The following text is from an amazon reviews dataset which was part of a project I worked on this past summer as part of my internship at the Idaho National Laboratory.

I hope a lot of people hear this cd. We need more strong and positive vibes like this. Great vocals, fresh tunes, cross-cultural happiness. Her blues is from the gut. The pop sounds are catchy and mature.
I'm reading a lot of reviews saying that this is the best 'game soundtrack' and I figured that I'd write a review to disagree a bit. This in my opinino is Yasunori Mitsuda's ultimate masterpiece. The music is timeless and I'm been listening to it for years now and its beauty simply refuses to fade.The price tag on this is pretty staggering I must say, but if you are going to buy any cd for this much money, this is the only one that I feel would be worth every penny.
The music of Yasunori Misuda is without question my close second below the great Nobuo Uematsu.Chrono Cross OST is a wonderful creation filled with rich orchestra and synthesized sounds. While ambiance is one of the music's major factors, yet at times it's very uplifting and vigorous. Some of my favourite tracks include; "Scars Left by Time, The Girl who Stole the Stars, and Another World".
Probably the greatest soundtrack in history! Usually it's better to have played the game first but this is so enjoyable anyway! I worked so hard getting this soundtrack and after spending [money] to get it it was really worth every penny!! Get this OST! it's amazing! The first few tracks will have you dancing around with delight (especially Scars Left by Time)!! BUY IT NOW!!
There's a reason this CD is so expensive, even the version that's not an import.Some of the best music ever. I could listen to every track every minute of every day. That's about all i can say.
I was a dissapointed to see errors on the back cover, but since I paid for the book I read it anyway. I have to say I love it. I couldn't put it down. I read the whole book in two hours. I say buy it. I say read it. It is sad, but it gives an interesting point of view on church today. We spend too much time looking at the faults of others. I also enjoyed beloved.Sincerly,Jaylynn R
When you hear folks say that they don't make 'em like that anymore, they might be talking about "BY THE SEA". This is a very cool story about a young Cuban girl searching for idenity who stumbles into a coastal resort kitchen gig with a zen motorcycle maintenance man, three hysterical Italian chefs and a Latino fireballing right handed pitcher who plays on the team sponsored by the resort's owner. As is often the case she 'finds' herself through honest, often comical but always emotional, interaction with this sizzling roster of players. With the perfect mix of special effects, that salsa sound and flashbacks, BY THE SEA, gets 4 BIG stars from me!
Excellent stockings for long shifts on your feet - not too tight, not too loose...garment integrity is longer than package states (with proper care).
Steven Wardell's book is a pure delight and I've recommended itto friends of all ages. In Rising Sons and Daughters, we learn thatJapanese young people are preserving their country's tradition of respect for their elders while also creating their own identity as Japan's "Generation X". Like our own young people, they are bombarded with some of the excesses of "Western culture" - Clothing fads, rock groups, a culture of shopping, etc. What they seem to be developing, however, is a healthy hybrid of old and new that retains a firm foundation in good values. The Ando family members are wonderful, memorable people and Stevern Wardell writes poignantly about their lives and hopes of each of them.
I heard a song or two and thought same o same o,but when i listened to songs like "blue angel","lanna" and 'mama" the hair just rose off my neck.Roy is trully an amazing singer with a talent you don't find much now days.
Greetings. Kodak also has a K6000 charger which comes with 4 NiMH 2100 mAh batteries. Two batteries charge is 64 minutes and 4 batteries charge in 140 minutes. The problem is that Amazon doesn't carry them YET. Good bye.
These will more than pay for themselves, they are perfect for my GPS which will drain a cheap battery in less than an hour.btw the charger did come with 1850 batteries.
This is an excellent product. I bought this for my digital camera. It has a great battery life per charge. Charger is handy to carry.
You said "...but the charge only lasts a very short time."Did you know that new Ni-MH batteries must be cycled 3 to 5 times before they hold a full charge? This does not mean that they should be charged 3 to 5 times in a row but rather that for the first 3 to 5 charge/discharge cycles, the batteries reach a higher charge level each time until they are recharged until they finally reach their rated capacity. This may be your problem. Try doing this and you might be pleasantly surprised.
It's just awesome, even better than what you can read online about using dramatica of Armando. If you want to use Dramatica - and don't want to get lost eventually - you really, really, really need this guide to get to some point you can call your plot really a plot. This book just makes you very, very happy. For it will boost your efforts to really WORK with dramatica. I only wish we had had that book ten years before. So I do highly recommend it. Even if you aren't a native speaker like me, having german as my mother tongue. I would never have made it with the DRAMATICA SOFTWARE if I haven't had this book. Believe me. It's worth every Cent (I payed in Euro). Though I tried very hard for roundabout 2 years I was coming to fail with Dramatica 4.0. This book saved my ass. Let it save yours too. It's making me happy. Thank you so much, Armando. Greetings from Germany, Cologne
After reading several reviews on this item, I purchased it as a Christmas gift. My brother liked it a lot, so I decided to get one for my wife and me. I'm really glad I did. It's pretty easy to set up and use, and the playback is excellent in both the VCR and DVD modes. The remote also operates my JVC TV. This is a great choice if you're looking for a quality combination player from a trusted name in electronics.
This VCR/DVD was an early Christmas present to myself after deciding to join the rest of the world in DVD-land but not wanting to let go of my VHS movies quite yet. Based on the reviews and price, and because I own a JVC TV, this was my choice. I agree with the easy set-up. It's a bit awkward to work the whole TV/VHS/DVD selection options but I think I've gotten the hang of it.Two comments: it's not intuitive and actually is pretty complicated (too many buttons on the remote but that might please others who are more technically-minded than me) so I've had to rely heavily on the how-to manual. And setting the VCR timer is awkward -- you can't enter the start and end time but have to scroll (unless I'm missing something)...but those are my only complaints. This is a good product for your $$$.
I got this machine primarily for the DVD with MP3 playback. It turns out, that most DVD players with MP3 capability don't allow you to select "random" playing of the tracks!??? I replaced my 12 year-old CD player and my sub-par VCR with this one machine. I'm very happy with it so far, although I wish it had another component input in the back. The DVD playback is awesome. The VCR playback seems fine as well, although since getting TiVo, I don't really use it that much. I recommend this to anyone who wants a versatile player of good quality.
Many useful concepts of digital compression can be found in this book. It is easy to read and understand, especially for students and engineers in EE.
It seems somebody was complaining for the printing quality. This is not a calculus book. If you take most theoretical books, and certainly most Springer's book, they don't have nice full color Barney images. This is technical (mostly theoretical) stuff. There is, in my opinion, no problem with the printing at all, clear, quality monochromatic printing.With respect to the contents of the book, it has almost everything you may want to know about Vector (and even Scalar) quantization and Signal compression. It was a great help while I was writing my doctoral thesis. Gray is probably one of the most respected authorities in the field.
It seems that authors have pictures unrelated to content of the text repeatedly printed. It does not cover major topics, such as .gif/ graphic file compression. On the positive side it is well-written, organized, multiple equation in some chapters, descriptive in others. Very little mathematical proof.
After you watch a few episodes, it will be fairly clear to you who the two central characters are. If you enjoy a fitting but bleak ending, stop at Season 3, Episode 5. But if you prefer romantic comedies, view through 3/5 then skip to Season 4, Episode 3, as the final act.
What can I say? It works. This helped me when applying to law schools. A great guide to utilize. Cutting a great score on the LSAT is just part of the equation to get into law school.
Wondering what the hell has happened to the moral aspect of modern American culture ? This book is a lucid, well argued explanation of the simple fact that we have become so totally focused on our individual RIGHTS that we have completely ignored, and even mocked, our personal and public responsibilities. The final response and indictment of Robert Ringer's best seller, LOOKING OUT FOR #1. This is a great time for anyone who is disgusted with the boorish state of American media, politics and discourse in general, to clear their heads for the substantial challenges that lie before us not only as Americans, but as human beings. A great book
Piper has a passion for the glory of Christ that is contagious. I've watched these videos multiple times and glean something from it every time. Amazing that he presents this MEATY material to a youth group and they are transfixed the entire time.I don't really care for the youth interviews, but I understand given the format of the original presentation. I've used this in a men's group and all enjoyed the material and we had some great discussions.I'd recommend to anybody. The humility and genuine concern of Piper toward his audience is refreshing against some of the other more famous "christian leaders" today.
if you love thunderbirds or any of anderson's productions,you will love this cd! a collection of songs from and inspired from his fab shows from the 60's thru today long live gerry!
We purchased this book based on a recommendation to create our own sourdough "start". The book is detailed and very informative. We have enjoyed creating our own sourdough start. It is amazing that you should leave the sourdough start on the counter for up to a year to have a stronger flavor.
Recieved this item in very fast time. was perfectely happy with shipper and sylvania lcd tv is excellent buy and works perfect. would do business with shipper anytime.
The Dk Travel guides are the best travel guides produced, each one a high quality illustrated encyclopedia on the country or city it represents. They are invaluable guides. The only disadvantage is that they are a bit on the heavy side, but the quality of printing and extensive range of color photos offsets that.
The Eyewitness Travel Guides in general provide lots of pretty pictures and are very nice, but if you want a handy, practical guide to TAKE WITH YOU on a trip you are much better off with the Rick Steves, Lonely Planet, Fodor's, or Frommer's series of travel guides. The other guides provide much better info on logistics like where to stay, where to eat, and transportation. Eyewitness (DK Publishing) makes great coffee table books, and that is what this book is. I recommend Rick Steves Best of Europe, or Lonely Planet's Europe on a Shoestring if you want a more useful guide.
The first 2 chapters of this book locked this reader to the pages like an arrow nocked to the string. The thoughts and feelings expressed by Howard Hill as he came to full draw on each of his adventures put me in the saddle or atop the mountain looking through his eyes. Any archer's heart will race at the reaccounting of each hunt, but only archers of traditional caliber will be able to appreciate the flight of the arrow as it's loosed and hits its intended mark. The bond between fellow hunters is well expressed and gives proper account to the knowledge and wisdom passed down at the campfire by older more experienced hunters. But for the fact that Howard Hill has accomplished things with his bow that I wouldn't begin to consider, I found it difficult to associate with some of his underwater adventures.
I have no quarrel with the book itself. Wanted a copy for a long time. However, I purchased a used book with the understanding that it was a "Signed Copy." The copy I received WAS NOT autographed. This is a disappointment. If you advertise it as an autographed copy, don't substitute one that isn't. Leaves me in serious doubt regarding furture purchases. I'd appreciate some clarification. Regards, Elmer Kurrus
did you know this software has been arwarded for parents choice arward 2002 i try this software and it's1# creativity for girls to imspire art in time.
Got the game for my daughter when she was four and she LOVES it. She finished it rather quickly and the games are not particularly difficult or educational, but she still occasionally likes to play it. It's a beautiful game. I wrote this review because the game froze on us as well. I had to update our video card driver and it has worked perfectly since. Hope this helps.
I bought this software for my 5-year old daughter for Christmas. She and her twin sister, along with their 4-year old sister, LOVE this game!!! They love everything about it, from the theme song at the beginning, to finding Prince Stefan in the maze at the end. I will admit, it's not super educational, but it does keep them entertained and it's nice to have a "fun" game once in awhile that doesn't require them to think too hard! It's also nice because they can leave the game midway, and return back to where they left off by clicking on their name. The names can also be deleted so that they can start a fresh game. They can restore the castle over and over again and have it be different every time. I think it was totally worth the money.
BARBIE AS RAPUNZEL: A CREATIVE ADVENTURE. I don't like Barbie, yet even with my negative attitude I appreciated the Barbie as Rapunzel adventure. This is a creative game in which the player must help Barbie free Prince Stefan from an evil spell by restoring a cursed and very run-down castle. The player takes Barbie around the castle and selects colors and patterns to decorate with magic paintbrushes and wands. Once each room is redecorated, Barbie retrieves a gem that will eventually be placed in the prince's crown to break the spell on him. The Barbie and Prince get to live in their renovated home - happily ever after, of course.
I confess to being a Hamelin fanatic! To me, Marc-Andre Hamelin is the best pianist performing today and I anxiously await new recordings by him. The Brahms is one of the greatest concertos ever written and it's one of my favorites. Hamelin plays it supperbly and the orchestra, under Litton's leadership, provides exceptional support. This is a "must have" CD for anyone who loves great piano playing. The Hyperion sound is fabulous, as usual too.
This is an excellent learning tool. It starts with basic shapes, then numbers, and then addition and subtraction. All done in a simple puzzle format. Wonderful to use one on one with two to four year olds. The whole concept is very basic, but the skills are extremely necessary and this is a great start.
As is the case with most adidas products I've owned, my 3-stripe fleece pants are made for style, fit, and durability. They are just the right weight of fabric for those cool winter mornings in Southern California (not so for 85degree summer days, when I'll stash them away for cooler days to come). My size is somewhere between a medium and a large. These adidas pants are amply cut, but maybe a tad too roomy for my particular build. A medium would probably be restrictive when I'm doing calesthenics or some weight exercises. This being said, I am nevertheless very happy with this product and with Amazon's superior service.
I just don't get it - SOULWAX has been around since the 90s, when they released their "rock" debut (on the now defunct Almo Sounds), chock full of should-have-been radio hits, and then when while they got some attention for their "2 Many DJs" mash-up/remix bootlegs, when they return to a full-fledged band, as with last year's ANY MINUTE NOW, critcs & consumers alike barely took notice of that album's amazing writing, production, and sheer electro-rock power. Hopefully, "Nite Versions" (a cheeky title recalling when 80s bands like Duran Duran used to release "Nite Version" on 12" of singles for clubs) will garner more sales and attention for SOULWAX - the songs practically leap out of the speakers to grab your neck and turn you head and make you move. Can't wait to hear what they do TIGA on his upcoming "Sexor" debut...?
I just love this album. Soulwax is great but this house/rave mix is even better. Can't stop moving while you listen to it.
This map is clear and informative, but more than that, it is beautiful to look at.Ordering it from the UK, I would have liked a quicker delivery option. But it arrived more or less when they promised -- if anything, a week sooner than I expected.Thoroughly satisfied with this purchase.
Wonderful! Karen Cummings writes a book that tells you all thebasics of cat care and tailors it to the Birman breed. The excellentphotographs enable the reader to see what a Birman really looks like. The history of the Birman, (Sacred cat of Burma), it's mythic legend is beautifully illustrated in the artworks that appear on page three and seven; "Mandela Cat" and "Temple of the Sacred Cat". I am the artist of these artworks and I am very impressed with the excellent reproductions produced by the publisher. In addition, as a Birman breeder for over 15 years I can and do highly recommend this book.
I really liked this one. I admit I had a little bit of a hard time getting into it a first. I have enjoyed all of the Avon true romance books, but the covers don't do much to promote themselves.
While I am still in the process of learning the Yoruba language, I think that this book is a nice beginners tool. Please keep in mind that the new book comes with to audio CD's that are MUCH NEEDED! So if you're considering buying the book used, fine, but be sure to ask if the CD's come with.Without the audio assistance, I'm not sure how great of a tool this will be in your journey to learn the beautiful language of Yoruba!Best,S
I recommend this book highly. I have a competitor's text also and while it is useful, I appreciate the format of Beginner's Yoruba which is interactive. The companion CDs that come with this book are simply outstanding. I especially enjoy the fact that the book is respectful of ALL religions.As an update after using the CDs for a few weeks, it is true that the speaker who speaks fastest on the CD does make many mistakes. I noted errors on greetings. These are rather odd to say the least. However, I still think this is a great source! My toddler is learning right along with me and she demands I play the CD everyday! As we repeat phrases, I simply correct the errors. I really appreciate the different participants on the CD and the dialogues which are authentic and properly contextualize the vocabulary.The phrase "O'ngbiyanju" is priceless!
This is an AWESOME game! Almost everyone know tic-tac-toe so it is EASY to learn and quick to play. You can't play just once! The twist is that your pieces are slightly different sizes - just big enough to gobble up your opponent. The first person to make tic-tac-toe wins, but it's not as easy as it looks when you're stuck in the mindset of just making three in a row and forget about the gobbling possibilities! My 4 and 5 year olds will beat me even when I'm trying to win! Excellent beginning critical thinking game. Grandparents loved playing it with the kids too.
I bought this game to bring down to my vacation home, a new game that the kids do not have at home. Every time we go to the house, the kids want to play Gobblet first! It is just like tic-tac-toe, but you can eat up your opponent's pieces with your own larger pieces. It is a game of strategy. My 7 year old enjoys beating her 17 year old cousins in this game, before they figure out how to do it. My 5 year old can beat his cousins as well. I would recommend it.
After doing alot of researching and reading reviews I purchased Kelly's Pet Parade and it is fabulous.My four year old daughter has has no problems playing it without any supervision. Ability to use the mouse is important.She can keep the different activities as simple or as elaborate as she wants to.When you want to do a new parade you have to use a different name (susie2 etc.) or erase the saved parade.The whole thing is just darling and fun to play. My daughter has to do 30 minutes of a math or alphabet game before she can play Kelly's Pet Parade. So, she likes it so much that using it as a reward has worked.
This cd is soooo cool. Especially the non-stop megamix the transitions are perfect, but you could be annoyed by the constant voice of the announcer. Some of what he says is very corny but you should be able to live with it (Especially when you're playing the actual game). All in all it's a great CD and a great buy.
King James by Ryan Jones is a biography of Lebron's James' life prior to going into the NBA. It tells about how a little kid who lived in poverty with his mother goes on to become a six foot eight inch 245 pound high school basketball superstar. Lebron has to deal with the pressure of the media and go against tough opponents almost every game. Somehow he is able to handle all of this and all the other obstacles in his life. This is an entertaining book to read and I reccommend it to anyone who is a fan of Lebron James or is interested in reading about the rising star. The author does a great job of telling how Lebron is on and off the court. After reading this book you will come to respect Lebron as a basketbal player and a person.
LO QUE PENSE QUE NO ME INTERESABA SABER SOBRE EL BOX Y SUS CAMPEONES...PERO ME CAUTIVO Y LO LEI HASTA EL FINAL !AHORA SI PUEDO DISCUTIR DE BOX CON MI ESPOSO Y MIS CUÑADOS...¡Y HASTA CON MI SUEGRO, QUE ES EX BOXEADOR !
Oh's has been my favorite cereal as a kid and still is an essential staple of my college diet. It's absolutely f'ing delicious.
This book has been completely instrumental in guiding my husband in his timberframing pursuits. He has read it so much the cover and binding have fallen off and broken! But he holds on to it because it's the BEST reference for a DIYer to look to when starting your structure.
Dated (1980's) so don't expect a lot of current technology for this ancient craft. A pretty good read and part of my collection. This book is also co-authored by Sobon. Of the three (Build a Classic Timber-Framed House, Timber Frame Construction: All About Post-and-Beam Building and this one), you need this one the least. Interesting history but not so much on the construction aspect.
If you've played this game in the arcade and liked it, then you'll definitely like this version to play at home whenever you like. You don't need a supercomputer to run it and the graphics and controls are amazing and faithful to the incredibly fun and fast arcade experience. This version also has plenty of unlockables, which you get by playing and earning miles, as well as mini-games that are a fun diversion from the classic arcade game. It has the European-themed levels of Outrun2 and the America-themed levels of Outrun2 SP, for a total of 30 stages to race through in the classic Outrun-branching style, or sequentially, or with challenges such as beating rival racers. This game is affordable, fun, and has plenty of replay value. You may not want to play it for hours and hours, but you'll keep coming back to it if you like to get a speedy arcade fix every now and then.
I really enjoyed playing this game when I went to the arcade. They preserved the arcade feel and kept it very simple. It is a fast paced game that is fun for everyone.
Love this book. Lots of patterns and instructions. Can't wait to start woodburning projects. Borders and patterns are just lovely!!!
this is a good book for more of the advanced pyrographer rather than the beginner the designs are really great though
Isaac Bashevis Singer was no doubt one of the greatest short story writers - ever! The various collections in the end also earned him a very well deserved Nobel Prize for literature in 1978. Several of his stories were first published in magazines like The New Yorker, Encounter and Playboy. The first collection I read was Passions and Other Stories, which immediately made me realise what a master Isaac Bashevis Singer was. Later I have read several of his novels and short stories, where especially the collections Gimpel the Fool, Short Friday and The Seance are at least as good as Passions. All a magnificent world of Isaac Bashevis Singer's saints and sinners. Sad, funny, ironic, poignant and seeming to come from Singer's pen without any efforts. This is what good short stories is all about!
I bought this Handycam 10 years ago. I stopped using it for whatever reason. But I recently set out to convert the video I had taken with this to digital. Not only was it easy, but the quality of the picture was amazing...even playing it on my 40 inch screen. The image is so much better than my phone new camcorder.
This is a good cable to have. You don't need to subscribe to the data service to download/upload pictures and ringtones to your phone. This cable pays for itself in about one month.
I received "free" access to the BA web page (all links) with my subscription...however, about every 3rd time I logged on, my username was declared invalid. I had to contact them several times before the problem was fixed. (It was fixed three times, and then it would fail again). The customer service people were friendly and helpful, but it was a little painful to have to keep asking for help.Outside of that - this is a great publication for people that are into fantasy baseball leagues that allow you to draft minor leaguers - or "long term keeper" leagues....or if you are just a fan of baseball and really like to learn a lot about the up and coming player.I'd give it 5 stars if it wasn't for the internet problem.....
I love the Peek-a-blocks sets that are out there and I was excited to see the alphabet set available. Every child should have a set of alphabet blocks and these are so much more fun than the basic wood ones. A few people have said that the letter obstructs what is inside, but I don't really agree. While they do have the letter on the one side, you get three other sides to view the inside object just fine. And isn't the point of the alphabet block the letter anyway? It is nice that it comes in a reusable case with a handle too. Just make sure and do your research before you bought. I did some digging around online and got this set for only $25!
Love These! However, do not buy these with the big block activity center, they don't work! A bit dissapointing. But the blocks are really cute and I do like them a lot!
What can I say about this book that hasn't already been said? It's an invaluable resource for both published and non-published writers alike. The only complaint I have is that I would have liked to have seen a CN designation for "Creative Non-Fiction."
The book came within 5 days Yeah!!! It was in perfect condition. This is a great read!
I purchased these for a Halloween party, and then...like a dummy, I forgot to put them up! Nevertheless, I did hold them up around the house in search of a good place to hang them. They're pretty big and look really cool. I'd say there's a little bit of educational value too, as you can teach your children about the actual pictures they're depicting. Even though I forgot to hang them up, I really liked these scene setters and I'll be using them next year!
If you do this video regularly, you will see results. I've used it before on weight-loss plans and I have always been able to see my body change. Because of the warm up and cool down, I never got sore. And even when I was 150 pounds overweight, I could still do the video. It's my all time favorite.
I surft on this book out of mild curiosity. But reviews like the three posted here convince me that the book must be well worth reading. So I'm buying it. Thanks, team! (I apologize for the 5 stars, since I haven't read it yet. But the program wouldn't let me post this comment without a rating. I'll get back to y'all when I'm finisht reading the book.)
I bought this book for my husband. He follows it faithfully, and you can see the results in our yard. We have the most beautiful, lush grass in the neighborhood - which seems to be a miracle, since our yard was an overgrown field just two years ago. Jerry Baker provides simple ways to establish and maintain your lawn. I also appreciate the fact that we do not have to go to a gardening store to find the items recommended in his book.
I saw this at a store and the cover is probably the best i've seen in a long time. However, you cannot judge a horror movie but it's cover. 9 out of 10 times the movie will suck. Mask Maker is about a couple who buy a home in the middle of nowhere. A long time ago the woman who lived there was accused of being a witch and was killed by the towns people and so was her baby. Her husband whoses face was horribly burned saw the entire event, I might have missed something. Anyways, the man unearths a stick in the graveyard behind there house and the man is resurrected. If you're a person who needs to see someone killed every ten minutes, then this movie is not for you. It's slow placed but the kills are well done. The killer looks like the new Leatherface without muscles. The ending was a typical slasher ending and I guess there will be another part made. I'd welcome a sequel since this did have potential.Overall, a good horror movie that was a little slow paced.
I liked the film it has what every horror likes in this type of movie the suspense,mystery,good and bad times,plus a shocking ending that makes you think that there is more to story, and plot was very good Robert.
This movie was a horror film thhat displayed an effort to steer clear of typical horror movie dialogue and pacing. There are no blonde girls and the girls that are here don`t trip over the tree roots in the yard. Now a white girl did fall and twist her knee in the movie but guess what? It was not on a tree root!!!
I wanted a book that could give me a guide to Chinese Medicine that would help me understand what it is and how it linked with the things I have picked up in my life. Thank you for the author and producers of this book for going a long way to helping me achieve a basic and fundamental understanding of the subject.There may well be other books on the topic of equal merit, I simply have read few.In Love and Light
This games makes even amazing games like starcraft and warcraft redundant. Warhammer has it all and does it better than anyone else. Truly great game, total fun, great combat, graphics, races, units, a pleasure to play.
Released after 'green' in 1979, this album of what was then considered experimental electronic music, now called 'ambient', is a seminal document in the field. more joyous and uplifting, and more engaging principally than others experimenting in the field at the same time, these two performances contain beautiful and melodic synth textures over which Hillage provides some liquid guitar work. it would take 12 years before Hillage would pursue this direction again in system 7 and climb the electronic heights.
The original version of this CD (On Caroline Records) was wonderful. The reason I purchased the remastered version was in hopes that it would have bonus tracks on it. Contrary to the product description, there are NO bonus tracks on this CD, hence the four-star rating.
I like this pillow very much. I was in an accident when I was younger and I have trouble using most pillows, but this one is very good for me. If I move around too much and I sleep in a weird position it's not good, but that happens with every pillow.
this is a rockin game its fun and you can even skate in the sky. i love choosing from like 30 outfits. i ordered from online(well my mom did it for me)and it took 3 weeks to get here and when it came i was sad because people said its a bad game but it wsant dont listen t anyone its soooooooo much fun!!!!!
This cd comes from the Memorial Album of the Musical 7 - Kaguya Shima Densetsu which stars famous idol, Fumina Hara as Sailor Moon. This is Fumina Hara's second stage playing sailor moon in the sailor moon musicals and this is the last cd released from her stage. This contains many popular songs but it is the first and only ever memorial musical cd released without the sailor moon musical's theme song, La soldier. Besides this, this cd (although not the best one) contains many good songs including Link, I do Justice, and Everlasting Moonlight. There are slow songs on this cd, but most of them are up beat songs. This cd contains beautifully arranged songs as well as good battle songs. :)
I have had this album on my 'must buy' cd list for some time and I finally got around to making the purchase in 2004. All I can say is that I should have purchased it earlier.A wash of alternative-rock-country-blues etched with dark and somber imagery. However it's not melancholic, just quietly introspective and laid-back.Works very well with a cup of coffee/tea, a newspaper and a lazy Sunday afternoon.
I bought a couple of the singles and one of the triples and they all work perfectly. I'm disappointed the triple is not available and may not be. Use them in my office where the triple handles the three lamps, and in the house where three singles are with three different lamps in the bedroom, home office and basement. Makes it nice to turn all the lights on from one place (my desk in the office) or from the door so you don't have to walk into a dark room and grope for the lamp switch. Used daily for about 6 weeks and going strong. I've had others in the past and they have lasted years and years. These are nicely made and seem durable. Mounting is a good idea so you don't end up groping for the remote in the dark!
This is 1 of da bst books dat i have EVER read! @ my school, we are doing a play on this & im playin Mary-Lynette. i cant wait 2 get to the last chapters when they finally give in 2 each other! Gr8 books!
Hey every one how did you like this book. It was the best book I have ever read of the L.J Smith.
I loved this book very much!It was excellent.I absoloutly fell in love with Jeremy.He was such a sweet,nice guy.I thought it was unfair that he died.The last few times I read this book I had tears streaming down my face.I really don't think he was crazy just misunderstood.This is a must read book. Once you pick it up you can't put it down.
This book was great and I just loved Ash. It should have 5 stars from everyone. And you have to read it. It was great. I did not like what happened to Jeremy but it was still the best book in the Night World series! It keeps you reading to the end. You will not put it down. I hope you read it for your sake. So read it!!
I've read all of L.J Smiths books up until TheHuntress,which of course isn't out yet,and Ihave to say, that Daughters of Darkness wasprobably the best Night World so far. I'mobsessed with Ash,and Mary-Lynette was just awesomeANYBODY AND EVERYBODY MUST READ THIS BOOK
Daughters of Darkness is quite possibly the best book in the new NIGHT WORLD series by L. J. Smith. It does not just revolve around one supernatural being or one singular person, it has interesting information on the werewolves of the NIGHT WORLD and the plot line is out of sight. I own all of the books in the series (Up untill Soulmate that is) and so far Daughters of Darkness is the best one. I only hope the following books in this wonderful series are as great as this one!!
This second book in the Night World series does not compare with the first, but is good in it's own right. The three sisters are intriguing, and Ash, who was introduced in the first book, does a turnabout and becomes a guy any girl would want to marry. Overall, this book was very good, and for the vampire lover, a must read
This book was the best out of the whole series. The book was pretty much about Rowan, Jade, and Kestrel, three girl vampires that just had enough of the Night World. Mary-Lynnette is a small town girl who loves to look at the stars, but has nobody to look at the stars with her. Ash is a tall, lanky, and elegant vampire that has to find his sisters and bing them back home. But of course his sisters had told Mary-Lynnette and her brother, Mark, bout the Night World. Another twist in the story is that Ash and Mary-Lynnette are soulmates. If this story couldn't get anymore exciting there is a vampire killer running around town. All six of them has to figure out who this vampire killer is and stop him. Meanwhile Ash and Mary-Lynnette has to figure out what to do about each other. If you like or are obsess with vampires (Like me!)you should read this book.
You might have read a lot of vampire-romance novels but this one certainly rates a 10. The story itself has a good plot and amazing characters to suit their purposes. The three sisters, Rowan, Kestrel and Jade, uncannily beatiful, are actually fugitives from Night World and their brother Ash is sent to take them home. Both male and female lead role are superb. Their roles fit them perfectly. Ash, a vampire whose whole life changed after finding his soulmate is a human and Mary-Lynette a girl with a strong character who wasn't really willing to accept the fact that Ash is her soulmate. And of course...the way the authour tells her story and the words she uses..it's absolutely incredible.
This book is incredible. It had me hooked from the very beginning. Why does everyone always say that they're in love with Ash? He's a great character, but not perfect in any way. Okay, ehough chit-chat. Read this book, I am serious. Rowan (my favorite!), Kestral, Jade, and Mary-Lynnette are just about the strongest female characters I have read in some time. I can find no flaw in any part of this book, and if you haven't already, READ IT!
This book is my favorite one. I've read it eight times. All of L.J. Smith's books are fantastic; she's my absolute favorite writer. Her writing style is very natural and realistic and her characters are so real, you start looking for them in real life. I fell in love with Ash, especially in how, even though he's a fierce vampire, he's completely helpless when it comes to Mary Lynette. Smith writes the most wonderful characters. I never liked fantasy or romance novels, but her books are a notable exception. My friends think I'm crazy because I'm in college and I'm still reading YA books, but, I'm telling you, her books are ageless!!! If you haven't read this, you're definitely missing out!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
I have been a fan of L.J. Smith ever since book one of _The Vampire Diaries_. With each of her books you can honestly BELIEVE that what she is writing about is the truth, even if the characters are ficticious. Dughters of Darkness (as well as any Night World book or the Vampire Diaries trilogy) should be required reading for anyone who believes in Vampires (or thinks they are one *grin*). Happy reading
As with the previous two singles from her sorely overlooked BODY LANGUAGE set, Minogue manages to go for something light years away from what many consider her given forte', that being straight up dance music. It's a shame that the singles from the album have met with only modest success(and the album itself even less so). This is another first-rate track, probably the best on the album, though I must say the re-recorded single version dwarfs in comparison to the magnificent album version, which may have not been considered "commercial" enough for radio.The remixes here are fine, the bonus track "City Games"(rumored to be the original choice as the album's title track) not so much, and the video lovely. Unfortunately, this looks to be the last single from BL--I suspect in the not-so-distant future we will witness the return of Disco/Dance Kylie with a "Can't Get You Out Of My Head" beat pulsing not too far behind.
Fine. Boys and the toys or trains I forget how many times kids can watch a movie and then watch it again
My son enjoys watching Thomas and Friends. It's one of the only shows he will sit still for. Having 10 years of the best shows for him to watch is a joy and a treat for him.Thanks again,James Rivers Jr.
Bought it for my 2.5 year old niece and she loved it. Dinner got easier with this disc.I think it should work fine for just any kid that age.
My youngest grandson is into Thomas and he will watch this video as well as others over and over as long as it is Thomas and all his friends.
Marking the 10th Anniversary of Thomas videos (certainly NOT the stories themselves), this sampler covers a fine cross-section of Thomas adventures (though they are presented out of order), musical numbers (all catchy and certain to infect your child's brain along with yours), and interviews with people of all ages visiting "A Day Out With Thomas." I was fortunate enough to catch one of these outings a few years backs, but since I am a parent of a child with a severe developmental disability, I got more of a chance to "experience" the day on the video than I did in person.Anyway, this is a nice hour of Thomas magic and a good introduction to see whether Thomas is right for your child. Highly recommended here.
Ripe political satire is experienced in camping Cosmos during 1986 where the apathetic beach campers are more interested in the beauty contest, the closeted gay exercise coach, eating french fries and watching soccer games on the big screen TV than the tirades of a visiting writer along with a frustrated anarchist and his former girlfriend who is also a terrorist sympathizer. The writer gets a pie in his face in a radio interview and the anarchist finally gets a hearing of his propaganda between rounds of a boxing match. Two youngsters fall in love at a sweethearts dance. Of course, the big draw to this film is a brief appearance of late adult film star Lola Ferrari who made the Guinness Book of Records title for having the world's largest breasts. The fantasy scenes featuring her are more attractive than you would expect.
I take 3 at night be for I got to bed, it helps me rest better!! TRY IT!! AND THE PRICE IS OK
Perfect carry-along for my notebook PC. Useful grounded and protected indicators. Small investment for critical protection. I have used APC products for quite a number of years and have found them reliable.APC P1T 120V Portable Surge Protector
This protector is an excellent value. Rated very highly in consumer publications. Great price from Amazon. I bought this to protect my new 55 inch LG flat screen.
These are great pants. They are really comfortable and easy to care for. I'm saving money too because I don't have to take these to the dry cleaners. I love the "Individual Fit" waste band. Who wouldn't like pants that fit a larger waste size without making you admit the weight gain by buying the larger size.
The pants are very soft and comfortable. The color holds up fairly well, but I do wish the darker colors held better. I do recommend them.
Product arrive well ahead of schedule, met expectations, and price was better than local retail.
This book is a remarkable exposition of the importance of the information-theoretical concepts in the understanding of chemical analysis, as well as a guide for practical usage of these powerfull mathematical and conceptual tools. The main merit of the book is the clear and rigorous analysis of many laboratory metodologies and systems, which makes evident the adequacy of information-theoretical concepts in description and analysis. It covers a great amount of the analytical chemistry scope, with subjects like: -IDENTIFICATION OF COMPONENTS -QUALITATIVE -QUANTITATIVE ANALYSIS, both single and multiple -OPTIMIZATION of strategies -QUALITY ASSURANCE -STRUCTURE ANALYSIS -CHEMOMETRICS
This is a great leap pad book. My 4 yr old son loved it instantly. The familiar characters from the Bob the Builder show make this book lots more fun than the ones featuring the Frog. I especially liked the fact that this book helps to teach that teasing is not a nice thing to do. There are at least 2 games on every page and it has the music from the show also. It is definitely worth the price and I hope they make more Bob the Builder books for the Leap Pad.
This is an extraordinary compilation of texts of environment and economics that constitutes a very helpful book to decision makers. I work for environment and always check this book to take the best decision, because its contents are wide enough for diferent topics of environmental problems.
I loved this book! Dating a chef now who is as passionate about his food and life as Bruno makes this book a complete treat. I was hungry with every page. The descriptions of the food and emotions are insipring and delicious.So worth the read! Have to go eat now!
I didn't like the ending, the characterization leave something to be desired, and the writing didn't make me think, but, oh I didn't notice any of that (Well, except for the ending) at the time, or even until substatially after it was all over. During, I read and read, bathing in the glorious food descriptions, not to mention the allure of Italy. Oh Yes!
I had just finished reading 'The Food of Love' by Anthony Capella since I had nothing to do, but read. Mind you, reading is one of my favorite pastimes.I had recently bought a series of books. The Food of Love was just one of the books I just picked up so I can get that 'three for the price of two' deal at Waterstones in London (British's equivalent of Barnes&Noble;). I wasn't really interested, but it was one of the more interesting options I had. Well, I'm glad I made the right choice! I started reading it last night and I haven't put it down since.If you love food and a little romance, which I am both fond of, it's an excellent book to read. Mr. Capella was remarkably thorough in his description of the rich and textured Italian dishes that the words assails you with a sense of smell and taste that leaves you hungry for more. This book took me by surprise and I'm sure you would not be disappointed.
This is one of Cashmoneys best albums next to 400 Degreez and I got that work. I like to listen to dis when I`m ridin or gettin ready to go to work. It hypes me up. As a group, the hot boys were great. They all contribute something to the album make it sound hot. This album is a classic. Add it to your collection.
why dont more rappers do what cash money does? no matter whos album it is, they showcase the best mcs and production they can pull off. there is nothing wrong with other rappers but cash money does this well, while setting asside tracks for the individuals, the group is what really shines, without the bling bling. i promised myself to never to buy the bling bling bull, but after hearing this cd, i had to get it. especially songs like i need a hot girl, and we on fire. get this cd!!!
you need to listen to me and buy the hottest cd by the hot boys cause if you like rap like me and you just wanna keep it real leave it up to the hot boys all of cash money they are just off the hook Adam
THIS ALBUM HAS SOME OF THE TIGHTEST TRACKS I'VE HEARD IN A MINUTE. MY FAVORITE SONG IS I NEED A HOT GIRL. SICK UNCLE IS A VERY FUNNY SKIT. THE HOT BOYZ ALBUM COMES IN WITH A BOMB INTRO AND GOES OUT WITH A BANGING TRACK. I LOVE DA HOT BOYZ, ESPECAILY LIL' WAYNE, AND THEIR NEW CD.
This album is just more proof that Cash Money is one of the best record labels out there. It has the same kind of beats as the Juvenile and B.G. LP's. The Hot Boys combines those 2 artists with 2 newer talented artists, Lil Wayne and Turk. If Cash money keeps making albums like this, they will be as famous as No Limit, an 10 times better soon.
This album is really sweet, unfortunately, it has it's share of stupis songs. If you buy the album, you should figure out pretty quick which ones are worth it and which ones aren't. Forgetting all of the pointless songs, overall, this album rocks!
This a classic cd. The best cash money cd ever. Every song is off tha hook. Don't nobody want to see the HOT BOY$. All I have to say is can't wait till LET EM' BURN.
The Hot Boys tore it up on this one. They had hot tracks wit b.g., juvenile, lil wayne and others from cash money. Cash Money is gonna take over the music business baby!!!!!!!!
At first I was disappointed that this wasn't a longer book, but then I realized that it is great to give away to curious friends and parents as an introduction to Love and Logic. I just wish it was a little cheaper.
I have been struggling to have my children be more obedient and to stop arguing with and each other. They were unhappy, my husband was unhappy, and I was unhappy. This book gave us not only some general strategies but also some suggestions on what to say in various situations. We are making great progress and the children are using it at school. We are becoming a more happy family!!
This is a book for all parents or parents to be, all people thinking of having children. Love and Logic is a program to help you be a more effect parent, raising responsible children. It can also be used on co workers and the rest.
This is a great CD!! I love WeiB Kreuz!! The anime is awsome! Its bout 4 guys (hhhooottt) who work at a flower shop, but at night they are the White Hunters (or Byce as in the anime) they are assasins that "hunt the tomorrow" of Bad guys, the bad guys the police cant get . Like when teens start blowing up in flames in public for no reason... from a strange gas substance that w/ instant contact ingulfs any object... but i couldnt resist. Its also an emotional anime at times! I think this is a Cd and Anime any anime fan should see...
Many parts of this book are difficult to understand for the beginning and intermediate user. It is an informative, advanced reference; the only one needed for an experienced website creator. There are no color examples of what the HTML language produces, making some of it difficult to piece together if you are not experienced.
I should just leave it at that, but I won't. When I got this book I was completly blind to the world of HTML, but now I have mastered it. This book starts off teaching the basics, like how to start your HTML document with the HEAD and BODY tags, and goes all the way into using HTML tables to design your website and using HTML forms. By the end of the book, I knew everything, and was able to move onto more advanced subjects such as PHP or CGI-scripting. This book is the perfect way to get started if you're interested in pursuing a career in web development or application programming. However, if you are not interested in learning HTML, this book is not for you. It is a complete reference and you need to read the entire book to take advantage of it. If you really want to learn HTML then buy this book, because it will be the first and the last you will ever need.
This is just the best HTML book I've got my hands on. Just about everything about HTML techniques you could think about is covered in this book. StyleSheets, DHTML, forms, frames .. it's all covered. a MUST have for the HTML-creator The 99 edition is even better than the 98 edition, because the overviews are now sorted by browser, instead of alphabethically.
For such a fat book, I never dreamed I would read it from cover to cover. Everything you ever wanted to know about HTML is in this book. I am a beginner and this book has given me a great start.
This book is just spectacular!I have been a web developer for several years now, and I have read many books about HTML and related subjects. This book covers it all. But not only does the author cover HTML extensively, but he also covers XML, XHTML, CSS (extensively), CSS2, JavaScript, CGI, SSI, ASP, Coldfusion, and fonts.Many examples are given in both code and URL, discussion, and the thoroughness of the author's coverage, makes this a first-rate book, in my opinion.Most remarkably, the author discusses this subject matter very simply and in a way that anyone can understand (probably). I've honestly never read a technical book as lucid as this one. I highly recommend it!If that was not enough, the book contains about 500 pages of appendices, covering extensively every topic related to web development that one might need. I'm not saying you won't need any other books to make fabulous web pages, but this book is amazingly comprehensive. The author's web site is nice too.
Excellent novel about cultural/generational borderlands and the search for personal identity. Tells the story of three marginalised young outcasts who forge a strong bond of friendhip that helps see them through various life dramas. Teo is a highly intelligent writer who makes you care about her characters, she is also excellent at evoking the flavour of various cultures in her writing. A thought provoking tale of borders, boundaries and coming of age in the cultural melting pot of contemporary Australia, told with plenty of wit and heart.
Very good product. Got my as a gift a few years ago, and it works fine. While mine has mercury thermometers, it shouldn't make a difference from red spirit filled one. I keep it in the shop drawer, dig it out when I wonder abt the temp here in NW Fla, dampen the wick, give it a twirl for a couple of minutes, then read it. I spray a lot of lacquer, shellac, and varnish, and usually have to crank up the dehumidifier in the shop, especially in the summer months. All in all, Bacharach makes a very good and reliable tool.
I have the original soundtrack for FF6 But I still love this CD. Well, since it's not OST so don't expect to hear the original music you heard while playing game. All pieces are played by symphony orchestra and, as a classical music lover myself, I enjoy this CD as much as Vivaldi's Four Season!! Every song was well rearranged and perfectly presented in symphonic style...Warning!! if you're only gamers and don't think any classical music is worth listening, don't buy this CD.. But if you're classical music lovers as well, buy it..!! Whether or not you've ever played the game, the beauty of the music will make you not to regret every penny you spend..!!
It was easy to put together and works nice. Love sitting in it with my grandson and enjoying our time.
Speaking as a blonde I can say that this is EASY to put together.Some of the very best instructions I have seen anywhere. Great Buy and a beautiful product. It holds up to 550 pounds, so it will even hold most Americans!
Bought this as an anniversary gift for my parents knowing they needed seating out near a family pond. Looked at wicker, aluminum products etc., but knew this would stand the test of the elements. Easy to put together (less than an hour) and comfortable to sit in. Only complaint would be its appearance - very plain looking and the "putty" color = gray doesn't really help matters. If you don't care about aesthetics, purchase this bench for comfort and security in knowing it will last outside in the weather.
I was really happy to find out that I was still able to purchase Boone dry erase markers from Amazon. They are no longer sold in the local stores and I find that I like them much better than the Expo markers because of the "medium" or "bullet" point option that was offered. Expo does not offer this option. Delivery was fast and efficient. Thanks Amazon!
A good short album. Mostly comprised of bonus tracks from previous releases. Entombed always picks good unique cover songs and makes them their own. Good for fans of the band, and no it isn't death metal, it doesn't sound like Wolverine Blues either, grow up people. It is a better release than Same Difference which I didn't care for except a song here or there. I do respect Entombed for trying new sounds and for releasing something on a yearly basis, unlike most bands. Pick this one up.
My kids love the little critter books, and this is no exception. Great for my 3 year old, and even my 7 year old isnt bored too much by it. He enjoys reading it to his little brother at bedtime.
I have really enjoyed Ms. Feehan's Dark series, so was eager to read her new book. This is a true gothic with just enough paranormal elements to help build a relationship between the hero and heroine. Nicoletta has special "gifts" which her entire village tries to keep a secret, however, it is the presence of these gifts which draws Don Scarletti to her. He has "gifts" of his own. Nicoletta isn't immediately enchanted with the idea of marriage to the Don. Unlike some authors, who use the "I hate you!" temper tantrum to ignite passion between the main characters, Ms. Feehan uses the empathy and sensitivity of her characters to achieve it. The love scenes are wonderful, though not very plentiful. So if you're looking for the same amount and intensity of love scenes as in the Dark books, you may be dissappointed. I read this in one sitting and couldn't put it down. The story is riveting.
Though I still favor the carpathian series I really enjoyed this book. Christine Feehan still kept some of her supernatural writing which made this book stand out from others that write mystery romance. Her men are still wonderfully stubborn, know what they want and get it. Her women in her stories are still head strong, not whiny and give the men a challenge. I recommend this book to anyone , I finished it in 2 days. Now lets get back to the carpathian series, this only wets your appetite for more Christine Feehan books!!!!
This is a one to keep. Wonderfull story and plot. Full of dialogue between main characters with a sizzling romance. The plot keeps you turning the pages wanting more. Once again an excellent author.
this book was great.Like all of christine feehan's books,it holds your interest at every turn until the bitter end. you did not know who the perpetrator was until the bitter end.it held you on the edge of your seat to see if nicoletta was going to be seriously hurt or killed as were the scarletti brides.
My favorite of all time....Giovanni intrigued me soo much...i felt his love for nicoletta soo much i envied her..well written. GOOD WORK CHRISTINE
I love it! it is a great quality camera and does alot of stuff. It even hooks up to my computer and lets me do alot of stuff. I can edit videos or copy them off and even stream video like a web cam its great! Works well with WinXP. I bought from Amazon and they got it to me quickly even with the super saver shipping and the lowest price I could find with a free bag who can ask for more!
This is a great camera. I had an older Sony camera which I used Dazzle to bring my video to the PC. When I heard this camera had USB steaming I was excited. The quality and the images are really poor. It produces a very blocky MPEG-1 movie. There is also a post processing time in which PIXELLA converts the movie to MPEG. Dazzle USB brings in my movies faster with no post processing time, it also produces a MPEG-1 movie. Dazzle only pushes video through the USB and uses your sound card to bring in sound. This is in contrast to USB Streaming which pushs video and sound through the USB. I guess because of this architecture, the video bitrate must be lower because it is shared with the sound and thus produces a lower quality image.Other than that, the camera is excellent.
The picture on this camera is good and it needs very little light. However, the colors are not quite as accurate as I had hoped for Hi8. Perhaps digital would have been better, but the price was a factor. I shopped around and found Amazon had the best price available.
This is a great book for anybody who wants to understand what bar codes are, how they work, how to prepare a cost/benefit analysis and how to implement bar codes. Even if it is called Using Bar Codes in Distribution, it is as relevant for other applications.There are a some redundancies in this book that would need to be fixed in a reeddition. Also it would be nice if a reedition was done since it dates from 2000 and technology has evolved so much. But still, even without these improvements it is a great book.
Cruel and Unusual is the first Patricia Cornwell book I have got read and I for one loved it and I can't wait the read more of her books my boyfriend told me about Patricia Cornwell books he said I need to read Hornet's Nest and Southern Cross and those will be my next two book I will be reading and I will be reading them on my new IPad I got for Christmas I can't wait keep up the great writing Patricia and thanks to my boyfriend for telling me about this awesome writer.........RKsbabydoll
Received the book promptly and in great condition. Thank you Amazon for the opportunity to buy used books.
I really liked this book. It is a page turner for sure. I would read before I went to bed and have to force myself to find a stopping point. If the ending was written differently I would have given it 5 stars, but it was still fun to read.
Cruel and Unusual was another wonderful story by Ms. Cornwell. It was graphic in its detail but I stayed rivited to the end. I read everything she writes. None of it is boring and her knowledge of investigative procedures adds to the thrills of her stories.
Cornwall is a great author and in this book she starts out with a great plot. Just when your interest might be slipping, the story builds
The first 75% of this book is a 10. Cornwell sets up the perfect novel, albeit with her rather drab, reactive protagonist, but then suddenly swerves off the road and goes bonkers. For me the peak of the book was when Kay Scarpetta is threatened by the governor and is suspended from her job, but then Cornwell finds a way to tie this great, believable plot into, of all things, a Nazi war criminal, and that's where she totally lost me. Then there's absolutely no climax or showdown whatsoever. We just hear about the acts of the murderer second hand, and that was a big letdown, too
to follow her own work. A superb 'next in series' not to be skipped over. Great plot although I thought it came together too neatly at the conclusion. The author's ingenuity and thought processes have made both Cornwell and Dr. Scarpetta reading buddies of mine. You will love this novel if forensics and mysteries thrill you. I guarantee you will enjoy not only this one but the entire series.
I love reading all of her books I have read a few in the past, now I am going back and starting from the beginning and reading in order.
If you enjoy medical thrillers, you will enjoy this book. It is evident that Cornwell does her research on her subject & you gain useful information as you read.
Like the ones before, this book is a solid forensic and police procedural. A death row inmate is executed and his fingerprint later shows up in a current crime scene. How could that have happened? I particularly enjoyed seeing Kay's niece, Lucy, again, as she is 17 now and her own person, no longer a child. Lucy's computer skills continue to amaze. I look forward to reading the next in the series!(Note: There is a continuing bad guy introduced in this book who appears in the next two installments as well. I'd recommend reading this book before The Body Farm and From Potter's Field)
Patricia Cornwell is very clearly a well researched writer. She really knows her stuff when it comes to forensics. This ability of hers is reflected in the character of Kay Scarpetta, medical examiner. I kept reading in order to find out the links among the deaths of Robyn Naismith, Eddie Heath, Susan, and Jennifer Deighton. Most of my questions were answered, but I felt that there was WAY too much forensic evidence for my liking, and really did not enjoy this book.
Cruel and UInusalPatricia is an excellent writter and I love her books, but she sometimes leaves you a bit flat at the ending of the book
I really liked this book. It is a page turner for sure. I would read before I went to bed and have to force myself to find a stopping point.I think that Patricia Cornwell is at her prime in this novel.
I enjoyed 'Funny People' because it wasn't the typical silly comedy that has come out in over abundance lately. The film is much more serious than silly with good performances by all and has a sense of reality and truth throughout the story. Sandler leaves his goofy bag at home and lets his character become a more likeable and interesting person. The film avoids the many pitfalls of such films and leaves you satisfied and wanting more of these types of films. If you're looking for an insightful film with some good laughs, you'll probably like 'Funny People' but it you're looking for the usual Sandler shtick, you might want to pass on this one.
I am a stand-up fanatic. I enjoy the alternative comedians and the culture that have been cultivating in NY and LA lately. I consume the content of stand-ups like C.K., Cross, Tompkins, Glass, Jeselnik, Ansari, Posehn, Miller, and Holmes-to name a few. If you lean that way in your comedy preferences then my review will likely be applicable to you.I love this movie. You must go into it not knowing what to expect i.e. don't assume you know the movie will have the same feeling as knocked up. The characters are hilarious in their struggles and their actors are superb. Great director, great cast, and a hell of an perspective on alternative comedy.Lastly, buy the collector's edition. The bonus features are endless! If the film brings you down and you consequently reflect negatively on yourself, worry not, the second disc will right you. Just read the disc content and you'll be sold. Enough said.
This is by far Judd Apatow's most underrated movie. I think that most people went into it expecting the typical Apatow fare, but were disappointed when they realized it was one of the filmmaker's more mature efforts. The film has its share of laughs, as well as moments of sincere drama. Just put yourself in that mindset, and you'll really enjoy this movie.
I am big fan of Judd Apatow's work. i went into this hearing that its not like his other movies, that it has a more somber, serious tone. so my expectations were tempered. I liked it, i do agree with some other reviewers that it was probably a little too long, which is why I take off one star. But if you go in knowing this isnt a 40 year old virgin/knocked up style comedy then you wont be disappointed. with that being said, i can see why some people rated this poorly if thats what they thought they were going to see going in.
I was prepared to be disappointed, wasting another 2 hours of my life on yet another cookie cutter Hollywood product. The movie, while about half an hour too long, was quite entertaining, making you feel privy to the inner workings of the strange world of Hollywood. It was well written, funny, but not immature, at least not more immature than the actions of the characters, which felt real rather than scripted. Overall, a strong addition to the recent spate of good, mature comedies coming out of Hollywood - I am thinking Forgetting Sarah Marshall, Hall Pass, etc.
This is just a wonderful graphic novel with beautiful illustrations, an interesting story set in a different culture. I had not been a fan of graphic novels, but this was one of those that have convinced me that they can, like opera, enhance the experience by using a fusion of art forms. I highly recommend it.
Safr's beautifully illustrated tale of a traditional rabbi who loses his faith in the face of colonial assimilation and a secular cat who tells the tale is on the level of Will Eisner's Contract With God and Art Speigelman's Maus. American readers will certainly connect to the tale as an Algerian parallel to the intellectual journey of Mordecai Kaplan, the American Jewish thinker whose Judaism as a Civilization was penned at the same time of the setting of this fictional fable. Safr raises the ultimate post-Enlightenment question: What is the role of religion in the absence of a supernatual God who acts in history? He is the first writer, I believe, to have a street-smart house cat answer this question. Rabbi Daniel S. Brenner, Director, Center for Multifaith Education, Auburn Theological Seminary, NYC.
This was a book club selection and, at first, I thought it was simply a comic book. Wrong. This is a charming, thought provoking little book that can be read at many different levels. No wonder my rabbi was the one who suggested that we read this. If you understand the basics of Judiasm, you'll get more out of this book. But even if you are not, you will be charmed by this fanciful tale.
This was such and interesting book to read. It's about the one person who was the closest witness to the assassination of President Kennedy and how she was persecuted and finally redeemed. Namely Jean Hill. Her story needed to be told. It can't be ignored. She was filmed for Oliver Stone's movie titled JFK. She was cut from the theater production, but it is in the director's cut, which is the one you should see. It chronicles what lengths people will go to silence a dissenting witness. If you have ever seen the Zapruder film of the assassination, then you have seen Jean Hill. She was the woman standing on the curb in a red dress at the "moment".
This is one of the biggest bands in minneapolis right now. Recently added to AP's 100 bands you need to know in 05'. So get to know em before everyone else does. Great great music. For fans of Further Seems Forever, Jimmy Eat World, Death Cab For Cutie.www.purevolume.com/smalltownsburnalittleslower
For a first book that I read from this author it keeps your interest and give a lot of forensic pathology when describing what is going.
Prepare to keep the lights on tonight if you're reading "From Potter's Field"! Enter the dark, even sometimes humorous, world of Dr.Kay Scarpetta, a mystery solving sleuth where you don't expect it! Marino better watch out for his job.Suspense and terror reign through "Potter's Field" as well as suprise and intrigue. We once again encounter the evil Temple Gault and seek the identity of his latest victim. Its like mixing horror and mystery and getting the best of both worlds!If you didn't read this book on hardcover, pick it up now on paperback! Unless, of course, you chicken..
Not as spell binding as others in this series but still very good. It took getting to the last couple of chapters to understand the title, but that was minor. I also found a alot of typos in this book. usually just minor ones but a name was completely wrong, but correct in the very next sentence. I had to stop for a second and think....who is that? ok...off to Amazon.com to find the next one.
this book is amazing. it was an all around exciting book. scarpetta definetly meets my expectations. it was a roller coster of emotions. i couldnt put the book down. i will re-read this book numerous times.
It was magnificent. I picked it up at a Border's bookstore for 3 dollars just to see how it was. ever since I've read it I've been stuck on her books. It was great a little gory at parts but it had a wonderful storyline and plot. I would highly recommend this to anyone that loves mysteries.
I have read almost all of Patricia Cornwell's series with Kay Scarpetta and if you liked her other books, you will probably enjoy this book as well. It has the same feel as the others except I find the adultery that Kay continues to commit inconsistent with her strict sense of right and wrong. Marino is always a great character you can easily picture in your mind and I found the scene with the police at the morgue particularly good. The ending was a bit of a let down. However, I'm still hooked and will continue to read her books.
The is one of Scarpetta's better adventures. Temple Brooks Gault, the serial killer released from prison in "Cruel & Unusual" plays mind games with Scarpetta and the NYPD and NY Transit Police after a woman's body is discovered in a park. The twisty plot is worth a re-read, especially for the ending which pits Gault against Scarpetta and her geniuse niece, Lucy, in the subway tunnels of New York.
I love the Kay Scarpetta series, that's how I got hooked on the whole forensics stuff! Patricia Cornwell is an excellent author!
This was my first Cornwell book. I enjoyed the characters in this story and I look forward to reading more about Scarpetta, Marino, Benton and company. The action was fluid and I was never sure where Gault, our killer, was going to turn up next.Cornwell is detailed and this lends credibility to the plot and circumstances. The events are gruesome, but this is a coroner we are reading about, so that is to be expected. Cornwell does not exhaust the reader with gore and that made the subject matter easier to handle.The one criticism I do have is that the story moved so fast that I felt I was sometimes missing something. I think I just have to get used to Cornwell's writing style, and I maybe should have started the series in a chronological order. Nonetheless, a satisfying read, and I would recommend the Cornwell series to others, worthy of 4 stars.
Adermatt grabbed my attention from the very beginning and kept it to the end. She tells an extremely poignant and relevant story such that I felt I was watching every minute of it in real life. I hope this is the beginning of a series!
I am from Germany and was in the US for studying Economics. That book is very easy written and explains good. For classes it is required. A bit too expensive and too heavy to carry. Quite good.
I picked up this book not realizing that I had already read excerpts from it in another of Childress' books. I was headed for Jordan and was interested in reading up on Petra when I found this book. As I read more, it began to get really interesting. His broad coverage of various theories of ancient civilizations is fascinating, if sometimes hard to believe. But, that being said, there are so many unexplained civilizations out there that, however fanciful the explanations may be, who knows, some may even be correct!! It's an entertaining read, and really causes you to reconsider some very basic historical facts that may turn out to be in error. How DID those guys at the Temple of Ba'al move 2 million pound stones?!? Makes you wonder!!
"Lincoln Reconsidered" by David Donald 1961History has always been an interest for me. This takes a bit of time and expands on it very nicely. It starts out with a nice introdution about Lincoln and his times, the people he knew and worked with, then goes onto the politics and war. It had some anecdotes that you never see anywhere else. It turns out that Linoln was not a rabid emancipationist, but a pratical president who did things as needed to be done. I wondered before why he only freed the slaves in the states in rebellion: it was because he did not want to alienate the slaveholders in Kentucky and Maryland. I am still mystified as to the reason for the war of northern aggression: slavery does not seem to be the all inclusive answer that mythology makes it out to be, and this book shows some altenative reasons, but does not take a stand, after it is only a collection of essays.
You can get the full text of the 1952 edition free here: [...]Information is costly, so hopefully you read the review.
Hazlitt presents a clear, concise lesson on basic economics. His message is well-articulated and well-supported. This is a must read for every person who has ever worked or voted (or is planning to do either) because it discusses the essentials in both economic theory and the politics that put the theory into practice.Unfortunately, there are some erroneous ideas in this book. Hazlitt occasionally makes claims or implies that the government should make some interventions into the economy; he also seems to think that capitalism's merit lies in its service to the "common good." However, these fallacies are rare, and they do not significantly detract from the book.For a great back-to-back lesson in economics and its moral base, read this book followed by CAPITALISM: THE UNKNOWN IDEAL by Ayn Rand.
Sure, a few of the specific examples cited 60+ years ago are no longer relevant today, but the basic lessons are absolutely and permanently valid and need more than ever to be understood by at least a majority of the voting public.The sad fact is that Americans can go through the entire public school system and "higher education" without learning the first thing about economic science (while getting bombarded with self-serving economic propaganda). Thus public gullibility to the fallacies cited by Hazlitt seems no less pervasive now than back then, while the resultant cancerous growth of government economic meddling has only increased.Here's a revolutionary fantasy: Make this book a required study by all high school students. Imagine what that would do for the kinds of politicians who get elected in the future.BTW, you can get the nice hard-cover edition at less cost directly from the Mises Institute.
For all who avoided economics like the plague, this is the book for you.very informative, and gives the novice a good foundation of the subject... Check it out.. next time you argue economics with uncle Fred, you wont sound like such a dope
This is not a new book;perhaps that's why it is so useful.There is no gobblygook, no arcane economic theories with fancy lables.What there are in this book are many examples of - - if the government takes this action to make this or that happen, the unintended consequences have proven to be and will probably be again something quite different, and usually not positive.Sound experiential economics in my view, clearly written; and a tremendous help to understanding what will probably happen if the nation takes on more debt, subsidizes this or that interest, taxes one interest at the expense of another, etc.I liked it; I could read and understand it.
Why was I not taught this in school. An excellent book whose lessons still hold true today. I highly recommend it.
Economics in One Lesson is essentially an introduction into the Austrian school of Economic thought. Hazlitt's now renowned treatise originally written in 1946 is lauded by Libertarian stalwarts Ron Paul, Peter Schiff and Lew Rockwell among others. While some of the examples provided in the text may be dated the book is as relevant today as it was when first written. Hazlitt, from a 1940's perspective, takes on many of today's most controversial issues such as government spending, taxes, minimum wage, balance of trade, unions and inflation. In an era of big government, many of Hazlitt's economic lessons come as a breath of fresh air. I highly recommend Economics in One Lesson for those interested in learning about the Austrian School of economics and basic free market priciples.
I read this book in college (some 50 years ago), and it's basic precepts have stuck with me all those years, and have helped me reduce complex issues to fundamental truths. You won't find details of the complexities of all of today's problems, but it will help you better understand them and give you a strong starting point from which to approach them, and to brush aside all the political BS that surrounds them. Politicians and economists-all of them-like to surround their public positions with their own idealogy. This book will help sort out the core issues. You might still agree with the ideology, but at least you will know it when you depart from the basics.
I know it sounds stupid. I know it sounds extreme. I know it sounds ridiculous.But this book REALLY DID change my life.I used to be a bleeding-heart liberal: "the government has to do X, Y and Z".This book showed me how wrong I was. How so VERY wrong I was.This book should be mandated reading in all schools.
I have to laugh at the negative reviews of this book. They are probably written by socialists who don't understand economics, otherwise they wouldn't be socialists. Hazlitt's arguments are based on (1) a real understanding of economics and (2) facts, including that socialism has been an abject failure where ever it has been tried. In contrast, the arguments of modern liberals are based on emotions and are devoid of facts and of thinking about the world as it is.I can tell you that this is one of the very best books that has ever been written on economics.
This book is a little outdated, and a little heavy on the libertarianism, but otherwise it's a very easy read, and I particularly like some of the stories it uses to present basic economic ideas.
The book is extremely too cryptic for normal readers. I had the toughest time understanding all the extremely complicated language in this book. It would be nice for it to have been made for "dummies", but I still got it. Austrian economics needs to be taught in school, period.
This may be the only hardcore economics book I've really ever read. I don't follow through on many books period, but I pushed on through this one. The effort was valuable and worth it. From what I understand, it's held as one of the classics and rightly so. Just take it in chunks as you have time, but do yourself a favor and glean some knowledge from this one.
Amazingly prophetic book. Could have been written yesterday. So far, a very educational read. I can see why so many people are recommending this book.
These concepts are important for everyone to familiarize themselves with. I teach economics and it has been incredibly helpful to use these illustrations with my students. Such simple and easy to read chapters. Read one a day and really think about each one. Before you know it the financial reports and the governments budgeting process will come clearly into view. You will begin thinking in the micro and the macro with ease. If it makes sense in your home, it will most likely make sense on the national level.I highly recommend this easy to read little book. Learn these concepts and see what new world will open up for you in so many areas.
An excellent and lucid exposition of what we really mean when we talk about 2 houses, or 1/2 an hour, or square root of 2 meters, or that the counting numbers are infinite. It does not require any prior mathematical knowledge beyond the basics, although it probably will be of interest only to those that care about math at its most abstract. It is fascinating to realize how much we take for granted when we do math and how much ingenuity it takes to pin down the concept of number. Highly recommended.
It's Thomas! Kids love it. I can tolerate him better than Barney or those Wiggles. Still sounds so odd to hear George Carlin narrating a children's movie...
I ordered this book several years ago to do a paper. Yes, it is good enough to use as a reference for a college level paper. On a less serious note, it is also entertaining to read for chocolate lovers, and even though I completed my paper and class a long time ago, we still have this book.
Chocolate makers and company evolution are the focus of a tasty selection of historical notes in Beth Kimmerle's Chocolate: The Sweet History - but the focus doesn't end with company profiles alone. Historical details trace chocolate's Aztec origins, cocoa plant myths and usage, timelines of chocolate trade development, and more, adding depth and insights which include notes on different varieties of chocolate. Add luscious historical photos and ads in full color and you have a delicious presentation indeed, packed with history and appeal.
A sort of mix of Percy Adlon's earlier `Bagdad Café' andRoberty Altman's `Three Women' set in Alaska.k.d. lang plays an androgynous miner who falls in love with a straight, private, local German librarian.They both have muddy, tragic pasts that slowly emerge. There are some deeply moving moments,and some wonderful slightly magical realist touches. The cinematography is very good. But while langdoes a surprisingly decent job, I can't help thinking a stronger, more experienced actress could havebrought out even more in this amazing role.That said, I did enjoy this much more on a second viewing. While it bothered me that it felt at times likeAdlon was simply trying to re-create the magic of `Bagdad Café' (odd, surreal setting, quirky out of placecharacters, cinematography that uses color in exaggerated ways for effect, etc.) overall I foundmyself more able to just let go and accept this tale on its own merits. And doing that, it made me smile.
I recently purchased this camera and I'm very satisfied with it. I find the quality of the pictures with this camera as good if not better than anything else without going to digital. It is very comfortable to hold and the controls are easy to use. I highly reccomend this product to anyone looking for a top quality camera at an affordable price. Nice going Sony!
I just got the CCD-TRV-308 camcorder and it is awesome!! The only thing is is that you cant edit your film on your computer you can just play it back. I give 4 - 4 1/2 stars
I recommend this book because is good to have it on your desk as a quick reference, for those wo are starting into ABAP, can consider to purchase the reference book too, in order to have a vast source to lern from.
This is a wonderful collection of tales from South America, which won the Newbery Medal 1925. The stories are for all ages and written to intrigue the reader and whisk him or her to a far away land. Brave worriers, fair maidens, rich kings, evil witches, and ferocious giants are all a part of these tales. My only negative comment about this book is that towards the end it became somewhat repetitive. All the characters became somewhat similar and the plots (although diverse) had similar paths. However, this is a great book for children's bedtime stories, and a treat to the adult who reads it to them.
As the author of this book, I would just like to say that it has been successfully published in the Uk and reached number 60 in the hot one hundred best sellers. It has also sold successfully in Australia, Greece, Italy, America, Japan, Sweden, and is now being published in Poland. In Japan it was so poular that although only published last year it is now being reissued.To Amazon!! Please remove the stars as I do not have the right to rate my own book. I had to put them in so that I could post this as you no longer give the author a right to reply - which I believe you should when bad reviewers slate an author's book.Linda Sole. I write as Anne Herries and Linda Sole.
I've received and tried these great tables. I'm sorry I only ordered four. Even though I'm small, I can manage these tables - all 4 by myself! They fit in the back of my SUV and in my camper. My bruiser children have already started using them as a jungle gym/stairmaster -- they are incredibly stable and sturdy. My only concern is the legs don't lock in the folded(collapsed) position. If you hold them vertical it's not a problem, but when rotated, one leg drops - I'm using a canopy bungee to secure the two legs together for transport.Lori
we didn't even use the magnetic feature but glad it had that option. Compact, easy to take (about size of Ipad but thicker). Would recommend for the avid backgammon enthusiasts like us who cannot bear to go too long without playing!
We got this for our 8 year old niece for christmas and it was a hit. Quality seems just right for the price. The fact that it's magnetic is great for the kids or for traveling. No complaints.
Received this product in the mail and have worn it a few times. It's fairly comfortable for a bustier/corset style waist cincher. The boning is very supportive and higher quality then a bridal style corsette (most of those are cheap and just to get things to lay down more smoothly). I'm pleased with the product. One thing I will say on the negative side is that I'm rather short. These are more of a one-size fits all from what I understand and mine is a bit long in the torso since I'm 5'1". Not an issue, it's meant that way so that it will cover under the chest down to about the belt so you dont have any random tire hanging over your pants, but I'm already fairly thin and this just causing the top wires to rub under my bra or jeans. Not the best for sitting, whereas a custom corset or one with a smaller torso likely wouldn't do that. The cloth is fairly comfortable and does as promised.
she liked it and I think it defined her curves an makes her appear alot slimmer. she said it is somewhat tight but also stated she gets used to it after a few minutes.
I ordered my size based on the sizing provided. I am able to hook on the first set of hooks. It does provide the curves I was looking for, but I NEVER forget that I have it on. The area below the waist was flipping up the first week that I wore it as I do deskwork all day; lately it hasn't but i don't know if that is due to additional weight loss or the fact that I was wearing clothes that did not allow it to do so! After wearing for several hours, I do experience a little soreness where the stays are pressing against my ribs. The lines of the squeem will show under a close fitting garment if your are near the upper limits of your size; and if someone is holding you, I believe they would be able to feel the support structure.
This product is fantastic, got alot of compliments on how much skinnier I looked and it is also comfortable, can wear it for hours. It took me about a day (actually a few hrs) to get comfortable wearing it
I bought this item for my wedding dress! I wanted to make sure that I "tried out" the cincher before my big day and it works really well! I started out with this same item, in a Small - but it gave me "back fat" which I do not normally have...I returned the Small and opted for the Medium and it works like a charm. When wearing the cincher you have two "size options" with the double hook closure..which allows you to let it out more around the bust & tighter around your "natural" waist to create a better shape. It definately does the trick and is made of rubber material(def makes you sweaty...but it DOESNT move around) Totally worth it!Kinda painful...the boning pushes into my "under/side boob" probably because I am not super skinny immediately under my boobs...(size 36 DD)Ladies, if it helps..I am 5'2 135lbs busty, not super skinny but not fat(size 27 in jeans)
I like the product. Helps trim me down a little under the clothing. The rubber makes you sweat. After a couple days of wearing it, I really do feel trimmer in the middle. The immediate compression isn't as much as my steel boned corsets, but is pretty decent for shapewear. I'd say an inch plus a little more in the areas that need extra smoothing.However, I don't recommend it for all day (10 hour) wear. I'm so itchy by the time I get home. It is cotten on the inside, but it still itches by the end of the day.In terms of fit, I am a 20, usually. Sometimes an 18. I bought a 3XL. It fits fine. I am short and it does indeed go from hip to just under the bust.
I have one of those "spare tire" waists, but when I put this on, I had an hourglass shape... I've never had results like this with any other shapewear... But it does come with some side effects...Wore it to work for 8 hours, took it off to find that my skin was a grayish color (i'm black) and had lines (which turned to bruises) on my sides and lower back where it folded from sitting... I did like the way it gave me a much trimmer waistline, so the next day I wore a camisole under it and it was very comfortable. That experience did, however, give me more incentive to exercise and get fit so I don't have to depend on anything to "make" me look trimmer...
i liked this product so much i am going to buy one for my mom and another one in black for me
This is very well made, it came on time and does exactly what it is made to do, I give it 5 stars.
This waist cincher is pretty good. It's really hard to get latched , but once it's on, it's pretty comfortable. I didn't have any problems with it riding up, or folding over.
Look a couple inches over ur belly button. Do you have a 'slouch line'? If no, then this is for u. Nice expensive material feel. Does wat it was made to do. It just didn't work out for me cuz I slouch all the time and it hurts where my belly fat curls. It's for those straight sitting people
I like it because it came as I was expecting that , and really helped to save money compare to other stores
This is exactly what is says - FIRM compression. I got a size small and my waist is a 28-29 inches. It squeezes you in and you will look FABULOUS. You won't be able to eat much, or bend over, but you'll look great! I wore it under a tight dress for a wedding and after about 6 hours, I had to go and take it off so I could wiggle on the dance floor.
I had two reasons for the purchase of this product, one was for my spine difficulties thanks to a severe injury many years ago & the other was pure vanity! But it has surpassed my expectations for both reasons! It is ever so comfortable and makes me look great so I feel beautiful!!! I just cannot express in words how great this product is!!!
Definitely a staple for my closet since having my baby! Holds me in, and looks good underneath my clothing. I'm happy with it...and will purchase another one.
Help with posture and gives a mommy tummy a nice squeeze. It feels great on my ribs and seems to be bringing them back to pre-baby size. I highly recommend this!
I wear this religiously! It's extremely comfortable, I even sleep it in. I wear it as often as I can - only taking it off when I need to. So far so good. The only problem was it smelled like rubber at first since it was so new. I washed it (HAND WASHED, never put things like these in the washing machine/dryer as the item can warp!) and the rubber smell went away. I've only been wearing this for about a week so when it's been a month or so I will post an update. I wear this in conjunction with dieting and light exercise. When I started all of this my waist was 28 1/2 inches. Now it's down to 26 1/2". I just hope I can actually keep the inches off. My goal is 24" but even that may be too much.
I absolutely love the squeem!!!! Although it does take a couple days to get use to it....... I wear it all day at work and I already see and feel a difference I absolutely live the squeem!!!!
I ordered my Squeem and it came earlier than promised. Mine didn't fit but it was my error and not the company's. I filed for a return and the company replied promptly with instructions to send back and offered to send me a different size. The company is very polite and courteous. It's one of the better companies selling on Amazon. The product itself from what I was able to do with it was very sturdy. The hook and eye enclosures were easy to use and the Squeem molded to my body shape. It was ridged but had give to allow for movement. The outside that goes away from your body is rubber but what actually touches you is a cotton material. It does smell a little like rubber if you put your nose to it but it's not strong enough to smell if you're wearing it. I can't wait to get my new sized one and try it out.
I ordered the Squeem waist shaper in a size small...my general size is 4-6, I'm 5'4 and weigh 120lbs right now; over the winter I ate too much cheese and gained about 7 lbs which isn't much to complain about but I have a roll of belly fat that shows through a slinky dress (I just wanted to smooth out my middle and fat above my hips). I wish I'd ordered a medium (or even large) instead because as I was hooking the waist shaper from top to bottom as instructed it was way way way too tight by the time I tried to hook the lower 6" above my hips. I don't want to be uncomfortable I just want a smooth finish! So, if you're similar in size I recommend ordering a medium instead. In general the quality of the product is exceptionally well stitched and built to last.
bought this over the other post-baby belly wraps marketed to pregnant women...and glad i did. the belly wraps are stiff and very visible under clothing, where the squeem is a good ol girdle and forms the mid section into a pretty shape while holding in the jelly belly left over after delivery. you have to wear the waist cincher for 40days/40nights for it to work on getting the belly to shrink; i'm on 2.5 weeks and have already gone from looking 6m prego to less than 3m prego when not wearing it. it also helps with initiating a healthy diet and losing weight b/c it makes you want to look better. but it is not comfortable to wear to sleep; makes me really hot. i have a cheaper wrap from babies r us that is more forgiving, but keeps up with the belly compression.
Great product for giving you that snug fit...it does become very uncomfortable around the waist line if worn to long. I really do like this item, the only BIG issue I have is the fact that you can see the snaps through your clothing...so I suggest not wearing this with a tight fitting dress or shirt, because everyone will know your secret!
I just had baby and ordered the squeem for post-partum abdominal binding. Its very comfortable and fit perfectly. Its doing a great job getting my stomach down in size. My only issue is that it broke after less than two weeks of wear. I will have to contact the company and get a new one.
Not bad, I tried it for 10 days and lost about an inch of my waistline. Need to try it longer to see how it goes.
I love my squeem! A little tight at first but I got used to it. I lost 2 inches off my waist in 3 weeks. I love my squeem!!
I bought this with the hope I would look slimmer. It did that, and more! I bought a large, and after a week of wear, I am purchasing a medium. I have gotten complements on how much weight I have lost, and I have actually lost weight too. It gives me a shapely figure. I could not be more pleased.
I purchased it to wear after delivery. Just after delivery I put it on, though I couldn't button every button. But several days ago I was able to button all buttons, a week later to button second line (which squeezes you more). All in all I wore it for a month day and night. It worked perfect, I have no tummy now. The only thing is I'm not on tall side, I'm short, so it was pretty uncomfortable because it was always climbing up and sticking to breasts. Once again if you are on the tall side it will be perfect.
I bought this squeem to help me get my post-pregnancy stomach and waist back. I didn't count on the excellent back support this gives. i am very pleased with this product! The only thing I don't like about it is the rubber smell!
I'm extremely impressed with this waist cincher. I had a bridesmaid dress that I had to fit into that was about 2.5 inches too small...I was just about ready to pay over $50 for alterations which would have made the dress different than the other bridesmaids....and then this came in the mail! What a lifesaver! I contacted the tailor quickly and tried on the dress again using the squeem and it fit perfectly. I probably won't use this long term, and I can't imagine using it over diet and exercise for weight loss, but in a pinch, it works great.
This cincher really works......but it can be uncomfortable when worn on the plain skinfor too long.....I put it on with a tshirt under and it feels much better!
I have been looking for something to hold in my stomach that wasn't elastic based. Found this item and have to say I am pretty pleased. The hooks do take a while, but once they are all done, the waist cincher does what it says it will do. The only negative thing is what a lot of the other reviews complain about. It does tend to cause back fat to appear more prominent by your underarms. So I can't wear this with a top that is clingy. Can only wear with looser fitting shirts. Oh well, nothing is perfect.
Rood and Trefil wrote this book because the media were being influenced primarily by scientists who were very optimistic about finding extraterrestrial life. The two authors describe "the conventional wisdom" as defined by Carl Sagan, Frank Drake and others. Then Rood and Trefil examine the key factors one by one, ending each chapter with a section called "Consequences for SETI" or "Implications for SETI." Basically, they come up with much lower numbers than the optimists; the Earth is special after all. Rood and Trefil do quick surveys of space colonization and the prospects for interstellar travel, dismissing the idea that UFOs carry alien visitors. Each author wrote a separate conclusion to the book, giving his personal views. Though now slightly dated, Are We Alone makes points that still must be addressed by SETI advocates.
This CD is amazing. I am very sad that 107.7 The X in Birmingham is no longer. They made a great CD to benefit a great cause.
Marie Antoinette is my daughter's favorite female historical figure. She was very smart, but not when it came to spending. She was a child bride from Austria who, as custom dictated, had to leave all her possessions at the border- including her beloved little doggie.
Well the album was awesome. I loved how it would go in sequence to the game. But there were two songs that were missing in the album but that's cool. Over all if your a band geek like me you'll love this soundtrack. Dennis Martin did a great job over all.
I was the final editor of this book. I spent a week secreted at Lake Tahoe making the corrections. I thought the cover was rather garish, but this is a book with a lot of heart. George Ellis spent a lot of time helping people who, otherwise, would have had little hope.This book is an inspiration and should be put back into print.
....I have a CD version of the original release on CBS Associated and it kicked in three previously unreleased tracks. These were two original tracks by Eumir Deodato "Latin Flute" and "Venus" and Deodato's fabuloso rendition of Steely Dan's "Do It Again"... but heck, at least "Deodato II" it has been rereleased somewhere in all it's Creed Taylor/Rudy Van Gelder splendor. Deodato's jazzy versions of "Rhapsody in Blue" and "Nights in White Satin" were noted to be two of the best fusion performances ever done when this one came out. Listen for licks by Billy Cobham, Stanley Clarke, Tropea on guitar, and Hubert Laws on flute...
See story summary above.No doubt an action packed story that'll take you from spots in England to spots in the Mideast. Pure action all the way. If that's all your looking for, look no further. As far as details and dialogue are concerned, there is very little to sink your teeth into, which is typical for a Higgins novel. Though short and to the point, I do enjoy his books. I would match super hero Sean Dillon against any fictitious villian. Good escapist fiction and quick reading make this book enjoyable.Recommended.
Taut and tense, an explosion of sequential thrill packed events - these are hallmarks of the popular novels springing from the pen of the seemingly inexhaustible Jack Higgins. "Edge Of Danger," his 32nd suspense laden powerhouse is no exception.The Belfast born author now brings us a harrowing tale with former IRA member, Sean Dillon, confronted by the Rashid's, an English/Arab family sworn to avenge the killing of one of their own by a Russian diplomat who was driving drunk. When the diplomat is provided immunity by Russia and America, vengeance is sought with the life of the American president.Action swerves throughout the world until a terrifying finale takes place in a remote castle.
Sean Dillon again impishly dances the Irish Jig through England, Ireland, and parts of Saudi Arabia, while efficiently wounding and killing every bad guy in or out of sight and drinking a Bushmill's while doing it all. Saying that, Higgins can put out a story that keeps the pages turning, your mind working and suddenly reaching the end you are thinking of his next offering. Heres hoping the next is as good. God bless all here.
This is my second Higgins novel and I am reall getting into this world that has been created by the author. I have learned a lot of the IRA in ways that I find pretty entertaining if at times a little fantastic.The story once again centers around Dillon the bad boy of the IRA that is now working for the British. His mission is to stop this family of half British and half Arab bilionaires.The action is non-stop and pretty interestng. It's a quick read sometime that is to the point and nothing really deep.The only compaint that I have is that I want to know more of Dillon but little by little we are seeing more of the character and some character growth.
I've read a number of the reviews, and thought they were too hard. This is escapism - nothing more, and nothing less. The dialogue is trite and cliche, and the plot formulaic. But that is what makes Higgins so good. Its fun! And sure you have to suspend disbelief occassionally to make the plot work - but what's the harm with that? I enjoyed this book. It returns Higgins back to form after a number of less successful books in recent years. Even inspite of the cliches and plot formulas, there is a distinct 'grittiness' about the characters, which has been long over due.
This book was just what I was looking for! HIGHLY informative information on each herb along with lore and magickal uses. It also explains deity correspondences and points out what sabbat you might use each herb for. I recommend this to anyone interested in magickal or medicinal uses of herbs.The product came early and the book was in excellent condition!
As some reviewers already stated, P. Beyerl's magical corespondences (some of them) seem arbitrary. On the other hand most of them are in accord with the tradition and seems ok. But if you put these 'errors' aside, 'Compendium of Herbal Magick' is still a very good (and very nicely illustrated) book with plenty of true informations and interesting stories regarding a lot of herbs. So I think that despise some errors (here and there) in the correspondences, (more than 80% of the attributions seems ok), it is nevertheless a very pleasant and respectable lecture. Buy it for its informations, for its interesting stories and for its nice illustrations but sometimes look elsewhere for the herb's correspondences. I give it four stars.
Yes, you need the software to stream data to your computer, but it's well worth it. Buy others ($$$$$$) and see what you think. This real-time machine is superb. Data input all depends on your car's computer and what data it supplies. Seems like the most data is provided by the Corvette's computer. Hondas, for instance, provide minimal information.
A refreshing, sunwarmed, beautifull change from the frozen steeps and plains of Ice Age Europe. A delightful story of a woman who must face and overcome immense odds to survive. The plot line moves in different ways from other "Woman against the odds" novels so it is a fresh and not predictable. A very good read and a much better choice over Jean Auel's "Shelters of Stone".
I read this book for my 11th grade Lit class and I must admit the book was quite a shock. Many of the books I have read have been nothing more than an attempt at delving into the inner parts of the human soul. This book does much more than that. It depicts the struggle of a man with himself and an outside enemy. He commits one of the most unspeakable acts of the time and punishes himself constantly. He lacks the courage to confess his crime and goes through a period of mental and physical torture. He also faces the wrath a cruel and vicious enemy who lives for nothing more than to torture his victim. All in all I believe it was an excellent book and I would reccomend it to anyone.
When Hester Prynne commited adultury with Aurthor Dimmesdale she was condemned to where the Scarlet Letter A on her bosom as a reminder to herself and o other around her about her harsh deed, mean while Roger Chillinworth, her husband, vowed that he would find out with whom Hester commited the sin. This was a great book because it is full of suspense and continuous sinning. The only problem with it is that it is fairly hard to read so much time and patience must be put into it.
I placed an order for a book, the seller accepted payment quickly, the item shipped very fast, in fact I had item in hand in less than a week and it was exactly as described. Thank you for a pleasant transaction.
I first read The Scarlet Letter (TSL) back in high school. I thoroughly enjoyed the book then. Going back and rereading a second time still brought back the awe associated with the imagery painted by Hawthrowne. Perhaps the most striking image is that in the beginning, where Hester Prynne is about to come out of her jail cell and a single rose blossoming amidst the bleakness of her prison is used as a metaphor. Hawthrowne does a superb job describing the details and ways of life. I believe he captures 17th century Bostonian life accurately. In a way this book is a history book. I do admit that the plot is slow at times, but the book does appear to move much more quickly if you try to admire Hawthrownes writing style and descriptive language. Overall, I would say this book impressed me as much as War and Peace and some of Dickens' novels did.
The description was exactly as written. Fast shipping and great costumer service. I would recommend the product and the seller.
I love it but it saddened me. . . I will read it again . . . but will wait a while. Life can appear to be unfair sometimes. . .
It was a good book to read given that is a classical in American literature but I much rather like Theraou's book Walden.
Awesome plot I particularly liked the theme to be portray in such a way that you may be pushed over the top over false hood also the kindle edition was a fictional read
I came up to this book (a reading assignment for school) with a bit of dread, having heard that Hawthorne's writing could be hard to read. Actually, it was a delightful suprise to find it was a captivating plot, very well written, and very easy to read. I enjoyed it thoroughly. This book is about a woman who has an affair, choosing to bear the scarlet letter than reveal her lover's identity. Along side her is her ilegitamate daughter, a delightfully and hillariously strange character in the book. The scarlet letter is a good book having a melancholy but redeeming ending. A definate classic. Check it out... it'll be better than you expected.
The Scarlet Letter was an great book in that it kept me reading. It was not boring. It had sense to it. It has alot of symbols in it that makes sense and has a purpose instead of just being there.
This book has a nice plot, but it just isn't exciting. It's not riveting enough, maybe because it was written in the 19th century. Things that are exciting more than a 100 years ago just don't seem all that interesting to me. It's hard to read because most of the book is composed of metaphors and other examples of figurative language. If you had to read it, I'd say give yourself at least three weeks.
I think that The "Scarlet Lettter" is a very well written book. One of the things that I would watch out for, is the vocabulary and how it is used in the context. The vocabulary is very confusing at times. However, it can lead you on to another world by wisking you off in the times where the"Scarlet Letter" took place. Other than that, I think this book is very good. I personally liked the characters and their roles in the story. The main character,"Hester Prynne", is written very carefully and it shows how she struggles to go on with her life. That is the only thing I can say about this book. You have to read the rest to find out what happens.....
This book was very good i had to read it for school I didn't really understand it the first time but each time i read it, it gets better.
It is Hawthorne, of course it is excellent. Well written and worth a slow, methodical approach. Definitely a literary classic.
Great book and it is nice to be able to read it on my iPad. Also, loved the price (FREE!) :)
This is a very interesting book. I started reading it in my 4th period English class. I think it is a good book because somehow it relates to what people do, when they feel superior to other people. I think you should read this book, because it is very interesting. Plus, it was written by the great Nathaniel Hawhthorne!
I did read the book in hs, so maybe that is when I bought it, but who knows. I just have to write words so that I can be done with reviewing this.
This slim book is like a three-course meal, where the appetizer is yak anus tartare, the entree is three-day-old caviar, and dessert is a Three Musketeers bar. That is to say, the first part, the Customs House prelude, is so floridly antiquated and negligible, that all but the sternest high-schoolers who've never had a bar or bat mitzvah will give up and read the Wikipedia plot summary for Monday's quiz. However, once past that interminable overture, the story actually picks up a bit, though it never really takes flight, and the ending is...pat. Hawthorne's idea of the scarlet letter is much more ingenious than his execution: the seed never sprouts as high as it should.
I found that this book was full of text that is not exactly for the typical high school reader. It is mostly out of date, so most people don't understand unless they are fairly good readers.As for the story. I believe that is was beautifully put together. I think that it is great how Hester (the main character) uses her sin as a way to show that she has strong character. The way it is portrayed is remarkable. I believe that if you are an american literature fan, this is a must-read. The reason for the 4-stars instead of five, most of the vocabulary takes more than basic skill to comprehend.
THIS BOOK IS A GREAT CLASSIC THAT EXPLOITS THE IDEA THAT A PREACHER WOULD DO THE UNTHINKABLE AND MAKE A WOMAN PREGNANT WHO HE WAS NOT MARRIED TO. THE SPIRIT IS WILLING BUT THE FLESH IS WEAK. I LIKE THE CANDID REALITY OF THIS BOOK THAT DID NOT WHITE-WASH EVERYTHING COMPLETELY AND THE STORY STILL MAKES SENSE IN THE MODERN WORLD, THIS STILL HAPPENS EVEN TO THIS DAY. HOWEVER, THIS TYPE OF BEHAVIOR IS THE WORST POSSIBLE OUTCOME AND THIS IS AN EXAMPLE OF WHAT NOT TO DO.
It is a very well written book. A little slow to get into, but once there it moved very well and was a pleasure to read.
I bought this for my junior year in high school (11th grade), with the intention to take notes & highlight in the book. Our class was simply asked to buy one copy of The Scarlet Letter, and version would do. A book is a book, and I have two very minor complaints about mine.1) This (as with many Dover Thrift Edition books, apparently) is a "Green Edition" book. What this means for me is that the pages are ultra thin, and whenever I use pen or highlighter ink it seeps through the pages, making the back much less legible.2) This book lacks footnotes. Not a requirement, but considering that most available versions of this book have helpful footnotes, those would have been nice.Not large faults of the books, just simple ones that caught my eye.
A great read that could easily be translated into modern situations. The way Hawthorne explains thing and his use of sybolism adds so much more to the story.
I am sure this is a book we were required to read in high school because I know the story well, but did not remember all the details. There was much more use of narrative than dialog and I had a hard time with that at first, but I can say I did enjoy the book.
Hawthhone's "The Scarlet Letter" is literature at it's finest. The attention to detail for both settings, and especially the thoughs of the characters will chain you to this book. Sin, regret, guilt, self-punishment, and revenge are all detailed in relation to an extramarital affair resulting in a pregnancy. The symbolism is beautiful, the plot tragic, the characters engaging. The "Scarlet Letter" is a true masterpiece.
I loved this book when I was about twelve. It was so tragic and really held me. However, on my reread I found I didn't like the characters as much. I guess I lost a believe that social pressure could make people hide and internalize something as common as a child born out of wedlock. So this book is still a good read, but I think in my more mature adult self I just didn't care for the plot as much.
I had to read this for school and since it was on my kindle I could just search a word to find the quote I needed. great book! Hawthorn's syntax is just so lengthy!!
I was required to read this book for English class, and it's my favorite book we've read all year :) full of juicy drama, scandal, and humor, the book is more like an entertaining Spanish soap than a boring classic novel some find it to be. If you look at the boon with the right eyes, you can enjoy it :))
I thought this book was an excellent piece of writing. The symbolism surrounding such objects as the "A" itself, the blacken weeds, and the sign in the sky make the story deep, and leave much of it open for interpretation. Hawthorne's use of details was also very good. His descriptions added so much to the plot and setting, but mostly to the symbolism of the book. I think the book is definitely a "must read."
One ofthe greatest novels in all of literature, The Scarlet Letter by Nathaniel Hawthorne, tells of a life vastly different from those that we live today. Rejecting the present permissive lifestyle to which we were accustomed, the reader is entrenched in the gloom and doom of Puritan society. It is an exposure to a law that tells what to wear, how to think, and whom to love. The Scarlet Letter is a story of law versus human nature, hypocrisy, and of undeniable passions.Enlightening and refreshing, the reader is taken on an adventure and fully understands the risks of living passionately, beyond the limits that society sets. A novel that can be enjoyed by all ages, The Scarlet Letter is a masterpiece of its time.
"The Scarlet Letter", by Nathaniel Hawthorne is a book about how keeping secrets can ruin a person. A very realistic view of how a society can treat others. Even though many of the towns people were no more innocent than Hester in many ways, they looked on her as one of the worse sinners in town, unable to be touched by the rest of society.
Much to my amazement, this book has been placed on banned lists in several states. It's an excellent study of the devastation caused by guilt. Although the story does allude frequently to adultery, there are no graphic details that would make it unsuitable for use in a high school classroom. Both the illnesses caused by guilt and the good health of those who overcome it are made clear.
Well-paced, surprisingly easy to follow despite the language used. I hadn't read it in 30 years, and found it to be much more palatable as an adult than it was when I was a teenager. There must be a lesson in there somewhere..."
The Scarlet Letter is a very good book. It would be much better though if we were alowed to read it on our own and draw our own conclusions. How well can you appreciate a book if you have to hurry because you must read 40 pages in one night while making sure to remember details that may be on the test. Read it in highschool or not, it doesn't matter. But make sure to pick it up later in your life when you are ready for it, and you can draw your own conclusions instead of regurgitating what the teacher told you so you can pass a test.
BrittleeMs. Self's English HonorsKickapoo High SchoolJunior11/21/05Warning: The book has a very high level of vocabulary!The Scarlet Letter by Nathaniel Hawthorne is a book about sinning and dealing with the internal and external consequences of natural sin in a society of Puritans. The book is about a woman named, Hester, who commits the sin of adultery. Adultery is not acceptable in the Puritan society. They view it as a sin. To punish Hester for her wrongful acts, they place a scarlet A on her chest to let everyone know that she is an adulterer. Hester has a baby girl and names her Pearl. Pearl soon starts to grow up and realize why her mother has the A on her chest. Pearl starts questioning her mother about the A. Hester then realizes that the A on her chest is not a symbol of shame but of identity. Identity in a world where everyone is the same, they act the same, believe in the same virtues. The scarlet letter only made Hester stronger.
"The Scarlet Letter" is a superior book that explodes in emotion, passion, love, hatred, and crime. Hawthorne's choice of vocabulary is absolutely perfect to suit this novel. However, like all great classics, the reader must be patient. The story is very powerful, like an iron fist, telling of sins of adultery, and the great Dimmsedale, a character in this book, "who keeps is hand over thy heart." Full of fierce yet excellent story telling, this book is a must for all lovers of classics and American Literature
While I had a copy of the Scarlet Letter in my personal library, my son's teacher required the Dover edition. I was very pleased with the vendor's delivery, arriving before the due date. My son expressed ease with which he was able to read, especially when the class used the same edition as a text. Thank you!
The story of hester is by itself a master piece worthy of its highly commended status, however the annotated version really helps the reader understand the historical references and many archaic words.
Where does one begin ? how does one begin ? This novel of Hawthorne is an excellent one .. a classic...a novel to be cherished . The lessons to be learnt about sin ,giult ,denial and eventual deliverance of truth ,redemption and socialization can all be internalized into real life . Yes , Hawthorne was not a perfect Writer but he portrays the language skillfully and beautifully . I must stress that to reaal understand this book, you shouldn't be cranking up the volume on your stereo and drinking caffeine drinks ....if you do . you'll fell the book is " the worst book you could ever read "
Although rather difficult to understand, The Scarlet Letter was an incredibly interesting book. Hawthorne writes in a way that his characters are very realistic and relatable. I just finished reading it for American Lit. and I have to admitt I was far from thirilled about the idea but I found by the time I got to about the 5th chapter that I really couldn't wait to find time to read more. If you like to read about human nature and how one decsion really can determine your life and that of those around you than you should definetly look into reading The Scarlet Letter.
I did not remember how good this classic was until I read it again. I originally read it in high school many years ago, and it was better the second time around..
I had to read this book for the first time in high school and even then I fell in love with the story. Yes the onld english can bog you down a bit, but it is so worth it. it has a great story line. It's what can be considered old school scandalous!
This book typifies the old English, colonialists, trying to impose their disgusting lawsThis is a must read book, for those who consider these authors worthy. The English have always been accomplished writers
Gets better with every reading! Required reading in high school aeons ago - so it seemed terribly tedious. Am now entranced with every word.
This went back to an old standard. It was a good read and easy to view on the reader. I enjoyed it as it was what I expected.
I love this book. It's a great classic, and I love Hawthorne's style. Very well written, and a good representation of the time.
Es un libro de puntos muy astutos en relacion al vida interior del pais Argentina. Los Paisanos del Interior como Chaco y Resistencia Puedan apreciar estos escritos de nuestro historia. Un libro muy Importante al juventud hoy dia.
If you keep your perspective in check, this is an excellent resource. Good, basic advice. I was struggling training my girlfriend (I am advanced, she a beginner), and this book made it much easier to convince her that I wasn't crazy with my training advice. It is a simple and clear book, pretty basic, but I am a big believer that 90% of the results come from the basic stuff, and the last 10% is for when you hit sticking points, or reach an advanced level. But the book is getting on in age these days; still, don't let that disuade you if you can pick up a copy.
I bought this as an xmas gift for my brother and he loved it! It's a great package of cheezy horror films from the 1980's.
In every way, 'Return of the Killer Tomatoes' is a far better film then the classic original. The characters, ranging from John Astin as the evil mad scientist, his clean cut news anchor servant Igor, and George Clooney in his first film role, are hilarious. The plot is more involved and understandable, and the jokes fly fast and furious. One thing potential buyers should be aware of is that this film, like the original, is presented in the fullscreen format common with straight-to-video productions, which this almost certainly was. A great film, a better sequel, and well worth the few dollars it costs.
The deadpan expression of Tony Starke makes the offbeat script bearable. Great party movie. For a "B' movie, this beats a few recent "A" movies I've seen
I bought this for my grandson and it is great. Easy to clean and keeps the food warm.
For anyone interested in the history of the ordination of women as rabbis, this book is excellent. It is written primarily from, and dealing with women in the British rabbinate, but is beneficial and applicable to all. It raises interesting discussions about women's involvement in Jewish leadership, and even highlights the first woman rabbi in modern times - who was ordained in Germany in 1935. It would not be until the 1970's that women would be ordained in America. As an American Jew, I found this book very interesting and I gained insights into the Jewish community of Britain.
i think it is a great comidy just anther adam sandler if you dont like him then this prob isnt a great movie for you but i would still try it
8 crazy nights was a movie that was touching and hilarious. Adam Sandler was good and should be seen by families.
Love it. Works great. Have watched several times on at least three different players. Would like to have more movies of Adam Sandle.
A movie that makes you feel a lot better about the holidays. Although not a childish movie, Eight Crazy Nights is a fantastic Sandler movie.
I liked it very much! It not for the very young kids. More for teenagers and up.Adam sandler is very talented and it's made up of HIS sense of humor. So if people are NOT a fan of his,...I don't think they would enjoy it.I found it too be very interesting. At first I was tired of Daveys character being SO mean to everyone. But his heart softens at the end and it would teach any bully a lession!I loved the character of Whitey, (voice of Adam Sandler). He is so cute and lovable! His sister, Eleanore,(Adam Sadlers voice again), is SO funny!!! I love it when Whitey sings, "Technical Foul",...both so adorable!!This is JUST a cartoon that is NOT meant to be taken serious except for the heart-warming message/story that its trying to get across!...people can be so mean to the nicest people who don't deserve it!!!I REALLY liked it a lot. I WILL be adding this movie too my collection!!
8 Crazy Nights is one of the greatest holiday films I have ever seen in my life. It ranks up there as one of the greatest holiday films with Jingle All The Way, Christmas Vacation, and Home Alone. The jokes are HILARIOUS and the plot is so beautiful. I cried from laughing sooooo much and cried from the wonderful storyline. This movie is pure genius.
Oh, my goodness. To all of you reading out there, I have been waiting for this movie's release date for almost a whole year. Ever since the film came out in theaters, I checked amazon.com every day to find out when it would be released and now, I know. Also, this DVD comes out on my birthday. That is cool. Anyway, all my friends who saw this movie and all the reviews I read said that this movie was terrible. I say forget those reviews because this movie is simply amazing. If you like Adam Sandler, then this movie is for you. If you don't like Adam Sandler this movie is still for you. This is by far his best movie ever (Happy Gilmore is his second best). This is a must buy for any Sandler fan. It is warm and witty and has the voice talents of so many people from Adam Sandler's SNL days. Classic movie. You can count on me being there at the store before school buying this. Can't wait!
Back in '66 when I was 16 I saw this film numerous times. Loved it!! Still enjoy it today. Funny. Great supporting cast. Pretty girls. Enjoyable soundtrack. Hilarious racing finale. What's not to like?To the reviewer(s) who consider this Elvis' worst film, I ask: Have you seen Harum Scarum? Now that one IS bad!!
mr. holmes was one of the masters of the hammond b-3 as this set attests. he melded the blues and jazz together in an endlessly swinging atmosphere, one that can't help but make you get off your seat and shake your behind! this album captures him in full roar toward the end of his life in 1988. "blues all day long" gets things off to a great start, setting the tone for the entire date. this is a soulful blues, best heard late in the evening when things are settling into a pleasant groove. "killer joe" shows mr. holmes could also handle funk/r-n-b. finally, "groove's groove" reveals just how much swing an organ can have. mr. holmes may never have gotten as much recognition as other b-3 masters like jimmy smith, jack mcduff, lonnie liston smith, or even shirley scott, but he certainly belongs in their ranks. if you can find them, his recordings for the pacific jazz label are also worth finding.
We bought this for our tall seven-year old and it is an excellent fit. It was not difficult to assemble and it is very sturdy and the finish is solid - it won't peel off with an accidental piece of tape or scratch. We have a similar set that is in espresso and love it. The kids spill stuff on it and stick things to it and it is still in good condition. This is a big sturdy desk and we highly recommend it.
I purchased this desk for my daughter for Christmas. It was easy to put together and looks great. It is a wonderful first desk that is very stable and well made. The materials even say that it is hand painted. Overall, I love it and my daughter was thrilled.
I searched hi and low for a desk that would work in my son's small room -- I wanted a desk made of wood and available in honey finish to match his other furniture with a small hutch (as a large hutch wouldn't work)...and at a reasonable price. The Kidcraft Avalon Desk is perfect! I took off one star because I didn't realize how short it was - ok for my 9 yr old son now, but as he grows up I'm afraid he will outgrow the desk. It would be great if Kidcraft offered taller replacement legs so that the desk could be raised higher as your child grows. I feel the desk is sturdy enough to go off with my child to college if were not for the short height! Dear Kidcraft...please make taller replacement legs so that the desk can be "normal" desk height for later years, making is a "Teen"kraft desk ;-). Thanks.
Love this desk and chair set. Bought it for my KG'er who is enjoying using it for his arts and crafts projects as well as for homework. It is good quality, took less than an hour to put together and definitely sturdy material - this coming from a mom of a very rambunctious 5yr old. The only thing is that I can see my kid growing out of it in 2 or 3 yrs. It's not very high and the chair is small, so is more catered to younger kids, i would say probably 8yrs and younger.
We wanted a desk to place a computer on for our 5-year-old. Yes, 5-year-olds use computers nowadays! this was perfect for her, matched her room furniture and though it required some assembly, it went together very well. Probably would be too small in about 5 more years, but for now, it's perfect and well priced.
I always keeps a can of this fine product on me person. You never knows when some palooka wot ain't on the up and square is gonna need to be put in his place. It always leaves ya strong to the finish.
I would have to say that I love this movie for several reasons. First, it is a very cute story with some adorable characters. Second, my niece starred in it and produced it, and last but not least, my son has two songs in it!!!
Being a huge Aspects of Love fan, I was extremely excited to find another cast recording. I was sceptical however, after reading reviews for this recording. After listening to it, all of my fears were put aside. This is a wonderful recording that possesses both brisk conducting and deep emotion from its musical director. I felt that the cast was extremely dramatic and that the piece was very well sung. Having listened to several other ALW cast recordings I feel that this cast was excellent. A must have for all Aspects of Love devotees!
The first thing that struck me was that it was easy to read. The print was readable and the illustrations were helpful. I did also find some grammatical errors as an earlier review said. But mostly it was very specific and practical. The chapters most helpful were on "emotional states" and music. It's hard to find a book on this subject that's across the board, dealing with many different issues and this one addresses nearly every brain-related research issue from nutrition to memory. As a scientist who also works with high school students, I found his translation of brain research into the classroom to be thoughtful, if not enthusiastic. It's a tough subject to translate, but I did get more than I thought I would out of the book. Mostly it helped me get past the hype and get into the real practical meat of the material. The book's far from perfect, but it's the best I've seen so far on this topic.
To those seeking an outline of what education needs to practice so "no child is left behind" this book is a starting point about how people learn. The flow of the book is easy to follow and considers the research findings of how the brain learns in stages of life. Unlike those who consider brain research a "fad", I know from application of the knowledge in this book, the influential changes do produce positive results for students. In the world of "accountability" the tools of Brain Based teaching will allow students and teachers a solution in "leveling the field" for the students from less fortunate environments, which politicians are clueless about in regards the obstacles of "survivalists of poverty". I highly reccommend this book to those wishing to "get off the dead horse" and provide a productive environment for education in the 21st century.
"Brain Based Learning" suggests a new style of teaching that activates student brains and makes them an active participant in the learning process. Author Eric Jensen is absolutely brilliant with his delivery of this material. His writing style is engaging, profound and insightful. I'm so impressed with the way to weaves together a variety of sources to present his idea for personal transformation. Never before have I read a book that combines material on stress reduction, fight-or-flight, activating both hemispheres of the brain, and flow states-- and applied it to education.Seriously, this book is a masterpiece! You don't have to be a teacher to gleam something from "Brain Based Learning" -- it is also insightful for entrepeniurs, marketers and writers. If you listen to brain synch cds, use light and sound machines, or do any sort of AVE (audio visual entrainment), reading this book will rock your world. I highly recommend this book!
It's not really meant to be read from beginning to end, though you certainly can. It's a handy reference that will draw you in. You may begin by looking up the last year Bob Hope hosted, but an hour later you'll realize you're in the Billy Crystal era. Lots of fun -- dishy but accurate. Pick it up, turn to any chapter, and enjoy.
I've had 4 hunting labs over the past 20 years, and this is the one book I always recommend to first-time retriever owners who want to hunt their dog. The book is especially good from the first day you get your puppy up until about a year. He covers questions at the end of each chapter that are typical of new retriever owners: What if pup eats the bird?, what if pup runs away from me with a bumper, etc. Advanced topics like drills for blind retrieves (swimby, casting and lining drills,pattern blinds, etc.) or hunt tests(multiple marks, retired guns, holding blinds, etc) are not covered. The book cautions against using an electric collar. I agree. I've seen too many pups with great potential totally confused by a newbie incorrectly using the ecollar. If you do plan on using an ecollar, I recommend Tritronics Retriever Training book by Jim and Phyllis Dobbs.
I was able to buy this textbook for only ten dollars including shipping! My classmates were skeptical of such a low price and assured me the book would be in terrible condition. But they were wrong! There is not one note, highlight, or writing on the margins. The book looks practically new.
The book I received was in excellent condition and arrived fast. Unfortunately, my professor did not require the text only an on line Virtual Child. I returned the book and was given a prompt refund. Thank you so much for your great customer service.
Can't really get too excited about this (because it was from a class a number of year ago) but Amazon did deliver a good quality copy for many $'s cheaper than the campus book store.
Let me just say first that El Cielo is one of my desert-island albums. The soaring melodies, the heart-melting vocals, the passion... This album feels more commercial to me. I still like it a lot, but the magic that made me fall for El Cielo isn't really here anymore, though I'm glad it won the band many more fans. I will say though that this one feels a bit more focused than El Cielo- the band has matured a little bit, but I guess I just found the first one more passionate, whereas this one is more professional.
Simply one of the better bands around today. Do yourself a favor and pick any of their music. I'm sure you'll find it a pleasant surprise.
This album is a wonderful piece of work. Great production---especially the drums, nice compressed snare. Great songwriting---this goes without saying for anyone familiar with Dredg. The lyrics are spot-on---every lyric fits perfect with everything. Go check out their earlier releases as well. It's all good. I hope Dredg can continue to make good music in the otherwise terribly trendy and unoriginal industry.ps. to "teerav"---->While I agree that this album is great, you really should check out the Silverchair CD, "Diorama" you were making fun of. It's really really good man.
The main problem with listening to this cd is that much of the vocals and songs sound alike. The good thing is that they all sound pretty good. I can listen to every song and for the most part enjoy them, but in the distant future I can see myself getting tired of this cd (but hey, you will get tired of any song in general if you listen to them enough times). I find that a lot of bands fall into the trap of making too much of a good thing. What sets Dredg apart is that they can get away with it in my opinion on this occasion.
Though it has typos and does not always focus on the child. It shows how the parents are coping.
I'm not a rock snob; I just think Ann Wilson is sexy. I always liked this album; my favorite song is "Nothin at All." Until I got the CD, I listened to the cassette edition. I was disappointed to hear that at least two of the tracks, "Never" and my favorite, had been replaced with different takes. In the case of "Never," I don't really care, since the replacement sounds essentially the same as the original. But the original track for "Nothin at All" is definitely preferable to its replacement. First, it's not as clean: Ann and Nancy add some extra vocal stuff that just gets in the way. Second, and worse, Ann sounds out of breath. One of the reasons I loved the song so much was because of the grateful confidence it exuded. That is diminished in the replacement track.
Couldn't ask for a better transaction. Shipped super fast and item was as described!
This is the best Heart album ever made in my opinion. I grew up listening to Heart and I still listen to them. I saw Ann and Nancy in concert last year they were awsome as usual. My favorite song is "These Dreams". Another good song is "What About Love". Heart has had numerous #1 hits and it's amazing people still love to listen to them.
At the time this was originally released, I worked in a retail store in a department adjoining the music section. They used to play these tracks all the time. After a while, I was kind of brainwashed. It got good to me, so I bought the tape.The tape always annoyed me, because it was so... linear. Couldn't skip the nasty tracks for the good ones easily. This CD release helps a lot with that. On the other hand, I only just bought the CD, and I stopped listening to the tape 10 years ago. It took me that long to remember to buy the CD version.My favorite tracks for "These Dreams", "What About Love", and "Never". This CD is about as pure 1980s rock as anything I can think of. Buy it if that's what you're looking for.
One of my favorite things from the 1980's was the synth-heavy pop-rock of Heart. Wow, how I love this album. Chock full of that classic 80's lite rock sound, with fantastic Ann and Nancy Wilson vocals. All around great stuff.
There really isn't any reason I can rationalize it, but this is a landmark 80's album in the same mode the recording "Boston" is to 70's albums. It just sounds huge, a Phil Spectorish "wall of sound": Great melody combined with some grit tacked on to saccharine sweet hooks. This massive aural assault has bunches of decent, though big-time AOR, songs that help it, for the most part, hold up way past it's prime. Sure it sounds dated, but infectious, so if the mood is right, it still works. Unlike Boston's "Boston" (undeniably their best), it certainly isn't the best thing the Wilson sisters have ever done, however it stands on it's own as a unique sonic place in time which remains highly listenable. A guilty pleasure.
If one word could describe "the 80's" it would have to be HEART. this cd brings back memories of when I was growing up and I would hear songs like "These Dreams" on the radio. Today when I that song it I con't get enough of it, I will never forget this song. If you love 80's music then I highly reccomend that you get this cd
Bantum is an appealing hero and his adventures are exciting and entertaining as he fights for his freedom and his maiden. The middle ages come alive before your eyes.
This is the Groove Holmes disc to get! The entire disc is loaded with great music; "I Love Your Smile" alone is worth the price, but there's much more. Get this; you'll be glad you did.
I searched out this film because the writer and director more recently made Kolya, which is a great film. The Elementary School is only available on VHS and I've had to blow the dust off my player to watch it. But it was worth it to know that the humanity, good humor and intelligence of Kolya have a predecessor in The Elementary School.It's set in the aftermath of World War II, but before the Russians took over, in the troubled eastern Europe, in what became, for a time, Czecheslovakia (sp?). For people who don't mind movies in which nobody is murdered, there are no car chases and nothing blows up, movies, that is, for adults, you'll like this one.
I have to say I'm as impressed with the packaging as I am with the music inside it. For roughly the price of a single CD you get both a CD and a DVD. The full hour and a half mix on DVD is in 5.1 surround, and there are visual cues on screen that show you which tracks are being mixed in and out, so you get a glimpse of Hawtin's editing processes. There are also two videos, a long excerpt from from one of Hawtin's shows, and an interview in which Hawtin discusses how he made the mix. Finally, a high quality MP3 (without DRM) of the entire release is included for mobile listening. I think this release really shows the way to avoid/discourage piracy--not by threatening and using onerous software protections, but by being generous and giving music fans a real value for their money.
Christmas may be a time for joy and laughter, but Charlie Brown has the Blues. To get in the holiday spirit, he takes Lucy's advice and directs a Christmas play. And what's a Christmas play w/o a tree? Everyone makes fun of the short sparse "nevergreen tree" that he comes up with, until Christmas works it's true magic.This is a classic family holiday film. It has all the characters that we have known and loved our whole lives. This DVD also contains the "It's Christmastime Again Charlie Brown" story. It has English, Spanish, Japanese and Portuguese audio tracks. This is a great way to enjoy Christmas with the whole family or with friends.
When I was a freshman in college, I stopped typing my term paper (due the next day) so I could watch it on TV. The next year my roommate gave me the video for my birthday so I could watch it whenever I want. There are only three things that I need for the Christmas season: A Charlie Brown Christmas, How the Grinch Stole Christmas and the Muppets album with John Denver. And then, even though I am a college student and have to spend most of December studying for finals 600 miles from home, somehow everything seems right again.
Commenting on what a wonderful Christmas special this is would be superfluous: I would only be echoing the comments of all the reviews of the VHS edition. As for the DVD edition, it's a good transfer, clean, no artifacts, good sound. Skip the second feature, "It's Christmastime Again, Charlie Brown." It just doesn't compare. My only gripe about the DVD: they fixed the one moment in the original master that captured my attention and my heart. Every year, I watched for the moment when the Peanuts gang gathered around the newly decorated little tree and began singing "Loo loo loo, loo loo loo loo loo" to the tune of "Hark the Herald Angels Sing." As the camera pulls in on the left side of the group and pans right, Pig Pen's head disappears for one frame when they all take a breath. You can see Patty's orange dress suddenly appear where his head was. I was really sorry to see them fix that. I don't know why, but it makes the cartoon even more endearing to me.
It's the movie you grew up with plus a bunch of other stuff. I teach kids who had never seen it before, they like it.
I bought this movie for myself because it is a classic Christmas movie. Also it came in Blu Ray was a factor.
I bought this for my husband for Christmas. It is his favorite Christmas movie from his childhood. I can't wait to share this with our kids.
This Charlie Brown movie is the best, most masterful work ever made by the late great artist. This movie is part of the Christmas tradition - no less than the apple cider, the carols, and the tree - and truely captures the sentiment of Christmas.
When Mr. Schulz and Bill Melendez decided to launch this half-hour special for TV there were many things against the odds: The music, subject treatment and Linus's Bible reading were unlike anything else tried on TV before. Work was done in just 4 months flat (considering the lot of work that goes into an animated feature) and a lot of money and resources were put at stake. Lucky for them - and a lot of us - "Sparky" hit the nail on the head. This film was the absolute winner of next year's Emmy awards for television for kids programming, along with more accolades and recognitions. I think the different treatment of the Christmas theme present on this film has captured interest across generations and, in true Peanuts' style, is something that makes you ponder beyond the obvious. One of those films that will never fade out and that are enjoyable beyond the season.
I love Snoopy. He is my favorite. And I love owning this classic and bringing it out every holiday season and watching it with family and friends. It never gets old. A timeless tradition!
Like "It's a Wonderful Life," this animated film has imprinted on the American psyche the meaning of the Christmas holiday season.
Always loved watching A Charlie Brown Christmas on TV during the holiday season, now I can watch it any time.The extra features included were great, one I had never seen before. Thoroughly enjoyable speaking as a Charlie Brown fan.
There was more to this disc than I expected. It has several additions that were good to watch. The cartoon itself is a good reminder of what Christmas is all about. Great for the kids or grandkids, or even the Scrooge sitting on the sofa.
This video has been around longer than me and has earned a place in my heart. It is a must have for every one who collects Peanuts' videos. Though it was done in 1965 it still holds true today. It is full of wit and charm and is fun and entertaining for all ages. It has become a Christmas tradition in our home to watch it every year!
Christmas is about more than santa and presents. It's more than just the biggest tree with the best decorations. It's about a babe in a manger, three wise men and eternal salvation. In an innocent way only Charles Shultz and the crew can do, Charlie Brown (And Linus, et al) deliver this message loud and clear. I say everyone needs to buy this DVD before everything related to God and Jesus and the true meaning of Christmas is removed from the world... It's sad when a cartoon such as this may very well be one of the last strongholds Christians have on our own identity.My own personal soapbox aside, this movie is great. It's timely, even today. It's meaningful and it's truth personified. It teaches about the things that really matter in life, not the superficial garbage most people tend to worry about during the holidays.God Bless Charlie Brown!
My grandchildren and I enjoyed the gentle reminders in this classic movie of what Christmas is really about! Since the broadcasters frequently preempt this traditional Christmas program with political or other events, we are very glad to have our own copy now. Merry Christmas at all!
The score by Vince Guaraldi is one of my favorites and the story is sweet as well. There's a second bonus episode included tht I hadn't expected.
This is my favorite Christmas cartoon. It's funny, cute and I LOVE the music. The one downfall is that my daughter likes to used words like stupid and blockhead after watching it.
I just bought the DVD to this great Christmas Special dated back to 1965. Who cannot love the Peanuts gang and Snoopy. Also, the DVD has It's Christmas Time Again Charlie Brown which is a bonus feature. Great family entertainment!! Too bad they don't make them like this anymore.
Only I watch it with my daughter now.Great Charles Schulz cartoon classicbrought to film. And biblically ac-curate too! Nice job, Mr. Schulz!
I bought this for a lot more money at the Relax The Back store. Amazon has a much better price. I like the design of it but it has some flaws. The pillow case is hard to get onto the pillow and stretches taught right where I'd like to rest my head making it a bit uncomfortable. Also the lower "legs" of the product are much too firm to have between my knees. It raises my leg up too high and hurts my hip. I'm 5'7" so this isn't a problem of being too petite. A flat spot has formed within a few days where I have to lift it open to get in and out of bed. I still like it and haven't found anything comparable.
I originally purchased this for my pregnancy, as I was using 5+ pillows for support, and i was tired of chasing them as they fell off the bed all night long. I loved the support and have slept with it ever since. (i even take it with me on trips.) its great because of the refluff-able fill and because you can roll over and not have to move it. I have yet to wash it in the laundermat and see how it turns out.one con, because of its size, it can be difficult to fluff... do it in the morning while you have energy, not at night when you're ready to go to bed.
I looked at all the different types of body/pregnancy pillows on Amazon and finally settled on this one. I am pregnant and have recently gotten to the point that I just cannot get comfortable in bed. I have had this pillow a week now and I absolutely love it. It was worth every penny. It's like sleeping in a nest, it supports me beautifully and its very comfortable.
Another great read. You can really identify with the characters. Lots of ups and downs as in real life situations.I have read all of her books now and feel sad that I haven't another one to look forward to.I find she write in a nice easy manner and the connection between family members is so real. I would recommend this to any female looking for good story to curl up and read.
This is the best replacement power supply I've seen for a Powerbook or iBook. It's solid and you won't have to worry about the cords pulling out or the connector breaking like on the $70 Apple units. The only downside is that it's a bit less sleek and ergonomic than the Apple.
This product is much better than the Apple OEM charger in terms of durability. It has a blue light on the adapter that lets you know if it's plugged in, but there is no indication that your computer is being charged like the OEM one. That being said I am very pleased with it and you could almost buy two of these units for the price that apple wants for their flawed version.
The adaptor works really well on my ibook or powerbook. It has a really long extension cord. The only problem is that it is slightly more bulky than the apple one. So, for traveling around, unless you have a big computer case, it will not fit nicely. Other than that, it is great. Much cheaper than a new apple adapter and works just as nicely. It is also sturdier than the apple adaptor and does not have the annoying light.
The wire connecting to my computer on my last macally charger just fried after 13 months (i'll take the blame i could have been wrapping it too tightly), anyways it worked well and costed a fraction of the original so I figured I'd buy again, so I've purchased another. This newer one is a different design, no longer has the light on the brick, and the wire that connects to the computer is no longer disconnect-able.
I've just had bad luck with Mac adapters.. this one is wonderfully long cord, much longer than apples' adapter.. However, the place it plugs in is not always secure.. wiggles out, or doesn't connect unless i push it in from time to time. i like the snap" of my daughters' new macbook magnet connection!
After going through two of Apple's poorly made power cords for my 12" PowerBook in a time span of three years, I knew it was time to get a third party power cord. The Macally power cord is simply awesome. It is is built sturdier than the Apple power cord, and best of all, it was less than half the price (Apple power cords cost you a hefty $80). The only minute problem I've noticed with this power cord is that from time to time (and it is not very often), my PowerBook will make a "charging" and "uncharging" noise. Usually I just have to fiddle with the part of the cord that plugs into the adapter, and it stops. Other than that, it's a fantastic purchase, and I recommend it to any one who is fed up with Apple's poorly made cords.
Who needs Mac accessories when you can have an equally good (or better) product like Macally powerbook Ibook ac adapter? I purchased this item for my daughter when her Mac-made original AC adapter connection frayed and was not fixable. We tried to get a replacement at Mac retail stores and Mac on-line, but everyone was out of them and did not know when they would be available. This made me think that the original cords must have been somewhat defective since there was such a demand for them. We turned to Amazon to order the Macally AC adapter with some trepidation because the price was lower than the Mac-made product. That was several months ago and the Macally adapter has worked perfectly and we are very pleased with our purchase. I would recommend this product to anyone who needs a new adapter and because of the lower price, would advise it instead of the Mac.
Good product. A lot cheaper than the apple version but does the exact same thing. Seems to be a little more durable as well.
I've been through two of the Apple adapters and they are terrible. This adapter works well with a G3 iBook. The laptop connecter is sturdier and other components appear to be adequate. A small blue led on the transformer indicates that the adapter is functional. I'm very pleased with this product which costs less than half the price of Apple's sexy but hopelessly flawed accessory.
This is a good replacement for the Apple Charger. Only a couple of notes to make.1. The blue light doesn't indicate whether the notebook is charging or not, only if the cord is plugged into the outlet. This means that you can't really tell what is going on unless you open your laptop and make sure the indicator is showing that it is charging.2. If you drain your battery fully, so your laptop goes to sleep BE WARNED... You will not be able to plug it in and resume working right away. I had to plug it in and let it charge up for a good while before I could operate my Powerbook again, pulling power to operate the computer and charge the battery. This has been most annoying.Other than those weird gripes, it is a sufficient power adapter.
My Apple charger broke (big surprise), and I obviously needed to replace it. Not for 80 bucks, though. I ended up with the Macally adapter since I've had friends recommend their stuff in the past. While this charger lacks the whole hip Apple design thing, it more than makes up for it with function and solid construction. It's also nice and compact so it's easy to take on the go.My one quibble is that the main photo shows a white brick with gray cords and what appears to be an indicator light to show the charger is connected to an outlet. When I got mine, the cords were white (a plus), but there was no indicator light (a minus). In fact, that's how it appears in the user photos.The lack of that indicator light is the only reason I'm giving this 4 stars instead of 5 (I know, I'm picky). All in all, it's still a great product. It charges my 15" Powerbook in 1-2 hours depending on my use, and it feels like it has a sturdy build.
This is a solid, and affordable replacement for the apple AC Power Adapter. If you've got a late model iBook or PowerBook, you can't go wrong with this device. I've owned a number of Macally products, and while not as flashy as the genuine apple gear, their stuff always works flawlessly in my experience.
I am about to buy my 3rd one of these. Each one has lasted about 6-9 months, while an apple charger lasts about 8-12 for the amount of use I put into it. So for my money, I like to buy one of these every 6 months for $30, rather then drop $80 on the apple brand.
I got tired of packing and unpacking the charger for my PowerBook everyday, at home and work. This adapter is a great option. It works fine and is a much better buy.
The only downside to this adapter vs. apple's is the lack of the light ring which tells you whether the computer is fully charged or not. Otherwise it's a great deal!
After my Apple adapter finally went to the big orchard in the sky, I was overwhelmed with grief coupled with the desire to not pay full price for its replacement. A quick trip to Amazon and some button mashing led me to an old ally (pun intended) Macally and the PS-AC4. Click. Purchase. Consumer joy. I would recommend this. True, it's not as aesthetically pleasing as Apple's OEM juicer, but hey, what is?
Please be sure when you order this product from Amazon that you are sent a Macally charger... I had initially ordered one, but there was a problem with the address they mailed it to, so they sent a second one. I ended up getting both... Both of them turned out to be Macally knock offs and wouldn't plug properly into my computer. Thankfully, I had ordered a second one from Maczone for our other computer and I was able to see that mine was different from that one. I double checked the receipt and packing form to make sure I hadn't made a mistake, and it had my product listed as the Macally PS-AC4 AC adapter. I hope that Amazon will fix this screw up...The Macally AC Power adapter gets 4 starsThe Cheap knock off that doesn 't fit gets Zero stars...
Was an affordable alternative to Apple's and generally works well, but the connector to the computer isn't secure. I'll be typing along and get a battery warning and have to jiggle the cord to recharge. Still, came at a better price than Apple's and I got what I paid for.
so much more inexpensive than the apple adapter. takes a little longer to get to 100% but not significantly longer. easier to plug in anywhere vs. the apple adapter. significant differences in design and there is nothing on the adapter to indicate if its charging or if charging is complete.otherwise great buy!
I love Macs and have had them for years, but I get really irritated having to replace the low-grade peripherals all the time, especially power supplies. The Macally version is great. Smaller, lighter and longer than the Apple version, and half the cost. Works just fine. I've used macally stuff before and it's always very solid and well thought out, definitely fills a void.
I was worried when I ordered this because there were so many bad reviews. After all, it's a power cord there is only one thing that can go wrong how can they all be so bad. I have had it for about a month now and it's a power cord. yay!
I read many positive reviews before buying this product, so my thanks to all of the previous posters. This adaptor is actually really great. I was a little upset before because I thought I was replacing my old G3 adapter with an even uglier one but was very happy to see that it isn't like the picture. It's the same shape but the chords everything is white, so it matches well with my ibook. It also has a pretty blue light that shines when the AC is connected, but it doesn't do much else. So if your worried about having an ugly adapter don't be because this is actually pretty nice. (at least much nicer than the G3 model adaper)
I wouldn't get this for a newer machine, but decent for an old beater laptop. Main complaint is that the powercord doesn't detach from the adapter (though a previous reviewer said it came as three parts) as I like to leave the powercord plugged. Though Apple no longer sells the yoyo, the cordwrap feature on the OEM was a nice feature. Unlike the picture my Macally has white cords, not gray, which is more aesthetically pleasing.
This Adapter will do the job as good or even better than the original adapter for a fraction of the price. Unless you are deeply in love with the "cute looks" and the Apple logo on the original adapter save your self some money by buying this one.
Like some other reviewers, the product I received did not look exactly like the one pictured. That's irritating. But, it functions perfectly, which is more than I can say for the expensive Mac chargers.Mac stores will tell you it's a "myth" that their chargers break. Um... why is it then that me, my brother, three friends and several acquaintances have had this problem?
We have 3 PowerBooks in the house, and 2 of them are using these cords now when their OEM powercords fizzled out - as the apple cords are known to do. While they don't light up, they do their intended job, and they do so without overheating QUITE as bad as the original cord. It still gets warm, so give it some space, but overall, a very nice product.
The Macally PS-AC4 is a great replacement item for the OEM power unit. A bit larger than the original, it provides an easy velcro strap that easily contains the wires or releases them to do their duty. Easy to use with a better strain relief than that of the OEM. The loss of the tell-tale light at the base of the adapter plus is missed, but hte positives out weight this little omission.
This is a solid replacement for Apple's charger. It is light weight and does the job it was intended to do. Blue "on" light simply tells you it's plugged in, but there's no indicator to tell you when the computer is fully charged. Lacks the portability elegance of the Apple charger, but costs a lot less.
My husband and I both have Mac laptops and the dog chewed his charger to pieces (yay!) and after five years of use, my charger literally started smokig while it was plugged in (yay!)I went to the Mac company store to buy new chargers, but at a whopping 79.99 I only bought one. I found the MacAlly charger on Amazon.com and decided to give it a try. When we got it and tried it out I immediately returned the Mac brand charger for a refund. I love the MacAlly charger! Its actually long enough to be practical. It doesn't fall out of the wall socket from its own weight (imagine that.) And it never gets hot enough to fry eggs.BUY IT! It's less than half the cost of the brand name, it's a more practical design, and it's still small enough to fit into my little laptop bag. Sure, its not as novel or cute, and it doesn't have the little Apple insignia on it, but I'm not paying eighty bucks for one charger when I could buy the two that I needed for about the same.
Considering it costs less than half the price of the original Apple adapter, it's a wonderful piece of equipment. it's great it is white as the iBook, and the cable that goes to the laptop is stronger than the original one. Just two thing to have in mind: it isn't able to charge a completely drained battery and run heavy apps at the same time; the other thing is that I miss the green and ambar light in the original connector!
I don't know how long I searched and searched for a replacement for myPowerbook G4 power adapter replacement. I looked at Computer City,Apple Stores, apple.com, and even Ebay. The old adapters aren't availablein either of the two stores and online the adapters can hit you up for 80bucks! Ugh!This adapter works great with the generation of apple laptops before theMagSafe adapters and it's much less prone to malfunction and designflaws that will enable it to rip, etc. Very elegant, too.
Couldn't be more satisfied with this product! And the low price ...I've bought my last $80 Mac adapter. They can fook right orf !!!:-)
not bad for the price. the little box part of it gets really hot though. in my opinion it charges the computer faster than the power cord that came with the computer.
Very pleased with this product that I bought as a replacement for a worn out Apple power cable. Apple has changed their plug system with the newest machines, but for anyone out there with a Pre-Intel Mac this is a great option at half the price of Apple's own product. Only gripe is that there is no power indicator light on the plug end, which is a feature on Apple's stock power cord.
- while lacking the green/amber light on the end of the plug, it *does* have a bright blue LED on the brick itself. the LED doesn't change color according to what the powerbook is doing, it just indicates if the brick itself has power.- it produces 2 amps, rather than the 2.65 put out by apple's. this means that while it's ok for older ibooks and tibooks, for the new albooks it's slower to charge the battery if the machine is on, and for some machines like the newer 17", may not be able to charge the battery unless the laptop's asleep.(this can be annoying at times, but for less than half the cost of apple's adapter and cheaper than most other 3rd party adapters, I think it's a fair deal)- the wire on the powerbook side twist-locks into the brick, so you can't yank it out accidentally.- no, the plug isn't grounded... but then again neither is apple's flip-out plug.overall, I think this is a pretty good deal, and might pick up another.
I am a great fan of Maeve Binchy's writing. I love her detailed character observation and how it lets the reader recognise bits of people in her characters. Silver Wedding centres around a 25th wedding anniversary and the plethora of dilemmas such a seemingly straightforward celebration can cause. Anyone who has ever organised a family event such as this will love the descriptions of family politics, and I'm sure many will sympathise with the heroine's family traumas and how being 'the responsible one' can lead to all sorts of complications, not to mention that vaguely disquieting feeling of being put upon. A good read.
Started off a bit slow but now I am hooked, not finished yet but cant wait for my next oppertunity to carry on with it
I agree with some of the other reviewers that this was not her best novel. I would have rathered her write about only half the characters and go into more depth about those. I would get so into a story and then it would end, and the person wouldn't be heard of again until the anniversary celebration. I did like the part about the various invites to the party which had been answered, (Not a direct quote) - "They would send flowers and a card,but would not attend, and that is the way it should be" It was a quick read, though - great for a rainy weekend or a trip to the beach. Also try TARA ROAD - a good novel as well.
i have been doing the i ching for over 20 - 25 years and this book is veryinformative and it gives other ways of divining that is not in thewilhelm baynes classic. i highly recommend it.
Absolutely amazing. that's the only way to describe this DVD A must have for any Queensryche fans.
To really get the complete Mindcrime experience, I would recommend getting the Operation: Livecrime DVD as well. If you can find the one with the booklet, even better. Watch the first part on the Livecrime DVD and the 2nd part on this DVD. The original Mindcrime with the original lineup cannot be topped. For the most part, they did a great job considering they don't have the budget for live shows they had in the early 90's. Mindcrime 2 is not at the level of the first part. Who expects it to be?
If you are not in really good shape this is a great product to get ready for P90X. It does get kind of boring because you are doing the same workouts every other day, but they do work. It is only about 30 mins but it is amazing how well it works.
The Spanish version of Brian Weiss's book, "Muchas vidas, muchos sabios" is even more intriguing to me than my English version. (La version del libro de Brian Weiss es aun mas intrigante para me que la version en Ingles.) For those who believe in reincarnation, this is a great book (Para aquellos que creen en la reincarnacion, este es un gran libro.)
Received my order promptly, as promised. No defects to the dvd, other than the content is very old, from the 70'si will enjoy this for years and my grandchildren will see this and make.their own decisions! I am glad to find a rare addition to my Bigfoot collection
This book was a great historical fiction!!! This book was about Colonel Knox and his journey to FT. Ticonderoga to get guns for general Washington. The story had lots of action and I would definitely recommend it to history lovers!!!!!
This is a fun book that should help your youngster develop an interest in American History. It is easy to read an has great illustratiions. You will not be disappointed with this purchase. Look for others by the same author.
appears to be a great book for my 5th grader who loves history. i am sure that he will be able to discuss with his class. Good purchase
The author is seen by enthusiasts of socialist capitalism, also known as Rhineland capitalism, as a sort of guru. He preaches that a company is a living entity, whose main aim is to perpetuate itself, regardless of shareholder, or even stakeholder, interest.I have no use for this type of thinking. The interesting contribution he makes is the concept of the "memory of the future", which any organization can use to better prepare itself for whatever comes in the future.
I like the mainstream of travel books, but I've never seen one designed quite this way. The author has woven a plain-language retelling of parts of Homer with descriptions of the modern Greeks as he came to know them. Fair play to the author: he has given us something refreshingly different.Lundgren writes clear, quality prose with above average descriptive talent. His deep affection for his subject is evident throughout, which warmed my heart as it deviates from the accepted journalistic principle (one I despise) of pretending to have no real human feelings. I tend to believe that a traveler learns more about a people when s/he tends to like them, and the author clearly does.Recommended for the travel reader willing to try a novel approach to the subject of culture study. For the travel reader with any interest at all in Homer, feel free to add a star.
This was an interesting and engrossing book about Greece (including its surrounding islands) which helps connect the historical world of Ancient Greece with the scenery and people found there today. (Reading it with a map or atlas handy would definitely enhance the experience).The first half retells the story of Odysseus and his journey to Troy, with a special emphasis on the sites as we know them today (great for those preparing for a trip to Greece - especially if you're interested in getting a handle on the names and significance of the various islands). The second half emphasizes personal stories of the author's own travels and visits to Greece which bring to life its land, people, personality and culture of Greece.Fascinating and enjoyable!
Such a cool check book cover! Seems very durable and will last a long time. Very roomy, yet slim enough to fit in my little purse! Excellent price and very prompt shipping. A definate converstion piece.
As a big fan of classical persian music and an Iranian I recommand this cd to anyone intersted in molavi's and nazeri's work.This very diffrent and amazing work by dastan and nazeri is for sure the best work i heard from them.I'm sure you'll enjoy it as much as I do.
I bought this for my father as a gift. He seems to really enjoy it. Being something he had in years past, the hand held infrared devices became a little hard to locate. While this one doesn't seem to have the super high build quality that ones did from years gone by, it does the job and as the gift receiver my father seems to be very satisfied with it.
In my opinion, Richard Webster's Revealing Hands is quite simply the best introduction to the fascinating subject of palmistry. Students will find the material to be concise and easily comprehensible, unlike many other chirological texts. This fine book is a mandatory addition to the library of any aspiring or professional palmist.
I have many books on plamistry. Some have too much info to ever retain, some are way too basic. This one is just right for EVERYBODY. Here's why:* The history is brief (about 4-5 pages which is all you will ever need to know on the topic unless you are devoting to major study* The book tells you HOW to give a reading and a SCRIPT to follow. VERY FEW BOOKS DO THIS!!! This is worth it's weight in gold. I typed his script out and left blanks and when I give a reading I fill it in like a 'mad lib' but relevant to age and the palm.* Nothing vague about it. BIG pictures. Excellent area on fingers too.Richard Websters best material is not sold to lay people but this books seems to be the exception.
Looking for a Palm Reading Bible you will go back to over all other pretty, colorful and modern New Age Palm Reading books? This is the one! Out of all the Palmistry books I go back to over and over when professional palm reading, this is the book I turn to. Why? Its black and white, diagrams give plenty of writing space for quick notes, writing style is down to earth and basic. For basic/intermediate study, this is a book based on old traditional rules.....Not a health study, more a realistic character study....I consider it the best I have in my Palmistry Library.
This is just great music. Funk through the eyes of the great Eddie Palmieri. A total fusion of the time period. A mix of funky, jazzy latin rock-a little like the band "War".
Excelente DC, aunque la grabación que fue en vivo y con un auditorio muy admirador de Cacho a veces entorpece el sonido.
We always need these extra little pieces and couldn't find them anywhere. Great to find them here and good quality for the price!
From the first tune, the chills came back. And when Glen rips into the words early on in Just This One Time, I was back to the old chair with the vinyl on the stereo. The tunes are a testament to Webb's remarkable writing and arranging talents. He puts himself up for all to see and speaks as if he has read my thoughts. Such a long lost treasure found again....thanks to the Aussies for put it all together! Now I must get back to listening...and smiling!
I can't express my gratitude at the reviews I've read enough - I remember finding "Reunion" in the remainder bin at a Caldor's a couple of decades ago. I couldn't believe what I was listening to when I got it home. How could this album not be a top seller, I thought? "Wishing Now" is one of the most achingly joyous, if that's the best way to put it, songs of longing you'll ever hear. "You Might As Well Smile" is a masterpiece of soulful humanity. "The Moon's a Harsh Mistress" is pure poetry set to music. One of the GREAT albums of all time - period.
I couldn't resist, I had to own this CD. Kenny's voice on these easy-listening standards was worth listening to. So I tried it, and was I ever taken aback. His rough, yet soothing voice unwrapped a new sound to these classics. It's hard to compare, because these are proven songs, but Kenny's effort deserves recognition.
This was a nice book to read. It was pleasantly vivid, especially when talking about amish food habits (heaps of ice cream and all kinds of fattening food). I enjoyed the descriptions. the author's own disturbing and overwhelming need to express herself reasserts itself at the book's end, and as we move out of the sublime simplicity back to the mainstream American's need for selfish self-expression of every nitwit feeling and emotion and intuition I felt a bit nauseous. The book is a clear snapshot of a symptom of self-obsession which is perhaps most obvious in San Francisco, where this book is a best seller.
I felt this was an extremely well written and moving little book, and I have recommended it to many friends. In fact, I bought copies and sent them out. It made you stop and think about your own life and how we complicate and prioritize.
This is the story of how one woman became interested in the Amish and decided to try and live with them for awhile. It is interesting to read how an outsider would go about getting into this very secretive world. Her experiences are not representative of all Amish - as she says in the book, there are many variations of belief and practice among Amish all across the country. I was surprised to hear about Amish using a telephone, motorized pumps, polyester clothing, running shoes, and plastic, or using store-bought white bread and cereal that is laced with supplements.The author did not have this experience to become Amish and she returns to her normal life, but with some appreciation for simplicity in the modern world. For those who find resonance in such a concept, I recommend reading Barry Schwartz's THE PARADOX OF CHOICE: WHEN MORE IS LESS, for expanded development of that idea.
glass globes would be a welcome addition to thesewonderful little pepper and salt grinders, with 1 hand yet, the glass woul make it feel more professional, or legtitament if you will thnx bert
A delightful change of pace as far as the main hero (Luciano) is concerned. Higgins does the WWII background well no matter what the story. (or plot) He manages to stick to his facts from other novel about the "Mafia Connection" and German forces. Though some of these facts are repetitive he manages to keep his readers on the edge with this change of pace (and hero).
This book is a great starters guide to owning and basic understanding of the history of Burmese cats. Useful basic information on care, feeding and breeding.
If you have to get this book for a class and you want a less expensive alternative to the latest edition, this may be your answer. I am using this in my class right now and so far the differences are minimal.
BP remains the standard for baseball annuals, with zillions of player comments both informative and entertaining, and team comments which are generally excellent.They know more about more players than anyone else.Minor quibble: Every year the back cover exhalts BP's predictive prowess and gives examples, yet for some reason the 2001 edition fails to speak of, for instance, the success of the Minnesota Twins and Jeff Kubenka. But that's just marketing, I suppose -- it is a great book.
BP sets the standard, not just for baseball books but for all annuals of any genre. The depth and breadth of coverage seems to grow each year. Whether you're a fantasy player or a hard core fan, this book is indispensable.
Statheads and fantasy players know that the value of this book is to be found in its statistics and projections for future performances. Anyone playing in a long-term keeper league will benefit by keeping this near them on draft day as they look for prospects to take flyers on. The stats in this book are as good as ever, as is the top-100 prospect list.This edition falls flat in its essays. In the past the essays read like great magazine articles that mixed stats and narrative in a 1:9 ratio. This year's essays are far more statitically driven, and are written in a 3:6 ratio, meaning that the flow of the articles is interuppted frequently by data analysis.This makes the book far dryer than usual, and more of a chore to get through. It's still invaluable as a reference tool, but as entertainment it falls a little short.
For those unfamiliar with Churchill, do not dive into this book looking for a university reader in English history. Churchill is a masterful writer and storyteller, and he weaves a tale for over 500 pages of the rise of England - from the pre-Roman times to the rise of the Tudors. Covering nearly 2000 years in 500 pages is a tall order, but Churchill spends adequate time on the major stories of the period. The book reads more like a novel than a scholarly history and the characters can come alive. A nice background on early English history for the "casual" reader.
Shipping was fast and packaging great. I was slightly disappointed that this seemed like an I Spy book for a much younger child than my 8 (almost 9 year old son)..... I wish I had known that ahead of time. Still, a great beginner I spy book, well put together and nice sturdy cover. Thank you.
It is perfect for my hyper toddler boy. He loves to spy items especially cars. I'll get more I spy books.
In his book, 'Napoleon,' Felix Markham traces the rise and fall of one of the most important men in western history. As a biography, Markham sometimes relies too much questionable references, but as a history, 'Napoleon' ranks among the great works on the subject. The reports of the battles and the men who served the Emperor are first rate. One can almost imagine being at Marengo, Austerlitz or Waterloo, or riding alside Ney, Marmont, or Junot. Perhaps some of the most appealing aspects of this book are the accounts of Napoleon's life after his exile to St. Helena and the events surrounding his death. Markham also shows us how the Napoleonic legend helped to shape post-Imperial France. I would recomend this book to anyone who would like to know more about this facinating historical figure.
Chopper Girl's debut album on HooDoo Labs is a throwback to an older often times forgotten subgenre of Memphis rap.The album has dark overtones and rides a fine line between Horrorcore and Gangsta Rap. Touching on a variety of subjects Chopper Girl seems to show she isn't a one trick pony and this album has selections ranging from a high octane posse cut to dark and sinister tracks that are heavily influenced by vodou and all the way back to selections that will easily get people moving in the clubs and c-walking on the streets. A veritable whose who of Memphis artists make guest appearances both vocally and on the production side of the house. I highly recommend this for anyone who is a fan of Memphis underground.
This is definitely worth coppin. Got some bumpin tracks. It contains a variety of songs, she is NOT one of them artist where all tracks sound the same. 15 tracks, and at least 10 of them are worth bumpin all the time. She has a music video for "Still Buck" too. You can download it from her labels website. HoodooLabs.com
Okay, a lot of this has been released elsewhere and some might find the price tag unjustified. However, this is worth it if for no other reason than the weird postmodern refraction (or something like that) of Robyn covering fellow '80s college rock casualties of the great alternative sellout of the 1990s, The Psychedelic Furs. "The Ghost in You" gains something in his sparse folk arrangement that it didn't have in its synth heavy/Richard Butler's limited vocal range but still great original version.Get it before it goes out of print like every other Hitchcock release.Signed,epsteinsmutha
This is a bootleg and quite a number of the tracks have since been released as bonus tracks on the Rhino issues. But there's still a few choice nuggets that will delight the Hitchcock fan that one would be hard pressed to find anywhere else.
There are basically 3 singles out there to ownwhite cover UK single 1 (stellar is not actually acoustic like on the drive single)1. Are you in2. Are you in (oakenfold remix)3. Stellar (Acoustic)Are you in (video)red cover UK single 21. Are you in2. Wish you were here (live)pardon me (live video)australian release1. Are you in2. Are you in (oakenfold remix)3. Wish you were here (live)4. Warning (live)5. Stellar (live)Overall if you just want the tracks, get the aussie single, if you need the videos as well then get the 2 UK cds.as far as tracks go, all of them are very good, the live versions, especially warning are excellent quality. The remix of are you in is surprisingly awesome to the point you would think thats the way the song is meant to sound if hearing it the first time.Hope that is of help
This is long overdue. Most people get only so far along in the Modern Primitive scene without "going native". Here is a book that gives excellent and easily followed guidelines for anyone who wants more from their experiences as a Modern Primitve. Combining Piercings, Humor and Good Spirituality, this is a great buy.
With the double vibes, this little dude has all the power you will ever need. The wife loves it! The only down side is the size. The ring is a little small, and not very flexible.
This book is a fabulous depiction of the Italian nun, Benedetta Carlini, whose drive for ambition in the Catholic church drove her to get the help of her lesbian lover to create the illusion of stigmata. Through this, she moves to new heights of power and respect in the church and brings money and fortune to the church...but upon accusations and scrutiny, she's brought down to pay for her ambition. The story is a tenderly told one. It has feminist elements and deals with the desperate desire of spoils, along with a not-so-pretty picture of the Church.
I ordered this book after visiting the Amazon and Dr. Smith's clinic. The descriptions of her work there and her clinic, local people and their community, culture, climate, plant and animal life were spot on so it was a joy to read and added depth to my travel experience. Dr. Smith's medical dedication and adjustment to life on the Amazon is inspirational.
This is a well written book that engages the reader in life on the river and the problems and innovative solutions the author achieved.I visited her clinic and it is wonderful the care the people can receive.
Linnea Smith's story captures you from the very beginning. Telling of her experiences as a physician in the Amazon jungle often keeps you on the edge of your seat. Taken directly from her journals, it discusses her experiences over a 7 year period of practicing medicine in the jungle without all the current medical technology. She also talks of the natives, their beliefs and some difficulties encountered because of the disparity of cultures. This book is an easy and enjoyable read.
High quality, light weight and uniquely interesting pattern. Adds fun to the dining experience and cleans up like a dream in the dishwasher. Arrived in absolutely perfect condition and was packaged exceptionally well.
a bit small then i would like but it was nice. Got it for my son's History class and it worked out great
I grew up in Indianapolis and really enjoyed reading about all of the things that have gone away since I was a little kid. I used to love Burger Chef, and the downtown Ayres store. I remember the Riverside Amusement Park sitting closed there for years when we would pass it going out to the Speedway.The author also has a webpage called "Lost Indiana" which talks about some of the Lost Indy topics, but also some other neat sites in the rest of the state. You could google this to find it.
A great device, I use it with a NOKIA 9300 it is great.I use it during the gym, I can hear my songs and do not waste a call at all.Cons.: Low Volume, Not as loud as an ipod or mp3 playerPro: Very very confortable, great singal coverage.I you are looking for hearing your mp3 songs in your phone it is great. Watch out that it is not compatible to hear mp3 music from all MOtorola, I tried it with a V3i, and I only was able to use it as a regular bluetooth headset, I could not hear any music at all.I gurantee you your satisfaction.
Wow! This is my favorite CD right now. Warning, if you liked Natalise's first album this one is a little different. And it's 20 times better! The music is totally hot and there are some killer beats and really great slow songs too. Her voice is amazing. And the lyrics are really meaningful. If you listen to the lyrics you can tell that she is talking about true life experiences and not just singing the same things as other other artists. And ALL the lyrics are printed in the booklet. It's a really big booklet with LOTS of pages TONS of photos and all the lyrics for every single song! The booklet is like a bonus. There are so many good songs on this album, It's the best CD I've bought in a couple years.I give it 6 out of 5 stars
Guy Clark continues to show what great country music really is. In these days of Shania Twain and the like where country is really a form of pop with cowboy hats, here comes Guy Clark with "Cold Dog Soup" that reminds you that great music with poetry in the likes of Hank Williams,Merle Haggard Willy Nelson and Townes Van Zandt still gets recorded. This is the true stuff that makes you think and tap your feet at the same time. This is an incredible production! Great work Guy! From Fort Worth Blues a Steve Earl Song to Red River, man you oughta be proud! This should be on the charts! But with the current country scene forget it.. Oh yeah what a great line " Baby don't let um blow smoke up your dress...." Also if you haven't written the song, you really know how to choose someone elses material and make it yours.
Being a fan of progressive rock, at first listen I didn't think much of this album because it didn't sound like there was much there. Don't make the same mistake! Don't be fooled by this album's simple sounds. They belie a complexity of story and emotion - an honesty that permeates every note on this album and is beautifully woven into a harmony of voice and guitar. This is a great album that is also well recorded - nuff said!
It's good to have all Paine's material in one handy volume. Plenty to read and think about. It's a pity he's not better known in the USA, considering his significance in the existence of the country.
Brilianty written with passion and fury for the common men of this historic period of time. Essays written not for the elitests but for those who could and did make a difference. Paines works are truly historical and express the point of view of the common man who day after day is raped with taxes and control by a royal family thousands of miles away who could care less for the people they take claim to.His works helped give birth to the greatest nation to bless the Earth.
Paine was a patriot that believed that the country belonged to it's people, and it was up to the citizens to keep their democracy.He like the other founders knew that in order to be a truly free people they must rebel against th tyranny of England and set up a democracy where the people ruled it's government.A revoluntary, patriot whose readings is a must for anyone that is for keeping the government, of, by and for the people.
At the height of The Age of Reason, The United States of America was created by men such as Thomas Paine and many others who held Man above all other philosophies long enough to get the idea "Individual Rights" down on paper in the form of The Constitution of the United States of America. Paine's contribution to this end is well known. Paine noted in this book that "we have it in our power to make the world over again", and they did. Man has a right to his own life, and there is no law above this. No one has a right to another man's life, not God, not the Race, not the dictatorship, not the proletariat, not The Great Society nor the New Deal. Thanks to Thomas Paine and men like him we have it in writing "We own our own life and we are free to dispose of it in our own way". Let's work together as free men and women to keep our freedom and to spread it around the world to our oppressed brothers and sisters. To the Glory of Man!!
Although this is an old public domain book, it was an entertaining, well written and exciting book. You may be able to get it free on other sites or get his package of 13 novels on this site that includes this book for .99
This book is written with a Victorian flair that may have been Max Brand's style. As this is the first work I've read from him (even at my age) I can't be sure. It was intriguing and written for the era. Brand was a popular writer of the time and has a strong command of the English language, which he uses to fully illustrate his characters. His descriptors however do tend to be lengthy and at times drag on for too long. Overall, a good read.
great reading. max brand has become one of my favotire authors. looking forward to reading more of his books,, great story teller.
This is for sure many peoples favorite release from the band, and rightfully so, as it definitely is their most unique record in the catalog in my opinion. Epic and huge sounding, this is a classic album. Everything from killer cover art, to the lyrics... it actually transports you to the place you see on the cover of the album and makes you wonder; who is living in that cold and grim little ice castle that is sitting just on top of hell... or maybe that's just what icechests look like in Norway and they are camping and their campfire needs another log... Either way, this would be the album I would give to someone who has never heard or heard of the mighty IMMORTAL. Metalhead or not, You've never heard anything like this. IMMORTAL RULES!!!
This is a great cd by Immortal, even though I'm not a huge black metal fan. A+.My favorite song on this cd is Withstand The Fall Of Time.
The first music I heard from Immortal was the latest release "Sons Of Northern Darkness", and I was instantly hooked! I promptly picked up "At The Heart Of Winter", and, after hearing others in their catalog, regard this as their second greatest release. The music is varied and interesting to listen to (unlike Battles In The North...sorry guys!) with awesome riffs all over the place! It's been a while since I've been this excited about a band and am in awe of the power they incorporate into their playing. Although there are only 6 tracks, there is not a single bad song on here. You don't have to be a fan of so-called "Black Metal" (I'm not!) to love this album. I'm sure it will be one of my favorite CD's that I bought this year (and I buy a lot of music). Great artwork too! A must-have for the collection of any fan of real metal!
Dramatica: A New Theory of Story is a useful prep for using the software. It's an interesting and complete theory of story too, which is great. The book in general is well worth reading. My only problem is that if it's worth saying, it's worth saying WELL and this book uses twice the number of words it needs. The density of words also confuses the message. I felt, on more than one occasion, that the author was willfully complicating the message in order to ensure more sales of the software.Again, worth reading... valid and useful ideas... enough extra words that it undermines its own usefulness.
This is one of the best Reggae albums to come out for a long time "World Peace", featuring Culture a mesmerizing preacher-teacher who tells it like it is. Heavy bass and drums, vibrating your whole being and getting through the fibers of life with every lyric.Several highlights ~ "WORLD PEACE", purity of harmonies reign within this simply but true statement ~ "NO SEGREGATION", hits home in every part of the world, no matter where you're standing at the time ~ "SELECTION TRAIN", again the lyrics blend with the beat, all you need is clean hands and pure in heart to climb aboard the Reggae train...sounds good to me.If Reggae is your cup of tea, then this one is a keeper. Take a bow Rounder Records for this enjoyable release, look forward to many more of the same...gotta love it!Total Time: 50:54 on 13 Tracks ~ Rounder 7764-2 ~ (6/17/2003)
Circuit Board arrived in quick fashion and in good shape. If you are just slightly mechanically inclined you can do this replacement yourself. Maybe the most difficult thing is working on a ladder. Had garage door working in less than 30 minutes.
I had no idea Dolly Parton was this GOOD. Really, seriously, this is top notch and I rate it 5 stars.
And I never thought I would go for bluegrass, always conjuring up images of "The Beverly Hillbillies" in my mind. Leave it to Dolly to educate me. This music is extraordinary: very intricate all-stringed arrangements headed off by Parton's lovely, shimmering vocals. The lyrics are pretty much standard, straight-on country, but the singer is so heart-felt, she invests them with so many colors and nuances, she might as well be performing Shakespeare. Thanks, Dolly, for a truly GREAT CD!
Coming from someone whose musical preferences run the gamut, from Mariah Carey to Portishead to the Cardigans and back to Geri Haliwell, these words hold quite a bit of meaning. I had read reviews of the album which touted it as the "best of her career" and, of course, was skeptical. I can say with complete honesty that this Bluegrass was something I was unfamiliar with, but something I have come to greatly appreciate. The music is fresh and live, different from any mainstream pop we hear nowadays, and is well-deserving of a listen by anyone with an ear for music, whether they are a city boy (Bronx, NY here) or not. Good music has a way of transcending boundaries, and this is one of those discs.
Dolly has described this CD as her "Blue Mountain" CD. Part Bluegrass, part mountain music. This is as good as it gets. Dolly never fails to deliver and if you are a Dolly fan or a fan of good music in general, you will not be disappointed.
DOLLY PARTON HAS SHOWN WITH THIS AMAZING ALL BLUEGRASS ALBUM, THE GRASS IS BLUE, WHY SHE CAN STILL CARRY THE TITLE OF QUEEN OF COUNTRY MUSIC. DOLLY IS NOT GETTING THE RADIO AIRPLAY THAT SHE STILL DESERVES. SO SHE LEFT COUNTRY MUSIC AND RELEASED AN ALL BLUEGRASS ALBUM THAT IS IN NO WAY DISAPPOINTING. I STRONGLY FEEL DOLLY WILL WIN A GRAMMY FOR THIS WORK OF PURE MOUNTAIN MUSIC ART. ALSO A WARM WELCOME TO THE RECENT HALL OF FAME MEMBER!
I'm a casual bluegrass fan and I really enjoy this album. Dolly's voice is perfectly suited for this style of music and the musicians she uses are obviously some of the best in the business.The only complaint I have is that, at only about 45 minutes, this album is too short. Dolly sings on every cut and I don't think it would have hurt to give this stellar band an instrumental number or two. If this album had two or three extra tracks (instrumental or otherwise) I would have given it five stars."This album is too short" could be considered a compliment and in this case that's partially what it is. Although I would liked to have gotten a little more quantity for my money, the quality of the music could not be better.
Since many music genres, among them the "Latin American" traditions from which Lhasa draws inspiration, use a limited aural palette and philosophy as a starting-point for individual compositions, I think it unfair to criticize Lhasa for her lyrical and aural restrictions. I would rather hear her and her band express themselves well using a limited repetoire than to barely-adequately play a dozen styles. That's called "the eclectic approach", and it's been far too hyped lately.
Lhasa's music:Her music crosses language/race boundaries. As a person who bond very strongly with female singers (eg. Kate Bush, Billie Holiday, Cesaria Evora), Lhasa's music speaks to me as if she is a close female friend, sister or mother.Amazing, intriguing voice. Simple yet dramatic; dramatic yet uncontrived.her velvet resonance and the beauty of the songs will slip unnotice past your defenses and touch the private self.I heard only about 30 seconds of the song "de cara a la pared (Face to the Wall)" on the show "Due South", but that was enough to make me determine to track down singer and song. I managed to do so on the net. And to my amazement, I found "La Llorona" in Singapore's HMV...
I gave this cd to my friend for christmas & this is what she emailed to me: I've got my discman set up with the little speakers on my desk and I'm listening to Lhasa. I love that girl! Song 9 (playing now: "Pajarol, tu me despertaste...") reminds me a little of the Klezmatics--kind of that Eastern European gipsy feeling... Makes me want to get up, smash my coffee cup and start dancing, with the belly beads showing....
Lahasa, your music touches me in places which needed dusting. your gift reminds me i have a heart, skin, teeth, beauty. thank you. thank you. thank you.
The only reason I am giving this CD 4 stars instead of 5, is because it is too short! Lhasa's voice is sultry, sad and powerful. The music is haunting yet airy. Perfection!
"Castle" is a wonderful book for children who have short attention spans. It provides adventure and re-affirms the laws of chivalry.
This was a great fantasy book. I think it was good because it was full of action and imagination. It is especially good if you like knights and wizardry. This book was about a kid named William who goes on a spectacular adventure with a knight. He runs into trouble and has to defeat a wizard on the way. I recommend this book because it is fun to read and keeps you on the edge of your seat.
just got this book since i read it when i was younger and loved it. i will reread it one of these days, but i bet its pretty lame 15 years later, oh well.
It is a very good book full of magic and castles,abou t a 11 year old gymnast that shrimks his self to save a magical toy's kingdom. A very good book for those who like the medival times.
Castle in the Attic is a masterpiece beyond childhood recognition. Ms. Winthrop has woven a tale not confined to the limits of a child's imagination, but one that tests the mature intellect. Christian parents will be pleased to discover that while magic is a recurring theme in this book, it proves to be mearly a side story to the more important and intreguing prospect of William's character development. I recomend to any parent this book for their young son. It speaks of Honor and Chivalry in the face of evil, of strength and tender souls. What this book speaks of in regard to emotional strength is something that every child, and even adult, needs to discover; That to Cry is not Cowardice, to be tender hearted is not Weakness, and that Honor and courage is the Heart of a Knight.
This book, by Elizabeth Winthrop was one of the best books I've ever read. It was a real page turner! The end of every chapter left me wanting to read on. If you love fantasies too, I strongly recommend you pick up this one today!
The Castle in the Attic was a great book. It was about a boy called William. His family friend babysitter was leaving. She gave him a castle. William and his toy knight go on an adventure for his babysitter. It was an awesome book. I would recommend The Castle in the Attic to everybody.
Do you believe in dragons and magical lands? Well, if you do then this book is for you! Willam's house keeper is moving away. He doesn't want her to go.He tries to make her stay. Before she leaves she gives him a castle. Next thing he knows he's on a fantastic journey to free the land from a evil wizard. Will the wizzard catch him and turn him into lead. Read this book to find out. Recommended for 3rd graders and up.By Sam
This music CD went along fairly well with the action and theme seen in the show, Bubble Gum Crisis. I guess that kind of figures, as it's the sound track for the show, but it was very good. I'm not a music critic, but that is my opinion. If you were a fan of the show, this CD is a must-have.
Sender made the transaction very smooth and pleasant. Delivery was on time as expected. The book, itself, was rather intriguing and very well written in details.
This is one of the many LJ Smith books I read and eventhough it is not the best, it was certainly very interesting... LJ Smith's books are very original and that's the main reason why I like reading them....I prefer all her other books about vampires though..since I'm a vampire freak..but I would encourage anyone to read this book...It's simply great!
Spellbinder was the 1st Night World book I have ever read.I recomended this book to ALL my friends,and I recomend it to you also. L.J. Smith is a very talented writer and I plan to read ALL of her books to come.
I just wanted 2 say that I'm a real bookworm and I loved this book! I also want 2 thank L.J.Smith for putting in the book actual spells.(I'm a witch.) I've been looking for some of those like,forever
This book is one of the greatest of the nightworld series. This book is about gentle, nature loving Thea and her wild beautiful cousin, Blaise.Thea falls in love with a human but since the rules of the nightworld state that she can't love a human Thea finds herself in a situation that could turn deadly......Blaise willing to do anything for her cousin tries to lure Eric into her trap and get him away from Thea for good!This has to be my favorite of the series. It was interesting to see the nightworld from the witches point of view and Thea and Blaise are great characters. Especially Blaise, she's no airhead beauty but like her name a bright blaze of passion, intelligence, and loyalty.
Unlike the first two books in the series Spellbinder switches it's romantic connections to witches insted of vampires. Blaise uses human men as toys till they go crazy, and when she sets her eyes on Eric, Thea's soulmate Thea will do anything to protect him, even if it means breaking the laws of the Night World. A great addition to the series that will have you excited to read more. Though it's a step down from Daughters of Darkness it stands well on it's own.
The plot was okay, the characters were great, and the conclusion interesting. But it was not as good as other Night World Books. But still worth getting.
This book like all of L.J.Smith's other books is absolutely divine! I luved it. Blaise was a perfect witch in my opinion. The only thing that disturbed me was the awful torture chamber for Halloween in the Gym. How can people actually laugh about that (I've met people who think it's funny)?
Good little set of reverse drill bits and corresponding EZ Outs. The #4 bit however, is a little short for the case, and if it is not closed properly, the bit will stick out of the case. This is how it was shipped, denting the case a little bit. The bit does not look damaged, but I have not used it yet.
Although most of the players from the 1961 Cincinnati Reds are forgotten now (exception: right fielder and National League MVP Frank Robinson), this book remains current due to the good humor and insider's view it affords the reader. Nearly 40 years old now, it shows how timeless the game of baseball is.I'm a lifelong NY Yankees fan, but this remains one of my favorite books on any subject.One note: this is one of the only baseball books that was _really_ written by the named author. Brosnan had no ghostwriter.
Jim Brosnan's second book is also a diary, this one on his 1961 season spent with the eventual National League champion Cincinnati Reds. Brosnan's wit, cynicism, and wry observations on the game of baseball make this an entertaining read. He enjoys interacting with his teammates (most of the time) and one conversation in particular involving Brosnan getting on a teammate for his grammar is priceless. It would have been nice had Brosnan included his spring training experience and the Reds' involvement in the World Series that year. Despite lacking those two elements, "Pennant Race" is an easy recommendation. It's not as good as "The Long Season", but it's still a very good read.
This is a very entertaining book that will appeal to all baseball and/or Cincinnati Reds fans. It's a day to day diary of events in Cincinnati's 1961 pennant winning season prepared by relief pitcher Jim Brosnan. It's easy to read, and you'll enjoy Brosnan's humor. Additionally, it gives great insight into the personalities of the star and every day players of the time.
but that doesn't mean it's not good. I mean, the game, like a lot of things in life, must evolutionized some times or other. And Tomb Raider is doing exactly that. So it is different. Lara also no longer runs, but walks for the most part. So what? I think it's a nice change. Sure it will take some time to get used to the changes, but it isn't bad. And for all the people who are complaining about how slow the game is, you know what? You need to get newer computers. Just because your computer fulfills the minimum requirement needs doens't mean it will be good. I have a fairly new computer and it runs perfectly.
Not as explosive as the earlier titles but this game keeps you wanting more. The graphics are above avg. and the camera mostly does what it should. The sound draws you into the game like before, hearing things coming and looking away from the tv as if they were in your house. There are a few glitches when you read some of the many clues, under the Louvre I had something that repeated for what seemed like forever. I just made it to Prague and can't wait to get off work to play again. Fans will still have the puzzles and mazes that take hours to clear a room. This isn't a shooter though, Lara fights but not often, at least not early in the game. Alot of hidden places that you don't have to go to to complete the game, not little rooms with a medi-pac but large rooms with ajoining rooms. Just buy it, if you have a month or so to invest into being in front of your tv on the edge of your seat.
The graphics on this game are really really good.A big downer is the controls, it used to be really easy but now you`ve got no choice but to use the anolog buttons and i hate them!The locations are very detailed and the interaction of friends and enemies is very impressive.But, i`m not sure that it was a good idea to bring in another character.overall, a very good game worth the money, v.good graphics and locations. The only set backs to this game are the controls, and the extra character.
This is my 3rd pressure washer and by far the best of the breed. It is solid piece of work that is easy to move about when doing the deck(s)with wheels that actually work. Santa gave me the one with the roll-up hose which is very nice feature. Only problem was that the User guide didn't have any information on this feature so I spent a few minutes trying to figure out where or how to connect the high pressure hose to unit- Guess What? - No need to connect anything except garden hose. I consider this tool the best buy for your $$$$
McCulloch 1800 PSI Electric Pressure Washer #FHH18AHave used the washer a couple of times and found it easy to operate. It has done the jobs I purchased for a snap. For the time being I find the product of good quality. It appears sturdy & I have the impression it will be a long time before I need another jet washer.The vendor shipped promptly.NGA
It does an excellent job on mildewed wood such as decks and deck furniture without using chemical mode which is the only weak link in an otherwise strong chain. Unfortunately, the only effective chemical solution is chlorine which acts more or less on its own but cannot be used with this machine. Safe cleaners, such as Simple Green are no more effective than when used without them. Other than that, it's a great product.
Super easy to set up and use. Lots of water pressure, tons of hose, and an extra long electrical cord. It also wheels around nicely. I'm excited to use the attachments.
I like it. I live on the west side of the Cascade Range in Oregon and things get dingy pretty quick. I had my vehicle, the rain gutters on the house, landscaping bricks along the path around the house, and odds and ends all washed in about an hour. It works great. The only drawback that I can find is that it doesn't appear to suck up any cleaning solution in the high pressure mode. Only the low pressure. I haven't tried the upper tank yet so maybe that's the problem. Not a huge issue since plain water pretty much takes everything off anyway. The plastic double male hose attachment was a concern before I purchased the unit. I'd read that most of them broke pretty quick. As long as you are aware not to stress it out dragging it around, it will probably last a good long time. If it does break it should be easy to replace pretty cheap. Again great unit so far.
I have several titles in this series--they're great! The recipes are easy to make and clearly set out, and there is always an introductory chapter on the herb or spice covered by the book. There are several other titles in this series: coriander, ginger, garlic, chocolate, etc.
All I can say is that this is a nice nearly complete compilation of his work. A must read in my educated opinion.
Great book for an overall look at insects. Doesn't go into great depth on any one topic or insect, but provides a great cross section of information. Purchased this for my son and will admit that as usual, the DK illustrations caught my eye and I ended up reading the book too. This is a great series of books for kids that really captures their attention.
I'm a teacher and I find the Eyewitness books highly educational. I like the way the concepts are presented in a form without backgrounds. This gives clear facts to the reader without over taxing the attention span. The books are highly informative, presenting difficult concepts in comprehendable chunks that stimulate interest. I have almost the whole collection for my own children and they LOVE them!
A wonderful book, beautifully done, which never fails to fascinate children.For such a short book it's surprisingly complete. Perhaps most importantly of all, it encourages children to look for further information, and directs them to good sources (including the bugs in their own backyards!). The inexpensive used copies that are available make this a don't-miss.
There is a huge range of authors in this book, and it includes most of the main ideas from each original passage. It can be sort of hard to follow at times, however, as it leaves out giant parts of arguments, especially in The Republic. This really breaks down the flow of the piece and renders it much more confusing than the original book.
So, what I've always wanted was a clean digitally remastered version of "Pom Pom Play Girl" in MONO! The stereo is rechanneled with Carl singing on one channel and the guys singing on the other! The Mono "FUN, Fun, Fun is also a "Must Have" in Mono to get the full benefit of Brian's Vocal. The music and vocals are very clean on this CD. The gatefold packaging is a bit weak without any details on the songs but still an overwhelming experience for anyone who enjoys surf music.
Having seen Scruj live a couple of times, and owning a copy of their studio release CD (see their website), I would consider myself a major fan. To quote a friend, "Are they French, Irish, or American Country?" Good question. Answer: all of the above.Blending Irish folk music, french fiddles and lyrics, and country twang, Scruj manages to always be true to the styles they worship. Yet they are all so young! If you have not seen them or heard them, do yourself a favor and do whatever it takes! They play such wonderful music with a profound respect for it's origins and it's spirit.
The reason that i give this cd 5 stars... it's simple... different styles of house music, compiled on one cd... you will enjoy it a whole time... so it's worth for your money !!!If Jack keeps it in this way... we may expect beautiful things of him in the future !!!
Wonderful product - heavy weight and well made. This has been a delightful and useful addition to my 50's style, diner kitchen.
muy buen producto. rapido facil y a tiempo la entrega. sin contratiempos en todo el proceso. lo recomiendo a a
I bought this only because as a fan, I want all of their material. First off, you'll notice the disc length of 76.46. The band added a keyboard player Graham Maitland for this tour which at first is a bit hard to digest(mixed too far up front)sometimes the keyboards work, other times not. There are some classics here- 'The king will come', 'Persephone', 'Time Was' as well as a few others. Sound quality is average, sounds like a straight transfer with no doctoring with the sound. This is the Mark 2 lineup with Laurie Wisefield. Not one of the best concert offerings by the band but worthwhile. I'm sure the band has some real gems in their archive like the live tracks on the superb 'Distillation' box set. Sadly they are not contained on this disc. If you can get past the keyboards and the muddy sound quality, you may enjoy it. Somehow I feel only the true fans will want this disc in their collection.
I usually buy the salted version of this butter since I mostly use it for spreading and for that I like the flavor of the salted version better. That being said, there are a number of recipies that call for unsalted butter and then the unsalted Lurpak is as good as you will find.Note that Lurpak is cultured butter (not sweet cream butter like most American brands) and as such it has a deep and rich flavor that no simple sweet cream butter can match. Cultured butter of this kind is produced by fermenting the cream with lactic bacteria that convert sugars to lactic acid before churning the cream into butter.In my opinion, the Lurpak Danish butter holds its own in comparison with far more expensive butters. I actually prefer Lurpak over brands like Echire, etc.
Ejoyable stories from the early 1980's by an author who waxes a bit nostalgic for the British Empire. Well written with dry humor. A languid pace. Never dull.
It costs a lot because its an IMPORT, not a bootleg! If you're going to enjoy the CD, might as well enjoy it knowing that you didn't pay too much money for a crook to burn the CD for you. Honestly. Things cost money. To a real fan, this is worth the money. Costs a crook a penny to create a mediocre bootleg. Do you really think you're saving money?
This science fiction novel walks around the speculative situation about a natural (not social and not even political choice) population distribution, in agreement his skills and gifts.Naturally many facts occur in this interesting tale , but the most remarkable issue is to make us think the elusive dreams about a better and even pacific society.
One of my all time favorite books, glad to have a new copy
Our Sunday School Class of Middle aged adults ordered this book for class study. We are having a lot of fun with it and learning a lot at the same time. Great Study.
Gwen Bristow is an amazing author. Her books may be a mite old fashioned, but she still packs an emotional, historical and cultural punch. Really a great read, as are her other novels. Don't miss out.
When I first read all three "Plantation" books by Gwen Bristow 20 years ago, I was so enthralled with them that I read them twice!! Well 20 years later and I just read all three of them again this past week. Great books that stand the test of time. Each book can be read alone but I recommend them as a series, loved them years ago and still love them!!
its like code red was an album from Sodom.This album is scarey and makes me feel cool
I had experience of RTS games (Total Annihilation, Age of Empires and Empire Earth) and after I bought Praetorians and played the first time, I found it very very interesting.It's not the typical RTS game where you have to produce a lot of units and simply attack the enemy (like for example TA kingdoms or others) but you have to think in a strategic way before moving and attacking the enemy. In this game, mission by mission, you learn how to balance your troops and how to move in the territory. It's important the fact that troops can interact with territory (hills, woods). You can hide your troops, you can stay higher than the enemy and then attack you enemy suddenly (for example,if your bowmen are in a higher position they will hurt more seriously the enemy). In some missions you have to lay siege to a fortess with war machines.To sum up, I think it's a good game, if you want to enjoy yourself and live the experience of "De Bello Gallico"!
Run the place red, the first cut, is great. If you like the recent direction being taken by people like Tim Hecker and Amon Tobin, consider this the Richard D. James twist on that cut-up trend, with his trademark super hyper drum track. And, like RDJ's past stuff, suitably nightmarish and queasy.The second two tracks are causing a bit of controversy, consisting as they do mainly of noise and analog-style knob tweaking sounds, high pitched shrieks, some distorted screams, etc. There is no beat, there is no melody, there is little apparent structure (although its marginally more structured than "Metal Machine Music," but only just so). This is some of the most uncompromising music RDJ has done, and for him that's quite a statement. Maybe this is his remix of Subotnick's "Silver Apples of the Moon". Anyway, it's not for the faint of heart. It doesn't kick ... and it doesn't make your booty move, so you might want to stay away unless you're a real noise head.
People look at this as a piss-take on an EP, just for RDJ's personal wealth and whatnot. And, truthfully, it is.But that doesn't make the one "real" track on here not worth the money.It does indeed, grow on you. Or else you love it right away. It's quite a departure from his normal works, rarely can you somewhat understand the lyrics, if there are any.The rest is a collection of annoying noises which will either make you or your neighbours go crazy. Nothing really "musical" comes out of them.So albeit is a rubbish of an EP, yet the first track is well worth the price, and if you're into ways of torturing people with different pitches of one noise, then you're set.
I think AFX's take on "Run the Place Red" is incredibly fun -- it makes me want to jump and shimmy each time I hear it. Now, I'm not a huge fan of ragga, but ragga-jungle-drill 'n' bass? I think it's a genius combination, one that only the demented mind of Mr. James could discover. You can barely understand the vocals beneath the percussion -- they're more flavor than anything else. As for the two noise tracks, they're rather interesting the first time around (not to mention intense on the squeals), but I don't think they stand up to repeated listens. Mostly because I don't want to go deaf.
A little research on the internet would show that RDJ has put squealing noise tracks out like this before. The first track is great. However, all the negative reviews of the second and third tracks might be premature. On at least one other AFX CD I had (2 remixes?), the third track was similar witha high pitch and ticking. I recently found out that the third track on that EP was actually a graphic---it's data, not audio, an SSTV image. Likewise, maybe tracks 2&3 on the smojphace CD aren't music, but data. I no longer have the CD to try to decode it myself.
If you don't own anything by the Muffs, get the first self-titled CD or "Blonder and Blonder" first. Then come back for this one.This is a collection of alternative versions, demos, covers from compilations, and tunes that just didn't make the cut.It's still the best thing the band has released since "Blonder and Blonder". If you are a fan, then the liner notes by themselves are worth ten bucks.And you get 30 tunes for under $10! It's hard to find that kind of bargain these days.Don't make this your first Muffs album, but make it your third.
I'm an arts and crafts director for a girlscout camp, so I read a lot of craft books. Klutz really does have the best ones around. These rings are easy, the book gives you everything you need (but scissors) and there are several cute patterns. I'm sure campers will love these projects. The only complaints I have are with the included supplies-- the bead wheel is cumbersome to use, and the colors mix easily. Also, there isn't much variety in beads-- but you can easily supplement with whatever you have on hand.
It takes a good voice to sing Tobira Wo Akete, the second opening song for the show. In my opinion, Anza did a very good job singing this! The first time you hear this song, most people will think, 'ugh! this song sucks', but trust me, in a while you'll get used to it and love it as much as I do. Yoru no Uta and Tomoe are both sung by Iwao Junko, the voice actress for Tomoyo (Madison). Her voice is very soft and high-pitched, but if you love melancholy songs, you'll love these two songs. Honey is the ending song, very nicely sung [by chihiro], and addicting too. The Sakura version is similar to the song, Shiawase no Mahou.The only reason you should buy this CD is for Tobira Wo Akete, Yoru no Uta, Tomoe, and Honey. I would only suggest this for die-hard CCS fans. If you're not one of them, go buy the CCS Best Collection soundtrack.
I just got this book and I am having a wonderful time reading the anecdotes of life in Victorian New York with an eccentric father. The humor is gentle and quiet, if you want outlandsih jokes the this is not the book for you.Of course, some of the customs and actions of the characters may seem odd by modern standards but we must remember that everything changes with time and in 150 years, people may look back at our culture and wonder if we were crazy.Still, in spite of its age, the humor of the book has held up remarkably well. Perhaps we all know a "father" type, an eccentric and bossy person who is somehow endearing nonetheless.So, don't obsess over the un-politically correct attitudes of the time covered, just enjoy the quiet humor and learn about a time gone by.
I loved this book as a preteen and I loved it, and the sequel "Life with Mother" too. Mr. Day paints an accurate picture of life in the early 1900's for a middle class family. Yes, his father is rude and a bit obnoxious, but watching him is very funny. He loved his wife and family and while he blustered and yelled, they loved him. I enjoyed this book and thought it was great.
Would you at the age of 25 leave home and go sailing around the world? Most of us would want to but only few of us would do it. William Albert Robinson was one of the few who took the adventure. It took him three years, three months, and nine days to do it. Robinson encountered cannibals, and head hunters, and Arab tribesmen who captured him and held him for ransom. He escaped them several times to continue on. He was also a keen observer of social life and customs in the South Pacific Islands. It is entertaining and informative book to read. You will not regret it.
I have always loved Peter McWilliams poetry.He had the most impact on my style of writing poetry(Poems in the Key of Life...a Journey). I never knew he wrote non-fiction books. When I couldn't find his poetry books I came to Amazon to purchase them again. This is when I saw his non-fiction work. I bought one. I loved it. It is a useful guide how to go through life with less distress. He does it in a witty, amusing and easy to understand way. I think everyone should read his books. I plan on getting the rest of his work. I have no doubt I will enjoy them as much as I have this one.
When I was a Senior in High School I took an AP Psychology class and the teacher used this book. This book has helped me so much in life. It helped me understand all those awkward teenage years. Helped me deal with an abusive, destructive blended family and helped me learn about myself and my own dysfunctionsd. This is a wonderful book that is very easy to read and something that every one should read.
My high school teacher gave it to me as a gift over 10 years ago, I still find it fascinating and insightful. For people who like quotes about life, this is a must-have. It's an easy read for everyone, and makes you think. I definitely learned something about myself.
End of Romance is the great new album by one of the best rock and roll bands that no one has ever heard of. The album starts out with the rocking "I'm No Angel" which is a vastly different sound than anything on the band's previous works. The drum beat to this song will instantly have you pounding the dashboard in your car as you drive with the windows down and the stereo blasting. Other highlights include "Walking Years Away" and the best song on the album, "Northstar". The song "Coping" which was on the "Born and Razed" album makes an appearance in a different arrangement; one that gives the song a much harder edge, on this record. All in all "End of Romance" is a terrific rock and roll album and one that will hopefully garner the Charlie Mars Band the audience they deserve.
They are definitely a man's pair of jeans. Couldn't imagine they would be more stiff and plain then when I tried them on. Good working jeans now.
This style and the size my husband needs has not been available in our local stores. I was able to find what I needed quickly online and the shipping was very prompt. I would have given it five stars but he hasn't had time to try them on yet so I can't give a perfect score.
They were really soft and great quality. No defects (which is always nice lol). The fiance and I both loved them.
I hate the modern day thigh highs with the silicone bands that hold them up on your thigh. These stockings do not have them in the lace trim. A garter belt is required or garter straps on your favorite bustier. Gives you that sexy garter style without the unsightly bulging and uncomfortable pinching.
Stockings are not easy to find where I live in Northern California and I cannot stand to wear panty hose. I decided to try these stockings that was recommended by the site I used to find a garter belt. I really like the stockings. They are darker black than the picture depicts them. I prefer off-black. The lace top is a little tight with not too much stretch, so if you have large thighs you might not like them. The next order I will order one size larger for that reason although I do not have large thighs. My husband really likes them and the fact that I like them makes him happy. I will buy more.
To date these are my favorite stockings - absolutely beautiful lace top and a lovely hand to the leg. The lace is quite substantial though and with many of the tiny buttons on garter belts this can be a problem. If your thighs not thin, go up a size - I always have.However this is a fabulous stocking that fits, wears well, and feels very nice. THe black is a bit darker than I would prefer.
It's really Little Richard singing some great Little Richard tunes with all the "woo!"s in the right places. But they're not the original recordings, and while still one hell of a singer and performer, the strain of time can be heard as he slowly but surely goes out of key toward the end of the recording. The back-up musicians don't seem to have quite the same energy as the original Disturbers, either. That all said, this is a nice collection of some of his best songs an the price is right.
I purchased this set for myself, because I fell in love with the design. A piece was chipped in the first shipment, but Amazon sent me the replacement immediately. I appreciate their quick response. It might not be the "every-day" set, as it is rather fragile(otherwise, I'd rate it 5 stars), but the design is wonderful. A perfect gift!
I have been wanting this pattern for some time now, so I finally ordered it (3 actually)and they just arrived, very well packed, not a scratch on them, and on time!And you can't beat the price from Amazon, I saved about $75 on each set!
This is a superbly written book. Witty, clever, and thought provoking, I found if hard to put down. It is filled with quirky and interesting characters, prose that flows, and subtle humor that occasionally had me laughing out loud. I cannot wait to read the next book by this promising young author.
It is a great tool and glad the manufacturer stands behind their products. They exchanged the Spanish for English. The tools is worth the money just make sure you get it in the correct language. I am just to OLD to learn a new language.
I haven't actually read Cienfuegos - yet. However, I purchased Caribes via the internet purely because I had been recommended the author and did not realize until I received it that it was the second of a series. Today I was looking for the third in the series - Azabache as I simply have to find out what happens to Cienfuegos next! Caribes is the first spanish book I have read cover to cover and I can't wait to get hold of the next . Great characterization. Vasquez - Figueroa certainly has a vivid imagination which constantly surprises you while instilling a sense of history about the conquest of the New World. Please, please please can Amazon get in ALL of the books in this series as well as Tuareg and Yaiza which I have also been highly recommended (untranslated)
Another Winner for Belva. The characters are real and you will both laugh and cry. The story is believable. You will not be able to put it down.
I'm an avid reader of Belva Plain's books, and After The Fire is just another one of her masterpieces. I really don't understand how anyone who've read this book can think otherwise.
Hyacinth has met the love of her life, Gerald, a medical student who wants to marry her. She is sure that theirs will be a "happily-ever-after" marriage. Her mother warns her about things she has observed in Gerald, but Hyacinth, undaunted, proceeds with the wedding. As it turns out, Mother really does know best in this case but Hyacinth has to learn this the hard way. Gerald uses an unfortunate incident against Hyacinth and she loses everything that she loves. Eventually she finds her true niche in life through a man who loves her, but her secret past keeps her from marrying him. This is a good page-turner and one in which you do care about the main character.
I am well into the book and am enjoying it as I am a fan of Belva Plain. However, no where so far do I find the last name of Hyacinth's family or Gerald's family. They are Dr & Mrs Gerald Who? Am I missing something or was this intentional on the part of the author?
Interesting anecdotes of a white man living among the indians, the hardships and struggles, but it's obviously a biased tale. Quite a stretch for the reader to believe that a man- Texas Ranger no less- would be unable to "escape" before 3 years. Personally I don't believe it. Anyway, while one reviewer highlights a particular commanche torture to an infant, it's best to keep everything in perspective and acknowledge the extreme brutality whites displayed against all tribes in the western hemisphere- for example, Sand Creek, Wounded Knee. That said, if you like stories similar to this, try Nat Love's autobiography.
Not top of the line, but adequate. Purchased for my son-in-law. He's happy with it to use with his woodburning stove in their first home. I would purchase it again.
For thirty bucks, I wasn't expecting much. After reading the reviews, I knew not to expect much. I went so far as to add J-B Weld to my order in anticipation of wobbly joints.I've used it on one fire so far, and I have no need for the J-B Weld yet. When assembling it, the threads all seemed to fit quite well--very snugly, tight, and firm. No wobble. Can't beat the value of these. And all it takes is to J-B weld if it ever starts to "go cheap" on me.
It was about everything I expected because I read the reviews first. I wanted something that would be very inexpensive, but would serve the purpose. So far I have no complaints I have had several fires in my fireplace and it has served the purpose for which it was intended quite well.Each piece is a good weight in your hand, the stand is a little unstable but I just set it close to the hearth wall and its ok.Overall I am very happy especially for the price I paid for it.
Virtual Resort: Spring Break is a highly addictive, surprisingly humorous management game with detailed graphics. True, you will need a powerful computer to get it to run smoothly, but when it does it is well worth it. It requires a decent amount of thinking and rewards you with entertaining animations. Being able to import your own music is a great feature. The level of control that is involved is what makes the game so addictive. It is actually entertaining to sit back and watch all the little things that are going on on your island. All other management games should strive to be half as fun as this one.
I have enjoyed this game. It seems easy but you'll find yourself out of time or money before you have met your objectives. You don't feel cheated, it makes you want try again and again. Maybe no one will drown and perhaps you can even turn a profit. I'm looking forward to many hours of entertainment.
I loved the music for this game and the 20 bucks i spent on this thing when i bought a few years ago was well spent. Its the oldest game for my computer that i still play, probably because there are no sequels, but i burnt the music to a cd and can listen to it in my car. For the 3.50 the game is going at now you might as well just buy it to try it, then again you have to factor in shipping cost, but all in all a great game especially for under ten dollars.
It doesn't matter what this Master sings; he is the best. I have been a fan of BB's forever. There is no such thing as a bad BB collection of songs.
SWEET DREAM BABY isn't grand fiction, but it's an engrossing story with a vivid sense of time and place. The author has pulled off the difficult trick of showing the world through a child's eyes and yet supplying the reader with adult perceptions. Parts of the plot are predictable, but at the conclusion predictibility flies out the window. The novel may be set in the '50s, but this is not a Leave-it-to-Beaver ending.Anyone with firsthand experience of the fifties may have to stretch their suspension of disbelief regarding certain sexual behaviors by the protagonist's aunt in relation to her nephew, but the author has traded a bit of unlikeliness for a gimmick that elevates this novel from the usual coming of age story.
This book should wake up more people to the opportunity to manage and take control of their mortgage instead of the bank controling you. Good information, outlined well with easiy to understand examples.As and extra bonus it was great to meet the author Harj Gill the other night as he presented his information and also showed how to apply this knowledge to your business too.Look for this book to make a difference in banking here in the U.S.
When you understand that banks are interested in making money -- LOTS of it -- for themselves, you'll understand why this book was written. It helps you keep more of your money while still paying off what you borrowed, only faster.For a conventional mortage, most of the payments in the first few years go primarily to paying the interest on the loan, with very little going to the principal. With most people moving to a new one (trading up) every 5-7 years, they wind up paying LOTS of interest with very little to show for it. The banks get VERY rich this way.With this book, you can learn how to move out of that pool of quicksand and stand on solid financial ground. Harj writes clearly and simply without talking down to you. He lays it all out from beginning to end, and everywhere in between.More than worth the INVESTMENT in your life. Definitely read it.
I love this story. Loaned it to my sister and she was just as impressed as I was. Highly recommended.
Need a fun "pick-me upper" for a quick read- try this one. Paige is a tax lawyer handling a cousin's divorce case while Ross is a divorce lawyer handling the cousin's spouse's side of the case. They can't stand each other- until they are forced to spend unlimited time for 2 weeks quarentined together in a hospital due to being exposed to a virus. Virus - The LoveBug! Lots of passion- due to the virus or could it be love?
If you are looking for a humorous, contemporary romantic novel 'Stuck With You' is the book for you. The characters are well developed; even the secondary ones are very humorous. It had me laughing out loud in parts. Although the plot is a little over the top, it is great fun and very easy to read; perfect for unwinding after a hard day.
As the title sounds, the author explained very well about the integration issues that companies who are aiming to become World Class Manufacturing companies status should look into. I stongly suggest those professionals who are being involved in the ERP business to read this book. Flow chart diagrams represent the best way to describe the integration processes among functional areas.
Co-workers stop to comb the sand and ask where I got it. Its a great time out in a stressful environment.
This item is great for sitting on a desk top in an office, classroom, etc. It arrived quickly and seems to be good quality for the price.
I bought this gift for my boyfriend who is going into law school. It was partly a gag gift, but I really did think he could use it to relax when he gets overly stressed. He already loves it and has used it a ton. I love that there are two rakes, and the rocks are appropriate for the size of the garden. There is quite a bite of sand, and it does spill over the edges a little bit when you are using it, but it isn't a huge deal. I can see where other people might have had problems with the base, but this one is just fine and there have been no leakages. I also love the size of this one because it is large enough that you can make great designs in the sand. I had considered going with something smaller, but now I'm glad I didn't because I don't think it would have nearly as much fun or relaxing. I definitely would recommend this for anyone looking for a simple gift that everyone can enjoy.
I purchased this for my new office and I love it and so does everyone who comes in.
Once I shook it a little to make it the sand flat, sand started pouring out the bottom sides because the bottom wood had pulled away from the tacks or nails. I poured the sand back into the packaging box for safekeeping and took the box home for repairs (I bought it for my office). I still like this item; the size is perfect, the sand is nice and plentiful and the rocks are nice river rocks, not too shiny or too dull. I didn't expect much because of the price so I'm actually happy with it... I dropped a star because of the repairs I had to make. I just wish I had read all the reviews before pouring the sand in and making a mess!
If you stop, take a deep breath and move the sand & stones it is relaxing.It is not an immediate fix and it requires you to work at shutting out everything else.If you do that, this will relax you.Additionally, you can make some nice designs.
I want to second everything said by Mr. Grimlan with respect to this album and Les Baxter's output in general. Although I am extremely fond of Les's 1940s-50s work in all genres, some of his 60s pop things (specifically, VOICES IN RHYTHM and COLORS OF BRAZIL/AFRICAN BLUE) continue to leave me cold. This 1970 album, however, exhibits none of the shortcomings of those earlier ones - the lukewarm performances, the generic guitar/bass work or the uncomfortably passe doo-wahs. No, this abbreviated QUE MANGO! has real energy. It crackles - and not only is there not a bad track, but some of them ("Que Mango", "Tropicando", "On a Warm Night", "Felicia, My Love") stand easily with the best of Les's work from his great 50s albums. Highly recommended even as it is at under 24 minutes.
If you ever wonder how tequila is made, find out what an amazing process it is. Buy this book.Full of incredible rich photographs, that depict the everyday beauty of Mexico.
Nab tis iz e bok. I'v beeen dwinkinking teakilyafar sum time and I cun say itz the bast dwink tohavb! Nah I meen et! I'b no dares Beer and Wienbat nothfing beets Teequilla,NOFING! It iz datdwink tht calhmsz da nerves and makez ya feelmo relaxed. Dake it for me thot Ttequila wilbwing good sings to youz and familee and itcan mak ya feeel whandarfol...YOO HERE VE!
In this book Agatha Christie refers to the murderers in Death in the Clouds, the Murder of Roger Ackroyd, Mysterious Affair at Style and the Mystery of the Blue Train, so make sure you have read all of these before you read this one, our your fun will be spoilt!Dumb Witness is one my top ten favourite Agatha Christie novels. Dame Christie has expressed the character of Hastings better here than in any of the other seven novels in which he appears. It is also one of the most amusing.One thing I enjoy about this book is that we are given a fair crack at the whip - everything that Poirot sees we see, there are no last minute envelopes arriving (which often irritates me). His explanation is convincing.Go ahead and read it! But don't forget to read the books mentioned above first.
I am a Poirot fan, so I enjoyed this mystery as I expected. The little dog in the story is precious and adds a new element to the plot. I don't remember an animal being featured this way in another Christie book. While I was reading, I kept thinking that the plot reminded me of another Christie book but couldn't remember which one. I thought I had guessed the killer but I was wrong. Which makes me like it more!
The Dumb Witness of the title is a dog named Bob. A dog who loves his mistress and possibly is the only witness to her murder. If it was a murder ... Hastings and Poirot work together, trade quips and get on one another's nerves as they work through a neat collection of suspects. This isn't high art, but it is quaint and well crafted. I recommend it.
Buy this to learn more about your 1911 pistol. I really followed some things written here and presto!, My gun worked better. (with the help of my gunsmith)Knowing your pistol can save your life and money. And knowing your pistol means that it is safer to handle and carry.
An excellent addition to the library of any Model 1911 owner. The book deals with the history, shooting and maintenance of this iconic firearm.
We got this for our son with sensory issues as an alternative to a more expensive therapy swing. If you use it without the cupholder and foot rest, it works just fine, and since it's hanging inside, we don't worry about wear and tear. Just make sure you have a swivel joint at the ceiling for it.Hanging in a kids room, it will generally fall very close to the ground, so be sure to shorten the cord to a higher level for a taller child.
This box set is a MUST-HAVE for all Elvis/Orion fans alike. Booklet is fantastic. Songs are great . Can't wait till the next Orion box set !
im glad i bought this item i could have use this years ago as i love to take pictures and video my kids sports.Darrin & Jackie
I'm an always learning watercolorist and this book is great inspiration for letting more passion flow into my everyday and my art. the book arrived in 'very good' condition, as requested. Nolde's landscapes and flowers are unparalleled in their joy for color and sense of spontaneous energy and expression. i'm really glad i did the market buy and let Amazon find the book over a few months.
This book deatails the travels of Felicia, a young Irish girl, who finds herself pregnant by a rake and travels to England to find him. We know from the beginning that she is on a fruitless task - she has been used, abused and discarded. On her search, she is 'befriended' by a creepy man who portends trouble and worse for Felicia. The book is peopled by religious fanatics, homeless eccentridw who come alive during the night and it is always surprising to recognize the naivity and innocence of Felicia. Despite the horrors and depravity that the book allude to, Trevor never gets into the bloody details that an author such as Stephen King savors. The same monstrosities are here but they are alluded to and left to our imagination, our ability to call forth our own personal monsters and give them literary life.
Book looks great everything that was promised and arrived in great time too. Thanks! Will enjoy reading it and sharing
Trevor does an execptional job of captivating the reader and telling the story from the two main characters (Felicia and Hilditch). One cannot help but feel sad after reading this novel. All involved appear to be victims at various times and on various levels. Felicia, the victim of death (her mothers) and a jilted lover and Hilditch. Hilditch a victim of his mother and his need for "friendship".Trevor will keep you reading and feeling throughout the book. Do not expect to feel good after reading this novel. A great book for a book group discussion.
I found this book to be a bit difficult to read because of the author's habit of jumping from past to present with no warning at all. I did however find the book to be very exciting and have not been able to get it out of my mind since I finished it.I would recommend this book to anyone who likes a suspence and is looking for a change of pace. My only recommendation is to read it slowly to keep from getting confused!
Amazon needs to fix its info for this product - it's not an audio CD. It's a great package of software that has helped me bulk up my vocabulary and get a better pronuncation in modern standard arabic. I learned arabic grammar a while back, but found that its hard to communicate without a growing base of vocabulary to use. THis program is helping me do that. Love the clear audio recordings!
this is what wilco would sound like now if they had not turned into radiohead. first 6 songs are as strong as any record in the last 10 years.
A must have for any PUR fan, it is if full of classic songs such as "Lena", "Prinzessin" and "Drachen sollen fleigen". Great cd.
Compiled and edited by William F. Buckiley, Jr., the Treasury Of Classic Children's Literature is an anthology of enduring stories for young folk, painstakingly selected and compiled by William F. Buckley, Jr. for their lasting appeal across the generations. Works by Jack London, Lewis Carroll, Rudyard Kipling, Mark Twain, Thorton W. Burgess, Palmer Cox, and others, are embellished with black-and-white illustrations in this timeless and memorable anthology which is a welcome and recommended addition to school and community library Children's Literature anthology collections.
This CD has instrumental experimental Jazz and near trance synthesizer pieces. Some of the rhythm patterns have a Latin flavor and feel very danceable. Others remind me of chill out lounge music. A few selections have some subdued vocals that are more part of the background rather than the foreground. I enjoyed the selections and liked working with them in the background. I have not heard the other volumes in the series and so I cannot compare them with each other. My only reservations about this collection is that the mood between selections is not always consistent, some are more mellow and some are more lively. But the mood of the CD is more consistent than a lot of collections I have heard. Some of the pieces are more experimental than the others and are interesting studies. Two of them felt slightly dissident to me, but the experimental sound still felt worth hearing.
IT'S OLD SCHOOL JAMS!!! I HAVE SEARCHED AND SEARCHED FOR THIS CD FOR THE LONGEST. I HAVE FINALLY FOUND IT!!! NOW I HAVE TO PURCHASE IT.
I purchase this for a friend who is a big fan of super girl she was really impress with the details lived it
This gift for my brother at Christmas got more attention than any others. My sister and I hid upstairs for a good 20 minutes trying to get it together, which for us was fun. "No, that doesn't look like the box. Let me try." "Maybe the German instructions make more sense" (neither of us read German).Our time was well-spent: my brother and his girlfriend admired the appearance, loved the caddy, until my brother became suspicious and announced "I think it's locked in". As my sister and I sat smug, several people gave it a try, and we heard a resounding chorus of "I know some people who absolutely must have this."
Wow, I'm surprised to see this available here. Horizont's "Silent Moon" is a classic New Age album from 1986. It was readily available for a few years, then totally disappeared; this disc is EXTREMELY hard to find now. This album is a good mix of new age and "space jazz". Most of the synths used here are now obsolete, and they sound great. The title track is definitely the outstanding track on the disc, but others are great as well. If you were to compare to other artists, it would be kind of like combining Vangelis, Jean Michel Jarre, and Dave Grusin (the more jazzy tracks are Grusin-esque). Overall a good listen and a great representation of the greatest era in new age music. Too bad the cover art is not available here, it's awesome. If I get a chance I will scan my copy and post it. Grab this while you can, you may not see it again for a long long time.
A simple premise ... a wealthy American businessman's only granddaugter dies of a cocaine overdose. He decides that he's going to kill everyone who had anything to do with it, starting with her boyfriend and ending with the head of the Columbian drug cartel. Along the way yachts are wrecked and burned, secret love affairs are revealed, priests are consulted, and plenty of smartass dialogue is emitted. Buckley obviously knows what really rich people are really like, and in addition to having a great plot and memorable charactes, it's full of consistently interesting observations. A good book
Fans of American Wolverine must remember this is an anime not a Marvel Comics release. I will admit the voice of Wolverine is a little unexpected being not nearly as gruff and deep as what we have came to know. Also, yes He looks like a skinny little punk, but this is how most male anime characters look! Besides these minor complaints I think this was a nice departure from the "kiddie" style American cartoons seem to hold on to. So give this a try and wait till 5 or so episodes in to form an opinion.
There are many very fine recordings of Parsifal in the catalog. In fact, it's difficult to find a poor performance. The highlight of this production is the magisterial Gurnemanz of Kurt Moll--possibly the best rendition ever. He is ablely supported by the poet of the baton Rafael Kubelik and a virile James King as Parsifal, also possibly his best recorded role ever. The recording has a wide and deep sound stage with excellent sonics. I enjoyed listening to this excellent studio rendition. Wagnerian singing of the highest standards.This recording is near the top of my favorite stereo studio editions along with Karajan's also fine rendition on DG recorded the same year as this one(1980). For the historically minded, I would recommend Krauss's 1953 Bayreuth live air check or Knappertsbusch's 1951 Bayreuth live recording on Decca. Karajan's live Vienna aircheck from 1961 on RCA is also interesting, but sounds older than the earlier recommendations.
Simple, straightforward , and no problems in the few weeks I've had this. Very good price. Good basic protection. I now prefer First Alert over their major competitor, after a problem with that companies' detectors , and their customer service did not seem to care at all. First Alert's customer service appears superior to me.
I was very pleased with my first alert plug in Carbon Monoxide Alarm. I like it because it is not that noticeable. It's not an ugly plug in and I like that. We received it in the time that they said it would be delivered and I would not hesitate to order again from Amazon. We have ordered many, many things from Amazon and have never been disappointed with their service.Thank you,Mary Lou Pantuso
After opening the package, I simply plugged this in to a wall socket (making sure that it is not near a heating source, gas, moving air, dust or sunlight). I tested it, the alarm rang loud and clear. A red light lets me know that it is functional.I feel better having it in my house.
Easy to install, just find an outlet in center of home. Product is made by first alert too which gives me confidence in operation.
Great product. i gave this product to my son and i feel much better that he and his family are safer from carbon monoxide. thanks.
The Carbon Monoxide Alarm met what I needed for my rental house. I like the idea of the plug in vs the battery only type. The Alarm has a battery back-up, which covers a power failure.The new law requires the CO Alarms for rentals and homes. Reasonable price too !
I just plugged it in and it's on the job. Perhaps it would be more assuring if it had a digital read-out of level of monooxide in the air.
I chose this alarm because it was the easiest to use. Just plug it in and that's it. I have a gas fireplace and was told that I needed a carbon monoxide detector. Plugged into a regular outlet, it has a dim light to let you know that it's working and you can test the monitor at any time to make sure it's "alarmed." Hopefully, I'll never have to see how well the monitor works in an emergency but I feel safer knowing that I have one.
I feel that these are a necessity especially if you live in colder winter climates where you may have the windows closed for a few months.I prefer this model as it plugs in to an outlet rather than battery operated units.I found the models through Amazaon were several dollars cheaper than stores around my area.
Easily the best tripod I've ever owned, including some considerably more expensive ones. The only problem was with the remote. You must turn on the video camera before connecting. When the camera turns off automatically, disconnect the wire, turn on the camera, plug the remote back in. What a pain.
1. Suerte - Shakira2. Si Te Vas - Shakira3. Ojos Asi - Shakira4. Te Aviso, Te Anuncio - Shakira5. Objection - Shakira6. Tu - Shakira7. Sombra De Ti - Shakira8. Que Me Quedes Tu - Shakira9. Te Dejo Madrid - Shakira10. Octavo Dia - Shakira11. Ciega, Sordomuda - Shakira12. No Creo - Shakira
This is a delightful little book of wisdom. It is a great read for anyone searching for greater spirituality in their life. It is not really a book of any particular religion or Denomination. It is just a bit of guidance from a great master. Krishnamurti does not try to convert anyone. He merely nudges people to seek aims greater than themselves. I find it a quick read that can also be read over again numerous times. In fact, I suggest it be read through once quickly and then referred to sporadically to absorb all the wisdom. It is a spiritual reference book that holds value over time.
We love this set -- we used it for our daughter, and now we're using it for our son. Sumersault is rated highly by Baby Bargains, and this set is well worth the money. It's held up really well for us over almost three years. FYI, it goes well with the Pottery Barn "classic stars" rug in blue.
A comprehensive history of Radio Corporation of America, from its formation in 1919 to its pending merger with General Electric in 1986. The CED VideoDisc system is only briefly discussed towards the end of the book, but this book puts it in the perspective of the corporation as a whole.
This is a great history book on the great Mongol Empire. It clears up a lot misunderstandings and superstitions about the supposedly horrible Mongol barbarians and gives a reliable account of their rule in this time period. It covers Temujin's (aka Genghis Khan) beginnings to the end of his forebears rule. It has pictures from the past and of re-enactments of Mongol cavalry - you will rarely find this elsewhere. The Mongol Empire was a militaristic nation, so this book lacks on the military strategy and warfare of the Mongols. Only the basics are covered.
Great product, good price, I have shot them several times and never had anything go wrong. I did robin hood one of them but that was my fault.
Been trying to make my first crossbow kill for a couple of years. Never could make it happen then I got a new Horton Crossbow and some of these carbon express arrows with muzzie broad heads and one shot one kill. The shot was a 28 yds and the deer ran another 50 yds and crashed in the woods. She did manage to break the shaft off when she fell since I hit her in her shoulder and instead of a clean pass through. Still accurate arrows.
I found this book to be extremely useful. The techniques were all new to me. The one that I am going to try first is the wax resist. I am a little worried about the other techniques that use solvents - I don't know where to buy them, and I don't want anything unnatural that is going to hurt my body. Overall, this is a lovely book. One department that does need a little bit of expansion is making the journal itself. However, I already have a blank journal that I bought from a bookstore beginning with Bor (they offer great blank journals CHEAP) and I am just going to use the techniques. Cheers!!
This movie is chock full of slapstick comedy so if you don't like that, you won't like this movie. However, it always makes me laugh. I love it!
I have loved Lewis and Martin since I was a child and now I share the fun with my children. My 5 year old loves the hilarious stunts Lewis does and the soda machine scene must be rewound and played over and over. He has tears in his eyes from laughing so hard. I highly recommend for the family.
ITem was shipped new and arrived in excellent condition. DVD provides a beginning knowledge about the almost lost art regarding Tibetan Medicine. As indicated in the DVD, there are very few doctors that still retain this knowledge and practice. Excellent overview but it is all in subtitles and obtaining any of the medicines/herbs seems as though it would be difficult. They take a wholistic approach and specialize the medicines for the person. You would need to go to India to get a diagnosis regarding your condition. Too bad it is not closer.
This film is filled with informative interviews which is great. This film is also subtitled. Not so great. Definately worth an afternoon. Watch this film with intention because it is filled with teachings, visual cues and subtitles.
The knowledge of Healing was a great explanations of Tibetan Herbs, treatments etc...that truly work, better then our deadly chemicals...they have been used to heal anything and everything since 5000 yrs and more; their correct diagnosis of the different pulses is very effective...treating illness with heat or cold treatments...along with prayers...how can anyone go wrong...
I recently broke my foot and were put in a FP Walker boot. The 1st couple of days were no fun with the skin on the back of my heel rubbing. I could not get a normal sock on due to the swelling.These socks rock! Easy to put on and padding in all the right places.I am definitely buying some more.
Now look, I know Piers Anthony is a great author. I've read his Incarnation of Immortality series, all the Xanth books, the Mode books, and the Apprentice Adept series. But this, I have to say, is the best of the bunch. What do you get when you cross a young black Mundane with a magical talent, a 130 year old man who was transformed into a tree, three kings, and a mess of zombies? Believe it or not, one of the best surprises to come into Xanth in years, thanks to the devious plotting of Good Magician Humphrey, Clio the Muse, and everybody's favorite elf, Jenny of the World of Two Moons. For all of us raised on fairy tales, this one beats them all.
I have just finished this novel, and must say that it is very complex, yet sets up countless options for the future of Xanth! This book is a story of love, hate, prejudice, potential adultery, and a complete denial and rejection of the Adult Conspiracy! If you love the Xanth novels, you MUST read this book!
Nice, handy, and lightweight philosophy dictonary.
I have a friend who has a family history of this disease. He wanted the most current information so I ordered it for him and he found it very valuable.Doc
I have very little to add to these semi-enlighted reviews (above).However, of all his albums, I prefer the immediacy and dialogue here between these masters of string & percussion.We're blessed here in Land of Enchantment to have Alhaj in our midst, and on Music faculty of state university, UNM. It's a secret, but he also has a delicious sense of humor...
I also read this book when it was first available last year as an e-book, and I definitely found it inspiring. Body image + sexuality are inextricably linked, and I found Miss Dodd's personal accounts of her struggles to be fascinating and ultimately inspirational. Buy this book for your teenage daughter!
There are very few books that I recommend to other readers, because I assume that everyone has their own tastes and their interests -- especially in the area of "self-help." But, this book covers such a far reaching subject, and I think just about every woman I know could benefit from it. This woman talks about body image in regards to sex, dressing, jobs, long term success, even friendships.It really is inspirational, and it changed the way I looked at my waist, hips, thighs, butt, you name it!
I got a similar set (3-pc with shaker and 2 glasses). I agree with the other reviews about the shaker, it leaks a little bit. I suggest getting another shaker, but keeping this one around as a back-up OR wrapping a small towel around the leaky seam. I like the texture of the shaker and glasses. It's classy and not so overdone that it's tacky.
I took a class from Bruce McIntyre in 1968 or maybe 1969. I enjoyed it so much and buying this drawing book brought back memories of what I had learned then. He makes drawing much easier than I thought it was but showing easy things to use to make the picture come to life. A friend borrowed my books from the class and I never got them back when I moved so I was elated to get the Drawing Textbook from Amazon. YEA!!!
Drawing Textbook by Bruce McIntyre is required for an art class I'm in. I like how it laid out and easy to follow away from class. I love that I was able to find it on amazon.com so I could get my own copy. It helps that I don't have to try to follow along with several others at the same time.
This book was more than I expected...the pictures are lovely - really makes you want to visit Alaska but if you can't you can certainly enjoy this book.....
Got this through Amazon for my daughter's superhero party. She could hardly wait to put it on. The quality is OK - some parts (like the skirt) have gotten stuck together and the color has come off a bit. For a costume though, it'll serve a good purpose, and provide hours of fun. The boots a really high. My daughter is tall for her age, but the boots go all the way up (and even under) the skirt. Just FYI.
A useful history of the last days of Soviet rule and the early days of democracy in Russia, told through the stories of several, mostly prominent individuals. It provides a nice portrait of what exists, but lacks deep analysis to answer the question of why.
Highly recommended. This book not only gives a stunning history of the Soviet Union but also a much more personal account of the people who live there. This is truly a must read for anyone interested in Russia and the problems it faces today
Mr. Remnick has given us a masterwork. He seamlessly meshes intimate portraits of Soviet citizens within the larger landscape of the last days of the Soviet Empire. He has a rare ability to blend the micro and the macro in a soul-stirring narrative. This is a profound work that is filled with compelling stories. Lenin's Tomb is so superb that even those who avoid "history books" will relish it. Could not more highly recommend this book. The scads of glowing reviews below are all well deserved.
great book with lots of great anecdotes and small, personal biographies of those power capitalists who entered the Russian business scene as the communist era turned its last page.
This is a very revealing and perhaps most revealing account of the last days of the Soviet Union put forth in a concise manner for the reader. It is smooth flowing, vivid in its descriptions and captured the mood at the time in such an authentic way. The reliance on interviews gives a lot of credibility to the narration and the portrayal of the character in the the situations they found themselves in. The society as a whole is bared for he reader to understand and the system's shortcomings are exposed. I read The Union Muzhik the other day and from it, understand the hopes of Perestroika and Glasnost that the demise of the Soviet Union failed to bring to the people.
I bought this binder to hold a 700+ page anatomy book that was published unbound, and it probably could have held at least two books that size. It's huge. The pockets, D-rings, and opening mechanism are all top quality.When measuring how much space you'll need for this binder in your bookshelf, backpack, etc., remember that the rings themselves are four inches, so the binder is even wider, close to five inches. The side of the binder with the rings will non-negotiably need that much room.
I keep all of my equipment manuals and owners' guides in these, and needed to add a volume. The others were bought in 2005, so I was worried that I might not be able to get the same durable quality. I worried needlessly. These are up to the usual Avery standards.
"Z" is the follow-up feature to "Nightfall" by Tempest. It's a jolly fun scare ride throughout, as you never know where the undead creatures (I hope that's not a spoiler) may be lurking. It reminds me of a Saturday afternoon matinee horror flick - full of thrills and action, but also with dashes of humor. "Z" is a film just perfect for Halloween - a relentless chase and pursuit as the characters try to survive, not knowing which way to turn. Also, interestingly, the creatures are very old-school - you'll hear and smell what I mean!!
This was a cool fast paced indie zombie movie. Would defiantly recommend friends and family to see this film. Would like to see what this company could come up with if given the opportunity to do a second or third zombie film. Oh and the disclaimer at the end of the film about no zombies being hurt during the filming of the movie was pretty neat too.
This Costume was just as it says. Was a great buy. The material was stretchy so it moved easily with my active child. No complaints.
Hello,This pink batgirl costume is the best and so perfect for this halloween! It's made well and the topic in kindergarten this past week has been all about bats!!! Daughter cannot wait to wear it and decided to become batgirl since she's already been a princess and ballerina before.Sandra M.
The costume came fast and fit awesome. My only complaint was with the shoe coverings. They broke easily and would not stay on my daughters shoes so we ended up not using them.
This was super cute on my daughter and she absolutely loved it. Everything fit nicely. The only thing I did not like about the costume was that the second time my daughter wore it the fabric had already started to stretch and tear. It would be nice if they would make the material more durable for the kids costumes.
This is a fabulous costume! My daughter loves it and has had it on every day since it arrived last week. She even slept in it a couple of nights. The other reviews are correct in saying that it needs some mending. We had to reinforce the velcro on the mask and the elastic on the bottom of the boots. After a little stitching it is fine. We also sewed on a small piece of material to the back of the face mask so that it wouldn't stretch any further and tear. This was a fabulous idea. Do it! I only deducted one star for this because the rest of it is great. The material is a durable shiny pink. My daughter is a size 4 and wears a size 9 shoe and the small fits perfectly. If she were a 5 or older I would get the medium. Totally worth the money.
My neice is four and wanted a superhero costume for Christmas and this is what I got for her.. This costume is not the most durable or made to withstand prolonged wear or washing, however it is great for what it actually is.. The material is pink and kind of shimmery and sparkle. My neice loved it so much she slept in it Christmas eve and wore it all day on Christmas! She loved this costume so very much and I feel as though it was money well spent.
This is a great costume. All the extra pieces make it really great. This is one of our favorite costumes.
Pink Bat-girl is a hit at our house. She loves to dress up. Costume is a little flimsy but will last through the Halloween season and maybe some dress-up after. Skimpy and thin so plan on wearing something under it. (I wish we had bought a size larger) Don't be fooled by the cape it does not go over the shoulders, only behind the back. It is very cute and my 7 year old daughter loves it.
Nice work. Full disclosure. Some of these guys were drinking buddies when I worked in Norfolk . I produced the first TV documentary on SEALS
This is a great rod if you need if for a little space. It is stylish while being sturdy. The accents on the end bring out more charater than other plain rods. Had a strong resistance so it stays up on the walls. Holds a material curtain as well as a liner and hasen't budged. Love this rod and would buy again.
Why is it so hard for them to put out Julia Child DVD sets? Just when i was about to give up, they put 8 episodes from Baking With Julia. The set is wonderful and well worth the money. The only reason for 4 stars instead of 5, is the annoying menus you cant exit out of, and the fact only 8 episodes were released. Though I am happy to see a volume 2 is released as of March 1st!
The DVD's are a great addition and compliment to the book. This would be wonderful for any cook from novice to expert.
This is one of three videos that comprise the show- about 8 episodes each to total approx. 24 episodes. I don't know how many were in the original show, so I can't say what percentage of it is on tape here. Reading the back covers, I don't see Martha Stewart's wedding cake presentation, although it was in the original show and that was great just by itself. It is really interesting to watch, and her guest chefs go slow enough to be able to reproduce what they are doing. It's good to have the companion book nearby by Dorie Greenspan, as well, so it's written down for you and you can focus on technique. More recipes in the book than on this DVD.
I was delighted to find this newest incarnation after digging about for his other albums/CD's that were not released in the States and having to get them as imports. The guy would be big here with a little publicity. His lyrics are as ususal clever with twists and turns not found in most artists work. The fave so far is "Billy" (which probaby could have been named "Sally Wants" just as easily). Keep it up!! and keep cranking it out into the 00's!! Valkomen back!
He's grown musically and hasn't lost his talent for interesting--almost arresting--lyrics. Fans of the Nik Kershaw who came to fame in the early 1980s will appreciate this album.
Very compact, well made, helps me level the camera when I set it on sloped surfaces and it stays in place due to the rubber feet. For the price and size it's a great alternative.
It's light, compact, and stable, easy to slip into a shirt pocket, and easy to use. It's great for fairly flat surfaces. From reading descriptions, the gorilla tripod (I think that's the name), while bulkier, is more versatile, since it can adjust for uneven surfaces and wrap around poles etc, but I haven't tried it.
The material was nice and clean, no rust and flat. Drills nicely and was easy to work with.Highly recommend.
It's a good basic book- no frills. Since it's my first Korean food cookbook I have nothing to compare it to. It has been helpful especially the glossary which describes terms.
I love Korean food but I had found it very difficult to find a good Vegetarian Korean cookbook until I stumbled onto this terrific book. I found fun and easy to prepare vegetarian and many vegan recipes in this very unique book.
I enjoyed A.F.'s other books enough to buy this one, although it is not nearly as practical. The sections on where to buy clothes are not only out of date by now, they are also designed for people who have far more money than most. Actually, I don't know why this book was published originally since, if you have the money to shop at these stores, you probably already know about them. It almost seems like a matter of credentialing, but who knows.I would buy one of A.F.'s other books if you are just looking for a men's clothing guide. However, if the subject matter really interests you, you will find that each of A.F.'s books covers much of the same ground, but in slightly different ways, so that there is value in reading all of them, including this one.
If you're seeking information on how to tell fine menswear from bad, skip this book and go directly to Flusser's new one.If you're a would-be dandy looking for information on where to buy men's furnishings around the world, buy the book (with a minor caution). Many of the stores in the U.S. have relocated and some have closed.On the other hand, I've used it to find choices in London and Paris that I would never have known about otherwise. And once you've made the initial investment in the measurements, you can patronize many of these establishments by telephone.A number of earlier reviews criticise Flusser for focusing on the finest quality and most expensive clothing in the world. It is, and he does. But for people who do or want to play that game, it's still the best source of information.
As noted by many reviewers, the clothing fact information is first rate.The second part of the book on shopping and retail establishments is so out of date in 2005 that I really question whether a purchase is worthwhile if retailer information is primary purpose of proposed purchase. A good 60% of the information on establishments in the US and London is totally outdated or the stores have gone out of business.Try the library or borrowing from a friend to see if any of the desired information is still relevant before purchasing. This book needs a serious update.
It took me some time to read this book. I read this first part avidly. Then read bits and pieces now and then. Blood glucose meter at hand I knew much of what he talks about but I did come across great insights.A must read for all people who have a problem with diabetes or better still with pre-diabetes. I do agree with most of all that is written in the book. A big part of the book is dedicated to Insulin usage which if you are not on it yet you might skip it. On the whole the book explains in layman terms the science behind glucose metabolism in our body. Pity there is no mention of any MODY diabetes which is increasingly becoming important as new discoveries are being done how actually what is called Type 2 diabetes is not as it is really depicted.
As with his first book, this book has more great information for me as a Type 2 Diabetic. Although my wife is not diabetic, we love ALL the recipe's in both books. They have kept my blood sugar in total control and are delicious! Thanks Dr. Bernstein!
Of the 3 books on this subject by Dr. Bernstein that I have read including his suggested recipes, this is the most detailled and informative. I started practicing what Dr. Bernstein preaches and while it is indeed, difficult at first-especially when you look to revamp your food choices that were learned over your lifetime. After a week, the cravings tend to disappear and I am seeing my sugars come down and I lost 3 lbs. This is just one battle, but if these results keep up, I see this investment into Dr. Bernstein's program is a small price to pay for nutritional and healthy control.
Of the five books that I've read on diabetes, this is the one that has all the answers. I've been on Dr. Bernsteins blood sugar normalization and weight loss program for 6 weeks and have lost 21 pounds, with no craving for carbohydrates!! The program works because the author(a Type 1 diabetic)hasworked out all the answers from personal experience.
I've been making my morning tea in these mugs for several years (no problem with pouring boiling water into them yet), and my mate has been using them occasionally for beer for just as long.They work well for tea or beer - the thick glass and the raised foot help keep liquids at the right temperature, and sixteen ounces is a bottle or a long-steeping teabags worth.My only problem with these is that the rims chip in the dishwasher. I dont' know if that's just my dishwasher, or because I put them next to heavy Arcoroc glasses, but I've found three so far with a slice taken out of the edge. (Which I then smooth down with a diamond wand). Anchor-hocking actually redesigned these to have a less flared lip a couple of years ago, so they may know about this problem. (The new ones chip too, just not as often).
I have had 12 of these 16 oz. mugs for some time now and think they are the best. Have had no chips, but am careful that no glasses touch other items in my dishwasher. I have given these for gifts and the recipients have asked for more of them for xmas next year. Thanks for an excellent product.
I read Antony Beevor which got me hooked on Stalingrad, and this book is as good as Beevor's. It is also as good as Hayward's new book on Admiral Nelson. Both get my high praise. Scholarly works that are also readable are few and far between, so make the most of this guy's work.
I enjoyed this book very much. I got it as a gift and have now brought a copy to give to someone else. It is very, very thorough, which makes it ideal for academics, but it is also easy for enthusiasts like me to understand and get absorbed in. And I did. Even though I naturally knew how the Stalingrad battle ended I still felt gripped by the dreadful story as it unfolded. Mr Hayward managed to make the events understable and the characters believable. I felt their frustration and their pain and their growing feelings of failure and terrible disappointment. This book goes well alongside Beavor's equally important study of the battle. Stalingrad enthusiasts simply MUST own copies of both, especially as Hayward's is the first to explain air operations (and brilliantly) and Beavor's is the first to look at the fate of the ordinary soldiers from both sides.
I read this book as part of a study I am doing into war on the Eastern Front.I found the book to be excellently researched and well written. For those who are interested in military history and in particular German Military history, I would say it's a must on any good bookshelf
I agree with what esteemed Professor Richard Overy said in his review of this book: "This is a model of its kind, which ought to set an agenda for the reconstruction of the air narrative in this and other theatres in the greatest of wars." But I will go further; this book isn't only or even mainly a narrative. It's a powerfully strong piece of operational-level analysis. It is written in a lively and captivating way, which makes the density of analysis easy to cope with. I rate this work very highly.
This volume is a major contribution to the history of the Luftwaffe during the Russo-Germano war. "Stopped at Stalingrad" is also a richly drawn study of the most important air campaigns in the Eastern Front. Written in an accessible style this volume will be welcomed by anyone with an interest in the WWII. I was very pleasantly surprised by the book and also the quality of its contents. The author did a masterful job of research. Joel Hayward draws on diaries of both key commanders and regular airmen. He also shows that the poorly conceived strategies of Hitler and his buffoon, Goering, dommed the efforts of men such von Manstein, Milch and Wolfram von Richthofen (an outstanding soldier) to come to grips with an impossible situation. I heartily recommended this book.
I've read a tremendous amount on the subject of WW II history, so very rarely do I read a book with anything new to tell me. This book is in that class and well-written too. The two points I found interesting were the discussion of the original focus of Hitler's 1942 campaign in Russia and the first extensive history I've read about the airlift effort to save Paulus' 6th Army trapped at Stalingrad. He offers original research into 1) the question of just who promised Hitler that the Luftwaffe could sustain 6th Army by airlift, and 2)just how successful the Soviets were in interfering with the airlift. For anyone interested in the history of WW II on the Eastern Front, this book is a must read.
After receiving both of the Librero's tapes (The Big Band Swing and The Latin and Argentine Tango) as a gift, my husband and I cannot believe how easy it has been to learn to dance from them. Neither of us were dancers and Blanche and Emilio have made it fun and very simple for us to learn. Now we can dance all of the dances that we always wanted to, plus have a good time practicing with our friends. We also enjoy the music CDs that were part of the package, as well as the cue cards.
I am an intermediate dancer in some dances, and a beginner in others. I found the Librero's Dance Series (both the Big Band and Latin) very helpful in providing and overall understanding of the similarities and differences of all the popular dances. Their Argentine Tango section would be specially good for beginners. Most videos I have seen on this dance can be frustrating and overwhelming. The music CD is not very inspiring but the tempos are very good for practice and it is convenient. I definitely recommend the Librero's Series, particularly for the Beginner dancer.
I buy Wiley's guide every year and always find her to be right on the money when it comes to rating the rides, recommending hotels, and giving tips on extras like how and where to meet the characters. What separates this book from the other Disney guides is that it's realistic....the unoffical guide lays out a itinerary that would kill anyone with kids and the official guide is all sugary and light, never telling you how to handle the crowds and the heat and all the other things that are just a factor when you're at Disney World. Wiley hits the middle ground - she's positive and obviously knows (and loves) her stuff but she'll also give you the facts.
I bought the 1999 version and am about to order the newest edition. I had not been to Disney World in 12 years so I had no idea on what to do and where do go. The book was right on about every detail. I especially like the ride advice for little ones and the hotel recommendations. If you are planning a trip, buy this book first!!!!!!!!!!
Book arrived in good contition as described and in the time indicated. Very happy with the service. I would use them again.
This is a wonderful book with bright cute illustrations and a good story. We got one with stickers for Christmas, it was a nice bonus. My son read it 250+ times in the past few years, he is growing up but the book never gets old or boring :o) thank you
Spider-Man - The High Definition Trilogy (Spider-Man / Spider-Man 2 / Spider-Man 3) [Blu-ray] WE ARE TALKING SPIDERMAN HERE AND ON BLU-RAY IT IS SIMPLY AMAZING AND ENTERTAINING. NOT TRUE MOVIE FAN AND COLLECTOR SHOULD BE MISSING THIS SET IN THEIR COLLECTION. A MUST HAVE TO OWN.
Just as you might have seen in the theatre, BD provides better sound and vision for all the viewers, especially HD resolution does come in handy compared to the old cable TV channels. Somehow I didn't give it a 5-star it's because the box looks kind of damaged outside. The fact that I want to keep it a collection, which a rough look on the ouside doesn't adore me too much. Well...I guess that's the only flaw I could come up with. Besides that, videos quality and sound look just fine to me.
This 3 package DVD arrived in perfect condition and rather quickly. Had no problems with this seller, very pleased. Always would recommend you to buy from this seller.
When I am in need of a product I spend a lot of time doing research. Not only are the costs of the product and shipping/handling charges important but also the speed, accuracy and dependability of the company/person involved. I highly recommend this source to be checked out when searching for specific products.
Version: U.S.ASpider-Man / Region FreeMPEG-4 AVC BD-50Running time: 2:01:11Movie size: 30,791,897,088 bytesDisc size: 32,496,402,276 bytesAverage Video Bit Rate: 26.09 MbpsDolby TrueHD 5.1 24-bit (upconverted from a 16-bit master)Spider-Man 2 (seamless branching)MPEG-4 AVC BD-50Running time: 2:07:25Movie size: 36,883,243,008 bytesDisc size: 49,011,222,186 bytesAverage Video Bit Rate: 24.14 MbpsDolby TrueHD 5.1 24-bitSpider-Man 2.1 (seamless)MPEG-4 AVC BD-50Running time: 2:15:46Movie size: 39,171,311,616 bytesDisc size: 49,011,222,186 bytesAverage Video Bit Rate: 24.06 MbpsDolby TrueHD 5.1 24-bitSpider-Man 3 / Region AMPEG-4 AVC BD-50Running time: 2:19:10Movie size: 43,368,265,728 bytesDisc size: 48,052,312,355 bytesAverage Video Bit Rate: 26.06 MbpsDolby TrueHD 5.1 24-bitLPCM 5.1 4608Kbps 16-bit
Story is way too long, and too many unneccessary scenes that not helping the story at all. It doesn't seem like a Spider-Man anymore. But the effects and fight scenes are awesome, so it balance out.
I got this for 40 something dollars and it was a great vale for my pocket, plus the great pic quality
Received promptly - unfortunately I ordered the blu-ray and this is not what my son-in-law wanted. I trust the return will be equally easy.
I bought this as a gift for a kid who's a Spider Man fan. He really enjoys it, but I'm not a super hero fan myself.
Spiderman I, II, and III, were very entertaining and kept the grandkids entertained. The entire family enjoyed the films, popcorn and drinks.
This was exactly what I was looking for. I have the trilogy on Blu-Ray but my son is a huge spider-man fan and only has a dvd player in his room so as I gift I wanted to get this for him so he would be able to watch it whenever he wanted.
The one supermarket chain in our area that carries Quaker Essentials Oat Bran cereal closed our local store. We can get it by driving around 60 miles round trip, but that is inconvenient and wasteful of gas.I could substitute another cereal for myself, but my peach-faced lovebird loves it, and so far will accept no substitute. She eats some, and dunks some in her water bowl, then piles it on a perch. The result is a "cereal sculpture." Why she does this, I don't know.I ordered it through an Amazon vendor and received excellent service, but I wish the shipping wasn't so darn expensive.
This was an excellent historical work on modern Pagan Witchcraft. It does tend to focus on Wicca, but it does also talk about Druids, and non-Gardnarian Traditions. If you know nothing about Wicca, I recomend you start with another book, or the very last chapter serves as an excelent summary of what Wiccans belive, and though it seams weird to suggest it, you might want to read the last chapter first. Although the author is a historian and not a Pagan or a Witch, he remains respectful in his historical endevor. This book is an excelent example of how a new religion is born, and perhapse the only such history of the birth of a new faith to exist!
I have not finished reading the book. I have, however, found it hard to put down. It was engaging, comprehensive and enjoyable to read. I heard this book recommended by sales people in my city Halifax.It is without a doubt informative and accurate in the history of Witchcraft. I know it was preferred over other books on the history of Witchcraft.
This is a veyr detailed and informative history. However the paperback edition has miniscule print on low grade paper, so much so that it is hard to read for a long period of time. I would reccomend getting the hardback. The work itself is great and it's worth paying the extra to be able to read it without needing aspirin on standby.
This product worked exactly as it was supposed to. I had tried using the cable that came with the camera (USB cord) and found out exactly what many others had said on blogs.....IT DOESN'T WORK!!!Once I got this cable, it worked perfectly. I was able to easily download video from my camera to my computer. The only frustration I had was that I would rather have paid a little more for the camera and gotten this cable with it in the first place.
its a good dampener. I bought it for my head racket which is now 6yrs oldthe reason i bought it was because my racket was getting these little annoying noises when i serveso i tried it on and now the sounds are gone and its also very good for the price
The product photo shows one black and one red dampener, but TennisExpress shipped to me two white dampeners. I was actually hoping for the red and black ones, just to match my racquet, but I do know that is only cosmetic. The dampeners function just fine.
Works as advertised; best shock absorber I've used. Silences the annoying 'poing' sound from the racquet, and has never fallen out, even on a direct mishit. Four stars because they are a little expensive for what you get.
Very fast shipping and excellent transaction with Amazon. Couldn't be happier with these glasses, had them five years now and they are still wonderful.
This book would be effective for grief therapy and for teaching about life cycles. It specifically answers the question: What is a lifetime?My daughter, age 4, had a lot of questions about death. She was most especially interested in finding out when her "dying day" would be. This book seemed to help her understand that everyone's lifetime is special to them. I wanted her to understand that because someone else died it doesn't mean her death is imminent. A common fear among the young.An exquisitely illustrated and plainly written book, it speaks clearly to the children about a complicated subject. I highly recommend it for all home and school libraries for ages three and up. It should be used as part of a comprehensive set of books on biological and familial concepts as it is not meant to answer all of a child's questions on life cycles, grief, death or dying.
This book helped my 5 year old a little. We need to read it a couple times. Thanks, it helped. He was concerned about dying.
I eagerly anticipated the release of this album, knowing whatever came out of it would be excellent. Musically, it was a dramatic change when compared to other albums such as pitchshifter.com, or infotainment? I like the somewhat mellow approach to many songs, but dont get discouraged, they still have the heavier stuff like "keep it clean," "dead battery," and "wafer thin." (my personal favorites) They just keep getting better and better after every release. people complain that they are going mainstream, they change for the times, and what not. At first they resembled one of my favorite bands, ministry, but look at them now, they have stepped away from that, and now have their own unique blend of techno, rock, industrial. they are on a plain all by themselves. lyrically and musically, they cannot be outdone by any rock, or industrial band out at the time. This album is their best to date. PSI ROCKS
I just bought it a few days ago. Doesn't do miracles but the suction is great, works well on both carpet and hardwood floors, the noise level is reasonable. The only disadvantage is sort of cheap plastic construction but for the $89.99 I paid for it I can live with it :)
The CD was exactly what I was looking for. It arrived early. It was in pristine condition. I'm very thankful that I found this vendor as this was a very rare CD. I will use this vendor again.
Ra is really underrated rock band. They have great melodies, good arganments, middle eastern vibe here and there, a singer who is really influenced by Sting and the Police. They even cover one of their songs. If you dig Breaking Benjamin or Alter Bridge, this band is for you. Every song is great, really no weak tracks. I highly recommend this cd.
I enjoyed this album. At first glance it appears that it is your standard post-1990's rock album. But after a good listen, you realize that they have succeeded in forging a rather good and unique album. It's well done and has a good shelf life due to its distinctive sound.
While ra's first cd is alot heavier, this one is more laid back. I like both heavy and lighter styles of music. I would have to say that this cd is better musically than the first one.visionclothingco.com
Ra is a very interesting band to watch grow. Their first release (From One) was an excellent debut that showed off their potential. Its an album that can immediately be digested and have you loving them in no time. With "Duality" the band is still lyrically strong, if not stronger. However, instrumental-wise, the band has fallen into a very generic hole that they need to climb themselves out of. Not to say the instrumental on this album is awful, no, not by any means. It just doesn't stand out nearly as much as their debut album had. I've had this album since the first week it came out. There are a few tracks that you can immediately get into, mostly on the first half, but the rest will fall away from your first listen. Over time though you will grow to appreciate the rest of this album, I did at least.8/10
For those of you that read my review for "From One," pretty much what I said in that review is a repeat. This is an excellent CD, though toned down "From One," it still rocks. You can't go wrong with ordering BOTH at the same time (that's what I did). BTW, I think RA does "Every Little Thing She Does Is Magic" BETTER than Police originally did it!!! ;^)
This album, of course, builds on the themes of the first one - Sahaj has a lot to say, and isn't done saying it - with plenty of the same texture and style that made the first album so listenable. Lyrically surprising, you may find yourself coming to an unexpected point when the song turns out to have something very different to say than first impressions indicated. Another reviewer had mentioned that they seem to be stuck with a single pattern of songwriting structure, and I can't disagree, but I'm willing to cut them some slack for a sophomore album. We'll see if they get a bit more adventurous for the third album.
I found this Band while looking up information on Trixter and found PJ Farley in the band. Listened to RA on their website and bought this CD the same day. I have not found a band lately that took me away like RA.I have not heard the first album but it is next on my list, since I got Duality today and have not stopped listening to it!!!RA ROCKS!!!!
great resource for anyone looking to add variety to medicine ball exercises, increase their overall explosiveness during intense physical activity.
Let me be the first reviewer since 9/11 to weigh in on this valuable book. Every American reacted to the horrors of that day in their own personal way and many reflected on the secular foundations of our constitution but few people know the details of the struggle that went into the conception, the codification and the defense of our first amendment. The separation of church and state is the greatest source of our strength as a country; every American should know the struggle of Roger Williams, the history of the Southern Baptists, and the strong belief of our founding fathers in the freedom of choice regarding personal beliefs. All explained in this simple and scholarly book.
I didn't like this book as much as the others. I still think it was good. But suddenly L. J. Smith sticks in a spirit from the in-between place. That has nothing to do with the Night World. It doesn't deal a lot with Gillian's witchcraft. In fact, she doesn't even know she's a witch until about the middle of the book. One thing I liked was Ash's cameo role as the knight in shining armor, coming to rescue the helpless human.
This book, was in my opinion, pretty good. Not one of her best, but it was good. I really liked the story, and I really liked the characters. To me, the story had a different meaning, than most people had seen. If you read between the lines, you see that this is what a lot of people hope for. To be popular, to be perfect in every aspect, and to have power. I really liked this book, and reccomend it to anyone who likes Lisa Jane Smith, or anyone who likes books about "Creatures Of The Night" :)
This was my first LJS book, recommended by a friend, who is a book critic. I was hooked on LJS books ever since. I have read every one of her books and have found them excellent.
This book is the ultimate revenge story. Sure Gillian is superficial but shes had a rough life and deserves to have her chance to shine in the spotlight. And all those readers who do not feel it fit in with the Night World must not have been very observant cuz her place in the Night World was hinted at quite a lot. And she does go to a witches store and she also trys to get in the black iris club once...besides it would be to formulaic if each book was wrapped tightly inside the Night World...each books show different levels of impact the Night World has...plus like all the nightworld books...this deals with a certain kinda topic...Secret Vampire was a girl who was dying and needed to be changed to live...soulmate covered reicarnation and this book delt with a near life experience. Its not the best of the series but its high up there on my list at least.
This is by far the most beautiful CD I have ever listened to. I love it so much I have given it as a gift to family friends and they all love it as much as I do and it has quickly become everyone's favorite. It is truly music to adore and nourish your sprite and soul. Aeoliah is a genius - I give this music my highest recommendation.
One of the few CDs of Asatru music that I actually enjoy. I could quibble with some things in the lyrics which are not quite in line with the lore, but overall I find the music both pleasant and inspiring.This CD draws upon Scandinavian folk music for inspiration for its melodies. With the exception of one track, the lyrics are in English. The lead singer, Andrea Nebel Haugan, can actually sing! Professionally done and melodic.Many of my non-Heathen friends also enjoy listening to this CD.
This small gem of a book can be appreciated not only from a modern poetic viewpoint but also from a philosophical standpoint as a comment on integrating pure creativity into our everyday motions. Read this book and be prepared to question your own thoughts. Perceptions might change after an afternoon with this book...
Having read at least 50 books on UFOs and related phenomena, "The Mothman Prophecies" has become one of my favorites along with those of Jacques Vallee. This classic is a must read and reaches the unpopular but most likely true conclusion that UFOs aren't from outer space but are psychic in nature.
As many of the other reviewers have said, this book isn't in chronological order nor does it put forth any kind of explanation for the mysterious events it describes - which I myself was rather disappointed by. You can catch glimpses of what Keel might be thinking from his comments throughout - enough to know, for example, that he doesn't buy the extraterrestrial invasion theory and that he thinks that the things people see are naturally occurring phenomena that most people just aren't aware of - but he never really sits down and explains it at length, despite the wealth of information he's gathered and thought about.However, the anecdotes and experiences presented were interesting - and by the sheer wealth and similarity of them, compelling. The nonlinear format might have helped to make it interesting in some ways, even if it distracted in others.
John Keel's "The Mothman Prophecies" follows a usual form for ufology books: He presents a large collection of anecdotes, personal observations and experiences, mixes it with some debunking to woo the scientific mind, and throws in some ancient gods and goddesses, references to fairies, and a variety of religious "sightings". This is par for the course in this genre, and puts this reviewer in mind of Charlie Brown's standard beginning for tales, "It was a dark and stormy night."Despite its rather disorganized and somewhat repetitive presentation (again, fairly standard for this genre), Keel relates his narrative earnestly, and he will engage your interest. Men in Black? Saucer shaped vehicles with diamond-shaped windows? "Thyroid-like eyes"? If this gets your attention, you'll enjoy "The Mothman Prophecies."The recent movie is based only loosely on Keel's research, by the way, and will fail to satisfy informed ufology readers.
I have never been interested in UFO literature, but decided to give this book a try. The early portions of the book are rather dry documentations of UFO sightings and other paranormal incidents. Towards the end of the book however, things pick up considerably. The author's description of events is credible and eerie. He concludes that so-called 'extraterrestrial' beings are really with us here on Earth but only perceived by those with perceptual abilities that most of us do not have. He also concludes that such beings are capable of influencing and interfering with humans. For books outside of the UFO literature that corroborate Mr. Keel's conclusions I recommend 1) The Active Side of Infinity (Carlos Castaneda), 2) Far Journeys (Robert Monroe), 3)The Path (Esmeralda Arana).
I read it first in the 60's and have never forgotten it. I was pleased when it was reprinted as I had wanted to read it again. It holds up surprisingly well. Keel had realized things about the 'UFO phenomena' then that most other researchers are only now beginning to understand. If you have a sense of wonder, get it. If you are a researcher, get it. If you are an open minded skeptic, this will give you a better perspective. If you're just looking for entertainment, it's a lot of fun.
Beautifully made and perfect for restorative yoga. I couldn't be happier. I own several other products from Hugger Mugger and always choose their product when available for bolsters, meditation cushions, etc.
I first heard M.I.A. in a recreation hall on my University's campus on a mixer with a great sound system (filled the entire downstairs and upstairs with sweet vibes). I agree with most of the points on other positive reviews: this has great beats, lyrics, vocals, and the likes.There is one thing you should keep in mind before buying or judging this album: it almost REQUIRES a good sound system because the music feeds off the bass. Like many "dance" genres, bass is a heavy component in making the tracks work, and this is no exception. The vocal are great, but have difficulty standing alone without heavy bass. Thus, if you're like me with two simple speakers and a default sound card, you might want to reconsider buying the album or risk slight disappointment.For me, it was a very upsetting difference, because I know what the songs COULD be. I would recommend high quality speakers/sound card and a woofer, or else you're missing out--big time.
She is a genius, has a lot to say, it's worth hearing, and this hard-to-categorize music absolutely grows on you and becomes your favorite album for weeks once it sinks in. Sound is fun, too, considering lots of toy instruments are used here, and there are a number of producers.M.I.A. is relevant, interesting and makes you pay attention.Buy this album.
For me this is a little tricky. I know next to nothing about this type of dance music, so I really have no criteria to judge MIA.But I do like the low frequencies, quite a shock for a rock and jazz guy. I also like the singer's voice: she can sing at quite a speed, but through her Shi Lankin accent, the emphasis is placed in the most interesting places. All the little moans and in between music noices remind me of jazz. I also like the little eletronic ambers that burn through the tracks.As sound, this is quite a treat.
You can't help but respect the creativity poring out of this album. This was M.I.A.'s debut & the reason why so many love her. I love this album & it hasn't left the car in weeks.
Galang is the strongest track here and I'd agree with many that it is no musical revolution. I enjoy it due to the fact it's a WORLD disc and I like World music alot. It's definitely different and I had seen the video for GALANG on the IMF Satellite channel. She's hotter than hell in my opinion so I'll give her a break. ;)And with those criticizing Revolution, America was created on a violent Revolution so I have no idea what they're talking about. When you live under brutal oppression you revolt which none of us in America understand anymore. Thank God we don't have to revolt here like others but people need to study what goes on in certain areas of the globe.Sometimes simple beats are good and this is better than alot of the major Rap trash here without any meaning at all.
If you don't believe in her politics, listen to the music - we can't all be John Lennon. But we could aspire to be Public Enemy - different genre, same ethos. With her minimalist approach, she jettisons a rapid-fire selection of rage, humour, politics [sometimes muddled and confusing], sex...but always arresting and thought provoking. Online pugilists argue the terrorist/Tamil revolutionary ties via her father, and while it's an important salient subject to spelunk, weaving the politico with the dance floor is an exhilarating art I can't overlook based on that writ - Madonna could learn a thing or two about juxtaposing them creatively [see American Life]. My grade: A
This is something my ears crave; uniqueness. This album has what you need to get loose. With it's wild beats and crazy lyrics, it'll keep you dancing (and in my case, running as well. Good workout music). M.I.A.'s music is not conventional. My guess is, most people either love it or hate it. Enjoy, it's a treat!1. Banana Skit2. Pull Up The People 8/103. Bucky Done Gun 10/10 (My fav. A true dance track. On point)4. Fire Fire 9/105. Freedom Skit6. Amazon 10/107. Bingo 6.5/108. Hombre 7.5/109. One For The Head Skit10. 10 $ 9/10 (The beat is sick! Robotic, lol)11. Sunshowers 10/10 (My 2nd fav. Gives me a real island vibe)12. Galang 9/10
If you can listen to this album - any track on this album - for more than 4 or at most 5 seconds and (1) stay still (2) keep it clean and PG13, my condolences to your family, alas, you are dead. You can expect to be receiving the memo shortly.
Who is M.I.A. and what has she done to the art of music?! The London-raised Sri Lankan MC has mixed up all possible forms of music to give us something that we can't define. You can't put a label on her sound; you can only identify her inspiration. With a combination of Jamaican dance hall, hip-hop, electronica, Brazilian funk, and Asian bhangra, her style is different from anything we're used to; it's addictive and fun. Her lyrics are filled with passion about life and society. She gets political and sexual all in the same song! Who does that? Maya Arulpragasam does... just listen to Bucky Done Gun off her debut album Arular to get a feel of her artistic flair.
Definitely spend a couple of bucks more & get this. Maya Arular is one of the few hip-hop sensations who deserves all the hype. Phrases like "raw talent" are often used, but what also impress are the musical sophistication and biting wit. This is a hugely appealing sex-war-and-lollipops album, and fears that non-British audiences "won't get it" seem to have been unfounded judging by the sales. Exuberant and bursting with energy.
Gosh where to begin. First off, thank the powers that be for artists like M.I.A.!Sitars, bongo drums, thumping basslines, blips and beats, there is everything but the kitchen sink in Arular. M.I.A.'s music is in a genre all of its own. More a fusion of hip-hop and electronica with a healthy dose of South Asian flavoring. I can't even begin to tell you how welcome and refreshing her sound is in this era of cardboard, cookie cutter music.Stand out tracks include Galang, Hombre, Pull Up The People and Sunshowers. While M.I.A. brings together a wild range of sounds and beats, it's fairly accessible and this is music you will want to dance to. Highly recommended.
i love this music, but i can see how some people wouldn't. i guess reading through the reviews here says the same thing: this doesn't try to be the kind of music my mother would like (or some of my coworkers). but that must be obvious if you listen to the samples amazon provide.but otherwise, this is pretty sweet - it strikes a nice balance between playing with new ideas/sounds on the one hand and keeping a steady groove on the other. "commerical experimental" in a good way - and i think that's a very challenging target.as for the politics and trying to second guess whether this woman is "for real" - it doesn't matter unless you don't like the music. good music doesn't need to (and usually doesn't) match my politics. why on earth should it? if you don't like the music, fair enough. but to argue that you don't like music because of the attitude or the politics - what's with that? you're confusing music with something else, i think.
i first heard the track bingo on the radio not long ago, and that has now opened a whole can of worms for me. how can one album be so catchy, raw, fun,fresh ,chunky and funky. while so many rappers drawl on about tired blah blah, MIA just mixes the singing and ragga-ish vocals straight into the most modern type of no-category music with little effort. the style? its kind of UK grime meets hip-hop meets calypso or something. definately a british vibe here, but this is still unique. the beats and sound effects are very well implemented into the chatting. cant stop listening to this. wicked stuff
Well it so hard to pick a favorite Kundrea book because they are all so Brilliant, but I might pick this one.
I've read the poems within, and the depth of feeling within them is impressive. What's more, the honesty in the poems is a breath of fresh air that has brought a new perspective to a lot of the ways I see things, partcularly loss and betrayal, as well as hope. Reading this book, I feel as if I truly know the poet behind the words.
I like the simple design of Noritake Colorwave dishes, but was unhappy with gray marks from metal tableware. I have discovered that the right dishwasher detergent takes care of this. I was using a phosphate-free powder, for ecological reasons, but it was not getting my dishes clean. Researching this, I learned that in the last year, phosphate-free dishwasher detergents have improved a lot, so this problem may go away by itself. Otherwise, try a different phosphate-free detergent; the tablets seem to work best.
For our wedding registry, we chose this Colorwave set. That was more than ten years ago. I liked it because the color (we have green) was attractive, and it wasn't too fancy for everyday use. The set has held up fine, with the exception that two out of twelve bowls have nicked. The bowls nick more easily than the plates and coffee mugs, which haven't nicked at all. Considering it's been ten years, I don't think the nicking problem is all that bad. I just have to be extra careful with the bowls. They tend to nick when I'm washing the dishes and accidentally bang them against one another.
Noritake product are really durable and I was worried since the first set was purchase in 2005, what will be the color if I get some more plates in 2011? There is in fact a little color change but nothing disturbing. Probably due to the use of a dishwasher for many years! The new plates are a bit more brilliant and a little touch darker...Really happy about this purchase...
I just finished Gods Of Mars and am ready for chapter 3. I feel truly fortunate to have "discovered" burroughs at 43. The rush of action, the clash of steel and its all mine for the taking. I have been forewarned that perhaps after the first three books it becomes hit and miss but I shall discover that for myself. Do yourself a favor and pick up A Princess Of Mars - book 1 - if you haven't already.
Lets get to the point. If I were to listen the album, without any knowledge of Derrick Plourde, or the lyrical content I would of seriously overlooked the album. The music (compared to older) is so bland. The riffs are weak, the guitar work is recycled, the drums are painfully dull. The music really has no edge.But throw in the sensative underlying message in the equation(suicide), and it truly livens up the record. TRULY. The album is 3rd right after DUH and TRASHED.NOTE: Drumming did go out the window after Plourde left! The man was sick. Bad astro showed none of his talent.Pick this record up.
Old Rockaway, New York in Early Photographs, exceeded my expectations! I thought it would provide a photographic history of perhaps the 1930's and 1940's. I was pleasantly surprised to find nineteenth century photographs of the peninsula in its true heyday. Having lived in Arverne during the 1960's and 70's, I was amazed to see that the rich and famous visited this area very similar to the way the rich and famous today visit the Hamptons on the east end of Long Island. As you view the postcards from this early era, you can actually see the unspoiled landscape of sand dunes and bay marshes that no longer exist. And the magnificent hotels and homes that graced this once popular resort prove to me that the City of New York truly mis-managed the development since the 1930's.
I would probably have given this book 5 stars if the Belle Harbor section (where I grew up in the 60's and 70's) had been better represented, but still, it was great to see the neighborhood I left as a teenager in 1976!For those that live --or lived-- there, especially if you spent any amount of time in Far Rock, you must get this book.To the authors: issue a revised edition with a more emphasis on everything West of Beach 116th Street... and I'll go 5 and a half stars in my next review!
Simply the only printed information available about the Rockaways of yesterday. It seems that everyone has roots in this once grand seaside community and this book gives you hundred of old postcard views of the towns along the beach. There's not much left there from the old days and even fewer people left in the NYC slum who know how to read or right. So we'll bet that most of the sales of this book will be outside of Rockaway. But if you're heart's at the seashore, then Vincent and William's book should be in your library...EKG, (escaped to Long Beach, NY)
Bernie is one of the best lyricists out there!!! His vocal performance on this cd and "Tribe" show that he is not just a lyric writer, but also someone who loves music. His passion for music has continued on to the formation of the band "Farmdogs".I have a question, however. The previous reviews state that this is either Bernie's second or third solo album. What were his first attempts?Please let me know at: Robin@moonsitter.comThank you!!!!
I bought this album because I got into bands like Theatre of Tragedy, Tristania, and The Gathering. Like someone else said, however, Nightwish is not doom/goth metal. Was I dissapointed?...no! This album is a masterpiece, pure metal all the way. Power metal with a female opera singer? I can't think of two things which go together any better. It is a wonder that it hasn't been done before. The songwriting is very good, and definitely laden with fantasy. The production is excellent as well. Then there is the amazing singer. I was captivated after hearing her for a mere ten seconds. Nightwish is one band that SHOULD NOT be overlooked!
Nightwish Rules! The Music is spine tingling and melodic while powerful. Everything I thought I knew About Music has changed forever. As a long Time fan of Savatage, and other prog-metal bands.. Nightwish has become my favorite. I can play their music over and over... I never thought I would enjoy Opera but her voice seems to be meant for it...like we never should have had to listen to it any other way. The world is full of tasteless crap like eminem, and god please can we forget the boybands and all the other put together mindless gatbage we are smacked with by local radio. NIGHTWISH Thank you for the wonderful barrage of sound you have given to me. I still love my other-prog metal bands but Nightwish has something for everyone who enjoys "TRUE" Music. Death to the false ones! LOL
Nightwish works so near perfection! None of the other similar bands (Lacuna Coil, Sinergy, Stratovarius, Angra...) even approach this. No, Therion approaches. Many people tend to compare Nightwish to doom/goth metal bands such as Theatre Of Tragedy, Tristania and Sins Of Thy Beloved. Please, Nightwish is not doom/goth metal, it's clearly high level POWER METAL! Fast versatile guitar riffs, poignant ballads and above all, intense female vocals. Wishmaster's most touching moment is the gentle "Two For Tragedy", when Tarja's passionate lament reaches the soul of the listener. Other highlights are the fast "Wanderlust" and "Crownless". The last song, "FantasMic", is divided in three parts and is also very touching. Wishmaster and its predecessor Oceanborn are without a doubt essential albums for any metal listener...
Moi to you all,Nightwish est vraiment le plus cool des bands. Unqiue pis des tounes supers orginales, ca ma faite découvrir le métal pis aucune autre band ma faite vribrer comme eux. À tous le monde cest un must buy.
Un album tout simplement renversant, extraordinaire, sensationnelle. Il est excellent sur toute la ligne avec une voix si bien cadré, si bien mis en evidence devenant la suite de se qu'ils avaient commencer avec Oceanborn, il revienne a la charge avec une disque presque aussi parfait. Un album tout comme le deuxieme, remplis de rebondissement, remplis de moment intense et de moment plus romantique avec Dead Boy's Poem qui est sans aucun doute la meilleur toute qu'ils ont faites. Souvent comparer a Dream Theater pour leur beat de piano, d'instrument progressif, ils ont sus selon moi allez une coche au dessus et nous offrir quelque chose d'encore superieur au membre de Dream Theater... En bref, il s'agit d'un CD dispendieux, mais combien il en vaut la peine, il est merveilleux et chaqu'un se doit de connaitre se magnifique groupe Allemand.
I bought 3 other types of thermometers -temporal scan, auxuliary thermometer (but), oral thermometer, but was getting tired of guessing her temperature. I just decided to purchase this one, the same one used by my hospital and personal doc. So happy to have peace of mind.
Finally got fed up with all small digital thermometers, none of which seem to be reliable, or require a full 3-4 minutes to be accurate, which is an aggravating long time for the (OB) patient. I LOVE this "machine", it is accurate and well worth the expense !
We do home care for my dad and have to take his rectal temperature every 2 hours when we turn and re-position him. We have had the same Welch-Allyn Sure Temp 690 thermometer for 4 1/2 years now. We just replaced the well and probe a few months ago. The casing finally cracked after all of this time. We have only had to change the batteries twice, too. It is still working perfectly and we would recommend this thermometer to anyone who really needs to take temperatures often. It is so reliable. This one gets 5 stars!!!!!
This tent takes a little work to put together. I don't know what people are talking about when they refer to the wooden poles and getting splinters as the poles on mine are metal. Anyway, once put together it is quite cool! I am 5ft 9" and I managed to be able to sit in it along with my 4 year old (sitting) and my 5month old baby (lay down) so there is plenty of space. I got mine on sale at a babies r us store, so I don't think I would actually pay (...)for it though. You could by a basic regular tent for that much!
this documentary tells you the relationship of Lewis Carroll and Alice Liddle. and also tells how alice in wonderland was created. this was a very intersting documentary. if you have not seen this movie then i recommend you do
Thats how music history books should be written, it was 1977, I first heard this album on a verandah overlooking the Indian Ocean in Perth Western Australia on a hot breezy Saturday evening watching the sun setting over the whitetops ..... WOW, what a old flashback that is, party goin on inside, my Triumph under the balcony, I got up, grabbed the keys, and went for a blast, that song has been a permanant source of pleasure in my old head for decades now .... mist in your eyes from the smoke of a distant fire.... da da da da ada, sounds even better with the exhaust note of a 750 Bonnie ... da da da da
This is a really good book for people that are studying the gods. I truely enjoyed this book. It was very informative.
All too often the Pagan God is forgotten in favor of the Goddess. This book will bring the balance back to our lives. It gives the history of many well know Gods as well as many not so well known Ones. It also includes rituals in direct relation to the Gods listed. I love this book! It goes well with The Witches' Goddess!
This is definetely the best PUR CD ever, but I've to add that the lyrics of this band are very important and if you don't understand them, you'd like it much less. I don't say anything against the music with that, but the words have at least the same importance.
What struck me the most all throughout the reading of "Beauty and submission" is the power and bravery behind Maria Pita's prose. She is undoubtedly a wise old soul. Yet, in the same instance, her no-holds-barred honesty about the lifestyle and personal odyssey with her beloved Dom has a youthful innocence that refreshes and renews like rain in the springtime. Love is new, and forever renewed, by each other. Life obstacles faced by most vanilla lovers face are present along with the countless obstacles any alternative lifestyle will bring. Every such mountain is a challenge scaled with intelligent and triumphant results. Missa's enormous heart, and huge capacity to love and submit to her man in the purest sense, will stay with me (and I'm sure all her readers) long after this book is closed. This real life romance makes fictional renditions pale in comparison.
The product came in about 3 days after ordering. The hat fits well and 59Fifty finally put in a black hat liner in the inside of the hat, which I like. I wish the "A" logo was bigger.
Losing a mom - never knowing your mom - living your life in anger. Sad. No redemption. It made me sad that some people stay in that state and do not find the only answer which is Jesus Christ. But I know this is true for many who's hearts remain hard who have a big God void in their lives. It was an interesting story....but very hopeless and sad.
Prolific SF writer Alan Dean Foster wraps up the adventures of the stranded Ethan Fortune and Suka September on the ice planet of Tran-ky-ky in a nice little package for fans of the series. Turns out the thawing of the ice at the equator Ethan saw in the second book (Mission to Moulkin) was not natural at all, someone is actually attempting to thaw out the planet. That could mean possible extinction for the Tran, which is unexceptable to Fortune and September. They and their Tran friends head out on the Slanderscree to see that the process is stopped, permanently. A wonderful ending to a wonderful series, highly recommended.
Excellent read, for children or for any age; also for adults who want to get to know Saint Rose of Lima.
Shows a sense of creativity with sound effects that reveals the artist's ability to be in touch with todays concerns. Loved the Twist!
I love reading Essence magazine, I am happy I can now read it on my kindle fire. I recommend this
I LOVE Essence and I am quite pleased with the delivery and maintence by Amazon, I receive it like clockwork each month!
I love the magazine, but I would love to receive it before I see it on the news stands or at least the same day.
I was pleasantly surprised how much I enjoyed this book. Fast paced, detailed characters, original story, and an epic feel make this a great read. I haven't liked other Koontz before, but I guess Kevin J. Anderson helped pull Dean up to his level. I look forward to the continuing story -- especially by veteran writer Ed Gorman.
this book is very good as I have come to expect of Dean KoontzI've been reading his books as long as he has been writing them and am never disappointedI wish the 3rd book was coming sooner but i'll take it when I can get it
I have always been a fan of Dean Koontz's books and when my flight was grounded and I was to spend the night in the airport, I figured I'd better get myself a book to keep me entertained. That's exactly what this book did. I enjoyed reading it so much that I almost missed my connecting flight back home because I didn't want to put the book down.It's unique, fresh and fast paced. If you enjoyed the original Frankenstein story, you will adore this "updated" and more complete modern version. You will not be disappointed!
One has suggested the Decaulion character lacked depth. Another has hinted that the ending lacked surprise (must have been reading a different book). Remember two things: Koontz wrote it, and it's Book One. We will get into the mystery of the original "monster" (Decaulion) and we readers will find many surprises and twists as the story continues to unfold.That being said, I loooooved this book. This is a fun, intriguing look at the evil Doc Frankenstein, who was certainly a monster before chopping his own body up to become yet more so. Dr. F., impervious to aging and disease after 200 years, has been a busy bee, building and perfecting more monsters. But things are starting to go terribly wrong for New Orleans and for the Doctor we love to hate.Read it, you'll love it.
I struggled with how to review this book. As usual I picked up this book, Dean Koontz's Frankenstein book 1, when I was traveling somewhere to read and take my mind off the flight. It worked and the book was good. But really, could they not have made the print smaller and made two books just one book? The book did not have the bite of other Koontz novels, but he did share the writing. It is a bit far fetched, but it is a good update on the classic work Frankenstein. Overall - B JVD
This is a wonderful twist on the classic. The characters are very well rounded and I was grabbed from the beginning. I now and then ponder how the biologically impossible events in the book could actually be brewing in someones own lab at this very moment. Mr. Koontz takes today's traditional underdog and makes him not someone to pity but someone to perhaps admire. My only negative on the book is that I am hooked and will make sure I quickly purchase the next in the series.If you like seeing the dark side of life let in a little light, you will undoubtedly become a Koontz addict as have I. Don't plan on doing anything else until you finish this one.I also highly recommend THE FACE. Another dark side trying to usurp the light. Excellent, excellent, excellent books.
I have to admitt that I am not as big a book reader as I used to be. However, when I saw this book in the store I couldn't resist.The idea of making a remake of the classic book was exciting and possibly to like the original. Let me tell you upfront that this book was GREAT!!!! It is the fastest I've ever read a book (4 days); I could not put it down. This book is very direct in the plot, and easy to follow the chapter changes. Koontz writes the characters in a way that you can truely understand exactly what they're feeling, and you can sympathize with even the dubious villians. I hope you take the time to read this book, IT IS WORTH IT!!!!!!!PS- The next part to this book is set to be released in July 2005 :)
I'm pleasantly suprised. I have read K.Anderson 'novelizations',and been a long time DK fan, and so far I am really enjoyingthe series. I wont re-iterate the Editorial Write-Up. You canalso go to DK's web page and get a synopsis of all the maincharacters. Looking forward to the next installment.
The idea to keep the original story intact and just bring us a new chapter 200 years later is just great! The story, as usual with a Koontz book, unfolds at break neck speed. I mean it never lows down, right up to the very last page! Be forwarned, there is nothing that even comes close to closure in this book. Its as if they wrote the entire story and picked the most suspenceful parts and end the book there. Then smiling , they watch as we anxiously wait for next volume to come.If you like Koontz, horror or SiFi please go out and get this book. But take one word of advice, you may want to wait till we are a little closer to the release date for the second book. I'm in anguish knowing I have to wait four months!
This is my first Dean Koontz novel, highly suggested reading by my mother of all people! I really enjoyed this story of a modern day Frankenstein monster created by an even bigger monster. There were quite a few stories intertwined in this book, all presumably leading up to an ending.Which brings me to why I did not give this book 5 stars. While it was very well written and edited, it was left with a huge cliffhanger. I understand this is part of a series but I personally prefer for a book to be somewhat wrapped up before going onto the next one. This book just suddenly ended in the middle of a scene. Anyway, I'll be getting the rest of the books (of course!), because I know good quality writing when I see it.
This was a great read! The mad scientist return & theres so much mystery its very intriguing. However, I did find it to be a bit confusing with so many charecters to keep up with in order to understand the whole storey & how it meshes into Frankenstien but Im glad I read it :)
I'm not much of a Dean Koontz fan; his tendency to use `deus ex machina' to resolve plots and such has always put me off. I'm also not much of a fan of the horror genre anyway, so I rarely read Koontz. However I had heard a bunch about this series, including the rumor that Martin Scorsese had at one time expressed in interest in producing it for TV. Anyway, I was really kind of glad to read this and see that Koontz had put a little life and a novel twist to the old story. I'm actually looking forward to the next two parts.
I have loved Dean Koontz for years but his books of late have gotten away from the reason I fell in love with his stories... All I can say is HE'S BACK! I can't wait for the 2nd book!! I could not put this down,it made me breathless the whole way through!
I'd only read the first three Odd Thomas books of Koontz's, but thought I'd try Frankenstein, because the review on Amazon said it was not a rehash of the old tale. And, it wasn't. It's a refreshing twist on the resurfacing of the madman (he was never destroyed, and actually resents that Shelley woman's story), but with a clean dash of Aldous Huxley's Brave New World, a pinch of James Lee Burke's detective angle, all with a flavor of hi-test horror. I'm starting on Vol 2 tonight!
Well actually, no. Of course not. Nothing can top the original. But Koontz comes at this classic tale with his own scythe ready to cause a change of faith in the fans of the original. This is not so much a remake as a supplement to the classic tale. Koontz references the story we all now and simply fast-forwards to our time, keeping the original Victor and his monster, and giving them longevity.The prose is ellegant and the speed is neck-breaking. It appears that Mr. Koontz uses 'big' words and paints detailed scenarios that may intimidate some readers, but I challenge you to read his work out loud - you'll see how nicely the words roll off your tongue.
I've always liked Dean Koontz. This one however is different from his others. It is still a fast read; I found hard to put down. I have already ordered the second and have started on it. This is one saga I won't want to end.
Book one of Dean Koontz's FRANKENSTEIN is a solid, entertaining read. I don't know if it should be taken as a conpliment or criticism of Koontz or Gorman, but I really couldn't tell which parts had been written by Koontz and which by Gorman (or whether Gorman wrote the whole thing, in the style of Koontz).Anyway, it's not Koontz's most original or forceful storytelling, but it passes the page-turning test. It kept me hooked until the end, and had me wanting to read the continuation in the second book.Koontz's FRANKENSTEIN lays bare, to a heightened extent, many of the faults and virtues of Koontz's writing in general. The novel is extremely readable, but it suffers from a patness of character and plotting. It's a good book, but not a great one.Still, a good book's a good book.
This is a gift for Christmas. I'm sure they will enjoy it. Had a hard time finding these books. Thanks
Excellent camcorder, does very well in all kinds of light. I have had no trouble with it indoors, and I find that it performs very well in low light. Flawlessly performs with Windows Movie Maker 2 through firewire. The sound is outstanding, considering the picture is it's strong point. I did not need the digital camera built in as I already have one. Effects are fun to play around with, especially with the handy scroll button. I have not heard the motor noise at all, so I can't see where that is coming from. My only complaint is that it shuts off too quickly if inactive, but it's really not that much of a problem. Image stablizer works really well, as I often have an unsteady hand but it is hardly noticeable with this camcorder. I just wish they made a VCR that could record the footage as well as it was taped!
I have used the camera for a month and am impressed by its features and picture quality. I agree with the other reviewers that indoor shoots require good lighting. I bought a video light and it helped a lot. Outdoor footage with sunshine is superb! If you are new to the video world (like I am) this camera is all you need to get started.
This disc contains Ornette Coleman's pioneering 37-minute 'Free Jazz' PLUS 40 minutes of shorter pieces recorded in the same year. So for a little less money than the American release of 'Free Jazz' you get about twice as much music, and the title track is the final piece, a fitting climax to a great set of music. That said, the jazz on this disc may be more challenging than some listeners would like, but among the extended collective improvisations of the sixties, besides being the first, this one is more immediately accessible, because it SWINGS and it COOKS! And you can tell the musicians are actively listening to each other and responding to each other's work, not just showing off or venting their emotions. So in a nutshell, 'Free Jazz' is less cosmic than Sun Ra's 'Magic City', less cerebral than Cecil Taylor, and less primal than Coltrane's 'Ascension', but probably more likely to hook you into an intensely brilliant musical world.
I'm a commercial pilot and flight instructor. I read many aviation related books and magazines. I don't often read books that contain a lot of poetry, which AIR FARE does.(It also has short stories and excerpts from longer works.) So to say I was pleasantly surprised by this little wonder of a book is an understatement.My advice? If you've never flown but wonder what it's like, you should read this book. If you have flown as a passenger, you'll recognize your own emotions, both good and bad, in every page. If you are a pilot, you'll see yourself reflected in myriad indelible images; you'll be drawn back by memory to a hundred different experiences; and you'll want to read-and reread-each and every privileged glimpse into the human heart of flight, and be left wanting more. It's a must-have for any aviator's library. Get it!
Read this book as soon as possible. It is so jam filled (malaprop intended) with wisdom and knowledge and so well written with passion and power. Give a copy to each of your teenage children, nieces and nephews! They need this stuff at as young an age as possible.And once you've read it, you must readYour Own Worst Enemy: Breaking the Habit of Adult Underachievementwhich gets down to the nitty gritty of breaking the bad habits that gifted people edge into because of their own gifted pride.
Houston exaggerates for effect--not all of the historical characters that he uses were actually at Bisbee. But how could anyone resist using the bigger-than-life leaders of the IWW?
The shorter length of this rod is exactly what we needed for our shower. Tension rods in this length are difficult to find and we were glad to buy this one. Great product.
Works great, looks more classy than the plain white ones for curtain hanging and it's strong enough to hold curtains. The end piece was a lot smaller than I thought. I thought it would be maybe 2.5 inches in diameter, but it's only about 1. (I didn't measure it.)
The Man Who Came for Christmas...The last thing Peggy Jo Riley wanted this holiday was a hard-boiled charmer in her house 24/7. But if she wanted to stay alive, she needed Jack Parker. And once she was in Jack's well-muscled arms, she realized just houw much she needed him...Up until the moment he'd seen desire flicker in her pretty eyes, bodyguard Jack Parker had thought Peggy Jo Riley was just another assignment. But the vulnerability he'd glimpsed under his cool beauty's armor made him ache to do a whole lot more for Peggy Jo. Like kiss her till she gave him her trust. And love her til she gave him her heart...
This item is very beautiful and dainty, but a lot smaller than I thought. The stones could also be better, but the design is so catching that it makes up for it. I should also add that Charoite is a very hard stone to find at a good price, so if you are looking at affordable, this is it. Trust me, I spent several hours searching. Overall I really like this pendant.
This is a great book for young musicians for inspiration. It tells a brief story in an easy to read format for each musician for a variety of instruments. Good for those who have the potential to go professional.
When you see an orchestra perform it look like the people in it play effortlessly. This is not the case. They get to be that great through LOTS of practice! In Meet the Musicians we are introduced to 15 member if the New York Philharmonic. They tell us there stories of how they found out they really wanted to be professionals.The book included a helpful glossary and a list of resources for learining.Young musicians will gain useful advise from the pro in this book.
Ghosts, Time Travel, Fairies, Magic and Scotland figure in this delightful story. I liked it. I had one little wish -- I got a bit confused with the love scenes - wish they were a little more detailed and longer.
This book, though not "great literature", is a fun read, with plenty of romance and suspense. But you have to be willing to temporarily (for the duration of reading the book) believe in magic, including magical time travel, to let yourself get into the story. This book does have an engrossing, suspenseful story line in addition to the romance, so it is much better than those romance books that are simply an evolving romance held together by boring daily life events. I recommend it as good entertainment reading.
This CD gets two stars for the good intentions and two for a couple good songs, but not worthy of five stars. I hate to be critical of charity efforts, but it just doesn't have that extra spark. None of the mixes especially strike me as really creative or original. I do love the dance version of Barry Manilow's "Could It Be Magic" and Sting's "Let Your Soul Be Your Pilot", and a couple other songs are worth a listen, but there are other CD's that I like better. For a great CD with some cool mixes that just blend together like you wouldn't believe, try Fire Island Classics (I like #1 best). For party music, the oddly-titled "Gay Dancing" is a really great mix of familiar songs. Dance with Angels is all well-known names and some great songs, but again, the mix just doesn't do much for me as a dance mix.
Pretty good manga.I'm in my twenties and this is one of the mangas I've really enjoyed.Its not like MARS :(But still good!
Product was as advertised. Very high quality. Product arrived in less time than anticipated. My dog Buddy looks very sharp wearing this collar. I would highly recomend company and product to anyone seeking a high quality leather studded dog collar.
The fisrt time I fist met Son de Madera on a live show in the city of Oaxaca, Mex. It's a very talented group, originary from the state of Veracruz, they made a "rescue" of the original Jarochan Son, Laura's voice its one of the best of Jarochan Son. their music leads you to tropical and apassionated world of the mexican jarochan soul.La primera vez que conoci a Son de Madera fue en una presentación en cico enla ciudad de Oaxaca, mex. Son un grupo talentoso originario del estado de Veracruz. Ellos hicieron un "rescate" del son jarocho original. La voz de laura es una de las mejores del Son Jarocho. Su m'sica te conduce al tropical y apasionado mundo del alma Jarocha de México.
In spite of the age of this work, and the fact it was directed to a young audience, it is well written and contains a great deal of useful information. Indeed, until very, very recently it was the ***only*** book that had any useful data on Dark Age warriors. Fortunately, more recent scholarship has come in to help fill the gap, but this is still a very useful work.Amazingly, it has not been reprinted with the rest of Oakeshott's series on Knights - why, I have no clue, for it is the best of the series that I have seen thus far, and is still extremely useful.Buy this if you can, which will not be easy unless a reprint is made - I lucked into a copy from Bookfinder and counted myself quite blessed.
While this is not one of his major books and written a long time ago Oakeshott got the details right according to what was known about the subject then, and it's a good introduction now decades later. I have his major books and most of the books written for young folks too. I read what others had to say about this book and I wasn't disappointed in it when I bought my own copy. It's a pleasant read and it filled a niche in our research books.Thirty years in reenactment societies...
Una vez mas Charles Swindoll llega al corazón del cristiano como tu y como yo. Nos alienta y nos da enseñanza de como enfrentar nuestros Gigantes, reconocer su origen y escudriñar en nuestro corazón para dar con esas espinas que han estado clavadas por mucho tiempo e impide que nuestro caminar con Dios sea firme. Prácticos y profundos principios para ayudarnos a ser mejores en nuestra casa, trabajo y en la iglesia.
An inspiring read which has the potential to change your life providing you actively apply the principles.
Great book if your looking for climbing routes - Class 3 to 5. The book does not offer signifcant insights into hiking routes in the Wind River Range. You can find better hiking intel on the web with Google searches.The Southern and Northern Wind River Maps also work better to plan out hiking trips.With that said, if your looking to rope up and bag a peak, this book is a must.
mr. galsworhy may have written a fine solid substantial novel, byt by heaven mr. anthony trollope who lived and wrote over fifty years before was a much more modern writer and didn't qualify every goddam sentence with an exclamation mark. (!) very dated stuff. who knows, maybe one day i'll get past all those damn exclamation marks.
I got interested in reading this book after viewing the Masterpiece Theater showing of the Forsyte Saga. It was interesting to compare the movie's interpretation of the book, and it gave a little more insight into the motivations of each of the characters. Overall a good book.
This is a great soap opera sprawling a number of generations from the 1800's to the changing times of the 1920's & 30's. Through this novel we can see the changes that took place in society where money was no object. There is love, lust, adultery, death, birth and friendship. We find in this novel that those with money during this early times were not suffering with the problems of monetary poverty but that of emotional poverty. There are standards to uphold and mistakes are made and status can suffer.You will love this novel, it is a classic and certainly better than any mini series.
One of my favorite gifts I have gotten! These are exquisite and top quality glasses! I remember my Great Grandma had these in the Fire King/Anchor "Coronation" that is what attracted me to them. They are so beautiful and would work for any function. I plan on having them for a long time since they are such good quality. You cannot go wrong with this reproduction!!! Especially if you are into Cottage or Shabby Chic home decor. Go for it you wont be dissapointed!
Excellent karaoke CD. We love it and the music of Abba just makes us happy! Recommend highly - nice collection of songs.
I was able to plug this cable into my video camera and download my videos in HD. This allowed me to see my videos in true HD and not just SD.
Easy way to get video from a digital video camera to your computer. You will need a special port on your computer to use this.
Atlast I can transfer my videos from my HC32 Sony camcorder to my laptop! Works with Toshiba & Dell laptops, not sure about others. The iLink/IEEE 1394 port on Toshiba is also called S400.
This cable is really working with my camera, I am transferring digital 8 to DVD and has been working great, the disadvantage is that the speed is not really better that others no brand cables.I recommend this produt
I thought troma was dead. i did'nt really like tromeo and juilet and i never saw terror firmer. well, as soon as i thought troma was dead the toxic avenger 4 proved me wrong ( and i am very happy about that!). Any way this movie is awsome it is sooooooo gory and has a lot of funny parts, like the retarted rebel, the "duck" scene, and the scene where the original melvin makes an appearence!!!!!! It is also very gory and has a head running over scene that gives the one from the first movie a run for it's money. also the scene where toxie kills all of these nazi cops....i also give loyd kaufman cridet for sticking his neck out and making fun of abortion, raceism and others.TROMA LIVES!!!!
For the cost, this tile saw met my expectations. Following the setup instructions for aligning the fence, the saw performed well cutting tile. While it is difficult to freehand beveled cuts using the tilting table, it worked well when I used spring clamps to attach a guide strip to the back side of the tile that followed the edge of the tilting table. The water reservoir provided a good source of water to the blade, but I found that I had to replenish the supply of water on a regular basis. I bought this saw to be able to diagonally cut 19" tiles that would not fit in my sliding table tile saw. The quality of this saw is definately much higher than less costly plastic versions. Having used this tool, I would buy it again if I needed a tile saw.
Used this saw to cut 3/8 inch granit tile and it worked better than i anticipated. Had no leaks as others indicated..some mess, yes, but not unusual with tile cutting. The diamond blade lasted throughout the kitchen project but did show signs of wear towards the end. . Certainly a great value!!!
So far I have no complaints. It seems to be working, but I think in more time, I will know if I absolutely love it. I have low progesterone and suffer from PMDD. My last cycle, my pms symptoms were less pronounced, so I think it is working.
I have been taking this supplement for a while. I only take one a day. I tried not taking it for a week just to minimize the pills I take every day, but I could feel my mood worsen. This is a great product.
Jay Hoggard is a vibes player who shows a strong affinity for both Milt Jackson and Bobby Hutcherson. His use of the pedal gives him a very warm, dream-like sound - his unaccompanied version of MY ONE AND ONLY LOVE is a good example of that. But he can swing hard, too, as on STARTING OVER, a Bobby Hutcherson tune that also features drummer Yoron Israel. SWEET POTATO is right out of the church, and the group plays a very relaxed STOMPIN' AT THE SAVOY. Guitarist Kenny Burrell plays well on Monk's EPISTROPHY. The only misstep for me is the title track, which is much "freer" than the others and has a strong Ornette Coleman flavor to it. Other than that, it's an excellent CD.
I have bought this and also the extra strength. I bought the regular then realize it came in extra strength. I alternate using them and they seem to work the same. This product has taken away 95% of my redness and flaking due to my rosacea. I have really tried everything and nothing worked in the past. Even my skin Dr suggested things and nothing worked. I saw this on a show on NBC and thought I would give it a try and so glad I did. I use it everyday. I am unsure why the price is so much lower on Amazon vs buying it directly from the Dr Gross website, seems odd to me.
This skincare product has saved my 50+ year old complexion. It's like having a facial every day. Great for anybody, any skintype, even teenagers. Worth the money. Leaves the skin w/ a "just right" texture: not dry, not greasy. You can apply make-up right after using the pads.
Great product! I have used many a skin care product and this was by far the best one. But because its so expensive i have to buy it sparingly. (Im not a high roller) I have ordered this product twice in the last year and it works right away. The problem is you really have to use them all in 30 days or the pads will dry up on you. This is dissapointing since i really dont need to use them everyday. Nonetheless this product works...if i had the money i would keep a ready supply in my cabinet.
Here Derrida offers a vision of blindness, that is to say a "vision" of "blindness", or even a "vis"ion of "blind"ness. By deconstructing the very "act" of see"ing", he defers to différance, grammatology, and "éperons", that is to say, the "spurs" by which we harry, that is to say hurry, the horse(s) of structuralized condescension. Perception, that is, or "interception", or even "interperception" of vision--or more precisely, visuality, and all that implies. Reading, and re-reading, this book, we can easily understand why Derrida and his thought were so instrumental in the fall of apartheid.
Even well written letters won't contain the whole story. Still I enjoyed the descriptions of life on a frontier. The storms, the relationships, and the culture left me wanting more; but friends can't share everything in letters. That is part of the time period. Intimate feeling but no "twitter" details. This free book was worth more than I paid for it.
I think that they are both nice voiced and this Cd is a great combination. A relaxive song with nice music. The only bad thing is that there is only 1 song including in this Cd. Anyway this is great Cd to buy...
This song, sung by Whitney Houston and Mariah Carey is GREAT! Sometimes, it leaves tears in my eyes. But, the song has some contrasts. Whitney Houston has one of the most beautiful voices in the universe. So when she sings the first verse and chorus, and then Mariah Carey starts to sing the second verse... it's a HUGE CONTRAST! Mariah screeches... If Celine Dion, who has the most wonderfully beautiful voice in the universe, had sung it with Whitney Houston, the song would've been irresistible. It would have been so unexplainable beautiful. Anyway, great job, Mariah and Whitney!
I ordered this at the last minute and it arrived on time. The case was cracked but the Cd was undamaged.
Read it all of it. can not say that I will use any of it. As a woodsman we usually go out already prepared and with our own more modern and durable gear. maybe if I were to live out there and have to replace my goods as they will inevitable need replacing with the suggestions in this book, but seeing as I am a working class man and will not live n the woods it just is good reading and that is all.
this is a great book. it was written well and read more like a story and not a manual the information although somewhat dated was great to read about and made me think about how a woodsman would have lived in the early 1900s
Malamud does three or four tricks in his fiction well, and here he does each one to utter perfection. And when taken together, this collection of stories almost transcends Malamud's normal limits: the stories are compressed, short, and below the surface, charged with almost unbearable tension. Unlike other collections of stories (or when you read too many Malamud stories) Malamud does not parody himself in the Magic Barrell. Everything is where it is supposed to be, and works like a well oiled machine. It is a shame that (as of writing this) only eight people have reviewed this masterpiece of a short story collection. In Roth's The Ghost Writer, Zuckerman explains that the world's morality has already passed by the E.I. Lonoff's (a character based on Malamud). Seems Roth was correct... and this is true even more today, thirty years after the publication of The Ghost Writer. We no longer live in Malamud's world, and it is a shame.
This book was interesting. I feel not everyone gets these short stories. The stories are sad and depressing, but that's the author's point: immigrant life can really suck. There isn't always a happy ending. Also, I read this book on my ipad so there were a lot of issues with formatting, which was annoying.
Small-Circle Jujitsu is the best pocket jj book on the market and also the closest book to traditional, real, ju jutsu. The photos are good (black and white), but the quality of paper can be better (maybe in next edition). All you need for to begin train is in this book.
As a Marine Corps Close Combat Instrtuctor, I can tell you that the majority of these techniques work well, and may be learned and applied by anyone. I do, however, beleive that much practical application and sparring/grappling against many different opponents is necessary to become proficient in any fighting art. Nearly ALL of the Marine Corps Close Combat techniques are found in this book. As our system was a collaboration of many SME's (subject matter experts), that has to speak for something. In addition, Wally echos one of my main points to my students, do not ever become subbornly commited to one technique. You must be able to flow from one to another based partly upon your skill, but primarily the actions of your opponent. Great book, although the pictures and descriptions could be better for beginning practitioners. If you are familiar with basic Jiu-jitsu techniques and principles, you should have no problems.
Finally, somebody has written a truly useful book about that most important of American science fiction authors, Robert A. Heinlein. In the past, sloppy criticism and the grinding of personal axes have ruined every single attempt to produce a book discussing Heinlein's works (I have the misfortune of having read them all). Gifford has produced what has to be the groundwork for all future studies of Heinlein: a basic categorization and numbering of every single published and unpublished work in the canon, along with the insiders' story on each entry. Readable from cover to cover, or as a reference work, Gifford has also performed the one invaluable goal of every reader's companion: he's sent me back to rereading the original works, but with fresh perspectives and insights. A perfect score, after twenty years of utter failures in Heinlein scholarship. Bravo!
James Gifford has given us a book immense in its scope, detailing the works of one of Science Fiction's Grand Master, and one of the genre's most prolific authors.The format is very reader-friendly. The individual entries for each work are fascinating for any Heinlein lover, and the bibliography and opus list will prove invaluable to new readers who wish to delve into Heinlein's universe. Truly a landmark achievement in research and clarity.
It has been a while since I read this book (maybe two months), but I just wanted to add to the body of reviews that if you love Latin American fiction or books that might read like the old Masterpiece Theater productions, you'll probably enjoy reading this book, and otherwise you'll probably be bored to tears. The writing is not very sophisticated, as is covered by others. Actually, given the quality of the book, I'm surprised by the number of reviewers! Many better books even in latin american fiction like Belli's The Invisible Woman have far less coverage. However, if you are thinking of buying the book to be well read in this genre(or if you want something specifically on El Salvador), you won't do wrong.
This is the first book I have read by Sandra Benitez. I have done much research on the the 1932 matanza in El Salvador and some on the civil war. I am Salvadoran and began reading the book critically and from a historical point of view. It began quite slow for me and somewhat sided, but as I read on I began to feel as I knew the characters and their realities. This is an excellent book. The realities of life, love, family, death, and war are presented strongly and passionately. The ending is gripping and seems unlikely, but definately portrays the difficult times of the civil war. Read it, it will provide a fictional story of the lives of some in a war torn country.
These are the best goggles we have ever tried. They fit well, do not fog up and have a good seal. No rashes from the material. The instructions for replacing the clear lenses with optic lenses are rubbish but once you pop the plastic frame off, the rest is very easy. Ignore the packet instructions and just follow your instincts!
The bells are exactly what you think they are and sound exactly like you think they do. My daughter was THRILLED to be able to make her own Santa sounds. They seem pretty durable and are great for the price.
No one describes a creature like Alan Dean Foster! Hands down, the very best. His silverslith sent shivers down my arms. I've read it many times, and I even use it to teach my students how to write a descriptive paragraph. His mind knows no bounds when inventing animals, plants, and humans. Probably my favorite fantasy book of all times (though Mid-Flinx) comes in a close second.
This book, like Heinlein's Starship Troopers, is a book I keep reading again and again over the years, and for similar reasons. As previous reviewers have stated, this book is quite compact, yet rich and complete, and operates on several levels. It's the description of a fascinating world. It's an adventure story. It's a character study. It's a parable. The concept is intriguing, and the characters are multi-faceted. It's a compact classic, and until today I hadn't realized that Midworld had shown up in any other books. Those books (all of them) are going on my Amazon Wish List today.Read this book, and read Starship Troopers. Both are SO much more than bugs-in-space. They're worth far more time than they actually take to read.
I first read this book as a teenager, many, many years ago, and I still dig it out of my bookshelf every other year to re-immerse myself in Foster's wildly imaginative world. He has such a great talent for inventing intriguing flora and fauna!Only two little flaws come to mind:1. Midworld seems a little too lethal for any colony to survive long enough to discover the Home Trees and make use of them.2. In Mid-Flinx, the author describes fire-extinguishing flora. They apparently don't exist in Midworld because if they did, the corporation couldn't have built their R&D; complex.
Beautifully written in prose form, Baldwin writes of race relations, and the awakening of one's mind to the differences, perceived or otherwise, of race, color, and their political ramifications. Very candid, and yet ultimately subtle, too---the book, which is written in the form of a letter, makes one think about the trials that many minorities (primarily African-Americans) go/went through and how far we've come today......and, yet sadly, how much further we have to go. This short book makes you think---with your eyes wide open.
I'd have to agree with M-Speedy, this album is great! If you enjoy Cyndi Boste this second album won't disappoint.
Jokes can be both funny and cutting, and often it seems that women have been the victims of comedy more often than men. But jokes aside, this book of quotations demonstrates that even if the numbers are not equal, men too have been the target of commentary but amusing and attacking for centuries. The illustrations are simple black & white drawings of a "Victorian" style, rather satirically in itself considering the gender roles at that time. The book is organized on the premise that males are a extincted species and this is a pseudo-historical view of them by the survivors, females. The book has five chapters where the quotations are organized by subject and tone. I found it actually quite interesting but not necessarily funny, but them I'm a historian and a feminist so I was over-analyzing the content, I'm sure. I find it to be a good source for bitting commentary when I write some of my fiction.
I love the story of Tess. Considering many of the classics I have ever read, I think Tess is one of the easier ones to understand. The work itself is a masterful story. However, I take issue with Penguin's version. The Notes are just awful- referencing back and forth from your place in the book to the back is a nightmare and many times isn't worth breaking your flow. Some of the Notes are helpful and even necessary to understand the sentence, but others are pointless and annoying. I recommend a different version, either without notes entirely or with more reasonable ones.
This novel, contrary to some of the other comments, is a wonderful piece of literature. Although not the most uplifting, it is a great example of Hardy and Deterministic and Naturalistic fiction. Despite Tess' best efforts (like Jude in the other Hardy novel), she is unable to escape the poverty and misfourtune which she attempts to leave behind. Although somewhat lengthy, the novel is one of the better pieces of British fiction to come out of the period.
I can't believe how tragic this book is! I picked up this book with an unexpected decision. The book I was supposed to read was Queen of the Damned, but then I saw this book and the cover appealed to me. So I decided I'll read it. At first it was kinda boring, until the last 1/3 of the book, I was so depressed by it...how fate was toying with them, and how their characteristic had decided their fate............Anywayz, this is truly a wonderful book, either by plot, writing, background, history, religion, describtion, etc etc, it's all with perfection. Read it, even though the beginning part might be kinda boring, it's for you to understand it better.I'd recommend this book to anybody, and if you like tragedies, you definitely *have* to read it!!
Ok, the first time I too this book out of the library, I got halfway through it before I hurled it at the wall. I couldn't stand the characters and I was so mad and frustrated with them I returned it without finishing it. A month later, it was drivng me crazy not knowing how the characters fared, and I took it out and finished it. But this time, I knew how to read it: I didn't try so hard to relate to the characters, I just read their story. And I found if a fascinating study of suffering and sorrow and love and all that good stuff. So just get throught the very frustrating middle and it's good, really. Strange, gothic ending, but good. And check out the A&E movie, because it's excellent - better thatn the book, and that's weird. Perfect casting and adaptation. Ok, that's all.
This year I decided to reread some classics, and read some I never had read. This one was a little tough for me. I'd be reading and have to backtrack few pages for the first time ever.
"Tess of the d'Ubervilles" is the story of a young and innocent woman who wants nothing more than to live a happy life. Every time Tess comes close to happiness something goes wrong. By the end of the book the emotional stress of Tess's life is clear, leaving the reader sympathetic to her misfotune.
About fifteen years ago, this book was almost universally considered Hardy's great masterpiece. However, times have changed and its relevance is not as immediate as that of Hardy's last novel, Jude the Obscure. Still, the message of this book is far from foreign. Hardy's gift for creating sympathetic characters seems infinite in magnitude. His prose is unique and at times more harrowing in tone than Conrad's. This book would be a great introduction to the work of one of the great masters of English Literature.
It was really a great book, but what is Tess's problem?!?She is just too trusting and dependant. And Angel. He's seriously got issues. I mean, come on! He liked Tess just because she was perfect!! DON'T GET ME WRONG, THE BOOK REALLY WAS GREAT!!
Tess, a naive and young girl whose one night relationship with her cousin Alec ruins her life, is a great example of a woman in love who would do anything for her husband and nothing for herself. Tess is a great book to read. I NEED HELP AND SOON IN LESS THAN A WEEK I HAVE A TERM PAPER ON TESS DUE (THE CONSEQUENCES OF MOTHERHOOD BEFORE BEING WED IN ENGLAND IN THE 1800'S AS SEEN IN TESS) PLEASE IF YOU HAVE ANY MATERIAL THAT CAN HELP ME EMAIL IT TO ME. tHANKS IN ADVANCED!!!!!
I read this book soon after I had seen the A&E mini-series. Reading the book after watching the series gave me a better appreciation for the dialect(s) Hardy uses throughout the novel which could be a little difficult to decipher. Very good book overall.
For those beginning to read the classics this one is a great hook. While the characters are complex the story is linear and the allusions are simple enough to follow. One can't help but hope Tess's life will somehow turn out right although knowing it will not. The burdens she encounters seem to do little to stop her from moving forward. Life seems so unfair to her, but Hardy handles her masterfully; indeed it is safe to say Hardy loves her more than God does.
Not a frustration in the negative sense, but in fact, this was a book which I could hardly put down. The fact that I felt compelled to express my thoughts here perhaps point to it's even greater impact on me. A fabulous story, and of course, tragic in the end... And why do I feel frustrated? Perhaps merely for the fact of Tess ' rash action, almost one of self defence, which closes her tragic life. And the want or need for the story to extend beyond the final close to see her defence succeed and her life prevail. However, these are not the modern times, and the chasm seems wide. Tess is a beautiful person - innocent and with only the intention of good - and suffers as a result. While not a ground breaking novel, it's eloquence and true to life appeal allows it to become part of you. I can only highly recommed this book and will read it again and again...
Out of all the book I was forced to read...I LOVED this one... the movie was good but the book was great...it is the only book I still have from my early Michigan college years.
I have read several Thomas Hardy novels starting with The Mayor of Casterbridge many years ago in high school and I never really appreciated the style and the fact that like other Hardy novels Tess is a love story and a very good story. Worth reading
Good book still reading it still trying to understand all the different wording of the book but it's pretty good I want you to review everything hopefully
This is a good book. It is sad that many of Tess bad decisions caused her life to be worst off than it should have been. Instead of making lemonade from her lemons in life life she continued to suck on the sour sour fruit over and over again.
This was a very chilling and creepy book to read, I highly enjoyed it and recommended it. It came as such a great surprise that this book, written decades ago, is comparabely as scary as Stephen King novels, but more wicked (and rather a bit more difficult of a task to read).Through circumstances and the evil of others, the young just prior nymph Tess Durverfield, suffers a series of tragedies. A victim of innocence, youth, beauty, and love. THIS WAS GREAT!
Tess is a very difficult book and I would not recommend it to the average old contemporary reader. There is so much more meaning behind the birth of the rapist's child, and the break-up of Tess and her "husband" Angel. You have to read the fine-lines and "footnotes". In other words, there is absolutely no way you could relate to this book, and anyways...why would you want to relate to books? The experiences Tess goes throught at such an early age has scarred her for life. Well, she doesn't live much of a life now that you think about it.
As the synoposis says: Violated by one man, forsaken by another, Tess Durbeyfield is a magnificent and spirited heroine of Thomas Hardy's immortal work.Written in a no-nonsense yet frilly female tone, Tess of the Durbervilles is just as comarible to ADAM BEDE, both are beloved and my most honored classics every. I enthusiastically recommend the two, these are the books that deserve to be called CLASSICS.
"I became acquainted with Thomas Hardy through another of his classic works, which lent to my curiosity on this one when the audio version was made available to me. It was an experience, to the say the least, hearing how the innocent life of this girl of late 19th century England played out. For no reason other than her own naiveté is she rendered with injustice and prejudicial attitudes of the day - Hardy's denouncement of his own country's false morals. In my view, all males of our current day and age should find this impressive work required reading, and then determine whether they are an Alec D'urberville or an Angel Clare. It seems we all fall into one category or the other."
Great read, had very few mistakes. The tragedy and triumph in this story has always attracted me, in a way that few stories have been able to do.It will always be on my favorite read list. Tess is the epitome of being a woman born in a time when circumstances really called for strength and courage. Now on my kindle fire and will go with me everywhere.
I put this book on my ipod and then thought I'd like to be able to read it when I couldn't listen. I have a kindle and kindle fire. It went to both Kindles! Yea! Now I have the book all places so how ever I want to read it I can!! Amazon makes it all happen like magic.
Loving the book. Was in good condition and arrived in a timely manner! I can not wait to funish the book. Great price too. Thank you!
A very good story once you get used to the old English language. Learned a lot about life in Victorian England and the double standard for men and women. Glad I read it.
The way this book is written makes it hard to read. I only bought it because Anna talks about it so much in Fifty Shades of Grey.
Tess of the D'Urbervilles is one of the best books I have ever set my eyes upon. I have tried to finish the book in one sitting but found out that I can't because there is just so many things to figure out in the story. No doubt, fate plays such an important role in the life of Tess Durbeyfield and it is due to her noble descent that spawns the events leading to her own demise. The ending of the story is somewhat disturbing. Should we feel happy that Angel fufiled Tess's wish or should we feel sad for Tess?
I thoroughly enjoyed Tess, even though it left me raging and gnashing my teeth at times. No picture of Victorian life can be complete without reading this book first.
Works well for the most part. The only problem we had with this product is that the bolt that is used to either keep the rack up or to hold it in the down position is weak. We used the bike rack twice and the pin is bent to the point that we need to replace it with a stronger bolt. Other than that we would have no problems recommending this product to anyone else. In fact we would buy this unit again.
Great product, works as advertised. It might be a bit to heavy for me (a woman) to manage alone but I'm not sure light product would be as sturdy and secure.We are able to fit out 4 bikes on it all right. Despite some reviews saying you can't put a kids bike on it - well, we hauled our little one's 14-incher with training wheels together with three bigger bikes, no problems. No additional bars for our bikes, no safety issues, recommend.
One of the few bike racks that I found that could fit cruiser wide tires and 4 bikes. Price was good compared to competition. Only complaints are it's heavy and if you have a lift back you can't open it with the bikes on the rack.
We have four bikes in our family and needed stronger rack to carry them. This is perfect for four bikes. It takes a little practice to figure out which bike goes on in which order. It is pretty easy to adjust as necessary. It is very heavy and therefore a little difficult to take on and off, but a little assistance is all you need. The locking pin does not "lock" in it only screws in, so for security you may need to purchase a locking pin with a key. Do not try to use this without a 2" hitch, it is so heavy it wobbles and does not look very secure on the back of the car. The clamps that lock the bike hold them in place and do not allow them to move but they do mark up the bikes. I just use a small washcloth to protect the bike frame. For the price, this is a great rack.
I did alot of research before I made my purchase. For a 4-bike rack, this was the best price and quality. It is a little hard to put together because the instructions are not very detailed at all. Took my husband about 45 minutes to put it together. It is a little heavy but it is extremely sturdy. I wouldnt trust a cheap wobbly rack for my bikes. I read reviews that said it was too complicating so I was nervous when I decided to purchase despite those reviews, but other than the assembly,it is not complicating at all. It fits all types of bikes with no problem. It is perfect and I love it!!
The Swagman XTC-4 Cross-Country Hitch Mount Rack is lighter than other bike racks and is easy to attach to vehicle. The attachments are easy to move and adjust to each bike that is put on it. Will be enjoying using this product for a long time. Seems to be very durable.
A little heavy, but a good solid rack. Its great for any size bike or tires! No problems what so ever! I'd recommend it to anyone but the weak!!!
The View From the Hill was one of the most exciting books I have read in a long time. It's a touching almost love story, an with exciting battle over Sterling Castle. This is a great book for not only the historical accuracy, but also for the story behind the action. I would highly recommend this book to anyone.
I love these nipples. I've ordered so many of these because my son will only use this nipple. We have tried the Medela nipples and every other type imagineable that will fit on our Medela bottles, but this is the only one he would use. It's a slow flow which is perfect for him. We will be buying more before we head to Cancun so we can use with the Similac Ready to Feed bottles.
We used similar type of nipples in the hospital when our baby was born and wanted to have the same with us when we travel from one place to another as being disposable they come pretty handy. Would recommend these not for daily use but when you are traveling. Its good that we found them on Amazon :)
The author, Feiler, took up a year long tenture in a Japanese secondary school to teach English. As such, most of the chapters in this book are concentrated on comparisons between the Japanese school system and its American counter part. The author did an excellent analysis on this subject matter, there were lots of insightful ideas within the chapters. The writing style of this book is crisp and clear, sparkled with touches of humors at various places. Overall, it's an excellent book to be used for cross-cultural research, as well as a fun and educational book to read about. The only slight complain I have regarding this book is that since the author had concentrated heavily on the subject matter of 'schools', therefore he had to left many of the other fanscinating aspects of the Japanese culture unmentioned. It's not an all-around cross-cultural book.
This book is very good. Having lived in Japan for a year and a half, I knew some of the realities of school life. This book de-mythologizes the educational system and shows you not only its impressive strengths, but also its fatal flaws. I thought it had a very balanced approach. It would be great to read whenever you feel that the American educational system is being left in the dust. It will raise your spirits.
I remember before I left for my first trip to Japan in 1996, reading about Feiler and his adventures in an Onsen hot springs. I remember his description of having to take of all his clothes and bathe in front of all these Japanese guys he just met. Any yet, during my trip in 1996 the same thing happened to me! I felt just like Feiler! The book is informative about Japanese culture and at the same time a great read. Its a must read if you plan to visit Japan...especially if you are a teacher.
An unusual view of Japanese society. Seen not as usual through the eyes of a tourist, journalist, or other professional observer, but from the viewpoint of someone living there. Mr Fieler must not only learn a new job, but a new culture.
This is the best book I have read by or about foreigners living in Japan. The author has moved to Japan to teach English in a typical small town school. Quite a wide variety of situations and scenes in Japanese daily life are covered from an outsider's perspective. His interactions with the school's principal, district administrators, teachers, the students and their parents are well written in a descriptive and anecdotal way. Mr Feiler is not just a good storyteller but is a very insightful writer as well. I immediately reread the book and enjoyed the second reading even more than the first.
This book by Bruce Feiler is not just about the Japanese educational system but about the Japanese themselves. While it does touch on how students and teachers work together, teen suicide and cram school, it also deals with the problems of racism, the way the Japanese balance their lives and their duties to society, and even a few chapters on Japanese dating and marriage. It is full of humor, insight and clear thinking. Mr. Feiler clearly but a lot of thought into his visit and is just as clear in explaining to us what he feels is the important and major issues that Japan has to deal with - not just then but now and in the future. A must for any library on Asia or Japan.
When I heard they were making a file of The Unbearable Lightness of Being, I thought, "good luck!". The main gist of the book is philosophical, a hard quality to translate on film. But Kaufman does it here, with the help of Daniel Day-Lewis - and manages to improve upon the book, adding color, humor, and a profound sense if intimacy. A touching and beautifully done love story.
I have not seen this DVD (not released yet) but this is one of my all time favorite films. Philip Kaufman (who also directed "The Right Stuff", "Invasion of the Body Snatchers" (remake), and "Henry and June") combines beautiful and erotic visuals with a compelling story of people caught up in the 1968 uprising in Czechoslavakia, and its aftermath.Wonderful performances by Juliette Binoche, Lena Olin, and Daniel Day-Lewis.Stands up well to repeated viewings. I have seen this in the theatre, on LaserDisc, and on the excellent Criterion DVD. Don't watch it full screen (4x3)!!
This film, is one of the best screenplays I have ever seen (and I seen many). I had read the book before, and the film is just an extension of the beautiful superiority of the book.I particulary enjoyed the mixture of 'real' footage of the occupation of Praque and the film footage. Very well done.The reason I've only given this film 4 stars is because it didn't have a specific secene which I was looking forward to seeing.But the reast of the film definatly makes up for it.And by the way... the director is the director of Quills.
Why do we commit to one another? Do we really know? Would a life of independence and detachment be better? Both analytical and powerfully moving, this movie deals with these questions. At first seeming light and slightly intellectual, the movie evolves into something more felt than thought. The film shows what is going on without telling the viewer in words. This is a story about the nature of love in all its human forms. It is a heavy story that stays with you. Not for those not in touch with their inner self or who object to some tasteful nudity.
This film is by far one of the best ever produced: It`s erotic, humoures, sad, poetic and the protagonists are all interesting. Now, this is why many Europeans critizise American films.... They feel most productions from the US are stereotyped, all glam and over the top, while the European productions tend to move more straightforward into our human soul.... This film is one of those glorious occasions when film is high art and linked to the freespirited human soul.
I've seen nothing like it. The supreme and rich acting of Binoche and the abstract cinematography and direction manage to distance the viewers in such a way from the everyday noise of a thousand feelings, enabling the viewers to taste and sense all the emotion and ideas of the characters and the era with a vividness only accesible in dreams.
The Unbearable Lightness of Being is a masterpiece, the most underrated American film of the past 30 years. Poetic, haunting, subtle, and terribly sad, it says more about the crushing impact of repressive (i.e. communist) regimes than a thousand documanteries or inflammatory speeches could tell. While idealizing the free-wheeling Prague of the late 60's the film also examines the emptiness of such a non-commital lifestyle- the unbearable lightness. If this all sounds very somber, ULOB is also one of the sexiest films you will ever see, and one of the few intelligent studies of sex in cinema. More surprisingly, it is a heartbreaking romance. Like a great novel, ULOB grows on you, and you'll hate to see the characters leave you at the end. Perfectly acted by its then unknown leads, and beautifully photographed, this is a film to grow old with.
I served in the Peace Corps in E. Europe in the early 1990s; this movie conforms to my experience of Prague, the Czech people, and E. European literature so completely as to take my breath away. Creating a full movie out of the first 26 pages of Milan Kundera's original novel is scriptwriting brilliance. The film's breadth and depth of each character, the larger-than-life issues played out against the seeming frivolity of the Prague Spring--and its tragic historic aftermath--never fail to impress me. This film has a very European sentiment regarding sexuality/sensuality, however; it is as woven into the fabric of daily life as a glass of fine wine. If you prefer more staid fare, I'd recommend many excellent British films.
Just kidding. It's no fruit juicer, but it made my wife happy and works well. Nice size for an apartment and when combined with a rotary cutter, my wife found that cutting fabric was a delight as opposed to working with scissors, or the katana/stump combination I bought her for the job before I bit the bullet and bought her this mat. Once you get one, you'll wonder how you ever survived without this...and you'll keep your katanas sharp and ready for impending samurai attack. Or zombies.
When E T A Hoffmann redirected his output from music to literature the world gained a lot. Not only did his literature have great impact with other writers, but his stories became the source of much musical inspiration (Wagner, Offenbach, Tchiakovsky, Hindemith, Schumann, Busoni, Delibes .....). But listening to this CD made me realise the world lost a lot as well, because Hoffmann was a very talented composer. I had previously heard some of Hoffmann's chamber music, such as the piano trio and harp quintet on this CD, and viewed them as pleasant but not memorable. The duettini italiani on this disc are for me, a pointer to greater riches in Hoffmann's music than I had previously seen.Other recommendations:Hoffmann's short stories, and his novel 'The Life and Opinions of the Tomcat Murr'E. T. A. Hoffmann: Arlequin Ballet; Overtures, CPO CD
We purchased this for our daughter for her first birthday. She loves it & plays with it constantly. It is great quality and fun colors & also comes with great accessories. It is very small (perfect for her size), but note this if you are buying it for an older toddler.
Another fantastic deal from Amazon. My son ADORES this little oven. It looks beautiful and comes with a complete collection of food, plates, pots, and utensils. The colors are lovely and it looks a great deal more expensive than it was. My only complaint is that the shelves are not solid in the wood backing. The small plastic bolt comes loose easily. It so far seems to create no structural issues, but it does make the yellow sliding door fall out sometimes. Probably could be resolved easily by adding a real screw to the backing. It is also on the small side (my two year old sits down to play with it), so know what you are getting before purchasing.
I now own 3 of them 512, 1G, 2G, write to it is 6MB/sec read is about 13MB/sec for it size the best you will find. I use it with RoboForm and BART-PE Boot OS, so it stays pluged in for long periods at a time and its size and round back make it the safest USB to leave in a laptop as you use it and move around and won't get knocked out or damage your USB port due to torque. I hope they never discontinue this model. A must have for the moble person on the move.Phil
We installed these on the switches for the exhaust fans in our two bathrooms and the closet light in our daughter's room. They work great. They don't need batteries -- the low-tech spring does the job. They save energy because you can't leave for the day and leave the fan going all day long.
Our home was built in 2003 and this fits just fine in the outlet/switch box. It does exactly what it's supposed to. We set it for 10 minutes after we're done and it shuts the exhaust fan off in our bathroom.Saves money on heat and cooling...
An amazing book. Personal life stories that all of us can relate to. Attempts to answer the question"why me?" that we tend to ask in adverse times.Inspirational and uplifting.
I love this book. Honestly, I haven't read it. I've only stared at the images and drawn the dragons from the book. I LOVE drawing them.Perhaps I should read it some time too!
Part adventure part encyclopaedia,The Dragon Chronicles is an exciting and unusual book. It will be enjoyed as much for its narrative thrills as for richness of its illustrative detail.The book appears to be a reproduction of an old journal that turned up for auction in a London sale room. It purports to be the diary journal of an old wizard, who to comply with the wishes of his dying king, sets off to find a group of malevolent dragons who are threatening the stability of the land.The book looks and feels like something that has been lying in a vault, forgoten for centuries. The pages are like old vellum and there are dozens of brilliant coloured paintings and sketches of dragons, weapons and specimens, like dragon eggs that were supposedly produced by various artist who accompanied the wizard on his journey. There is even a dried pressed speciment of a dreaded "Dragnette" a kind of flying piranha!Thoroughly enjoyable yarn for any age (why should kids have all the fun)
Really captures the imagination. An exciting yarn, incredible colour illustrations plus interesting specimens of dragon remains etc.A real collectors item, whether its a reproduction of a genuine document (as claimed) or not???Some of the imagery certainly looks believable.
Excellent book for staff development within the Foreign Language department. Includes tools for evaluating both student and instructor performance with guidance on how to improve those scores.
I HAVE SEEN ENERGY AT THE GYM, EVEN WHEN I RAN. NOT SURE IF IT'S FROM THE CREATINE BUT I KNOW ISS RESEARCH MAKES GOOD STUFF BECAUSE FIRST TIME I USE THE GLUTAMINE THAT STUFF WORKED REALLY GOOD.THEY'RE NOT FLASHY ABOUT THEIR PRODUCT; DON'T ADD CRAZY FLAVORS AND WHAT NOT, BUT THEY DO MAKE GOOD PRODUCTS. EVERYONE'S BODY IS DIFFERENT SO EXPERIMENT WHICH WORKS FOR YOU.
Pretty good book. The author really did a lot of research with the people who were personally involved with the accident. She also did a good job by not writing the book as a lengthend NTSB report but rather the whole process the FAA, Coast Guard, and NTSB have in place to react to a downed airplane. She gave a lot of background information also and sometimes even too much. I really didn't get why she would write about the Mayflower or the history of the Coast Guard but it was her book to write, not mine.
Shutters come down, safety inside, exile at home, this is more than just the best CD in the world.... This is the beginning of a new music age.
I first heard a track on the tv while I was doing something else. In a program reviewing new music. I was astonished. It didn't sound at all as all the other worthless types of modern pop. The first parallell I made was to the "old" 10cc. But of course, anyone who knows about Beach Boys, Brian Wilson and the "Pet Sounds" album would rather like to refer to those. I will go and buy at least two of the albums.
It's actually "Hoops Hooley" that sounds straight off the Beach Boys "Pet Sounds" album. I love this stuff. Get it!
stereolab and sean o hagan might as well be the same groop...a lovely companion piece to that cobra thing. more subtle then cold and bouncy, plus help from the lab girls. this is a solid album, great melodies and the wacky sounds youve come to expect from the whole incestuous chicago scene.
Well I loved Cobra & Phases....by Stereolab!!! I loved Cold & Bouncy the previous effort by the High Llamas!! And Snowbug takes right off where the last album left off and exceeds!!!!! Phew!!! Our favorite gyrls Laetitia & Mary lend vocals on 3 of the tracks and they sound so beautiful... Fianlly Sean gets funky and this album proves it...Maybe it has sumthin' to do with the help of Jim O'Rouke and John McIntyre... This album is remarkable...I recommend it to all!!!!
Wow! With "Snowbug", a return trip to "Hawaii", Sean O'Hagan and friends have created their most accessible CD yet. While retaining the Wilsonesque arrangements for the most part, the vocal aspects of the production have been honed to a more refined level, thanks in part to the inclusion of more female background vocals. Gone are the avant-garde electronic-bloop excursions of "Cold and Bouncy". The new direction on this CD is the incorporation of Brazilian influences into the already exotic High Llamas cocktail. These developments in the band's sound gives "Snowbug" a warmer overall feel than any of their previous efforts. I don't see how any critics could argue the true excellence of this collection of songs, though many have pointed to the Llamas too-strong Beach Boys influence in the past. It is unassailable in it's musical genius, a beautiful work of art.
As a Californian, frequenter of the Sierra Nevadas, as well as a college student who obsesses over fine American Literature, I found this work to be perhaps the most well written piece of beat fiction i've read. Contrary to popular belief, I feel this is a much more mature and insightful piece than "On the Road" (not to take anything from the brilliance of Kerouac's breakthrough work) and should be held in reverence by literature and philosophy enthusiasts across the globe. Japhy Ryder's Buddha representation, as well as Kerouac's struggle to incorporate his new discovery of traditional buddhism with his original Catholic upbringing are representative of the Western Frontier of Eastern Thought, which is becoming more popular even today, thanks to the likes of Jack Kerouac. Bravo!
Although this isn't the greatest book written by Kerouac, it is easily my favorite he has written. There are many weak moments and contradictions by the characters (Kerouac) but the passion in the pages is hard to deny. He really means everything he writes and believes he is trying to become a better person. All told, it is a fun, romantic trip; this is something that is lacking in today's cynicism.
Anyone who has any respect for nature, the Dharma, life, or philosophy will gain from this book. Kerouac always has a way of drawing a reader in and putting you in his place. It's a beautiful and eye-opening book.
Liked this more than On the Road. Has a completely different feel. One of my favorite reads.
Cracker Jack's got quite a nack at righting these shindigs about the bums in rucksacks. Dharma Bums gives you a glimpse into the life of the Beats with a focus on their cut of Zen. This really is a great story and it will inspire you. On a side note I recommend trying to find the original edition; the old pages really smell a lot better.
Stylistically and idealogically its Kerouac through and through. The idea of living a truly free life and one without boundaries truely provoked a lot of thought for me personally. It makes you want to be one of Ray and Japhy's friends; to go find a shack to live in and really exist in what may be the only best way to exist, free of material incarceration. I recommend this book to be read by young adults everywhere. Not all will be opened to a new way of thought and what really matters in this world but some will and it could possibly change their life for the better by not being wrapped around society's focus on material possession as symbols of achievement.
This is the book that lured me into the world of kerouac. I had previously read "On the Road," which was excellent, but I feel no match for "the Dharma Bums." This book changed my life. It changed the way that i thought. Kerouac introduces the reader to his experiences and beliefs through his novels; they are mostly semi-autobiographical. Before this novel consumed me, i had no notion of Buddhism. In retrospect this has been the single most influential thing that I have been exposed to. This book is just a starting point for a Kerouac fan. I recommend that you follow this book with Kerouac's "Desolation Angels." Simple, and yet so satisfying literature. I have not really encountered any other writers who are so beloved, so beautiful and poetic in few and simple jazz talk and random amusing European literary name dropping. Pick this one up, maybe it will change your life too!
Yes, "On The Road" gets all the attention, but this follow-up work is by far his most gorgeous and uplifting...from sleeping on the beach to climbing a mountain, to the flowering of his Buddhist consciousness, Jack really takes the reader with him. Filled with plenty of movement, bohemian idealism with Ginsberg and Snyder, self-discovery, joy, etc, this is simply where Jack shows himself as most fully alive and in love with the magic of experience. "Dharma Bums" soars as high as "Big Sur" dives to the depths of agony. Read this book, and you WILL feel the beauty of life without anchors.
Five are definetly the world's greatest boy band. Even though they split up, they are still awesome."Let's Dance" is a very poppy song, and definetly makes me want to dance as the title suggests. The extra track "Sometimes" is awesome and the remix is pretty good. The Megamix rules and overall "Let's Dance" is a good single to buy.I recommend it to any people who like dance music, pop music or anything catchy. Also, if you're a huge Five fan, this is a must to buy. A definete 5 star.
this movie is amazing on HD the story is awesome the battles are intense and its just a nonstop thrill of a movie the only 2 minor thing thats bad is megan foxx wasent in this one what can i say im a fan and 2 they are 0 special features but to me that dosent matter as long as it was well made on bluray and it did i defently recommend this movie go out and buy it ASAP and enjoy
This movie is great. Fun for the whole family. Is action packed and we don't get bored with this one. Recommend to go ahead and buy this one.
I don't understand why people didn't like Revenge of the Fallen. I thought that was great. I thought that the first Transformers the best... Until I saw Dark of the Moon. Dark of the Moon was just a perfect movie. It had comedy, suspense, and (Most importantly) action. Some of these action sequences were just great. And there were some white knuckling sequences that you HAVE to be prepared for. And Shia LaBoef was just great with the new actress. She was better than Megan Fox. In more than one way if you know what I mean =) But altogether, this was an A+ in my book. So dissapointed that it's the final one. Michael Bay, this was your MASTERPIECE!
This is a great third movie for the series. Not to happy with the dropping of Meagan Fox from the series, however this movie gave the general population more of what was wanted...giant robots fighting. There was a perfect mix of disappointment, sadness, and then again joy in this movie. There were also a lot of parts that just left me stunned...in a good way. Disappointed with the way they had to throw one f-bomb into the movie. Great movie, lots of fighting, and an acceptable conclusion to the series, for now.
I love all three of the Transformers movies, but this last one is not my favorite. Whatever the reason for Megan Fox not being in Dark of the Moon, there is a loss of continuity with a new female lead. There was chemistry between Megan and Shia LaBeouf that Rosie Huntington-Whiteley doesn't bring to the screen, IMO.I do appreciate the irony in the government getting outwitted by the Transformers again! What would happen, if there's a Transformers IV, if they actually get cooperation at the outset instead of having some stumbling, bumbling upper echelon idiot get in their way? I know it's in the script, and it gives good drama... but it's the same story line over and over.In the end, however, it's (spoiler alert) the good guys' triumph over evil, the requisite stunts, explosions and stomach churning, death defying drama that makes this movie *almost* as good as the first two. Definitely worth having, and thanks, as always, to Amazon for the availability of prepurchase!!
Excellent sequel and follow-up to the first movie. I think I still like the first one better but, either way I definitely enjoyed it. ;-)
I'm an Original Transformers fan from the original cartoon. There was action from start to finish and the Love Story didn't slow thing for me. I've watched this movie numerous times and still see things I missed the first few times i watch it. Loved It!
I like the new love interest in this movie a lot. Also this is a great extension of the last two movies. i can't wait for a 4th to come out.
I was very satisfied the product and the speed I received it I would do business with them again, I was very satisfied
This is a good action packed movie sure to please the science fiction/fantasy enthusiast. The story starts with an alternate history of the moon landing with an alien discovery twist and moves on to become a fast-paced action movie with the familiar heroes except for one, a new romantic interest. The new romantic interest, played by Rosie Huntington-Whitely, fails to measure up to the previous one played by Megan Fox.The sound and video are both first rate and will rattle your rafters if you crank up the sound high enough. The story line holds ones interest and provides enough surprise elements to keep one guessing. This is a worthy addition to the franchise and a keeper for any collector of this genre.I recommend it highly.
DOTM made it easy to forget 2009's ROTF. The "plot" was much improved, possibly because there was only ONE writer this time. Some of the best action sequences I have ever seen were in this movie. A great way to end the series, as well. If they made any more, I would hope it would be the military and Autobots working together to hunt down Decepticons, similar to how ROTF started out.Please take my advice: how good a movie is has nothing to do with the studio wanting to get consumers to buy the movie twice. If you disagree, then spam the studio with correspondence rather than deduct stars from your review.Try it this way next time: "DOTM was a fantastic action film, but I am disappointed the Blu-Ray release hardly has any extras. Otherwise, 5 STARS!!!!"
loved the movie more than the television series from the 80's.......my boys loved it so much they were characters from the movie for Halloween....my 3 year old loves cars more than ever after seeing this
She loved it when she opened it on her birthday. Now I want to watch it lol. It looks exciting.
Great Quality! no problems at all playing it on my PS3. Not a fan of buying Collector's edition, price is great.
Must i say more it a f****in good movie me and the kids love it.. If you dont have it ur late
This movie is a great movie for those of you seeking for action. It's simple, fun, and it's full of action. If you're into movies with a deep meaning, this isn't it for you, but for those of you that just love action like me, it'll be awesome! Blu-ray definitely makes this movie pop out and you'll love it if you have a huge awesome HDTV.
mil gracias por el producto fabuloso recomiendo a este vendedor todo llego en perfectas condiciones excelentesaludos espero seguir contando con ustedes
Like all the other Transformer movies just great, one you can play over and over and never get sick of seeing it.
Okay, first off I just want to say that I absolutely loved the Dark of the Moon and honestly believe it was probably the best of the three movies. Special effects were spectacular on the blu-ray and everything just seemed so clear and unbelievable.The only problem I have is... special features? Or maybe, the lack thereof. I honestly have to admit that I didn't really look at the description to see about the special features because... it's a new movie!! I pretty much thought all new movies came with SOME kind of special features, deleted scenes, commentary, gag reel, SOMETHING!! But this didn't and it leads me to believe that they'll probably re-release all three together in a special 3-D, blu-ray pack with 'Never Before Seen Footage' etc... etc... Which is the only reason I'm giving this 4 stars instead of 5. That, in a nut shell, irritates the peediddle outta me!! : )
I really liked this movie. I own the first two on DVD and despite what a lot of people think of Michael Bay's movies, I took this for what it was: a fun movie bringing an iconic childhood toy to life. I grew up watching the cartoons and was really excited when I heard there were going to be live action movies. Now I did enjoy this movie more than the second one, not that I hated Revenge of the Fallen. I loved the action sequences and the special effects. I admit I watch them more for the actual Transformers than the human actors. I didn't care for Patrick Dempsey's character. I don't watch Grey's Anatomy so I have no attachment to him as an actor and I really didn't like Rosie Huntington-Whitley. Sorry, but she shouldn't quit her day job. Acting just isn't her thing. Other than that, I loved the movie. I'm waiting until the collector's edition is released later this year. I have to have my special features.
I must admit I thought the third film in the franchise was a lot of fun, most notably with the integration of the 3D photography. Here though is the problem: it becomes very apparent that Paramount/Dreamworks is so eager to release this, that they throw this version out to the masses, minus the expected extensive supplemental material - the word is that the deluxe (and 3D) version is coming out in November/December AND given the (highway robbery)price $31.49, Paramount/Dreamworks thinks that Joe-consumer is an utter twit and will buy anything Transformers related at the drop of the hat - well, I ain't buying this version, I'll wait for the 3D version.Oh and according to Paramount's press release the MSRP is 29.99 not 44.99 - Amazon is RIPPING US OFF - big time!!!!
I've enjoyed all of these movies. Growing up with the Transformers I was very excited when the first one came out. This Blu-Ray looks great and the digital copy is great for when I travel.
I received the message that the U. S. government is hiding knowledge about what is beyond Earth's atmosphere. But all governments hide information from the masses of their people. What intrigued me was when the Sentinel Prime character said to the Optimus Prime character that they used to be gods and now they were called machines. I can relate to that statement. I am a descendant of a people that were performing high sciences at one point in time and now we are beasts of burden. Try to talk to a typical African person about science and see what you get. At best they'll say, how does this help me pay my bills? At worse they'll look at you like you have 2 heads.
This item worked as advertised and excellent customer service. I would do business again in the future with this vendor.
Transformers: Dark of the Moon is an excellent movie. The adaptation of the animated series into a cinematic format has been completed with great effect. The storyline is also imaginatively and creatively thought-out.
I am a HUGE fan of the Transformers movies, but I have to say that this is not the best of the series. As much as I am not a Megan Fox fan, they should have kept her. I also thought that the ending was a bit abrupt. Not really the way I would have ended the series. (to my knowledge, it was the last)
This is a great movie lots of action and intrege. Being the third movie in the series i was afraid it was gonna be a flop but it was a great movie after all.
this is a must-own bluray. looks killer and sounds incredible. definitely a great way to show off your system and the story resonates with our current economic and political problems when it feels like evil has already won.
Great Action Adventure with a really good plot and lots of great actors! It will keep you sitting on the edge of your seat!
Just wondering when they are coming out with the next movie hehe. Of the 3 in this trilogy, this is my son's favorite.
I cannot play this video on linux despite having a very fast computer with a very good nvidia graphics card. The video starts playing and then a retarded amazon notification pops up saying it can't play it because of my flash player and it is unfixable. Well if it started playing and then stopped due to a pop up that has to be DRM. Amazon you need to knock it off now.The movie is fine.
This item was suppose to contain a digital copy but it only has a Blu-ray and a DVD disk. The digital disk was not included, from the package and from your advertising it was suppose to be included. What happened?
Great movie but no special features on it. Once I opened that movie I noticed that there is a $10off coupon for the 3D version that is coming out with special features.
A great smash em up movie (as usual for transformers) with michael bay directing proceedings. Hope they make T4 to end it all, I'M CERTAIN that there are still some decepticons to smote somewhere on earth.
This was good series ender, still in line with the other two and lot's of action. New girl, cuter than Megan possibly.
The movie was all we expected, and the 3d was just that much better. definitly worth the money. I was very pleased with my purchase.
have all of them now..was a good movie..only part that sucked was them replacing sam's girlfriend w/someone else..other than that it's filled w/lots of action and all those Autobots..
I am so glad I got this Transformers Video for my younger brother he is going to love it and it is in brand new condition. Thank you for this great Christmas present at a great rate !
i love it cuz it was fast delivery and my son wanted this as a movie night to add with the other two he has and plus the movie was in good condition and i was ok with it not having a case cuz the case to me is collecting dust and when you have a disc you can add inthe dvd book sleeve
I thought it was a good movie. I grew up watchig transformers. Its nice to see it brought to the big screen.
Adventure Sci-Fi with great FX features, a fast moving story that's only flaw was that the beautiful young lady from the first two movies was absent.
watched this one and the previous one several times. Like this movie lots and so did the kids! thanks so much
I am a fan so not going to repeat all the good things already said or you already know but I will comment on the girlfriend. She is annoying. I believe she is British. The accent and those lips ABSOLUTELY DO NOT FIT this All American movie. She is useless and I did learn to ignore her. No chemistry between her and anything in the movie. It just does not fit. They should have found some American girl that is tough, rough, and All American.
Used an unknown carrier "Ensenda" - package was lost and then found. I could have purchased at Best Buy and got it quicker
Absolutely awesome as usual. One of the best actions series of all time!! You cannot ask for anymore than what Michael Bay and company provide here.
Just adore this movie and bought it with the included digital copy so I could transfer it to my X oom. Unfortunately digital transfer is not possible for android devices so be aware of this.
Seen the movie at the theatre and knew then it was going to be a must buy on blu ray when released. Amazon always delivers promptly and on the release date.
I bought this as a preorder from Amazon and you couldn't be the price for a 3 disc set! Movie is very good and if you like the other Transformers movies it's a must have.
If you are looking for a home photo-quality printer (not pro quality- but good enough form me), for a decent price. This is your printer.I can print 8X10's that come out with amazing results. I even use my scanner to print from the negatives and the photos print out better than my local store (I am not comparing to 1-hour development, I am comparing a local specialty store with an amazing reputation).Just make sure to use (and of course set the printer) to high quality photopaper, and you will see amazing results.I bought this printer a few years ago and have never had a problem with it. I don't know if the newer versions are better, but I can't say a bad word about this printer.
****These are your basic large safety pins and come in a package of 65. I always found myself buying assortments of safety pins and using up all of the large ones first, so these solve a problem for me. These safety pins are all the same size, called a "Size 3" as far as safety pin sizes go, but actually are two inches or 5.1 centimeters long. They are nickel-plated, not fancy, but do the job just fine. Save yourself a lot of time hunting these down in stores by buying them here on Amazon! They seem sharp enough for the uses I have for them; however, I don't think they would be good for any extra fine work, as they are just general-usage quality.Recommended.****
We are organizing our costume stock and large quantity safety pins are in big demand. Wish this came in a larger quantity, but they do serve the purpose.
i love this movie for the action and all the bad crimanals get what they deserve at the end.i recommend this movie 100/00 percent
OK. First off, I don't see this movie winning any prizes for story, script, plot, or anything like that.That being said, I think it was a good action flick. It was well-casted, the fight scenes were well-choreographed, and the explosions were lots of fun. Also, I think it was a good start for Cena. Get the man some acting lessons and let him try something that doesn't involve as much running around and beating the heck out of people.
I am surprised by how much I enjoyed this. Surprised, and a little disappointed in my own taste, but anyway...You know exactly what to expect from this movie. Explosions, Fighting...and that's it. Luckily, it delivers both of those in spades, especially the 'splosions. I have never seen so many things blow up. Every fifteen minutes John Cena barely escapes some building blowing up. And in slow motion, of course. The story is Kelly Carlson is kidnapped by Robert Patrick and John Cena must rescue her.Robert Patrick is plain fantastic in this flick. The filmmaker is smart as he gave the lion's share of the line to Mr. Patrick. He plays a great, sarcastic bad guy, plain and simple. John Cena can act in the sense that Arnold Schwarzenegger can act. Mr. Cena lets his actions do the speaking, thankfully. Plus, he's a hottie so...Overall, just an easy, cheesy, blow-em-up, action B-movie. The extras are pretty lame, though.
thanks for getting my movie here so quick. we really enjoy and its in great shape that is great thanks
Good action the previews show the good part of the movie. Good plot ending could have benn better.
I thought this movie was pretty cool for the most part. Robert Patrick's role also added to it's success and suspense. Lots of action and the storyline was well written. Maybe John Cena is the next big action star to Hollywood and to action movies in general. I think if he continues to make them like this, he will be. Thought it was better than 12 rounds as well.Peter J. Miller
YOU HAVE TO LIKE THE THE ACTION SCENES AND STUNTS. WILD.... ALITTLE FAR OFF IN NEVERLAND. AND IF YOU LIKE JOHN CENA THEN YOU HAVE TO SEE IT. BUT ALL IN ALL A PRETTY OK MOVIE.
This is one for the hard core action fans. There's very little 'down time' to run for popcorn. If someone isn't getting shot, punched, etc. things are getting blown up or sunk in water. There is an action scene I haven't seen yet with a police car. Several of the action scenes are worth a rewind and I did appreciate the 'buff bodies'. You have to give these guys an A plus for working out.Chrissy K. McVay - Author
I was skeptical of this movie featuring a WWE wrestler (WWE wrestlers are notoriously bad actors) and because the movie was produced by the WWE rather a than a major motion picture company. However I was wrong. The movie was full of action and special effects. John Cena did a respectable job acting. The theme and plot were very entertaining, not cheesey or bogus. If you like action movies such as "Arnold" movies or Rambo movies then you will very much enjoy this movie!
The score by Craig Armstrong is brilliant. If you're a Hans Zimmer fan or like Graeme Revell, Trevor Rabin, etc. Then you'll love this CD. Filled with vocal pieces which are tragic, but still keep in touch with today's times. Hymn, Ruby, Ball, Hanging & Disaster are tracks to look out for. Great Cd if you liked the Crow, Devil's Advocate, Crimson Tide & The Negotiator.
I was pleasantly surprised to find this book so readable- even by modern standards it is a good read, although the language in parts is somewhat old-fashioned, archaic even ..... but if you can deal with that, this is a good bet for anyone who would like a tale of England in the late 1600's... love, adventure, and even a little humor too!
I brought myself a emarker, which is just more than a glorified time stamp it sets up easly, works fine and is for me a usefull product, if you live in a big city like ny or la the site is updated every 10-15 minutes it seems that outside the big areas your SOL.. its a neat little gadget and good if you live in an area where its updated frequently.
This works like a dream to find out what song is playing on the radio. There are two problems I have, however. One is the hassle of hooking it up to your computer and waiting a day to find out what song it is. In cities with a large population, the songs get updated every 10 minutes. The other is the heavy flash use on the web site. This makes the process of finding out the song even longer. I do not have a high-speed connection, just a 56k modem. Even with these problems, the great function of this product makes it original and worth your money.
I'm really happy with this eMarker thing. I mark songs with it almost everyday on WPLJ and I download the songs from Napster. I do have to wait for about 3-10 minutes (sometimes less) to get the song name, but I'm usually in the car so it is not really a problem. It would be great if they covered NPR. It works on my Windows 2000 PC at work and my Windows ME PC at home. The technology behind it seems to be pretty simple. I think the keychain product just remembers the time. It works flawlessly for my station, which is what is important anyway. The site is a bit slow, but it is a really slick design that is very interactive. I wish it held more songs than ten.
This book is scary stuff! I read a story, "Me-Tie-Doughty-Walker" that scared the stuffing out of me! Now I'm in seventh grade, and the book still gives me chills when I'm reading it alone! The pictures are so trippy and disturbingly graphic!
If you like scary stories you will like this because it is scary. The book I am reading has dead people in it. Dead people come alive and kill people. Then they would eat that person.Some of the dead will just walk away. Then, the person who sees that dead person freaks and dies. The ghost of the dead person will just walk away. Finally when one the guys or girls run so fast they bump right into the ghost or the dead person and just kill that person who bumps into them.
Horrifying and haunting short stories illustrated with mentally disturbing sketches. I used to pull this book out at slumber parties and we'd all freak ourselves out. I still remember some of the short stories to this day.
SCARY STORIES TO TELL IN THE DARK has classic campfire stories, such as ''The Hook'', and ''Me-Tie Daughty Walker'' along with lesser known tales like ''Alligators'' and ''May I Carry Your Basket''? Some stories are funny, such as ''The Viper'' (I've come to vipe your vindows) and ''The Ghost With Bloody Fingers'' (cool it dude, get a band-aid) while others are genuinely spooky, like ''The Guests'' and ''Cold as Clay''. The book was clearly intended for reading out loud, many stories even have tips for the reader, such as when to raise and lower your voice. Stephen Gammell's pictures are mysterious and darkly beautiful. I highly recommend this book for those looking for a spooky read aloud.
Scary Stories to Tell in the Dark didn't really have much of a plot, since it is a collection of short stories. In one of the stories, The Girl who Stood on the Grave, the plot is a girl was given a dollar to prove that if you stand on a grave, then the person who's grave it was wouldn't grab you and pull you under. She was to stick a knife in the grave so her friends know she was there. She put the knife through the grave, and tried to get away, but she that she was being held back, and she died of fright. The setting is at a graveyard at night. The conflict is that the girl tried to prove the fact that if you stand on a grave at night, then the person under it will pull you in wrong. It wasn't resolved, but the girl died of fright because she thought she was being pulled under, when she had just put the knfe through her dress on accident.
This, along with the other two books in the series, is a classic. Alvin Schwartz's tales are so simple yet so deviously scary, and Gammell's dark, surreal illustrations greatly enhance them. Actually, some of the illustrations are midly disturbing...(what IS that thing coming up the stairs in "The Voice"?) Once you've read at least a couple of them, you'll start to realize just how scary the world is...(for instance, "The Girl who Stood on a Grave", "The Red Spot", and "No Thanks"). So give them a try...you won't be dissapointed!
YOU HAVE TO SEE HOW SCARY LOOKING THE PICTURES ARE IN ALL OF THE BOOKS!!!! THAT COULD DEFINETELY GIVE YOU NIGHTMARES FOR A WHILE.EVEN IN SOME STORIES. THERE WAS NOT A PICTURE OF THE WENDINGO, BUT THE BACK OF THE BOOK SAID IT WAS A FEMALE SPIRIT, AND/OR A CANNIBAL GIANT THAT KILLS FOR HUMAN FLESH AND ANTHROPOLOGISTS DESCRIBED INDIANS WANTING TO EAT FLESH AS A "WENDIGO PSYCHOSIS". {I'm sure that's how you spell that word}.
Okay, I had all three books when I was a kid. The original ones look like their worth some money so I'll be kicking myself in the back later. If these new ones stay true to the stories from the 90's editions, then you need to buy all three of them for your kids. The stories are pretty freaky for kids, but if I recall, most of them do state some lessons to be learned. Definitely buy all three.
that was my last favorite era in the R&B movement and talk about a musical gumbo? it had so much pressence and flavor. alot of important acts came along during this time period.great hybrids of styles,beats and grooves. so many incredible talents on this compilation.
Very much in the tradition of Edgar Rice Burroughs and H. Rider Haggard, Merritt was one of the early avatars of swords & sorcery fantasy novels. He emerged from the pulp magazines of the 50s to write novels which went on to influence a generation after him._Dwellers in the Mirage_ I found to be a very nice combination of all the things that make early fantasy readable. By turns sly and frightening and full of the high-hat adventure that characterizes speculative fiction of this period.Leif Langdon feels as though he never really belonged in the modern world and this feeling is confirmed when he disappears into a separate society hidden by a natural phenomenon. He feels strangely at home with this lost society and discovers the role that he was meant to play in life.Trainspotters may be interested in noting that Merritt went on sometime after this book to co-author a story with Lovecraft. After reading about the Khalk'ru I am certainly curious who was influencing whom.
This is truly wonderful gooseberry jam. It is packed with chunks of gooseberries. I highly recommend this product!! It truly met my expectations.
Just so everyone knows, Atea is NOT that stiff in real life! She must be camera-shy (a lot of us are). She is an excellent dancer, although she could use a bit of meat on her. Still, for basic moves and correct technique, it's a good starter video.
This video has advantages over the others I have bought in several ways-The photography is clear and moves close enough to the dancers (in the relevent area) to allow someone new like me to actually understand what they are doing.She explains clearly what she is doing. Pretty rare!The secondary dancers are different from segment to segment highlighting thier strengths and getting a better taste for different styles.There are dance sections showing how the moves just shown can be used in dance.Overall- Good! Wish I could find a teacher in Las Vegas.
But divisive statements like the one above (or is it below) about D-12 are not needed in hip-hop. If you can't say something nice....
This is one of the better books I've seen that gives a real feeling for Morocco, their lifestyle, culture, colours, ambience etc. There's a wonderful balance of writing and photographs (none of which are "touristy" style pics!). it's one of those pieces where you can read & finish, and come away with a real feeling for the place, and a real respect for it's historical contexts.My only downer is that the bookbinding technique is miles too lightweight for pages of this quality and weight, and on just the second opening the stem came unstuck and fell apart. Still, with some tender loving care this will stay on top of the coffee table for years to come.Worth grabbing if you have a romanticised love of north Africa and it's people.
If you want to know how Idaho is assembled geologically, this is for you. It is the most readable book on the topic and more complete than other tomes. I strongly recommend it for the amateur geologist.
ELECTRIC SYKCHURCH IS A WONDERFUL EXAMPLE OF TODAYS RAVE SCENE. WANDERING THROUGH YOUR BODY LIKE A FLOW OF POSITIVE ENERGY. ITS A GREAT GROUP TO LISTEN TO, WHEN THE SUN IS COMING UP, AT A DESERT PARTY. A PERFECT END TO A NIGHT OF DANCING.
This is the perfect cd to put in after a night of partying. Great to chill out to. Track 5 and 6 are just amazing.
This has to be the best group of performers I've ever enjoyed. I've seen them 4 times.. well 5 times.. once on the 55 freeway.. :P This is cd is very creative and will set you in the mood that will take your mind away from everyday life.. GET IT!!! -Darkpeace (Moontriber 4 life)
Ordered these for my husband, it's his 2nd pair. He wore the 1st pair into the ground over several years so pretty good value.
I bought these for my boys for Christmas and they love them so much they refuse to take them off. They told me these are the best pair of shoes/boots they have ever had.
I have bought about 20 pair of these boots over the past 6 or 7 years. I usually buy them 2 pair at a time and wear one for work and one for good.Even when you buy them at the buy one get one half price in stores the price on here is by far cheaper than anywhere else.They are comfortable, waterproof, last a long time and are light weight.
These boots are an excellent value. They are comfortable, provide great heel and ankle support, good grip, and keep your feed warm and dry in cold climates.Purchased a pair for a vacation in New Brunswick, Canada. These boots kept my feet dry and comfortable the whole time, even while snow shoeing and hiking across a snow covered beach front. Didn't slip once in them, though I encountered ice a few times.Very good purchase!
This boot is comfortable and gives me the ankle support I've needed for any type of hiking. I look forward to many years of use from these boots.
Comfotable fit on the loose side. I use a heavier sock and works just fine. Recommended and would buy again.
I first purchased a pair of Hi-Tech Altitude boots approximately 10 years ago. They fit me extremely well and were very comfortable from the first moment I wore them. Prior to this purchase, I have had 2 different pairs of the Hi-Tech Altitude boots and I have not been disappointed. They wear extremely well and seem to last me about 4 or 5 years. I have found them excellent for everyday wear as well as for use in fishing and hunting. I think these are excellent low cut boots for such a moderate price. Haven't ventured into buying the $100+ boots, but then why should I when these work so well, so can not comment or compare my $70 Hi-Techs to the more pricey boots. I think you will be pleased with these boots.
These are very nice boots. Love the styling and appearance. They do need to be broken in a little when you first get them.
Kudos to the Hi-Tec designers & manufacturers! My husband wears these daily for all types of situations. Easy to keep clean and looking nice. VERY durable. Almost no time to "break them in". Design has stayed constant. Run true to size. No need to change something that already works great. Will continue buying these in the future.
These boots feel and fit great. I am interested in how long they will hold up. They look pretty sturdy. I will put them to the test for sure.
Went to Yellowstone in these boots. They were comfortable, waterproof and did well on the 328 steps to get down to lower falls.
These boots have that classic hiking boot style to them. The NuBuck leather looks great and the boots are comfortable and seem well made. I'm not really a hiker. I just like to wear hiking boots in the winter and these are perfect so far. I wear them everyday and I like them so much, I was thinking of ordering another pair!
Hi-Tec Men's Altitude IV Hiking BootEste producto fue comprado y cacelado junto con una cartera para caballero NAUTICA Men's Trifold Wallent y numca fue enviado, este comentario lo he enviado muchas veses pero no me han solucionado nada, no voy a rrepatir mas este mensaje, pero no realizare mas compras por esta pajina debido a lo que esta sicediendo.
Exactly I'm using this ones from 16 months, ALL the sundays, and in some trips to the mountain and beach for a complete week, they are great in all the ways! I can't hope something better from a daily used and/or hicking shoes! Another thing to consider; I'm a "big and heavy boy":6 ft.2 in.and 225 lbs.
These arrived quickly fit great and are very comfortable. I bought these for general use during colder months to replace sneakers.
I've now had these boots for a month and they just continue to impress me. They were comfortable right out of the box so break in was very quick. I've worn them day hiking and have had no problems with hot spots.Even though they are waterproof I still recommend spraying them with silicone.5 Stars!
Comfortable boots that are indeed water proof and actually do breathe. They seem to work well for the winter wearing anything from cotton socks to solar socks depending on the outside temperatures. It should be noted that they do not have a slip resistance sole so they can be slippery on smooth wet surfaces. I haven't had a chance to use them in warmer weather to see fully how well they breathe. For the price they are a very good buy.
I'm on my 5th or 6th pair of these boots. I'm a meat cutter. I'm on my feet, in the cold for 8 hours a day. My feet are warm, dry, and comfortable. When I wear these out, I'll buy another pair. End of story.
I ordered these in fall when I was going for a backpacking trip and I could just forget about twisting an ankle or anything. Wear these, step on any kind of surface with confidence, lots of grip, good support for the ankle. Will highly recommend these for snow as well as adventure!!
I had initially purchased a pair of Asolo Moran GTX. Although they were great boots, wearing those around the house made me realize that the right boot pinched a bit too much for my liking. Those got returned and in desperation picked up a pair of these. For the price (roughly 1/3 of the Asolo) these are fantastic boots.Break-in was fairly quick with my biggest problem area being around the shin. A strategic fold of the smartwool socks intially took care of any discomfort for the test hikes around the neighborhood. I have had no issues with the boots since then. I have deliberately stepped into streams to test the "waterproofness" noting no problems. The traction seemed fine.Great boots and will most likely purchase them again.
Overall pretty good books. I just went on a 3 day Horn Hunting Hike in North East Wyoming and these boots held up good. The only downside was the boots need to be treated before plowing through snow drifts. My feet did get wet. Luckily I did have polypropelene liner socks with wool outer socks so my feet did not blister or get cold. Considering the extreme terrain and weather these boots served me well.
These boots are nice looking and well designed. I have an ankle injury which is well supported by these boots.
I used this book as a supplement to my statistics and QA courses. The book is pretty well written and points out some great examples of the misuse of statistics.
All of Paxton Quigleys self protection books are written for women but are in general excellent advice for both sexes. Men are usually stronger & larger than most women so a well trained female in the use of a firearm and the knowledge of when to use it in todays society is almost a necessity. I purchased these books as gifts for the women I care about, as a guide which points them in the correct direction.
This is not only a spectacular and stunning piece of film making, it is a powerful anti-war film. If you can watch this film today and not be haunted and disturbed by it, you are not paying attention. I watched it recently for the first time in over 20 years and came away shaken. I can't help but wonder if it is not on DVD because there are people who do not want this film to be widely available. As it is now, you have to dig for it. If more people watched this film they might be asking questions our "leaders" would rather have left unasked. If you have not seen this film, or it has been a number of years since you saw it last, I can recommend it. It is not an overt anti-war film with an explicit anti-war message, but after seeing it, you will not view world events with the same eyes you did before, I promise.
DAVID LEAN COULD HAVE DIRECTED ALMOST ANY FILM HE WANTED AT THIS TIME IN HIS CAREER, AND HE CHOSE THIS PROVOCATIVE AND EMOTIONAL STORY OF A LITTLE TOWN IN IRELAND. THIS MOVIE IS DIFFERENT THAN ANY OTHER OF HIS, INCLUDING THE EARLY ONES. THE CASTING IS SUPERB, COULD NOT BE BETTER RIGHT DOWN TO THE SMALL ROLES LIKE MAUREEN. I SAW IT WHEN I WAS 13 WITH MY PARENTS WHO WERE LEAN FANS. ITS HIS BEST FILM, TREATED BY SOME AS HIS WORST FILM. I EXPECTED TO SEE ALEC GUINESS IN IT, BUT THERE IS NO REAL ROLE FOR HIM. THE COMPLEXITY OF THE PEOPLES LIVES IN THE FILM IS AMAZING AND I THINK AHEAD OF ITS TIME FOR 1970 FILM VIEWERS.
We had used a decent quality camcorder before our son bought this one. This one has been a pleasant surprise. Although the picture quality might be more like 4 stars, the features that are provided at such a low cost make this a 5 star product. It has all the fundamentals for a beginner and it fits well in medium size and small size hands (unlike some that require two hands or very large hands or cost five times as much for a small form-factor). We had it out of the box in minutes and were recording first videos with it in less than 15 minutes. The price makes it affordable for school kids to have all kinds of fun projects with it.
I just purchased this camcorder used for only $80. It is a great camera for the price. It's easy to use and the picture is good in quality. I bought it as a gift for my son (age 7) and he can handle it well on his own.
This album is proof that Jason Robert Brown is a musician's musician, and that he has mastered many different forms of popular music. Each of these 11 songs could stand on their own as a brilliant song, and none of these have the same style or feel as another.Brown's pure talent shines through this album, and there are several moments that are just so beautiful that I just get chills listening to them. Every lyric and harmony has been precisely placed, and the music always fits the idea of the song very naturally. There are some amazing performance moments on this album; Brown is an incredible pianist and singer in addition to his composing and arranging talents.This is probably the album that I listen to more than any other, and I would recommend it to anyone. It is packed with amazing musicality.Don't listen to this while trying to get work done; these songs will steal your attention and keep it for the whole duration of the CD.
I am fortunate enough to have Lake Douglas as an instructor. He has forgotten more about landscape architecture than most people will ever know. I love going to his class because he has a genuine passion for the subject and almost limitless knowledge. Buy this book. You won't be disappointed.
What we have here is the crack "April In Paris" era Basie band with one Ella F track singing with Joe Williams on "Too Close To Comfort", a bunch of tracks with Joe taking the lead and a few great swinging instrumentals and a few alternative sides.The whole album works well, great sound,exciting music,especially if you like the croon of Joe Williams.The famous "Joe Williams sings CD" with Basie is considered the better,no arguing that fact, but this CD is a nice addition to your library.Great blowing on the 3 versions of One'O'clock Jump here make it all worthwhile.
My garage door was not working for 4 months.And did some research and bought this product.Right away the garage door started working great.
Great purchase. I was so frustrated and I couldn't figure out what was causing my garage door to reverse direction after just a few feet. This was an easy fix. Everything was packed well and shipped fast
This is a good,inexpensive printer.It is easy for me,stillvery gadget illiterate,to install and use.
This CD is really awesome...the style of their songs are not exactly trance, not euro dance/trance either...they have their own way of playin their songs...AWESOME CHOICE
This is a great CD from an extraordinary jazz saxophone player and probably the biggest name in Brazilian jazz today. We got a chance to see Leo Gandelman perform a lot of these songs at the Blue Note in June. Maracatu is a superb song...his son played it alongside him that night, it was one of the best experiences of live music I've ever heard. If you are into this type of jazz, this is a "must have" collection.
This new translation of the "fairy" story first presented by Charles Perrault (1628-1703) in his Tales of Mother Goose in 1697 was illustrated by Fred Marcellino and translated by Malcolm Arthur. It was a 1991 Caldecott Honor book (that is, a runner-up to the Medal winner) for best illustrations in a book for children. The youngest son of a recently deceased miller receives a cat as his inheritance. He feels that he will soon die of starvation (after he has eaten the cat) since he has no other possessions. But, the cat convinces him to get him boots. The cat proceeds to find a fortune and a position for his young master.
*** The strength of this book are the exquitely beautiful illustrations. Fred Marcellino, illustrator, is an artist extratorinare, for children's books. Another of his beloved children's books is "The Steadfast Tin Soldier," which has a wonderful story! I highly recommend "The Steadfast Tin Soldier," illustrated by Marcellino, with 5 stars!!!
Unfortunately this one won't be on cd anytime soon. A bargain at $2400 for the cassette. So rare its worth it. You won't find it anytime soon! If you make an offer you might be lucky and get it for less.
Just to be clear: the album is uniformly quiet and just consists of electric guitar without lots of special effects except long sustain. The genius of the record is that MazzaCane can bring out so much with minute details -- muffled string noises, minute pitch changes, perfect arhythmic timing of notes. Don't mistake apparent simplicity for emptiness, as another reviewer did. One of the most moving records I've heard, with a rare, sad, clear quality. I'd recommend this as a first album by this artist (he calls it his best too).
The introductory essay alone makes this book worthwhile -- the editor traces Lasch's evolution as a historian, and shows how his interest in plain writing evolved along with his political thinking. The examples in the text are both entertaining and informative, and the writing advice is excellent. A good resource people who care about how writing and thinking impact our society.
I guess it is a tribute that I am buying another one of these. I have had this unit for 7 years and it has been slowly dying for a few months. The weakness is the pushbuttons and slide switches that wear out. The real plus to this unit is the interface which is a lot easier and quicker than the almost entirely menu-driven units which take time to change. This one is quick for guests to figure out too. So the "hard" buttons are both a strength and weakness. Overall though, a nice thermostat which you may have to replace in a few years--unless the manufacturer has made any changes in it since I bought my original one.
All good. The only wish I have is that the batteries could be replaced without taking off the whole thing.
Easy to setup. Looks good, great price. Shopped around a bit and this value is second to none. I have only had it for a month or so and good so far.
Works well and easy to program. Has definitely decreased our heating bills. Price of product was also very good. Would buy again
In an age of the internet GUI store fronts, the typical on-line stores may forget the importance of quality in F2F interaction with the customer. In this regards, FAVGUTI exceeds all expectations on customer satisfaction!The product ordered opposed to product recieved was incorrect (...it happens), to final product quality / reliability was addressed daily till mutually satisfied. Need more on-line stores like FAVGUTI !!--Michael (in San Diego)
I didn't know where to even begin the divorce/custody process, but this book gave me the confidence to make the first appointment with the lawyer. It helped me not feel like such a "victim" and I felt much more knowledgeable and prepared. I didn't feel so much like I was at risk for being "led by the nose" by my lawyer, and it was indispensable in helping me stand up to the tactics of my husband. Everyone woman in a divorce situation should read this, especially those with children.
THIS IS THE REAL GOSPEL MUSICTHIS IS WERE IT ALL BEGIN, WHEN GOSPEL MUSICSOUNDED LIKE IT WAS IN CHURCH AND NOT THE CLUBTHIS IS THAT OLD TIME RELIGION ITS GOOD ENOUGHFOR ME
When I first heard of this group in Canada, just before their US release, I didn't know what to think. Here was a band of Anarchists, how good could they be? Apparently, very good. I was impressed when I heard the first track with their simple, memorable lyrics that could get a crowd on the floor dancing and singing, and I like Amnesia even more, with it's more otherworldly quality of being just left of center. Their musical style isn't stuck in just one genre, so they are more free to experiment with words and rhythms and to do more diverse things musically without all of us going crazy trying to keep up. All in all a very worthwhile endeavor, definitely a must get.
Granted, most of the songs on this album are decent, but not great. However, the four songs that ARE great (Tubthumping, etc.) are so incredible that they literally blow the rest of the songs away! It is worth paying twice the price just to hear one of these amazing four songs!
While Chumbawamba's recent musical efforts have left little or no impression on the music scene, their debut album "TUBTHUMPER" will remain "thumping" to the dance club beat of a different drum. For unexplainable reasons, I find myself coming back to this album time and time again. The music will not let you go. It's enjoyable, entertaining, and fun!"Tubthumping" is an unrellenting statement of defiance. "Amnesia"'s persistent guitar riff and catchy trumpets will NOT leave you suffering from "long term memory loss". "The Big Issue" contains some tatalizing chorale, and a catchy, lyrical tune. "Mary, Mary" is probably my favorite questioning the sanctity of Catholicism.Chambawamba may come and go, but let this be known. There was a band with a wierd name from England, whose music was fun to listen to, coherant, and made anarchy seem like fun!God Save "Tubthumper"!
Damn, their still selling this CD? Well, my friend gave it to me a couple years ago. I liked Tubthimping and all, although I wasn't crazy about it. Actually, it's not the only good song on the CD, Amnesia, Drip, The Big Issue, and Scapegoat are all awsome songs, as are most others. Some of the songs never really caught onto me, but most of it is good music. Anarchy rules!
Even though Chumbawamba's most popular single in America was Tubthumping, that is my least favorite song on this album. It's way too slow. The rest of the songs are really fast, and have a great beat. If you like music with a beat, you must get this CD! Hey, even better, many of Chumbawamba's songs actually have meaning, for those of you that have a brain. There are a total of 12 songs and about ten mini-songs on the CD
I have had this printer for approximately four years and have had absolutely NO problems with it. It is dependable and reliable. Very efficient. I would recommend it!
Printer was exactly as I expected, practically new condition and worked perfectly. It was shipped quickly and I am very satisfied. In fact, I just ordered another from Solar. I think it was the last refurbished one they had. Sorry.
I bought this printer two weeks ago and had it up and running within minutes of unpacking. When I first bought this PC I feared the two most commonly documented problems,paper jams and printer driver problems/OS problems, but to date I have not experienced either and the quality is as good as the laser printers I use in the office. The only thing I dislike about this printer is the high cost of replacement cartridges so I am hoping someone will deveolpe a refill kit similiar to the one I used with my old Canon BJC 250, which worked great...
I've had the HP940c for a year now with no problems. The printer installed via USB under Windows XP without a hitch. Photos and text are good quality. I have used multiple pages/page printing and manual duplexing without any hicups. No jams to date. Replacement of catridges is easy. Low cartrides are noted by a dialog box popping up and by lifting the lid to the catridges to see where the cartridges line up with the icons inside the printer. Replacement catridges are expensive, but this printer scored well vs other inkjets in cost/page on PC Magazine's review. I use a HP Laserjet 1200 for volume printing where color is not critical. Good bang for the buck. To get 5 stars, the printer would need to be faster, hold more paper and cost less for cartridge replacement. You just won't get that at this price range.
It is always a pleasant suprise when a new author appears on the fantasy scene with a book that should keep them there for a long time. Shadow in the Glass has a great blend of magic and adventure, which has nicely set up the series for the next three books.
I'm a quilt lover, and my favorite are old scrappy quilts. I do alot of quilting myself, but as a result of my love for quilts I also collect quilt books. One of my favorites is this little books from That Patchwork Place, Quilts from the Smithsonian by Mimi DietrichThe book has pictures and patterns of 12 great quilts from the Smithsonian collection, from a simple Plaid Patch to the more complexed Chesapeake Rose, and The Lilies of the Quilters. There are all colored pictures all through the book, and the there are easy to follow directions helping you to make your own quilts for future generations to love. Or if you are not a quilter the book si a perfect coffee table book with all it's colors and inspirations.Britt Arnhild Lindland
We have a colletion of Little Critter books that my 3 older ones have enjoyed since they were little. Now with my 2 younger ones I purchased a few new ones. They sure love them! They're simple books but they are a hit!
Personal accountability, integrity, character - whatever you label it, it's doing the right thing, even when no one else is watching. "Your Signature Life" is a personal-development home run!Through captivating imagery and intriguing statistics, Dianna Booher challenges us to examine our lives to see what kind of character we are developing. Do we reflect light or darkness? She shows us how our experiences and relationships may help to form the way we look at the world, but they do not have to define who we are or who we will become.Although we cannot control the actions of those around us, we are called to control our responses to those actions. Personal accountability is not a thing of the past. We can and must have it today if we ever hope to look back over our lives and smile. Others are watching. God is watching.Ms. Booher's latest release, "Your Signature Life," is a triumph for those seeking to live a life of integrity and total fulfillment.
The best example around of Asimov's work. It is intellectual, interesting, and just plain entertaining. reading it, you can feel the danger that the fledgeling Foundation is in when threatened by its aggeressive neighbors and there are unconventional solutions. I have only two complaints. The book is dated and there is little action. Get past those and you're sure to enjoy the book.
Parts of the book I really enjoyed. I appreciate the twists played by characters on one another. I felt that after reading through the entire bit, though, that not enough had actually taken place. I didn't feel I walked away with a story I could remember. I did read in one review that this was "serious science fiction," so with that in mind, I still give it five stars. I only would have liked that the pace be quicker.I really really enjoyedThe Hitch Hiker's Guide to the Galaxy. I would recommend that over this book Foundation, based on my personal taste.
This is certainly an excellent "first" book in the Asimov series. Even if one has not read, Prelude to Foundation, you can pick up right up and enjoy the series. Sets the stage for the next books in the series, but also makes one think, "What would happen if America lost its power sources?"
I started reading this series with the original "Foundation" and was very disappointed with it. After all the acclaim it received, I was expecting something truly exceptional. Instead, I got a historical narrative that is closer in style to something you would read in the Brittanica for a school assignment. It is really a kind of "mutant" between a novel and a documentary. What's more, it is exceptionally boring. What kept me going was the Asimov name on the cover and the hope of better things to come. This is not to say that it is a really bad book. I must confess that it has some interesting parts and of course, the series as a whole is an absolute classic. Every other novel in the Foundation series is so brilliant, that they cover for this disappointment. It must also be remembered that Asimov wrote this book in the early 50's when he was still a young and inexperienced writer
Foundation is great science fiction for the scientific minded, no deus ex machina here. The only fault I find with this 1st book is that the 3 main characters are exactly the same person. Seldon, Salvor Hardin and Hober Mallow are the exact same character. All calm, cool and collected. Perfectly confident and perfectly logical. No difference in dialogue and problem solving skills, you wouldn't be able to tell from Asimov's writing that these characters are from different time periods and are from different cultures. For that matter, every character in the book seems to be of the same culture and dialect. I realize Asimov uses a minimalist style of writing, like Hemmingway, there are good and bad sides to this. No fleshing out of characters has to be considered weakness in Asimov's writing. It may have made for a longer book, but his characters would have been better served if they all didn't behave as robots.
A trilogy consists of three books so, even although "Foundation" (one of the true classics) is good enough to be a trilogy by itself, formally "Foundation" needed two more volumes to make up a trilogy. In these two volumes the level does not fall off too badly, although "the Mule" is rather weak.Unfortunately Asimov, one of the truly greats of SF, later succumbed to undue pressure and combined his Robot-series (already in itself continued too long) with the Foundation, with outright embarrassing results. The original three books were quite enough, thank you!
The start of Asimov's highly influential groundbreaking future history series. The invention of the science of psychohistory captivated me the first time I read it. Basically, all those with an interest in SF should check this out.Asimov's intro gives some history of the evolution of this series with his editor, Campbell, as well as some entertaining silliness by the publisher Doubleday. He tells how they wouldn't publish him at one time, and later on they are at his door, cap in hand asking for a new book.Foundation : The Psychohistorians - Isaac AsimovFoundation : The Encyclopedists - Isaac AsimovFoundation : The Mayors - Isaac AsimovFoundation : The Traders - Isaac AsimovFoundation : The Merchant Princes - Isaac AsimovFuture prediction equations suggest Galactic Empire go bye-bye.4.5 out of 5Struggles with Seldon's legacy.3 out of 5City split and the odd ship.3.5 out of 5Commercial leading edge.3 out of 5Seldon crisis and sellers of heaps of stuff.3.5 out of 5
I found the politics of this novel interesting enough to disregard the dated scientific references. Seldon and his science was fascinating to behold, and the plot was masterful. What concerned me was (dare I say it?) the fairly amateurish use of dialogue tags and the fact that each character seemed pretty much to speak with the same voice. Asimov wrote this as one of those authors who are at pains not to repeat 'he said'. So it must be a new tag each time, no matter how ridiculous, often paired with an adverb that makes you cringe: ('spluttered angrily', 'cried sternly', 'mumbled grumpily', so on.) Sad this very basic trick of writing lets down passages of vivid description and intriguing plot.Also, some things seemed implausible to me, such as: how was the foundation, which exported its technology across the galaxy, able to keep its technology secret?Nonetheless, this is a series every sci-fi fan has to read - its attributes outweigh its faults by a fair margin.
Having just finished Greg Bear's brilliant "Foundation & Chaos", I've decided I can no longer wait to begin re-reading the original again. I wish I could take the next few months to start off with the Robot series, move on to the Galactic Empire series, and then finsh with the entire collection of the Foundation books (because it's all one big wunnerful story, doncha' know!). Well, not this year, perhaps, but in a few I may do just that. In the meantime, I will re-read "Foundation" with yet another new perspective of Hari Seldon and all that came before this original masterpiece... it truly never gets old.
The set arrived on time and enjoyed listening to the tapes, the tapes arrived in good condition and great sound.
Great book by Isaac Asimov. What a wonderful sci fi book. I'd recommend this series for anyone that likes fiction
Not earth shaking or intensely mind bending but even after 30 years I enjoyed rereading the series. Asimov's storytelling is great!
Asimov was one of the founding fathers of Sci-fi and to him we owe a debt of gratitude for making the genre worthy of the literary title. His messages and considerations give the reader a lot more than just something to kill time. It makes sci-fi an avenue to real soul searching.
Any coment's on this serie of books must be a positive one and if it's not then thats becouse you dident understand the story, so you should reread them all again, i stronly recommend this serie of books to anyone, not just sci fans, but to all that have the taste to read. The author of this serie wrote 470 books, he was a genius and died out of his time with the age of 72, in memory of ISAAC ASIMOV i recommend all of his books, but especially the foundation series,thaks for reading my review.
I highly recommend the time to read "Foundation"...it just may convince you to continue on with the rest of the series. I believe it was the forerunner and main idea behind the concept of a galactic empire as has been expanded on by Star Wars and Star Trek. If you would like to see the genesis of the idea behind those phenomena then you'll very much be rewarded by reading the Foundation series...besides, anything by Asimov is worth its weight in gold and this is the zenith of his space operatic writings!
The book doesn't really need yet another enthusiastic review, so I'll keep this to the point.The stories in this book are really enjoyable. You get to learn about characters in the beginning and then spend the rest of the time reading about the legacy they created and the later events that they had a hand in shaping. I find this satisfying in a way similar to the Dune series but I didn't have to read 6 books.As with every Asimov book I've read, the plots in this book are forged and hewn into complicated machines that are disassembled before your eyes at just the right climactic moment. It makes for a hard book to put down.
I enjoyed the Foundation. The book is divided into 5 parts. The most interesting of the 5 is the 3rd one. The end is not what i expected. The 5 parts overall are not particularly conected in my opinion. But the book was good.
The foundation is setup to secretly monitor mankind through its darkest hours. It reminded me a little of Orwell's 1984. In placing humans away from the central government on a planet with few resources. They are forced to develop quickly. This is a novel more about political machinations than about action. The contradictions in human nature are here to analyze. The characters use guile, spirit, & cunning to survive. Some 80% of the book is dialogue & the character development is a bit shallow. Nonetheless, Mr. Asimov portrays the future in poignant & diverse ways. The predicted conflict makes the story of galactic history entertaining, especially since this was written in 1951. Some 7 years before Sputnik was launched. The author deserves praise for his imagination that was well ahead of his time.
I admit it, I am an Asimov-phile. This is yet another book by Asimov that is very hard to put down. I rate this, and all of Asimovs books with the highest regard. Quite simply buy it now, or you are a fool. ;-)
This book is a highly cereberal study of history. I you want a lot of action look somewhere else. (I suggest David Drake or S.M. Sterling) If you want something to ponder this is the book. Asimov's ideas have been borrowed by other works so some of it will not seem new. The science is somewhat dated (nucleur light bulbs and economical transmutation). This book does give an excellent veiw of the forces of history. If you want to understand what causes nations to fall read this book. Just don't expect Star Wars style entertaiment.
I always liked Asimov, but finding series books in sequence is difficult with print books. Kindle makes it easy! Now they're all cataloged in order and I don't even have to get out of bed for the next one.Reading the "Foundation" series in order rather than by availability makes a great writer even better.
I have read almost all of Asimov's fiction, and this book is by far one of the best. I would recommend it to anyone interested!Boom, Done.-Jeremy Paul Gallagher
This book it simply one of the best science fiction stories ever written. It should be on the "must read" list for any sci-fi fan.
What can I say??? Asimov at his best. It's impossible to stop reading this book. The chapters are so incredible, that you can't wait to get to the finish to know how the plot ends. If you haven't read it, you don't know what you are missing
Foundation has been called by science-fiction lovers all over the world as a cornerstone for science fiction. Isaac Asimov's all time best, this book tells the tale of the crumbling of the Galactic Empire and is only the beggining of a 7-book series. The way Asimov uses the analogy of the Fall of the Roman Empire has pleased readers for decades. Asimov tells the story of a planet alone at the edge of the galaxy awaiting a future already planned for it. Leaders struggle for the planets survival, for this planet, Terminus, holds the future of the Human Race in its hands. Isaac Asimov tells the thrilling tale of human survival in an environment that is against it.
If this series seems a little dated and naive now, try to cut yourself back to when it was read! I appreciated the imaginative leaps, as well as the way the whole series observes the discipline of the genre -- make one fundamental alteration to science as we know it, and then see where the thread leads you.
I remember walking to the library as a thirteen year old with my back pack, smile on my face between each of the foundation books. Now, I have read them over again (a few times) and the only difference is that I now own them so no more walks to the library.
It was a very interesting concept, a bit heavy on a scientific version of "fate". This series of books uses the concept of random motion as a prediction for the future was quite a brilliant idea. The story deals with a genius who predicts behavior for millenia into the future and actually has recorded holograms for future people that deal with his predictions. Where I had trouble was the reliance on robots in the later books. I personally prefer the human side of things. It was an interesting read and well worth it.
In a twisted (mis)reading of the Foundation series, the Japanese terrorist cult Aum Shinrikyo used Asimov's epic as a prophecy of upcoming apocalypse and converted dimsighted guru-dictator Shoko Ashara into an incarnation of Hari Seldon. Worthwhile to sharpen your wits as you read the story to see how the zealots got it wrong -- but also how they could easily pervert Asimov's points. (See David Kaplan and Andrew Marshall's book, "The Cult at the End of the World.")
I always enjoy reading Isaac Asimov's writing, and foundation was no exception. The plot is imaginative and original, like much of Asimov's writing. Foundation is set in the future, a time when our galaxy is ruled by a failing empire. Hari seldon, a psychologist, must prevent the galaxy from falling into anarchy and barbarism by creating a foundation of scientists. Foundation is fun to read, and provides ample entertainment. I recommend reading it.
Sandy Dennis plays Frances Austin an ultra vulnerable boderline psychotic woman who wants to make a big change in her life.As fate would have it she trys to possess a young man she sees in the park with a bizzare and devastating outcome. Directed with a sure hand by Robert Altman .A Most unusual film.
This is really an incredible book! Steven Selengut has incorporated very creative insight with some highly original thinking to produce one of the best "investing manuals" ever written! I wholeheartedly endorse this book!
Steve Selengut really knows his stuff. Follow his system andwatch your net worth GROW for a change!
I heard a short segment on Stu Epperson's radio show as he discussed investments with Steven Selengut. I heard enough to prompt me to search for his book on the internet. As a securities rep. myself, Steve appears to be "right on the money". I didn't want to put the book down until I was through. Steve's trading strategy is refreshing information that should make a lot of people a lot of money with less risk. I have even contacted him with a couple of questions and was pleased with his prompt and courteous response. Thank you Steve for sharing your success with everyone. In your next book, please remember that all "advisors" are not "sharks", some of us do put our clients first.
Message to the first reviewer - this compilation album comes from Australia. Being in the southern hemisphere, Autumn begins in March. And like the 2nd reviewer said, international songs are released at a later date here.
We are using the activities from this book at our 4-H Club meetings. The age range is from 9 - 18 and I have had not problems finding activites that work for everyone.
I'm going back for a second degree after 21 years. This book is very easy to understand and will make my class a lot easier and enjoyable. Great seller, quick shipping. I would highly recommend.
A nice overview that skims the surface pretty well. The only major downside to it is that it really targets people who are going into the medical field. It seems to ignore any other applications of microbiology other than in health (e.g. environmental applications).
If every parent had just one book on their nightshelf this should be the one. It's packed with simple, usable ideas I can use instantly to help my kids become decent human beings. The tips for helping kids stand up to bullies and learn to fight fair are worth the cost of the book alone. If more parents would read this book we really could minimize violence and raise peaceful kids. We should read this book together!
At a time when confusion seems to reign, Michele Borba's book is a ressuring tool that helps to keep our family grounded. I refer to it often and my husband and I use it as a conversation builder with our four children. This book was recommended to me by a fellow physician, and I have chosen to give copies of this book as gifts. Whether a new parent or a seasoned one, this book should be in every family's home.
Not much of a challenge to read. Enjoyed it just the same. It was a change from the modern world and therefore, I recommend it.
Because most people it seems were willing to sit for two hours watching Nicholas Cage play a drug-addicted detective - hoping somehow he will reform or find a solution or that some twist of fate will bring a conclusion to his hopeless life!And the script is also excellent - you are denied the pleasure of justice, being forced to watch him find pleasure in what is totally destructive. The script constantly draws you into taking a moral position on the subject matter - by either accepting the person's behavior / actions ... accepting / rejecting the movie altogether. I would recommend that children watch this movie with adult supervision - Nicholas Cage in this movie is not a role model to follow.
Imagine Dirty Harry with a bad coke habit, played by Nicolas Cage in New Orleans. Cage gives us an outstanding performance as someone who goes though those violent coke induced mood swings. The iguana which appears in the movie from time to time is symbolic of the metaphor "monkey on the back." Cage is investigating a brutal family execution and interweaves his personal failings into the process. His girlfriend is a prostitute who he protects and supplies drugs. He has a gambling habit, and owes money (bets too much on LSU) and of course steals from the evidence locker. He also shakes down people for information, even grandmothers. Makes Dirty Harry look like a sissy. Lots of drug use, bad language, sexual situations, and some violence. Good story. Plot fairly simple to follow. The movie, at time, has the feel of a dark comedy.
Arguably one of Werner Herzog's best films. Cage packs a punch with some intense acting. Of course it's edgy and not for everyone as well as pushes the limits of traditional film-making. Get tranced by extra-long shots of wildlife as the music trips you into a 'though-you-were on drugs' daze. Quirky humor, crazed rants and a man breaking all the rules in a wreckless but focused and effective way. I'm not one to watch movies more than once, but have seen this one at least three times.
He is such a good actor that he can take this "plot" and make a good movie out of it.
I enjoyed this. Get to see N Cage in a role where he can wallow in his manic phase shtick...a wonderful diversion from typical film normalacy. He starts off living in a nightmare, and somehow dives deeper and deeper into an overwhelming whirlpool of desperation and threat. It all takes place in New Orleans, a city where dissipation is a career. During the lowest part of Cage's crash dive, Herzog includes some bizarre shots of alligators and iguanas. Disconcerting, but an interesting visual evocative of his mindset at the moment. This film is a mesmerizing ride to hell, with Cage as the perfect conductor. There is a light at the end of all this, preventing this film from existing only as a compleat downer.
This book shocked me, educated me and was truly a page turner.I purchased this book as I am doing some research into the period and it didn't disappoint. The book focuses on the darker side of life which is present in every society in some form.If you are looking to understand our history and human nature you will discover that soccer hooliganism is nothing new.
These stand up better than other types of elastic shoelaces. Once set, the lock does not slip and the shoes fit the same way always.
If you want to laugh and laugh hard this is the DVD to purchase, also this DVD will bring back memories of the late 70s when Tv comedy was at it's best.i give this DVD a 2+ thumbs up. Looking 2 purchase season 2 soon!!..
Three's a Company is another great Sitcom Starring John Ritter and his Zany castWhere john Ritter has Followed Dick van Dyke's Foot step's in tripping over thingsGreat Show with alot of Laughter for the whole family..
Loved Three's Company when I used to watch it on TV Land so I had to get the first season. Would love to eventually get all the seasons of it. It is a great comedy show not like the so called comedy today that I personally think should be called sick or dark comedy.
It's great to finally have this sitcom on DVD even if it's the first season only. The only bad thing about it is that it has as a bonus the teaser of letting you know that season 2 is coming next spring 2004 and at first I thought as a bonus surprise it actually included the 2nd season!I think this should've been released on a more complete package but oh well....nothing's perfect.
Another funny sitcom of the 70's it's still unbelievable that John Ritter a great and funny actor is gone, order the entire series it will crack you up.
we LOVE the classic tv series. this was one of the best. can't wait to buy the rest of the seasons.
I love Three's Company, always have, always will! The first season is one of my favorite seasons and I love all the episodes but especially the episodes where Chrissie and Janet first meet Jack and the episode where Chrissie's conservative mother comes for a visit and she worries that her mother will be upset that one of her roommates is a man and that her mother will get the wrong idea about the living conditions. This season may be short with only having 6 episodes but it's still worth buying because the episodes are funny and Amazon is offering it at a great low price!
I am a big fan of the classic "Three's Company" series. Therefore, I would be hard pressed to say anything negative about the show. However, this DVD is a teaser to die-hard fans by getting you started on an affordable collection, yet limiting your viewing experience. With only six (6) episodes, you find yourself quickly disappointed with the amount of content. Apparently the next DVD (Season 2), due out in May, 2004, is more realistic in the amount of content and what a fan can more likely expect to pay for a full season's worth of episodes. Thumbs up to the actual content; thumbs down on the amount of content.
I'm glad Three's Company was put on DVD. It was a good show back in its days and it is still a good show. I can't wait to buy the Second Season when it comes out in the spring of 2004. If you have never seen any of the shows, I suggest you start watching and own this DVD. You won't stop laughing.
I love this show!!! Ritter was a comedic genius as far as I am concerned. Everyone of the episodes on this disc is a real hoot for anyone that grew up watching reruns of the show. Give it a whirl and you won't be sorry. R.I.P John Ritter...We'll miss you.
I'm so glad this show is finally coming out on dvd. I've been waiting for it ever since MASH came out on dvd. Mash and Three's Company have always been my all time favorite shows and i'm only 20 years old. You can't get much better in John Ritter's physical comedy in Three's Company. He's probably the greatest actor/comedian to ever walk the face of this earth. And to hear of his passing tore a whole in my heart. I never got to meet the guy, but his tv performances helped me to generate a many a laught and I can't wait till i can get my hands on this dvd. It's a safe bet i'm gonna wear this dvd set out quickly as i did MASH. RIP Mr. John Ritter, but your awesome legacy will live on in my dvd player for years to come.
I've watched all the episodes a dozen times and I never get tired of watching these three. This show is definitely the best. I forget my worries and relieves me of the stress that everyone go through in their daily lives.
The first season of Three's Company. One of the funniest sitcoms around. The story of two girls, who need a roommate. After throwing a party (in the first episode) Janet and Chrissy find a man sleeping in their bathtub. . .eventually, they become roommates.A lot of storylines on the show revolved around misconceptions, and misunderstandings. The on-going joke that the landlord thinks that Jack is gay. In the first three seasons, the landlords are an older couple named The Ropers. And their on-going joke about him not wanting to sleep with her. Kind of like Al Bundy, on Married...with Children.Guaranteed many laughs. Rest in peace John Ritter.
What a shame this book is no longer in print! I adore this book to its core. What a beautiful story.The text on the back said it was a hilarious comedy about god and the devil returning to earth to see what happened to creation, but as a matter of fact it is so much more. It is about society, it is about humanity, it is about downfall. And yes, it is extremely witty.I am so glad I found it at the shelves of my favorite second hand book shopping place. I do hope it will get back into print, so more people can enjoy this awesome tale.
Here you have a perfect example of soundtrack. The music perfectly accompanies images and it intensifies them and it gives depth them. Aid to raise climax in horror scenes and aid to relax in dialogue scenes. The style is very powerful, very advisable for the postapocaliptic look of the movie. In spite of it, globally it is not as close as the soundtracks of the dawn of dead and the day of the dead.
Wow, was my first word when I opened it up. It is so small. I have not had a chance to explore all its functions yet, but so far it works great and gives high quality video. The picture function is also a great plus. This camcorder is well priced for what it offers
one thing to watch out for,when using the zoom button,dont just let it go after you zoom,or it will click and the noise will be recorded. however,if you edit and can dub different audio then it wont matter. that said, we love the camera.ive been thinking about an off board mic for sterio audio,,just for fun. but since this camera is kinda old now,finding extra parts is kinda tough. when we bought it,they were just comming out and then everything was available,but now,several years later,,, well they arent. ebay or maybe canon outlet in the usa.in fact i just bid on a remote for it,we lost the other one. man,they come in handy.id probly also want a clear over lense to protect the main lense from grit and crud. cheaper to get a new cover than new lense.
I have read a lot of reviews and concluded that I'll give this camcroder a try. I was not really afraid of the motor whining but on the low-light performance much really. Anyway after I bought I did a couple of trial shootage in various lighting conditions and I was satisfied. After it got dark i did a trial under low-light in-house and it was satisfying to me. Because the shutter speed slows you do not have the luxury of moving the camcorder fast but this is a fact of optics not a camcorder flaw or anything. Motor whining is a problem but not a big deal really. If it is buy a mic. With the size of the cam, price i don't think this would be major problem. This is my humble opinion.
It is a catechism ... what more to say? It does the job, presents the facts and gives a lot of information in concise form that can be used for further study. What it is not is a prayer book, philosophical discussion or flowery inspirational work. It is a catechism.
A simplistic way to garner a better understanding of the Buddhist way of life and for the beginner to grasp the journey that lays ahead of them.
from start to finish it left you with knowledge and a possible desire to get in deeper. i read the entire book in only two sessions.
I bought this book on a whim because I had just found my interest in photography, and I was done reading it two days later! Garrett makes all the concepts of photography understandable to those without any prior knowledge! I even found myself going through the book again and jotting down notes about film speeds and filters for easy reference later! I cannot wait to try out the things I have learned from this wonderful book! I only wish I had more to read! I recommed this for anyone who thinks he would not be able to understand the concepts of photography and the camera. This book is not written on a technical level so make this the first photography book you buy!
The book arrived in a little more time than I expected, but it was within the time frame indicated. However, I am happy with the book's condition. It's better that described. Great book and price.
I just took a photography course and this book was one of the ones recommended. It is a little shallow, but covers all the basics and all the items covered in the class. It covers all the various topis from portrait to building photog as well as types of cameras, etc. If you want a basic book, this is the one to get. However, if you are looking for a lot of depth, keep looking. Then again, it is "Keep it Simple" so it delivers just what it says.
Larry with great "4" piece horn section.Much, much different than the Larry Carlton/Steve lukather DVD, which is great.Who doesn't love a good horn section: Mark Douthit/T sax; Doug Moffet/Baritone; Mike Haynes/trumpet; Barry Green TromboneKeyboardist/Rick Jackson/phenomenal(same as Carlton/Lukather DVD), Moyes Lucas/drums/exceptional and none other than Travis Carlton/Bass/tight.Songs:Friday Night ShuffleNight SweatsJosieSapphire BluesMinute by MinuteJust an excuse7 for yaTenor MadnessSlightly DirtyDeep into itRoom 335sleepwalkextrasThis is great, but do NOT miss the new Larry and Tak DVD. That thing is just way too much. Phenomenal.No, I am not a Larry Carlton freak/affectionado/wierdo. I just love great concert DVDs.
Excellent resource. Covers all the issues revolving around membership programs. Lots of specifics, examples and ideas;for membership staff, boards, and executives. Fills a major need for specific ways to carryout and improve membership programs. Great to have input from experts on a subject that so many non-profits grabble with everyday. Covers such essential membership topics as planning, membership and fund-raising, getting and keeping members, volunteers, the internet. Also helpful examples:of worksheets, budgets, and helpful case studies, plus software information.Truly "an action plan for results." Recommended highly.
This is really good stuff. Strong uplifting beats with some serious funk thrown in, sketches of twisting melodies, beautiful airy vocal overtones. It's a lasting favorite that still hits all my get-up-and-groove reflexes.
Anyone who thinks that becoming addicted to Valium can't happen to them should read this book. Brutally honest it follows Barbara Gordon, a successful award winning documentary film maker, through her addiction to Valium and her painful struggle to get off. This is a great read. I won this from Goodreads.
I read this book many years ago. I was touched by her story. I can not speak for the Kindle formatting on this. Only to the books content. Excellent.
Interesting read. Mental illness is a common illness that often goes ignored until families are destroyed, job lost, etc. This was a true story of how someone has reached their goal in life and struggled with mental illness. Excellent writing.
this was a very good story and held my attention. I was a little disappointed by the ending, I wish it would have given a little more follow up on her life.
With dialogue like that, how can you NOT take to this movie. Crisp, cool dialogue, a minimal plot, 100% action and performances from Halsey and Lambert taking the honours. The violence is bloodless, though brutal (perhaps budgetary restraints prevented Mr Pyun from spending on blood squibs...reminded me of Miami Vice...gunplay, but no blood). I'd love to see this one re-made with John woo directing. Bloodless violence aside (which takes the edge off the movie) the only thing that lets the DVD down is that the congenital cretins at Tri-Mark have seen fit in their infinite wisdom to present it as a Full Frame picture rather than the 2.35:1 aspect ratio it should have been. The picture quality of the disc suffers abominably when zoomed to full frame, and the action becomes confusing, the cropping at the sides being blatantly obvuious. Come on TriMark, let's have a Widescreen re-release of this one. One of Pyun's better efforts, on a par with Nemesis.
the main reason why i waited up until 2 in the morning cause i am a fan of chris lambert i saw it id say it was excellent of the action and the acting done by chris lambert and ice t.Great action AND I WAS DISSAPIONTED when christopher lambert was told by marcus that he killed his daughter when he didnt and so they killed each other and that ugly old woman who can t even act probably old enough to look like shes 50 mabye she is.So it was very entaining worth a watch.
Don't know if anyone else has addresed this. I have been building my barn shop for 7 years now. The book covers many of my thoughts and concerns. Would have wanted this sooner than later. Points raised for consideration. Noise and sound. I put in some wood walls, painted white and sealed against moisture, but I fussed with that or drywall. I considered my own sound issues and went with wood. But after reading some of the author's comments I will be spending extra time for fire protection and sound absorption when I do other parts of the shop. Not for me alone, but for my nieghbors as well. Good book to read before, during or contemplating a shop. Hey, we get to find out about how the masters of wood roughed it as well.
As a library administrator, and avid woodworker, I get to see and read a lot of woodworking and shop building books. This is among the best I have ever read. I even purchased a copy of this one for myself. I was really impressed with all of the common-sense advice for day-to-day problems encountered in any workshop. Many of the other workshop books on the market are either too simplistic, or serve only to showcase famous woodworking shops without detail. This book gives all the nitty-gritty that you will need to set up or rework your dream shop. It definitely helped me.
We had a great time watching this virtual tour of Chile and it's wine regions. The DVD is narrated in English, gives you good tips and interesting information of the history and how the wine industry has develop in Chile.
It took a while to get into this cd. Though I often admire Bill Laswell, sessions that he produces are often terribly uneven (except Sharrock's Ask the Ages where he basically lets the music do the talking). The title track starts with an "ambient" percussion section that makes you want to say "laswell is a genius." This is followed by an "afro-pop" song/rap that makes you want to say "why does Laswell have to mess with everything." The problem today is, everybody thinks you have to fill up a whole CD with music. Try programing this disc without the "smooth jazz" Midnight in berkely and the title track and I believe you will find this could have been Pharoah's best album and it still clocks in at about 50 minutes.
There is no way anyone can truly say that they study or train ninjutsu without reading Stephen Hayes' material. He is probably the only reason that ninjutsu is accessable to the masses. His work and dedication to the art without being a fringe kook or a wacko give him the highest level of credibility. This is good stuff. His master, Masaaki Hatsumi is still alive and in Japan. There are no secrets--just verifiable truth waiting to be discovered. If you want your knowledge of ninjutsu/ninjitsu/ninpo etc. to be complete, you will buy his books.
This is the ultimate action movie and still after more than 20 years I really enjoy watching the film again. Max has to fight crazy motorbikers with his supercharger V8 car in the futuristic landscape. He give no mercy to the bad boys after they have killed of his family.
I first saw this movie in the theatre in 1980 or 81. I have purchased the VHS version and the DVD version as soon as they came out. Since then I have been searching for the Australian soundtrack version but to no avail. When I read on a Mad Max website that the Australian version was available, I bought it immediately. Man was I blown away. This was one of my favorite movies. Now it is my favorite! How they could have released this movie with the overdub is insane. It's like watching a brand new movie. Definitely worth the price of admission. Oh and there is no comparison between this movie and it's sequels. Road Warrior was okay but Thunderdome was a joke.Turkey.
I LIKE TURTLES. And Mad Max. Excellent movie. I like very much. I love him. And the bad guy was good in Farscape.
"Mad Max" was made on a low budget ($50K to $100K according to various sources); the dubbing and some of the editing do make the film seem cheap at times, but the photography and music are of big-budget quality. The chases provide lots of thrills (wait'll you see that trailer burst!). Director George Miller provides some brilliant imagery (Max's feverish search for the last of the bikers is a most unforgettable set-piece).
A catalyst in the Contemporary Era revenge-actioner movement, this George Miller flick features a young, then-unknown Mel Gibson in only his second movie role, as top-cop Max Rockatansky. After a pursuit of Max's ends in a fiery crash, killing the pursued (a biker named Nightrider), he is targeted by motor-terrorists for the death of their fellow gang member. When Max goes on a vacation trip with his wife and their infant son, they are attacked by the malicious, vengeful mob, leaving Max a childless widower hungry for his own violent revenge--and that's exactly what he gets. Set in post-apocalyptic Australia, this film, made for a meager $400,000, held the highest cost-profit ratio of any film in Hollywood history until 1999, when Blair Witch surpassed its mark.
This film set the standard for Post apocalyptic violence... Almost along the line of Kubric's Clockwork Orange. The movie is unforgettable and launched Mel Gibson into the lime light. With a low budget they managed to come up with a very unique movie that was captivating and horrific. Many tried to cash in on copying this movie, but failed to capture its orignal spirit... The Road Warrior was a decent sequel with a much higher budget... It would recieve 5 stars, but the middle section of the movie is a bit sappy... and dubbing over the Australian accents was a mistake.
After watching Mad Max I didn't really know what to say,I mean the acting was pretty bad,but the action was great,there wasn't really that much of a plot but it had good characters who tried to describe the plot.It was cool to see Mel Gibson in his first staring role.This movie's fun.
MAD MAX the special edition is a must have for 1 reason:THE ORIGINAL AUSTRALIAN LANGUAGE SOUNDTRACK. They should have released the movie with the original language NOT the English dubbed.
In the near furture, the high ways of tomorrow are no longer a safe place. Gangs of bikers and kamikaze lunatics roam the long stretches of road that populate the stretch of land known as the Austrailian outback. Mel Gibson soars as the tough futuristic cop Mad Max in this extreme action thriller that started it all. Amazing non-computerized stunts make this movie a treat to watch over and over again. After his wife is brutally murdered by an evil group of bikers, Max sets out on a crazed revenge, earning his heading "Mad". Grinding action sequences and Gibson's cool headed attitude make Han Solo look like second hand trash. Just like what Star Wars did for sci-fi, this movie revolutionized action movies for all time, setting the standard of today.
The Australian dialog was dubbed because it was believed by the director that the Aussie dialog wouldn't be understood by American audiences. This is by far the best of the trilolgy. The leader of the motorcycle gang is absolutely frightening. I think the dubbing and the orchestrated soundtrack actually ADDS to the 'alien' feel of the movie. We are watching cultural shock where ANYTHING goes, and it keeps you on edge throughout the movie. FOUR stars ONLY because it doesn't include the original Australian dialog. The sequels are wannabes and don't deserve a SINGLE star.
This film will give those who never thought much of Australian films either more fuel for the fire or a wake up call .This is a classic and I suppose there are some who would call it a cult film , but it is full of intense performances and whilst not science fiction , it does have an otherwordly quality to it .Forget Mel Gibson is in it - watch this film for its own brand of drama , revenge , thrills , action and good old fashioned mean-heartedness .If you think about it , the plot for this film was recycled for 'Gladiator' , which was another breakthrough film for an actor from the Aussie part of the world .Buy and enjoy this distinctive film on DVD , with a healthy and worthwhile dose of extras .
If you did not know it starred a very young Mel Gibson, you would have never believed that it was really him. This movie was a really good revenge movie. The only problem I had with it was trying to make out what was being said. It is done in "Australian language" and, though it is basically English, the accents of most except for Mel Gibson's character are so strong that you really have to over-listen to try and figure out what is being said. Other than that, the movie was a good movie and the crash scenes were fantastic for the era in which it was made. I only wish I could have understood what everyone was saying without straining in order to get even half of the dialogue. But, it is a movie well worth viewing.
Anyone intelligent enough to "get" this movie is capable of understanding the Austrailian version. We have moved beyond the need for Americanizing films, which tend to water-down the original intent and flavor of the director/creators vision. This movie, for me, is more relevent today than it was when it was filmed. In this part of America, especially in small town rural areas, you can almost get the feeling that we are living in this future. Many people in the midwest scrounge and save their meager earnings to be able to afford to fill their gas tanks just so they can drive to their jobsite. The desolation of the area in which the movie was filmed makes this movie eerily believable and I often am reminded of the look and feel of the film when driving through some small midwest American "ghost-towns". In spite of the realism this motion picture is still high escapism, which for me is the point of watching movies. I'll watch this one over and over.
I saw this movie when i was a kid and loved it. I still like it as an adult, but the dubbed dialogue takes alot away from it. Hearing the original Aussie accents take this to a new dimension. Very Cool!
Yeah, I'm gonna post here to contrast what others have said. This dvd does include the original Aussie soundtrack, the first time Americans have ever seen this version in the history of the film. Pretty impressive. It is much better than the dubbed version. The special features are so-so, not a whole lot to rave about. The print is clean, it looks great with the widescreen, and the original audio is a definite plus. This is certainly a worthy purchase for being only ten dollars.
A true action movie with Mel Gibson as " vigilante " after the death of his wife and son by mad bikers : truly a masterpiece !
This is the book I read as a child and loved, then read again as a man and loved more. It is part of how I see the King Arthur legend. I will never part with my copy, and I will read it to my son when I have one.
I found this cd on the shelf at my work. I'm listening to it right now. Sweet instrumentals that make me want to dance around. It reminds me of sugarplum fairies creating music in the 70's. The sound is light. The lyrics are few but this album isn't about the lyrics. It's about the rhythm it creates. It's a pleasant album.
Ever have one of those albums?An album where you spin it a few times and a few songs might sink-in, but the majority seem wrapped in gauze? Then-- ONE DAY -- it hits you, the genius behind the songs, the hidden melodies, the amazing musicianship?That was my experience with this album. It took 2 years of (very) sporadic listenings to suddenly be hit in the head with just how flat-out AMAZING this album is. A few songs are easy and accessible (ie. "Captain Easychord"), while others may take a few listens to *really* appreciate--- but it's worth the effort. (as a comparison, I found "Margerine Eclipse" very easy to get-into, while it took a while for "Dots & Loops" and "Cobra & Phases" to really sink-in).Very highly recommended, once it hits you, it will stay with you and grow-stronger with repeat-listens.
I deeply enjoyed the other Hoover novels available for Kindle, "The Moghul" and "Carribee". This offering, "The Samurai Strategy", suffers a little in comparison. Unlike other Hoover works, this effort was written and set in the late 80s-early 90s. The dated setting slightly detracts from the book in today's world. The subject matter still holds up very well in the aftermath of Wall St's latest shennagans, but some readers might get lost in the thick financial terminology. Well written and edited, this is a good book to spark thought on America's current financial and industrial situation.
I thoroughly enjoyed reading this well written, absorbing, researched story of international financial espionage and the potential opportunities that a base-less currency and the global financial world offered by the internet.
Well, everyone, this movie was pretty good! There was some hysterical moments-like when Murray is trying to turn the mean guy into a rabbit and instead turns him into a rabbi! Or when the bad fairy (played by Kathleen Turner) turns the head fairy paper-thin and stuffs her mouth with bricks. However, I think that Mara Wilson has been in better movies. Also, if you are gullible, do not watch this movie. Some parts are very believable, but some parts are totally unrealistic! But it's really good.
This movie has the little girl from Matilda and Martin Short. Good family picture , we loved it. Came in excellent condition!
This rattle is easy to hold and has an added advantage of being able to roll around the floor. This makes my grandson want to crawl after it. It's well made, makes a nice rattling sound. I would buy it again for my grandson as it is quite nice. He didn't show interest in it until about 7 months and now that he is one plays with it a bit. The only negative comment I have is that he loses interest in it after a very short time.
With this tool you can keep your mini blinds really clean, the brush reaches into those impossible crevices. And I now dust my blinds on a regular basis to keep them looking really great. I was most pleased with this product, especially since it saves me those extra steps of cleaning!!
Like all of their CD's, Trout fishing in America has done it again! Fun, entertaining music that is great for adults, kids...whomever!Trout continues to be one of my favorite groups out there-- it's amazing that they do not get more national publicity.
Keith and Ezra's most polished, mostly serious work for non-kids. Very well done with excellent new songs. My new favorite Trout CD. Hey, guys, just don't forget your roots and all the silliness that made us fans fall in love with you!
Trout Fishing In America make kids music, they do it well, and the album probably will stand up to the death play the kids will give it, even with adults, although I highly doubt many adults will listen to it for it's own merits. If you need a CD for your kids to listen to that won't drive you crazy, you have found it, but otherwise this is probably not a CD you want to own.
Great looking toy. I have Magic doing his no-look-pass pose towards my other Lakers greats. Good size and similar resemblance to the Magic man.
Burroughs searches in his writing for the same thing he searched for in drug use, sex and the russian roulette games he played with his guns: to try and distill out of an experience the pure essence of what it means to be alive, that single moment of ecstasy when living is made real in a blinding flash. Through graphic imagery of sex and death Burroughs will play you like a miscreant attacking a cathedral pipe organ, pulling out all the stops, feet pounding all the pedals at once, hands stomping the keys, blasting the pipes. In that rush of noise he challenges you to find the whisper of truth. A Liturgy and Scripture for the Damned.
Misanthropic and challengingin this work Bourroughs sees mankind as sociopathic an mindlessly devising methofs of self-exterminationdifficul and difficult to put downyoull find that possible only to answer bodily demands for sustenance or eliminationENJOY
Burroughs drags in the nets he has held out for fifty years or so and sorts out the information he has gathered. In his most lucid, almost straight forward prose (inspired by Denton Welch), Burroughs puts forward a trilogy -Cities of the Red Night, Place of Dead Roads, and The Western Lands- with all his loves and hates, and serves them in his most favourite genres from childhood up: Pulp Dectective; Sci Fi; Pirates; High School Theatre; Egyptian; and others.Naked Lunch may have messed with you, but it never infiltrated your thinking as much as these books will. I think the deceptively simple language and 'sense' of 'narrative continuity' help to disarm and act as a Trogan Horse.If you are easily offended you may want to skip Burroughs altogether, though, in that case, I suspect you need him to unsettle your morals, just a little, so you can reflect on your position.
This was the first novel I've read by Shari MacDonald. It was great. She ranks right up there with Lori Wick and Lori Copeland. This is a must read.
I think that Rashel is a strong female charactor. I think that her only flaw is that she tends to be hypocritical. I think that Quinn is a good soulmate choice for her. I really liked this book because it had a good plot and I liked that a vampire and vampire hunter got together. This was my favorite book out of the whole series. I recommend buying this book, or at least reading it, because it is very good!
Compared to all the night world books this one is the best! I love how Rasheal is so brave and finds her soulmate while fighting vampires.
Of all the books that L. J. has written in this series, "The Chosen" is by far the best. I have read all nine of the currently published books(and am still eagerly awaiting the tenth). This book has the wonderful premise of the previous and subsequent books. However, it also has main characters with more depth than many characters in other novels and realistic motives. Rashel and Quinn spend most of the book trying to ignore their feelings for eachother and trying to kill eachother. Both things are something that the other books really lack. Niether readily admit to bieng soulmates. The two characters fellings towards the members of Circle Daybreak coin the term "damned Daybreakers."All of these things and their depth of character contribute to make this a great book rather than a marginally good book as the other books in this series have been.
I really loved this book. It made you laugh and made you sad. I wish I could have the courage to rescue dogs in the same manner as Randy Grim does. Truly inspiring stories.
A fascinating account of one man's crusade to rescue the stray dogs of St. Louis, this book gives us incredible insight into the issues surrounding the stray animal problem in this country. I learned more than I knew there was to know about feral dogs and their place in our society. But this book is not just about dogs - the lessons learned could just as easily be applied to the "capture" and "saving" of all the other strays found in our cities--including those lost & homeless children who have become so commonplace. The behaviors they exhibit are scarily similar to those described by Randy Grim in this book. A gripping tale and one which should be read by anyone interested in the plight of all the strays of the world.
Marie Curie's youngest daughter Eve has given us a gift by writing this biography of her mother. Eve manages to let us into her mother's private world while inspiring our full respect of her privacy. Madame Curie and her husband Pierre exemplify the meaning of the word integrity - a rarity, especially in our culture of constantly searching for fame and wealth at all cost. I will read this book multiple times like visiting a friend and learning a bit more about this remarkable person each time.
This was a very enjoyable history book, and certainly one of the best books I have every read on Florida history. Though it is filled with facts and dates, it is also full of stories that make colonial St. Augustine come alive. It was also helpful that each chapter is a little story of it's own which relates to the whole book, but can be read separately. Best of all, the Spanish Inquisition makes an appearance, and nobody expects the Spanish Inquisition.
When my doctor gave me a choice between crutches or a walker, I chose walker. My uncle had one of these and offered me its use. I loved the ease of its smooth gliding wheels and especially the hand brake. I never felt like it was getting away from me. The compartment was handy for traveling around with a book, meds, etc. and doubled as a seat when I was tired and had to rest. I think this is the best walker on the market!
JoAnn and Monte are two of the best Alaska singers I have ever heard. Back in the early 80's we purchased some tapes from their show in Juneau and are sorry to find out that we can't get CD's now. It seems that nobody carries updated versions that are truly some of the best Alaska folk songs. I was thrilled to get this CD and wish I could find more.
Strauss - The Great WaltzThis is truly a masterpiece reflecting upon the life and times of a remarkable composer. We are lucky today to have such talented orchestras who can reproduce Johanns' works with such expertise thus keeping his music alive in our modern times.There is no one illustration of Johanns' work on this DVD as none can be classed as being one better than the other!
This is an excellent puzzle for very young children. Melissa & Doug products are well made and kids love them. This puzzle is wooden so kids wont destroy it if they try to roughly put the pieces in. The design is adorable and makes a great gift for any young animal lover.
My two year absolutely loves puzzles and this has been a great addition to our collection.. It's sturdy and I don't think she'll be able to wear it out or break it.
I bought this puzzle for my 3.5 year old daughter as she showed lots of interest in puzzles. This is a very nicely made toy, very durable and extremely helpful to have the wooden tray to put it together in. We haven't had any issue with pieces sticking together. My daughter loves this puzzle and takes it apart and puts it together a few times a day. She is able to put it together in amount a minute now.I'd recommend this as a skill level for under 3 years old.I'd also bought one of the 48 piece puzzles which seems at a better challenge level for 4-5 years old.
I love these shoes. I live in Dubai where it is currently hotter than you can imagine, yet I have 2 dogs that need daily walks. I wanted something that gave me comfort and support while walking but without the heat of socks and shoes. I bought these shoes last week and have worn them every day since. They are so supportive yet comfortable, I feel like i could run in them, yet I barely feel like I'm wearing anything! This was my first pair of Merrells - over the week I bought 2 more pairs :)
Got this item quickly and in good condition, installed it without trouble and it has worked flawlessly since the installation. Not much more you could hope for.
I got a huge kick out of Vinny's interpretations of the Beatles' songs that they never recorded. Sure. they ver due elements from the later years that they should have skipped, as has been written here. But the don't mimic previous covers, but try to recreate the early Beatle sound. It's light and it's fun. It's is not a must have as a Beatles fan, but I think you'll get a big kick out of this disc.
If you're like me, then you probably find cast recordings of Evita long and drawn out. Well I've found that this recording flows very smoothly and the music has a nice, slightly updated sound to it. I hear a lot of die hard Evita fans critisice and insult the film version and Modanna and Antonio's talent, but the fact is, this is a good recording and the stars do a fine job
There are two soundtracks for this movie, get this one. Yes, it is a bit more expensive, but if you want to get the full expierience of an incredible soundtrack with even more incredible talent performing it, then this is an absoute must!
I think Evita is the best music piece ever. Madonna and Antonio Banderas are the best Evita and Che. This musical is probably the only one where I listen to EVERYTHING. Even tracks like "A Cinema in Bueonos Aires" even though it is not even music.
I love it ! My favroite song is the 2nd one in disk two called," Don't Cry for me Argentina!" I think It's the best recodings ever.
I ordered the sound tracks for the film Evita since the 1st of Dec.'07 I am still waiting for it to be delivered. I have been a long time customer of Amazon and I've never had any problems with deliveries before. The item ordered was meant to be a Christmas present. Since it's not here where is it? I need an answer please...P.S Happy New Year to you all.Chas>>>>>
I loved the movie EVITA and rented it so many times, the movie store eventually sold it to me. The songs are upbeat and there's a variety, so it kept my attention. Banderas and Madonna made a great pair!
I bought this printer for my son's new computer which runs XP. No problem loading the software, no paper jams, no problems at all. For [the money]including the USB cable. I am still using an HP Deskjet 540 that I bought with my Packard Bell Pentium 75mHz over 6 - 8 years ago. The PB is gone, but the HP lives on and on and on. That's says a lot. New print heads with each cartridge I think is the way to go. Will use 825 mostly for text, but having printed a photo, it compares fairly well with my Epson 780 with glossy paper.
I ordered an used copy and received a brand new one. Mistake? I don't know. Quick shipment and delivery. For about $10 I am very happy with this purchase.I bought it for school, and the content is interesting.I was surprized by the size of this book. It is almost like a pocket book
I love how high it gets - I have bad knees and have trouble getting up from a position where my knees are bent more than 90 degrees - and it is so easy to set up
I love this air mattress. It inflates quickly and is super comfortable. I just wish I had NOT bought the raised one. If you move around too much or get too close to the edge, you feel like you're going to roll right off of it. I think it's because of the high center of gravity or something. But, overall, highly recommended! BONUS - Unlike most things, you CAN actually fit this back into the bag once you're done with it!
First airbed I received had a leak, sent it back and got the next one within 4 days. Super convenient to have the built in electric pump and super fast to inflate. Takes a bit of an effort to deflate, but that is expected for pretty much any airbed.
Bought this for my summer cottage for extra guests. Very comfortable. Great size and built in Air Pump made it a breeze to inflate. The Velour top was also a great plus. Would reccommend highly.
I bought this bed, for my niece who was visiting. The bed was so simple to put air in it, took about 3 minutes or less and very comfortable, did not have to put more air in it the whole weekend. It was much better than the Aerobed, and cost less. I have been through three of them, which didnt last past two years. It was well worth the purchase, will buy another one. Fast shipping too.
It fills up really fast and is a sweet bed. Best Airbed ever!!!! A must buy item.... Fast shipping as well =)
I got this for guests to use in our small spare room. Inflating it was quick and easy since it has a built-in pump: you plug it in, turn it on and switch off when it's inflated enough for you. The only drawback is that the pump is really noisy - about the same as a loud vacuum cleaner - so you probably want to inflate the mattress before the rest of the household goes to bed.I had one guest a week, two weeks in a row, sleeping on it for several nights. Both found it comfortable and slept well on it. The extra height makes it feel more like a regular bed and less like you're camping out on someone's floor.Like all air mattresses, the air sucks heat from the body so the sleeper can get really cold; I've found the best way around this is to place a blanket or comforter on the mattress before you put the sheets on - this bottom blanket will insulate the person from the cold air.So far it's been great and I have no complaints.
I was little apprehensive before buying an airbed thinking how it would be. But this turned out real nice one. It doesn't need you to call U-haul when you move out. It doesn't require much space to carry it with you anywhere you go. Its also really easy to inflate with the electronic pump and even easier to deflate naturally. After you get used to the "airbed", it feels like a normal bed. It offers a great option for people who don't want a hassle of carrying mattress and other accessories along with the trouble of carrying them.It also doesn't require you to carry your pillow. The top surface is velvet like thing that is so soft, you could do w/o a bed sheet also.go for it, if you need one.
I have not completely set this item up yet, but thus far looks like a great mattress for extra sleeping accommodations. Is for my college-age son via family visits....
I sleep on this until I got a real mattress. Great for allergies. Will keep it in the car in case I spend the night at the kids house.
It is very comfortable and easy to use. The only thing they could improve on is the storage bag. It should be larger. It is difficult to put is back in the bag.
Inflates fast. Nice shape when inflated stores well. Guest are getting a good nights rest. Would reorder if we need more.
I've had this for 3 months now and it gets used about once a week and so far has held up well. So easy to use and takes no time at all. I would recommend this product.
This bed was bought after realizing that the Queen size air mattress I bought from the same company was a pile of crap. This mattress was only intended to be temporary, but it survived for probably a good six months with only a small leak being sprung toward the end of the six months. For four out of those six months, it was shared with my girlfriend because we couldn't afford anything else. Yeah, it was awkward, but the little thing held up. The only reason I stopped using it was because I finally got the money to afford a real mattress, so we've moved on. But this mattress will forever be used as a spare guest bed...perfect height, only a very minor leak, and once you get used to it...very comfortable.
Well so far we are satisfied. It is easy to inflate with a very convenient built in pump, which so far actually works. My daughter says it is very comfortable, and , so far, it surprisingly isn't losing air. Some do and require frequent inflations.I would highly recommend it, and for the price, it is a very good purchase.As they suggested, it isn't meant to be inflated and deflated constantly, so we try to keep it inflated, cause my daughters use it for sleepovers, and their friends love it.
The Intex Pillow Rest Twin Airbed with Built-in Electric Pump is a amazing purchase comparing price and quality.
Does everything I expected it to. The built in pump works perfectly (for both inflation and deflation), and it hasn't sprung a leak on me yet.
I like itI was looking for it I found it I got and I am enjoying it to the fullestI recommend it to anyone
I was very happy with the airbed that I chose - it met all my expectations - service was excellent.
Needed place for kids to sleep while visiting grandma and now they argue over who gets to sleep on the air mattress. Both think it's more comfy than their bed at home.Would have given 5 stars, but the bag it comes with to put it in is worthless, no chance of ever getting it in there again.
For the price, this air mattress is a great bargain. Inflates fast, deflation is done via the fan motor which speeds up the process, compact and light, easy to store.....I highly recommend this as quick and easy way to accommodate the need for an extra bed.
This item arrived on within just a matter of a few days. It sure did serve its purpose. It took about a minute to inflate and deflate I am very pleased with this product. Would buy from seller again, definitly.
I love how quickly inflates & deflates! Maintains fullness throughout the night! Love that's it's raised high enough for getting in & out of bed! Very easy to store away. Love the tote in which you can carry to anywhere you may need to travel. Totally recommend it!!
My wife and I bought 2 of those for our vacation home and they are practical as they have an electrical pump build in and quite comfortable. We slept very well on them. We also liked the fabric surface very much.
I ordered the aerobed for visiting guests, and they loved it. Also, it fit nicely in my space-challenged unit. Shipping was great! Price was great! all happy campers.
I needed an extra bed for my 4 year old grandson...this really fit the bill...he loves sleeping on his inflatabable bed...inflates and deflates in minutes..
It's convenient to take around. I think the only complaint I'd have is that it makes squeaking noises when you move around and THAT sound wakes me up... Other than that, it's sturdy and as comfortable as a airbed can be.
I bought this to use whilst staying at my sister in laws house for a couple weeks around Christmas. This bed is awesome! It pumps up very quickly and is comfortable and big enough. My nephew is 6ft and 220 pounds and I'm 5'5 and 140 pounds and we could both lay on this whilst watching a movie with no problems. I used it for 2 weeks and only inflated it slightly on the second day, I think the material stretched a little during my first nights sleep to break it in and thats why it seemed like it lost air. After the second day I never had to refill it. I left it there when I went home and my nephews are still using it and love it more than their regular beds.
actually i love it . but i just gave 4 stars because i think its a little bit smaller than what i think .
The airbed is easy to inflate and it holds air. It is confortable and easy to store away. I recommend it.
Really good product. For this price, I give it a 5. Very comfortable and easy to use. You do have to refill the air after two nights though.
This bed is so easy to use. Just plug it in, turn it on, and walk away. The pump is built in, so you don't have to worry about keeping up with an air pump, using a hairdryer, or finding double D batteries to power your pump.
This is an incredible air mattress. We purchased this for a last minute house guest. It was shipped quickly. The mattress itself is very nice and comfortable. And the automatic pump makes blowing up and deflating a breeze!!! I would highly recommend to anyone needing an air mattress
I bought this for my daughter to use when she visits. She found it was so comfy that it was hard getting her out of it at all. It came packaged nicely & was exactly as described on Amazon. Very pleased!
my house is so small that i can't justify losing space to an extra bed. a twin air mattress was really the best solution since we only have company once or twice a year. So far, i've only used it once. The price and the built in air pump were the main reasons for purchasing. It mostly stayed inflated, but my mom did say it could have used a little more air the second night. There is a storage compartment for the power cable, which is nice when it is inflated because there isn't the risk of someone tripping over loose cords. The mattress has just enough height on it so you don't feel like you're sleeping on the ground. The pictures make it seem like there is a groove for a fitted sheet to slip into, but it's really just a seam. Not a huge deal if you have sheets with good elastic, but they might get stretched out over time. Overall, the design is compact and it does what it is supposed to do, at the right price. i'm happy with it.
I have not seen or slept on this mattress........bought for my daughter for a quick replacment.............she tell's me she thinks it GREAT.....I bought the twin size,and she tells me when she buys a full size it will be the same one. I have an inflatable bed she has slept on while visiting, and she said this is 100% better. I might add my daughter is not someone who is easily pleased.
while only used a couple of times, it seems well constructed, held the air pressure, was easy to inflate as well as deflate. A great value.
One of the best air mattresses I've owned. Extremely easy to fill and let the air out, just plug in and flip a switch. I like that it's all one unit, the plug and air in/out take is attached and hidden in a compartment. It's comfortable and does not loose air, even over an extended period of time.
Love it! this bed fits the bill. my guess like it compliments on how comfortable it is. Easy to inflate and store. An excellent buy in my book. The built in pump is a super feature.
The bed was comfortable and filled easily. It's only draw back was that did not fit all the way back into the carring box.
I took this with me on a vacation for our guest to use. But, it is so comfortable that it turned out that I used it the whole week and gave the guest the actual regular mattress bed and used this air mattress instead. I have used it for 3 different 1 week vacations and have had no problems with it. It even deflates electrically so it fits back into the travel bag it came with. Amazing deal.
this product is amazing i took it camping and loved every minute of it ... it is a great product and very comfortable... the pictures show it to have a manual inflating pump like most inflatables but this one does not have that port. Not a huge deal just thought needs to be exactly what is in picture but the actual mattress is amazing and i would definately buy one again
I have had this for almost 6 months and there has been no problems. For $40, I think that is a good deal. Folding it up is a bit hard with the pump inside the mattress, but I guess that is the case with any model like this.It was surprisingly cheap. I remember agonizing over if I should spend more money or go with this one... I seems to be fine.That being said, I have only used this indoors. I will do some tent camping in the summer, I think it will be fine for that also.
Recently I've got this air bed for my guest.It includes electronic pump and it takes about 5 ~ 7 mins to completely put an air for using.No leaks and it stands for a month, but after that period, there were some air leaks. But it's ok !recommand !!!
This mattress is absolutely a best buy for me as I basically use it when I just need to find my own space. It's affordable, easy to inflate, even easier to deflate and simple for anyone to do.
Its a very comfortable bed. I bought this one because of the built in pump and was happy to find that it doubles as a vacuum pump to rapidly deflate the bed when you need to pack it away.Being an air bed it is really light when inflated. It should not be used on the edge of high places or staircase case.
I needed this for a Scout outing, had no idear about air mattress. I wanted something easy to carry and not to many items. This air mattress is true to it's word. Just like my home bed, comfort and ease of sleeping. Ease for filling and letting air out. Going to order another one that is larger.
Good afternoon I would inform them that the item was received in perfect conditions, and they estimated the time, so I give the maximum score. thanks
Hubby goes to a huge pig-roast with retired and active navy guys every year. Bunks in the campers are prized beyond all else (except the kegs). Our friend was dumped after one of the guys decided at the last minute to not bring his camper. I had a trail of Amazon prime so I quickly ordered this mattress. It was delivered on time. It blows up pretty quick and was very comfortable ( was used by two different people on different nights). It holds air well and over a 3 day weekend only needed a quick shot of air once. I think the only complaint was it was a tad bouncy and one of the sleepers fell to the floor (maybe had something to do with the drinking). When deflating make sure it does not suck onto itself or the pump gets whiny. Fits well in it's well constructed carrying bag. Glad to have made the purchase. Highly recommend for a spare rack.
I bought one and it was so easy to use and quick to inflate, that I ended up buying one for a family member as well. The pump is build right into the mattress so you don't have to worry about misplacing the pump as with many other air mattresses. Inflates in just a few minutes and the pump is not as loud as other pumps I've had in the past.
With a bad back, it is difficult to get off the floor when using an air mattress. The height of this solved that issue for me. The first mattress we received, leaked and I spent one very unpleasant night. But Amazon paid the costs of shipping it back, and the new one is doing well.
My daughter purchased this airbed for my long weekend visit to her one bedroom apartment. For three straight nights, I slept great. It didn't hold all its air all that time but what air mattress would? With the built-in pump, I just had to throw the switch and within seconds it was firm, comfortable and ready for another night's sleep.I also want to mention how easy this bed was to get out of. I have arthritis in my knees. Because this bed is the height of a mattress and box springs, I was able to get up and down easily. This also made it a great place to sit. This product is absolutely worth the money!
The street index is hard to read for the over forty crowd. If the font size was 12, it would have been much easier to read.
I was looking for an affordable aluminim case, which looked good and didn't cost an arm and a leg. Antec surprised me with this SuperLanBoy model.Not only does it work great (specially with led fans) but it also helps you keep your P4 system cool.Together with an Antec TruePS power supply, the chances of your system malfunctioning due to a cpu/mobo heat-related problem are zero.If you are building the ultimate "fail-proof" system, I recommend the use of 5,400 rpm hard drives (like Samsung's SV1204H if you can still find them), instead of the overheating 7,200 ones.
you've heard their music, now hear their words. this dvd gives insight into an extrordinary album of the early 70's; a release that was polar opposite to much of the musical landscape of the era. timeless tunes created by five talented musicians. the joy on levon helm's face is rich as he recounts how the harmonies of himself, richard manuel and rick danko were structured. an impromtu version of unfaithful servant performed by rick is just as emotionally poignant now, as it was on the lp. a couple keyboard demos by garth hudson is both pythonesque, and accomplished keyboardist, in it's scope. and with much less screen time compared to the last waltz, robbie robertson has a word or two as well. after viewing this dvd, cue up the band's lp on the turntable, or tray in the cd, and relive this great work once more!
Very good comprehensive review on The Band. Gives good insight into the individual members and why some of their songs were written. A good addition to my collection.
I'm 24 years old and have never had an orgasm. It's not that it's not enjoyable, it definitely feels good, but I've just never been able to get to that state. I've had sex with enough men and tried doing it on my own, it just never worked. Then I finally did something about it and ordered this item. It was my first toy. Within 2 minutes I had my first orgasm. WHY DID I WAIT SO LONG TO TRY A TOY?!?!? :p Now I just have to get a few more toys and introduce them to my sex life with my boyfriend...hopefully he won't mind ^_^
Bought as a replacement for one used for last 2 years. One received not quite as powerful as original, but gets the job done. Wife enjoys that it's thicker than others that have been used.
totally comfortable, and extremely sensual i love it.i adore the bunny ears and the controls are super easyi recommend for any woman looking for comfortable, intense pleasure (:
Good product, made well. Bullet has good amount of vibration. Hits all the right spots. I think the rabbits bullet should be placed a little higher for better stimulation. Also the beads inside are made of steel and if placed wrong can be a lil painful. The product however is worth the money.
What can I say?! I absolutely CANNOT believe how wonderful this product is! I own 5 toys and this one by far is my favorite! I have no regrets or complaints when it comes to me purchasing this product. It certainly gets the job done, and quick too. I have never had to use it for more than a few minutes, its amazing! It has 3 speeds of vibration for clit stimulation, 3 speeds of rotation in the shaft, you can change the direction in which it rotates, and it is completely submergeable! It even has a bumpy texture on the shaft to stimulate the g-spot. As far as batteries go, they do not have to be replaced very often either. This is a very well thought out invention and I can't think of any ways to improve it!
This is and was one of my most favorite vibrators. While the size is a little large the beads and movment of the shaft combined with the tantalizing bunny ears leave a Big O not to be forgotten! Couple of notes they state the item is waterproof not true a few uses in the tub and every time water got in battery compartment. Also this vibrator has a battery compartment that is removed from vibrator and this broke in a very short time rendering the vibrator useless. I tried to contact the company for a replacment compartment but no response thus far.
We were a little hesitant to add a toy of this nature to our collection but the wife absolutely loves this one!
This was my second toy and I love it! As soon as it arrived I tried it out. I highly recommend this! It is worth the $28.06 and shipping. I've never had an orgasm that powerful (:
I had mixed reviews of this product. It most definitely got the job done, and fast! The only qualms that I had was that it was really large and hard to get in sometimes. Also I found that the rabbit ears would get in the way and could become annoying at times, but other than that it is a GREAT product.
I saw this online and bought it immediately. The only toy I ever bought before this was a small bullet and this blew it out of the park! AMAZING! You must buy. Most intense orgasm. Put's my boyfriend to shame!!!!
I bought this to replace the same item I'd purchased 2 years ago from Amazon and, after many, many uses, burnt out the vibe portion of the toy.This product is slightly thicker than average rabbits, but definately not oversized. The motor is quiet and VERY effective, almost too much so; my husband and I like to use it during playtime, but I find I often have to turn it down or off to hold back a little...Don't hesitate to purchase this; at this price point, it's the best you can get!
I really enjoy this product. The only thing that's missing is a lock button. It tends to get very slippery at times, and buttons are accidentally pushed, which makes the experience less pleasurable. I would by this product again, but only if it has some sort of locking feature so I wouldn't have to stop and adjust it all the time.
It's really big. I'm not too impressed with the rotating dildo part because I really don't feel much and I guess I also feel more stimulation from thrusting. However, those rabbit ears (and the little nose too) are amazing. I can turn it on the lowest setting and it won't take more than 2 minutes for me to have the big "O". It would probably be a lot of fun with a partner.
By far, one of the best videos I've ever purchased. This video takes each band member down memory lane and you get a wonderful inside scoop to what was really going on behind the scenes making Rumors. Stevie, Christine, Lindsey, John & Mick tell of how their very personal struggles with each other had to be put aside for the survival of the band. With all the emotions running in high gear, no wonder this was their best album yet. I had to watch it a couple of times...Remarkable video about a remarkable band.
This DVD is fanstatic, the interviews are great the band has made it through all the tough times, they are going to have with each other and come out the other side.This insight to this classic album is just great a wonderful look, into their lives and problems they where having at the time.Now we can rely see and hear the rumours album the way it was.Now all that needs to happen, is for the record company to get off there back sides and re-issue the cd digitally remastered. While there at it do a new greatest hits digitally remastered, would be great too.
If you love the Stevie and Lindsey era your going to love this CD!!! This is jam packed with interview with the entire band, how they got started, and all the ups and downs thru the years.
it's good to go back and see how the band members felt and recall their time in making this very important album. i just love how the engineers and producers can go back to the studio and select different tracks, break them down so you can hear what went into them instrument by instrument. lindsey buckingham is a wizard in the studio. stevie nicks and christine mcvie are philosophical about those times and are interviewed in nice settings. mick and john are their practical selves. yea the music clips come up a little short. but it's not a concert tape. i'm glad they could put some of those clips in. an important look back on the making of one of the most important albums of all time.
This timer is AWESOME! It's very easy to install, and because it operates on a 9 volt battery, I won't hafta replace as often as my old timer that used 3 AAs
Programing it was easy and adjust nicely to my system. After three weeks testing it is working fine as required.
I first bought a Ray Padula deluxe water timer.Returned that because it was terrible.Couldn't even keep time!Cheap cheap cheap.Ordered a couple of these and so far impressed.Quality feel and function, made in Germany.I had no problems programming this, very logical.Worked perfectly so far.No comparison to the Ray Padula Time It Deluxe Water Timer.The Claber is like a Mercedes, the Padula, a Kia.But, that is really unfair to Kia.Spend the extra few dollars and return it if I'm wrong.
If I was stranded on a desert island with one album it would be this one. One deep complex song after another. Put on the headphones, close your eyes and take a trip into a world where the beat never ends and melodies play with your emotions.
Virginia Ryan gives what no standard travel book could even approach: the authentic feel, taste and emotions of Italy, all interwoven in a fascinating personal story. It reads like a novel, yet takes you into an Italy that few tourists could hope to glimpse. Frances Mayes pales in comparison. I'd recommend it for anyone going to Italy, or who would like to go there in their armchair. It's a great, adventurous, authentic read. I loved it.
This is a wonderful book: the spiral bound format makes it perfect to work from. The motifs themselves are clearly presented and lend themselves to stitching on all manner of items.From bookmarks to babywear, from towels to tableclothes: there is something here for every stitcher!Highly recommended.Jennifer Cameron-Smith
In this extremely useful book for understanding the poetry of Wallace Stevens, Lensing effortlessly traces the poet's life and development as those were important in determining the sort of writer Stevens would become. Many Stevens poems are explicated in terms of their original context, and a lot of fascinating information is provided about the nature of the poetry "establishment" of the early 20th century, and how important such sponsorship and networking was for Stevens' emergence as a major voice.This book deserves much more attention from Stevens fans that it seems to enjoy. It is very well written, a work of erudition and scholarship that avoids the all of the pedantry and other typical negatives of its genre. If you're a reader of Stevens, this is a book well worth owning.
Potok, a master of the written word and an accomplished artist, recreates New York "ghetto-life" and makes it live through the eyes and life of a young boy growing up in New York between the two World Wars. The sensitive reader will experience unthinking hate, intolerance, love, intellect, and most of all, the perserverance of the human spirit--a vividly painted portrait of human existence and spirituality.
Averse to books (and movies) with gratuitous sex and violence? Try Chaim Potok. His books tend to honor the gentle, sensitive intellectual (see Elaine Aron's writings on highly sensitive people). In this book, you follow the childhood of David Lurie, a Jewish boy growing up in 1930s and '40s Bronx (New York). An early injury leaves him physically weak and vulnerable to teasing, but his scholarly talents, vivid imagination, and tight-knit community allow him to grow into a fine young adult with the courage to forge his own way, even when that means challenging some of the religious values of his family and friends.
Beautiful, well crafted novel about a young man discovering himself as an individual separate from his father, his teachings, and his family. As in "The Chosen." Potok is a master at making the reader excited about learning for its own sake. Unlike "The Chosen", this is a far slower, deeper, and ultimatly moving story. Prepare yourself for the slow pace, but jump in. It's worth it.
The movie industry in India is the world's largest. Steve Derne's book takes this idea and runs with it, using the film industry as a lens for focusing on Indian men's ideas about gender. It's a commonplace that, while people might not talk about their personal attitudes with a stranger, they are more than willing to discuss similar issues in their favorite films, and thus this report (as the very good previous review shows) reveals some surprising insights about how Indian men perceive the construction of masculinity.This book, unlike many sociological texts, is both scholarly and readable, and would make a good addition to undergraduate or graduate courses in area and gender studies. Highly recommended.
This book give a brief story about Koichi Tohei Sensei, who developed and bring his knowledge about KI to our world.Within this book you will find summaries in practical KI for our daily life.The most impressive thing is the fact that relax and calmness is the key to a great strength.
This item came earlier than expected! It is everything I wanted and more! I speak Italian, so it was easy to read the instructions. You can change it to English if you like...SUPER SIMPLE! GRAZIE!
"A great book that motivates you to reflect on your current life and challenges you to be and do better. It made me wonder what people at my funeral would say to each other about me and the inpact I had on them, others, my profession and my community. It challenged me to take "my game" of life up another notch to live my life in a way that I can be proud of my signature work."
Those most likely to read this book will be those who are basically good people and they want to be even better. This book will help them. Those who Should read this book are all people who need a shot in the arm, a feeling of hope, a renewed sense of self confidence. This book will transform them!Dianna Booher is a unique thought leader in the field of personal and professional growth. She not only knows and lives the concepts, she also fully understands the steps to take. And she shows the rest of us the paths in her many wonderful works. The sports metaphor used to structure the book gives it a refreshing and memorable flow. You will love the book and like yourself even better after reading it.
I saw Bab's in concert in Vegas and have to say that she is still wonderful, but her voice has changed and deepen. It has been my dream to see her in concert my entire life and it finally made her a human being. The CD brings back memories of the concert, but does show the changes in her voice.She is still one of the greatest vocalist, but everyone get old!
The CD is very good. Enjoyed the patter with the audience. But she sounded MUCH better when I saw her live in Phoenix! Her voice sounds a little raspy in some points on the CD. I didn't notice that in concert. It could have been the excitement of finally seeing my all-time idol live for the first time. I hope she tours at least one more time before she calls it quits!!!ALL HAIL BARBRA!
Many here have commented how more relaxed Barbra appears to be on this live performance disc compared to earlier ones.No where is this more evident than in the many instances you hear her infectious, lilting laugh.As a student of Ms. Streisand I always treasued those brief moments of hearing that laughter on earlier concert recordings.She says she has been enjoying the concert tour and all that heartfelt laughter we hear is testament to that fact. But I guess it's not surprising that someone who sings so gloriously laughs so gloriously also.
Streisand: Live In Concert (2 CD's)Her voice is stronger than ever. She's obviously had work done but still looks like an incredible diva. Surprisingly, her numbers with Il Divo are terrific and they are choreographed so she is like a Greek goddess and they are her chorus. It's also nice she does old songs from "Funny Girl" that she has never performed in concert before. A must have CD set at any price.
Saw Barbra in Atlanta and this is a wonderful album to bring back the memory of an unforgettable experience! I just hope there is a DVD planned!
This is one of the best CD's of all her concerts. I was lucky enough to go to her concert in Los Angeles and it was fantastic. The CD makes you feel as if you are there listening to her wonderful voice. ILDivo performs and I highly recommend it to anyone who is a Streisand fan.
good looking but the canister is difficult to re-seal when closing. The top doesn't seat comfortably on the base without some coaxing. Only size coffee filters that fit in the canister is a size 4.
Bring your style reference everywhere you write. An unbeatable classic. Every time I open it up, I find something to use in what I'm working on.
I, personally, am not a lesbian. I would recommend this movie to any of the "GaY Phobia" people. The fact that Mirren turns out to be a lesbian has no baring on the emotions you will express while watching this film. It has a wonderful cast of characters and exceptional use of words. I would recommend this to anyone 13 yrs or older, of any gender, and any sexual prefrence.
I've been using this monitor for about 2 weeks now. Easy to set up, works great! No dead pixels. I'm using the analog input for my old PC and the DVI input for me new PC. Even my 7 year old PC looks great on this using the analog input! Minor complaint: have to hit a few menu buttons to toggle between analog and DVI inputs, wish there was a toggle button so it could be done in a single push. Haven't used the built-in speakers yet. The monitor tilts up and down just fine. Overall, great monitor!
I purchased this charger along with the "Ericsson 1200 mAh Extended Battery" for my LX588. I had to return the battery because it does not fit in either of the two slots provided by this charger. Don't get this charger with the larger 1200mAh Ericsson battery. BTW, the Charger works great with regular sized Ericsson batteries. I like the discharge feature in the back slot.
This is my first Madeleine Wickham's book that I have read and I was pleasantly surprised at how good it was! It was a slow start but once I got into it I couldn't put it down!!! I will definitely read more of her books!!!
A very light and enjoyable read!! I love books by Madeline Wickham and can't wait to read more of them.
I must say that I was very impressed with "Cocktails for Three!".You read about the tales of 3 best friends who meet at a Manhattan Bar the same night every month. They get to catch up on everything that is going on with their lives.Maggie is pregnant. Roxanne has been dating a married man for 6 years. Candice has such a warm heart and can't seem to say "NO."The end of the book will throw you for a loop. As other reviews have said, you will not see it coming.This book kept me wanting to know what was going to happen next to the (3) characters. I am sure that you will be able to identify a personal friend of yours for Maggie, Roxanne and Candice. I was able to finish in just (1) day which is rare for me.I can't wait to check out Wickman's other two books.Enjoy!
I read this book because Wickham also writes under the pseudonym of Sophie Kinsella, the author of the Shopoholic books, of which I'm a fan. Cocktails is a great book, very funny but also poignant. It has quite a bit more depth than the Shopoholic series and some of Kinsella's other materials. The characters in Cocktails are well developed, though the plot for Candice at times seemed a bit contrived. Overall, this is a great and entertaining book.
The language wraps you up and transports you to a time and land like no other. It's full of love, hate, brutality, and loyalty. All these emotions get tangled up and mixed together. That lends itself to an amazing set of circumstances. There is no greater love story than Juliet and her fair Romeo. All other love stories are measured against this one and you will get lost in this classics story. It's a true classic.
I enjoyed this presentation of Romeo and Juliet. It has been a challenge to find supplimental material to help my students understand and appreciate the drama and humor in this fine work of art. I often begin with an adapted version of the tale for my young readers. Visit [...] to review. L Heflick
This isn't my favorite of all of Shakespeare's stuff. First of all, Mercutio is the best character, and he dies too soon. Second, I didn't really like Romeo and Juliet enough to care a lot when they died.As for all the metaphors and allusions packed in, that's always interesting. I think people start Shakespeare with this play, because it's not as difficult as the other tragedies, which I suppose is a good idea. After this, go to Macbeth (the best!).
The play's setting is the Italian city of Verona where Romeo and Juliet, the star-crossed lovers, face authorianism with a blood feud between each other's family, the Montegues and the Capulets. At a feast, Romeo notices and is struck by Juliet's beauty. At the first opportunity he approaches her; they fall in love immediately. Only after parting do they learn that they belong to rival families. The two exchange vows and decide to marry the next day, expecting that they will bring peace to the feuding families. Many deaths resulted from this relationship. Romeo and Juliet is one of the best romantic stories in history which motivated many people to rethink hatred against one another. It captures the essence of true love.
The classic Romeo and Juliet. Wonderful book, wonderful read.Kindle users: This book seems to not be typed out for the Kindle. Instead, it's a bunch of pictures of the text. This results in disjointed annotations and an inability to select a word on the screen and pop it up to the dictionary.
this book makes it so much easier to understand the context of this book. there are definitions of some of the words that are almost impossible to understand. there are character explainations as well. very good version for a student!
This is definitely the best play of all time! If you have never read it, then you should as soon as possible!
This edition of romeo and juliet is worth getting and the annotations are very helpful. I am one of those readers that likes everything annotated so if you aren't don't get this one. The notes were excellent, helpful, and so was the introduction. I wholeheartedly recommend it.
Romeo and Juliet does not read as well as some other plays such as Hamlet. It must be seen to be fully enjoyed. Nevertheless, I would reccomend this edition of the play. It is dirt cheap, for the amount of content you recieve, it is well worth the money. I reccomended it, however I strongly suggest you watch the play first before reading it. I believe that only after you watch the play will you fully appreciate it.
I don't know want the book is about yet Hahaha so can I read now? Thank you ? This is I don't know
It a old novel but a good one that u can more then one time. A lot school use it for English reading.
The first time I read one of Shakespeare book was at school, I thought is was going to be amazing because he is one of the most recognised writers in history. But I couldn't understand anything; it has a very old and complicated language that young people can't understand well enough. I think that all that style is very complex for us, older people could understand it well and enjoy it. But in that case I would only recommend it to women, I really don't think men will like all that kind of love stories as this one, where two people are strongly in love and that is a forbidden one by their families. I recognise that is has a very good ending but that's all. This is my personal opinion, you may like it. I have my respect for William Shakespeare but I think he is awful.
Books by Shakespere is something you just don't read for fun, you read it slowly by savoring the moments of every word spoken by each character. By reading Romeo and Juliet, you would understand the tragidy because of love...and how they both would risk their lives for each other. Shakespere is the man who can really define true love.
This book not only a classic but a real journey(not really but just saying) the only thing I dislike about this book is the names at the sides. If you are looking for a script this is the best thing told use. Plus at the book defines some uncommon words with numbers beside them that are defined in the next page. A true five star book!
I stumbled upon this set one day at a store and I initially purchased it based on some of the familiar artists on the track listing. What I had purchased turned out to be probably the best compilation of downtempo music I've ever heard. From start to finish on both discs I can't turn it off. If you're not enjoying it directly the compilation makes for excellent background music if you're having friends over to enjoy some drinks. I recommend this set to anyone who is a fan of downtempo music.
Like new just little wear around the edges the binding does not have a crease and pages are cripse. Over all I'm very happy.
For what it is,Flesh Wounds is a good movie,although I can see the comparisons to Predator. Kevin Sorbo does a good job of playing Lt.Tyler,comannder of a special ops force. As is usually the case in Sorbo's movies,there is a pretty woman,who,through no fault of her own,causes more trouble than the team really needs,but eventually earns their trust. They soon discover that their real enemy is something created by their own government-the perfect soldier,part man and part machine,who has lost control. With time running out,it's either kill or be killed,and Lt.Tyler much prefers the former. If you like action-adverneture films,this may be one movie you will want to check out!
I bought the pillow covers and the mattress covers and they are great. They wash and dry well and do exactly the job they should.....protecting pillows and mattresses.
he enjoyed it. will recommend it to friends to order form this site. It is cost friendly and you save
Even though, this album was not critics' favorite, give it a try. You'll be mesmerized! Its pulsating hypnotic melodies will drive you to the ecstasy and force you to listen to it again and again. I must admit that by being Yello's fan I can not be very objective in describing their work. But after so many years since I've heard album for the first time and after so many changes in my personal taste in the popular music, it is still one of my favorites. It is quite simply THE BEST CD TO LISTEN IN THE CAR by any artist. And hey, if all you know about Yello is infamous OH YEAH, consider this: it is not even in the best five of this album. What can I say more! Enjoy.
I got goosebumps in 1987 the first time I heard Dr. Van Steiner @ 1'26", still today in 2011 the same.Let me take this CD to heaven.
Loved the show and use classic movie and TV memorabilia to decorate my home office. Wish I could find posters.
If you're a long time Jobim fan (or just a fan of music) - you'll have all these tracks scattered across various CD's and LP's - if you want a roundup of his some of his greatest romantic/chill/ lounge and quiet bossa tracks - this is really another greatest hits package. The version of DINDI is backed by Astrud Gilberto. Elis Regina joins him on a couple tracks also. For longtime fans who might want a convenient CD to put in the car or have ready a romantic evening CD with his "quiet" classics, no reason not to add this to your collection. For new fans, this is a great starter CD but you'll be buying many more of Jobim's - no reason not to start with this one :-)
For the fact that the book was written just a few years after Li's death, information was fresh and probably quite accurate. I just wish that the book has a lot more photos. I enjoyed reading it.
The cable works perfectly and was obviously professionally made. They worked great for bridging our LIU to our switch across the wall at gigabit speeds, and I would expect much higher if necessary. The price seems to have gone way up since I bought it however, making it not as great of a deal, even with the fast Prime shipping.
I have worked in an abortion clinic for over twenty years and Anne Baker's work is required reading for all new counselors on our staff. In addition her book is an excellent resource for the seasoned counselor. Her expertise and sensitivity in dealing with a host of patient issues relating to abortion becomes apparent in the first few pages of this manual. She also manages to provide useful guidelines to help clinic staff deal with the special stresses involved in working in an abortion clinic.
I really appreciated this book until I got to her views on homosexuality. They so offended me, I almost stopped reading right there. But then, I remembered some of her outdated language and references and checked the copyright date: 1970. So I cut her some slack for her unenlightened viewpoint of homosexuality and read the rest of the book. I'm glad I did.Her outdated view points notwithstanding...this is an excellent book for raising children with confidence and high self esteem. I was looking for something to help me take my vague plans for raising my 10mo son and turn them into something more cohesive. This book said what I was thinking, very concisely. Recommend it.
Reading this early was a great help to me. My son is still quite young, but I'm already getting good ideas and getting into good habits to help build up his self esteem. This information also makes me feel like a more confident parent.
well, what can i say? i love it because i needed it, i do believe the seller should have given the book more credit, they should have categorized it VERY good, in the "condition" it was.. i am more than please, i started reading it for class already and i actually did grow fond of this book its very interesting and filled with knowledge!
I am half way through the book and am enjoying every page of it. The author seems to be enlightened as well, which makes the read more enjoyable. God bless her soul. My condolensces to her loved ones (she seems to have passed away on Sep 21, 2012).
I have read many books on Manson as well as other "Serial Killers." There is legitimate debate as to whether or not Manson himself should be lumped into this category. Digression.Of all the books I have read on Manson, surprisingly this one seems the least self-serving. The whole notion of "Helter Skelter" (which I honestly believe was preached to his followers, but in actuality was in no way the catalyst for the Tate-LaBianca murders) as being the one and only motive put forth by prosecutor Vincent Bugliosi seems to me to be one of the most self-serving.I won't reveal anything too important, but Manson is surprisingly candid in this book and his version seems much more plausible and realisitic than any of the other accounts I have read.
This book began with the childhood of Manson and the numerous institutions he's been in and out of throughout his life. It eliminates hype and sheds light on the truth of the madman behind the mask and gives a personal account of how experiences led him in and out of institutions for the duration of his life.
MANSON IN HIS OWN WORDS ALLOWS YOU THE READER TO SEE THINGS FROM MANSON'S POINT OF VIEW. I WAS IMPRESSED HOW CHARLES MANSON DID NOT DOWN PLAY HIS ROLE IN ANY OF HIS HORRIBLE CRIMES. HE OWNED UP TO THEM AND REALISTICALLY POINTS OUT HOW HE WOULD HAVE BEEN MORE CONTENT SPENDING HIS LIFE BEHIND BARS. HE ALSO ALLOWS THE READERS TO SEE HOW THE OTHER FAMILY MEMBERS WERE IN FACT RESPONSIBILE FOR THEIR OWN ACTIONS. I'VE READ MANY BOOKS ON THE SUBJECT OF THE MANSON FAMILY AND I MUST SAY THIS WAS DEFINETELY A WELCOME DIFFERENT POINT OF VIEW ON THE SUBJECT.
I LOVE Miss Kittin. That's why I've given her 4 instead of 3. She is completely awesome, and her music rocks. Though in this album. I've listened to it again and again, but I haven't found anything really thrilling on the CD.I mean, I REALLY LOVE MISS KITTIN. My favorite song is "1982" which was done with the Hacker on a different CD.The only thing I really have to say about this CD, is that "Requiem for a Hit" is one of the better songs on the CD. I don't know, maybe I'm just haven't been in the mood for this type of music as of late, and that's why I can't get into the CD at all. So perhaps, later, I will come back, and edit this review to show that is the most totally awesome thing ever conceived!
I have read all three books individually and now the compendium. All I can think of is a line from Oliver Twist..."more, please."Dahak and Colin I are among the best heroes on the market.
While I couldn't put it down - I feel like I just finished a LONG outline. Great concepts throughout, makes me want to get out the telescope and look at the moon again and say "what if".Weber's style reminds me of WEB Griffin or Beowulf - each chapter peeking in on an hour in the action, spread over months or years, villains or heros dispatched with alacrity and gore. This could have been a framework for a whole series of books in the hands of another author, perhaps delving deeper into the characters and the worlds. But I certainly appreciate the classic scifi visions.
this rocks they are right now one of the best bands out. Mirror Spirit is one of the best songs to come out in a long time. The only band out that is better then these guys right now is silvertide, and possibly Rose Hill Drive. Sounds like classic 70's 60's rock and roll. The singer has a great voice, I believe his name is Eric Shea and there lead guitarist is a girl but she can really play. Expect to see these guys again because this completly rocks out. Rock and Roll is here to Stay.down below is a list of all the bands true rock fans should check out. New bands here to save the scene.The DarknessJetHurricane PartyParchman Farm (Only have an ep out but it rocks and you can find it here on amazon.)Rose Hill Drive ( have an ep out but not on amazon. They toured with Van Halen and completly rock and the guitarist is incredible.)SupagroupTokyo DragonsYoung Heart AttackBlack Keysand the best new band Silvertide
Parchman Farm are a new band from San Francisco. They are named after a Paul Butterfield Blues Band song. They remind me of a lot of bands who were in father's record collection like Blue Cheer and Steppenwolf. Many of the Parchman Farm songs seem like they could co-exist somewhere on the Easy Rider soundtrack. The song "Mirror Spirit" alternates between soft nice sounds and heavy rock. "Too Many People" sounds like Deep Purple at their best, not that there are keyboards on this record. Songs like "Say Yeah" are appealing because of the heavy riffs and the cool vocals. This is a pretty interesting record. I could believe that it was recorded in 1968, and not last year. This is a recording that makes you think you can time trip back in time.
The album Trouble, by Akon, is a very good album, if your in the right mood, like songs like Locked Up An Lonly are sad and depressing where as Belly Dancer and Show Out and Trouble Nobody are more up beat. Whatever mood your in, Akon's Trouble matches it!
This earset must be tried; it is nothing like what you used as a kid. It fits well, is light and guess what - no hands!
Me, myself being a practicioner of both JKD and Wing Chun Kung Fu found this book to be interesting. It shows you how Bruce Lee used his Wing Chun knowledge and skill to be the basis of Jeet Kune Do. This book also shows how both Wing Chun and Jeet Kune Do would handle the same situations.In my personal opinion Jeet Kune Do is much more simpler, direct and practical in terms of hand-to-hand combat, but where Jeet Kune Do is rooted from should not be overlooked.
Good read featuring two renowned Sifus, on two very important Martial Art Sysstems.Bruce Lee, JKD, or WC fans should enjoy this book!
I am satisfied with this book about basic of wing chun and comparation with jeet kun do.I recomend this book as introduce into wing chun and jeet kun do.
This story blew me away. I thought it was going to be another one of those hair books where the women sit around in a beauty salon gossiping, but it wasn't. It was a sweet and touching story about a woman who wanted to be married before the age of thirty-five with 2.5 children and a picket fence. When she didn't get her wish she cut off all her hair. That simple but very well written. I cried at the end so I deducted a point for that. I don't like sad endings.
"Nappily" was entertaining!. However, the characters of Venus and Khandi worked my nerves. Both were shallow and had agendas. A lot of time was spent on Venus and her "finding herself" which is what we need to do from time to time, but so much time was devoted to this. We were privy to the main characters' thoughts which was an insight into each of them.The book's opening left you "hanging". I surprised by the ending. I give the writing a four (which is what reviews are about?). I was not bored!
Venus is a sista that has it going on in every way. She has a good job, live in boyfriend and long pretty hair. Out the blue one day, Venus goes to the beauty salon and instructs her stylist to cut her hair off then she sends her boyfriend on his way. Wonder what cause this? Venus is in search of her independence. This is an outstanding debut. God's Blessing's to the author.
I enjoyed reading the book but I think that the character, Venus Johnson, could have been more developed. I was expecting for all hell to break loose after she cut her hair.....however, in all actuality, her cutting her hair was an end result. It seems as if she was not fulfilled with her life before cutting her hair and still never gained fulfillment after. If anything, it added more havoc to her life (at least in her mind). The title of the book was an excellent choice in that it is eye-catching and sparks curiosity. However, Venus was neither "nappy" nor "happy"......or is that the irony of it? Overall, great job for a first time author. I applaud Mrs. Thomas on her work and wish her much continued success!
I THINK THE BOOK NAPPILY EVER AFTER WAS APAGE TURNER AND SOMETHINGS THAT HAPPEN IN EVERYDAY LIFE, LIKE THE SAYING GOES U HAVE 2 LET SOME THINGS GO 2 LET UR BLESSINGS FLOW, AND I GUESS THATS WHAT SHE DID. U GOT ME ON SOME PARTS OF THE BOOK B/C I REALLY THOUGHT IT WAS KANDI WHO WAS SENDING THOSE NOTES 2 VENUS BUT IT WAS TYSON'S WIFE. I THINK THAT VENUS LOST OUT ON A GOOD MAN B/C SHE WANTED HIM 2 MARRY HER WHEN SHE WANTED AND THAT'S WHAT HAPPENS WHEN PEOPLE GET GREEDY AND WANT WHAT THEY WANT WHEN THEY WANT IT. SHE DID FIND HER ANOTHER MAN AT THE END AND THAT WAS ALL WELL AND GOOD AND I WAS HAPPY FOR EACH OF THE CHARACTERS IN THE BOOK AND I WISH U THE VERY BEST IN UR CAREER. U R A VERY TALENTED WOMAN AND GOD BLESSES THOSE WHO BLESS OTHERS AND U HAVE W/ UR INSPIRATION. OOH BEFORE I FORGET I KNOW U HAVE PROBABLY HEARD THIS BEFORE SO I HOPE U DON'T GET OFFENDED BUT ON UR PICTURE U LOOK LIKE LYNN WHITFIELD. THAT IS NOT A BAD THING. GOD LUCH AND GOD BLESS>
I enjoyed this book. I needed to read a book like this. There are feelings I need to change about myself and this book made me realize it.
I've enjoyed Alastair Reynolds' books since I stumbled upon Revelation Space. I was a bit disappointed by Century Rain - partly because I just wanted more in the Revelation Space series... partly because it didn't live up to the promise of Reynolds' earlier books. I enjoyed reading it, but not as much as I'd hoped.Pushing Ice is an improvement... it's a good solid epic space story. Reynolds has a knack for good ideas and good characters, and it shows in Pushing Ice. There's a particular conflict in the story that doesn't quite work for me; unfortunately it's central to the plot, but it felt a bit forced (like these people should have known better). I could have done with a bit more explanation/exploration of the bigger picture, too. Regardless, I really enjoyed the story and am looking forward to his next book.
This was a very good read. It did start slow, but it really hooks you. And it felt to me as though it were several books in one. I loved the balance between political intrigue, personal passion, and science. While not perfect, it was a good adventure.
After many years wandering lost amid fantasy mislabeled SF, and turning in desperation to the oldies but goodies written by Niven, Zelazny, and their ilk, I stumbled onPushing Ice. Fabulous! Enough explanation that this non-physics major can follow (or pretend to), with plenty of action. The typical male failure (sorry, guys) to track character development, but it is quite possible (sorry, girls) for a woman to hold an implacable grudge for 50 years or even 18,000. 5 stars for the pleasure to read some really good, and new, hard SF.
An exciting science fiction novel that pushes the limits of scientific imagination. Mr. Reynolds has a Phd in Astronomy and worked for The European Space Agency for 13 years. Now, he is a full time science fiction writer. This novel explores behavior of humans when presented with arduous undertakings and reveals our darkest fears and how we try to cope with them in our unique way. In a science fiction frame, Reynolds tries to state that what is wired in us is not pure evil or pure goodness but a mix of them both. How much of each component you have in you will determine your course of actions and makes who you are. Because I'm a total geek, I loved it. Give it try and you might love it too. @shakirbahzad
I brought this book after reading some favorable reviews. I was not disapointed. I enjoyed the build of the story, which is a large story covering many years with many stories within. Would most definitely recommend to the space sifi addict who likes a good story with many twists.
Other reviewers mention technologies and relationship to previous stories. Yes, but I would add that Pushing Ice is a major novel featuring complex, believable female protagonists. They deal with frustration and competition on an intellectual level; in a first-contact story, there is a lot of both. People change only gradually (clinging to old beliefs) as the universe changes drastically around them.Several chapters build toward crises, and I hesitated to start the next because some character faced certain defeat. But few disappeared, and new scientific concepts are thereby introduced. The last chapter really does not end the tale- you will find yourself wondering what the crew of Rockhopper will encounter next. This book really pulls you into their lives.
This work is best read in the context of Reich's work as a whole. In particular, this work is quite different from the rest and reminds us how prolific the author is. In this book, Reich draws parallels between the crucifixion and modern day emotional pathologies. It may be painful for some to read this book. It equates the 'murder of Christ' with a common modern day phenomenon of which we are all active participants.
heavy to read!! still worth it to get to understand how institutions and the masses function over individual persons willing to change our paradigms!!
I am a huge Dali fan and this is another one of those books that gives a great insight into the man's thoughts and feelings.
This portable heater is good for use in your office, den or sleeping area..It is quiet and efficient,and is good for spot heating...please keep away from drapes or rugs,and small children,who might mistake this heater for a toy...Otherwise this is a good deal...Mine came with a remote to adjust setttings more easily...4 star rated...
I have read many books about the Lindbergh kidnapping. I feel Lloyd Gardner's book is thoroughly and thoughtfully researched. I have read it twice carefully and each time I read it I discovered new information. Who was John Condon? Why did Violet Sharpe commit suicide? Why did Lindbergh act so strangely the night of March 1,1932? Does a parent call his attorney before calling the police when he suspects his 20 month old child is missing? There are so many bizarre events surrounding the disappearance of the Lindbergh baby that it is no surprise that Lloyd Gardner titled his book "The Case That Never Dies". The trial was a farce and a circus: an embarrassment to the State of New Jersey. Read it!!!!
Written with the motorist and independent traveler in mind. Carefully chosen itineraries guide you to historic towns and villages, beauty spots and some lesser-known areas. Distinctive page symbols point out the information you need. Useful information gives opening times, transport, currency, accomodation and much more. Color photographs capture the true essence of this fascinating region.
The first twelve numbers recorded in 1952 will offend those anti-mono listeners who can not support the noise very audible.But don't forget that the liner notes have told you so.The second set recorded in 1959,is worth the price alone of this cd.What i mean is that when you have OSCAR PETERSON at his peak playing the music of DUKE ELLINGTON,it's simply for any jazz fans,the quickest way to get to heaven.OSCAR knows his craft;he can get around those tunes anytime and always find new settings for you to rediscover them.In fact he did,because he recorded ELLINGTON tunes again after that.On these recordings,he has mostly stayed with the tunes and did not go for the adventurous ways.Let's not forget that NORMAN GRANZ,the original producer of this series of songbooks devoted to the composers wanted these to appeal to the mainstream crowd.Mission accomplie.
Extremely quiet and very well constructed. Warms up a cold room quite quickly. I have read complaints in the past about oil-filled radiators leaving the room smelling of oil. Not a problem with this unit -- the manual states to run the unit on high for 2-3 hrs in a ventilated room when you first receive it.I live in a 75 yr old brick & plaster home with no insulation on the outside walls and no basement heat. The unit works wonderfully in my upstairs bathroom. (The manual states that you should not use the unit in bathrooms, but I am careful to place it away from any sources of water.) It also works well in the basement bedroom, but it will not heat the entire basement.The only complaint is with the digital display. It is difficult to read, but not impossible. The mfr should consider a magnifying lens over the display or perhaps backlighting the LED display.
This volume is a compilation of ballads taken from albums Joe Henderson recorded in the period 1992 to 1997. The music is supurb - Henderson almost whispers through his saxophone - and provides the perfect setting for a pleasant evening. Those who seek a late night CD look no further! Those who wish to explore Henderson's work of the nineties in more detail should consider buying (one of) the albums used for this compilation: "Lush Life", "So Near, So Far", "Double Rainbow", or "Porgy & Bess".
Guidance for workout training, eating healthy, and caring for your body with ease and diligence. Recipes for making beauty products and remedies from organic ingredients. Guidance for simple menus and recipes for following a healthy eating program that the family (kids included) can enjoy. She educates readers about food quality, effects of nutritional combinations, and various effects foods can produce on the body. She provides guidance to incorporating smart, effective changes to improve one's health and appearance. She's proof treating your body well at any age by adopting healthy lifestyle changes and simple fitness routines can make dramatic improvements to one's health, flexibility, strength, and outward beauty.
This was a big gift from Santa to my 5-year-old son and it also gets played with by my 3-year-old son.I put it together in about an hour or so and that was fun for me. The instructions are relatively rotten, but I got it together. I agree that it is not the sturdiest. I had to clamp (AFTER superglueing) two important levels for the rappelling line to work. Whoever was in charge of getting parts to fit together missed the mark.BUT.... I got this toy for $20 bucks and I was willing to do some supergluing...so, the result is a toy that my sons love. There is a lot to do in this Bat Cave and they have a lot of fun doing it.We don't have trouble with it falling over - we just lean it slightly against a wall - no big deal.
My 5 year old son has the original batcave, but he had seen this one and really wanted it. It went on sale at our local TOYS R US, so I decided to give it a shot...he was thrilled. At first when I saw all the pieces, I thought I'd made a mistake, but it was really easy and fast to put together. The cardboard backing doesn't fit properly, so we just took it off. The elevator sticks sometimes, but none of these things bother my son...he still think's it's "the coolest ever". Might not have been worth full price (from a mom's point of view), but it was worth every penny because my son loves it.
My son received the bat cave for Christmas. He LOVES it! Of course, it required adult assembly. The adults did become very frustrated and annoyed at the lack of instructions. You would think the pictures would be enough! Once it was up, we knew with one little push, everything would come crashing down. We had to superglue some of the parts AND we screwed it into the wall so it wouldn't fall over every two seconds. The plastic parts do seem very flimsy but I think it'll stand up anyway. My son is only 3 and he loves this bat cave.
...while I may think it's not the sturdiest of toys my son loves it! He got it from Santa and has played with it every day since. He is 4 and is using his imagination and having fun. I think that is what the toys is all about!I have read several reviews on different products where the parents are frustrated putting things together. Really if the children love it I don't see what the big deal is.With all that said, my son loves his Batcave!
Almost 500 pages! The author, Fritz Springmeier, shares a tone of info that's mind blowing. It may not all be 100% true yet just a fraction of it being true is astounding. A highly recommended read.This book, though out of print, is freely available in PDF format, at the time of writing this review. If you search for its title on Yahoo there will be some links showing the PDF format for download. One of the sites it can be found on is ministryoflies-com.Springmeier also has a one hour video that can be freely watched. It's also under the same title as the book, and can be better found by searching with Google in the Video section of the search options. It's not as comprehensive as the book but worthwhile. God bless.
As I said, good to very good for small to medium size rooms (12x12). Heaters have 3 speeds, oscillation, timer and theromostat shut off to save heat. I have 3. The oscillation stopped on one and Delonghi replaced it. Price has jumped from $39 to $69 online, a little high. I keep mine on low, especially in bedroom and only occasionally on high to increase room temp. quickly. These would help living rooms with central heat. I read the electric meter daily and chart usage. I shut them off when not home or use timers, except as needed for warmth. See how it does in your environment. Some rooms aremore drafty than others. I built frames with plastic that I use in winter. Important to seal off cold air as much as possible to take advantage of heaters and savings. It's good to read reviews and even try some models that you can return if not suitable.
My five year old daughter brought this book home from her school library and we read it over and over again. She loved the rhythm of the language and rhyme in the story. She also seemed drawn to the vibrant illustrations. As a parent, I liked how it incorporated many people of all shades as Spanish dancers. It showed appreciation of a culture is not based on your genetic heritage. It reaffirmed that we all can celebrate life with each other.
This book avoids the pitfall of trying to explain the deeper meanings behind Halloween. It's main focus is on Emily Elizabeth and Clifford deciding what costumes to wear for the holiday, and remembering the things they did with their friends to celebrate last year. Totally age-appropriate introduction for under-threes.
This is a really great Animal Ark Pets book. A new boy named Jack moves into Welford. Mandy and James know he's sad so they try to get him to adopt a rabbit, but Jack doesn't want one. Then at a picnic the rabbit is in danger. Will Jack be able to save him in time?
I just bought this toy for my 4 year old daughter. She absolutely loves it and is playing with it every day! She was very excited pulling out the puppies to see how many the mommy would have. I would really recommend this toy, especially to those who love puppies!
Not to date myself, but I have the original on well-used vinyl. This album is one of my all time favorites because of the originality of the music. Sure, comparisons can be (and have been) made to many other groups, but each song is a slightly different style. Fun surprises for those listening very closely (headphones help). ENJOY!!!
When it was announced that this remastered CD version would reveal new things to even the most accustomed Klaatu fan, I was skeptical. Then I heard it. No other CD edition comes remotely close to this one! My only, _singular_ gripe is that an extra crossfade was added between True-Life Hero and Doctor Marvello (which the band insists was wanted by them ever since the first days of the album, and that they had passed on it on the original release simply because they had maxxed out their studio's capacities). Apart from that, this is an amazing reissue! And now that Hope is ready and on its way, I'm looking forward to hearing that remastered issue as well. Unreal!...Oh, and the album is really great as well. They're _not_ the Beatles, time has proven us that... but this album is worthy of the Beatles moniker! Sun King it is.
This is a great summary program about all of the work George and Joy Adamson did. It features Elsa, Boy, Christian, and the lives and personalities of George and Joy. A lot of perspective from Mrs. McKenna who played Joy in the film.
One of my top books of my 7 decades of reading! Love the way it's told in the voice of the 13-year-old. Great descriptions of the French setting in the country!!
This is so much better than an external device. No extra power source to worry about and less clutter. If you're looking for extra USB and Firewire ports, this is the way to go. I only wish the firewire speed was 800 instead of 400, but at $40, who can complain? If you think you're a luddite and can't install a PCI card, I can tell you it's really easy. Not much different than plugging in your USB device, actually. Just open your computer, remove the PCI cover (one screw) and pop this one in! And if you have Mac OSX 10.28 or above, no driver is needed. I was up and running in five minutes.
I ordered this card yesterday (19 Oct 2006) and received it today (20 Oct 2006), free shipping with Prime - excellent service.The card?I installed it in my Quicksilver in 3 minutes and 2 minutes later my USB 2.0 300GB external disk drive was screaming through a complete backup.No need to go to the vendor's web site for drivers - Tiger supports it out of the box. Superb value.
This C.D. was my first purchase from an American supplier,I must say that I was most impressed with their response and the delivery which took only 13 days from a small town in Kentucky to my home address,all for a cost of only about 11.The C.D. which originated from a recording made in 1957,is of first class quality and I am very pleased with this purchase, it replaces a vinyl disc that I can no longer play,and I hope to replace some of the other records of the same era.
If you can only afford one Ella songbook set, make Ellington the one. Ella and Duke are perfectly matched. Having her sing with the composer is a unique feature of this set. There is an exuberant spontaneity here which is unmatched by any other songbook album. This mean that there are some imperfections and improvisations, and that's what jazz is. The material is fabulous. The obvious reciprocal adoration and respect of these two legends permeate everything. It is one of the all time great jazz albums ever. Not to be missed.
Even if i could have done without the third disc,this tribute to DUKE ELLINGTON really hits home ,and is a must buy for anyone interested in these two legends of jazz.ELLA takes more chances here than in previous and later records of the series ,and this is probably due to DUKE himself who took an active part by creating new songs and rearranging a few of his classics.CARAVAN shows ELLA in a rare sensual mood ,and does she delivers?All the well known songs of ELLINGTON are present, from MOOD INDIGO to SOPHISTICATED LADY.The only songbook celebrating a non BROADWAY composer was indeed worth its price.
Well... I really despise reading. I hate it with a passion. There has never been a time when I decide to just "pick up a book" for a good time, I usually won't even consider that in my plans. However, a few summers ago I picked up King Rat. And I picked it up again a few weeks later. I lost it, but bought it last summer. I finished it in a weekend because I just couldn't put it down. I read it again a couple weeks ago. Every time you finish that book, something just comes over you, I swear it. It's the most amazing book I have ever, or will ever read in my entire life. Now that that's done, I can go paint my nails.
King Rat, tied with Shogun, is the best of Clavell's Asian Saga. He incorporated, and illustrated the very core of what it is to be a man. What makes this book an instant classic, is the simple, yet horrific, setting. Also, Clavell was able to fill each page with such meaning, he didn't have to make a several-hundred-page-behemoth of a book in order to digest the meaning within it. Compelling was the depth that a man falls to in such a desolate existance, and the measures required to lift a man up to some degree of dignity. For his ability to depict the strength of charicter of this western man in asia, Clavell has earned a place of honor among the great novellest of our time.
Great! Reminded me of The great escape only without the escape. Very moving.
I found this to be a very entertaining and insightful book. That the author lived through the experience is clear as one reads. Although some of the subplots died off with no explanation and the ending was a bit anticlimactic, overall it kept me turning the pages and I finished it in two days. Some of the dialogue remains with me to this day like from a dying man:(paraphrasing here) "From nothing and into nothing with 22 years in-between, seems kind of pointless doesn't it?" I recommend this book as one any fan of WWII fiction should read.
Interesting book with a very different premise. Had read it before, but still enjoyed it the second time. Its set in WW2, but is not really about the fighting.
I rated this book as high as book godfather and brave new world !
Unlike other James Clavell novels, King Rat had a point of reference in regard to a place and time that is embedded in more recent memories of people my age.It was not, in my view, as well written as the more completely fictional works but, nonetheless, it described very well the attitudes and stresses of humans in close contact, starving and in fear of death at any moment.The interplays between characters were well drawn to an extent that made up for the absence of the swashbuckling excitement of Tai Pan, Noble House and Shogun. King Rat was different, less exciting but despite that, enjoyable and informative.Sceptic Ian
I love almost everything about this toddler puzzle. I don't like that it starts with 0 zero, since I've been teaching to count starting with 1.
This is a great puzzle to have in a childcare center , the children love working with the different numbers
Shirley Horn is not an artist for compilations. Please refer to the originals ... You will find all of them in each CD in the Amazon store. This is no more than a Verve penny-hunter CD. Worst of all be aware that the same track Come a Little Closer is included in another compilation title in the store (The Ultimate Shirley Horn). An absurd. Go direct to titles like `You Wont Foget Me` or `Here`s to Life` or `Close Enough for Love` or all titles in the store but not to those dishonest compilations.
Loved the documentary about Mozart. I learned things I never knew about him. Too bad he died so young, can you imagine the amount of music he could have written?
These canisters are well made and the lids fit tightly. However, I ordered Cinnabar and was disappointed in the color. It is like burnt orange and I wanted something in a deep red color. Be sure of the color before you order.
This product was very nice and I would have kept it had the color been what I saw online. The picture online showed a dark scarlet red canister set and what I received was a bright fire engine red canister set. It did not match my decor so I had to send it back - sadly.
Impressive punk band.. Best of the late seventies/early eigthies. Can't help listening over and over.
What I found in this book was something certainly unexpected.I thought it would just be a coffee-table catalogue with episode reviews and character profiles, but instead it was that and much more. The book is made to look like a surveillance survey of the Sopranos family. It's pretty fun to read what the feds 'allegedly' think about some characters or events of the show, but what disturbed me was the fiction that was written there. Some facts are mere fantasies of the author and I don't think they are authorized by David Chase or anyone else from the creative team of the show.So, it's a four-star book, still a good one.
My children (ages 5-10) love this book. I have also read from this book to hospitalized teenagers; when I read Oedipus I finished the story and heard a chorus of "read it again!"I noticed that some of the reviews posted here say that this book is unsuitable for children, but I wonder if the reviewers actually tried reading the book to them.
I've had great experiences with this scanner connected to Win XP, using the ADF to scan 50 pages at a time without problems. Unfortunately I just bought a iMac G5 desktop & discovered that there is no Xerox support for Mac OS X ! So I will need to keep using my Windows laptop if I want to scan....otherwise a fine product.update March 2009: ExactScan 2 for the Mac now supports this scanner -- pricey software but worth it for me since after five years the scanner is still working great in regular use.
For a cheap sheet-feed scanner the 510 seems an adequate unit (I paid 185 including delivery and VAT) and I've used mine daily for 8 months scanning many thousands of pages. After a paper jam the scanner will not automatically recover - and refuses to continue scanning. In Windows XP the solution is to switch off the scanner for 10 seconds then on again. After up to 90 seconds the scanner will reset itself and the job can be continued. But who'd guess that that was possible ? The instructions make no mention of it and apparently owners have been starting jobs all over again after a jam. The software has worked flawlessly.
This is a very effective toy. After rolling a few 7's or 11's it becomes obvious that even a cursory examination will expose cheating methodology.
I personally like the control that the Zen Xtra gives you in organizing and classifying your music. It also creates playlists on the go for you (combining tracks by the same Artist, the same album, or same genre) for easy playback retrieval.The software that it comes with, Creative MediaSource, is great also, however may be a little complicated for new computer users. It lets you edit all track information (Artist, genre, album, track #) regardless of what ID3 tags were used when recording.Also do I need to remind you of the removable battery. Poor iPod users have to shell out almost $100 to get their battery serviced/replaced when its dead. Also you can store, data files, video files, etc. on the Zen Xtra (it's a portable hard drive also)The only negative is the buttons on the case are oddly positioned.Overall I don't recommend this item for newbies. But if you want great control and organization over your MP3s, this is definitely the player for you!!!
I bought this MP3 player about 6 months ago, and love it. I got an upgrade to expand the hard drive to 80GB and I can't even see myself filling half of it anytime soon. The menu structure is very intuitive, and the screen is very easy on the eyes. I have seen other MP3 players that hurt the eyes when you're looking at the screen for too long.The only issue I have with the player is a short battery life, but I usually have it plugged in with the AC adapter anyway. All in all, if you're looking for a large capacity MP3 player that won't break your bank, this is the one to get.
I take this unit everywhere, and love it. I use this in my car with a C. Crane FM Transmitter and boy is it oh so nice to essentially have your own radio station.I have to admit that the case could be a little better. You have to open it to see the display and make music selections.I also wish it came with a car power adapter, I'm still trying to hunt one down for this particular model so that I don't have to run it off the battery all the time.Other than these two minor issues, this unit is a great value. The battery is easy to get to (meaning you don't have to take the thing apart like the Ipod) and it will play wma files and hooks up to my Windows Systems!
I purchased this player over 4 months ago. I read all of the reviews and I was aware of the pros and cons going in. This player is slightly thicker than the same capacity ipod. On the upside, the battery is user upgradeable, which iPod users can't do. The main downside to this player is the software. I highly recommend NotMad Explorer from http://www.redchairsoftware.com as a replacement for the poor Creative software. The upsides are great sound quality, great capacity, decent battery life and a good price. If you don't care about looking trendy carrying an iPod, take a good hard look at the Creative Nomad Zen players.
I have had mine for a month now and have to say I have enjoyed it. The Pros:Price! Almost half what an ipod would cost you! I don't care how it looks and I always drive so the size is not important to me.Sound quality is wonderful, I really like the smart volume sound normalization. Yes the included earphones suck but everyone replaces them anyway. I quickly got to use to the interface and can find any song/playlist etc fast enough. I also liked the fact that you can save custom playlist you made on the player not just the computer!Cons. Creative software stinks. It's horrible. redchair software makes nice software that allows you to do everything you would want to and more! The front cover can pop off easily but I always have mine in the case so I didn't notice after first day.
I had an RCA mp3 player that used cards. I decided to purchase this one based on its reviews and cost. I'm not sorry. The only thing I had challenges with was transferring music from my PC and CD's to the player. I searched and searched and finally figured it out. I think Creative needs to have a picture of the software in the quick guide so people know which window is which.I love the ability to organize and listen to music using several options: genre, artist, etc.. It transfers very quickly (using a 2.0 USB hook-up) and sounds great. I'm just beginning to play with it so I'm looking forward to finding out everything I can about it. It isn't much larger/heavier than an IPOD and is very versatile (not to mention a whole lot less expansive). I also like the fact that it's a "mini" external hard drive so I can store large files on it if necessary.
I have had this unit and used it for a couple of years now. the reason that I bought it was its portability and I could use it both in the car or have it with me when I am walking. So, from that aspect, it is very nice. now every positive normally comes with a few negatives. as you may guess, due to the size of this unit, the receiver is probably not the most powerful or accurate receiver, so you need to learn how to cope with these aspects of it. I have had cases where the receiver got confused when I was in the city (San Francisco) with a couple of tall buildings around or when I was driving around on windy roads in Sierra. But other than that it has worked fine for me and I have used it in town and country. I found another navigation SW for it that I think is nicer and performs better than the one that came with it from HP. (...) mine is an MMCX.
I was looking for a solid GPS that wouldn't require the outlay of several hundred dollars. I already owned the IPAQ RX3715. Out of the box the IPAQ GPS unit was partially charged, the software was easy to install and sync with my IPAQ. The unit picked-up strong signals quickly.The maps are a tad dated and although there is an update for the software I have decided to keep the original for now. A savings play.The unit works great in the car, which is the reason for the purchase. You will want to purchase a mount for your IPAQ. The screen will get washed out in bright sun. With the voice command on, this is no problem as you still can hear where you need to turn in plenty of time to figure it out.Overall this has made a terrific GPS investment for the price.Comments are always welcome.
I live in NH and just started freshwater fishing for the first time. I went from knowing nothing to gaining some great info on what gear to buy (and not to buy), cold water vs warm water fishing, fish species and lake conditions. There were several helpful pages for techniques for fishing either on a boat or from the shore.The only down side that was not covered (thus 4 stars instead of 5). Was fish cleaning and keeping, and how to do proper catch and release on different species.Good book overall that covers a rather large amount of ground.
It was never offically Christmas until my mother hooked up the Jingle Bells door chime and my father put Ramsey Lewis " Sound of Christmas" on our HiFi. This is a fantastic holiday treat. I have loads of Christmas music, but I place this recording very high in my December rotation. The strings that play on" What Are You Doing New Years Eve?" and the bouncy "Sleigh Ride" take me back to the Wonder Years of my youth. I believe it will become an evergreen in your collection. Happy Holidays or as Ramsey puts it...Merry Christmas Baby !
This was a real find! I've always been a Ramsey Lewis fan since I'm in w/ the In-crowd' hit of the '60's! A nice easy 'laid back' compilation of Christmas songs. Add this to your Christmas CD's, you won't be disappointed!!
This is my best shoe purchase in a long time. Sporty look. Comfortable. Perfect fit. I wear them every chance I get.
Another masterpiece from Rockport. I recently purchase these shoes and I am so happy with this product. It is very comfortable. Its worth every single penny.
This book is a thorough and gentle explanation of the how the process of forgiveness works, and how completeness in our own lives (we who have been hurt and need to forgive the person(s) who hurt us) can be attained through the five stages of forgiveness. It is also a gentle and compassionate explanation of how hurts affect the various aspects of our lives. Linn's format is easy to read and to understand. A must for anyone's bookshelf.
This book, based on Kuebler Ross five stages of death & dying, is a wonderful way to work through life's hurts, giving us permission to take our anger, pain, bargaining, to God in prayer & allow Him to show us how to stop letting the past continue to hurt us in the present. The section on the unconditional love of Christ is healing in its presentation. I have used it over & over & have loaned this book out to my friends in need.
This book is very detailed, technical and complex. If you're seriously considering exploring the photogravure technique on copper, this book is a must. It tells you everything you will ever need and all the complicated steps in the process. However, there are few historical or contemporary photogravure reproductions which is why this book gets only a four star rating from this reviewer. If you are seriously considering the photogravure process as one you would like to explore, I recommend starting with solar plates rather than copper. It is much less complicated and toxic. A very good resource is "Printmaking in the Sun" (2001) by Dan Welden, inventor of this method.
this is the story of what happened to one little boy,who was kidnapped from a loving family in the Sudan, and forced to become a slave at age seven. He remained a slave, untill he finally escpaed ten years later.It did not happen hundreds of years ago. It happenned thirteen years ago.Its written in a gentle voice, but one that conveys the tragedy well.It NEEDS to be read, NOW.Please, if you are a human being, and feel that slavery is wrong and kidnapping is wrong, then read this.I have also been going through the website that Francis Bok is attached to and am learning a great dealhttp://www.iabolish.comDear Francis Bok, if youre reading this> youre a good man and a tribute to the human spirit. A good son.
overall, the documentary was pretty cool. however, about 99% of the beach boys clips were from a prior documentary, an american family from '85. they should have included the clip of dennis singing manson's song never learnt not to love (aka cease to exist). especially since the title of the movie is the beach boys & the satan. but did have cool footage of interviews with dick dale and dean torrence and the chantays. also kim fowley was cool too.
When I first bought this CD player I thought it wouldn't work all that well or the sound wouldn't be that great but it turned out to be a great product. Although I would invest in a more expensive brand if you're looking for more functions the Koss has been very reliable and at such a great price!
This is an awsome game for the psp. You should definetely pick this game up at a store. There are party play games which include ''shot blocker'' and ''arcade shootout''. There is wireless head to head mode. This game also includes ea's pocket trax which is when you get to listen to any of the songs from the game. Also King of the court mode. So pick this game up its awsome!!!blue
Here is a wealth of colorful accessible piano literature for the intermediate to advancing pianist. These sound pictures should be more widely performed and listened to. The pianistic interpretation is very accurate and generally good, but could be more daring and flamboyant in some of the interpretation.
Every Mercer Mayer book is a hit. I try to buy all the new titles, and my grandkids love them! The art work & the stories are great for adults & children.
In a year when INDIANA JONES AND THE TEMPLE OF DOOM, GHOSTBUSTERS, and BEVERLY HILLS COP were conquering the box office - this film got lost in the shuffle.Dudley Moore plays a symphony conductor who learns that his wife is having an affair. He hatches an intricate plan to kill her and frame her lover for the murder. However, in typical Dudley Moore fashion, nothing goes as planned.The film starts slow as it establishes the characters, but the final sequence is worth the wait. Fans of the ARTHUR films will also feel right at home as Dudley falls back into ARTHUR's familiar intoxicated-state with an overdose of tranquilizers.
This movie is so fitting of Moore [He plays an orchestra conductor.] since he was an accomplished musician himself. It's roll-on-the-floor humour when the conductor's fantasy goes awry.
I have never seen the original old Unfaithfully Yours movie but I saw this remake on HBO and I thought it was very funny! Dudley Moore, Nastassia Kinski and the rest of the cast were great and I'm glad that this underrated movie is finally on DVD and I highly recommend it. Dudley Moore plays a composer married to a much younger woman played by Nastassia Kinski and he goes kind of mad with jealousy when he thinks she is having an affair and has bizarre fantasies of doing her in! But is she really having an affair or is he letting his imagination run away with him? Watch this hilariously funny underappreciated movie and find out!
Insight Guide Bali is an exceptional travel guide. The history is well written and rich with interesting facts. I reads like a good novel. The maps are deteiled with plenty of cross references. There are plenty of travel tips from riding a bus to how to order food without MSGS. It appears that every possible travel issue has been addressed; from how not to get arrested to finding the swank resorts. The book is worth the price just for the exquisite pictures. I have never seen a travel book with photos as exceptional as these. Usually I purchase a couple of guide books before going to a new location, but this time I will only use the Insight Guide Bali.
This 1973 book is keyed to Harry Smith's famed music anthology, now available on CD. It is edited by Josh Dunson and Ethel Raim, and includes interviews with Moses Asch and Frank Walker, as well as song lyrics, chords (for many but not all songs on the Anthology) new anecdotes, and very nice b & w photos of artists and rural scenes (folks hanging out on front porches, etc.) Some of the anecdotes are a bit disturbing--about Bascam Lunsford's racism and anti-semitism, for example--but it'll save ear-strain trying to grasp some of the numbers. May not be worth the hefty price being asked here, but a nice volume for those of us drawn to this strange, exciting music.
Item was easy to order.Item was delivered as promised on time.This item will be purchased again.
I bought this book after i failed to get the score i needed in the TOEFL exam, and it helped me a lot at the second time I did the test. The best part about it is the CD-ROM that has 4 complete tests so you can practice just like if you were doing the real Computer Based TOEFL Test. It helps you to get in the mood of the test so you are prepared when you take the real test. There is only one thing that should be enhanced in this book. The review and hints at the "writing test part" are not enough. There should be more essay examples. Over all, this is the book you have to buy if you are planning to pay just for one book to prepare for the TOEFL
This book is the second-best book on TOEFL after Educational Testing Services' (ETS) TOEFL book.
The blockheadedness & utter insensitivity of the two reviews below, in an open forum such as this, demand a response.Frances Sherwood's reimagining of the life of the brave Mary Wollstonecraft, the woman who wrote the groundsbreaking "Vindication of the Rights of Women," proves quite the equal of her subject. Sherwood brilliantly recreates her protagonist's haunted Enlightenment world, at once alive with new ideas & half-smothered in medieval fears & prejudice. Better still, however, her history goes far beyond the merely correct, investing its conflicts with the chilled yet heightened humanity they must've engendered at the time. The "Mary" of this book has the wallop of her namesake, providing a new testament to women's toil & tragedy while never losing her humor, her smarts, or her desires.
I have to say I am a sceptic with herbal cures but saw a short article in AARP so thought I would try it. I have been trying to use diet to lower my cholestrol so I could avoid medications but after a year of that and the cholestene my cholestrol was lower than it had been in 7 years, even my doctor was impressed. I am only able to take 2-3 a day since more gave me stomach problems like high fiber would.overall cholsestrol down 21 pts
I've listened to heavy metal/hardrock music for close to 20 years now and this is the one record in 10 years that have made me go WOW! At first i didn't think this record was much to have but it grew on me and now i just love it. This record is one that can and will stand the test of time. I'm sure that this record will remembered as a hardrock classic if Evergrey makes it outside Sweden. Tom's voice cries with agony and you can't help to get swept away along with it.
Bryanna has created the absolute best cookbook ever! My friend originally bought this and when she told me I should get it, I remarked "why would I need an Italian cookbook, I know how to cook vegan Italian!" I was then treated to several meals at my friend's apt. where she used Nonna's Italian Kitchen and was I wowed!!! I couldn't believe how delicious these recipes are and how satisfying - much better than anything I've ever had as a non-vegan! Now every year for my birhday, my friend knows what I want for my birthday meal from her- the lasagna al forno Bolognese on page 113 - to die for (or to live for really!). Buy this book - all my non-vegan friends love the dishes and can't believe it's not dairy!
This is a wonderful book with a nice combination of quick and other more involved recipes. I love Grogen's side notes on the recipes and her comments in the beginning of the book. The recipes are divided up into courses of an authentic Italian meal, so it's easy to plan a full menu, or just a single dish. These dishes would appeal to anyone, vegan or not. These are good, wholesome meals. Grogan mentioned in the introduction that Italian was her favorite cuisine with Chinese and Indian running a close second. Maybe she could be convinced to write a Chinese Vegan cookbook next?
This book is not only a must for vegan kitchens but for everyone who likes Italian food. The recipes make very authentic tasting vegan versions of popular dishes. My vegan friends are enjoying this food too, always the best sign.
As with their first dvd, the instruction in this is clear and detailed. The pace is faster than in the first dvd, and they do not cover as many moves, but it is still worth it.
As a former teenage girl, I decided this book would be perfect for my teenage daughter. I was really surprised when, while talking to my husband, I learned that he had read and enjoyed this book as a teenager as well. (And remembered it, twenty years later!)
Out of the hundreds of books I have read through out my life, this book remains one of the most endearing to me. Maybe it is the way Cleo triumphs over her life troubles and struggles that I like. Or maybe it was something that I would have liked to do as a girl-escape and make my own pathway toward learning about myself. We are reading this book in our book review group in March 06 and I am so excited to share this with my adult friends who maybe by reading it will have gained an appreciation for this young 16 year old hero.
Whatever Bill Frisell touches seems to turn to "gold". And the sweetest punch is another in a long line of golden eggs.Add to that some great vocals by Cassandra Wilson and of course Elvis Costello and you truely have some sweet sweet punch. Drink it up!
This was a can't-miss concept, and the result was even greater than I assumed it would be. Frisell proves himself as an imaginative orchestrator, never heavy-handed. The feeling of the album is light but substantive, effervescent but always grounded in the deep well of musicianship brought to the project by Frisell, Costello/Bacharach, and a lineup that includes such giants as Brian Blade, Don Byron and Cassandra Wilson.
This is about the most versatile bass amp I've ever had. It's very clean and punchy and has plenty of power. with two preamps, a compressor, a graphic eq and high and low contour controls, this amp covers it all. Hard to beat for the price.
The woman known to rock and roll history as Tina Turner proves once again why she is, and will always be, the "Queen of Rock and Roll." Fiery and dynamic.
Tina is great. I bought this because of the song selection on the DVD. The only problem is when she goes into Proud Mary and the band kicks in after her intro for a moment and then she goes back to her intro the sound is distorted. I have a very good system and while this was on medium sound,the sound was distorted during this 3 second burst of drums and bass during the intro to this song. What is going on?
Miss Turner never fades!!!! She will always be number one!!!. This is a must see for everyone young and old alike!!!! Grrrrrreat Show!!!!!
Tina Turner outdoes herself! She really knows how to work a stage (almost a lost talent in the MTV era), and the music is first-rate. It is no wonder that the entire tour was such an incredible success. Turner also surrounded herself with first-rate musicians and dancers. I heartily recommend this video to anyone.
This is a great concert by Tina.Very entertaining from start to finish.Nowhere near as good as Tina - One last time in concert ( which was brilliant) but still extremely good and a must have for any fan of Tina.
This is a great DVD of a great performance. If you think Tina Turner is just "okay", you'll be a real fan after seeing her in concert in Amsterdam. Tina is full of energy, the dancers and musicians do a magnificent job, the camera work is exceptional, and the DTS sound is phenomenal. Among the best concert DVDs out there.
Book was a little hard to get started on but once into it was quite interesting. Written different than what I am ;used to
Ivan Doag has captured my attention. After reading this great adventure story, I intend to order more books written by this author. His ability to create dialogue and tell a fascinating tale is remarkable. My only wish is for a sequel.
Based on a true incident, this tale of the escape of indentured workers from a fish packing plant in Alaska in the 1800s is hair-raising adventure. Doig's descriptions of the trials the men face in the unforgiving wilderness are masterful and vivid. There's humor here too. At first, the syntax was challenging, but Doig succeeds in giving the narrative a Scandinavian and historical flavor through the language. This boat takes some startling turns, so hang on!
An enjoyable survivalist tale, along the lines of "The Long Walk" or even Shackleton's "Endurance." Basically four workers escape an indentured work camp in Alaska, steal an Indian canoe and try to make it down the coast of British Columbia and what is now the state of Washington to make it to the settlement at the mouth of the Columbia River.The depictions of the water and scenery is good. The author spent some time researching the surroundings. The rough humor and tension between the men is hilarious. As they battled starvation during their journey my only question is why didn't they catch more fish, as that coastline is chock full of fish, but that's a minor detail. Love the scene where they get to witness a Northwest Indian tribe bring in a whale, as that is of historical significance. You'll feel an ache in your own back and blisters on your own hands as you empathize with their journey.First book of his that I've read, and I now want to find more.
Northwinds seems to have a good share of originality to their sound.It might be sort of tough to describe their work,but I'll try.A French progressive outfit that blends old school Sabbath with celtic music.Would that formula even fly?It does here.Notice some truly inspired heavy guitar work along with some superb keyboard and flute playing on 'Great...'.A total of six cuts,with each one averaging eight minutes.Tunes I couldn't get enough of were the title track,"Great God Pan",their Sabbath cover of "A National Acrobat"(talk about covering an obscurity-great work!!)and the epic "The Forest Of Koncerei".A real keeper.
it was a gift for my son he use to have the smaller version years ago . so, when i saw this i new he would enjoy it. thank you.
I definitely like this. All the features that has makes this product smooth and easy to operate.Definitely recommended.
Mostly very happy with this product, except the fact that it's dreadfully slow on fast forward or reverse. As you might imagine this can become very frustrating at times. And also totally unable to skip ahead to another part of the recording immediately similar to what the ipod can do.---C'mon Sandisk, give us some software to correct these serious inconveniences!!
I bought it to use for taking my Unbox videos mobile. Great, clear little screen. Very easy to use, very easy to transfer media, very compatable with Unbox, Windows Media, Rhapsody and Yahoo Music (which will soon be Rhapsody, too). Can't load my photos on it, but I think that's more of a problem with my computer rather than the Sansa Media Converter. (It originally worked until I started messing a bit with it, and it was easy to use, too. Will fix the problem when I find the time. Until then, it's not a big deal.) Expansion slot is a big plus. The View automatically senses what media is being loaded and adjusts accordingly, a feature that is absent in the E250, which I also have. Great sound with the right earphones. Loads of space. What else can I say that hasn't already been said. I love my little View and hope it lasts a long time. Good price at Amazon, as always.
I really like this MP3 player. I have downloaded many videos and about 400 songs on it and it still has plenty memory...with the help of a Micro SDHC 8MB card of course. Overall pretty good except.*Slow to rewind and fast forward*It freezes occasionally*instead of going to the next video, you have to manually select the next video when its done.*Would be nice if you could still listen to it while charging. Although you can if your computer is sleep, it will still charge.
I've had this mp3 player for a few months now and really like it. It's very lightweight, easy to use (I saw from the reviews here to format it before attempting to add music - that's the only thing that would've been unclear from the instructions), good sound quality. The battery really does last a long time if all you're doing is listening to music, which is mainly what I do. I'm very satisfied with my non-conformist (ie non-ipod) mp3 player! Saved myself a little money and don't look like everyone else out there.
I purchased this mp3 player for my daughter who really likes it. She experienced some difficulty at first downloading her music, but this problem has been resolved.The player is very easy to use - she did not even need to read the manual.
Unfortunately it hasn't been all wine and roses w/my View but overall I would say that I'm satisfied with it. After having to return my first view due to battery problems the second one I got has worked great. It has been reliable (so far) and it's a breeze to load w/my music, photos and short home videos. The sound is fine with a little tweaking and creating my own equalizer setting. The screen rotates to landscape to show videos so you get the widescreen view, albeit on a very small screen. The wheel works well to glide through the menu as well as volume control. It feels solid though definitely not noticeable on my arm when I'm working out.
Can not beat this item for the price, hands down!Excellent product with all the features you could want, period.
I am proud that the item purchased on amazon, and therefore recommends to cybernauts to use and buy on Amazon because so far is a trusted site and find everything you need to this.SanDisk Sansa View 8 GB Video MP3 Player (Black)
I loved this book. I am in the process of becoming a public speaker and wanted to be very affective with the people I speak to. This book helped me to make sure my workshop is designed in the correct order to teach from A to B rather than floundering around from one to another topic never smoothly progressing toward the ultimate goal. I am well on my way to become an excellent public speaker.
It was what I expected it was and told me what I needed to know. It's a very worthwhile purchase
I never took up any efective speaking book before. This would be my first. It has been very helpful and comes with examples that really boost your confidence. They let you see the bad, let you feel the good. Then you'll know what to follow and what not to. Recommended for shy speakers. -)
I just received the Rhomba 128M MP3 player and its quite a good value.Pluses -Recorder function also with FM radio.Nice displayLi-on Battery, good life between chargesWindows XP recognizes it as a drive, no need forspecial download software like the Rio players.NegativeFilmsy switching for track forward/backwardNo beltclipIncluded ear buds are totally useless and built for elephant size ears, you'll need to use another headphone.No expansion capabilityNeed a USB charger if you travel (these are about $10)I have used Rio MP3 players in the past (original MP300 parallel port, RioOne, S35S), but this is more functional.
It's surprisingly small which allows me to easily toss it in my pocket. Thus far I've downloaded about 50 songs and still have room for about 30-40 more. The only problem is finding the right place to download from. I avoid Kazaa due to its spyware/adware and virus problems. I currently use MusicMatch which works great with some extra work. I burn a cd first ( which I normally do anyway ), then I use the software that came with the Rhomba to burn from the cd to the Rhomba. There's probably and easier way but this works fine for me. I still recommend the Rhomba for people who are looking for a less costly mp3 player or for first time buyers of mp3s.
I, also, cannot understand why the first reader found this biography on Fredrick Douglass, racist. Personally, I found it completely the opposite. For the first time, I truly felt I understood the man behind the public image.
This is the sequel to Kin Platt's excellent mystery "Sinbad and Me". All the great characters are back: adventurous teenager Steve, his heroic bulldog Sinbad, girlfriend Minerva, her suspicious dad the Sheriff, Herk, all investigating goings on involving witches, mandrake root, and a deadly bracelet. What a great book! If you are ten on up, you'll love it! If you are an old person, you will still love it!
This product does make the appetite disappear!! However it made me very irritable while I took it. I took it for four days so I did not give it enough time to see how the fat burning part worked. The pills were also very long and caused me throat irritation. Everyone is affected differently when taking things so I would say give it a try you will notice the effects right away.
Another great purchase of the Sandra Lee cookbooks to add to my collection. Recipes so quick and easy to prepare. ~ Thank you Sandra Lee for making cooking enjoyable again for women everywhere!
this is one of sandra lee's best ever. The recipes are easy to make and best of all delicious.
Good variety of recipes, complete with brand names and suggestions....pictures are gorgeous. Good for the new or experienced but busy cook.
I love this book! Its such a fresh concept, especially for a full time working mother of 3. Full of great time saving ideas!This is a great christmas gift for people who love to cook, but dont necessarily have the time.
I am a college student. I can't afford many cookbooks because they're expensive but Amazona[.com] had this one at a good price. I am graduating in the spring and need to learn how to cook so I thought this book would help me ease my way into it. Now that I've tried it I doubt I will cook any other way. Its just too easy. I can fix an entire meal, clean up the kitchen and still have time to go out or do something afterward. I would have to give it a definite A.
This book is informative on all aspects of partial seizure disorders, from discovery to diagnosis and treatment. I loved how easy it was to read. I read this book in less than 2 days! My only disappointment is that the book didn't touch a little more on the psychological impact of the disorders (and subsequent consequences).
.......with basic factual info. A must have if you were recently diagnosed with partial seizures.
Who better to write a book on the Manson family murders than the prosecutiing attorney. Vincent Bugliosi captures what actually happened during those two nights in 1969. Through testimony of his witnesses he gets eye-witness truths abouy Manson and his family. The best book I've ever read.
I was 16 years old the summer of 1969 and remember it vividly. I didn't read Helter skelter until I was 22, when it first came out and learned for the first time many of the detail, and the book truly stays in your mind. That is what most of the other reviews say that it haunts you for many years and you actually feel that you are there on that hot summer night, Sharon and Jay talking in the bedroom and a strange woman walks in and orders them to the living room. How terrifying could it have been for Sharon watching Jay die in front of her and Frykowski and Folger fighting for their lives knowing very well her unborn child and her couldn't defend themselves. Bugliosi wrote with such compassion for the victims and we can truly thank him that these people are behind bars now. Watching Charles Manson talk on television shows how unremorseful he is and will always be.
I found this book very interesting and disturbing. It's all the details you would want to know about the Charles Manson case.To think that one man could convince people to carry out such horrendous crimes. That he had such skill in story telling and making people follow him blindly. I enjoyed reading all the details of the case and how evidence would come up and start up new leads. Bugliosi did an excellent Job of walking us through the crime, and all the way through to the Trial.I could not put the book down. It's a definite page turner, and has many photo's of the victims, the killers and the evidence. Not for the squeamish, very detailed.
This is an in your face account of the Manson family murders. Brought to you straight from the courtroom as Vince Bugliosi, the prosecuter who tried Manson and his "family", tells you this horrific story piece by piece. Complete with a photo album of the killers and their victims. How did Charles Manson make these people kill for him? What was the motive for all these murders? The cold, but true answers are told in "Helter Skelter"
Fantastic! I have read this book twice. I love the way the author narrates the real life drama of these murders, murderers and inefficiency of the LAPD. It is probably one of the scarriest books I have read so far. The author does a great job of explaining the psychological influences of Charles Manson and the crazy/hipnotic behavior of the Manson Family. He also paints a very clear picture of the long and difficult trial and the obstacles that needed to be overcome to convict Manson and his followers. It's a very interesting book from a psychological and legal stand point. I probably will read it again some time soon because the second time around helped me understand even more, the real-life occurences and legal complexities of this case.
In the begining of the book it reads "This book will scare the hell out of you" and was that ever an understatement. Charles Manson and his crew will always be the ultimate in evil. The only time you will put this book down is to sleep, that is, if you can.
My husband has always wanted to add Helter Skelter into his book collection and today he opened it as a Christmas gift. It's four hours later and he's still reading it, pausing every now and again to tell me some other disturbing connection that was made between music and the murders. This was his perfect gift!
This is a fascinating account of the Manson case from the eyes of prosecution attorney Vincent Bugliosi. Well paced, haunting, somewhat grissly, but suprisingly quite funny in places- (the defense attorney made over two hunderd objections on the first three days of the trial!). A real pager turner probably best read in the daytime so it won't give you nightmares. One quible though I feel the author has grossly misinterpreted the philiosophy of Friedrich Nietzche by affilating his philiosophy with the spread of Nazism. Yes Hitler (who shared with Manson many characteristic's; they were both loved animals more than humans, each a vegetarian, and had spent time as an "outsider" living on the fringes of society) had read his work. Yet those documents he read were greatly adulterated under the cursed hand of the authors sister, who, after the philosophers death re wrote his manuscripts to fit Nazi ideals in the hope of courting parties leader...
This book is certainly not a Pulitzer prize winner, but it is definitely a must read for any true-crime fans. I found myself unable to put the book down for hours. Bugliosi carefully unwinds the horrific details that surround these infamous murders. This book is much more than a gruesome exploitive account. I found myself understanding the late sixties as the tumultuous period that could host this episode in history.
This is an excellent book on one of the most horrific crimes ever committed even by today's standards. The research, details, and explanations are absolute top-notch. It is evident that Vincent Bugliosi is one the greatest prosecuting attorneys ever to step into the courtroom. The way he can rationally reconstruct the events of a crime and get into the heads of the criminals and lay out their motives is just amazing. The courtroom drama is re-created in dramatic detail so you can feel the tension, suspense and horror all throughout the trial. We also learn alot about cult psychology and how people can be driven to extreme bahavior. What's even scarier is that there are people in this world like Charles Manson's fanatical followers ready to do his darkest bidding.
This book by Vincent Bugliosi is by far the best book I have ever read. The Manson murders being the most interesting subject I have ever researched. Being the prosector in the longest trial in American history the author is also an extremly good writer! I recommend this book to anyone and it is well worth the money
This book is endlessly fascinating because the Manson story is endlessly fascinating and because Bugliosi (the prosecutor) and Curt Gentry (the real writer) manage to avoid sensationalism. But it's really a pedestrian work, eminently readable, but nowhere near the level of Capote (In Cold Blood) or Mailer (The Executioner's Song).
Mr. Bugliosi has been able to make us feel we were there throuhtout this nightmare. This book will keep you on your toes, wondering if you locked all doors at night. For those who had not been born yet like me, is testament that that crazy idiotic losers have been present is every generation, williwng to do the unthinkable. The skills and genious shown on behalf of Bugliosi during this trial is enough to make anyone want to achieve excellence, no matter what the field of expertise may be.
I ordered this book to read on a road trip because I have always been interested in true crime stories.This book, of all the true crime books that I have read, was by far the most gripping and interesting. It kept me on the edge of my seat throughout the entire book, and I had a hard time putting it down.Even if you do not care for true crime stories, this book is so shocking and well documented. I have since read several books about the Manson family and Tate- La Bianca tragedies and this book is the best out of them all.I strongly recommend reading this book.
I first read "Helter Skelter" the same summer I read "In Cold Blood." Both books left indelible images in my psyche and ensured I would never look at the world of crime and investigation the same again.I've never read a book quite like HS since. Bugliosi and Gentry have written a taught and gripping blow-by-blow account of the two seemingly unconnected streams of events, the Tate/La Bianca murders and Manson's cult, how they horribly intersected and the breathtaking resolution.Bugliosi's reminiscences provide both the personal anguish that the investigation caused him and his family and the urgent immediacy that gripped him and the community to see that justice was finally done.Unforgettable and unflinching, "Helter Skelter" forces us to look into the eyes of evil and learn more about ourselves.See also my reviews of the "Helter Skelter" TV movie and the audio book version.
The book Helter Skelter by Vince Bugliosi is perhaps one of the best tru-crime books I've ever read. From the story itself, to the incompetency of the LAPD; from the chilling descriptions of the murders to the way the book is set out, you just can't put it down. It's amazing how clsoe to Manson and his three co-defendants Bugliosi gets. If you're interested in true-crime stories, and even if you're not, this is a book to read, if simply to find out how horrifyingly brutal and cold humans can be.4 Stars, and don't forget to check out the photos.
Very nice playing, especially on the ballads like "I Got it Bad..." "Your Love Has Faded" and "Day Dream." Hodges' solos on these tracks are achingly pretty and Strayhorn's arrangements are elegant.
A recent documentary has noted that it is difficult to distinguish the respective compositional arrangements of Duke Ellington and Billy Strayhorn, so in sync were they in understanding the men of the orchestra and their sound. Perhaps. I have long suspected that Strayhorn soon became the dominant arranger, and this album of well-known Ellington works retooled by Strayhorn may prove the point, though the synergy was probably superior to either's contribution. Aside from such academic conjecturing, this album is outstanding. Johnny Hodges' saxophone is at the fore, with his smoothed-out Bechet melodic lilt. ***** for him! There is a soft, relaxed spirit throughout, evident in Jeeps Blue's and even Juice-a-Plenty. A caveat is that Jimmy Jones is at the piano, so do not expect the minimalism of Ellington or the sensitivity of Strayhorn. The high resolution digital mastering makes this 1961 setting as sharp as a tack. This is a very fine addition to the Ellington collection.
Fierce Eden (The Louisiana History Collection) ~ Another great collection by Jennifer Blake. A Real attention getter. If you like historical romances you will love this collection. I had trouble putting this one down.
well written, lots of historical info about a period of history that are not too well known. characters were believable, good descriptions of places and time period. was a page turner, sorry when it ended, loved the characters.
I love this toy for my son. He spends so much time manipulating it and discovering all that it is capable of. This is really his best toy ever. It is a bit difficult to assemble the tanks and green rings, but oveall I highly recommend this toy.Hydrodynamic Deluxe Building Set
for something off the beaten track, here's an extremely fun cd of music composed between 1971 and 1980 for various projects, including: some rejected tracks for a TV show in switzerland (1978), three tracks from an experimental film about an evening in the life of a striptease dancer (also 1978), an electronic work for a trade exhibition in basle (1971), theme music for a successful swiss tv quiz show (1972), music for a PR-disc made for an iron-foundry company (1972), more PR music for a company called "lansing-bagnall" (1971), and finally, music from a documentary film about an art exhibition in zurich (1980). lots of synths, keyboards, and electronics throughout. and it is all fun stuff. highly recommended for those who like something different.
This is an absolutely facinating specimen released by wierdo psych crate digger Andy Votel. Bruno Spoerri creates the beuatiful 70s synth cheese Votel just loves to reissue.Cheese usually has a negative conotation, but here, it perfectly describes the punchy confections Spoerri creates. If you can imagine Giorgio Moridor's 1970s work without the electronic syncronazation and a more improvosational approach, this is what this sound like. It contains danceable passages, but also goes deep into space, with synthasizer bloops and blips.It all amounts to a funk psych bass synth dance party that is impossible not to revel in. That fat juicy funk that you imagine when you think of the 1970s is on full display, and listening is like biting into an oh so groovey creampuff.Enjoy. Eat too much of this yummy stuff.
They were very good quality, but they are very large. They would be good for kids, but for adults that want to hold their cards they are very bulky.
Works well, especially for arthritic hands. Use it once a week with group I play cards with and having more fun due to less hand pain.
The card holder works better than most. Easy to use. The only problem is adding more cards once the holder has about fifteen in it already. Tends to be a little tight.
All of us girls loved the card holders. It did have an odor, but I sprayed them with Fabreeze and let them dry, then washed with soap and water and let them dry again. After that all was fine. We find that we even use them when we have 3 cards left. You can set it on the table and it leaves your hands free for important things--like snacks!
So, if along with inheriting your Mom's Roseville, you also got her arthritic hands, you'll want to check out these nifty card holders. No more achy palms after a hot Canasta hand, no more spilling the cards while sorting, no more locked thumbs......and you can even play relatively hands-free!The Games Dames (of the NC Piedmont Triad) love these little things.
I bought this for my ten year old daughter so she could play canasta with her grandmother. Her little hands did not allow her to hold all the cards. With the card holder she enjoys the game a lot more. I think they are grooming her as a substitute in the Canasta league!
What an incredible compendium. I would like to see the US create something similar to Japan's Cultural National Treasure and Robert Frost would certainly be included as such.
For most of us most poets live through a few poems of theirs we have read in anthologies. It may be that in the case of a poet we especially love we have gone and read most of their poetry.This volume presents a wonderful opportunity for the devotees of Frost to have in one book the work of a lifetime.For me Frost is "The Road Not Taken" and "Birches" and "Mending Wall" and a host of scattered lines, " Good fences make good neighbors" and " The land was ours, before we were the land's".Frost is also however, I must admit , for me the poet whose life casts a shadow on his work. Unfortunately perhaps I long ago read parts of the Thompson biography of Frost the central theme of which was his inveterate cruelty to all those around him.All this has left me, you will excuse this, a bit 'cool toward Frost' and I personally prefer the more musical metrics of Wallace Stevens to the canny, often pithily wise lines of Frost.
Jay Parini's ROBERT FROST: A LIFE, 1999, may rehabilitate somewhat the view of Frost as terrible person, presented in Lawrence Thompson's earlier biography. See Parini, pp.452 ff. Some reviews may tend to discourage reading Frost, because of Thompson's jaundiced portrait.This wonderful, copious collection of Frost contains many of his best poems, which do not show up in popular anthologies. And his prose is filled with wit and wisdom you might not suspect. A great contribution to our Art and our humanity.
never thought i would need these, but they have come in handy numerous times since i bought them. quite well made.
This movies great it follows the way thru a whole downhill season. Ups and down til the final race with a nail bitter the whole way. Check it out if you love downhill it worth it.
One of the foundations of SF is examining the consequences of science and technology on society. Here Hogan creates two diametrically opposed societies - those of Earth founded on limited resources and those of the newly colonized planet Chrion having unlimited resources. You won't find deep character development in this book, the focus is on the effects of technology on society - what we can become. Telling the story from the viewpoint of solders on the second colonization starship traveling and landing on the planet Chrion, Hogan explores his vision of what humanity can be. Chrionians value and trade respect, possessions are in abundence and free from automated factories. On the second colonization starship traveling from a militarized Earth, imagine the consequences to those powers to be when character matters! Unlimited resources you ask? Hogan postulates, the mind is a unlimited resource.
Interesting dvd with some hard-to-find footage and interesting interviews. Must have for any Burdon/Animals fan; however, I was a little bummed that no full-length performances/songs were included. Also, the video primarily focused on the two incarnations of The Animals and Burdon's time with War was very quickly glossed over. :( All in all though, this was a great dvd and I recommend it.
this c.d is pretty kool it got all the latest hits out, in one so u won't need to buy another c.d this winter. i would recomened this to everyoneso get off ur bum and buy it now
Used these to replace the painfuly uncomfortable original earpads on my Samsung WEP200 Bluetooth headset and they're a tremendous improvement. Great that they include small, medium and large pads to ensure custom like fit. If not for these I wouldve had to chuck the earpiece in the garbage. They obviously won't fit every device out there so you maybe taking a gamble.
They work fine, keep the Jawbone firmly in the right place, and are almost comfortable. There are 6 in the package: 3 sizes each for left and right ear. I was surprised that the one that worked for me is the large one (no, i don't have gigantic ears!) :0) so try them all on until you find one that works.With the Jawbone, put the small plain rubber ring on first, then the eargel goes over the ring.
The Jawbone bluetooth headset is a great little device, but unfortunately, none of the supplied ear pieces fit comfortable in my ear. I was all ready to return it, when I decided to try these Jabra EarGels. Well, I got them yesterday, and they make a world of difference. The Jawbone now comfortable fits in my ear, the little piece that is supposed to be touching my cheek is doing so. In fact, it is such a good fit I don't even need the other-the-ear hook any more!The EarGels come in three sizes, and are designed to fit the contours of your ear - not just to be shoved in an held in my force. Why JawBone themselves don't make something like this to come with the headset is beyond me, but at least Jabra stepped up to fill the void!
I have small ears, so the only one I can use is the small, and it is still not small enough. But the only way I can wear my bluetooth is with the Jabra eargel. So they work pretty good!
eargels replaced old and lost ones that came with my blue tooth. they fit well and got ere quicker than expected.
Super fast delivery. The last ear loop on my Jawbone had worn out. The large ear gel fit over the Jawbone earbud and, with a little superglue, stays there. It fits in my ear without using any loops. After a full day, the ear is a little tender, but it is getting better the more I use it. I would highly recommend the ear gels for anyone with a Jawbone. Improves sound and the fit of the sensor with the jaw.
I have been using in-ear bluetooth devices for a couple of years. My wife and daughter (of the small ear canal clan) had opted for over the ear designs because of fit and comfort issue. As it turned out, neither of them used their ear buds because of the loose/insecure fit and feel of the ear hanger design. The Jabra gels resolved that problem by 'sizing down' to match their diminutive ears . . . . It would be nice if you could order by specific size (s-m-l)and side (l-r) rather than getting the 'variety pack'.
I used these pieces on my Samsung WEP200. removed the supplied piece and slipped these on. Fit perfectly on the device. Holds well in my ear. Creates a little bit of pressure/discomfort on the "wing" at the top during extended wear. Still a very good product IMO.
These really do make wearing a jawbone a lot better for me. The only problem I found with them is that you have to buy so many just to get the one that fits right.
Jawbone Bluetooth Headset with NoiseAssassin-Jawbone II (Black)[Retail Packaged]Jawbone Bluetooth Headset with NoiseAssasin-Jawbone II (Silver)[Retail Packaged]These ear buds fir snugly over the stem of the Jawbone II and fit snugly, comfortably in my ear. They were necessary for me to use the Jawbone as it requires both good ear fit and good jaw contact to work at all. Many, like me, cannot achieve both fits with the ear loops and buds that come with the Jawbone.In a perfect world there would be a Jabra gel half way in size between medium and large, but either works well for my ear. I suspect most ears would find a comfortable functional fit with at least one of the three sizes they sell (3 sizes, left and right per package). They only cost a few dollars.
I wanted an in ear blue tooth headset but couldn't get them to stay in. these made it work!
I was in hell with my Jawbone until I got these. I think I need to glue the thing on with a little Superglue, which I haven't. I keep it in a little pouch in my purse with my phone so it doesn't matter if it falls off...but gluing it on would fix it. But it makes my Jawbone fit perfectly and stay in my ear, and no earloop -- I've removed the dumb earloop altogether. You have to experiment with the sizes and play around with the fit at first, then it becomes second nature.Oh, and you have to remove the Jawbone earthingy -- the rubbery piece -- which is accomplished easily enough by turning it and pulling it off. It's on a little track, and turns like a jar lid.
I bought these to use in place of the earpieces that were included with the Jawbone. With these I am able to remove the bow that goes over the ear and just wear it in my ear. The Jawbone does not fall out of my ear, and I walk all over work without risk of losing it.
I have not really had a chance to use these but my daughter states that it works for her very well.
a little uncomfortable but the only way my bluetooth headset would stay in my funny little ears.
All I have read about these was pretty much true. You can remove the rubber piece and press these over the part that it was attached to and they will stay, but they do come out with a little tug. A fine line of rubber cement will fix that though, and it peels off if necessary. But the great thing is that they will hold the Jabra in your ear without the ear loop. And that's huge, especially for someone like me with really weird shaped ears that nothing else [except an over the head headset] seemed to work. All in all worth the cost easily. I just wish you could order multiple pieces in one size only. If I lose the 1 that fist my ear I have to buy a 6 pack again just to get the one that I need.
I have a jabra bluetooth that I just could not get to sit on my ear correctly. It sat in the drawer never being used with the addition of the ear gels not only can I use it but now it is comfortable.
I first looked through this cookbook in another lady's kitchen. She had it all earmarked and I could tell she had tried many of the recipes. I knew this lady was a great cook, so I ordered it myself. I'm pretty picky about which cookbooks I keep. This one is very nice. I love all the seafood recipes. A classic.
This Oddysey is great for anyone that has a sense of adventure or just likes the Greek myths. It is well done and has a great cast of characters. The movie is a summary of all the adventures Oddyseus had to go through in order to get back to Ithaca- to his wife and son. I highly recommend this movie and give it five full stars.
The Oddyssey, as most of you know, was originally an epic poem written by the ancient Greek, Homer. If you are interested in ancient Greek culture, this is a good movie to check out. I've read the poem and much of the context is the same in the movie as in the poem. The order and storyline differs but it is still a close match. I've you're planning on reading The Oddyssey, check this movie out. It will help you understand the poem better.
The movie wsa filled with action and lots of special effects....I loved the plot and the sory was meaning full.
I think the movie 'The Odyssey' was great. You would think for this movie that the special effects would be really bad, but they wern't. 'The Odyssey' is about a man called Odissius. He and his wife Penelope had a son. But on the day Oddisiusses son was born he had to go to the Trojan war. The story has many twists and turns as he goes through the jorney of trying to get back home.
I teach Engish to freshmen and we read The Odyssey as part of our curriculum. This movie version is well done and I enjoy showing it to the students. (They enjoy it, which adds to my own.) It stays pretty true to the version we read and the monsters, gods, etc., are portrayed well. The only hesitancy I have with it at all regards Circe and Calypso. There are some brief sexual innuendos/situations with these two women, which there are more of in the story, but generally not in the story provided in freshmen anthologies. However, at the freshmen level, it's completely within boundaries to show it. Watching the movie adds a dimension to the written word, and provides opportunities for comparing and contrasting as well. I will continue to show it.
I really like this version; especially since there is really very few versions of this work of literature.
This movie was just so much fun to watch. It was originally made for TV, so when you watch it without commercials you're able to get the full effect of the story without interruptions. This is based on the story The Odyssey by Homer and it follows the story fairly well. Some of the adventures are left out, and some are unfortunate to be so, but the main part of the story of there so you don't feel they just did what they wanted with it.The acting is very good for a TV movies, as are the special effects. They're not cheap looking which is something TV movies have a problem with sometimes. The costumes are good and the sets are too. You feel like you're with him traveling around the Mediterranean trying to find home.The ending felt a little rushed to me though. I felt they could have spent a bit more time on that.
First, this is an adaptation on The Odyssey. As the director said in the featurette, he omitted a lot of the direct philosophical discussion that is in the poem itself and focused more on the action and story line.Personally, I'm glad he did. This is a very enjoyable movie and throughout the movie you're just waiting to see Odysseus return home. And with every setback he faces, you keep thinking he'll get it the next time. Only to see it happen again!The acting is pretty good overall. There are some notable lapses of skill by a few cameo people like Bernadette Peters, though. But thankfully it is a very small segment. This DVD isn't really for young children. Too much violence. Especially at the end.Not many extras on the DVD, but the story's the real thing, eh?
This movie is fabulous. Anyone who is a fan of greek mythology or the Roman era would love this movie.I cannot get enough of Armande Asante and this movie portrays him in a way that would make any woman drool.Definitely a great buy. {^_^}
My review was about The Odyssey.I think that this movie is a good movie to watch and you might learnt something from this story. The Odyssey is about when he had a wife with his baby and he left on a journey after defeating Troy! He met many monsters and many perils over many years! I loved the action and special effects in this movie! It was cool!
I have read and re read all of the reviews for this film and I have to say my two cents. I have been studying Ancient Mythology(mostly Egyptain) for the past ten years. Yes, this film is NOT 100% correct. What film is? History is always open to interpertation. Anyone who does not understand this needs a new hobby. Anyhoo I loved it, Armand Assante was amazing in his role. The rest of the cast was great too. There was a veil of erotitisem throughout the film, which was interesting considering the film wasn't outwardly graphic. Overall, the movie was wonderful. Don't rent this film, buy it! (you'll want to watch it over and over!)
Considering that this is a TV Mini-Series I am impressed with the overall quality of this movie. The actors are terrific, especially Armand Assante as Odysseus and Greta Scacchi as his wife Penelope. The direction is swift and competent and the special effects are just that, special. I have been teaching The Odyssey for more than 10 years now and I'm glad that someone finally made a film of the story that can show the more visual aspects and intimate scene within this great tale. The old film with Kirk Douglass was awful. I enjoyed this film and so do my students when I have time to show (it is very long).
This was a great movie. The beginning was a little rocky, but then it smoothed out a little bit. The movie had great special effects and a great cast. Some of my favorite characters were Odysseus (Armand Assante), Telemachus (Alan Stenson), and Calypso (Vanessa Williams). This movie was very gory, but in a way I think that made it better. In this epic poem by Homer, my favorite part was when Odysseus shot an arrow through the axe handles. Overall, my opinion of this movie is that its a masterpiece.
This is a beautiful three hour film version of Homer's 'Odyssey'. The film captures the essence of Odysseus's adventures and misadventures following the end of the Trojan War. I enjoyed watching it with my four and a half year old grandson who loved every moment of it. We have watched the film several times, discussed it and have now begun to read the book.
These earliest of monks take Christ's admonition "to sell everything and follow Him" to heart. With deep austerity, and prayer they follow a path utterly dedicated to a spiritual life. Despite their austerity, there are at times a surprising expressions of personality, and even community among the solitaire cells and companionship of the monks. There are stories of hermits with lions as companions, of sustainment of a few herbs or palm leaves, of them helping thieves stealing from them, or selling Gospels to help the poor. However these monks are humble in their faith, and a lesson often repeated in these stories is humility and compassion for temptations that they themselves feel. The temptations of women, and even a monks' expression of Pelagia "the harlots" beauty was surprisingly sensuous. It may seem impossible for us to be isolated like this, but we can quest for solitude as abbot Antony said "Who sits in solitude escapes from three wars: hearing, speaking, seeing"
I eagerly read this after "My Family and Other Animals" (which I had enjoyed immensely). It contains stories which were omitted from "My Family" and while the offerings were still magical and wonderfully well-written and sometimes hilarious (especially the story about the turtle), it lacked the memorability of its predecessor. There was also no real structure in the order of the stories, this is more of a miscellaneous collection.
I read Gerald Durrell's books 10 years ago, while I was still living in Romania. I loved his books from the first page to the last and literally I couldn't put them down until I finished them. The best humour I ever met in books! His stile is unique. I am planning on reading all of them again in English. I would recommend them to anyone!
This is another wonderful books of Gerald Durrell's memories of his time on the island of Corfu prior to the Second World War. He takes us back to another time and place before the world changed for good.Each chapter is a separate story and rememberence of those days when as a young man he marvels at not only the natural world around him, but also the various people he encounters and learns to appreciate. It is easy to get lost in one of these stories and feel like you are there with him on a hot summer day with his faithful dogs tagging along beside him.I recommend this book to anyone who not only loves nature, but also can appreciate a time gone by when people were different and even strangers were looked as guests. This book is one that I intend to read again and again in the coming years and will appreciate the stories just much each time as the first time.
Great solution for a special space. I know how difficult is to hang things from a modern ceiling. This item, will solve that problem. Installation is very fast and price was great. Seller was very fast delivering the item. Good job.
Enjoyed it immensely. The sound is best in stereo. The DTS and 5.1 mix are both done poorly imo. But, the stereo sound is very good!
After using Psalms Now in Bible study for litergical prayer I decided to try it in a Contemporary Christian Worship setting. The response was phenomenal. Whether it is used as a basis for prayer or in a traditional liturgical style it is a very helpful book to bring the psalmists words to life!
We had read the original book before, this one is half that story, but it is long enough for a little one to work through each page with the magnets.My favorite thing about this book is that it teaches the lowercase letters (we had mastered the uppercase ones already), and this was a very useful tool because she loves to work with the magnets!It was easy for her to confuse 'b' and 'q', and 'd' and 'p' as they are from the same mould (but different colors).
The original Moby Dick book is in some cases better than the movie.... that's true.... but the actors (instead of Patrick Stewart (normally i really love him) his role was good, but tooo nervous and toooo crazy... it didn't sypathize with the other roles... e.g. Starbuck, Ismail ...) the whale was stupid and awful, like in a very low budget film... could be much better... but it's worth to buy it and to watch ....! that's my opinion ... bye and enjoy the time you see moby dick
The other fellow said Patrick Stewart hammed it up too much, but I actually liked him in this part. I read to book too, and it is mostly "everything you ever wanted to know about mid 19th century's understanding of whales... and more." Limited action in the book. But I thought they did a pretty good job of creating the movie around the action in the book, and followed the story well. I have not seen Gregory Peck's version of Ahab, but I thought Patrick Stewart made a good madman.
Just like any movie produced from a book, if you compare it to the book, it will most certainly fall short. If you take the movie in the context that its a dramatic movie made to enthrall you for a couple of hours, than you'll find this movie exceptional. I watch it about twice a year and find it one of the better movies in my personal collection.
Patrick Stewart handles Ahab admirably, and Gregory Peck as the minister giving his blessings and warnings at the outset provides continuity to the version in which he himself played Ahab.Two points to consider:1. Queequeg is played with considerable energy and earthy humor, but the actor risks veers close to a "John Belushi" homage (which has its own charms).2. I found the English subtitles (for those of us who need help hearing) contain an unacceptable number of errors - from simple misspellings (e.g., "thoudsands" for "thousands") to text that appears to be the transcribed notes of a non-native English speaker (as heard by his/her ear and written out by sound). I highly recommend that Amazon contract with an editor to review the English subtitles, edit appropriately, and that Amazon find a way to insert corrected text. The errors are so distracting that I would even ask Amazon to send corrected versions to those who request a swap-out (such as myself).
This little heater works far better than I'd hoped. I tested it in my toughest space, the 10 x 40 glassed front porch. For three nights, the outside temp was right at 27. The radiator on its highest setting kept the porch temp at 60! In other, smaller, rooms getting a cozy heat is no big deal. The only noise it makes is an occasional (low) click. I'd have given it five stars if the dial were easier to read, and it had a handle on both sides instead of one.
Typical of Ms. Smith's work, the story of Hush and her apple empire can't help but wash over the reader's heart even while their brain disconnects over some of the story's plausibility. Well, it really doesn't matter if all you want is a fun, romantic read. Afterall, a writer is supposed to have a good imagination, right? Ms. Smith is especially good when developing her characters, flaws and all. This writer never disappoints the true romance reader.
It's been a long time since a book kept me up on a week night, but Sweet Hush was that kind of read. I loved the characters, I loved the family, and wondering where they were all going to end up made this a un-put-downable book for me. Wish they'd make a movie of the story! I was already casting it in my head.
I acutally bought this for my kindle and fell so in love with this quirkly little story that I turned around and bought the hardback book for my mom. Deborah Smith has given us this wonderful cast of characters that believe in family and the family business. They love each other, stand up for each other, and will do anything to protect each other. I know the plot has been review by other readers, so let me just say this: it doesn't matter what your genre of reading is, this story will draw you in and keep you entertained. It is a wonder story and a terrific read.
The authors takes time to explain the basic hypotheses of statistical mechanics. I believe that it is an excellent introduction to this field.
Twenty five years since I've seen a classroom. I had a burning desire to pick up where I left off. What I needed was a good introduction but I could not find my "Elements of Statistical Thermodynamics" by K. Nash (an excellent little book). So I tried Chandler's book, modern but not a beginners text. For the true beginner, I'd suggest "Intro. To Thermophysics by Espinola, WCB (c) 1994". After Espinola, go to Hill's book a great bridge at a bargin before going to Chandler. Hill's style is clear but examples are given a condensed treatment. Not a problem solving book, but a good book if physical understanding and a bridge forward is your goal.
If you are intrested with studing statistical mechanics then start here. Hill starts from the defintions and postulates of thermodynamics and then moves into applications and problems. You will need to understand Diff EQ for this book.The first chapter took me a week to read and work out the math but then I red the rest in 4 weeks. It is a hard start because Hill develops your background before starting with applications of the theory. I really began to grasp the subject after reading this book. Ohter books will not lay the mathout as well as Hill does. It is a hard read because Hill is so thorough, but the rewasd is well worth the struggle. It is a great introduction and I suggest all of Hill's Stat mech book. Another great bargin from DOVER PRESS.At the price I recomend it to all graduate chemical engineers and chemists
This is an ancient stat. mech. book with a lot of old topics. Most of the chapters after 8 (there are 22 I think) are directed towards chemical applications. I think this book and McQuarrie are about even, Chandler is better if you know a little about stat mech already, much much worse if you know nothing. This book is also really cheap so I don't think you can go wrong in getting it. The explanations are pretty good in both this and McQuarrie, though I don't always like the organization of Hill.
This was the textbook in the statistical mechanics course I took a few years ago. The single greatest feature of this book compared to so many other texts in statistical mechanics and related fields is its clear presentation of some sort of intuition behind the concepts. That alone makes it worth buying. And it's so cheap that you may as well just buy it.
An excellent text book for Physical Chemist who want to get sound footing in Statistical Thermodynamics.Inorder to really get a good view of the basics of statistical mechanics the reader really needs to spend an adequate amount of time in digesting the contents of the initial chapter. However, after spending some amount of time in reading those initial chapters, one can grasp the latter parts of the book in a quite interesting fashion.In my opinion, this book is a must for those who want to master the statstical thermodynamics. Infact, one would be really amazed at the standard of the book considering the fact that it is reasonably old. No new standard books on ' Statistical Mechanics' can provide such an adequate foundations as it in this book. I would strongly recommend this book along with the other book 'Statistical Mechanics' by the same author.Sasisanker Padmanabhan
I picked up this book used for a couple dollars while on vacation and spent the rest of my vacation reading it. I rated this book 4 stars because even though I found it to be very enjoyable, I seemed to easily figure out where the plot was heading, Nevertheless, I was still surprised by the ending. I found the tension between hester and Monk to be both intriguing and frustrating, especially when it was not resolved at the end of the book. Needless to say, I was delighted to discover that there are 11 (soon to be 12) more books in the series. I plan to read them all.
I will keep this short and to the point... the plot and characterization are brilliant but the writing inserts repetitive analytic asides on almost every page... a good writer does indeed use this technique to enrich the story and Perry does succeed quite nicely at times... the problem is totally that she repeats the ideas with little added information many times. If Perry were to rewrite this novel and remove about 30 or so pages of this baggage, she would have one of the best detective novels ever written. Still I highly recommend this book.
Introduction to a series which obviously became rather popular. This offering peaked my curiosity enough to read the second in the series. However, that is where I had to stop.
William Monk awakens in a Victorian-era London hospital with amnesia. Over the course of this book, he returns to his job as a policeman, hoping that work will help him regain his memory as well as his detecting skills. What's fascinating is that not all he discovers about his life before the accident is flattering--including the fact that he may very well have been responsible for a serious crime. Over the course of Perry's new series--this book being the debut--Monk's past will at various times haunt, delight, and maybe even endanger him, and the people who come to be his allies don't always like him, but their loyalties to one another shine through. As with the Pitt mysteries, Anne Perry's trademark detail and eye-opening descriptions of what Victorian life was really like make this an entertaining way to read away a winter afternoon
I'm not one to write reviews but it drives me crazy when people put down movies because they're similar to others! I really enjoyed this Van Damme movie. I see it getting put down because of the similarities to Blood Sport, and yes there are similarities BUT it's not the same movie. I gave the movie 4 stars because it was very entertaining and kept my full attention the entire time. There were plenty of action scenes and I loved the plot. DEFINATELY A MOVIE TO SEE!!!
Zaller turns our perception of polling data on its ear. People don't think about most issues until they are asked, so opinion surveying might actually do more to shape opinions than actually report on them.
I had to read this book for a class at school and its very well written. This book is very informative and a recommend reading.
Very gald these guys are back, this is the debut album by Hallows Eve and it's brutal, hard edged, pure thrash the way it was ment to be. When I think of the pure 80's thrash metal sound I always think of Hallow's Eve and their first three glorious albums. Solid release, Worth every cent! \m/\m/
bought this case with an amazon gift card i got for my birthday only to find it at a chain sporting goods store for 1/2 the price. over all a great case not ideal for airplain travel but prefect for off season storage.
It was interesting to read The Foxes of Harrow again, as a "senior citizen, since I was only in my early teens the first time I read...and enjoyed...the book. It is quite sensual, considering the year it was written. It has held up fine during the years. I probably understood the nuances better as an adult than as a teenager. Frank Yerby was a brilliant writer, and in this book he presents a balanced view of what white slave owners and their slaves faced during that pre-civil war era. I couldn't help comparing it with Gone With the Wind as I read it.
Yep, that was my reaction when I first heard of the girth of this book. I tend to believe that if you can't write a good story under 600 pages or a very little bit more, you can't write a good story period. I stopped picking up any book over 600 pages by authors I didn't already like years ago. And even though I really like the work of Lackey, Flint, and Freer, it did take me a few weeks to go get it and then read it. I read it in about two and a half days, a better pace than many a book half it's length. The characters are all worth reading about no matter who you fell most drawn to. The world is a little harder to adjust to than the run of the mill (DRECK!!) stuff that is usually based on northern European mythology were English is the norm and German and French are thrown in for 'culture' and 'scope'. Not only a good read but it has put any follow on's into the top portion of my must buy list.
I'm not one who normally likes alternative histories, but this is one of the best, most complex Lackey books I've read in ages. The characters, as always, have depth and humor, and the plot is fascinating -- my one question -- will there be a sequel?One word of caution -- those who have read C.J. Cherryh's Merovingen Nights Series may find many aspects of the plot strangely familiar...
This book isn't much like Mercedes Lackey's normal writings, but isn't that the point of a collaborative work? I'm only giving it four stars because it is a bit hard to get into at first and the character list is extensive. It can sometimes be difficult to remember who is who, even with the glossary. I found myself having to write notes in the glossary just to record my thoughts on their characters and motivations. The plot is constantly twisting and there is enough humor without making the book silly. I've read almost every book by a female fantasy or sci fi writer (and quite a few of the men as well!) and found this one a delightful change.
Being a huge fan of Green Carnation and Agalloch, I decided to pick up this album and their "Heart Of The Ages" album at the same time. Honestly, this album seems like exactly what you would get when you cross those two bands. Impressed? Yes, overall this album was pretty awesome. The dark atmosphere was perfectly created. The female vocals in my opinion were better than the male vocals. A five star review is out of the question because the male vocals in fact were not very impressive at all. At times, I was so impressed with the background elements that I just wished the male vocals would just stop. Overall though, this album was a great purchase and is a must have for any fans of Agalloch, Green Carnation, or Katatonia.
What a great movie! Entertaining and enjoyable with some very, very funny moments and great acting by Diane Lane. The film is so beautiful to look at on the bigscreen and the story is beautiful and avoids any cliches or sentimentality. A great movie. Very recommnded indeed! 5 stars.
Fun and light but, a bit unrealistic. Just let go and enjoy! Diane Lane and Sandra Oh are great! Linsay Duncan steals the movie!
Under The Tuscan Sun is one of those special films that comes along once in a while. It is funny, uplifting, inspiring, beautiful and above all entertaining. This is one of the most enjoyable films I've seen for ages and the acting by Diane Lane and the lovely scenery make it a modern-day classic! 10 stars!
As a guy I was not sure if I would enjoy this film or not. It had Diane Lane in it who I like alot. It had good reviews in the newspapers and magazines. But it also didn't really appeal as subject matter AND I had never read the book either. Having said all of that - I did really enjoy this film. It is funny and enjoyable and has a pleasant, uplifting tone to it. Diane Lane was sexy and again gave a great performance like last years 'Unfaithful' for which she was Oscar nominated. The supporting characters in the movie were very entertaining and the Tuscan hills looked spectacular. This is a very good movie that I would recommend even to other guys. Give it a try.
Love this one and have seen it many times...When you want to watch something sweet and uplifting that makes you smile when it is over - this is the one!
I must say, i avoided this movie like the plague for a year. It was deemed to me to be just a sacchrine "chick-flick." Now I have to ask myself...what were you waiting for? This movie which I now own, definitely deserves more praise and should be essential to anyone intrested in high-art. It's a magical and uplifting tale set in some of the most beautiful locations in Italy. Diane lane sparkles! She carries the film so well you forget she's only acting. A remarkable movie, filled with poignant characters and a heartbreaking story-line. It's message is one that transcends time and gender. Watch and learn...it's fabulous!
So entertaining and enjoyable. A masterful and beautiful comedy that is heartwarming and inspiring. Beautifully acted and shot. Wonderful. 5 stars!
This movie is very warm toned and sincere. I really give a lot of credit to film makers who can create a romantic comedy that is not contrived and unoriginal. Under the Tuscan Sun is a fresh romantic comedy that has a heart.Of course this is not a masterpiece that will change your perception of life and leave you breathless, but it will leave you smiling for at least a half an hour after it is over.Also, it has a really good point. So many times we force things to happen in our lives and and become totally frustrated in the process. It is indeed so much easier to just "fall asleep and let the ladybugs crawl all over you". You will see what I mean when you watch the movie.Highly recommended enterntainment.
I never actually got to watch this movie. It got lost on the trip from my mailbox to my dorm room on campus. I went ahead and gave you 5 stars anyway because I know it would have been in excellent condition.
This is such a feel-good film. Diane lane does a wonderful job playing the woman who leaves behind everything and starts over new. The people she meets, the scenery, the neuroses are all charming in their own way. Where Eat, Pray, Love failed, this film succeeded. A woman sets out to find herself after a personal disappointment, but rather than the whiny arrogant character of Julia Roberts in Eat, Pray, Love, Diane Lane's character has a relatable warmth and energy despite her situation. i highly recommend this film for a rainy day.
I thought this movie was great. If you are one of those that has faith and hope in things this is the movie for you! Diane Lane was great and I hope she gets and Oscar nomination for this roll! My boyfriend even liked the movie which says alot he's picky on everything. If you haven't seen it I suggest you do. I liked it so much it made me want to actually get the book and read it and I am not big on reading books at all.
Yes i'm a guy and yes i enjoy chic flicks from time to time,so sue me.This is a good film from Diane Lane(best known for her great performance in Unfaithful)which was also the first flim i recall her having a main staring role.I won't get in to deep to the story but she is a recent divorcy,whom feels she can't go on living in San Fransico,so her 2 gay lesbian friends convince her to go on an all gay trip to tuscan(italy).While there she becomes intrigued by a 300 year old italian home,mind you nothing works,and its in pretty sad shape.So she hires contractor's to help her with her project,and all along the way she runs into various men whom you think she'll develop an attraction to and maybe more but it never pan's out.So thats all i'll give for now,watch for yourself.Although it seems a little slow in places it's an entertaining little piece of film none the less.
A truly magnificent movie. Diane Lane shines in her role as Frances Mayes in this funny, sweet, enjoyable piece of great entertainment. The director makes this movie so engrossing and enjoyable that it is impossible to not be drawn into the wonderfully realized 3D characters and the brilliant played out scenes. The scenic locations help and so does the likable characters. Make no mistake... this is a magnificent movie.
This is a beautifully filmed romantic movie about a woman searching for meaning in her life after her life is turned upside down by her husband's infidelity and subsequent divorce. It has moments of humor as well as emotional intensity. It is well acted for the most part with characters that are believable in their parts. And the scenery is truly stunning. My husband accompanied me to see the movie very grudgingly. But he actually watched the entire movie, laughing at the funny parts, and after the movie was over he admitted that he enjoyed it. Children will have no interest in this movie, but it is great for couples.
A great actress and beautiful scenery. It is good to watch a woman coming into her own and growing strong from from what can be a devistating loss. Women will love this and men should watch it at least once.
This is a great movie. Views of the Tuscan towns and other scenery make you want to hop on a plane for Italy. The movie content was both funny, entertaining, and a travel advertisement.
Destined to be a favorite of yours as well, I'm sure. It has everything a chick flick should have...romance, finding strength, empowering substance. If you didn't think you could survive life's pitfalls before...this movie will give you the strength to keep on keepin' on! Funny, entertaining, ensightful and empowering, this movie is a bowl of popcorn and a bottle of wine away from being a classic!
Superficially, this movie is indeed sappy. However, look beneath the surface.What I see is that Diane Lane's character is playing the Superego. Sandra Oh plays the ego. And the Fellini Fatale is playing pure ID.They all play their part to explain love, despair, dissappointment and lust.The buying and remodeling an old house is just like cleaning out the cobwebs upstairs. Clean house to move something new in.I believe this movie is made more for what it is representing than what is flat out shows you.It is a good psychological study of the human mind and the ups and downs that it goes through in a lifetime.
This is a wonderful movie for those who have experienced loss, pain, and are on the road to the amazing good things that can happen...and do...in life! I loved this movie and just bought a copy for myself and my sister, who is a hopeful (and married) romantic! Very insipirational and moving for me. Would recommend it to my best friend!
This movie is for the dreamers of the world. It is not the sappy love story I was looking for, but it was inspiring. Even though it wasn't totally belieavable, it made me feel great about being a woman! Diane Lane is a very wonderful, talented, sexy woman who is a great role model for all women.
Wonderful story about a woman who reclaims her life. Great "feel good movie". I love how all her dreams come true!
I don't know, but it seems a lot of people don't like this movie! Why? Because they don't like the feel good feeling at then end? I mean, sure, usually the book is ten times better than the movie, but come on, this movie should be at least a four! When you read a book, and than a movie comes out based on it, don't expect it to be as good as the book, because it very rarely is. Even the movie Lord of the Rings wasn't as good as the book for some people. And if you look at movies like Harry Potter, Ella Enchanted, Bourne Supremacy.... a lot of these movies aren't better than the book. So, if you have read the book, and you are thinking about seeing the movie, my advice to you is try not to expect too much. Think of the movie seperate from the book. By the way, I only rated this movie five stars because I think some people should lighten up, and watch a nice, family movie for a change.
ILOVED THIS MOVIE!!!! THE WIDESCREEN DVD VERSION REALLY TAKES IN THE BREATHTAKING SCENERY, AND THE BEAUTIFUL COLORS IN THE LANDSCAPE. THIS MOVIE REALLY DREW ME IN FROM THE BEGINNING, AND IT REALLY BROUGHT OUT EMOTIONS RANGING FROM SADNESS AT THE BEGINNING OF HER DIVORCE, HAPPINESS IN WHEN SHE BEGINS HER NEW LIFE IN TUSCANY AND MEET THE "EYE CANDY", ANGER OVER HOW SHE IS TREATED, AND TEARY-EYED AT THE BITTERSWEET ENDING OF THIS MOVIE. YEP, THIS IS DEFINITELY A KEEPER!!!!!! I REALLY DON'T UNDERSTAND SOME OF THE MORE NEGATIVE REVIEWS OF THIS MOVIE!! HAVE NO DISTRACTIONS, RELAX, AND LET TUSCANY TAKE YOU AWAY!!!!
I enjoyed the story and the scenery in Tuscany. It makes you want to visit there!!
If you like romantic movies, this is the perfect one for you. But, please don't cry! It was a gift for someone else, eventhough I personally had seen it. It arrived just in time and I could keep track (via UPS) where it was, since I purchased it being in Puerto Rico.
This movie is for those who love romance, Italian culture, scenery and Diane Lane who is reeeealy easy on the eyes. This is sweet story about a woman who rises above her emotions and heartbreak to find love with the people and places she finds in Italy. The supporting cast is excellent and the scenery is an artist's dream.
One of my absolute fav movies. It's so rich looking and makes you want to go to Tuscany. I wish this had come out in blu-ray, the colors would be even more amazing. Watch with a blanket and a bottle of vino!
This is a good movie. It had the misfortune of coming out around the same time as Julia Robert's feminist 'Mona Lisa Smile' and being sometimes confused with that film by critics. This is not a feminist, male-bashing movie. And it isn't entirely a 'chic flick' either. Diane Lane is apparently very picky about the roles she plays and the films she appears in. This is another good choice for her.There are plenty of reviews here telling what this film is about. I'll simply tell you that I bought the DVD for my wife, but I usually watch it with her. It is a good movie.
I know the movie isn't the book, with that said, it's a good movie. A movie that revolves around redemption, discovery, and love. In short the pains and joys of life. A life best enjoyed when lived, truly lived! Well acted with stunning photography! Worth the watch, but don't expect this to be a verbatim re-telling of the book... it isn't!
The scenery in this film was breathtaking- the countryside, the house, the people, the food- the way of life in general was just inspriring.What made this movie great, though, was the romance between Frances and Marcello. In any typical romantic comedy, the broken-down and lonely Frances would have met Marcello and all her problems would have been solved. The end. But in this film, Frances thinks her life has turned around and that she has found the answer to her prayers....but, like in real life, this is not the case.I liked this movie because it didn't sugar-coat anything, but at the same time it was very uplifting.
A review below lists several stereotyped characters in the movie, and to be honest, that's a fair critique. But Diane Lane is such a good actress, and Tuscany is so beautiful (similar to central California -- now I understand why California is a "Mediterranean" climate) that I was able to forgive the clichés and the fact that I could basically stay one step ahead of every plot twist. I only wish that they had shown the transformation of the villa, a la "This Old House."OK, so maybe I also wish they had shown a little more of Ms Lane's body. So sue me for being honest.
Yes, it is a chick flick, but the Italian backgrounds and scenery make you wish you were there. Diane Lane is very easy on the eyes as well. My wife enjoyed it so much she forced me to book us a Mediterranean cruise to Italy for our 30th anniversary.
I gave this movie 4 stars because it was a good movie. However, it is quite depressing at times. Diane Lane just can't catch a break. It is kinda slow, but I'm very pleased to have seen it.
This was a GREAT and FUN movie. It was so funny and touching, yet did'nt have the 'cliches'. It was well acted by Diane Lane and it looked fantastic! A great fun movie! Highly recommended!
Determined to rebuild her life after a sudden, unexpected divorce, Diane Lane gets away from it all by going on a gays-only excursion to Italy where she falls in love - with a house! She buys a delapidated villa to renovate and quickly fills it with an engaging cast of characters. She finds her dreams - love (sponsoring star-crossed lovers), her family (her pregnant friend, jilted by her lesbian partner) and finally hopes for a romance of her own. More than just a "chick flick" this movie offers a little something for everyone, including exquisite cinematography. Highly recommend!
I can't say enough positive words about this movie.It was good at the show but like alot of things the second time at home it was so much better. It was a DVD gift from my daughter,and that night I watched it and noticed all the little things you often miss in a large show. As a women I could idenify with Frances in many way's. When she leaves her home she loved and goes to her tempory apartment,and lays down on the floor.. It was Diane's and her best friend performance that you ,the viewer grow to love and laugh with. But the most important message in the movie is that France's positive and helpfull attitude towards everyone is as beautiful as Tuscany.
I thought this was a very good film but I am puzzled by the reviews I have seen here. Some hated this movie but many liked it and yet I wonder how many really got the point? This film could easily have evolved into an Italian Travelog with actors or succumbed to the facile ending, but instead it moved in unexpected directions everytime you seemed to know what would happen next. It really captures the joy and spirit of the Italian people without actually making that a focal point. The handling of the people and the locale were excellent because they never became the actual point of the movie. However, it is the ending that really sets this film apart, because the film builds to the conclusion that you should be careful what you wish for because you just might get it. And as usual when you get what you asked for God has a way of providing it in unexpected ways. I thought this was a subtle and entertaining film. I have seen it twice and enjoyed it both times.
Entertaining story. Unfortunately, most people don't have that kind of money to rehab a property in another county. Italy was lucky that someone brought their $$ over to invest & improve their real estate.
I saw this on TV & I just had to have it. I just love watching this movie. I watch it every yr :)
Great Battery. Last a long time to be depleted. I was going to get another one as second spare when traveling. I don't need it anymore. One is enough. Highly recommended.
I took more than 130 photos in addition to 5 minutes movies all with LCD on without any need to recharge. it is so powerful. the battery is much powerful than the one for SD 750, NB-4L family. 1120 mAh is great.
This battery works like a charm and gives me the same life as the original battery I received from Canon. I bought this as a back up battery and I am extremely happy with it. Ships damn quick. Merchant's service is excellent. Cheers.....
Worked extremely well with my SD800IS. Bought it as a spare for a weekend getaway. The camera itself gives little notice of a low battery but, the battery itself holds a charge wonderfully. I only swapped the batteries out twice (so, three full charges) and took over 350 pictures over 4 days. Not to mention the price was great for something that I couldn't find locally.
A must have for your SD950IS, because you never know when you need a backup battery!
I switch this battery with the one that came with the camera, so I never miss a shot.
This is the strangest "retail" packaging I've ever seen from Canon. The battery functions OK but seems to run down faster than the battery that came with the camera. It's going to get a good test in a couple of weeks and I'll update this report if it performs much worse than the stock Canon battery.
I can't imagine not having a spare battery for my camera. I bought this for my 1st Canon Powershot camera and it works exactly as you would expect. I was even more excited when I discovered that my new Canon Powershot uses the same batteries. Now I have 3...the ones that came with each of the cameras plus an extra.
Great price on a genuine Canon battery.Reasonable shipping cost.Arrived in reasonable time.
Not much to say it was a true Cannon battery not a generic battery which don't seem to last as long. I had bought generics before and had problems with them retaining the charge after a while. It's worth the cost to have an actual Cannon product. It was sent promptly and it works
Imagine my surprise when I found the battery in my camera was completely dead and wouldn't even charge. The camera is less than two years old, but I always thought the battery life was great since I rarely had to charge it. That turned out to be misleading however since the guy in the battery shop told me you have to use it from time to time to preserve its life. Since I got a phone with a good camera, I stopped carrying this camera with me and it went for easily a couple of months without any use at all--then I found it stone dead.I was very pleased to find this replacement, but mentioned my experience when I was next in the battery store and learned I hadn't been caring for the original one correctly. I also noted that their version of this battery was a good bit more expensive so I was pleased to have made my purchase on Amazon. Now I know to activate the camera periodically and automatically recharge it after a period of disuse to keep the battery active for longer.
This battery was included with my sd 990 years ago. It has been through 44000 pictures with flash always on and only in the last few months before expanding did its charge begin to falter.The best price on these comes from buying used and as long as they have not begin to bulge you should still be able to get good life out of them.
The battery works just as good as the one that came with my camera.
not the genuine canon battery, but usable. the item received does not have "canon" on it, just like any replacement battery.
I ordered this, based on the reviews. I ordered on 11/16, and received it on 11/21 (I needed it by 11/29). I love the musky smell. I only tested 1 drop on my wrist. I have to say that after a couple of hours, the smell turned into a strong sex smell... not bad, but definitely sex. I'm going to test it out at work next week, but the real test is on 11/30. I'll report my findings then.12/6/12: It works! This is definitely going to be my "go-to" scent. It drove my man crazy! I love it. I will purchase again.
love this kettle looks and works beautiful. I have no p;roblem with it being remanafactured have many other ones I higly reccommen d this to perk up anyones kitchen
Among those involved with the planning and implementation of specialized, multi-casualty incident response, this book is quite useful. Field personnel, command staff, and planners - all will find it helpful. I found it to be concise, packable, and physically handy. About the only thing I'd change would be to laminate the pages for weather resistance.R.D. Lopez, Emergency Medical Services and Disaster Specialist, Dept. of Public Health
This book is beautifully illustrated with photographs that are sure to spark discussion. The text (the Pledge of Allegiance) is broken into meaningful phrases that make the reader reflect on the words that we sometimes rush through or take for granted. I highly recommend purchasing the big book version for lower grade classroom use. A gem!
The text is the spoken pledge, and the photos show America -- the people and places and landmarks. Beautiful photos -- did I already say that?Facts at the back -- every family with a kindergartener should be equipped with this book.
The book is just what the title states, the pledge. Which I think is a must in all libraries. Our schools are cutting corners and teaching American history is made that much richer with the book.
When i bought this album I expected it to be a bangin joint and when I played it....all I can say is that its tight. You gotta check out joints like "Imagine That", "Take It Off" and "Fuhgidabowdit". Other ill joints are "Farmers" and "Hello" what the heck every song is fresh. This is way better than his previous joint "Phenomenon". Get this one, it sure is butta...its great to see the one of tha greatest back in tha game!!!!
I work with Hank Hassell at NAU and know him as a friend and kind and unassuming person who, from what I've gathered, can hike the doglegs off anyone. This book is the offspring of his love for the Colorado Plateau area. It is a well told story of a piece of our geological heritage that could only be written by someone who has been there and done that. I would recommend this book for the academic community as well as for travel buffs. Betty Lee/Library Specialist @ NAU
Overall I like the dvr but it has a few quirks.(1) It is nosiey(2) No sleep mode that I have been able to find(3) No mute button on the remote(4) It is slow (It has taken about 90 seconds just to power off and it take 10 to 15 seconds to pull up the tv guide)Overall I would buy it again. I would much rather deal with the quirks of tv guide on screen than have another monthly payment by getting tivo.
Chaos is such a visually stunning field of study, since you invariably run into those computer generated figures of Julia sets or random fractal landscapes or cloud formations.But can we get a rigorous, first principles explanation that is broadly accessible to undergraduates with good, but not advanced math preparation? Well, you might consider this recent book. The authors have gone to some length to explain events without appealing to more than simple calculus.Nothing flashy. But you can obtain a good understanding of fractal dimensions, self iterating systems (like a Sierpinski gasket) and noise.
Fun movie, but the tape quality listed as "NEW" has faded colors- VHS tapes just don't hold up. Arrived on time and otherwise in excllent condition
This is one of my all time favorite movies. Ive had it on VHS for years and am glad that I was able to find on DVD. Im a sucker for medical, and romance, this offers both.
I think these are great they're nice and soft. That being said I'm not as picky as others. Picky abpit certain things but sheets aren't one of them!
I BOUGHT THIS SET FOR MY 10 YEAR OLDS BED & SHE GETS TONS OF COMMENTS ON THEM.THEY ARE VERY COMFY & VERY WARM.SHE LOVES THEM!!THEY ARE A GREAT SET FOR THE PRICE
The sheets seem fine but the packaging looks like something you would see at "Dollar General". They come off looking very cheap - not a big deal at all really unless you are giving them as a gift.
This movie is not for everyone, but I love the absurd humor. Every character in it is irrational in some way. Where films today would probably mock the characters in a mean way, this film has more of a sad and sweet acceptance of their eccentricities. It respects the courage of human beings who have obviously been damaged by the hardships of life but still continue to muddle through. Just like real life.
the toy is pretty awsome. it is a lot of fun and really cool. the only problem is that the batteries die really fast.
My kid was looking this toy for a long time since this is not produced anymore and it is more like a colectible. We are happy to finally got it. It is working properly. Looking at the picture of the original toy looks like a feature is missing(like a cover that protect the screen)Anyway I am happy with the toy and with Amazon service.Best regards,Arturo Garcia Arias
this PET is so cool. after I got it I started buy battlechips and fight my bro. then for some reason my computer had a virus. so I went in with megaman. Thank goodness that I had the right chips or I would have been deleted. And it was all thanks to my favorite battle chip...........TIME BOMB. Now my computer is safe.
I just recently got the megaman pet and it is a lot of fun. I play with it all the time and i am 13 years old. The only problem is that you only get battle chips through the toys. When you by the pet you only get 3 battlechips. The game is easy and hard to play.I think it is the best game ever
The Plug-In PET is not coming to America. The season of NT Warrior is already over, Axess is airing now. They would have brought the Plug-In to America before the Adanced PET. It wouldn't make sense to make the Advanced PET while NT Warrior is showing, then make the Plug-In while Axess is.The Plug-In is extremely rare. I have one, don't buy it. The battle system is terrible, and the battery dosn't last that long.Either buy this PET, or buy the Progress. I have both. The Progress is the best out of all...
Yes, it's me again. I have a right to do so. Anyways, there are some people out there who I noticed are complaining that MegaMan is in ProtoMan's PET. Well, on toywiz.com (I'm not trying to sponser them or trying to get people to go there), they sell the Japanese version of the PET, and it will actually give you ProtoMan if you choose the red PET. They also sell battle chip booster pack, single chips, and the original PET found in MMBN 1-3. My PET is the English version, but I think there's something wrong with the battery. The manual says it's due to low power, but it occured only 6 hours after I bought the product. I'm gonna check with a new battery, and my advice with the Attack+10 is wrong, it obliterates only Lvl 1 Mettaurs, Billy's, Volgear, and "Shumps" (those things that look like shrimp). Everything else will just lose a lot of HP.
I'm a big fan of Vickery's ever since I read his previous book, Cocksure. I have to say that as good as Cocksure was, Play Buddies is even better! Not only are his stories hot, Vickery writes with real humanity, making his characters come across as real and three dimensional, out on the prowl, looking for sex wherever they can find it. As far as erotic writing goes, Vickery is a master!
I'm not gay or male but I do enjoy Bob Vickery. His stories always gets my juices flowing. I will definitely read more from him.
You definitely feel that it is not 100% cotton but for the price it is still a great shirt. They are lite enough that I just wear a cotton tank underneath so don't feel the poly so much. They do shrink a bit, but not too much, I typically get shirts in XL so when the shrink they fit right. These almost didn't shrink enough. Probably after a few washes they will. I wear a 42-44 jacket as a reference.
I like the feel of the material and that it is by Jerzees.I recommend it to family and friends.
This album is the best release of the "New Mayhem". Total insane, brutal black metal. Only for people that like primitive raw black metal. Hellhamer plays in an incredible way, necrobutcher give an atmospheric sound to the tracks, and maniac voice is totaly inhuman. WLA is a must have.!
For you hard-boiled detective fans who are also intogeneology, you might like to trace Philip Marlowe's familytree. Raymond Chandler's prototypes for his now famous detective began in the mid-30's with characters from some of his early pulp magazine stories. Whether the character is Ted Carmady, Johnny Dalmas, John Evans, Tony Resick or a character named simply Mallory, they all had the qualities and charactoristics that eventually evolved into what became Philip Marlowe. Red Wind, Trouble Is My Business and Goldfish are just three of more than 40 stories Chandler wrote during his lifetime. Don't miss a single one!
This album was not death metal or even thrash metal by today's standards. It was, however, an incredible debut that I ended up owning on cassette, album form, and finally, CD. Unfortunately, Nasty Savage sounded best when they werent trying to be heavy. Some bands do (Metallica, Possessed come to mind immediately), just check out the incredible original version of XXX (available on Metal Massacre 6) and then listen to the much faster, more aggressive, and much less interesting version on the CD 'Indulgence' and see what I mean.)This album is actually very good "idontknowwhatyouwouldcategorizethisstuffas" metal for this time period. For some reason, they decided to use more death metal growls and faster beats on future records and that made them sound like they were trying to do too much....This album is their crowning glory.
After a neighbor girl got one for her 6th birthday, my 7 year-old son had to have one for his (birthday). He got it today as a group gift from several families and he loves it. The Trikke across the street was labled "Trikke", but my son's says "Razor", but they seem to be almost identical. My son is very athletic and took to it right away, but he has been riding his regular Razor (two wheeler) for over 2 years now. The brakes are a little tight, but my husband is just stretching the cords for a smoother brake...which I'm told is common with new brakes.We live in a hilly area, but he seems to have no problem adjusting to the "squirlliness" of the Trikke.
This book is amazing! It provides us with great humor while taking a serious look at religion as a whole. Personally I think the Great God Om is the best character on the whole Discworld (followed by a close second of Rincewind and then Death bringing up third place) and I hope to see him again sometime soon, maybe in another Discworld book(of course). This book also has the best villian in the whole series as far as I'm concerned...he was really truly an evil man. In short...I LOVED IT!!!!!
still well worth reading, whether you are looking for something light to take the edge off a long day at work or something a little heavier to pose a few interesting questions. Small Gods is the only Discworld novel I've read, so I can't compare it to the rest of Pratchett's work, but it grabbed my attention and held it. It's a many-layered book, but Pratchett doesn't force the reader to go any deeper than they feel like. Knowing Latin is an asset in reading (he can come out and say more adult things which he leaves implied in English.) Also, this book doesn't have either a "British" or an "American" feel, which so much fantasy falls into. Overall, excellent.
I've read quite a few of the Pratchett books, mostly at the insistence of my 13 year old son who loves these novels. This ranks right up there among my favorites, and is intriguing for the allusions to so many of the world's religions. The author is clearly well read, and catching these little references produced many aha! moments, I confess that I even lugged home a compendium on world religion to dig out the paralells and little obscure references - and there is alot more to this book than meets the eye. Well, but in the end, I find myself in complete sympathy with the conclusion, and thus a truly satisfying narrative from start to finish. I should add that this approach to reading this book drove my son absolutely crazy, and in fact taken only at face value, no references or allusions the book is still a great read.
It is just as entertaining and well written as all the other Discworld Novels. The basic philosophy about the nature of religion is brilliant; it is much more credible and closer to reality than the official dogmas of most of the existing religions. Actually, it is quite close to Nordic paganism (as practiced in Iceland), traditional Shinto (not the official version practiced by the Japanese state) and religious Taoism.
I've read nearly all of the Disc World series and have thoroughly enjoyed most of the ones I've read. SMALL GODS holds a special place in my heart. The characters are engaging. Om as a little turtle won me over completely. Brutha, the naive is one I could relate to. What a villian Vorbis! Pratchett is at his best with his usual terrific humor, but in addion -- and upon rereading I keep discovering this -- there is much much more to this story. It invites us to think and to question. If you only want to read one Terry Pratchett story I recommend SMALL GODS.
Let me just say I'm not a big fan of Discworld. I can't give any solid reason for that, but it has never quite captivated me the way it does so many. Pratchett's writing is very good, and his world entertaining, but well . . . I don't know. Just doesn't do much for me. Maybe too much satire, not enough story."Small Gods" is different. It has a pretty good story. And the end is very satisfying. This is one of the first Discworld books I read, and it's still my favorite. Admittedly, I haven't read many, so take that with a grain of salt.It does drag a bit, and once in a great while, Pratchett is more convinced of his cleverness than he should be. But usually he's justified. When it comes right down to it, he is one of the best at humorous fantasy that still has something worthwhile to say.
If you have the slightest inkling that you have what it takes to be a professional author, do not read Terry Pratchett. This is not because he's not worth reading, or because I don't think that aspiring writers can learn anything from his prose: that is patently false. Do not read Terry Pratchett because one chapter in, you will feel like a kid with a toy xylophone staring at Beethoven at the head of a symphony. Pratchett is one of the truly great writers today, with vivid imagery and beautiful wordplay that is unparalleled. In Small Gods, Pratchett follows the Discworld version of the Spanish inquisition, and creates a story that managed to make me laugh in the same chapter that it caused me to genuinely think about the nature of religion, belief and faith. I know I'm using hyperbole, and I know I'm raving to a ridiculous extent. But Small Gods earns the praise.
I expected a lesser Douglas Adams; after all, it was only a Terry Pratchett novel, one of those things with pages that you read quickly, laugh a couple of times and change for any other book on those second-hand stores.But "Small Gods" is a thing of beauty, of seemingly superficial thoughts that nevertheless takes you to the depths of the human condition. Pratchett mayve even did not intended to reach the heights of art, but here the attempt has succeded, and we could well be in the presence of a minor classic.Here you have a book that explains how Gods are made and destroyed, not in a fantasy world, but in our very real one, deux-ex-machina and all.
Tabasco and Chiapas in the 1930's - not a nice place either to live or to visit. Greene's explorations provided background and some characters for his great short novel or tale, The Power and the Glory. If you are a student of fine writing, read the novel first, then read this to see how he gathered and used material. Or read this first for background that adds depth to the novel. If you are an armchair traveler or student of Mexico, enjoy Greene's adventures and be grateful he went through them so you don't have to do it yourself. This is truly a classic of travel writing.
The CD is great. Every song has its own personality and that makes the entire CD very diverse. I especially love the mixes on the second disc.
I discovered Anastacia on you tube and fell in love with her music. I love the CD, especially the track "I belong to you" and "everything burns". There isn't a song on the CD that I don't like. Why she is not more popular in the US is beyond me.
Packed with great information.Great for people like myself just diagnosed with Celiac Diseasefunny friendly fact filled! The one recommended by my nutritionist!
Jax updates her "Against the Grain" success story! It's the first resource to get when one is newly diagnosed with gluten intolerance or wheat sensitivity. Jax writes with intelligence, knowledge, sensitivity, creativity and wit about the gluten-free lifestyle. She tells it like it is; the gluten-free diet is very do-able, but attitude is everything. You'll enjoy learning with Jax as your guide in this GLUTEN-FREE BIBLE. [...]
I find it strange that some of these negative or one star reviewers stated the supposed facts they understood from the book. Did they even read it or skim along, get into an angry frenzy and decide to write a review? Their reviews couldn't be more inaccurate. Over and over again, Jax lets you know that it's not okay to be subjected to just eating the topping of something without the crust or the insides of a sandwich. She writes to be prepared, but to also express your feelings when others expect you to be ok eating contaminated food, or eating around the dangerous parts of their dishes. Although I find some of her dialogue or self-back patting to rub against my grains, I still very much enjoyed her book and will not only suggest others should read it, but hold onto it for future reference. I guess read it and research anything you find questionable since it was published in 2005, things change, facts change. Otherwise, enjoy.
I have a family history of auto-immune disorders and have started developing them myself. This book was recommended by some other family members and I have read it and passed it on to more family who need it! Great book!
If you are looking for a compact, pocket-sized copy of the New Testament, Psalms & Proverbs, this is a good one. The ESV is a respected, accurate translation. This copy is nicely bound and should last awhile with careful use. Of course, given the size, the text is on the small side. But that is the concession in the purchase of a pocket New Testament. Finally, the price is right.
This item is good for storage of cds and is less breakable than the harder cases. Wish I'd have bought and may buy more of them than harder cases, which can crack.
Diane Schoemperlen said she found inspiration for this book when her young son asked her how come her books never have any pictures. She then had the brilliant idea to wrap short stories around antique drawings, 100 year old catalogue pictures and illustrations from the original Gray's Anatomy. The results are stories that are compelling on their own but are perfectly enhanced by the pictures put in them. A great gift or coffee table book to be flipped through again and again.
After reading Schoemperlen's Language of Love I couldn't wait to read her new book. I was NOT disappointed. All of the magic and insight and wonder and irony is there. Later when I took a walk on the beach, everything seemed magnified. The sun and a grain of sand were suddenly about the same size and equally amazing.
I found out about this author while reading a collection of shorts stories from 1998 with a forward from Garrison Keillor. Her short "Body Language" was included and it was the most impacting story of the bunch. This full collection does not disappoint!
I read this series in junior high and loved it. Very original and very unique take on the secret agent genre. The main character is given the chance to be a top operative for a clandestine organization. Dying of cancer, he is given the opportunity to move his mind into cloned bodies. The only catch: the bodies break down after a period of time, giving him a very mortal deadline to his missions. I got into this series at the same time as the Destroyer and Mack Bolan books. This was by far my favorite. I highly recommend this to fans of extraordinary adventure.
I just bought my second copy of this CD - I have loaned my first to so many friends, one finally kept it! When I first heard the CD, I wondered if something had gone wrong with Amy Grant's long-time marriage to Gary Chapman. A long-term relationship of my own had just ended badly, and the songs I was hearing, particularly "Like I Love You", "Cry a River", "Missing You", "The Feeling I Had" and "Somewhere Down the Road", echoed my very feelings of regret, loss, hope and emptiness. Later, I heard that Grant's marriage had ended. I had never heard a collection that so profoundly captured those feelings, as if the person on the CD was in my shoes. She writes and performs each song from her own torn heart and in words she has cried. It is the rawness and honesty which brings me back again and again and keeps me recommending it to my friends.
Leave it all Behind, I Will be Your Friend, Like I Love You, Takes a Little Time, Turn this World Around.. OMG, pretty much all are my favorites!! Gotta have it!
Iv'e been listening to Amy's music since I was 16 years - I find in her a kindred spririt. While the tones of the album weren't overtly spiritual, you can find the christian influence. My favorite song on the album was Somewhere Down the Road which addresses the questions we all have about life's tragedies. Like others before me, I could have done without Nobody Home - it just did'nt seem to fit. I've always believed that Amy Grant sings from her heart and this album does not refute it. This isn't my favorite album of hers, but my opinion of it improves each time I listen to it.
Amy Grant's albums are like a soundtrack to all of our lives. Out of all of her albums, "Behind The Eyes" is definitely the album that shows us the real Amy Grant, of who she is as a person, not a personality. Personally, I thought this was going to be another "Heart In Motion" (which I still love), but boywas I wrong. I remember when Iheard her doing her version ofJoni Mitchell's "Big YellowTaxi" (from "House Of Love"), I kind of guessed that will bewhat this album would sound like: Very earthy, acoustic, and organic. "Lead Me On" was just like that too when it came out in 1988. I love "Takes A Little Time." It has a Tom Petty-like sound that you would never her on an Amyrecord. I like all the songs,especially "Somewhere Down The Road," "Missing You," and "I Will Be Your Friend." This album will stand the test of time.
Truthful. Dark. Uplifting. - call it what ya like but this isindefinitely her most personal and emotional powerful record to date. Behind the eyes captures sheer honesty from within Amy Grant and the best part is, it's very relatable. From Like i love you, to the "Feeling I had" and then " I will be your friend" it's apparent that Amy has come through many changes. But what is Strikingly interesting is how she toned down the "fluffy pop" sound and got accoustic. She's showing the listener that this record isn't about sappy love songs, it's about life and making peace in her life. I think we all need some peace in our lives every now and then..don't ya think?
No plot, very little talking, tons of high-quality flesh - all you could hope for from this genre in one package
Girls are cute and really attractive. Most enjoyable little film especialy if you like bikini tops falling off and boobs exposed.
To many people Mr. Young's thesis will seem to be outlandish. Yet, he is the one author I know of who actually tries to seek out the origins of religion using modern research into chimpanzee behavior. I wonder what Jane Goodall thinks of it? First there was Freud's Totem and Taboo, a mere root to Young's amazing tree. As he writes, " . . . the Darwinian-Freudian-Foxian root-stock on to which I would graft the story of alpha-shaman." I'm not sure exactly how to take him, but it is dazzling stuff. Since there was no impartial observer in the Garden of Eden, perhaps he is correct.
This monitor, when it first came out, received rave reviews and I have not been disappointed. Since first buying it a few years ago, I have since added two additional ones as well. I would recommend this monitor to anyone looking for a older model that performs well.
Your Child is one of the best books I have ever picked up to read! My toddler and I were experiencing some difficulties at home, which is why I purchased the book. After reading this wonderful map through childhood, I believe we are both going to be just fine. It gives hope to parents that we really are doing a good job at raising our kids in todays world. And if we aren't, it gives great advise on how to seek help. This isn't your typical "self-help" book!
Readers should always remember that while reading. Instead of the usual monthly periodical installments with room to spare, "Hard Times" was done in weekly installments with a very limited space allotment, for the newspaper "Household Words." Dickens found the combined pressure of time and space nearly intolerable, given the breadth and depth of his vision for needed social reform. One can only imagine how much better, fuller, and more satisfying this book would have been -- in plot, character-development, dramatic impact -- if Dickens had written it as 900 pages over two years, rather than 300 pages in five months.
A most interesting book, and not the "downer" one might expect from the title. The story begins with the issue of what might happen to children raised in a setting where the non-logical human qualities are repressed. This is blended in with the relationship dynamics of those who own the factories and those who make the factories actually produce something to sell. Further, related issues are added. These various topics are intermingled in a moving story.
Book was in excellent condition and service was excellent. It's not the seller's fault that the book is boring.
For my English class, I read Charles Dickens' "Hard Times." I chose this book because I have read several of Dickens' works, and I have enjoyed them. I find his works good, thought-provoking books that are free of cuss words, violence, and lusts. I think this book was a realistic account of what life was like in the early nineteen hundreds. I was glad that Mr. Gragrind came around in his thinking and realized it is okay to have fun. I am also glad of how the book ended. I was glad to see that justice was preserved. Overall, I think this is a good book, and I would suggest that you read it. I enjoyed it.
Bad Azz is dope and getting better everytime i hear him, however in my opinion its his beats and track selection that will halt his progress in terms of album sales and flava. His first album was good but suffered the same as this album in the fact that there are too many tracks that sound the same because they are so laid back and really lacking alittle liveness or crunkness even though this maybe the style of beat Bad Azz chose because he describes ghetto struggle so well. The best tracks are 'Streetz Illustrated', 'Wrong Idea' and 'How We Do It' with afew others close behind. If Bad Azz can include afew more tracks like these on his albums then he will start to really shine. Buy this album still, because the good tracks are Phat!!!
I have actually had this item for awhile! I wanted to purchase a large thickness but this has actually been great! At least until I can afford my dream bed.
The moves illustrated in this book by William Cheung are performed by him on video in "Wing Chun Kung Fu, volume 4."available on DVD, ASIN: B0001FFJR8Wing Chun Kung Fu, Vol 4 by William M. Cheung, or on VHS, ASIN: B00000JRU7.Wing Chun Kung Fu Vol.04
Although the PET's are an interesting concept, perhaps you (the customer) should wait until something more hi-tech such as one with a laser pointer acsess and the Net Nabby actually communicates with you. There would also de much better graphics. This computing power isn't feesable now, but if you wait it'll be worth it.
this is good toy. it's cool that you can now put chips in a PET, unlike the gameboy advance. it's educational because it teaches tatics in you useing things for advantages. it does'nt scratch easily and the power would be be somewhat better lasting than double a's.it's also very fun and it's not just for 2 players,there's one player mode (i think). booster packs will come out soon. it's great fun to play
the pet is preety cool its a nice sise and also if u want great game exp. buy more battlechips i cant give this toy 5 stars becuse when u die u need to shake it which is retadrded when i bought it at first i thought it would be a load of crap now i know that and if u buy it i want u to know
Jake Song "Jake" (New Jersey USA) this is for you remember when you said ask you if anyone wants to know the glich to get any battle chip you want. [...]
Stumbled on this one while channel surfing on cable... It has already started some time ago. So I went on Amazon and bought the soft copy so I can watch it immediately.
Good mystery, some good twists! From the beginning to the end it keeps you guessing!Also enjoy the leading man when he was a younger man!
I just got this player and found it very easy to use (without even referring to the handbook). It's great being able to play one CD full of about 14 albums in MP3 format. I've not tried other formats yet. The design is very nice and has all the main basic functions. It does seem to last a long time on 2 AA batteries (longer than an ipod ;-)The sound is OK for the price but I found that it does skip a bit after some time if on the move (unless you hold it carefully). For my use though (listening whilst travelling on the bus and train) I find it just right and the added FM radio is excellent for listening to BBC World service.I've just sent off for another one for my daughter who is 9 years old and loves the look of it.
Tonneau covers aren't cheap and this is what I needed to help salvage mine. Only bad thing was it still wasn't enough even for a regular six foot bed.
In October of 1871, something like 2,500 people were cremated alive in the forest fire that forever changed Wisconsin from the Big Woods to America's Dairyland. Eclipsed by the simultaneous Great Chicago Fire, and because few eyewitnesses actually survived to tell about it, the Peshtigo firestorm never achieved the notoriety it should have and there are not many books about it. This one builds a suspenseful narrative out of the more reliable accounts and anecdotes of the fire, and is studded with unforgettable images -- the self-herding house cats, the pretty girl running down the flaming boardwalk, the farmer who momentarily left his wife and children alone in the wagon ...The shipwreck story is a bonus.
this item was fantastic and neat. it arrived on time.it was worth the money. I will buy more items like this again.
This is a book I had when I was in the first grade. I recently started cooking with my eight year old and hoped this book was still out there. I have never seen it it a bookstore and there it was on Amazon and for less than three dollars!! It was exactly the way I remembered it. We have already made several of the things in the book. We have a lot of fun looking at the pictures and following the directions and the together time is great! A classic forever!
I'm reviewing all three Albums together as they are by the same artist; Regina Carter. Again I purchased these Albums on the basis of a 30 sec listen. They all lived up to my expectations. If anyone is familiar with Stephane Grapelli, Regina Carter's style is very similar. She really swings. I love these albums and play them over and over again.
I really enjoyed this album, especially the songs "I can't live without you", "King of Glory", "More of You", and "One God". There were a few songs that would be good for choirs or dance ministries. I'll play this one for a while.
En résumé, si vous tes dans une période de votre vie où tout semble arriver sans raison et but précis...ce livre pourrais bien vous redonnez de l'espoir et vous aider à comprendre ''le pourquoi'' de la vie.In resumé, if your stuck in a rut, and you feel like nothing is going like you planned out in life; that your wondering why ''this or that'' is happenning....this book will give you hope by allowing you to understand ''the why'' of life.
Great book ... my friend will really like this book especially since it is in French. Hope to order more books soon from this retailer
I use this phone holder every day on my commute, in conjunction with an auto charger and hands-free earset. I find it indispensable in securely fastening the phone in place, yet easily removable. It makes one-hand dialing easy, and I don't have to worry about the phone sliding around because of sudden turns or stops. One word of note: it doesn't accept the use of oversize extended-life batteries.
Consider what might have happened to England if Dracula had survived Stoker's novel. This is the premise upon which Newman's story is built. Fortunately, his knowledge of Victorian history and literature is matched only by his brilliant ability as a storyteller. Newman is one of the best!
Many of these reviews have already laid out the story's premise and characters. I feel it my duty to comment on the last 20 pages, which are as deeply haunting as they are unforgettable. In those pages, the detective protagonist finally confronts the Prince of Vampires, and Kim Newman shows he is a true wizard of imagery. Dracula's court is a mixture of Bram Stoker's vision and an Hieronymous Bosch painting, and leaves an undelible mark on the reader.
I'm a quarter of the way through this and my interest has peaked and troughed.Peaks:- The array of real and fictional characters and their often amusing relationships with each other- The entire premise - a very refreshing vampire faceliftTroughs:- Parts are quite polarised - particularly those concerning Genevieve- Bit confusing keeping up at one part with several characters having similar names (but maybe that's just me!)It dipped a bit for me and I thought I might end up driving a silver knife through it, but I stuck with it and now I look forward to times when I can sit down and read it.Kim Newman's concept is brilliant.
The seller presented the title accurately and honestly. The book arrived in a timely manner, in tact.
This was the first book that I purchased after becoming a CHL instructor. I was impressed with a lot of the information within the book. However, there were quite a few typos which, to some, could lead to a credibility issue of the author and information when dealing with such a high stakes issue.
I was a little disappointed with this book. Not with the information, which I found to be very interesting, but the construction of the book itself is bad. Page 12 is printed in place of page 22 which is included as an afterthought on a single sided page just stuck between the pages like a book mark! I have great respect for Massad Ayoob who wrote the foreward and for the author, David Kenik. However I have little respect for a publisher who obviously did not read the pre-press proof. Again, good information, poor construction.
These were delicious, but not wrapped as well as I think they should be. They kind of melted out of their wrapping.
Excellent book. Easy directions and explanations to implement the Crucial Confrontation Model.
Knowing I had to face a crucial confrontation I looked for answers to help me in this uncomfortable situation; and, I found them!! Not only is the information valuable in business but it applies to family and life in general. Recommend it to anyone that has a hard time facing confrontations. It is written in a way that is both easy to understand and to apply. The information flows in a format that makes total sense.
The follow up to "Crucial Conversations" this book has some great tools and insight into dealing with those crucial confrontations that we all have from time to time.
This is a workbook for people in organizations or any relationship to have a succesesful confrontation. I think the ideas are very good. It follows some of the basic tenets of Conflict Resolution.
This is the most practical and best researched book on conflict resolution. On my top 10 best management/leadership books. Must read!
I do say it is a varry handy item for PC Cameras so that you can plug it into theVCR to make a Copy of what Video you Recorded on your Camera and put ona VHS Tape or a DVD CD if you have a DVD Player that can Burn DVD's
I bought this as an inspiration for my wife who makes boxes. We both love the book and have come away with some great ideas!
Ok, the kids accused me of reading it because its full of boats, dories, fishing boats, rowboats, skiffs, mailboats etc and they are right. But I liked it most because it showed the kids thinking and the dangers of not trusting your brain when you are in trouble and the way out is not by getting into more trouble.The kids, before committing to read it, also wanted to know that no dogs die, and no one dies in the story. They are sick of stories where the main character or their dog dies. So there are dead people mentioned in the book, a dead mother, but she's long gone by the time the story starts.Anyway I liked it. The depiction of being out in the storm was very true to life, as was the actions of the kids.
This worked great when I used it. It's been so long, but I remember it worked great! The only problem is that comparing it to anything recent or current technology its a piece of junk.
This is a good, 'simple' witch costume. Good product for price and just one night's use.
This fundraising concert has the most amazing collection of artists you would hope to see in any concert. I saw a more recent documentary about the career of Sir George Martin that actually showed his Air Studios in their derelict state in Montserrat today after the cyclone all those years ago. Such a pity given the historic music that was produced there.
This is a great music DVD I love it. Lot's of rock stars and loads of songs, I am very pleased. Money well spent, If you like this DVD you will love "A Concert For George" that was a ten plus+++++
The most amazing music DVD I have ever seen. I have had many a party when this DVD was played that captivated the crowd. To have Paul McCartney, Elton John, Eric Clapton, Sting, Phil Collins, Mark Knoffler and more all playing together is an historic event.DC
This is one of the best music DVD's I've ever seen. If you likeany of the artists listed on the sleeve -- and particularly ifyou like most or all of them -- you'll love this DVD. Claptonplays rhythm guitar on Money for Nothing. Knopfler playsbackup on Layla. Everyone plays on Golden Slumbers -- whichfinishes with The End and Carry That Weight. Awesome!
The concert performances are par excellent... but when I bought this video, I truly thought it was defective. Phil Collins faded in and out on "take me home" and the sound was extremely uneven on many other tracks. I immediately logged in to check this and other reviewer websites and found that many complained about audio quality, but there were a FEW who DID NOT. After closer inspection, I found that there were two versions of this DVD-- one with Dolby 5.1 only (released 02/02/99) and one with Dolby and DTS (released 10/26/00). Well, I searched around until I found the DTS copy and low and behold-- audio is MUCH better on DTS format-- like night and day for me and my sound system is definitely NO great shakes.... I highly recommend this DVD, even though ths sound still won't quite rate a 5 star, but the performances and collection of musicians definitely come close. BUT buy the DTS version!!!!!!
This is a great DVD to pop in and just listen to after a hard day at work. The music is great, although I may be biased, seeing as how all my favorite artists are featured, especially Mark Knopfler. Sting's performance is another highlight, as he sings his standard "Message In A Bottle". You may want to skip Elton John after he does "Your Song" to get to Eric Clapton and Paul McCartney. All in all, a great concert.
This is a very good recording of a fabulous concert. The sound and picture are first rate and the list of performers is, simply, a stunning collection of British rockers. McCartney singing "Golden Slumbers" is alone worth the purchase price. I highly recommend it.
I bought this cap for my Canon PowerShot SX 40HS, but being previously advised I'd be using constantly a 67 mm. UV filter attached to the Lens (you must have the FA-DC67A Lens ring adapter for this). Otherwise it will be useless.If used as indicated, you'll have a cap that holds tight to the lens and additionally, will give your camera a terrific, nice look.Also, be aware this cap has no leash to keep it attached to your camera (don't forget this, to avoid losing it!)
5 stars for functionality. This works perfectly on a Canon SX50 67mm Adapter ring. The only thing I don't like is that it's hard to keep in your hand when removing, but I feel the same way about the original lens cap that came with my camera.
the product is of great quality, and unsurpassed even Canon, I was very happy with the product. cap quality is excellent
I found the beginning to be interesting, albeit kind of sad. But when it turned to what I guess is an opiate trip, it got downright creepy. Gave me nightmares.I'd heard of it forever and I'm glad I read it. But I would not read it again.
I could not put this book down! The story is riveting and heartbreaking, and the writing is fantastic -- this reads like a novel more than a true crime. I felt like I was right there as the horrifying events unfold, and as the family deals with the tragedy and the injustices that follow. What I admired most is how the author, herself in the center of the story, manages to be so generous in its telling. We go into the heads and viewpoints of each family member as well as the four killers, and as a result we get a nuanced, thoughtful and balanced portrait of that fateful night and resulting tragedy. The killers are living breathing men whose lives and personalities converge to create this crime -- a senseless tragedy that robs the world of two amazing, spirited young women. The author calls the book her "personal memory stone" to her cousins, and it's a beautiful, heartbreaking tribute.
The heart of this book is chapters 4 through 11, where we are given a taut, detailed account of the brutal attacks and of the hours of abuse suffered by the surviving victim at the hands of St. Louis homocide detectives.Chapters 12 through 15 (about 60 pages) cover the investigation, apprehension, and trials of the vermin responsible. Unfortunately, the author goes on to tell us all about parole hearings and execution stays and Ricki Lake and Court TV and thus manages to actually drain away some of the disturbing power of the tale she has so skillfully told.
This true account is well written, riviting, and perfectly clear. What happens to the young man is beyond understanding. Crime on top of crime is what comes to mind. But he survived to tell the story.
Like the famousMetal Massacre, Vol. 1, which is noteworthy for introducing the world to Metallica, Metal Massacre III's major claim to fame is that it unleashed thrash legends Slayer.The early Metal Massacre compilations are the best reflection of the American metal scene at the time, as such this 1983 release is full of power, traditional, and proto-thrash metal bands that are all clearly influenced by the NWOBHM scene. In addition to some of the "name" bands like Slayer, Virgin Steele, and Bitch, Metal Massacre III featured bands like Snowhite (later Znowhite) and Warlord that developed a cult following, as well Medusa, Test Pattern, Sexist, Marauder, and La Mort, who appear only on this album and were never heard from again.A lot of these bands and songs are raw and unpolished, but that was part of the charm of the early 80's metal scene. These Metal Massacre albums are a great way to revisit that era, and are a must-have for all old-school metalheads.
Connected . Works well. Fast delivery. Great service. Great for when you want maneuverability while at computer and don't want to be tied to the four foot cord on headphones.
almost a year of use, and it still works great, this runs from our tv, to my treadmill, I exercise 6 days a week, and this is a fantastic extension.
I am allowed to listen to music with headphones when I'm at work, but my computer is on the floor and it's too far for my headphones to reach, so I bought this extension cord and it has saved my life. I'm happily listening to music as I type this!!
This headphone extension works great. I bought it for use at work, and it's wonderful not to be tethered to my desk. I may now move freely around my cubicle without constantly having to take off my headphones. It may be my imagination, but I swear the sound quality has improved too.
This book has everything! Romance, intrigue, deceit, Religious persicution, War... with a discription and belief in honor, love and God that parellel my own beliefs. This book has been a multiple read for me and I will probably read it many, Many more times.
Very good book! Well written and a def must have for all collectors!!!! It's a little off from the movie but still as exciting as it gets you to want more and more Rambo!!!
Co-written by David Morrell (FIRST BLOOD AND RAMBO: FIRST BLOOD PART II). Based on a Screenplay by Sylvester Stallone and Sheldon Lettich.John Rambo. The most dangerous man alive. His country has called him once again -- this time for a mission he will not accept. Living in exile in a Buddist monestary, far from home, he is finished with the glory and the blood of war.Now, his former commanding officer, Colonel Trautman, the only man Rambo trusts, is in trouble. On a mission meant for Rambo, he has been captured by Soviet troops on the Afghan border.For John Rambo it's a call to arms. And an invitation back into Hell...with the help of Afghan rebels.
I know that this wonderful band delayed five years to launch this album, however was compensatory. The quality of this material is surpreedente. The style of the band is gothic/atmospheric. In some passes of the CD, we perceive the influence of the Dead Can Dance. For who it does not know, the songestress of the band, Francesca Nicoli, is the same songstress of the band " Ataraxia ". The vocal masculine is for account of the Andrea Zanetti, where the gothic style predominates. All the CD is excellent, the instrumental part is sufficiently melancholic, but gorgeous. The bands prettiest of the CD are, instrumental:"Battesimo: Nero Opaco " (introduction), " Consuming Jerusalem ", "Fade to Grey ", " On perspective of Spiritual Catharsis " (Title) and " Nephtali ". Who to want to acquire this CD, with certainty will not go to repent itself, valley to confer.
Freud based his ideas from no scientific facts. There is no way to measure somthing as subjective as dreams. I enjoyed the the book as entertainment, but would not derive any factual information from it.
I love the soundtrack, but was disappointed that the songs are not ordered as they "appear" in the film. The order on the CD then seems to be completely arbitrary. Still a great CD, but I think that it could have been better if the tracks were ordered properly.
If you've seen that strange and wonderful movie, The Triplets of Belleville, then you should order the soundtrack. If the triplet's song plays over and over in your head, then you need the cd, because not only is it there three times (twice in French and once in English), but the French Mafia' s theme shows you those horrid clones perfectly. If you've ever wanted a recording of music by a vacuum cleaner, a newspaper, a bicycle wheel and a refrigerator, this is the cd for you.
"Les Triplettes de Belleville" n'a pas reu le Jutra de la meilleure bande sonore, puisqu'il n'était pas en nomination. "Gaz Bar Blues" l'a remporté.
Another treasure from one of the world's greatest-somewhat-unknown poets...more more more is all I can say! To see his translations in his own hand is the greatest thrill, as well as the brief but wonderful interview at the end conducted by the editor and publishers. A true touchstone for living dharma and freedom.
I ordered this charger for my Canon PowerShot SD 880 IS. Fortunately, I ALWAYS go to Amazon when looking for anything. I found an ORIGINAL Canon battery charger for a lot less( half off!) than the Canon site's price & with Amazon Prime shipping & it's guarantee. I was able to order two for the price of one charger. They both came in authentic Canon boxes & sealed new. I have two Canon batteries for my camera, so I immediately popped them into charge. They went into the charger perfectly and charged within two hrs. I'm SO glad that Amazon had these chargers on their site. They're authentic & backed by Amazon's guarantee.
Bought this exact replacement for the camera battery that I lost. I also bought another version that was 1/4 the price just out of curiosity. While this one works great and I would recommend it. I would recommend the other one more because of the cost and it comes with car charger. Either way, cant go wrong
Thank you for great prompt service for the Canon camera charger.I misplaced mine a month ago and was in desperate need of a new one> Thank you so much!
This is the perfect replacement to your lost charger. Not much to say about it. I like that it doesn't have a long wire. The electric prongs slide in and out of the back. Good compact and portable.
This was a replacement for our original recharger and it was a wonderful price. We are happy with it so far after a charge or two. We just bought some super cheap replacement batteries and will see how they fare. Was happy to bring the camera back to life with these purchases!
If you lost your charger that came with the camera, this is exactly the same one. I looked for cheaper versions at Best Buy and other stores, but those chargers were all so much larger in size. This Cannon charger is so compact that it is easy to keep with the camera, and it seems to charge faster than the cheaper brands as well.
This is a well made battery charger and very easy to use. No long cord with a plug. It plugs right into the electric socket. Handy to carry with you. I am happy with the Canon SD700IS digital camera and not surprised that any accessories would also merit a 5 star rating.
Got this to replace the missing one from my daughters camera. It works perfectly! We really shopped around but found that Amazon had the best price on the real Canon charger. There were many others that, when examined closely, were not actually Canon brand. We were not willing to take the risk of an off brand just to save a few $$. Would recommend to others.
I lost my original charger and needed a replacement. Works as expected. Charges the battery quickly and the battery holds a charge for a good amount of time.
I bought this charger for my parents on Amazon when they misplaced the original one that came with the Canon camera I had given them. It arrived quickly, it works well, and Amazon's price was very competitive. Plus, it enabled my parents to use their camera on a recent trip to San Francisco.
I lost the battery charger that came with my Canon camera this Christmas. Looked for a while for a replacement and found this one. Looks exactly like the original one and works just as good.
Charger was an original OEM, but not the excact one pictured. it came with an axternal power cord. it was still a good deal, not worth fighting over.
I got exactly what i asked for, works as expected, and was delivered on time as promised.
I first saw the HBO Special, and looked forward for the DVD to come out with Dobly 5.1. Fun to watch, and dance too. They did a great job on this DVD.
Janet is one of the best artists in music and she knows how to get a crowd going, even when it's home viewers with their DVD's. I saw Janet in concert as well and it's really this much fun. This is also a great DVD as well. Great motion menu's and animated chapter selection. Get the DVD now!
I reviewed the concert special. Janet wwas really good. I loved the choreography on Rhytmn Nation the best! and also YOU which was suppose to be a song dedicated to Micheal. Her dancers were remarkable!. The Rope Burn song is really hot I'm sure the guy from the audience felt the same. Janet has many moves like Micheal part of her show even remind of Madonna. Janet definitely has alot to show for her success.
She is very much full of life and her singing is what made me become a singer. The way she moves and spins is totally killer!!!
The DVD could have been better if the audio was as good as the video and that is not too much to ask. When compared to the Eagles 'Hell Freezes Over' one has the impression that a lot is left to be desired. Janet on stage presence however covers a lot, after all this is Michael's sister.
Janet is at her best in this excellent concert! I love this video and have seen many concerts... This it top entertainment!! I recommend it highly.Janet Jackson - The Velvet Rope Tour (Live in Concert) (DTS)
Okay, I'll admit it...I'm a Janet fan. But you've got to give it to her, Girlfriend is a fantastic performer. This video proves it. I've seen her live twice and this video brought me back to the great times I had at those concerts. She gives so much of herself that you don't mind the price you paid for the tickets. With that in mind, this video is a bargain at any price. Madonna who?
Simply an awesome 20 song blues collection by 20 classic artists (Muddy Waters, Willie Dixon, Hound Dog Taylor, etc.) from an Austrian label called Wolf Records.
If you are a totally out of control Buddy Holly fan (like I am), then this book is a "must have" for your library! It adds a great deal of information about Buddy and his performances in England and is well written and researched with some great bibliographic information!
I run 12 of these strips in my data center. They are reliable and the new online interface is very nice.Pros:- very reliable, never had one fail- online interface is nice and easy to useCons:-the price is quite high-the software that comes with the unit is Windows only
This book describes how to do anything and everything you could ever want with an xbox.It starts of very simple by describing how to open up the xbox and take out the parts. But by the end of the book you will have covered such things as;-Installing Mod chips on all versions of xbox-Choosing the right dashboard-Learning the Xenium OS-FTP your computer and xbox-Flashing a bios and installing a dash board-Customizing your own dashboard-Replacing the case-Installing hard drives over 137GB's-Custom lighting-Xbox Media CenterThese are just a few of the many things that fascinated me about this book. A person who has never seen an xbox before could pick up this book and read it and have a completely pimped out xbox in a week.It is FULL of very detailed explanations and it has tons of very useful photographs.I would HIGHLY recommend this for ANY one who is going to open up their xbox.
book helped me with what i needed to accomplish.Got the job done and couldnt of done it without it
I had no issues running this cable through a drop ceiling and connecting it in to my devices. The connectors seem solid and had no issues during connection.
I was really surprised to find that this was really made of leather and actualy works. The pouch is a good idea for the remote and wall plug accessories. As there isnt really any good handle for the IM7, I am very happy to have purchased the harness.
Makes the speakers portable, without this harness the speakers are difficult to handle.Altec Lansing IM7 Speaker Shoulder Harness
Great sound in all ranges.The only reason I'm not giving it 5 stars is b/c my iphone doesn't fit in it very well.It would be nice if the manufacturer could provide an after-sale attachment for new ipods and new iphones.
I purchased the IM7 harness and absolutely love it. It is solid and unobstructive for controls and speakers. For fun I even swung the unit, with IM7 in place, around in circles about 8 times at high speed to test its ability to stay secure.... NO PROBLEM!!! Hope you all enjoy yours too.Altec Lansing IM7 Speaker Shoulder Harness
Besides being so happy with the IM7 Speaker Boombox that I got for my daughter (the sound is terrific, it rocks), the shoulder harness is great. You put it on the IM7 and just leave it on. It makes the IM7 much more portable. I love the IM7! And the harness. What a team!
Joan Crawford & Jack Palance are sheer perfection in this tightly directed film noir suspense film. Not for a moment does the tension ease! Crawford has done excellent work in many of her large library of films, but this ranks right at the top. This is one to own!
Alright, there are no special features. Alright, so there aren't even any subtitles. And there are a couple of seconds where the picture had grain- ok, I give. But overall, this film is excellently presented. I don't have any complaints about the sound or the picture- in fact, I thought it was remarkably clear considering that it hasn't been preserved as well as a lot of other pictures. Trust me, the plot more than makes up for any minor annoyances.In an Oscar nominated performance, Joan Crawford plays successful playwright Myra Hudson. When she falls in love with a handsome actor named Lester (played by Jack Palance, nominated for Best Supporting Actor) everything seems perfect. But when she discovers her husband's plot to murder her, she designs a plan to reverse the gun.This movie is great, and if you're not one of those people who whine when they don't get all the bells and whistles, you'll love it too.
One of the problems with buying Joan in the woman-in-distress in this movie is just that Joan is just not very good at playing it (She stares Palance down with the eyes of a gunslinger and looks as if she could take him out with one punch). Once she decides that she is going to engineer the demise of both her murderous husband and his girlfriend, we are in territory that Crawford is best in. But I am not saying she can't be good- despite the nutty scene where she finds out that Palance plans to off her (where she does everything but juggle while spinning her head around a la Linda Blair in "The Exorcist"), she's good in this one. (Especially in the scene where she catches her reflection in the mirror with a gun and actually "sees" herself for the first time. ) Slighly looney, like most late-middle era Crawford flicks, but our Joan makes you buy it lock, stock, and barrel.
Joan Crawford delivers one of her finest performances in this 1952 suspense thriller. "Sudden Fear" has all the classic noir trappings, with enough plot twists to keep you on edge. Jack Palance and Gloria Grahame are a perfect match for Crawford's cat-and-mouse theatrics - guided by David Miller's razor-sharp direction and Charles B. Lang's Oscar-nominated cinematography. Despite a less-than-stellar print and no extras, this Kino DVD is highly recommended.
It makes us look at our lives as Africans living in America...trying to assimilate into mainstream America or maintain our Blackness. One thing that affirmed what I've always said is that we have to try to help whomever we can to realize their potential.
every young lady and young man should read this book in high school or freshman year in college. easy read in one day, get it, read it ,enjoy it, i did twice:)
I was in my early twenties when this book found its way into my heart; I will never forget the sound of Sister Souljah's voice in my head, I could hear her words and feel the pain rising from the pages. Though it has been since the early nineties that I read No Disrespect, I will always heartily recommend Sister Souljah's grand debut; this book is pure heart; not easy to come by in these plastic times. I say, pick it up and give it a read, you won't be disappointed, and something might change within your soul, a new perspective, or even a song within your heart might be born and you might chance to sing along with No Disrespect ~ I think it takes guts to write like this, and this author has my full respect for putting herself out there. Not an easy thing to do. Sometimes its not easy to read a book chock full of opinions that one may or may not agree with; and that is the glorious thing about this book; new perspective, new horizons; freedom to think newly.
There aren't enough words to explain how much I enjoyed this book. Everyone should read this joint! I read it twice!
I enjoyed this book very much. Saw a lot of myself in the pages. Some good and some bad, I think all females should read as rite of passage. Will enlighten and encourage a different behavior. A book that should be read and passed on to others.
I enjoyed reading about the people in this book. Her view on life in this country as a black woman was not watered down.
Fates Warning's Inside Out is hailed by a majority of their fans as one of the band's weakest, if not the weakest album. I dont agree with this feeling.Inside Out is similar to Parallels, but generally lighter. The lyrics are more focused on euphoric feelings. Its a light progressive fans dream. If you like the melody and passion of No Exit, and the lighter feel of Parallels, this is the Fates Warning CD for you. But do not buy this CD if you expect Fates to bring the Metal, because they dont.Inside Out is my second Fav Fates, next to No Exit.
An amazing book that I couldn't put down. The Shuberts have compiled a great tribute to Broadway theater. It's worth the money if you are a theater history buff!
Jack Polidoro has a writing style that will keep you turning the pages. This book is a fast read. The plot is exciting and moves. Jack has a way of making the tale come alive in your head. This book should be made into one of those disaster movies starring George Kennedy. It would be a knock-out! Jack included a generous helping of juicy sex too.
The Freddie Slack collection is especially well assembled. It's great to hear these tracks again, particularly his work with Margaret Whiting.
Ok, before I bought this DVD, I read all the reviews and I was prepared for it to be really annoying. IT WAS! She gets on your nerves. She LOVES to act, and she thinks she is really funny, but it gets old quick. On the other hand, I was so glad that I sat thru it because me and my husband learned so much. It was too late for us to get into a class, and this was really so informative, and it went over pretty much everything you need to know about going thru labor or having a c-section. So, for the people who said it wasnt enough cuz you didnt get to interact with couples or instructor, why did you buy it? Its great if you cant go to a class. What you learn is the most important part of this, isnt it?
For those of you that don't or can't go to a traditional class, I think you will find this video/DVD very helpful. My husband and I like it because we can watch one segment at a time. If we feel we miss something or don't understand something, we simply replay that portion. We ordered this video when I was about 28 weeks into my pregnancy. I would recommend this to others so that you have time to ask your doctors all the questions that you can't ask the DVD.
After reading so many reviews that criticized Sheri Bayles' delivery (no pun intended), I was prepared to be informed but also annoyed. I was very pleasantly surprised--I thought her wry sense of humor and presentation were an excellent match to the material, and I watched the whole video in two days of viewing. My husband and I had dropped out of our local childbirth class because we found the nurse there to be incredibly annoying and full of scare tactics, and this was exactly the tone I wanted--informative, entertaining, and fast-paced. My one issue is that I would like to have had footage of labor, as many childbirth class videos seem to include that, and it might have been useful. For simply getting the basic information, though, I thought this was excellent.
I thought this was great. The complaints about sound and video quality I thought were unfounded. I didn't find her annoying and both my husband and I did laugh and learn. The breathing techniques are helpful and clearly taught, and being a dvd if you miss it or somehow just aren't getting it you can always rewind. I especially like this format compared to a class as I can review this any time I feel the need.
These classes were a lot better than I expected. Most of the infomration was refresher, but there were several things that I never knew. The instructer doing the classes is hilarious, and my husband actually sat down and enjoyed watching them. These were much easier for him since he doesn't do well in a class room setting.
I thought the video was certainly worth watching and it had some very good information in it. I plan to watch it again when I am closer to delivery and take some notes. This is our first child and we are overseas, unable to take childbirthing classes. I did find out that you can rent them on Netflix and so I'm not buying the childcare and breastfeeding ones, but I am going to rent them.
Okay - The information given was thorough and helpful. I feel like I learned a bit more than I knew before. I'm definatly glad that I did a video and NOT attend an actual class.My husband and I watched most of it together, but I have to say that I watched more than he did. Although, I did fast forward through the stupid stories that the instuctor tells all too often. I felt bad for the people in the video who had to sit through all of her jokes and drama!I chose this video bacause it was more up to date than some of the older videos on the market and I think that the information given is current enough to learn about medical technologies for today.Just be forwarned that Sheri Bayles is annoying - Keep your remote in hand and your thumb on the fast forward button!Sorry Sheri- I know that you tryed to keep it from being dry, but you actually made it annoying instead.
Soon after my baby shower our doctor ordered me on bed rest. She said I wouldn't be able to attend a regular lamaze class and recommended this DVD. Happily, my sister had just given it to us as a shower gift. It was a joy to watch and very informative.
This is a great product. We watched a couple child birthing videos and this one was by far the most informative and entertaining. Great money saving idea too with birthing classes costing over $100 these days. Highly recommended. Other videos in the series are great too (breastfeeding and newborn care). Good luck!
Overall, this DVD is great. It's informative and hey, you can watch it on your own time, according to your own schedule.The instructor was funnier in the beginning than I found her to be at the end, and she gets a little long-winded, trying to hard be funny about childbirth. But, that's what the 'fast-forward' button is for, right?Compared to others on the market (which isn't very many to choose from), I think this one's a keeper.
I have to say that the information was very good but some of the comedy I could do without....I think thats what made it so long but other than that I liked the meat of the film. I also liked that it was something my husband and I can do without going to a class and that it didnt have a bunch of breathing exsercises that I wouldn't use. The one breathing (fucusing on a object and breath past contractions worked like a charm. I have also given that to my family member and her husband.
I am so glad I did not sign up for in-person classes. This video fulfills that need. I now feel very well-informed.
Love it!This DVD includes real couples in classes by Shirley (who is teaching the classes)In a nutshell she walks you through women anatomy, birth (or labor signs), do's and dont's; breathing exercises, and labor.Because each sections is separated in chapters, you can choose which ones to view; The best part is to be able to view this in the comfort of your home with your partner or husband, at your convenience; ask questions to you doctor or midwife as well.
Remember that nerdy kid in the back of the room who thought he/she was funny but was actually really annoying? Well, she's all grown up and now makes childbirth videos.This video is good in terms of content. The facilitator's experience lends itself well to the conversation, but she has the worst sense of humor ever. Expect to learn, but don't expect to laugh. If you can make it past the bad jokes, annoying voices and face contortions, you'll get some good information.I'd recommend the video for the content in spite of the dorky antics.The couples are really nerdy too. If these people can have kids, believe me, you are going to be ok. Very reassuring. :)
As a "first-timer," I knew I needed to take a childbirth/lamaze class. Since I'm still working full-time, however, I couldn't imagine having to drive into town and actually sit through scheduled lessons. This DVD was truly the answer. We learned just as much as we would have if we actually went to a live class, if not more (I know this because I did actually go to classes with my sister a few years back). Yes, the instructor has sort of an unusual sense of humor--but she gives you tons of information, answers the questions you'd ask if you were there in person, and addresses the issues you were unaware of or might be afraid to ask about. The best part is I could sit on the couch in my PJs and hit "pause" if I needed a potty break!
I didn't get a chance to go to a birthing class so I don't have a basis for comparison but I feel that the video provided a good alternative for me. It provided straight-forward information and didn't overwhelm me with a bunch of different breathing and pushing techniques. She demonstrated just one of each which I'm sure will be easier for me to remember when I actually go into labor. My husband didn't think the instructor was very funny but I really didn't buy the video to watch a comedy show, I bought it to learn a bit more about childbirth. Even though I've read all the "required" pregnancy books, I think this video gave me the extra info and confidence I needed as I was feeling a bit stressed about not attending a birthing class. I would recommend this video.
This is a great DVD, I almost thought some parts could be a little longer. I liked the questions from the participants, but it would've been nice to have a "most asked questions video as well".
I am pregnant with my first and this DVD was great. It was easy to understand and gave all the important information I need to know before I go into labor. I especially like the fact that I could attend classes at the local hospital, but my schedule is very hectic. This way I can watch it as many times as I need to and in the comfort of my house.
The video was up to date which was very nice. Also, was entertaining, not dull like many others. I did not attend a childbirth class and this video gave me all of the information that I felt I needed.
I agree with the other reviewer on all the CONS she listed. Before ordering I read her review and hoped it wouldn't bias me, but even my husband after viewing the DVD for a while became annoyed at the teachers endless and annoying attempts at humor and her "funny stories". It's a real shame she is so annoying because the course concept is great and better than going to class as you can pause and review at any time. I tend to fast forward when she goes into her "funny story" mode. The camera work is poor: at odd times it focuses on the couples--they are quite scary to look at--and then camera will shift to the instructor and cut off the chart she may be explaining or holding. Overall, the course is NOT very professional but it is informational.
This DVD is not only super informative, but presented in a way that dads/moms can understand and even recall. If you have about an hour you can watch an entire session... and there are six in total. Only wish it came with a workbook or 'cheat' sheet of the helpful information.
We chose to get this DVD prior to enrolling in any local class. I'm glad we did. I've never gone to a class on this information so won't really compare a class to the video.This DVD was extremely informative. Yes, there are some antics and humor in the DVD that may not suit all tastes, but this is not a comedy DVD. The purpose of us buying this was to gain understanding of what's in store for our first childbirth, not to be entertained. If she didn't have some of the comedy and antics this would be a really boring dump of straight knowledge like a college course or something. I think she does a great job overall in the DVD mixing facts, concerns, choices, questions, and keeping us paying attention with some comedic examples and editorial.I would recommend this to any of my friends/family. It's great to own because I know we will need to watch this again at least once. There's a lot of content for review.
This DVD worked out excellent for my husband and I who don't have a lot of time to go to the traditional classes. We were able to do these classes out of the comfort of our own home, on our time and without the frustration of traffic, etc. Also, the DVD was less money than what the hospital wanted to charge us for enrollment into their classes. The sound fluctuates a bit, but it did not get in the way of our learning experience. I would recommend this DVD to anyone out there!
We did not take a birth class, they were too expensive, cost too much, and who's got the time?! I did a lot of reading, and thought I was good-to-go... Women have done this for 1000's of years right? I don't need a class....Wait... Maybe just a short class. By the time I found this DVD I was 37 weeks along!I saw the reviews that the instructor was annoying, and tried too hard. So what?! I didn't want this women to be my new best friend! I wanted to see what she had to say, and I'm glad I did!After watching this DVD set I went on to have a natural labor & delivery! I knew how to breath, I knew how to push, I knew when to go to the hospital. She covered all the key points, and I would reccomend this to any pregnant women, and her coach. No doubt, it's well worth it!
A major challenge of preparing for childbirth is the immense volume of information you are required to digest in a relatively short period of time. Most people have huge networks of people who give them tons of advice, which often serves to confuse rather than to enlighten since it is often contradictory. Enter Sheri Bayles.This product is amazing. It provides vitually everything you need to know, in a super efficient format. And with Sheri Bayles' witty presentation, the DVD is engaging and entertaining. Sheri Bayles has a way of making you feel comfortable and confident, by being honest, upfront and absolutely comprehensive.This DVD should be required viewing in all OB/GYN waiting rooms and hospitals. An absolute must buy.
I checked this out from the library. It's the best childbirth DVD that I've watched. I learned a lot and appreciated that the instructor tried to make it less boring with jokes and stories. I didn't try to watch the whole thing in one sitting, so that might be why the host did not annoy me as much. My husband didn't like the host, but he agreed there was a lot of useful information. I also liked that it felt like you were part of an actual class with other couples. I was surprised that the section on banking cord blood is sponsored by Viacord. This blatant marketing plug annoyed me and seemed really out of place. But other than the Viacord plug, and maybe getting annoyed with one too many jokes from the host, you'll learn a lot from this DVD.
I loved this Dvd. It had so much info that I found so very helpful. I would tell all my friends to buy it. It was very intertaining and funny. It awnsered all my questions on child birth.
My husband and I wouldn't be able to go to birthing class which scared me, I ordered this video bc of all the great feedback from reviews I read! I found this video most comforting and eased my mind. She is a great teacher! I would reccomend this video to anyone I know who are soon to be parents!
I was very pleased with this DVD. My husband works every day dusk til dawn and couldn't go with me to classes, so I purchased this DVD. It's to the point and it's funny. I would reccomend this to anyone that's in the market for it...I have already let a friend borrow my copy and she loves it too!Brandy
Very good classes (very informative), but the woman and her voices were pretty annoying. My husband had a hard time listening to her because she's just a bit weird, but I still thought the dvd was good.
I really enjoyed this video. My hubby and I couldn't make it to a class so I enjoyed watching it as a class setting and getting a lot of great info. My hubby, however, had to hold the remote to fast-forward through the lady as she got carried away in stories. That shouldn't detract you from purchasing this, however. Just a fair warning for other husbands that are forced to watch.
My husband and I bought this DVD as the thought of spending 12 hours on a prenatal class with people asking inane questions was too much to bear. I'm glad we did. Yes Sheri is annoying and her jokes grate on you very quickly, but the classes provide all the information you need, and in general she does a good job of spending the right time on each point without going into overkill. Unlike other reviewers here, I was glad she talked about how painful it is (because that's the truth!)....if you want no nonsense/factual classes then this DVD does just fine.
My daughter got this for Christmas. She was 4 at the time. She liked the toy for about a month and then it's sensational value wore off. Don't waste your money. If your child is a big puppy lover, she will adore it. My daughter doesn't even care about the mommy dog now. She does like the little puppies that came with it, though.
I enjoyed listening to Big Wheeler. He played his harmonica and sang like the old Delta blues I grew up with. Thumbs up!
I love this guy's movies so I'm a bit biased here. As far as horror goes, you could do better. It didn't really scare me too much, but there are the usual "look away" scenes typical of an Argento film. Plot: sicko tortures a cop woman and basically ruins her life. I stress not to watch this movie with someone who is easily offended...it will offend most! But for those of you who don't mind venturing into the bizzare and beautiful world of foreign thriller films, go for it! I doubt you'll be disappointed.
I have been taking this for a little under a week. I have noticed that my clothes are starting to fit more loosely. I have dropped about 5 pounds. No noticable side effects like some other products I have tried in the past. I am not jittery or my heart racing. Over all seems to be a good product.
I had to priviledge to get to know Izzy while he was recording his album in orlando, FL. He is an extremely talented and anointed young man. Most of all he is a christian behind the scenes and in his real everyday life. His production is super hot and his lyrics are uplifing. I hope that everyone who listens to his samples will buy the album and support my boy. You did it Izzy!
This book is oriented toward those interested in developing improved strains of edible mushroom species. Highlighted species include Flammulina velutipes (enokitake), Lentinula edodes (shiitake), Agaricus bisporus (common white button, portabella, crimini), Coprinus cinereus (woolly inky cap) among others. Caution, this is not a how-to-grow book, but a technical reference for breeders. Reviewed by THE MUSHROOM GROWERS' NEWSLETTER, April 1993 issue.
Have you ever kept a diary? In the book The Healing Time of Hickeys by Karen Rivers you get a chance to enter Haley's diary. Haley is a 16 year old girl who keeps a diary on her laptop computer. She names her diary Junior JT after her crush JT, but she calls her diary Junior for short. This is one of the funniest books I have ever read! If you like hilarious books or even hilarious movies, I highly recommend you read this book. Haley has never met her mom and liives with her dad who is a hippie. Her mom left her when she was a baby with her dad. Along the way, Haley gets the chicken pox, an awful haircut, and into a dilemma with a Ouija board. Will Haley ever meet her mom? Will Haley ever get her crush to fall in love with her? Will Haley ever find out what the healing time of hickeys is? You'll have to read this book to find out!
This book cuts down the odds with a better chance at winning lottos games. Very informative with many game wheels for all wallets. A must have if you want a better chance at winning than watching others win and wish it were you.
Ever since I became hooked on the song "Lovers and Fools" from college radio back in the mid-80's, I have searched for material from the Rich Kids. Although the original mix was muddy sounding, Cheery Red Records did its best to clean it up the sound of their debut album. This high energy material conjures up comparisons to the Buzzcocks and a bit of The Damned. Don't worry, Midge Ure's vocals are still able to penetrate the slightly muffled production of the material.
I had been a Marc fan for some time, emphasis on the past tense because his output became so repetitively prodigious that somewhere circa Fantastic Star I threw in the towel. (I mean, who has that kind of room on their cd shelves? And just how many albums can you release with the word Star in the title?) I picked this up because I'm a huge Antony fan and love "Ballad of the Sad Young Men." M&A do a good job on it (although it's nowhere near as focused or ultimately arresting as Anita O'Day's read), but I was even more pleasantly surprised with the unexpected excellence of the rest of the disc. The covers are surprisingly sharp, often unexpected and exceedingly well-chosen (love the resurrection of the Barry Ryan and especially the Dana Gillespie - perhaps he's saving "Weren't Born a Man" for a b-side?). Best surprise? The one original damn near outshines the lot. Welcome back, Marc!
I found the information timeless. Yes, somethings sounded dated because of time. Yet it did not take away from the content.
Very nice book! I am very happy with all the information on this book. It explains a lot of english grammar!
It has been a long time since high school and college English classes. This book helped me remember things I did not realize I had forgotten. Order it today. See what you forgot!! I would give more stars if it were possible!!!
A very informative book. Good for reference. Book price was affordable. Very helpful and a good read. Liked the book.
I loved the product, but when I went back to get another bottle, I discovered it had nearly doubled in price....so no thanks...I'll find something else.
A must-have for any fan of Thrash Metal. Blacky's meat-grinding bass sound and Snake's Venom-like vocals will make you wish you were born a Voivodian. However, the production sounds somewhat inadequate. Having seen Voivod live this past summer perform two of these tracks ("Nuclear War" and "Voivod"), I thought they sounded MUCH better in concert than on the album. Still, it's WAR & PAIN!
Excellent album, a masterpiece of this guys (and the shipping was absolutely great). A must in every music collection.
This book was riveting from the first page! I couldn't put it down and ignored children, laundry, and dishes until I reached the end. Adams brilliantly weaves her characters through an 'end of days' experience that will keep you on the edge of your seat (At least it kept me on the edge of mine!) Can't wait for book three!
This is an awesome CD. The title track will put you in a state of mind that makes other music become just noise.A truly talented man.
I don't know what it is about this movie but it's a classic 80's flick! Mark Harmon is at his best. The plot is a little predictable but it's entertaining and takes you back to the decade past.
I was so happy to see this came out on DVD, finally. This is a longtime favorite movie of mine. I love to share it with friends who have never seen it; they invariably enjoy it as much if not more than me. Believe it or not, it's a great "date movie" to cuddle up with....there are enough plot twists to make the story, at one time or another, enjoyable for just about everyone, and yet nobody will be turned off by them. This movie is great fun....enjoy!!!!
Great movie. I had to watch it for class and I actually enjoyed it!! It's in French but you won't even realize you're reading the subtitles
Good movie if you dont mind subtitles. I like that it is around 1 1/2 hours, good for my attention span.
There is something painful in the movie in the circumstance that the company retains an employee just out of reverse discrimination (that is, because they believe that he is gay and so is firing-proof). This is a REAL matter that is happening often--whether the reverse discrimination is against whites, straights, or men.Apart from this, the movie is entertaining and it has serious and worthwhile scenes amidst the farce. Worth seeing.
First, the full disclosure: I am not the kind of person that likes foreign films. Having said that, I highly recommend The Closet. Sure it's in French with English subtitles, but if you don't normally watch foreign films you'll be amazed at how quickly you forget that you're reading subtitles. This is a genuine laugh out loud movie, and how many comedies really fall into that category?Keep in mind there is a lot of sexual content, and if you are easily offended this is not for you. However, if you are looking for a comedy that's a bit different (and much funnier) than the latest Adam Sandler movie, you can't go wrong with this one.
I thought this movie was hilarious. Depardieu, who usually plays more serious roles - had me laughing hysterically. Behind all the silliness is an intelligent satirical commentary on business, lifestyle choices, over-the-top political correctness, hang-ups. Everything gets made fun of, still poignant and totally nutty. A gem.
This was a really funny movie. I usually don't like reading sub-titles, but I hardly even noticed them because the movie was so good. The humor is understated and well-done. I highly recommend this movie.
I've been a fan of Daniel Auteuil for some time and look forward to each new movie. This one is very funny and entertaining.
The bed wedge, combined with a Brookstone neck pillow, is giving my asthmatic husband the best sleep he has in years. The slant is gradual, and the pillow is wide enough to accommodate a man's wide shoulders, and still leave ample room for me in our double bed.
This whole series of books is magnificent. So unique, such a wonderful heroine. There are a lot of details in these books, and it's easy to get bogged down in them, but you just have to look at it as a learning experience. Other than that, this book is fantastic. Moving and inspiring. Could teach people today a thing or two about racism. The only thing I would caution is that I bought this to go with my set, which are the normal size for novels and this book is like a foot high. Not what I thought I was getting. But the text itself is fabulous!!
From the moment you open the book and begin reading the first page, you will most likely be hooked to Auel's first novel in the Earth's Children series. Auel did wonders with this first book! Not only is the story of Ayla, the blonde-haired orphan raised by Neanderthals, touching and, at times, exciting, there is a wealth of knowledge about Ice Age plants and animals. The first installment of the series can, at times, move along more slowly then I would have liked. However, I never found myself bored when reading this book. The ending won't necessarily leave you on the edge of your seat but you will be longing to read the next installment as soon as possible.
I'm almost finished this book and can't wait to get on to the others. This is entertaining, engrossing and educational. It has taken me forever to get through it but I'm learning so much about our ancient ancestors that it's worth each page.
An excellent AUEL written story that you cannot put down, Many suprises, and life as it was thousands of years ago. EXCELLENT RECOMMENDATION.
PPLLEEAASSEE HURRY UP! I read this book when I was in grade 5, am now in grade 8 and have read it 5 times since then! Okay, so I'm a literiture junkie. I have read the whole series twice and have thought about the fifth book for so long that I think I could write it myself!
It's a wild ride that you will take with Ayla as she learns what the world around her is all about. This book is a real treat. Start with this one (it is the first in a series of four, soon to be five books) and keep going. Jean Auel is definitely talented. Enjoy
I loved this book. I have read it and the rest in the series at least 5 times. Not only were they fun to read I also felt they were educational and Jean Auel did so much research to try and make the books as accurate as possible.
The book was listed as used but was in perfect condition. Excellent book, I would recommend it highly. It is evident that the author did extensive research before writing the book.
This book is absolutely awesome. However, if you aren't interested in The history of man kind, then I sugguest you read another book. While reading the book, I almost felt like I was the main character and it kept the pages turning. This indicates a great book that is worth reading!
I have the whole series on my Kindle Fire, and I love to read them over and over again. THey are really good reading.
I had lost the original book that I had purchased so I chose this oneTo replace the first book of this Earth's Children Series. I love this book very much and reread it immediately. This soft cover volume is easier for my elderly fingers to handle while reading. This is a series that will never grow old and one that I will pass on to my grandchildren in the future.
Auel's story of Ayla who lived at an earlier time during human evolution is very exciting. Auel's description of life during the ice age is well researched and her writing is filled with description of life at that time. This is the first book in the series and, in my opinion, it is the best of the bunch. For the reader, it is thrilling to learn and imagine what life must have been like during this earlier age.I "read the book" on an unabridged audio by Brilliance Corporation. Their version was very well produced so that the listener feels like he is right there with Ayla at that earlier time.
I never thought I would read this book based on the title, but I did and really liked it. I just bought the 2nd one and can't wait to start that one. At times there was too much detail and not enough action, but a great story that makes you think, what was it really like?
This book was required summer reading 2 years ago for my english II AP class. I thought it was really an amazing book. I loved the main character how strong willed she was even though she was more human and not cave man. I thought Auel did a great job writing it, but sometimes she was too descriptive about setting of the story. Description and imagery is good, but too much of it takes away from the story. I have read the rest of the series, but if you like this book you should read the others that go along with this series.thank you for your time,Loran
Jean M. Auel captures efficiently the changing times and landscape of the Neanderthals and the passing of evolution towards the more modernly advanced Cro-Magnons. The story not only provides excellent descriptions of nature and climate at the time, but also captures the customs of the people. The highlight of the novel revolves around the medicinal plants and herbs that are constantly brought up through Iza and Ayla's work as medicine women. The low points of the novel are some of the repetitive elements in Auel's description of the landscape and certain details repeated verbatim. However, the story clings to you as you flip the pages hurriedly, trying to find out about the next stages in Ayla's life. Overall, a good and worthwhile read.
Loved the story. And have now read the next book Valley Of The Horses, and am in the process of getting the third book, The Mammoth Hunter. Great Author.
I love this book! The entire series!=) Everyone should read it. You feel you are actually there through the story.
I loved this book, and I can't wait to buy The Valley of Horses. The way Ms. Auel could create such an intricate culture amazed me. Her writing techniques combined with a wonderful plotline make for an incredibly enjoyable book.
This book was the first ever I had read of its kind. Not usually into the prehistoric era, I found that I fell in love with the characters. I cried and laughed with them. I am looking forward to her fifth book of the series.
The Clan of the Cave Bear is very, very good. However, I only gave it four stars because it is a bit long-winded and its sentences run on. (It would have a long phrase, a comma, and then another long phrase. It got kind of tiring.) Ayla's abilities do not seem unnatural to me; Jean Auel did an excellent job of sculpting them into the story. Whoever said that Jean Auel "really, really wants to be blond" is sadly mistaken.
It was a co-worker who recommended to read this series.. I was sceptical at firstespecially as my Husband said he had the hard copies, and I didn't even know it.But once started, it was not easy to put down. The description of events, surroundings and the Clan people, were amazing..so much so I bought the second book "The Valley of Horses"..
I read almost all of these books many, many years ago and found them so interesting - am loving The Clan again, and will probably order the entire set in time. So nice not to have the usual voilence, although the primitives were sometimes pretty rough, but in a more natural way! Just lovely night-time reading whilst the hubby snores!!! So good to have something to read in the dark.
paper.You can really understand and feel for Ayla,her confusion, and love for these prehistoric beings. But it's hard to imagine that these ...people could be so oblivios to the more advanced ways of different people, that obviosly were going to excel in the human races...if I could I would give this book a 4.5 because I belive Mrs. Auel gave 90%
Ever since I read Clan of the Cave bear and its sequel The Valley of Horses, I have been looking for books just like it. If i were you, i would rush to the bookstore or the library and get it. Don't wait. Its a good book.
She had a older book in paper back, but the ex tore it up in spite. I got her the hard back, and she nearly broke my back with excitment!!! She was nearly in tears she was so happy.
I really liked this book, I have always been interested in early man, and I think this book sheds new light on the way it could of been back then. I found this book facinating, and I think that it was a wonderful experence.Although she didn't have any facts she still did a good job of filling in those empty spaces.
I rated that good because this book grabbed my attention inmediatly. Not only is intersting but also instructive. I recommends it to everybody. Regards.
This book was very different. Who would have thought you could write a work of fiction from Cave Man days. It kept my attention and I can't wait to start on the second book in this series.
Interesting and a very informative story about how the Cave people survived. The writing was somewhat elementary and repetitive but with a good plot. I would not read the second book in the series.
This is unlike my usual choice of reading, but I really enjoyed it. It contained a lot of interesting events and information that really stimulated my anger (such as the cruel treatment of Broud to Ayla). I disliked Broud and would have done everything in my power to annoy him if I were Ayla. i am disappointed that Ayla left her son behind with the clan, but he would have slowed her down. I reccomend this book for any avid reader that can handle long yet interesting books. Also, if I were a district official of a school, I would make it mandatory for prehistoric history students.
I loved this book so much. Ayla is sure to be a classic in liturature to come in the next decade or so. She is a great role modle. I think this woman has major courage! If this is your first book in the series, keep reading it's worth the time and effort, I promise!
I got this book for Christmas, and was hesitant to read it, because it sounded a little boring. But I brought myself to read it, and loved it! I loved every word! It is 500 pgs, and I read it in 3 days. It was so excellent. Jean Auel expressed Ayla's feeling, Broud's hatred, Iza's love, and Creb's frustration. It was a wonderful story!
Do you not remember the Clan of the Cave Bear hype in the mid-80's.....it was all the rage. The book is good. Good story, a little difficult to believe at times, since a lot of the actions of the people in the "clans" are hypothesized. But all in all a determinate story of survival, and coming of age in the post ice valleys. I do believe that she, Auel stole a bit from the Native Americans, well not steal per se, since their culture more closely mirrors the nomadic clans, but there are interesting depictions of seers, spirit chasers and medicine women. There are some romantic scenes which I have to admit were a little much for a 14 year old, but interesting nonetheless. Slightly educational and a good read. - Jennifer Rees
The best book is this one right here! Ms. Auel's story makes you feel as though you right there next to Ayla the whole time. You're there when she's in the earthquake, during her time with the clan, when she leaves and all the way up until the end. When I read the first story, I couldn't put it down and when I finished, I ran to the bookstore to buy the others. I can't wait for the fifth one to come out. And as long as there are more books of this series coming, I'll be reading them. Two thumbs up and a must read!
What an amazing and visually stunning book. It has been years since I have read anything that has shook me to the core of my humanity. This book has done just that. Will be reading this entire series. Such a prolific and dynamic writer. So glad my mother in law introduced me to this author.
There is something both mundane and exciting about this book. I read it cover to cover. I couldn't put it down. It's a beautiful story and the author has put so much research into it. A must-read for all women interested in prehistoric culture and even men who don't mind books with a good believeable heroine.I first started this book when I was 17 but couldn't get into it at first because of the apparent mundanity of the story. But I discovered later that the beauty is in the details with this book. The characters and the author's descriptions of the landscape and culture of the people are just wonderful.I highly recommend this as an addition to a fantasy collection.
While some people complain of inaccuracies in Ms. Auel's novel, it is important to remember that this was written in the 70's, back before much of our archaeological technologies existed. Much of what we know today we did not know back then, especially in the field of genes. However, with what she researched back then, we're presented with a solid and enjoyable read. The descriptions are lush (and sometimes overwhelming) and you definitely get a very good read - I find this better than many novels today by sub-par authors like Danielle Steel and Fern Michaels.
I read this book around 30n years ago, and have read it several times since. The amount of research that Ms. Auel puts into these books make the story really shine. I had no problem envisioning the settings and surroundings of the Clan and their territory. Sometimes Ms. Auel could get heavy on descriptions, but better than some authors who rush through this vital element of any story. Ayla's struggle to fit in with the Clan and learn their ways is not always easy, especially with the constant antagonism of Broud, a man who hates Ayla for no apparent reason. In the immensely patriarchal society of the Clan, where it is okay for a man to beat a woman, Ayla has a hard time, but there are also good moments, and she finds a place of value within the Clan. This is a book I will never forget, and it is a shame that this enthralling saga came to such a pathetic end in 'Land of Painted Caves', the sixth and final book of this series.
This is one of the few books that I've read *many* times. It's one of my favorite books. It tells the story of Ayla, that, due to an earthquake in her childhood, is adopted by a group of people that are both like and unlike her. In order to fit in to her new society, she must go against her own instict. She learns to hunt, though it's forbiddin, and she learns to heal..because her family thinks that this is the only way she will have any value in the patriarchal society. She is raped at a young age, and bears a child, which she nearly loses.Many people are critical, because Ayla is TOO perfect, and discovers too much. Well...so what? It's fiction. She isn't perfect in every way, and she is full of self doubt, and frequently makes poor decisions in her life.Ayla is a strong character, and Jean Auel is a great writer, and the imagery in her books is fantastic. They are well researched and enjoyable. I loved it!
This is a story of total humanity. The characters are real and captivating. I LOVE THIS BOOK!!!!!!!! If anyone asks me for books to read, I would definately reccomend this book. Clan of the Cave Bear also tought me to be who I am. Dare to be different. This was a great book!
This is one of the better book series out there. You grow to love the characters, and they are quite realistic. Talk about going back in time because of a book! Jean Auel has a wonderful way of doing that for the reader. Excellent series in which I've anxiously read every book.
It will be difficult to keep once step ahead of ms aurels. I never gave any thought to people of this time in our history. But from the first paragra your mind carries you away to a new adventure, which gives promise to a long and happy union.
Finished reading this last night. Amazing story!!! It was a bit difficult getting through the 1st chapter but after that, I was good to go! Totally imaginative, riveting, touching & pretty much leaves you with a kinda obsessive focus even when you're not reading. I loved the language; can't remember the last time I read a book that taught me SO many new words!!! & the story line? good grief....... I totally had NO idea the book was going to be that intense! or amazing! It's one of those moments where I realize & appreciate that you really cannot judge a book by it's cover/name. Some things you just MUST read! Auel is so descriptive and thorough in her writing. I'm so happy I came across this series... it realllllyyy makes you THINK and pulls on all your emotions. If you're reading this on your kindle, you will truly indulge in and love the dictionary! Every few pages I will hover my kindle cursor over a word and get the definition. Good stuff!
This book came within a week of when I ordered it. It was in good condition and I am enjoying it.
Jean Auel is a wonderful writer! Her books magiacally come alive. Impossible to put down once it has been started! The best book I have read in my lifetime!
I first read Clan of the Cave Bear when I was prompted by my mom.I thought "another one of your lousy stories" I read the first page and I was enthralled!! I simply could not take my eyes off the page!!I am a 12-year-old living in Kars,Ontario,and I reccommend this book to EVERYONE!!!!!!!Nobody writes like Jean M. Not ever.This book made me laugh,as well as cry. I have read all of her books,and am eagerly awaiting her 5th book.I love this book! I would give it 10000000 stars,if possible. If anyone dares to insult her work in my presence.......
I've read the 4 books by Jean M. Auel (twice). I'm sure the story has not ended yet. I cannot sleep because I want to know what happens next. Please Mrs. Auel could you finish the other books as you entended to do ? A suggestion : the story is very strong on its own. No need to waste paper by inserting a full description of their love-life every twenty pages. I'm sure you did it for commercial reasons and not because the story is incomplete without these descriptions. Thanks for the many hours of joy I had with your books. Hope I did not make to many mistakes in English.Anita
I had the misfortune to read the other three books of the series before reading clan of the cave bear but that did not detract from the joy of reading this book.Ayla's story is just that,although the author has written about our ancestors one should not take it as a trueism.Ayla's constant fight for survival and her success inspite of Broud's dislike for her,simply because she is diffrent from him helps push the story along.Their battle of their will continues even after her brutily beats and rapes her.Her decision to leave the clan inserch of her own is out of selfpreservation,leaving her son is hard but so necessary.The book is highly intresting and this authors eye for detail is truly awsom.Keep on Mz Auel.There is a rumor that there is another book in the works.Hurry PLEASE.
A beautiful story. Couldn't put it down. So well written that I felt like I was there with Ayla and the clan.
While reading this series it seemed to always slip into my mind throughout anytime of the day. It became so facinating that I would ponder it constantly. I am marveled at the talent Mrs.Auel has been blessed with and grateful she has shared her blessings and given us a true heroine in Ayla. This will been a series I will treasure and will love to read again and again.The time she has put into researching truely paid off.You feel as if you are right there treking along on the steppes. Reading this series has been such a wonderful experience.
My best friend first introduced these books to me probably when I was 14 or 15. Since then, I have not been able to put them down. I don't know how many times that I've read, and re-read these books. They still get me every time. The detailing and description really makes me think, and visualize what Ayla sees. I often wish that I could be her, sees what she sees, and Jondalar! How cute is he? I know every book almost off by heart. I know what's coming, and how they will all end, but I still anticipate and agonize every time. I haven't bought many other books because the Earth's Children Series always satisfies, and leaves me wanting more. I too, am anxious for the next book(s) to come out. Hurry up already!
I read this book for the first time when I was 14 years old. Since that time, I got the others in the series. I cannot tell you how many times I have read and reread this story, as well as the others. At one time, they came together in paperback, and I bought it. Now, they are so ragged they are held together by tape. I have been awaiting the time when Mrs. Auel comes out with another book. I would definetely be in line for that one.
One of the best books I've read. It brought tears to my eyes especially at the end. Strong and touching it made me really think. The book is excellent to the very last word.
I purchased this copy of "The Clan of the Cave Bear" to help complete the set of "Earth's Children" books. My first reading of it was a library book. I loved the series and decided to own and reread them all. Jean Auel is amazing and I look forward to another book.
Excellent compilation on Leadership attributes for innovation and is a collection of well written articles which made me think and connect to a real world phenomenon. I enjoy reading Peter Drucker's books and the content of the book has Peter Drucker's flavor to it. The Clarity and style of this book is truly outstanding.
Very nice Floor Mats. Bought these for my Honda Civic and they work great. Super deal. Shipping was very fast and they were exactly as I expected. A little small so they should fit just about all vehicles. Might be too small for large trucks.
This product is made of durable material and has managed to handle the salt and snow during the past winter months.If anything these floor mats would protect the ones that came with your car, even if you are not a Patriots fan.
I am a New Orleans Saints fan and have been since the franchise began. I no longer live in New Orleans but I do still support the team. I wear Saints gear when they play and so does our dog. My entire family are die hard Saints fans. I fly my Saints flag on my car, so why not have the Saints floor mats. Every time I get in my car, I say "geaux Saints!!!!" The color is perfect for the interior of my vehicle. I would recommend the Saints floor mats to all Saints fans. I just wished there were mats for the rear.
I bought this for a friend for her birthday and it didn't have a picture posted but from the description I figured it was the old version without the scary lady on the cover but it wasn't. Oh well.
i have this book and bought it for my best friend. It has a lot of easy, inexpensive ideas; great reference book.
The son of a Russian general, Prince Serge Obolensky grew up at the court of Nicholas II, and served as an officer in the Chevalier Guards in WWI. This is a remarkable tale of Obolensky's long and varied life - from student to soldier to City stockbroker to soldier again (this time as Lt. Col. in the US OSS in WWII) to hotel impresario in New York City. Married first to a Russian princess and later to Alice Astor, Obolensky was one of those rare 20th c. characters who "knew everyone". Yet he comes across in print as humble and self-deprecating. He was a leading representative of a civilization that was completely swept away by the 1917 Revolution. This is a good read; it is a pity it is not in print at present.
Por favor, no te importa mi español pobre, pero en serio no soy hispanohablante. Cuando tuve trece años esto libro mi mejora amiga me dio, y imediamente fue enamorado con su idioma, tema, y jugadores en una historia complicada y intimo. "Mas Que Humano" es un libro de los mas importantes del siencias, y de los libros intelligentes.
This was an enjoyable film that I would not have seen if I hadn't suscribed to Amazon Prime. I'm not getting any perks, etc, for reccomending Amazon Prime, but one of the features is the instant video. While many films have a rental fee, this film was included and I would not have watched it without that incentive.I found the plot of this film rather predictable, but the acting was good. I haven't seen many Danish films so it was interesting to me on a cultural level. The scenery wasn't a huge part of the film, but it showed some lovely aspects of Copenhagen. I did enjoy the film and would suggest it to people wanting a thoughtful film somewhat in the vein ofThe Descendants.
This movie has a wonderful and fully devloped story that reveals itself slowly during the first part of the film. It is filled with family drama, sexual tension, and one mans deep love for his family when he knows he is dying. Well worth the long movie time, and being dubbed in English (I am American and don't speak Danish). I am still thinking about it today, after watching it yesterday evening.
Great film. Interesting narrative that is easy to follow. The story of a past love reintroduced and how a twenty year gap has effected those involved. A new family is melded as the original partners story is revealed. Beautifully shot and cast.
Great acting by all, love all the characters and the story, a real love story. Watching the deleted scenes and listening to the director interview really fills in the whole story and adds to the character motives. I enjoyed the spoken Danish. I'll enjoy watching it many times.
Flawless... great movie with lots of heart and a beautiful perspective. Thoughtful story line that makes life hit home! Enjoy!
These are the first few words of the amazon.com product description: "Equal parts weepy drama and soap opera". This is a profoundly shallow and stupid description of this film. Fire the reviewer, Amazon!The story unfolds intelligently, the acting is believable and first class, and the overall effect is extremely moving. American movies should study this film. U.S. films, first of all, need to craft their stories instead of recycling the same old same old. I have the same advice regarding American casting: stop recycling the same old faces. Please!This movie makes me feel there is hope for the art form of film. American film makers take note!
what a wonderful movie for people that wants to watch how complications of life cam evolve into something that will will change your ideas for how YOU want things to be, and still be ok with. It could possibly happen in real life. bitter sweet. I cried but could also see the sweetness in how their lives completly changed pathways from how they thought it would be and how old roads ended up meeting again. It was all about life's ups and downs and about the message of staying to telling the truth and how people cope with that. I enjoyed the movie.
about past mistakes and future opportunities. It's better not to read a plot summary about this one because the main character only gradually finds out what is really going on. His orphanage in India is running out of funds unless he can get a Danish billionaire to consider his project more worthy of support than others he is considering. Of course the rich man has his own goals. It's up to the viewer to judge if they are realistic or noble. It isn't the typical cliche of poor man good and rich man bad. They both have their strengths and weaknesses.
Although a little uneven, this release has two timeless ballads ("Iris" and "One Step Ahead") and some rollicking good time pop songs (History Never Repeats, I Don't Wanna Dance, Hard Act To Follow) and the dazzling "Ships" which is one of my favorite Enz songs. Actually I think it is better than thier debut and shows a lot of growth.
This is a real good game. Very realistic, even down to the goal horns. Playing against NJ as The Mighty Ducks and hearing the goal horn from NJ brought back nightmares from Games 5 & 7.The only problems I have with the game is the jersey numbers. For example, I acquired Daniel Briere, and instead of letting me pick his jersey, the game automatically gave him #66. It's the little things that bother me. A game that is so good, shouldn't have that kind of glitch in it.If you can look past that, it is a great game, a must buy! I hope NHL 2K4 is just as good.
Path of Radiance is an incredible game that I've spent waaayyyy too much time on, simply because there are so many characters to choose from, and thus so many different tactics to use. It's an excellent turn based strategy game that requires much more planning and attention to enemy movement capabilities than other similar games (e.g. FF Tactics). The only real gripe I have with the game is the fact that you cannot revive characters once they die, so you may find yourself in the position of nearly complete with a stage when an enemy gets a lucky critical hit on one of your guys and destroys him, leading to you beating your controller against your head / swearing liberally as you reach for the reset button and prepare yourself for another hour of the same exact stage. Thus, I only gave it 4 "fun" stars, because having your characters die is definitely NOT fun. Otherwise, I love this game, and highly reccommend it.
Not only does this game challenge your brain in the gameplay, but in the story as well. Inbetween strategizing, there is a an awesome story about class and race; its political and social strife, rife with emotion. While the story is complex and convoluted, it never loses its logical train of thought.I have but one gripe: the presentation is lacking. Though the character designs are top notch (the hawk king is awesome), the music is bland, and the gameplay and character interaction animation barely scratches what is possible on the Gamecube. I lived for the cutscenes, which were drop-dead gorgeous, but few and far between.Overall, a good game. A must for starving Gamecube owners. So buy this game and then maybe the next home console iteration (Revolution, please?) of the game has a bigger budget that could improve the presentation.
This has got be one of the best games out there for the gamecube. The combat is simple and easy to learn, yet later on it soon get,s very complicated and fun at the same time. About 3% of the story is done through cinematic cutscenes and the voice acting is good. The graphics are beautiful and colerful and look great. everything also sounds good too. The story is showstopping and full of surprises and in terms of epic it can be compared to lord of the rings. Overall 10 out of 10!
I don't know why this does not have 5 stars as the overal rating! Path of Radiance is fantastic!!!1: The charecters names are atleast sane unlike many of the other charecters in Fire Emblems.2: The charecters are also different from eachother and interesting!3: The storyline has much more to it than the others as well! I never get board or try hard to get to the fighting sequences like I did in Sacred Stones.If you have any interest in games, get this one it will definately be among your top 5!
This is a great game, a very good mix of turn based strategy and action. You play by moving your team around the grid, choosing what to do and then see the results. (Turn based strategy) From there, they give you up front action of the players in combat, etc. It's a good fun game. The only down side I see to to it is sometimes you really wanna dive into the game and they make you run through this long history/lore of the game to give you some background. So far, I've been unable to find a way to skip it aside from just pressing buttons until it goes away and lets you play. That is why I'm giving it 4/5 stars. Aside from that, great game. I'm playing it on my Wii with a GameCube controller and memory card. (Required if you play on the Wii)
This may be one of my favorite games ever. Here are its pros and cons.Pros:1. It has a good plot.2. There is also a strong main character that you don't have to worry about dying.3. You need to use at least some strategy to win.4. Pick who you want to fight in each battle from out of a possible 43 characters.5. Good art and cut scenes.6. A lot of hours of gameplay.7. Good replay value. If you're bored you can make a new game and try using different people and strategies.Cons:1. Can be confusing at first.2. A little to much talking between the battles. Sometimes, when I would be in a hurry, I would have to skip the plot in order to save the game.Can go either way:When a character dies in battle you can't get him back. Instead you have to restart the level. However it also adds more strategy to the battles.9/10I beleive this game is worth buying.
Val Kilmer put much of his heart and soul into his work. You can feel his feelings while reading through the poetry. Some of it may be a bit hard to understand if you do not know the man personally but you get the general idea of what he wants to get accross.
He is the best of all writers of nonsense verse. He wrote "The Owl and the Pussycat "The Nonsense ABCs", and numerous limmericks.dwahl
this game is so fun baby. i got it last week. it has better graphics than road to wrestlemania. and kane,undertaker ,the rock are still on there i git it infinity stars.
Cut the crap! it's motorhead, it's rock n' roll, loud, dirty, agressive, but also a singalong album.By far, my favourite Motorhead album, actually the only one that still survives in my collection nowadays.many eternal hard rock classics that must be listened by every metal, hard rock, stoner fan of the XXI century.check out Overkill, stay clean, no class, i'll be your sister, metropolis.
I decided to buy this album because my good friends Metallica told me they really liked this band. They covered four songs of theirs on their garage, inc. album, so I thought they couldn't be that bad. And Motorhead are awesome! This is wonderful noise, especially the title track (which feels like it can go on forever, which is OK by me), and Stay Clean, which has a great bass solo in it. Lemmy can't really sing, but that's OK, I still dig the crazy vibe this album has. It's also hard to believe this guy are only a trio, as they sound larger than that. Overkill is a perfect introduction to the genius (?) of Motorhead.
when i hear this bad nasty music i feel that my ears are being raped. but i can't help myself: i like it. pure musical mayhem. well worth 4 stars.
More similar in its simplicity to a Princess of Mars than Gods/Warlord. John Carter's son engages in search for abducted Thuvia, while he remains the prime suspect in her abduction. Usual strange meetings and stranger neighborhoods, but this story is a little less frenentic than Gods/Warlord, and both Carthoris and Thuvia are solid characters.
Thuvia, Maid of Mars is classic pulp science fiction.Our hero is framed for the abduction of princess Thuvia, so he goes to rescue her and clear his name.It's also a pretty classic romance plot, with the hero and heroine in love with each other, but unsure how the other feels, and societal/political conventions standing in their way. *shhhh... don't tell.
Awesome book. I've read all of the books in this series. You will not be disappointed. Edgar Rice Burroughs is before his time as an author and I look forward to reading more form him.
One cannot help but find themselves entranced in the soundscapes the this Chicago group creates. Songs such as, "Afternoon Speaker", and the cruising vocals of Sam Prekop bring you back to what I may call, "a simpler time", some kind of nostalgia mode. Strange are these vast songs, that seem to span to the horizon, yet remind you how good it feels to use your headphones and keep things all to your self. Like a chapter of a good book, this album keep you rolling upon sand dunes, and finally ending with sand caked to your feet and a good tan, and your afternoon still continuing. An excellent album. (As a side note, the design of the album's case is fantastic).
Some people find have bad taste in music and for the rest there is Sea and cake whose originality and creativity is a rarity these days. No cool videos or haircuts not even a cool belt! but some damn fine music. just listen to "all the Photos" MAN!! Some people find this boring and i feel bad for their simple minds that cannot wrap around the sea and cakes sweet melodies. the colony also is fabulous among others.
On their 5th album, what once seemed like a fun side project was surely coming into its own, as a refined, more intimately arranged group offered what was arguably their sleekest sophistication to date.
Something of a Cult band insofar as their albums (although critically applauded) are usually stumbled across by word of mouth. The unashamedly `Easy Listening' tag associated with their music, probably deters people. But if you actually listen to the tracks, there's a preciousness to they very accessibly music, that although features lyrics of hushed sighs & several instrumental tracks feature throughout. You'd have to be a cynical listener not to smile when hearing the catchy guitar pop of "Afternoon Speaker", or indeed the acoustic lounge of "The Leaf".....not an album to impress your friends with. But for music that evokes positive expression & sunny afternoon on every turn, restrained, Bittersweet indie Pop has rarely been so well composed.
Simple to install and easy to use the software does not eat much memory and works without much intrusion in your daily life and fore that I give it 5 stars.Updates are done often or as often as you wish and take only a very short time to download...try that with other programs of this nature.I would buy again.
Picked up the album after I saw the band play with Clutch and COC - Very cool, mellow rock groove throughout... Kind of a funky COC/Gov't Mule kind of sound to a lot of the songs... Excellent choice for fans of "stoner rock," especially "Fear Death by Water" and "Poor Robert Henry," which have a definite old-school southern rock feel to them... Check these guys out, it's worth your while!
This was their first true recording project, although it was thier second full album. I give this album four stars, because, though I love this album and this band, Five stars would mean it's an album that stands next to Physical Graffitti, the White Album, and a select few other records. This album is a must own for fans who enjoy any of the splinter disciplines of what Sabbath, Hendrix, and Zeppelin started. An album worth the money, with many great songs and performances. If there are any criticisms, one would be the production. It leaves some room for improvement. Beyond that, I hope this band can continue to build upon this awesome release for years to come. Purchas and enjoy!
This card was free with my new Panasonic Lumix TZ-3. It came pre-formatted, has plenty of capacity and is certainly fast enough for my needs. I don't shoot movies or multiple-frame sequences very often. All in all, I'm very pleased with it.
The product title is incorrect. This card is 10MB/s (up to 66x). That is what it actually says on the box, not 133x. It isn't a problem for me because 66x is plenty fast for my panasonic fx30 camera. But if you really require 133x (i.e. 20MB/s) this is not the card for you.
Since there is this issue of people getting the wrong card, I just wanted to say Amazon did send the correct card.I have a Nikon Coolpix 5m camera. The card seems to work fast. I have only tried it for a few days.
Overall the movie had what might be considered a plot but I do have to say the blonde in the movie was simply awesome. The ending blow my mind WOW if anything get the movie just to watch the ending over and over.....
I was in the mood for some alien invasion movies the other day and watched a small marathon. As well as such movies as The Arrival, I watched a film called Femalien. Femalien reminds me of a modern remake of The Girl From Starship Venus.Femalien is the story of an alien landing on Earth to study human interactions. The energy being is given the form of a young woman. What follows are scenes of her spying on couples and her interactions with others. The alien is collecting and cataloging experiences for her race who have risen above physicality but still miss it. During her adventures she tries to help a local woman retain ownership of her diner.While the plot is weak I do recommend this film for those times when a movie like Invasion of the Star Creatures or Galaxina is the sort of thing you are looking for.
As a nerd, I'd always dreamed that a race of nymphomaniacal superwomen would descend upon me from space and probe me to no end. Until the night it happened. It turns out excessive probing can be quite painful, not to mention humiliating. Femalien offers those nerds too scared to undergo sexy alien abduction a legitimate erotic alternative. Three billion thumbs up.
If ever there was a war movie designed for a James Dean style actor - this is it! Although "inspired" by a true story, there is nothing original in this movie's story line and it's outcome is rather predictable (but then we all know how WWI ended), but even those two criticisms can take nothing away from the action portrayed in this movie. I missed seeing it at the cinemas and having now watched it on DVD, I really wish I had made the effort to have viewed it on the big screen. The scene of French Bi-planes attacking a Zeppelin are awesome, as are all the dog fight scenes of which there are plenty. There were no real disappointments for me in this movie (other than my own failing to see it on the big screen), it is a great watch, one you walk away from thinking - "man that was pretty good, I'd watch it again!!!"
The critics don't like it for the most part, but I really had a good time. Flyboys won't win any awards, but it sure entertained my packed theater. People laughed at most of the little jokes scattered throughout this long film. Clocking in at over two hours it is a bit too long and some of the dialogue is lacking, but the romance is handled well (unlike Pearl Harbor, thank God!), as are the many amazing CGI dogfight scenes. If your bored one afternoon, you should check out Flyboys, otherwise just wait for the DVD.
It's not Oscar time for this film, but it was diverting. I thought it did give a good overview of the Escadrille and the motivations of the characters who came from the US to volunteer. True, the terrors of war weren't driven home as in Saving Private Ryan, but this just isn't that kind of movie. Fortunately, as it was my 9-year-old son's interest in WWI planes that motivated the purchase. He was able to watch it without too many disturbing scenes (although the scene in the trenches was pretty intense). If you're looking for intense, gripping action and emotional turmoil, along with Titanic-level accuracy, this isn't the one for you. But for a family movie I thought it was pretty good.
The disc was send in fast time,and made it in perfect shape.Info was great between Amazon and me,Thanks for a great job well done.
Unlike the technical experts who hate the score, criticize the presence of red Fokker Triplanes, condemn the physics of the aerial battles, and not to mention, the quality of the acting, I enjoyed every minute of this film. But then, I like airplanes, and I like it when the good guys are good guys. The story line was interesting throughout. The acting was just fine - thank you, and the special effects were great. I recommend this film for all except the nitpickers mentioned above.
I was expecting Flyboys to tank. And it didnt. The movie could have had some help at the box office if it had a different name (Flyboys sounds dumb to me) and more advertising leading up to its release. When viewing the movie you cant find fault with the acting. Everyone does a good job. The plot and writing arent perfect but get the point across. The bond between the men as they battle together works well. The romance though is the key here for me. We have two people that speak different languages and they fall in love. Its the heart of the movie in my opinion. The action is great, though I could argue that the dogfighting is too short. You just get the blood pumping and that particular fight ends too soon. The battles could have been longer but they are well executed. Very good movie!!!
This was a really fun movie to watch but it they took an awefull lot of creative liscense. The combat scenes were fun but looked so fake. If you were to dive as steeply as they did in that film for as long as they did in a Nieuport 17 you would rip the lower wing clean off. Probably the same with the Fokkers. If you want more realistic combat scenes I would recomend The Blue Max but this movie will still keep you on the edge of your seat. One think I didn't like was the fact that they made the Germans look really bad. I've read many accounts of German pilots who really went out of their way to be humane and a many stories of allied pilots who were downright cruel (Mannock). WWI was a war where niether side was better than the other, and it was a war that shouldn't have happened. Entangling alliances are an itch.
There is a long tradition of these movies; Howard Hughes even made one.This movies has some very good aerial shots.The acting is also pretty good. I think this may be a remake ofan older film, but it is in full color.The glamor of the war was in the air with the Red Baron.There were real Americans that actually fought here.WW I was the first of the real dehumanizing warswith the trench lines and poison gas. The fighter pilotsgave a new "knight" like quality to war in the air.
Fantastic special effects! Makes one think they're actually in the air. Period uniforms, period aircraft, and good scenery. The love story part was a bit hokey, but all in all I liked this movie.
I know this movie has a lot of historical inaccuracies and a lot of cliches but it is fun for my 10th grade students. I use it to teach how hollywood glorifies history and rewrites it for the sake of entertainment. And 10th grade students understand cliches. After all, I would not be able to show them All Quiet on the Western Front or Joyeux Noel. They would fall asleep. I don't even have to censor part of the movie! The movie is good for them.
The movie as other reviewers have commented provides the viewer with a realistic and near historically correct account of early fighter plane and pilot experiences in the WW1. The dogfight and bombing scenes are spectacular and convey the perils of early fighter plane flying. The touch of romanticism is subtle and makes the picture more appealing to a wider audience who might be put off thinking it is just a war movie. I thoroughly enjoyed watching this movie and would actualy give it 4.5 stars.
Excellent documentary drama. If you enjoy history you will love this! Would have liked the happy ever after ending though.
While the story drifts at times, it is still an entertaining movie with great dogfight scenes. Makes you wonder what early fighter pilots went through.
I have watched this movie 3 times. I thoroughly enjoyed this movie. The only complaint I have is the fact that the german tri planes are almost all red. Which is totally inaccurate. The only plane that was red in reality, was the Red Baron. Who was not even in this movie, otherwise all the americans would be dead. roflol:)Seriously though, the fighting sequences are great to watch, especially when you see the bullets flying through the air. If they would come out with more movies like this one, with the same technology, that would be great. Maybe less romance, and more flying action. the flying sequences were too short in my opinion. Worth buying and enjoyable!!
This really is a must see blue ray disc. I read a lot of reviews before getting and must say I see what all the excitement was about. Watching this movie on blue ray is a treat in itself. The movie was okay but the specail effects and photography really made it an exciting expierence.
I enjoyed this DVD and the suplemental DVD as well. I give this film four stars because of the great computer graphics and the clean plot. The reality factor was taken a little too far concerning the aircraft abilities/ capabilities of that time era. Still...the film was enjoyable. I can't help but wish that they developed the characters more. I guess there are time restraints and such to consider. Anyway, a fun movie to relax with and eat pop corn with your family! Sure beats watching yet another ho hum flesh eatting zombie spin off that seems to always be showing up(smile)!
I went to see this in the theater with tempered expectations based on the "average" reviews the movie received from the critics. I was very pleasantly surprised. This is a great movie about a subject and period that is largely ignored by Hollywood.
I loved the Movie, it has everyting Great direction, Stunning visuals, Good looking cast, Great locations, Superb arieal fight scenes, Awesome Blu Ray picture & sound quality..Other than some great action, it covers Romance, Friendships & some more..pssst now thats for you to watch & find out!!
This is an excellent movie about a little known piece of history, wherein a group of American volunteers traveled to France to learn to fly and assist the French in their effort against German aircraft. There are several encounters with the German Ace, the Red Baron, who had shot down something like 80 allied planes.The movie is well done and the air action is exciting.
I've wanted this book for a gift. It's in excelent shape except for a dedication in side front cover, It alteady arrived today, which made me happier. This is "Missionary Pal for Missionaries and Teachers". 1/11/13.
Book was recieved fast and in great shape, I needed this fast so I could send it to my son in China that is serving a mission and it came in time to send it with his Christmas package. thank you for your service
These socks are my husband's new favorites. And he has tried LOTSSSSSSSSSSSSSSSS of socks. He used to wear the Gold Toe Windsor Wool OTC for many years, which were beautifully made and stayed up and came in 4 colors. Gold Toe changed them more and more so they became so tight that they'd leave marks/indentations on his legs. My husband bought numerous different Gold Toe styles and finally loves these. They only come in black and navy, so he is wearing only the black for now and uses old brown, navy, or gray ones when he needs those colors.These are very soft and stretchy but durable feeling. They stay up and do not make your feet sweat like many fabrics do. For the time being this is the new favorite at our house. (Gold Toe, PLEASE make more colors!!!) Two thumbs and 10 toes up!
Ok, for all those people who aren't good at playing video games and would like to stick to the unrealistic NBA live 2003 where it takes you 3 seconds to get down court, stay off this game. NBA 2k3 is a great game. I could do the franchise mode all day! There is great graphics, and great gameplay. The ESPN setting makes it even better. For sega sports fans this is a great buy!
i wrote a review of this game a couple of months ago and after starting to play this game again have changed my mind. i thought before it was slow and the passes were too balloon like. but i have started playing the game on fast mode which i believe brings the game up to regular speed and brings back some of the fast break points. fast mode doesn't make it like nba live, it just makes it regular nba speed. this game is very real. just watch the passes and watch how the computer plays at times (penetrating and dishing out). although the computer doesn't know how to handle a zone (jacking up three point shot with whoever is at the top of the key). the only thing to watch out for is the game freeze on franchise mode. this will drive you crazy
HOOP fans all over the globe ditch the stupid nba live to go to a better game I like to call NBA2k3. Brings realness and dunks that make you want to scream. This game is so good it will make your pants fall off. Good modes. Graphics 8out of 10. Gameplay 10 out of 10. Realness 10-10. Not perfect but as close as its going to get till next year.
Here they are again! German deejay and producer Yanou and the Dutch goddess Do(minique). If you liked Heaven, you will love this song even more! Radio edit is a nice trance tune. Extended version is even more powerfull. Piano version is a nice ballad. Even your mom will like it! Dj's@work remix is the best version, and the Flashrider remix is the least commercial version of this tune. My favorite remix is Flashrider meets Yanou remix. Buy it! (Unfortunately, there is no enhanced video. It is an interesing story about the dancer (Do) and her admirer (Yanou).)Yanou and Do, please be here for us!ON & ON!
This game is fun, but VERY hard! I had a very tough time getting all the 10 red gears on the 1st level. However, I got 5 out of the 10 red gears. Not bad, huh? If you are a hardcore videogame player, buy this, or if you aren't a hardcore videogame player, buy this and just play for fun.
Okay here's the deal there's a one player mode and a multiplayer mode. In one player you can either play Adventure mode which is the story. or you can play Chalenge mode which is simmilar exept no story and you can unlock more. There's also practice races and battles as well as JoyRide wich is free roming. IN multiplayer you can either battle or race. There's many cars too. Plus alot of cool weapons, like sonic boom, or ZapperCannon.This is an overall good game, but don't expect it to blow you away.
I found this book to be very comprehensive: addressing what MS is, what causes MS, symptoms of MS, diagnosis, symptom management, treatment options, and social aspects. It includes the technical description, but through the use of analogies, makes each description very tangible for the layperson. I found the section on medications (and their evolution) particularly helpful. This book reinforced much of what I've learned through doctors, websites, and support organizations and filled in the gaps where information was lacking. It's an excellent resource for someone who has been newly diagnosed with multiple sclerosis.
I do not own this book, and am not reviewing it. But there is a quote from the essay "On Living In An Atomic Age" that is going around once again, following the London bombings of July 2005. I am putting it here on Amazon so interested parties Googling to find the source of the quote might have an easier time of it:"If we are . . . going to be destroyed by [a] bomb, let that bomb when it comes find us doing sensible and human things--praying, working, teaching, reading, listening to music, bathing the children, playing tennis, chatting to our friends over a pint and a game of darts--not huddled together like frightened sheep and thinking about bombs."--C.S. Lewis
"Mom Kills Kids and Self" was an unassuming book I saw on the library shelf. Intrigues by the title, I picked it up and opened the cover. The book sucked me in with the first few pages. Our main character, never named, has returned home to find his wife has killed herself after murdering their two sons. What unfolds afterwards is looking through the eyes of a man driven to insanity by this act. His behavior and actions are strange and unexpected as his thoughts fantically trace back through time, trying to find the cause of his family's death. Everything in this story is juxtasposed, from his perspective on his wife's life, his boy's lives, and from his own life, from his work, aand from his philosophy on women. The story kept me captivated, I recommend this book to anyone who would enjoy a combination of King and Vonnegut.
After reading his earlyworks you can see how Chandler used his previous stories and ideas to develop these incredible novels featuring his most famous detective Philip Marlowe.
I would have given this album a 5 had I not heard Zero first, but then nothing beats a live performanceBB
Superb and superb again! Jake Scott has not made a documentary, he has taken us for a look into the 18th century, and has slapped us against the lens of Hogarth to do it. Anachronisms? Yes! They illustrate for him, he has laid them in our path like beacons, they aren't mistakes! We are all awash with them, they have to be made into tools; I know this, having been an 18th century re-enactor for many years. Plunkett and Macleane shimmers and stinks, is glorious and gory. The genius here is not just that he takes the viewer with him into Hogarth's land, it is that he leaves us there.
This film is exactly as it says on the box, "A historic lock, stock and two smoking barrels"! I sat down to watch this film with an open mind as to wether I'd like it or not as it is different to anything i've ever watched before but as soon as the movie started I was mesmerised by the excellent acting, complex,yet easy to follow storyline and excellent soundtrack! Carlyle and Miller both never fail to (Stand and)deliverand Liv tyler as support is also excellent. If you like LOCK, STOCK & TWO SMOKING BARRELS you're bound to like this!
Starting in a dingy English drunk pen, you may easily mistake this for an every day, run-of-the mill medieval type yarn. However you'd be very much mistaken. 18th century scenery give way to 20th century language (Hence the 15 certificate). A fast paced plot bring together Plunkett (Carlyle) an ex-apothecarist and violent type, with Macleane, a pauper who desperately wants to be a gentleman. Together they create a crime wave, 'robbing from the rich and that's it' An all round gem of a film, with several notable stand alone scenes, foremost of which is the dance scene. Incredible outfits in a beautiful 18th century ballroom to the sounds of drum, bass and keyboard. Truly a unique turn on what could easily have been another tired old ball. All actors put on sterling performances both the 'good guys' and the 'baddies'. Great script, superb costumes, a marvellous film.
This is probably my selection for the sleeper movie of 1999. I went past the movie in the video store and saw that Robert Carlyle (Trainspotting, Ravenous, The Full Monty) was in the movie and decided to take a chance.I would probably give a 4 1/2 to this if it were possible, everything was done well, acting, directing and especially writing, which is very often lacking in movies these days.The out of place piece of the movie was the language, which was often completely modern, used effectively for humor, especially the modern swearing.Plunkett is a highwayman who loses his partner to the bad guy (Chance, played by Ken Stott) and hooks up with Macleane, who has connections in high culture (i.e. money). They go on a crime spree and become well known. Chance makes it a personal point of honor to catch them.The action was good, the characters were superb, the villan was evil and mean. What more can I say? It is well worth your time.
Novak is another of my all time favorites. I have all of his recorded orchestral music, which is my passion. I thought, this one won't hold up to my favorites, In the Tatras and the Eternal Longing. Wrong. They do hold up, they are as beautiful as all of his other compositions. Creative, inventive, runs the full gamut of emotions from tiny delicate passages, to the full beautiful storm. Don't miss this composer!
"Brownie" was a true genius. Although he died in 1950 at age 25, he was one of the fathers of hard bop. He could play the fastest bebop tune with ease, he was also adept at the ballad, i.e., "You Go to My Head." He was also an accomplished composer, i.e. Daahoud" & Sandu.Brownie was taken from us muchy too early. No, he was not into the Parker influenced drug scene; he died in an auto accident.I guess my favorite tune he wrote was "Joy7 Spring" & he plays it on this album.If you're into jazz at all, get some of his albums. The ever present Max Roach was always with him, & on this one Sonny Rollins has a lot to say. The interplay between them is fascinating.
This book is a really nice reference book for the backyard birdfeeder. It's not just a bird identifier book, it has chapters on bird survival and behavior. I'm glad to have it my small bird library and refer to it often.
I am a beginner backyard bird watcher and I really enjoyed this book. It has some great pictures to help you identify birds, or even just to look at. The book doesn't stop there, however, it gives you nice detailed information of bird behavior, sounds, nests and habitat. I recommend this book to beginner or intermediate bird watchers.
This purchase was made as a replacement for a copy that was ruined when it got wet. Exactly what I wanted.
I saw the Teddybears perform live at Coachella '07 and had such a fantastic time that I bought their album. Their music is lively, fun, interesting and great to dance, run or do anything active to. Very entertaining.
The notion of three different books by three different authors about the same story, each from a different character's perspective is new to me. I'd enjoyed the Diary series, and thought it was worth picking up the three books just to see how well the concept worked.I actually thought the books by the other two authors were better than this, but only by a small margin. They are all excellent, and reading the same story three different times never got boring because they are all so different, while remaining consistent.In many ways it's so true of life - we really don't know what's going on in other people's heads, especially when it comes to subterfuge and illicit behavior.Three different authors, three different characters, three different styles, one terrific story.
The first story is a novella, the tale basically of a Holly Golightly type named Melba Toast who uses men for their money, and her female friend and admirer who is not sure she can or wants to become like Melba. This story and the rest of the short ones are quite different from the ones of Jaffe's usual innocent, naive heroine who has limited insight to her own behavior. The tone is more real, the women are more realistic, and the stories are just more well-written overall. I would recommend this book over any other Jaffe book.
Surely, Hostel pushes gore into new level. But to be honest I think Turistas is slightly more realistic than Hostel. A group of 20s something were picked up one by one and slaughtered for their internal organs while vacationing in Brazil (wonder whether this movie is banned in Brazil for bad publicity of its tourism).Lead charactered is a brother and a sister (a rarity as flicks like this usually they are lovers - also check out Jeepers Creepers 1 as the main heroes are also brother and sister)Overall, the movie is well-paced, well-balanced between action, gore, humour and yes, SEX. The dvd itself is slighty disappointing. The 5.1 sound is OK but the picture transfer is too dark so it is hard to see what's going on the screen in the night scenes. There is also a good commentary by director John Stockwell.If you like Hostel, this one is no brainer but even if you don't like Hostel, you may still like this one as this is better than HOSTEL.
I liked this movie better than Hostel. This movie has great scenery in the amazonian jungle plus a A plus underwater chase scenes. There's only one gory kinda disturbing death scene. Even though the main characters are one dimensional, you could relate and identify with each character so you cared for the person who dies. In hostel, I didn't care and i feel asleep in the theatres when i saw Hostel. I really didn't believe any of the characters in Hostel. What are the chances of seeing a Hispanic guy whose best friends are two white americans that go on a trip to Europe. Give me a break. Because most hispanic people don't have white americans as best friends. Come on! There's still a lot of racism and this is polite society. People are racist behind closed doors. I find Turistas much more believable than Hostel.
If you're going to buy "Turistas" expecting to see a Hostel" Eli Roth" type film ...Your not going to,What you will see is a good, well acted, action packed movie with pretty people, beautiful scenery and some blood "not much" but the premise is not Horror it's more like the vacation from hell.Over all I liked this movie and recommend it for someone not looking for a hard core horror or gore film but just a good suspenseful action movie.
A very enjoyable and coming-of-age hockey story about persistance, drive and a will to win. It does involve a bunch of losers who turn into a bunch of winners, but it is done the right way: with entertaining flashbacks of past successes and failures, complemented by hard work and kids having fun where hockey is the topic of conversation, 24 hours a day. In my opinion, it is the roughest and most talent demanding sport in today's society, but also the least publicized and most enjoyable. A group of kids can do something right if they really want to and are willing to give it 110. Not only is this fun to watch, it sends a positive message out to all. Not to mention, a cameo from Mike Modano. A few years after this flick, an NHL expansion team joined the NHL the "Mighty Ducks of Anaheim". Coincidence, NO!
This movie was funny! I love Hockey, and I love this movie. If you love Hockey, then you'll love this movie!
I first saw this film when i was younger in the summer at an activity centre, and from that day i bugged my parents until they bought it for me. I have owned it on video for several years and i constantly watched it, so when it came out on dvd i jumped at the oppurtunity to purchase it. The story is about a lawer who is put in charge of a hockey team as his community service assigment. Gordon hates kids and he hates hockey. When Gordon was a child he used to play hockey so he is going to be a good coach if he could just get over the fact that he doesnt want to be there. This film is a laugh a minute with childish humour that still makes me laugh now
I too am glad he gave up rapping b/c that was a lost cause. Raydiation has solid HoT tracks. Ray J has my respect. This cd is NOT bad. This album has shown that he has grown as a artist from being Brandy's younger brother. Gotta Much Luv for these songs: 3) What I Need 4) One Wish 5)Playing house 7)Melody...kinda sexy Exotic Unbelieveable...hot beat Sexy.... would have been better w/out Mya.
This is a good come-back from the 'This Aint A Game' album, that album was good wit songs like 'wait a minute', 'where do we go from here', 'wet me' and 'formal invite',etc. However, this album is even better. You can tell that he has grown up on this album. I think he is making a name for himself in the music business, and wont just be known as Brandy's kid brother. My fav tracks on this album are: 'Exotic' - love this song 2 bits cant get enough of it. 'In tha Mood', 'Anytime', 'One Wish', 'What I Need' and the crunk track 'Keep Sweatin'. However, there are a few dodgy tracks on there like 'Quit Actin' - i was excited when i saw R. Kelly was on there bt was sadly disappointed when i heard it. 'The War Is Over' - i liked the last duet they did 'another day in paradise' bt after hearing this song they should have stopped then. However, overall its a good album ... WELL DONE RAY J.
Love this, amazingly sexy. bought it in white for our wedding night so my future husband has something to rip through ;)
the product is cute and just what i was looking for. they were very helpful when i called and asked a question prior to making my puchase.
I'm not gonna bore you with a long review. Let me just say that it is the most realistic hockey game i've ever played, and I'm very judgemental with these games. Blows nhl 2003 out of the water. Sega sports makes the best sport games.
I use this product to pickup chopped vegetables from my chopping board. I saw it used on a food show and I thought I would try it. I love it.
For some inexplicable reason teenage tragedy was a pop music phenomenon in the late Fifties and early Sixties and this single-disc collection hits all the highlights. "Last Kiss", "Teen Angel," "Endless Sleep," "Tell Laura I Love Her," "Patches" and "Leader of the Pack" all went Top Ten, so apparently sad tales of adolescent woe weren't a detrement to chart success. The only real clunker here is the goofy parody "Leader of the Laundromat." [Surprisingly, that song went to No. 19, while "Leader of the Pack" was still on the charts.] If you like a good cry now and then--or just need to be reminded that not all pop hits were sunshine and rainbows--this album is for you. RECOMMENDED
Any fan who appreciates the Everly Brothers has to havethis album. The remastered sound is superb of course, butthe deciding factor on this one should be the inclusionof their last hit, after more than 20 years had passed sincetheir previous one.After the team reunited, one of their biggest fans wrotea song especially for them. Paul McCartney wrote "Wings ofa Nightingale" for them, and it is a truly beautiful songthat displays their harmony at its best, and the song isnot usually found on other collections.Get the best of all their classic early hits, plus thislast hit.A must have for any fan.
This game is awesome, it has good graphics and other tight things. Like street ball, franchise and dynasty mode. All are awesome no doubt. NBA Live will never be better then this game at all. This is one of the best games that I've ever played. You can slam and drive and shoot and pass. You can also juke like crazy. The free throw is pretty hard, but that's only if you have bad players.So basically, this is about the best game anyone could ever want 2 own.
Well written with a sense of humor about a very tragic period of time. I liked his style of writing with a story told from a different point of view.
Franz von Suppe (German form of Francesco Ezechiele Ermenegildo Cavaliere Suppe-Demelli, which I like better) is known for his ballet music, but the CD series 1-6 contains even more wonderful music. All his music is very conducive to movement, whether ballet or other calisthenics (beauty and strength). Enjoyable when sitting still, too! He is a relative of Donizetti, so he had great musical examples to help him along (probably good genetics, too).
A must have for those wanting to know about the growth of civil aviation in the 1920's and beyond.
I have been playing hockey games on the PC and on consoles since NHL95. Until now I have not found a console game I could tolerate. I have now found it! NHL 2k3 is the closest to real hockey I have ever played. What makes a game good is flexibility. The sliders in this game make it fun for anyone. The designers have given us the ability to modify the AI even after starting a season, franchise, or even in the middle of a game. You can tweek this baby until you find the right skill level for you. The controls are more like that of the PC. I can chose the setup that lets me use the right trigger for speed burst, to me that's the only way it can be done comfortably. There are just too many good things to mention about this game so I will just finish by saying...EA Sports has just fallen way behind. This game sets the standard for video hockey games.
I recently purchased NHL2K3 and I must say I am impressed. Being a loyal follower of the EA NHL franchise I was a slightly apprehensive. But after two games were under my belt I quickly came to the conclusion that this is the best console hockey game to date. The game play is far more realistic than the EA version. That combined with the fact that the game is supported by X-BOX live make this game a must have for any sports console game enthusiast. The live interface does leave a little to be desired when choosing opponents, but the online game play is smooth. Go out and get this game you won't be disappointed.
Following up to the excellent 2K2 on the dying Dreamcast, this release will finally allow all the hockey fans out there to play online with XBox Live! This will be the only hockey title to have this feature. I can't wait to play against my brother in Toronto and not have to wait for him or I to visit!
This book was recommended to me by one of my male friends who is a fairly discriminating reader. I was enthralled in the story and the setting from the first chapter and was sad when it was over. As many other reviewers on here have superbly written up already (and with more litearary critic skills than I will ever have) -- Bayard does an outstanding job of playing in Dickens' sandbox. This book would make a great gift to the avid fiction readers on your Chrismas/Holiday/Other gift list -- I have two brothers-in-law that are certainly getting a copy from me this year.
Did you ever wonder what may have happened to Tiny Tim, the Cratchett family, or old Mr. Scrooge? Bayard answers that question in a very imaginative and mysterious way. Part historical fiction, part mystery, and part psychological thriller, this book is a wonderful read.
Sometimes it's better not to know what happens to a fictional character after the book in which he or she appears ends. This is the continuation of the life of Tiny Tim, all grown up now and just about free of the physical problem with his leg. While this book is not badly written, and the characters well-drawn, it seems that it takes an awfullly long time to get to the point of the plot. Several times I felt like putting the book down, but I kept on reading in the hope that it would imprve. It does improve, and once it gets started it moves along briskly until the end. It's not a bad book, but it could really use some initial movement to keep the attention of the reader.
What initially drew me to this book was the expanding story of Tim Cratchet (tiny Tim of a Christmas Carol). When a Christmas Carol ends, you feel that everyone lives happily ever after because Scrooge uses his money to make everyone's life infinitely better. The author does an excellent job of presenting a complex and facinating character in Tim. Tim is more than just a crippled boy who got healed. He is now grown up and dealing with the tragedy of his father's passing, accepting money didn't make everything better, and finding the courage to help a small girl he barely knows.While I found this book to be very good, I only gave it 4 stars out of 5 because the mystery/suspense story wasn't very original. I was more interested in Tim's character rather than the mystery surrounding young girls turning up dead in London. However, I would recommend it as a facinating read.
Following the route of Gregory Maguire, Louis Bayard has taken a fairly minor yet memorable literary character and revisits him at another point in time. Entirely successful with a fun "DaVinci Code"-type caper (pacing not the puzzle), Mr. Timothy shines most with Bayard's Bob Cratchit ghost device/letters and depiction of filthy London. Ending is extremely touching and beautifully written a la Dickens; also loved clues of Tim's true sexual orientation: point did not dominate but made perfect sense. This one deserves the Masterpiece Theatre treatment--not the usual American-produced lard.A wonderful, multi-tiered read.
This album is just so great that it's a crime that so few people know about it. Sometimes just gorgeous and sometimes really crunching cathartic stuff, all combined with the kind of odd murky and haunting sonic atmosphere that you expect from 3MP. This was album was clearly a slapped-together job, comprising of new material plus B sides and outtakes etc over a period of years. And yet the material outdistances anything else they've done. The bass work in particular is phenomenal -- he plays it like a lead guitar. Also, if you're a fan of Pinback then you really should own this. One caveat: I almost never listen to CD2 -- except for the song "The Trail", which is great -- and the very first song on CD 1 is really the worst on the album. So don't let that put you off, because the rest of that first CD... wow. Wow! If my desert island disc was limited to one choice, it might be this one. (Well, okay, a Beatles disc might win instead, but only just.) Really, it's that good.
I LOVE this CD! I listen to it whenever I'm on the can. It helps me do my thing.
IT WAS EXCELLENT. VERY HOT! HOT! HOT! IT BROUGHT BACK MANY MEMORIES OF THE CONCERT I SAW IN NOVEMBER '99.
I USE THIS LEVEL ON MY JOB SITE TO SHOT GRADE ON DRIT OR PIPE THE VIEW THROW THE SIGHT IS CLEAR AND CLOSE UP IS SPARD
There are fancier, lighter, more comfortable, more adjustable headlamps but this one puts out enough ligh to find your way in the dark and sooooo cheap
The light is better for using as a personal source of light. The other, larger ones I got are GLARINGLY brighter and lots of fun.
In 1980, I successfully climbed Mt. Rainier, reaching the "true" summit. It took several attempts because of weather. It was hard work. But after reading Lene's book, I came to realize how strenuous and physically challenging it is to climb Everest. I was not aware of all the work and risks that are taken just to prepare for the final assault. Lene proved herself, showing incredible strength, fortitude and emotion. There must have been such a terrible sense of despair and fear knowing that death was probably inevitable and no help available.Lene gives the reader another perspective of this awesome event, using her professional knowledge as a clinician and writer. I would recommend everyone who has followed this climbing event, either from past magazine articles and stories, or from the several books written about this Everest climb, to read this book.
I recommend this book for anyone who is interested in getting into Miller. There are many great examples of his works, without the commitment of an entire book. Henry really has a handle on what it means to be human.
I am a fan of Perumov's myself, and I have all of his books on my bookshelf ;-]. However if you're not a fan like me, wait until you read Doom of the Gods and Land without Happiness before you get the Warrior of the Great Darkness. Still, do get it once you've finished the other two, as Hjorward experience will not be complete until you finish VVT. Bottom Line: A good read, although not Nick's best.
This is a superb album with some brilliantly written songs that I find very easy to relate to. Raymond always writes songs from the heart and if more people knew about him they would love his music. Okay they might be quite simple songs but they all have something to say and although Country and Western is not really my thing, this to me is different and I don't see it as Country.I have grown up listening to Raymond Froggratt and there are some songs on this album I find hard to listen to, as they can be a bit cheesey but songs like 'everybody is losing' and 'you sing so blue' are beautiful songs which say a lot. Definately worth listening to if you like songs with good lyrics that come straight from the heart.
The year is 1852 and we follow a wagon train as it wends its way across the country to the Oregon Territory. Along the way we experience Indian attacks, disease and much death, and some good things as well - romance and bravery. Binns tells the story well and with great feeling for his characters. He has a great feel for the trail as well: it's said that before writing this novel Binns drove a good distance across the Oregon Trail, seeing the sights he would later write about first hand. As a work of literature and not just a genre piece, this novel succeeds handsomely.
I have a 22 month old son who LOVES this DVD. He is really into trucks, fire engines, and ambulances. Basically, any vehicle that makes noises. He begs for me to put this in every day. He was not afraid at all in the beginning when Elmo shakes. They do show Elmo very afraid, but the adults in the DVD really do everything to make him feel better and let him explain his feelings. There are catchy songs and good fire safety information. You should preview this DVD and judge for yourself if your child is to sensitive for the part where Elmo shakes in the beginning. If you feel that part is to scary for your child then skip to the next chapter of the DVD. It's a small part of the DVD and the rest of the DVD has so much educational material. I highly recommend this DVD.
When my granddaughter was small, she loved this video and squealed with delight when the fire truck drove out of the Fire House. Alas, she grew up. My grandson is now 2, and I may have bought this prematurely for him. He loves Elmo, so I know he will eventually get into this video. Video also includes some good information as to how to act if there is a fire in your home. Very instructive for small children.
This is a very well done educational (IMHO) DVD. Elmo DOES become scarted, and your child might be scared a bit while watching it, but fire is scarey and it isn't a bad thing to see Elmo scared. Maria is there with him all along, and mom or dad should be with the child when first viewing this DVD...we used this as a spring board to talk about good fires (to cook with, fireplaces etc) and bad fires. Kids even in day cares have fire drills, so they aren't as sheltered as most parents think when it comes to fire. But, having a plan in YOUR home is something that everyone should TAKE time to make. This DVD helps open the door to conversation, and helps kids not be afraid of the firefighter suits. A good point is made, the firefighter tells Elmo even if the firefighter looks scarey, he is there to help, and if in a fire go to the firefighter not away. I also like the "get low and go" tag line it helps us all remember to Get low and Go!
my 22 month old son is somewhat interested in Elmo's World on Sesame Street, but he was riveted to this entire DVD about Firehouses. I don't know if he grasped all the concepts yet, but it's a decent DVD with solid safety concepts in it about fires & firefighters.
Randolph Scott and Budd Boetticher combine their talents once again to make an exciting western/civil war movie.Scott is ask to leave his Civil War duties back east to run a stageline full time to deliver gold to the union.The transfer from the Warner Archive line is beautiful. Very crisp and colorful.All-in-All gets a B+ from me.
This is not one of those great five star Boetticher films (Comanche Station etc.), but still a very good one (4,5!). Scott is always good. He is so natural that one does not give enough credit for his acting. There are a lot good actors in this film though my favorite Virginia Mayo does not have very much to do. The only minus is the somewhat predictable story. Burt Kennedy did not write this one. I recommend this film highly. The dvd quality is also great.
Avery Dulles takes the untrained reader on a journey through the complex thought processes of a religious scholar, in an easy-to-follow, step-by-step manner.He sets up criteria and begins building five philosophies or models of revelation theology that are most commonly embraced by Christians today. These models serve as a great eye-opening tool in the final compare-and-contrast stage of his analysis.Perhaps more fascinating, Dulles expands his search to include specific historical periods, so that the reader gets a better understanding of how theological thought evolves and changes, as one generation of Christian believers builds on the knowledge or misconceptions of the past, and how meaningful dialogue with historians, scientists and other religious groups have enhanced our traditions and affirmed our convictions.This book represents a rare opportunity for one of the laity to peer into the mind of a great theologian. One can not help but be impressed.
Quentin Tarantino lauded William Witney's directing of this movie and Roy's performance in a New York Times interview this year (2000). Trigger is blamed for a killing done by a wild horse, and Roy confesses to the crime to save him and serves three years for manslaughter. Witney once again handles animal scenes with finesse as the wild mare dies after giving birth to Trigger Jr. A beautiful story, in color showing off both golden palominos, in which Roy temporarily loses Trigger to a band of diamond smugglers and recovers him in a typical Witney action climax.
One of the better Roy Rogers films, especially for fans of Trigger. When diamond-smugglers hide their stolen treasure inside the horseshoe of a gorgeous golden mare, Roy Rogers and Trigger are hot on her trail (Trigger for reasons other than Roy's, obviously). When Trigger is accused of murdering one of the smugglers, Roy takes the rap and goes to jail. The plot takes on more curly-cue twists than the designs on Roy's fancy saddle when the mare gives birth to Trigger Jr., and Trigger is taken by the thieves. Roy, finally out of jail, uses the colt to catch the bad guys and get Trigger back. If you're a real Trigger fan, don't miss 1946's My Pal Trigger, which follows the prized palomino from his birth through his first meeting with his pardner Roy. Another great Trigger movie moment is in 1952's Son of Paleface in which he costarred with comedian Bob Hope.Staci Layne Wilson
After becoming addictive to the CSI series, I just can't seemto get enough. So I purchased the third complete series to geton with the excitement and I couldn't stop.Each episode is such a unique story, with twisted human emotionsand perceptions of the truth and the real truth. And how the human mindis so animalistic. This season only had one returning character, but made itworth while to get more insight of the character of Gil Crissom. And WarrickBrown returns to his oldneighborhood to give you a perspective of his past.All in all, if you're into CSI: Las Vegas, you'll enjoy thisseason as mush as 1 and 2.
I got introduced to CSI this year and have been addicted ever since. It is a great show. Great characters and great cases that all you need to have a great show. The mysteries are so well put together and thought out. Buy this box set and in the future, you will be buying others.
The DVD arrived quickly and exactly as advertised. Plus, the pricing was better than retail. Thanks!
CSI is just one fine TV series, though it can go from engrossing the viewer to grossing the viewer out with some of its all-too-ugly scenarios. Yeah, but it's realism, they say.Another 'but' and a big one: just about all the viewers l know - friends, neighbors, co-workers - complain about the same thing: in the show, why is Marg Helgenberger all too often referred to as 'beautiful' or 'gorgeous' or 'lovely' when she is simply an ordinary-looking, run-of-the-mill actress with tight, low-cut clothing? Really! She hardly stands up to any lovely woman, so the question is: is she married to the producer or the Studio Head to get such unwarranted acclaim?
Vanessa-Mae is an amazing talent. This young woman is beautiful as well! She gives an energetic pulse to her violin playing! I never tire of hearing her enthusiastic version of 'Cotton-Eyed Joe' or the 'Can Can'. Will have you rethink the definition of 'classical' music...a definite must-hear!!! As I don't see her scheduling any tours in the Sac area, I will probably purchase her concerts on DVD, next.
she is an Excelent and great violin player, her music is unique, if you love instrumental music, you can't miss it.
I read this book several years ago. One of the better, more cerebral espionage books I've ever read. Been trying to find his other spy book (i.e., "Zolta"), but its out of print. Too bad the author does not appear to be writing this type of fiction anymore--while his nature stuff is good, I'd love to see him fill the void left by Adam Hall.
I have purchased this knife as an upgrade from a Farberware Pro Chef's Knife. Kershaw is a lot thinner, lighter, and infinitely sharper (buy some Band Aids). It has enough curve for a rocking low motion and long enough for high cutting technique. I love it.P.S. Still love it after half a year, recommend dulling the blade corner near the pummel, it will reduce number of little cuts with out sacrificing usability.
The agme starts out with good game play, but after a while you lose the needed story line.
I've used this book in the undergraduate Romanticism courses I teach, and found it quite useful. It is brief, brisk, and cleanly written, and serves as a good introduction to Byron. You won't find a lot of subtle insights into Byron's more obscure works here, but you will see how the life and the work converge and, at times, diverge. If you want to know more about Byron than you can find out from an anthology introduction, but don't want to plough through (or have your students plough through) one of the long biographies, this is the book for you. If you want geat detail and a full, scholarly treatment, you'll have to go elsewhere, though. Peters isn't catering to those needs.
The additional songs aren't that great, so if you already have the original album, it's not much worth buying this CD solely for the bonus tracks. The original album is one of the better Cranberries albums, but all Cranberries CDs are great, and that includes this one, a must have to complete your Cranberries collection.
You cannot go wrong with Mr. Stuart Wilde's teachings. Each book he writes or tapes/CD he produces is a jewel. He's a great teacher and these tapes will really help the one who seeks knowledge in living courageously with awareness.
calm, soothing, comforting. listening to this just now put me back in the womb of the dreamy days or 80's brit pop. my friend said it was depressing to him, but not to me. it put me inside an atmosphere that felt familiar -- but most definitely not a depressing one. the vocals, the music...it's all so lovely!
I down loaded this for my Mother for Christmas. She loves the harmony of the songs. I burned a CD for her to play in the car while they travel. We all love it, I plan to make a CD for myself so I can listen to it in the car. Another Christmas Album that is wonderful is The Singers Unlimited Christmas. They are a Jazz group, but their harmony is even closer than that of the Mills Brothers. They are both very good albums.
The camera works fine and was easy to setup and use. I'm not good with distances but I'm guessing the range was about 200 ft
I am so tired of people talking about bad camera angles. There isn't a game that doesn't have them so get over it. This game is one of the best platform games I have seen. I played all the way through JAK & DAXTER and SLY COOPER without hardly thinking. Both are great games but way to easy. Vexx not only is a great game but it is actually somewhat challenging. Not to say it doesn't have it's easy parts too. I hope to see a sequal. If you like PLATFORMERS you gotta play this.
This is a very cool, very fun game - much in the vein of Ratchet & Clank and Jak and Daxter. The only problems were the maddening camera angles (tough to control) and the feshman swimming controls. And don't bother with the Prima Strategy Guide. It's very basic, dosen't cover the controls, and just skims over the walk throughs. It seems as if it was just slapped together to meet a deadline.
I read this book for a Utopian Lit class at my high school and thought that it represented the totalitarian views very well. I did not like how Winston gave in after fighting so hard to try to make changes. I can see that this world is entirely possible in the not-so-distant future. The way that their society is set up, there is no way to change it. The telescreens, are already in use in terms of security cameras, hidden cameras, etc. It is really easy to find out anything about anybody today. This is quite scary.
Enter a world where there is no past. Where the past is the present. Follow Winston as he thinks THOUGHT- CRIME, works on fake documents, and plots to shut down the system. Big Brother's eyes follow Winston Everywhere he goes. If you want to see wether Winston accomplishes his mission, you must read the book. After you read this book go check out the 1984 Movie. But don't see the Movie unless you've read the book or else you will have no idea what is going on in the movie.
Scary how almost real this could be in the very near future. It is a clear depiction of how our politician's overzealous control is beginning to run our lives.
This book is unrelentingly, amazingly depressing. It's absolutely graphically realistic in it's descriptions, and the story - I'm gonna give it away here - does not end happily. I read this in high school and have never forgotten it; it frightened me then and it still frightens me. The word is bleak.You should still read it. You should not only read books that give you happiness, or catharsis, or what you want; those are candy for your mind and will not tell you harsh truths. You should also read books that give you gifts you don't want, gifts that make you uncomfortable or upset or frightened. Books that point out things you'd much rather you could ignore and hope they'd go away. That's why this is a classic; not because of stupendous writing or anything else (I've seen better writing).I still hate this book. And I still gave it 4 stars.
Discomfiting, penetrating, imaginative, and very grey, this book deserves its fame not for elegance of prose (it is only adequately written) nor for an interesting plot (not much happens, at least as novels usually go), but for its indelible, devastating portrait of human degradation and its far-fetched-yet-just-around-the-corner description of the hows and whys of totalitarian power. A dramatic, illuminating read.
This should me a must read for everyone. It will make you think twice about things that go on in our government and those around the world.
1984 is a great read but not a compelling one. It can be a little hard going at times. The characters are a little frustrating thus making it a little annoying to read. Still it is a great classic and well worth persuing to the end.
Good condition book. Look forward to passing it down to kids, grandkids, etc after our media begins to get censored here in the USA...Coming soon, you know.
It was a good book. It was not my favorite book ever, but I feel more cultured because I read it.
Despite the extremity with which orwell depicts this totalitarian state, this story speaks at a much smaller level as well. in a day and age where brainwashing among civilized countries is ignored despite its presence, this is an important novel. Studies have shown how humans, like chimps, end up gaining a following when in a dominant position in society. only 1984 shows how humans take it to the extreme. Of course this novel does use exaggeration to stress its point. And it does so quite effectively, I might add. The end is fantastic, a climax that is the culmination of Smith's life.
Although the images are not profound and the grammar and language usage rather basic, what holds this novel together are its plot, intelligent ideas, and unique, beautifully flawed characters. I loved the fatal relationship between Julia and Winston, mostly because it was unsentimental and virtually realistic. I don't think Orwell romanticizes anything, alluding perhaps to the bleak style of life led in the book. (The denouement between the two is stunning, yet tragic). The novel ends on a melancholic, similarly unhappy note, which epitomizes the main idea presented: there really are no happy endings, and sometimes there is no winner. Winston, our anti-hero, already dull at the beginning, goes full circle, culminating in a conclusion full of Orwellian grace and sadness. Perhaps the ending was the best part of all, as it leaves the reader feeling like the world of 1984 is, in fact, real and never-ending. Clearly, that was Orwell's point.
To call 1984 a work of science fiction is, while technically accurate, somewhat a disservice to the book. 1984 is a chillingly accurate glimpse into a future of hellish totalitarianism, and quite amazingly, with each passing generation it actually seems to become more and more relevant. It should be regarded not only as great literature, but also as an oracle of the very real storm clouds that are consistently looming just overhead. But perhaps most importantly, it should also serve as a much needed kick in the groin to anyone who is constantly blinded by the bright lights of patriotism, war, greed, fear, and all forms of propaganda.1984 is not science fiction. 1984 isn't fiction at all.
The best science-fiction book I've read (the only sci-fi I've read). It was actually quite good.
People always talk about books that they can't put down and 1984 is defenitly one of those books. You really feel scared for Winston throughout the entire story. It made me cringe all the times where he was sneaking around. The only thing that made it unrealistic to me was how sex and love were eliminated totally from the party. It goes against human nature. Was everybody tortured like Winston in the party to make them this way? Anyway it was a great book that makes you think
I sat down to read George Orwell's novel on a Tuesday night while my family had dinner in the next room. For the following few hours, their dinner conversation was interrupted with my bursts of anger and frustration. "How can you call the destruction of words beautiful?!" I cried. Orwell writes so convincingly that it frightens the reader into thinking, "What if Oceania really existed in that form? How could I break free from the oppression, the mindlessness, the fear and anger that surrounds all aspects of life?" It creates a level of paranoia, especially since there is no happy ending. The main character, Winston, is never freed from the bondage of being brainwashed and held captive in his own mind. For if we are not free to think, we are not free at all. However, I think Orwell succeeds best in terrifying us to the point that we are sure to count our blessings and be sure not to take for granted the beauty of words, thoughts, and freedom.
George Orwell has another hit. Animal Farm was only a glimpse at his intellectual genius. This story takes you on a carefully regulated emotional rollercoster. You will go from intense shock to indignation for the characters involved. This small glimpse into what Orwell considered to be our inevitable future has left me with a strong sense of denial. Everything from the telescreen that watches your every move to the mere thought of a "thought Police" force gave me the shivers. There are several interesting implications for example the use of a term called "doublethink" which implies that people can hold two contradictory thoughts in their heads at the same time and beleive them both to be true. overall this book was an amazing peice of work, there was never a time that i put it down unless i had to. i would definitely recommend this to any person who wants to take their mind for a ride.
George Orwell is a master of the English language, his superb style of writing and the intensity of the story is sustained throughout.The novel covers a timeless issue. Orwell attempts to shock us with the extremities that exist in a totalitarian society whose ultimate purpose is to obtain power. Perhaps these issues, as mentioned in the afterthought, are relevant in areas apart from totalitarianism. Perhaps capitalism is also a class distinction where money is representative of power.These and other issues are covered, proving Orwell's brilliant writing genius.
George Orwell had my attention from the first to last page of his novel 1984. 1984 is a fascinating and mind-inducing novel. The story of Winston Smith's struggle through life in Oceania is extremely captivating and thought provoking. Orwell's sharp, detailed descriptions paint an image of an unforgettably unique society. His story is a detailed description of a man living in the worst case scenario communistic society. Orwell's ideas and images are extremely brilliant. His extreme communist society brainwashes their citizens to become emotionless, violent, and thoughtless. I was mesmerized by the way the society dehumanized its citizens. People had no freedom what so ever. The concept of people having the inability to think, loves, and express themselves is engaging. I found 1984 to be an extremely thrilling novel, I recommend it to anyone interested in a classic and contemplative piece of literature.
I thought the book 1984 was great. It really made me think about weather or not I was pro Big Brother or con Big Brother. At the end of the book I decided to diagree with Big Brother. It is too powerful and controling. There are some forms of Big Brother that we think nothing of and don't even care that they're around even though there it's watching your every move. 1984 was an awsome book that kept getting better and more interesting with every page.
"It's a beautiful thing the destruction of words" This appelation coming out of the mouth of a character Syme seems strange for any author to intone, tantamount to writer's heresy. In a way, this whole book was about heresy, 'thoughtcrime' towards the regime which ruled Airstrip One. This book will be able to teach a lot about politics in the modern day. The only place where it really strays is at Orwell's atheistic uterances. Otherwise a great read.
Pros: This book seemed to be a science-fiction book about the future, but in truth, it was a sci-fi symbolism of totalitarianism in Orwell's time. Yet, this book is so timely today! It reminded me of the way Bush and friends control our thoughts with smart words; GOOD Americans believe in the war and TRAITORS believe in other causes. We should always keep our own opinion and forget the always-swaying popular opinion. And that was just ONE of the many things I learned from this great book! I highly suggest this book.Cons: It was a bit repetitive and it's a very heavy read.
At the time this book was written, in the 1950's, this book was feared as a posssible future for the world. This story is a bleak prediction of the future of man. Whatever they say is the rule, whatever they you think is ungaurdable, and even the smallest change in your apperence is subject for search. The biggest question of all though, is not how you can escapes, but who can you escape from. They know everthing that you are doing because of the telescreens located in every room and any thought of treason is picked up. This is the story about a man in this world, all alone, trying to figure out which is which. He knows the Party lies, and can even alter the past, but in a world where alliances wavor, and there is no certainty about who you are, how does he know he is fighting against the right people. Even if he can trust someone, there is another problem, "Big Brother is Watching"
Long before I read 1984, I read Brave New World and Anthem. All three have similar subject matter: the bleak future. Both Brave New World and 1984 depict technology run rampant and used to further de-humanize the populous. 1984 is a bleak book, but in parts very powerful. I would say, however, that at times Orwell lost my interest. He is in love with narrative, which is fine, but occasionally it drones on. I would say that Brave New World is a better book to read about how the future CAN go wrong, mainly because it is much more entertaining. But 1984 has a ton of integrity, especially in the ending.
1984 is the biggest achievement of Eric Blair as a novelist and anybody even slightly interested in politics, history or the future should give it a read. I think 1984 is one of the few books which you can't skip reading and just watch the movie. Very detailed, very thorough, very challenging - the book is more than 50 years old, and yet very very current. I've read it more than 5 times now, but the paperback copy from amazon is definitely the nicest edition I've had - printed on something that looks like recycled paper, roughly cut and printed in weird, but nice font - I recommend buying it.
This is such a great book! I ordered it on cassette so that I could listen to it on a long road trip and the product arrived right on time in great condition.
this was the first novel ever that i have finished (i tend to read the first few pages and quickly move over to the end). yes. like a winter in london under heavy smog, this novel has a gloomy, cold, and a bit cynical perspective. but there's something pulling you in. it's the secret love between winston and julia. so beautiful. soon to be crushed like a flower under some fat tires, though...
1984-A good example of what government can and may do. Good warnings of what may happen when government is given too much power and how it may completely take over without being noticed. Depressing but gives good insight. READ IT!!
Across the country there is a travesty going on. High School teachers are requiring students to read Animal Farm by George Orwell. By the same author there is a much finer example of satire and the multiple levels Orwell attached to each of his books. Nineteen Eighty-Four is simply one of the best books written this century. It approaches a subject matter, Communism, attacks it and then inadvertantly exposes a greater meaning and truth, the essence of freedom. Orwell meant 1984 to be an attack on Russia and what would happen if Stalin and Lenin won. It trascended that and became a handbook for freedom. If anyone doesn't come out a Libertarian after reading this book, they didn't read it close enough. One of the many books that will be on classic reading lists for centuries to come.
I wish there was a way Amazon would let you rate ONE book with six stars, your all-time favorite. If they did that, 1984 would be my pick. I've read it at least four times, once when I had insomnia I read the whole thing front to back again. The first time I read it was in high school, and I was disappointed because it didn't have a happy ending, because Smith didn't manage to somehow smash Big Brother. But now I recognize the book for what it is: a timeless statement on totalitarianism and individualism. Don't let the title fool you: if we're not very, very careful it can happen yet.
Obviously a great book, but the Kindle edition (at least) omits the Appendix "The Principles of Newspeak" which any reader should want to have!
George Orwell's "Nineteen Eighty Four" is a brilliant warning about totalitarianism. It is certainly about communism. You can tell from their physical descriptions that Big Brother is Stalin and Goldstein is Trotsky. At a time when many people admired the Soviet Union, George Orwell saw the Soviet system for what it was- a brutal dictatorship based on fear. However, it is not just about communism. It is a warning against all totalitarian systems of thought that seek to impose forcibly a particular ideology on people and to mould people at will. Winston Smith's struggle to hold on to objective truth in a world of lies and human decency in a world of cruelty symbolises the real life struggle to do just that of so many people in this century that has brought us the horrors of the Gulags and Auschwitz.
This book tells us about how one person's Total thinking can be altered by means of a simple tool called Torture.
In my opinion this is Orwell's best novel and is also my favorite book. It can happen to us as long as their are power hungry human beings in this world.
I bought this for my wife as she really wanted to read this book. She loved the book and could hardly put it down. Just wish the price was a bit more affordable for a kindle book, but the convenience is really nice.
I think Orwell spent 2 much time on developing his world and his own language (new-speak) and not enough time on the story and chartacters. This is quite a simple book and very stright-foreward. The characters seem unrealistic and not very likeable, but his world is amazing in it's intricate structure. He planned out Oceania down to the very last detail, If only he had spent the same amount of time on the story and charactersthen This would have been a definite calssic, but as is, I still cannot say I found it as amazing as the other reviewers. But this is a great introduction to literature, just don't take it in a classroom setting as it kills the enjoyment of reading it
The numerous references to this novel in pop culture make this a must read. In addition, the discussion in the afterword by Erich fromme was well informed added to the presence of this novel. I definitely recommend it.
Wow is the first phrase that came to my mind after finishing this book. It is one of the best I have ever read and certainly my favorite read over the last year. I am sure everyone knows the plot by now so I will not rehash. But I knew the general plot beforehand i.e. "Big Brother" and the thought police, and I was STILL overwhelmed by 1984. Orwell's writing makes you keep coming back for more, always eager to find out how the current situation will turn out, and what will happen next. Besides the sketch of a tyrannical government using mass propaganda to literally brainwash its citizens, Orwell also shows how powerless the ordinary citizen becomes, how much trouble must be gone through to engage in illegal conduct, and how brutal the aftermath of getting caught is. And the love story, which I expected to be the weakest part of the book, is actually fascinating and heartbreaking. A Must-Read if there ever was one!
If you have not read this, I strongly recommend it ... ESPECIALLY if you are like me, and somehow "escaped" having this assigned to you either in high school or in college, but have always wondered what the hype was all about.Too many times today, you will hear this book discarded as a bunch of prophesies that were way off -- e.g., that in the year 1984 there would be computers and "telescreens" that would all but read our minds; that "Big Brother" would always be watching us. Many, I'm sure, feel that since this is NOT the case today, that Orwell and his book were / are a wast of time.As for me, the more I read this, the more I see how the overall concept of "Big Brother" -- i.e., how information is "cleansed" to "protect" us; how we are teaching technology itself to out-smart, or at least, stay one step ahead of us -- IS, in fact, all-too-real in our lives today!In any case, very intriguing!
There are many works where the story is the content. These books are usually for entertainment. This book uses the story to deliver its content. It uses the story to illustrate some awsome philosophical ideas. By presenting the ideas in a story they are easier to understand and they are more entertaining.I could not put the book down as I got towards the end. This is the only book I have ever read that has given me the shakes.
one of the best books i've ever read. makes you think about what is true and what isn't. though written in the 50's i believe, the concept can be applied to the present and the future.
This book was amazing! I've never read anything like it, not even other Orwell. After this I read every book and paper he'd ever published. An ominous vision of his future and our present.
It was interesting to read this book again in 2006. It is fascinating to read this book and then analysis and compare the different governments in today's world.
this book was unstoppable!i couldnt put it down.i suddenly felt like i was being watched from everywhere just like the folks in the book.ive read it twice.the 1st time i was on winstons side but i learned to love big brother by the time i was done the 2nd time.big brother is watching!writer george orwell gets a lot of props for "animal farm" but this ones way better!
This book is the most amazing, influential, disturbing, wonderful, and sickening, nightmarish, fantastic book I have ever read in my life.Don't read this review. Read the book. now, by whatever means.
It is hard to belive that a totalitarian government can happen, People say it can't, but in truth it has. George Orwell's book has almost in a cense read the future. Take what happened in Stazi Germany, it is identical. And i belive that anyone who can guess at the future like that and be so right is deserving of some complement. And for the people out there who think that the readers of this book are all paranoied they are wrong. Read this book and then take a look around, how close are we really?
It takes a lifetime to read this book. It's packed with symbolism and meaning. Few people will be able to absorb it all in one reading. Probably one of the Top Ten greatest literary works of all time. An excellent example of clear, concise, efficient use of the English language. Not one word out of place, not one word more or less than is needed. No 'Newspeak' in this book. It should be required reading for everyone who wants to live in a free society.
Orwell crafts one of the most absolutle horrors of a future world in this celebrated novel.Written in the late 40's, Orwell crafts the tale of a bureaucrat in the future whose job along with countless other mindless peons, is (in essence) to erase history.Bombarded by slogans that hammer the totalitarian nature of the state, he finds some comfort in a woman who shares his ambition to break free from the controls of "Big Brother".Parables abound in this book, to a world and people seemingly oblivious to what is going on around them. Orwell has managed to create one of the most frigthening environments put to paper and weave a future world bleaker, but more importantly, theoreticaly possible in any day or age. So ingenious in usage of slogans, and terms made up by the author, that they are culturaly refered to still in this day and age.An astounding piece of fiction.
En 1984 Orwell nos dibuja un panorama asolador. A pesar de la complejidad de los conceptos que quiere desarrollar (el proceso del doblepensar puede requerir un repaso para más de uno) los explica sencilllamente, de tal manera que no se podría haber escrito mejor. El panorama es tétrico, eso sí, con lo que no la recomiendo para mentes catastrofistas.
I just finished 1984 about a week ago and loved it. Orwell showed his maturity as a writer and his evolution from Animal Farm (also great). 1984 shows the force of totalitarian governments and the faults of human nature. This should be read by any progressive-minded persons in the world.
I was entertained throughout the book wiht orwell's vision of the future. Though I was unable to accept the ending. I was not convinced that Winston truly loved Big Brother. I felt that there was too muchh time skipped over and not enough leading up to his revelation.
Doublethink and Newspeak need no explanation to people growing up with a Patriot Act that takes away liberties. We don't need the brilliant economic explanation that Orwell provides for the state of perpetual war with constantly changing enemies...But it's amazing how "1984" keeps popping up on enigmatic posters at recent antiwar rallies with references to doubleplusgood wars and war equalling peace and freedom equalling slavery. On February 15 in New York, I saw a young man holding a poster with the ultimate reference to this great cautionary novel: "1 + 1 = 2". If you don't know what that's referring to, please read this book today.
Orwell was dead-on in his vision of a possible future for the Western world. Indeed, according to recent events, Big Brother is HERE and voting Republican.
In this book, George Orwell paints a very dark future for human kind in his novel 1984. One must wonder how accurate he is about this, society's future. He shows how a gov't can alter the past just as quickly as the present occurs and still maintain full power over it's people. Today is the world going in the direction that this book depicts, to the exact destination, or are we going the opposite way. One can only think and worry about this situation, but it does appear society is heading towards what Orwell wrote so many years ago. The people of Oceania in this book were governed by telescreens monitoring everybody's moves and giving them rules to abide by. This book depicts a communist gov't and a guess at how the future will be. I personally really enjoyed this book. It was one of the few books that kept my attention on every page. This is definately a book for the intelligent reader. END
I read this book to kill some time at work, and I have to say that the time I "killed" was some of the best time I ever spent with any work of fiction. I would re-read this book in a heartbeat. This novel is one of the most worthy of five stars ever published.To all students: If this is a book you were assigned in a class, definately give this one a chance. You'll come out of the assignment with a new favorite novel, and thoughts and ideas that will challange and haunt you for weeks, if not years to come.
This book is extremely powerful. That isn't a secret. The power of this book is that this is now happening in the freeworld as it had been happening in radical dictatorships. First it was western europe in the 70's and 80's. Then it began in the US in the 90's during the Clinton's reign and the rise of the NSA and ATF. Now it is spreading because of Terrorism. The bottom line is that many in the governments in these free countries mean well but don't comprehend what is coming. The current Bush administration is just answering the call because of the power that technology has given our governments and global terrorist. We must either accept that we are always at risk or give up some of our freedoms. We just have to hope that when this risk dissapates, if ever, we can get them back. Lucky for us FDR died before he became king... If you think this is about facism you are thinking too liberal-1984 can occur in a pure democracy.
If you only read one more book, read George Orwell's "1984."Other reviewers including the ... reviewer, has captured the essence of this incredible, disturbing, poignant, an accurate view into the mind of the totalitarians - and yes, folks, they live among us even today.I'll only add this: the "book-within-a-book" by Orwell's fictional author, Emmanual Goldstein, should be required study by every single high school and college student in the world. Don't know what I'm talking about? Read "1984" and look for Emmanual Goldstein within this book's pages. Then ask yourself the questions you dared not ask yourself before.Then go read "Brave New World" and "The Probability Broach." The first is a different, altogether more pleasant version of Hell. The second holds out the real promise of freedom-loving people ("Broach"). Then tell others what you have learned.
Orwell writes a wonderfully disturbing story about totalitarianism. The characters were interesting and the story is a little creepy, but it is a fascinating read. And Orwell has a wonderful grasp of language. On the downside, the middle does drag on because it's more of a political treatise or arguement instead of a story.
Even read now--many years after 1984--some of the revaltions of this book hold scarily true. Big Brother vs personal freedom--a scary topic.
After reading the book for the first time I was inspired by the vividness and characterization, and then after reading it for the second time I enjoyed the book just as much. The most striking feature of this book is that for some countries this type of totalitarian state is not to far into the future, which left a small, but apparent truth with me. Orwell was not trying to show what life in 1984 would be, but as a projection and exaggeration of tendencies and changes over the years. It would be a shame to miss out on this book no matter what.
George Orwell's, "1984", is a classic and detailed adventure that will leave you asking for more. The story is set in London where Winston, the main character, works for big brother. But he soon finds himself questioning Big Brother and how he works.For a while Winston tried to blend in with the crowd and not really stand out. But when Winston starts to remember his childhood, he begins to question Big Brother. Winston soon finds himself wondering what life was like before big brother. But unless he takes a real chance, he has no way of changing anything.One flaw I found with the book was its detail. I like a lot of detail, but this book overdid it. I would soon found myself thinking about other things and not the book.
I really liked this book. It is well written and it really made me think about the value of having privacy inside my own skull. It also made me wonder about how much of our free will IS free will and how much of it is manipulated. The story is fluid and easy to read. I seriously believe that this book is a must read, not only for science fiction lover but for everyone.
I read this book in 1994, just after a trip to Byelorussia, Russia and Poland. Life under the Soviet regime must have been a nightmare. This book helped me appreciate what it must have been like.
Just as high lord Orwell predicted, the world is at an apocalyptic state. Constant war, no privacy, thought police, the world is truly at its end. Though this lowly species has somehow managed to survive 15 years longer than lord Orwell predicted, surely this feeble race will extinguish itself because of its own greed and blind hatred. The contempt of the aristocrats has finally backfired as all knew it would. Creating ignorance and superficiality amongst the masses has finally gone too far, and there are no functional human beings left to survive. The contempt for nature and human ideals has led us to the brink of destruction, by our own hand.
An excellent and horrifying view of a possible future for our world. Written in 1949, "1984" takes place in a future ruled by a rutheless and violent governemnt that watches all its citezins. The story's main character is Winston Smith, who's life is changed after buying an old journal and simply writing the words, "DOWN WITH BIG BROTHER" From there, paranoia turns into realised fear as everything Winston does makes him a target for the governments thought police, who are everywhere. Orwell does not hold back in his warning to the citezins of a free world of what may happen if one day we stopped watching ourselves and those who govern us. Don't take advantage of your feedom.
this is one of the greates books i have ever read it goes along with orwells great reputation of pplitical novles it left me wondering on how the human race is so week and breakable once you pass the first page you will not put it down till you finsh it
Stephen Bradley: I first read this book and now Im 15 and I still haven't read another book. Every time I read it again I find another piece of clever symbolism. I would recommend this book to anyone! I am incredibly awed by the clever uses of English and symbolic meanings. For example I have been told that Gin was thought to be the downfall of the British Working Class. It would be a shallow understanding of the book to claim it as an anti-socalist book as Orwell (Eric Blair) obviously cared about the working class and was only against pretentous totalatarian states. I invite any like minded people to discuss the book with me. I apolagise for carless grammar and spelling (Im only 15 :) )
Here is the book that first got me thinking about politics and philosophy.This is Orwell's dystopia of how he feared the world would become run by a group of cahooting despots by 1984.The main character, Winston Smith, lives in London in a dictatoeship run by "big brother". In this state there is no love but love for big brother. There is no excitment but patriotism. Chocolate is rationed and orgasms are banned. In this world smith somehow manages to fall in love.. and that's just the start of his problems.1984 warns us to be wary of those who might take our freedom whilst trying to convince us we are actually gaining extra liberty. Buy it.
Eric A Blair did us all a favor back in1948-49 when he wrote this politicalnovel about future tyranical society.Followed by Animal Farm, another winner.Most of what Orwell predicted has/will(but I hope not) come true. Only our Con-stitution can stop it, if Mr. and Mrs.America would/will wake up!
Although Brave New World has been written before Orwell's masterpiece - which is the great merit of Aldous Huxley - and these books show different views of the future, I consider 1984 much more mature than the other. When I started to read it, I couldn't stop. It's intelligent, interesting and VERY well written. Besides, it deals with many, many issues, not only totalitarism, as people use to say. It deals also with loneliness, mass media and the power of verbal language. I really like Orwell's description of a profesional "building" a new language, a language so limited that would control human's thought. George Orwell was very inspired when he wrote this book. Congratulations to this sensitive writer.
1984 can do without my review I suppose, it's been around for more than 50 years and it's a classic. So that means you must read it! Unless you are very sensitive, because some of the tortures described leave you with a strong sense of impotence. The book also has very surprising and unexpected plot changes.
To this day, no other novel has changed the way I look at society as George Orwell has done with "1984." I highly recommend this book.
Winston lives in a world of constant survelence and secret police. Truth is what the government says, not what actually happened. According to the "facts" produced by the government, the country is getting better, but according to memory, the country is getting worse. Society has been brainwashed by fear of its own government and also by incited anger at its enemy country.1984 yields the (very) far extreme of a society that many fear some current societies are headed. Although fiction, it is fascinating to look at certain similar aspects to current societies (again, nowhere near as extreme as the book's society), and is a good book in terms of where we should keep our society from heading. Truly a great read in terms of perspective.The only downside that I took from the book was that I was so bothered by what Winston endured and especially the last 50 pages of the book. Never a regret reading it, but definitely not a "happy book." I like my eyes wide open.
What can you say about this book that hasn't already been said? It's dark. It's real dark. It's real, real dark. Get your flashlight. The future is not a nice place and this is no fairytale. It is, however, a classic and a must read.
I believe there are some people--many of whom are artists-- who arrive on this earth to warn us of the future. George Orwell--a Humanistic Socialist--is one of those people. I write in the present tense because although Mr. Orwell has left us, his masterpiece works such as 1984 and Animal Farm, remain, and probably will--as all great artistic works--for a very long time.The warning that 1984 represents is that of impending dystopia--evil in its abject, Senseless, Self-Serving brutality--that threatens to take hold of our human society whenever people become complacent. The question is will we heed the warnings and begin taking responsibility for creating heaven on earth-- or will we wallow in this dangerous complacency and thereby enable the bullies to take over for the sheer love of power?
This book is a great read, but is also quite disheartening. The society described in the book is inconceivable to some, but it's hard to argue that we aren't moving in that direction. I challenge anyone to disagree after reading this with an open mind.The highlight of the book is a manifesto that the main character, Winston Smith, must read. It shows Orwell's ingenious insight to mankind's role in it's own oppression. I couldn't help but agree with so much of what was said, at the same time realizing how much it seemed to trivialize the work of all civil rights activists.Highly recommended, particularly if you enjoyed stories such as "V for Vendetta" or movies like "American History X" and "The Matrix".
1984, written in the late 1940's, is a shocking look at a possible future. This future is one where independant thought is outlawed and "Big Brother" rules over the people of Oceania with an iron fist. One man stands up against this totalitarian government. Can he topple Big Brother, or will he be one who falls? This book really makes the reader THINK while they read. Today, with our ever-expanding government, this future is not a far-fetched possibility. Do not take this book so much as an entertaining novel, but rather as a warning of events to come.
1984 is a book based on the main character Winston Smith. Winston lives in a Oceania which is controlled by a totalitarian government, big brother. Big Brother has become so bad that the government has come up with their own language and have many devices to monitor them daily.George Orwell went about conducting 1984 very well in my eyes. This book is a pretty easy read and it really gets you thinking about some things. What if something like this ever happend? What if we weren't born in the U.S.A. and we were controlled like that all the time? By Orwell even being able to put that sort of image into somebodies mind shows and proves how good of a writer he really is.
1984 is definitely a book that can generate discussion. The topics form strong and sometimes unexpected opinions. A few parts are a bit dull, such as the beginning, but the plot is quite intriguing. George Orwell utilizes superior language and I loved the way he used one example of "mind control" throughout the entire story and ties up loose ends with the concept. MAny different themes are all taking place at the same time, but everything associates with the main "Big Brother" government. I truly enjoyed reading the novel. It was a refreshing change of pace for me because I'm not normally a science fiction reader. Despite all of this, I wouldn't suggest knocking this book off in one sitting, even if you're an avid reader. It can get pretty hard to focus. Overall, though, I would definitely recommend 1984.
The entire book was good up until the last chapter, at least in my opinion. Without giving out the ending, I didn't feel that Orwell used the characteristics of his character well. Maybe I'll need to re-read the book to understand the true meaning of the book because I didn't get it in my first try. However, the book was well put together overall with very strong characters and a strong plot. It's scary if "Oceania" ever became the world of today.
Another great read by Jack Polidoro. Unbelievably uncanny that not too long after reading Project Samuel there is all the bruhaha over what to do with Ted Williams' body after his death. A riveting novel! It is scary to see what could and does happen because of human greed. Jack does a remarkable job of allowing the reader to get to intimately know the characters. Once again I anxiously await Jack's next novel.
The premise of cloning from a living celebrity kept my interest all the way through. The author's love of baseball and it's heros is evident. I couldn't put it down, had to rush to the very satisfying finish. Looking forward to more from Polidoro.
Bought this to disguise redness occurring with rosacea. It does a good job when used over a moisturizer and primer covering the redness but not cracking. Recommend using it with a primer and moisturizer.
I really like this concealer. It covers better than any other I've ever tried and stays on until I wash it off. The only reason I didn't give it 5 stars is because it does tend to get a bit cakey. I primarily got it for dark under eye circles. Be careful to put it on in light, thin layers around the eye area. I have a small scar on my cheek and this covers it completely. A little bit goes a long way, too.
I've been using this product for a few years now and cannot imagine ever being without it. I have terrible dark circles under my eyes and the difference after applying this product is remarkable. I HIGHLY recommend it.
I've been using this product for a couple of years now. I've tried other products but have always came back as nothing else covers imprefections as well. Can be a bit chalky if you don't blend well and only use as a cover-up and not a full face foundation.
Product covers my black allery eye circles perfectly without drying the eye area; it stays until you wash it away.
THIS IS BY FAR MY FAVORITE CONCEALER. DOES NOT CREASE AT ALL. COVERAGE COULD BE A LITTLE BETTER, BUT STILL A GREAT PRODUCT.
I always have a hard time finding a concealer that is just right. But this concealer I found years ago, and I've been using it ever since! I have dark bags under my eyes and this concealer helps lighten them up. Definitely recommend it!
Very effective product and cost effective. The smallest amount of this concealer covers under eyes and stays put. Creases a bit but not as much as some other products that give less coverage.
i suffer from severe skin discoloration and i cant tell you how good this product is at hiding most if not all of it. For those people who have issues relating to skin, pls try this as it is by far one of the best concealers i have come across.....
Pretty good gun case. I use it to hold 2 handguns and a kel-tec sub 2000(small rifle that folds in half). I can put all the guns on the top level then all the magazines and other items on the bottom level. Case closes tight and nothing moves around. The only bad is that the locks are useless, the key dose not fit well and it is hard to lock/unlock. I have just stopped using the lock, which would be a problem around children.
What a brilliant movie about incest and how it leads to the devastation of a woman. A woman who can't feel anything, who is trying desperately in every way to feel...something. And when someone presents himself to draw her out of her withered self, all she can do is re-enact her adoloscent despair. Come on, folks -- her mother tells her she's filthy, she berates her for giving in to a man -- this is Psychology 101, but brilliantly acted and compelling. Of course, she wants her student to be damaged, because she is both jealous and trying to protect her student from her overbearing parents. I doubt that I'm going to sleep well tonight.
Bound to become a classic of world cinema, 'the piano teacher', is Michael Haneke's most perfect film.. It tells the story of a women so repressed and abused by her mother that she explodes with sexual tension..it comes out in her music.. and in a sort of chaotic relationship with one of her students.. at times incestuous and at times perverse this is a truly disturbed women who is as rigid as her own philosophy of music- this is a must see - a modern classic from a powerful new cinematic voice..
got to see this Film recently&I didn't find it near as Strong overall as it was advertised as being.it had some twisted moments&elements going on but overall not that different from what I've seen in film over the past several years.enjoyed the music&overall chemistry.
The book has many very good points and suggestions for educators to deal with difficult parents. I bought two copies as gifts for colleagues who just started their careers as elementary school principals, and they liked it as well. As with most books regarding education topics, there are some things that are utopian, such as encouraging parents to contact you at home making relations so much better.
Excellent dvd! gives insight to a scociety that created a major movement of last century. many of these techniques have carried on through other inovators, but we will surely cherish this dvd and use it as a resource.[...]
The moment I put this cd on and heard the light, lulling strum of a dreamy guitar fluttering like soft breezes that carried with them the whispered caresses of sun-kissed Gregorian chants, followed by the ocean spray of some middle eastern voice sweetly singing amidst gorgeous strings and a hypnotic beat, I knew this was going to be one journey I'd be willing to take for many years to come...and that was the impression I got from the first track alone! Imagine what ensued... It only gets better from there!Every song is aptly titled to create a spellbinding mood, and while I find this exotically soothing debut album by Black Ether (an astonishingly overlooked group) extremely hard to classify because it is so diversified in its use of instruments and styles, I'd have to say if you enjoy lush chillout music with an ethnic-world flavor to it than this is most definitely your cup of tea.
See my review of this movie on vhs.Some day before I'm dead,maybe this will come out on dvd.If you want this movie out on dvdthen click yes.
Although it is difficult at first to picture Alec Guinness as a distinguished Tokyo businessman, you soon begin to accept his character. I was skeptical of this movie when instructed to view it by my mother. However, just a few minutes into the story, I found myself hooked. Rosalind Russell is believable as the wise and loving Mrs. Jacoby. Alec Guiness is an acceptable post WWII Japanese business man although you want to tell him to quit squinting. Overall, the movie is a guilty pleasure on a cold or rainy Saturday afternoon.
I have been a big fan of the movie "A Majority of One" for many years. I have a "tape" of the movie, but was thrilled when the movie came out on DVD. Rosalind Russell is superb. The interaction between Rosalind and Alec Guiness is extremely pleasurable to watch from the time they met on the ship to their relationship in Japan. The scenes with Rosalind dressed in the Japanese Kimono were priceless. The ending was extremely enjoyable leaving the audience to draw its own conclusion on where their relationship would go.
Bueno tener este album debido a su sonido peculiar, algunas de sus canciones hasta fueron programadas aca en la radio en Guanatos...es + el Kala (Rostros Ocultos) se encargó de hacer un cover el cual fue un exito en español - con los Smithreens nunca lo fue - ("Tiempo de Cambiar" o "Something New"). Saludos de neta. Mork
Felix Blumenfeld writes etudes in the grand nineteenth century tradition, and they are worth hearing and playing. The performances on this CD are technically expert and musically satisfying.
Louanne Pig is ecstatic when she receives a Valentine's Day card from a secret admirer. However, she is now faced with trying to un-mask her admirer, so she can thank him in person. After all, having a secret admirer is very exciting. So Louanne sets out on her quest to find her admirer, but it's harder than it looks, and Louanne keeps hitting dead ends. Now she'll never know who her secret admirer is.Nancy Carlson has done a wonderful job of creating an adorable Valentine's Day book for young readers, in which they can identify with the character. Her short, yet sweet prose on each page is easy-to-understand, and her lovely illustrations depict what is going on perfectly, making it easy for even the youngest reader to know what is going on. This is a splendid new book for children, that will make a lovely present, whether it's given on Valentine's Day, or any other day of the year.Erika SoroccoBook Review Columnist for The Community Bugle Newspaper
Louanne the pig has an age-old problem: She's received a beautiful valentine from an unidentified admirer! Whimsical drawings accompany her search through all her classmates, and the ending is sweet enough for those to young to appreciate boy-girl romance.
I loved this product!I was burned twice on my face and this was the one product that I have ever needed for my face,I didnt need makeup my skin always was soft and firm looking,now I cant find anything to compare and my skin has been rough and very dry.They sell less for way more,the more was better cause I used it even on my belly and legs.I miss it....
As of now, this is Leonard Goldberg's last book in the Joanna Blalock series and, in my opinion, the best yet. It deals with a very touchy subject: Smallpox & Terrorism and bits of 9/11 are added in the book as well. Joanna Blalock, a forensic pathologist at Memorial Hospital in Los Angeles is called in by the FBI to do a top secret autopsy of an unidentified man found murdered at LAX, Joanna and Jake fear that they are once again being pulled into another terrorist investigation; the previous one having nearly cost Joanna her life. While the investigation into the corpse's identity is in progress, another emergency intervenes when a man with symptoms of smallpox arrives at Memorial and everyone who has had contact with him is quarantined in the hospital's basement isolation center; including Joanna.Based on a scenario that has all the makings of a very real nightmare, Leonard Goldberg has put together a top notch medical thriller.
Not only is this 5 stars, it should get a rosette in the Peguin catalogue.It's simply the best since the 1970's superb Emi recordings. Thanks Emi for putting all this material on one disc. Mr Cleobury's has directed this music in a somewhat faster pace than the 70's versions, thus rendering these works absolutely fun to listen to, especially the "Praise the Lord, O Jerusalem". It's just astonishing. I've followed Purcell recordings since Yehudi Menuhin, Schwartzkof...Baker...Britten...Deller Consort...James Bowman...Elloit Gardiner...Will Christie..I am quiet intimate with Purcell. And, this one stands right up there with the best of them. Intense, passionate and very singable. This one could revive the Purcell Society or maybe, even start one in the states.
IN MY OPINION THA DOGG POUND IS MAKING A GREAT MOVEMENT....ITS BEEN A WHILE SINCE THE WEST COAST HAS BEEN PUTTIN THIS MANY ALBUMS OUT. WE HAVE "THE GAME" , "ICE CUBE" AND MANY MORE STILL TO COME....IN MY OPINION THA DOGG POUND IS DOING GREAT THINGS....SO IM SAYIN IF YOU GONNA GET THIS ALBUM PREPARE TO BE AMAZED
I'm a huge Anne Rice fan, and I bought this to add to my collection. She has a style of her own. If you are a fan, I would recommend adding this one.
...and besides all that, the writing is gorgeous, and the New Orleans settings are so wonderful. Ann Rice is truly a writer of many talents - and many and diverse interests.Kinky? Yes. Erotic? Yes? Fun? Yes. Should you read it? Yes.
Movie was okay, I liked it. Never realized there was a book for it. I was buying more Anne Rice's books and saw Exit to Eden, I picked it up knowing if Anne Rice wrote it, it would be good. But... it was even better! A MUST READ! It was completely different than the movie! But totally BETTER! I recommend this book with no problem. You must be open-minded. I like the fact it went from The Club to real-life. I have read most reviews. I agree with people saying its the best. For those who say it "trash," you may need to open your eyes and see the true world out there. It's not the 50's anymore. You have your opinions, but I have mine and this is an EXCELLENT BOOK TO READ. I have read the Witching Hour and the books to follow for the series. Anne Rice continues to amaze me with her works, specially considering this is a earlier written book! Amazing. Read it!
[close] I was one of the fortunate people who was able to read this book before the film came out. I would like to open by stating that if you liked the "movie" starring Rosie O'Donnell, DO NOT READ THE BOOK. Likewise, if you read the book, avoid the movie like you would avoid a rabid dog showing signs of ebola.This is not Rice's greatest erotic work. It lacks the expansiveness of the Beauty trilogy or the vividness of Belinda. Those facts aside, this is an interesting work from a psychological standpoint (understanding the "top" and "bottom" or "Master/Mistress" "slave" relationships), and not a bad read for its sexual content and scenes. However, it is not the pathetic, vaguely slapstick comedy that the film made it into, and is nowhere near the quality of most of her other work.
A friend recommended this book to me. Once I started, I couldn't put it down - it captured so many ideas I'd already been thinking. I then gave it to my wife, who, to my surprise, also loved. Needless to say, it has completely changed our lives for the better.
I was not able to put this book down. If you have ever been interested in s/m, you must read this. Anne takes you to the point of being sexually submissive like no one ever will!
I have read so much about Anne Rice - and finally managed to read one of her books - since I dislike anything with vampires thought I would give this a try. All I have to say is "where is the Club?" and where can I meet a man like Elliott?? wow! This is a very sensual tale about two people Lisa and Elliott who have enjoyed to the hilt such a heavy dose of an alternative s&m life style but when this couple finally meet - PASSION!! Much more powerful and intense for both of them than they have ever experienced. They both find themselves willing to risk anything to persue this opportunity with "love." Rice actually allows you to see them fall in love in their flight from the Club. This is a strong powerful book and I found it a page turner.
A love story infinitely more readable than the Sleeping Beauty set, it delves deep into the human psyche, and attempts to explain how and why someone would choose BSDM as a lifestyle. Plenty of erotica, and a plot too! A great read!
I like this book more than a lot of Ann Rice's books. It is not so full of sadism, and homosexuality. It is an interesting story, and holds the attention.
I can't believe I read this book in one sitting. This is the first novel by Anne Rice I've ever read. Her words are so descriptive, I found myself just painting the images in my mind. Even my body shivered as I read some of the encounters between Elliott and Lisa. It's a good story. I don't really get the S&M stuff, but still a good book. Most memorable section...the butter and cinnamon in New Orleans.
I think this is enough to tell you that the game is great. This game resembles Mario64 and Banjo-Kazooie, but has the better graphics and more mature gameplay that you would expect from XBOX. The graphics are amazing, and the controls are easy to use. The characters in this game are amazing, each with their own unique traits. There are several levels in which the game takes you to places far and wide. From a Snowy Winter Wonderlad to a Firery Desert, you get the feeling of visiting places all around the world just by a move of the joystick. With a resemblance to the old and happy Mario64 and Banjo-Kazooie, this is a must buy game.
I get a lot of compliments on this necklace when I wear it. The chain is heavy enough to be sturdy, but not too bulky. The amethysts are very deep in color and have good clarity. Recommended.
Well built... i recommend having 2 people to install...i bought it for a 1996 Chevy Silverado... the frame was cut different than what the towing hitch was so i had to modify it...so it took about 5 hours to install alone...
My brother lives in Bangkok and I've been there many times so I was keen to see what a novel set there would be like and I wasn't disappointed - Mr Moore evokes the seediness and poverty without it appearing soul-destroyingly hopeless because he manages to balance it with interesting characters (both the good, the bad and the humanly flawed), a good mystery and moments of beauty and humour. I enjoyed it and intend to try the next one...
I read this book many years ago and wanted to read it again.My order was handled quickly and professionally.Great service. Great book.
I think that Fahrenheit 451 was a great book. The story was based on a very good topic. One thing I liked about the book was that it was very well written. This book never got to boring or to lame, it was always fun to just keep on reading. People like me who don't like to read just want to skim through it and pay no attention, but in this book I was so intrested I never wanted to put it down and stop. One thing i didn't like about this book was that some parts were very hard to understand. It took me a while on some pages to fully understand what I was reading. I think teachers should recomend this book to their students.
Come on - a classic. Montag is iconic and impervious to criticism; c'mon, he hates burning books and he's a 'fireman.' Bradbury has created one his best stories in this tale of the near future, which tragically, is beginning to mirror our own. How many young people to I hear say 'I don't like to read, not my thing.' Are we so far away from Fahrenheit 451? Five stars.
I give Fahrenheit 451 41/2 stars because the ook keeps the reader on edge. I had a very hard time putting the book down. Fahrenheit 451 was a lot like our socity today. Instead of putting out fires firemen started them. That strange twist was what I liked most about the book. I deducted a half star because it was a little hard to follow.
I gave fahrenheit 451 4 stars because it was an interesting and thoughtful book. It shows that books have been an advent to all major ideas.Without books creativity and thought would be stifled. Ray Bradbury`s classis story is a sure bet for good reading.I deducted 1 star because the book was sometimes hard to follow but don`t let that deter you from reading it.
I'm a sophomore in high school, and I just finished reading F451. I may be slightly bias, since I love to read, particularly Sci-fi (Star Trek rules!), but this book was really good. I know many read this book in their junior high years, but I think it's better if it's read a little later, when it can be "digested" more thoroughly by a more mature audience. So many people, regardless of high school levels, hate to read, and I sincerely believe that is one of the most dangerous things in today's society. Schools do not stress music, art, and literature nearly as much as they should. We learn to THINK--we gain WISDOM from what we READ, not from playing sports and playing games on computers. Even many colleges give out more sports scholarships than academic scholarships. Western Civilization had better watch out, or Ray Bradbury's sci-fi book will become REALITY...
Hello People,I thought that Fahrenheit 451 was a good book. I wouldn't say that it was the best book in the world but it was definetly a good book and you should read it. It isn't your average book that you're used to, it's a little diffrent. Bradbury writes really well and you can follow the story, but sometimes he would just say something and you would have no clue what he's talking about. So then you have to go back and read a couple pages just to figure out whats going on. But above all I would say that it is a good book and even though it's a little diffrent, it's good to give diffrent things a try. :)Peace-out and enjoy the book!!!!!!!!!
Irony without imagination and the will to think for yourself.You're just a mindless zombie, a puppet for people to control you. Inmy opinion, that's what Ray Bradbury is saying in his book. - J. Litton, BDHS
Ray Bradbury takes us into the future where the government burns books to keep people from thinking and/or rebelling. I think that these circumstances could be somewhat true to the future of this world. Dictators have burned books throughout history to keep the people tame in their ideas. We should all just step back and say,"Hey, do we really want to give the government this much power. I mean, what happened to power to the people
I bought this book after Ray Bradbury died because the obituaries said that this was his best work. I did not know what to expect.The book is about a future in which [almost] everyone live vicariously through the lives of others delivered via technology. The system prohibits independent thinking or feeling and actually used the fire department to burn up anyone that is a 'problem'.As I see more people (myself included) using their cell phones, social media, and on-line entertainment, I see our society moving in this direction. It is amazing to me that Bradbury created this dystopian vision many years in advance of the current technology that almost makes it possible today.
Amazingly relevant for our times. Story is a little odd and wordy, but it is an excellently crafted piece that will go down in history as a classic.
Another book I read as a young man and dismissed. The book is so spot on. The difference is people tend to be obsessed with PDAs not walls in their homes.
This book was short, and deep. It was amazingly deep in fact, for the length. Bradbury captures something about our nature both to believe in something passionately, and to ignorantly become sheepish. There is lying, betrayal, and small glimmers of home, in a macabre future. One of my favorites by far.
this was a good book. the part called "coca"is the best (about cencorship) the book is kind of like "the giver" only a lot better.
I personally thought that the originality of the plot was what made the book interesting for me. Never before had I read a book about the banning of books and using "firemen" to get rid of them. At times there were some lulls and some confusing parts, but overall Bradbury's unique style is what made the book worthwhile for me to read. I believe that Montag was at times a flat character that could use a little spice, but his growth throughout the novel seemed to counteract the deterioration within his own surrounding society. To think that one day our own society could be like Montag's; burning books and stifling creativity; is absolutely frightening to me and this book does not try to supress that notion. It actually amplifies it, but it can be used as a reference for our future generations so they would never reach that low point that Montag's society reached.
This book is exceptional in its portrayal of the future. Yet, it is slow for the few chapters. If you buy this book, brunt the hardship; it gets incredible later!
This book just sweeps into the world of so called happiness.I think the book is warning us about the dangers of technology.I love the way he portrays life in the future and how liberal and lazy the people have become.I especially love Captain Beatty's personality, he can burn books but yet he knows quite alot about them.Captain Beatty's name is kind of ironic in how it incorporates the word beatific, which means to show extreme joy or bliss,when in the book they all are trying to stay happy when really they're not.They are not happy in my opinion because they always have to be doing something they can't just think or have a conversation with a human being.This book is very interesting and I recomend it to teens so they can learn more about life itself.
I was first introduced to Ray Bradbury when I took up The Martian Chronicles at my community library. I was impressed. Now, several years later, I finally read Fahrenheit 451.The book is divided into three parts, and the first two were absolutely excellent. (The Afterword and Coda were, as well.) The third part of the story, however, lost me. Ray Bradbury decided, partway through the section, to abandon the easily flowing narrative that he had established in the rest of the book. Instead he picked up a very difficult to follow inner dialogue that lost my interest. Which made it even harder to follow for the rest of the book.But, Bradbury deserves a gold star for his insight into how society is working today (which he foresaw several years ago). We are giving up books and stopping thinking. Remember, at first, the government didn't have to burn books... People just stopped reading them.Love it or hate it, this is a book that rings with truth. And, whatever you do, don't burn it.
For grade levels 11th and up, Fahrenheit 451 is sure to please readers of all intrests. Fireman Guy Montag is deeply troubled when he meets a local girl and watchs a women burn in her home. He then realizes the importance of those books he keeps burning and within a few days, he is a totally diffrent person.Author Ray Bradbury predicts the future and successfuly holds the reader's intrest. Frightingly, Ray predictions are quite acurate. Read it and see for yourself.
A nice easy read for someone who may be interested in a futuristic fun read. Guy Montag brings to the reader a whole new life style that no one has ever experienced. I enjoyed reading this book because there was never a moment when I felt bored with what I was reading or thought of putting it down. I recommend this book to the young adult who is looking for an a relaxing, fun read.
A great read and very thought provoking. We read as part of a community grant - The Big Read. Would strongly recommend.
In Ray Bradbury's science-fiction story Fahrenheit 451, he tells of a world set in the future when it's illegal to own books. The main character, Guy Montag, works for the fire department setting fires in homes occupied by literature. Guy Montag, unhappy at home, is surrounded by technology that he feels is unimportant. Guy Montag soon realizes that burning the books would ruin years of writing and history, when he takes home a handful of books he is put in danger. The setting is believable, unknown, and familiar all at the same time. It has a lot of similar issues as today's world does, but with a futuristic spin on them. Fahrenheit 451 is a fast paced, fascinating read; I would recommend it to anybody who likes sci-fi thrillers.
Although not as profound as George Orwell's "1984", "Fahrenheit 451" still stands as a prophetic warning against the evils of censorship, and controlling the masses through ignorance.The little lost in profundity by comparison to "1984" is more than made up in readability. Whereas "1984" took me two days to complete, I read through "Fahrenheit 451" in an afternoon. Additionally "1984" ends with an feeling of hopelessness, whereas 451 ends with some degree of optimism for the future.Overall, 451 still stands out as one of a limited number of dystopian stories whose message remains as vital today as when it was published.
Guy Montag is a hero of heroes in this masterpiece of a book. He is a misguided soul who never wonders whether his and his companions' actions are just and right. When the idea of the flaw of his society is introduced, Guy goes on a difficult journey for the truth. This is a book that will stay with you forever.
This book was the most breathtaking, jawdropping, and eyeopening phenomenon. I have read this book several times and every time I see something that I didn't see before and gain one more level in the battle against ignorance.
Bradbury creates a perfect dystopia in which life as we know it does not exist. The deep value of somewhat simple style makes this book one of the finest ever written. This book should be a necessity for anyone who plans on helping to preserve liberty for one's self and for all.
It's a book that basically tells of censorship. It is well written and makes you think about censorship today.
I am a 16-year-old and I also had to read this (in my holidays) for school. The book was very confusing at first, but it makes you think. This is the only sci-fiction novel I have liked. Those who hate this novel show themselves to be almost illiterate (just look for the spelling mistakes).
I totally agree with "Reader from Vermont" Whoever you are, you summed up exactly how I felt about the book. I chose to read it because of all the hype. I was disappointed, I expected more. I feel that it is a good book, but overrated.
All theses years later this book still holds up. Loved it. I would recommend this book to anyone. Somebody should do a modern movie remake of this story.
I read this book as a teenager, and I wanted my students to read it as well. Although I loved it, I did not get the same reaction as when they saw the video. However they did think the video was cheesy... :D
The story is simple, but powerful. As other reviewers have noted, some of the details that Bradbury imagined in 1950 (when he wrote it, not the publication date of 1953) have come true (large TVs on the walls, a move towards simplistic sensationalism, the deep distrust of education and educated people, etc.) I found the writing to be serviceable, sometimes brilliant. Occasionally the metaphors get too long winded and overly descriptive.The 50th Anniversary Edition, published by Ballantine Books/Del Rey is wonderful. Not only do we get the full unedited text (ironically, this book about censorship has been censored frequently over the years), but we also get the afterword and coda (added in the late 70s, early 80s) and an illuminating 10 page interview with Bradbury himself. In the interview he describes his writing process, how he thinks the book holds up today, and whether or not he'd write a sequel. It's a great addition to the book.
Fahrenheit 451. The temperature at which books catch fire and burn.Odd title, but not as odd as the story itself. The community in which this story takes place seems strange, but it's shockingly similar to our own. Both in their community and ours, citizens follow what the government says and do it without question. In this case, people don't read books. If they do, firemen burn them. It's simple, but in Ray Bradbury's account of this tale, it becomes very complex.Guy Montag, the main character/fireman, discovers that this process is wrong. Firemen should not destroy homes and books. People should be aloud to read. But what can he do? Find out by reading Ray Bradbury's Fahrenheit 451.
This book although one of the worst distopian books was good in that it was for a childs view. Some of the characters showed extreme likeness to modern society and the theme was very well developed. many very good literature components in this work.
I bought this book for my personal library and was thrilled by it's condition. It was in mint condition and the seller was great to work with. The book was delivered really quickly and I thoroughly enjoyed reading it. Thanks!
Is the book outdated? Have people finally learned that they are closing their minds? Unfortunately people still need the message of Fahrenheit 451. Most people are still convinced that God becomes angry and, what is worse, far worse, they are still burning books today when they ignore new ideas.
Grateful I stumbled upon this book. A fantastic read. Timeless and incredibly thought provoking.If the summary grabs you at all, give it a chance.
This is such an amazing novel, everybody should read it because of its message. While some books become outdated, this novel is still relevant today.
While sometimes hard to follow, Ray Bradbury's science fiction classic is still intense and searing when at its best and bears many frightening resemblences to our own world. This futuristic civilization regards cursory items such as magazines as better than books; the television has pretty much taken over; there's even a mention of kids frequently killing each other. Pretty amazing stuff, considering Bradbury wrote this way back in 1953. At least we haven't gone so far as to burn all books, but who knows; maybe things will get so bad that we just might....CALLING ALL GUY MONTAGS!
To you reviewers who had to read this book for school and hated it: I too was forced to read it when I was in 8th grade, and felt the same way about it that you do. I thought it was the dumbest most boring book I'd ever read.I'm telling you now: wait 5 or 6 years, and pick this book up again. I promise you will enjoy it. It's a story of an oppressed society and a man with the courage to try and break free. Please, give Farenheit 451 another chance. You won't regret it.
I have enjoyed reading this book. everyone will enjoy it after the first reading. It may be slighlty difficult in the beginning but if you continue to read you will find this book to be very deep, and compelling. I feel as if the more you read it, the more you will enjoy it because you will absorb more information that you may have missed on the first reading. Go Montag!
I always like to read a classic every once in a while, whether it be a mystery, literature, or good old science fiction. It seems that many of the classic science fiction novels deal more with man's attitude toward his surroundings rather than the stories of aliens and the future world gone crazy thru technology. This book takes the simple premise of a world where books are illegal and turns it into a Twilight Zone episode. The best part of a novel such as this is that the reader is forced to contemplate a scenario which is actually imaginable and decide how he or she would act and react. An interesting story to say the least.....
This book follows the same outline of the great novel "1984" by George Orwell. This book deals mainly with the threat that censorship poses on a nation. Guy Montag, a fireman, has never had a problem going along with the norm until he meets a young girl who changes his perspective on life. He then begins to question why he burns books which leads him into trouble with his boss Fire Chief Beatty. There are many important lessons that one can draw from this book but mainly the idea that books never die and that they live on in people's hearts and minds as long as there lessons are remembered. This book can teach young people to appreciate the importance of books, a must read.
Ray Bradbury's Fahrenheit 451 is a book that will make you think. As you are reading this book, questions pop up that you would have probably never thought of. Set in the not so distant future, Bradbury plunges you into the life of Guy Montag. He is a fireman who was always taught to ask how, not why. His job is to burn, not put out flames, never asking the reasons behind the burnings. He goes through life happy, not knowing anything is wrong. He lives in an unperfected utopia. Due to one event, his whole mentality crumbles and chaos emerges as he goes through a transformation, making everyone around him his enemy, except the few people who have gone through this metamorphosis. No longer ignorant he becomes isolated, pushing for some way out.This book is probably one of the best books I have ever read; it might even be my favorite. If you like books such as The Giver, or the short story Harrison Bergeron, then this is definitely a book to read.
I love the writings of Ray Bradbury and this book tops them all.Although decades old, it's message is loud and clear. And I still think that the allegories and themes in this are still prevelant in today's society.
This book was really good and made me think a lot more about society and censorship. We are already at the point where everything we think about has already been thought for us(news, magazines,media,etc.). I guess as long as one is happy with society we will always be ruled and brainwashed by the government. Anyways...read this book it'll make you think about real life and how lucky we are that society isn't as screwed up as it could be.
Many people have already read and reviewed this novel. I willjust say that it is worth the 7 rating.
My daughter has to read this for her 10th grade english class and I decided to check it out myself. It is not as well written or as compelling as 1984 but it is still a very good read. The author makes a number of excellent points. To me it felt like film noir mixed up with some comic book qualities in my imagination. Still, a very good read with lessons to share.
This is one of those books that you see pieces of in all kinds of other books and movies.
I really enjoyed this book, but the story line was a little different then I had expected it to be. This is always a fun book to read, which I will be reading in the future as well.
Farenheight 451 is an extrordinary piece of literature. It contains a number of symbols. Ray Bradbury has written a deep complex piece of literaature in Farenheight 451. It is set to take place in the future. Everything isin a fast pace, and there is not a second to breathe in the world that it takes place. You can not walk along the road. Also you can not talk. The most odd things in this book are firemen start fires, and it is illegal to own books. After reading this book I am left to wonder... will the future really be like this?
I liked the symbolism Ray Bradbury used in this book. I really liked Mildred and the "mechanical dog". I really enjoyed reading this book and I'm glad I read it in class so my teacher could explain the symbolism and metaphors to me. Other than that i really liked this book.Shoutz to 8-4 at Holy Angels!
A great story to pass the time during travel, such as on a plane or in car, because it should only take 2-and-a-half Hours to read. It starts with Guy Montag, a fireman whose job is to actually start fires, primarily to burn books and their owner's houses. After being encountered by a strange 17-year old girl who asks not only "what" things are about but "why", and witnessing a woman commit suicide by lighting her house (bearing books) on fire rather than let the Firemen do it themselves, he decides there must be something else to books than just words and paper. The story is about his struggles to revive the book world and save it from certain destruction.
Ray Bradbury in his classical novel Fahrenheit 451 uses symbolism, imagery, and literary devises to create an abhorrent world filled with censorship. In Fahrenheit 451, Ray Bradbury gives a frightening vision of the future where firemen don't put out fires--they start them in order to burn books. Bradbury paints society as holding happiness as there highest goal, where trivial, useless information is good and ideas and knowledge is bad. One of the most reoccurring literary devises in this novel is symbolism. We often see symbolism in the character's names. For example, one of the main characters, Guy Montag can have two translations. Guy signifies Guy Faux a famous man we associate with effigy, and Mischief Day (Nov.4), and Montag is the trademark of the Need American Paper Company, also a brand of furnaces. More symbolism is shown when we meet Faber. Faber is America's leading pencil company and it is going to be the pencil that writes on Montag's paper.
I thought that this book was great and it really makes you wonder. This book was written by a person who had a great imagination, the best. And like Einstein said, "Imagination is more important that knowledge." Which I thought was the moral of the book. I would reccomend this book to anyone who wants to read where one page makes you read the next.
I believe that the book Fahrenheit 451 was very well written and very interesting. Mr. Bradbury made the book have a lot of good vocabulary for a 12 year old to learn. This book is one of the better books that I have had to read in school. Prior to reading this book I never really liked science fiction books. This book has changed that dramatically. It also taught me fun facts like (before reading this i didn't know) paper burns at 451 degrees. WOW if a book can just do that, i don't even know why people would ban them in the future. LOL :)
I am reading this book in 7th grade advanced language arts. Most students don't like it and think that it's confusing, but i love it.
Fahrenheit 451, is a fine novel. It belongs to the kind of sci-fi, which is really imbued with meaning and consequence. Thus I would group it with other great, litterary accepted, sci-fi novels, like "Nineteen Eighty-Four" or "Brave New World". I was quite surprised about the abrupt ending of the novel. I think it's too short. It's kind of like a novella. While reading I was thinking whether there is an allusion to the tremendous fear or reds and the communists during the 50's in the U.S.?
The lessons learned from good authors are timeless. Reading this book today one wonders how a writer 50 years ago could have so much insight into the society we live in today.Yes its about censorship, but its also about today's media and advertising culture. People are fed the news and told what opinion they should have about it... why bother thinking yourself?The parts of the book about television and how the media ties into law enforcement are chilling, in light of the new "Amber Alerts" adopted across the country.Good books make you think about your world, and this one makes you wonder how Bradbury could have known.The afterward (or coda) was priceless, and its comments on censorship and "editing" are far more frightening than people showing up to burn your books."I will not go gently onto a shelf, degutted, to become a non-book."
As an English teacher, I felt like a loser because I had never read FAHRENHEIT 451, so I picked up a copy and read it.It's pretty good. I guess I avoided it because it was written by Ray Bradbury and I didn't consider him an accomplished author. Now I do. The book just might surprise you. It is science fiction at its best.
This is a great book. I loved it because it was so confuseing. I bet that is hard to believe, but I love confuseing books alot. If you a good book to read, read F451
This is a marvellous book. I found it full of compelling text and did not want to put it down. I recommend this book to anyone whom likes a good can't put down book.
"Fahrenheit 451" a metaphor on the freedom of speech. It is not in literary terms that knowledge can be controlled by burning books; there are other ways to accomplish that. As the world is full of people; running with lit matches. Ray Bradbury is basing his attack on every editor; censor; lobbyist; government that see themselves as the caretaker of knowledge and literature; and they control by shackle the words of an author who dare to speak out.The question is very relevant to present times. The news is splattered with stories of doctored intelligence documents; on the bases of which dreaded events occurred.
Bradbruy creates a world of censorship and what is supposed to be simplistic and fun. The main character, Guy Montag has the profession of a fireman, and rather then put out fires, he begins them. His job is to destroy books, but he soon realizes that there is more to the world than what is told to him. With the help of some very interesting supporting characters Montag's life is drastically changed. This is a really quick read under 200 pages. It was definantly thought provoking and the whole message fits in any time period.
I rarely read SF, I'm more of a fan of general fiction books like Prince of Tides or The Triumph and the Glory. But I had to read Fahrenheit 451 for a class and actually enjoyed it. It had an aura of chilling prophecy, the world may well deteriorate to conditions like that described in Bradbury's classic book, where books are burned. I hope not, though, Amazon would lose even more money than they are now.
I think his writings are amazing. I know many differ on that opinion but I truly enjoy his works. 451 is my favorite of his writings. I think it is fascinating to see how much the time influenced him. How so many things you see in the movie are now in creation like the wall tv (our flat screen now). This book was required reading in my youth and I feel it should be required today as well. It's a view of a world which could easily occur if we allow our rights to be flushed basically. How we could easily fall into a dystopian world if we become complacent and lack knowledge. I highly recommend this book!
In the world presented by Mr. Bradbury, books are illegal and all books here are from older times, people now hide and hoard them, and if someone is caught with books, their house is set on fire by firemen - the very same people that once prevented fires instead of starting them. Spare time is spent watching TV instead of reading, and the TVs are huge, taking up an entire wall. Some people try to have a TV room (TVs on all walls) for total immersion, which is what the main character's wife wants even though they cannot afford it all. Rather eye-opening and a appropriate commentary on books vs TV.
throughout the novel, you are exposed to many different thingS comparing to our world to this books words. the main character Guy is a firemen and his job in this world is to burn books that they find among the people. This book repersents the amount of learning that the people will be doing in the future of our county it tv will keep going as it is. the book is a good book it has the posibility of telling people what we will come to if we stop reading. There are factors that leading to the general lack of interest in reading and factors that make people actively hostile toward books. Nature is presented as a force of innocence and truth with one of the characters.Blood appears throughout the novel as a symbol of a human being's repressed soul or primal, instinctive self. Montag often feels his most revolutionary thoughts welling and circulating in his blood. thsi book kept me interested un till the end because you did not know what crazy thing was goin to go on next.
The Firemen of tomorrow do not put out fires anymore..... they START them. This story about a fireman doubting his job is absolutely riveting. Guy Montag thought he was happy. Then a girl named Clarisse came onto the scene. Her sudden disappearance and/or death leads to his unsettlement. When his wife, Mildred turns him in, he must burn his own house. He finds hope with a group of shabby old professors. Ray Bradbury must have been psychic to write a book that hits this close to home. Who knows, Fahrenheit 451 may be the future. This book is a MUST for children to read in the classroom.
The message in the book is similar to that in "1984" and in the writings of Ayn Rand. At times the message seemed to be so "in your face" and I'm certain that Mr. Bradbury would have been more subtle had he written it 10 or 15 years later.
This book was very interesting to read. This was my first time reading about the issue of censorship. I had recently wrote an essay about censorship and with the help of this book clearly made it easier for me to understand the issue better.
I thought this book was going to be great since it is always on the teachers' lists of recommended readings. But I felt the story went a bit slow for me. The first half of the book, was not very interesting and it was a little confusing. But in the second half of the book the story really picks up. I would only recommend this book to people who like science fiction.
I got this book to read as a part od the Nerdfighter summer book club, and I am so glad that I bought it. This book is amazing. It is incredible to think that this book was written over 50 years ago and Ray Bradbury pretty much predicted the decrease in book sales and increase in television viewers. This book is awesome and one of the best books I have ever read. It has completely changed the way that I read books and has increased my appreciation for the written word. I highly recommend this book to every single person who is able to read honestly.
This is an amazing book. I decided to read it when I found out that Mr. Bradbury had passed away.Even though it's supposed to be fiction, it seems way too familiar, since unfortunately there are so many people who prefer wasting their lives doing unimportant things rather than spending their time reading.I highly reccomend it.
The irony of this book always slayed me. Here is a book of a future where books are like drugs: outlawed, sold on the black market, and if there's a "library," firemen destroy it. And the added bonus is that the main character, a loyal fireman, has a library! The irony that gets me is that this book is about banning books, yet it is a banned book, so nobody read it! (Ha ha, just kidding folks!)
This is amazing, all predictions and foreshadows came true in our present day lives. Amazing story a must read.
This book is powerful and interesting. It is the future and books are outlawed. Opinion isn't allowed and people are all brainless. In this book a man named Montag must go against the rules and break the law to do what he feels is right. It is indeed a spooky book about a dark future.
I am an avid reader and Ray Bradbury's idea of a book burning society is amazing. I believe this is a must read for 8th graders and up. I was forced to read this book and I am happy i read it!
I had to read this book for my H.S. freshmen english class and enjoyed it more than I thought I would. Bradbury uses a lot of good symbolism in connection with the theme of the novel. I realized that understanding these symbols and reading more into the novel is a necessity for a full understanding of the text and Bradbury's message. On the first quiz my teacher gave me, I got a 70%, but after reading more deeply into the novel (and taking some marginal notes to study from), I received a 100% on the next quiz. Unfortunately, when you look at our society today with all the ignorance, technological advancements, and anti-intellectual behavior practiced by many, you realize that it may end up a dystopia just like the F-451 society in the near future.
This book should not merely by its face value. It is a "good" book on its plot and development alone. Its insight into life, however, knocks it up a step. It is very profound and warns us of an ignorant, entertainment society.
Fahrenheit 451 is a book about a man named Montag. His occupation is being a fireman. When this book takes place, which is in the future, the firemen are making fires for books instead of extinguishing fires. Montag meets a girl that's new to his neighborhood and he walks her home. On the way, he finds out that her name is Clarrise Mclellen. He also found out that she was quite peculiar. Clarisse asked questions like if he was happy.
This book does a fine job at creating a dysfunctional, brainwashed American society of the future completely controlled by a dictator-like government. The story is easy to follow and has the moral of never lossing hope when everything around you feels lost. The book doesn't have too much deep meaning behind it, which means it basically reads out how it reads out. Ray Bradbury is a good author of these types, and provides interesting scenarios for these characters.
I have read this book more than once, when I first read it I had to for school but really enjoyed it. I read it again and even watched the movie, the book is way better. Very good message for those that think books are bad and useless. Books remind us of the past and can help us in our day to day lives.
An interesting story of book censorship and the consequences of mankind if we allow this to get out of had. This version of the book has an interview with the author at the ned which I really enjoyed reading.
This was a fantastic book. Felt like the quality and price were fair as well. I would recommend this book.
I read this book as an assignment when I was 11 or 12, I believe. The reason I write this is because all the moronic kids who were "forced" to read it seem to think it sucks; well, let the record show that not *all* schoolchildren are idiots who must interpret every line of every book literally. I was duly impressed by the book even in 7th grade (?) and it gets better the older I get. The fact that I, an impoverished (well, you know what I mean) teenager, am willing to pay double the price of the book for a signed copy says something.
If you haven't read this book you have to do so now. I know you are thinking its science fiction but once you read it you'll be thinking how can they burn books and kill people who do. You will agree bradbury's ideas. I hope a movie comes out of this book eventhough bradbury doesn't like it.Maybe the book can be remember by a movie.
Very well-written science fiction from 1950. Despite being written before the explosion of modern technology, Bradbury's book-burning story makes many timeless observations about censorship and the suppression of original thought and personal interaction.Bradbury's seashells as earbuds and the parlors with surrounding interactive screens are hardly a stretch to imagine if you have ever competed with an iPod or a flat screen for another person's attention.SPOILER ALERTDespite many hopeless characters and some violent destruction, the ending is optimistic as Montag and his hideout professors devise a way to preserve the classics.
Now this is not just a toy for the boys. Girls can have hours upon hours of fun with this handy dandy little toy. This shoots fun missle shaped foam darts so any girl can pretend to be megaman's sister Roll. She is so cool by far the best charicter yet.
Riding on the coattails of movies such as Halloween, I found terror train to be head and shoulders above most of the early 80's slasher flicks. Its really too bad that most video stores don't carry this anymore. Fans of Jamie Lee Curtis' scream queen days won't be disappointed.
An amazing all star cast show off serious acting chops in a dark drama/thriller told in segments and concentrating on different points of view and experiences revolving around the death of a young woman. Harrowing, moving, and suspenseful, the films draws a sudden and suprising conclusion that is both realistic and shocking. A great character piece that paints complicated portraits of its character both both good, bad, and neurotic. I would describe the film as being very dark but told with such conviction and lack of heavy handiness that it's also very entertaining. Toni Collete as always gives an incredible performance alongside quasi walking legend Piper Laurie, Mary Steenburgen, Giovanni Ribisi, Kerry Washington, and many others including stand out performances by an amazing Mary Beth Hurt and a right on target Brittany Murphy (nobody does almost-insane and/or drugged out better than her). A good film elevated by an amazing cast and inspired performances.
It's definitely one of the best movies I have seen in the past 5 years. Amazing performances, great cast and story.
I'll admit that I only bought this movie because James Franco was in it. I do enjoy his looks, but he is a strong actor that has intrigued me over the years. That being said, his part wasn't the biggest, nor was it the best. He did the best he could with the part given, but his segment (the movie is divided into 5 segments) was mainly focused on Rose Byrne's story. She gives an excellent performance, likely the best in the film.The 4 remaining performances, all centered on women, are held together by strong female performances. I found Toni Collette's part to be the most emotionally touching, and Brittany Murphy does a good job as well. She was a bit over indulgent at times, but I have always admired her acting skills. This movie was no exception.Overall, the movie was pretty depressing. The story was moving and engrossed me, but I can't say that I would recommend it unless you are a die hard fan of one of the actors. The plot is interesting, but the acting is the real story.
This movie is definitely not for everyone. It presents a dark, disturbing reality that left me moved and haunted for several days. The movie is so well made, though, in just about every theatrical aspect, that I have to rate it highly. I usually don't care for a movie that is presented in segments or chapters, but this movie's form of storytelling is masterfully accomplished at the hands of its director. Acting performances are outstanding. I walked away with both a lot of emotions and a lot to ponder after seeing this picture...a sign of excellence in my book. Just don't view this if you are looking for something light or uplifting.
When I rented this movie I didn't realize it was the stories of different women and how one murder links them all. It begins with Toni Collette as a shy caretaker of an abusive old woman. When she finds the body of the murdered woman she is shocked and fascinated. She realizes that life is too short to be sitting in one place letting other people make you feel worthless and she acts. The movie continues with the ME preparing the body. The ME thinks that the dead girl could be her missing sister. Her life and that of her family has been frozen since her sister went missing. Her parents won't accept that their daughter might be dead. This weighs heavily on their remaining daughter who only wants to get on with her life, but this obsession with finding her sister overwhelms her. We also get to meet the dead woman's mother, her roommate, and the dead girl herself. I've never seen a movie quite like this and I found it an interesting character study and mystery.
I really like this movie. It is one that I would stronglyrecommend to my friends and all good movie buffs. It is bestthe first time you see it as there are surprises in it thatyou don't want to know before you see it. Watch this movie.
One of the best....Ramsey Lewis's famous "Wade in the Water" which has been heard in countless film and TV spots truly is one a jazz fan will want in it's entirety.
It's rare that I can find a piece of music that can relax me after a long week and get me grooving at the same time. This CD does it. It also gets my 1 year old son shaking his nappy so strong is the rhythm. Familiar songs given a piano jazz working maybe an ignoramus' view but that's what it is. I am amazed this trio weren't hawked to me as part of a back catalogue release sooner. But this proves there are some musical gems yet to be re-released in the noughties. Ramsay, your public needs you - where are you?
i have an old vinyl of the ramsey lewis trio from college days. it was fun to discover he is still around today (saw him in concert recently) & that i can get all kinds of cds of his wonderful music. i love his older music the best.
I am listening to this right now. I bought it for Henry Gray. Mr.Gray is downhome. You have to like solid blues, his left hand isstraight boogie woogie, right hand Chicago after Big Maceo. I have been playing for 10 years now and this will be a solid addition to my collection of Maceo, Pinetop Perkins, Little Brother Montgomery, and Leroy Carr all my favorites. His voice is strong and clear and his songs good straighforward blues.The other guy on the album is Rudi Richard. He does guitar like somebody who is stuck in 1950. Sort of like a primitive Buddy Holly or Ventures. Not real creative but solid. I would give this album a ***** if it was just Henry Gray. All and all its good for dancing and like early rock and roll.
I haven't tried this yet. But it looks good .. came in a cheap packing, maybe because its a OEM and also the fact that how much can you expect for $2. The shipping and handling were more costly than the actual item. Anyway as one of the review said, it is not different from what is shown on the website and I assume it will also work without any problem ..
This product was delivered by provider on time and the quality is better the original I bought directly from my cell phone provider and way cheaper! The only down side is that the cord is short so it is difficult to talk on the phone while it's charging (unless you are hands free).
Great charger, works fine. Second one I bought but this one does not light up blue like the first one, it only has a small blue LED on the front.
Ordered 2. One worked and the other didn't. Contacted Company who sent another at once. Got it i a few days and didn't have sent the broken one back. That saved me a lot of time. will do more orders with them in the future.
The car charger I ordered and got works great with my phone, but when I got it, it didn't look like the one the seller had pictured. He said it was on OEM. The one I received just had a small blue dot that lit up. The charger does look like it would be an OEM. I read from one seller that the one with the small blue dot was the newer model but I just checked the Motorola site and the one with the all blue glowing top is still the one they show. Reading a review by another buyer on another sellers site I found he had the same problem I did. So you may get the charger that is actually pictured and you may not depending on the seller. (Charger works great the reason for the 4stars and not 5stars is the charger did not look like the one pictured. If you really want what is pictured you may want to ask the seller if it is the one pictured, if you don't care what it looks like and just want one that works good then you can just order it)
Yep. Motorola knows how to make an automobile power cord. Has a convenient on off light that you'll never miss. It's big and bright.
I am very, very pleased with the car charger. It came packed very well and in a very timely manner. The price was great compared to retail stores. No worries now when traveling long distances.
Wish all chargers had coiled cords like this on has, stays out of the way. Very nice looking unit, well made and works great.
Who are these people who beg by the side of the road? What has driven them to so desperate a measure as panhandling? How much money do they collect? Where do they go and how do they live when they are not on the streetcorners? While Bruce Moody's book cannot speak for all street beggars, it does provide a thoughtful and penetrating glimpse into the hidden world of the down and out. In reading this account, one must perforce give up the well-worn cliches and stereotypes about those inhabiting this netherworld. Moody's tale is one of raw adversity, yes, but also one of redemption. The kindness of strangers he encounted in one year is, I daresay, more than most of us will experience in a lifetime. "Will Work For Food or $" shines as a bright beacon of hope through the darkness of despair.
This entire album is great! In particular, "The Chant of the Islands" is a breathtaking song. Its what paradise sounds like.Do yourself a favor and purchase this album.
This game is really fun! The graphics are wonderful,and the buildings and landforms are outstanding looking!But there are some badpoints.When you move your chracter He moves like a slug.The battle system is turn based.Its not melee like the two towers.If you liked the battle system in pokemon then you might like this battle system though.And this game freezes a lot.You could have goten very far and it would just stop!But the fact that you can play as all nine members in the fellowship is REALLY cool!So:Buy it if you like:Puzzels and Organized battles.Don't buy it if:You hate doing missions and thinking.
Well, the game is ok, as long as you don't want to finish it. Most of the game is just wandering around pointlessly to find things and getting lost a lot. The major problem is that at one point Gimli is invisible when you need to talk to him and the fact that every single game freezes up when you try to leave Moria. Other than that it's well.... ok for being Lord of the Rings merchandise.
I am such a huge fan of author J.R.R. Tolkien's wonderful Lord of the Rings book trilogy and I must say that Fellowship of the Ring for the Game Boy Advance is a remarkable adaptation to Tolkien's book trilogy! But, beware of the glitches in this game! I got past them, but it wasn't easy. The game crashes in the Old Forest and the Mines of Moria levels. Other than that, this is a stunning game!
This is by far the best game I have ever played. You may get stuck in the Mines Of Moria ,but this game you won't be able put down! The frist time I played it I played for 7 hours strait!
this game is hard and I still havn't beaten it, and I have had it for two mothes. I reconmend for only skilled players play.DELTA 904thanks for youre time and patience
This game is definetly fun but make sure you rent it before you buy it! There are a couple of glitches but it can be fixed. If you like LOTR then look into this game. If you don't like LOTR you will think this game is a total mess! I love this game but see for yourself.
I have the Plantronics BlueTooth for my cell phone, so when I was looking for a headset for my desk phone I knew that style and size worked for me. The fact that there are different sized ear buds is the key, since everyone's ear is shaped differently. My only complain about this headset is the fact that even though I have made the adjustments stated in the book, sometimes I get an echoing sound (only on my end) when I am talking. This does not always happen.
Our office bought 10 of them and all of them seem to work fine so far, except one, that stalls upon hookup, but seems fine now. Very good reception and clarity.
My grandmother gave me this book when it was first published. I loved it then and I love it now. My grandmother lived in similar conditions and now I am too. Its a wonderful read. Full of laughter and smiles.
I just saw this book at a yard sale, the title caught my interest and I am not sorry I bought it. I enjoyed it so much I bought it for my Daughter-in law's birthday
I've read Dear Mad'm three times and am still amazed at the author's ability to transport me into the Klamath mountains. She skillfully paints a detailed picture of her late-in-life adventures amidst enchanting mountain forest life and people who take care of each other around the mid-1900s. You'll learn a lot about small-scale gold mining, the beautiful plant life of the area and the ability that one can have to change his or her destiny with the simple phrase of, "I'm going to do it!" I hope someone turns this into a movie!
I read this book several years ago,and enjoyed it.I recently reread it after travelling from Yreka to Happy Camp,and realizing what a very remote and wild area it is now,let alone back in the 50s.I was impressed with the courage and physical fitness that the author had at the age of eighty.The book is written in a simple but interesting way.There are surprises throughout!
This is a great PSP UMD Video!!! Includes BOTH Stuart Little and Stuart Little 2 on one tiny PSP UMD!!! Two great family films!!! Will keep the kiddies(and adults too!)entertained for hours!!! Recommended!!! A+
Well made, great tread for walking in snow, sand and standing to work in all day long, I bought these for my partner and he stands at his job all day long and will only wear combat boots. His last pair of combat books were jump boots and the sole did not last. As a former military wife I would never buy anything but a Corcoran boot. The field work boot looks like it will be up to the wear and tear he puts on his footwear plus the soul is thick and has a great tread. We received them in record time to "boot!" THANKS! You cannot CANNOT GO WRONG with Corcoran's no matter what cut or style!
I know this isn't the most helpful review but I would justlike to concur with the other reviews. I have had these bootsfor a year now and except for a few scuffs, they still are ingreat condition.
I had my doubts that I would even like "Baby Oh Baby" due the fact that I saw it advertise in the back of another book that I didn't like, but I took a chance and bought and I am glad that I did. "Baby Oh Baby" is a great story about losing love and finding it again. The one thing that I really liked was the fact that the secondary characters also had a storyline to, that help to contribute to the main story. Can't wait to read more by Robin Wells
"Dreams were nothing but diving boards for disappointment. The higher you climbed, the deeper you plunged." This sentiment could describe my reading experiences this year, until Baby, Oh Baby. In fact, it gets my early, albeit imaginary, vote for Best Contemporary for 2001. The characters were deeply realistic, yet likeble. Jake's return to the fertility clinic ("The clinic was sterile. Just like the patients who came here.") made me choke up. Annie's attention to "signs" and intuition was touching, not silly. Her steadfast resolve not to be second place was admirable: "I want a no-holds-barred, not-holding-anything-back, in-it-with-everything-I've-got kind of love." The ending scene at the courthouse was perfect, and had me singing along..."Baby, oh baby..."
This is one of those rare romance books that just suck you in from the very beginning. There are actually two romances in one in this book. I actually found the secondary romance as good as the main one and that is not easy to find in a book. Usually you find yourself skipping over the second relationship because the first one is so much better.Actually, I think this book would adapt well as a movie. There were enough humorous parts to rival any of today's romantic comedies.If you haven't read this one, you're missing out. I'd give it 10 stars instead of the 5 allowed.
The only reason this isn't a 5-star review is the hefty price. This briefcase is terrific and just the ticket for a baseball loving guy who traded in his glove (but not his love for the game) for a desk. It's heirloom quality and I may well come back in 20 years to give it a full five stars if it ages as well as I expect.
Can't say very much about this.Cord doesn't tangle and there is no noticeable loss in sound quality compared to plugging phones directly in to stereo.
I am very happy with this product. It keep the camera completely dry and still allows full functionality of all the buttons!!
I really like this housing, it's light, easy to use, easy to clean. Takes great underwater pictures from simply snorkeling to deep (30m) diving.
I just had to write and say how wonderful this CD is. The kids and I love it so much. As a matter of fact, I listen to it when the kids aren't even with me! We have purchased it for all of our friends!
A far better book than the BBC movie. i enjoyed it immensely even though it is long. Some of the characters are not real particularly some of the young women
I was happily surprised by this book. Given the snyopses, I expected the usual woman-as-victim-of-cruel-husband trope. Instead, the book presented a complex marriage, with both parties at fault; in fact, to me, the wife was in the wrong and was abusing her privileges for at least three quarters of the novel.The secondary and tertiary characters were well drawn, entertaining, and captivating. Trollope managed to convey myriad nuances of the male-female dynamic, avoiding stereotypes and common topicalities of many Victorian novels.Enjoyed this one a lot.
Video Violence is one of the greatest horror movies ever. Howard and Eli crapped their pants in a bad way. Video Violence is just so tight. Steven has a vicious mullet, and the movie just kicks diaper butt.
I've never seen a film with Judy Dench or Colin Firth in it that I didn't like very much! I would have rated this DVD five stars if it included sub-titles.
As one would expect these producrions are beautifully presented. The quality of the acting is superb. England seems to produce character actors of great skill and presence. I thoroughly enjoyed the variety of themes presented
A gift to myself during the Christmas season. I love Bristish film and this collection contains wonderful choices. Merry Christmas to me!
This set of 8 movies are top notch entertainmentyou will enjoy some great stories with excellent actingso do your self a favor and order this set of movieschfancierFancier of fine movies
I am a great fan of Colin Firth and bought it for that reason. A fortunate purchase because there are some great films that I may have missed.
It was brand new as stated and received very quickly. I love BBC and historical pieces. This is a good one, especially for this price.
I never thought I would get addicted to this book in the way that I did. As a hetero female, I assumed I wasn't the target audience. And I'm not. But that's besides the point. The stories are so engaging, so honest and funny that they transcend gay porn or erotic fiction. They're fascinating stories--a truly spectacular entree into the world of the penis.
At last I found this release on Japanese import. This band originally signed up to the label WRONG AGAIN RECORDS for this release- although unfortunately they went bankrupt and getting hold of this cd has proved a nightmare worlwide due to very little printing!If you dont know NAGLFAR, they play blackened death metal in the typical Swedish variety(ie, like Dissection). This group are a little different though, so they are not completely unoriginal. Most of the music is mid-paced, although fairly brutal with good growling vocals. The group have also added a couple of classical twists in their sound, and this is more thrashy sometimes than the usual stuff I hear!Overall this has very good material, although this can get a bit boring to listen to sometimes. I recommend that if you like the Swedish death/black scene, then buy this release, and the groups latest called DIABOLICAL- which I think is better!cheers!
A very interesting compilation of wonderful performances, from several heavy duties of the prog rock scene in the 90s. The progfest was an amazing opportunity of enjoy our well beloved bands, old and new! The John Wetton Band is at its best in this concert, and also are specially inspired the intervention of Spock's Beard and Arena. The Flower Kings is always a great presence, and watching Le Orme after so many years, was a wonderful surprise.Thanks to the progfest! To have the video is at least a good consolation for all of us who were not able to be there. Only problem is that you want to watch more of the performances!!
I was skeptical about my purchase of Columbia Umatilla Cyberpack,but as soon as the product reached and I opened the box all my doubts were cleared. It is really a "cool back pack" as it has lots of space for all the things which a college/anybody who is always on the move likes to carry.Only disadvantage is that it cannot stand on it's own when you put it on the floor. On the whole I am happy with the product and using it to the fullest.Will recommend this product to anyone who wants to have a back pack for less price and with all those pockets.
An interesting CD which gets better each time I listen..Being used to the basic home grown Cajun style of four or five people standing around an echoey room, the 'Big (ish) band' style of the CD came as a bit of a shock - initially somewhat disapointing.. But now, I love it!
In this book, Pam finds herself having trouble with Lightning that she doesn't know why. Soon, Lightning starts getting more dangerous and gives Pam a couple more bruises. That's when it's decided to get Pam's dad involved, but what's wrong with Pam's Pony? I liked that at the beginning for once that I didn't have a clue what the problem was. Even though I am getting a little old for this series, I like the fact that these books are well written and deserved to be read.
I've been searching for a gamecube game that is like the old style Atari-Like video games I grew up with and here it is! Plus, when you succeed with a pac-man game (not sure how many levels), you are given a bonus game of Pac Man to try which was a wonderful surprise. The galaxia games are pretty much like I remember. Pole Position is still hard for me to maneuver. Also no directions onscreen so plan on figuring out the game for yourself. I love it because it's simple w/ no frills!
This game is simply amazing and flawless! There are some unlockables, and all the games have multi-player action! It's seriouly like a classic arcade, rooled into a updated game system. Before I go on with the posative, I have one just one, the entire reveiw, I promis this is the only negative...In some of the pac-man games, if you play on a small TV (like me) then it's hard to see everything in general.*gasping for air* I'm so glad that negative part is over! Back to the posative!With three totally new games: Pac-man Arrangement, Galaga Arrangement, and Dig-Dug arrangement. These are all great games, that are so much fun!In addition, there are two games you can unlock:1. Pac-attack - Unlock by scoring 20,000 points or more in Pac-man2. Pac-Mania - Unlock by scoring 15,000 points or more in Ms. Pac-ManPros -EverythingCons -Read above
Great item, and I'm enjoying it, thanks! Great sale too! Item came to me very quickly! I'm very happy with my order!
Imagine you're in a pub in Dublin, and a regular has started talking to you. The combined amount of beer in both of you makes it difficult to understand much of what he's saying, but every once in a while there's a moment of clarity where you get it. You laugh not only at what's said but at yourself for the situation you're in. In the meantime you can only stare gape-mouthed at the beauty of the sounds he makes and in hopes that another moment of clarity is near.It is easy to get frustrated with this book if you can't get comfortable with its style.
Don't write a review until you read this and waited.Finnegans Wake takes time to penetrate the mind.At first, it makes no sense. But keep trying, and try, and try...and then you will get its awesomeness.
O.k. this book is unreadable. It is not enjoying and it definitely shows you your limits in all categories. But what power must lie within a text whose first 5 or 6 lines could be the subject of 100 dissertations or 1000s of interpretations that make sense too. Just hand the first paragraph to a student class and let them brainstorm what could be meant by "riverrun,... commodius vicus or recirculation, ...etc." and you will see and feel it.
book cause when you're reading it you're on the other part; they're calling it the levels. I was running earlier when this book came along. Some people in the other room were sleeping until I fell of my chair. That is. It was arguably the best moment because of smiles and of course the "Temper-Chur". Zabadoo-zing song rides twice in the loop. Finnegans Wake is a spectacular
this book is like so cool man i mean it is like watching the spice girls movie cept its in a book i really like it so i think you should buy it
Again, Sr Mary Elizabeth O'Brien has writeen an excellent book. I give this book to nurses when they graduate. It truly puts nurses in an angelic and spiritual perspective which they deserve.
I purchased this book as "used". It is in excellent shape. At the moment I am still reading it. Great.
This book is a solid read and works well as a go-to-guide to spiritual disicplines. The section on journaling is dated, but perhaps you could draw a correltation to bloggin. Either way, it is worth a read.
There is a lifetime worth of practical advice on developing spiritual disciplines. Chapter on Bible Intake 1 & 2, Prayer, Worship, Evangelism, Serving, Stewardship, Fasting, Silence & Solitude, Journaling, Learning and Perseverance in the disciplines.
Any Christian, new or old, needs to read this book! It will absolutely change the way you go about life!
It is interesting but these nurses are very naughty. Gives nurses a bad reputation. No wonder the countries in these regions look up us as immoral.
This faucet had a very nice manifold. It was extremely compact and very heavy. The finish on the hardware was good quality.
I'm not really sure what to rate this card for I am having trouble installing the drivers. From what I hear it is a great "budget" card and is worth the price. Installation was easy to a point... Getting the card in was a snap but for some reason I had a great deal of trouble getting the drivers installed. After I finished installing them my computer would freeze, sometimes I'd even get a confusing error sign. So my suggestion is, if you've never seen the inside of a computer and have some cazy idea that its going to blow up if you touch it, then get a professional to do it...
The comfort, the ease of use, and finally, a protective surface for my tender lap that was being burned off by the heat of laptop! Lapinator to the rescue!I'll be honest, this isn't my first lapinator. I have bought two before and used them for meetings. When I got a new house, I had to have one for here too, so I got the ultimate! With a mouse holder! Way cool and good for either righties or lefties! :)I've tried them all, every product to protect my privates, and this is the only one I'll trust my tender thighs to!
It really works! This is my second one. I have the smaller one at my boyfriend's place. My laptop gets hot since it is a 12" with a touchscreen. And I can really tell the difference. I give it 4 stars because it isn't the most comfortable for a lap but it isn't uncomfortable. I would really give it 4.5. And the mouse piece is great. Don't need it with the plus and small laptops but definitely need it for the smaller lapinator. JustMake sure you put the border on or the mouse slides off. The border foam is included. I bought two so I do love this product. It may have a silly name but it definitely works!
I read a reveiw on here from a customer named xtestosteronexsupplimentsx and he seemed to think that Hatebreed stole their sound from such non-hardcore bands as Slipknot and others. Well, seeing that Hatebreed was formed in the early 90's I don't see how that could be. Sorry man, but you just don't know. Hatebreed is a brutal hardcore band with in-your-face hard hitting riffs and relentless vocals. I love the music of Hatebreed. Being a Christian I do find some of their lyrics confrontational but the music is great. It can get a bit repetative but nonetheless good. This band is for those who enjoy true hardcore, not what has recently been attributed as hardcore (for example bands like Korn, Slipknot, Kid Rock....these are pop bands that are very heavy...not hardcore bands. hardcore is different). If you have any comments just write me an e-mail.
I bought this cd when it first came out. It has not left my cd player yet. The only problem is that it's kinda short. But I can deal with that because it's heavy. The bigger problem is that I haven't heard of them touring. I hope they do!
Im ussualy into something much more brutal & insane & gore then the likes of hatebreed but i can't deny tha fact that i enjoy their music alot! I seen this guys at ozzfest & i did enjoy their performance alot & i just like how their music attracts all kinds of people...Some how that makes me like them even more! I quess that's hatebreed for you! Okay, hatebreed's new album "rise of brutaly" as well as the one before that "perseverance" are also pretty amazing in itslef...Support hatebreed!PS: I hate the fact that they put slipknot in the same category as hatebreed...F*ck slipknot--they suckkk!!!!!!! Only posers listing to slipknot,f*ck 'em!
Wow!!! Just insane and just how I like it. NO rapping. No singing. No slow parts!!!!! It is short but it still well worth it!!! Closest thing to what they sound like is probably Soulfly. EVERY SINGLE TRACK IS GOOD!!! I cant even say that about Slipknot! Although, Slipknot is the best band out there. Another band to check out is Mudvayne!!
This doesn't mean its bad, its simply mainstream. I mean, they dont bother tagging those on unless it is a widely known band. Hatebreed are not fanpleasers, great live, and have strangely undertstandable vox on this album. They've got the emotion many bands with the same formula lack, and thats what set them apart from others. They've got the feeling of hxc and the temps of mxc. It's not so much a blend of the two, but their own interpretation of both. This is beyond mediocre, but its not going to blow you away. They have more talent but this is the sound they like and their slight maturing of their sound is what keeps them going strong. This is what people see as a defining album, but its nothing of the sort, it simply excels at what its set out for. Breakdowns designed for the mosh it seems, if you get into it.
People call themselves a huge Hatebreed fan, but they don't have this, let alone the fact that they have probably never heard any of the 25 minutes of brutality that is Hatebreed's indie-debut. I won't say their new stuff sucks (it rocks), but this is even better. Go down to a Newbury comics or somewhere where you can find some great underground metal and check it out, especially if you like Perseverance or Rise Of Brutality.
This CD works wonders on people. If I had to fight Mike Tyson, I would make sure to have this CD with me before the fight. This CD is sick. My dog likes it, too.
All I know of this book is that it has a lot of family history, and it is very hard to find. I've heard that it is available in limited viewing at Saint John The Baptist Catholic church in Johnsburg Illinois but couldn't find it. In any case if you can find it I'm sure it will cost an arm and a leg.
Many piano-vocal reductions for musicals are completely different from the original score. This one stays surprisingly true, though the left hand is missing a lot of interesting rhythms, and not many vocal harmonies are present. The keys of all songs are the same as the movie, and all intros, choruses, and verses are intact. Some of the interludes and dances are shortened or omitted, however. If you're looking for the karaoke CD, try iTunes.
"Born to Pull" is vintage Bob Cary, maybe his best work ever. As always the question is, is it Cary's marvelous prose or his illustrations that make this book great? Wait. It's illustrated by someone else - Gail de Marcken. But Bob, please don't try to tell us you had no hand in the art work.Even if the reader is a die-hard dog sled fan there are things to be learned in this book. Even die-hard Cary fans will be moved by the stories of mushers and their dogs.This is a beautifully put-together book. It even feels good to hold. The centerpiece is the collection of great stories. Cary lets his subjects speak for themselves as he guides the reader through the details; he is the master of this technique.Five paws up.
In truth, I thought the end was here for Van Damme--his last few films were uninspired, humourless, shameless retreads of better films by worse actors. But Legionnaire redeems his oeuvre by ignoring him throughout much of the film, giving the best lines and most of the drama to a group of relatively unknown but excellent character actors. The editing is flawless, and let's face it; no director ever went broke by ripping off Lawrence of Arabia. I love Van Damme films, and I'm telling everybody to rent it because it's not a true Van Damme picture.
I grew up loving movies and books about the Foreign Legion; the misfit recruits, the brutal sergeants, the doomed stand against the odds in a lonely desert fort. So it was with some trepidation that I watched "Legionnaire". I had never previously watched a movie starring Jean-Claude van Damme, and I am no fan of martial arts movies. Would he mess it up with pointless anachronisms, a legionnaire/kick boxer? But I was happily surprised by this movie. All of the basic elements of a good Foreign Legion movie were present and the production values were first rate. The cast was strong, with all of the standard stereotypical misfits becoming Legionnaires with the Legion's "Marche ou creve" spirit. This film is by no means movie as great art, but it's solid, well done and entertaining. Movie as comfort food. I loved it.
VAN DAMME shows his another aspects through this movie. it contains humanity, friendship, frustration, and some good fight scenes. It is very worth seeing.
This is a very good Van Damme movie. It is not his best movie. But I would have to say it was his best acting. Great action scenes.
Van Damme scores big in this movie. Finally he has picked a movie with a decent supporting cast and a good story. Unlike previous films, Van Damme's kickboxing and martial arts skills are blended nicely with real life situations and drama. This movie deserved a theatrical release, the action is tasteful and the movie has a quick but meaningful pace. Some of the characters have some tired dialogue about being presecuted, but that aside the actors fit their roles. Overall the movie ranks among one of Van Dammes better emotional roles. Lionheart has the same tug on the heart strings, as well as the Legionaire angle.
I went the store and i saw this movie on the counter and they had Van Damnes pic on it so i got it,i watched it,I wasnt pleased,i mean the movie was excellent,but where in the hell is Van Damnes high flying kicks,I am like a huge fan of Van Damne.This is like the only movie i didnt see him do his fancy kicks.This movie is worth watching,but if u wanna see his kicks dont get this one.
I heard the reason why this one didn't get a theater releases was because Van-Damme's previous ;"Knock-Off" was a dud. "Legionnaire" is definitely one of his best. The movie has a great story that is very beautifully shot, with action sequences that are reminiscent of "Glory" and "The Young Indiana Jones Chronicles" The supporting cast also lends great acting and overall this movie must not be overlooked. This aint your usual "kick-butt" Van-Damme film , but very much better. Give this film a chance and you'll see why it deserves a theatre first audience. Also the DVD is well done with animated menus and tons of historical footage and documentaties about the Foriegn Legion.
It's a shame this movie didn't have a theatrical release. It's one of the best Foreign Legion flicks around, and if its a bit short on plot it more than makes up for it with some very solid action sequences. Van Damme plays a 1920s boxer excaping to the Legion after double-crossing a crooked boxing promoter and losing his girlfriend in the process. The very-overated "Beau Geste," by comparison, is definitely a better story-line, but Gary Cooper was way too old to play the title role and he's too wooden. Admittedly, Van Damme might not win an Oscar but he does a very good job as part of a solid ensemble cast of lesser-known actors playing the usual riff-raff joining the FFL: a black America, an Italian, a German, and a mysterious Englishman. Overall, see this one and "March or Die," with Gene Hackman. It, too, has some great action sequences. "Legionnaire" is a good movie!
You don't watch Van Damme movies for the acting, realism or historical accuracy.With good reason.However, some predictable clichés and highly unlikely events aside, this film is pretty decent, has lots of action -which is what Van Damme does best - and is worth having if you're a Legion fan.
This is not the typical chop-socky Van Damme flick. Heck, Van Damme doesn't even do his crescent kick, his cherished trademark. Instead, it's a war movie about the French Foreign Legion in 1925 that is sent to war in Africa. Van Damme plays Alain, a fugitive boxer who signs up with the Legion as a way of escape from gangsters. This all happens within the first 10 or so minutes. The large bulk of the film has Alain befriending his fellow legionnaires and learning the values of friendship even in a time of war. True, this movie is rather predictable and many of the characters seem cliche, but the cinematography, score and (surprisingly) acting are all above average. Even Van Damme pulls off a convincing performance, proving that when he's given a good script, he can be believable. The reason this $40 million film was never released in theaters was because of its downbeat ending. Don't be fooled by its direct-to-video nature, though. This is a good one for the war/action fan.
I bought this as a gift for a friend who has a 70# lab-shar-pei mix. Even though this dog's head is a bit smaller than the one pictured on the front of the product, it fit perfectly and my friend has seen great results in her walks with her dog, who used to pull like mad, but is now behaving really well thanks to this little contraption.
After our new furry family member chewed through two of the Gentle Leader collars in three months, I went in search of something new. We have had this collar now for over nine months and it is still in one piece. The nose loop does not slip off like with the other collar, so he can't eat it! And even if he managed to do so - the material is thicker and stronger. Our dog is a 75 lb lab/bulldog mix, who can out-pull me or my husband on a standard neck collar. But this head collar really minimizes his ability and desire to pull. I can control him with two fingers on the leash - HUGE difference! LOVE this one!
I bought the Halti brand first... This brand is better... has a soft piece of material that goes over the nose of your pet.. This is the best thing I could have purchased for my dogs.. It DEFINITELY WORKS... I have 2 strong-willed Boxers that try to control me... but this product is a lifesaver... Thank you, thank you, thank you !!!!
Purchased the small for our 27lb Jack Russell. He was constantly pulling with a standard collar - to the point where quick-pulling back on him to correct him looked like animal abuse. He initially tried to back out of this collar, but got used to it fairly quickly. He does try to paw at it from time to time, but only when we're not moving, (ie, when he has time to think about it). We had one of these years ago for a lab that pulled like a freight train. They work. Now we have very calm walks.
I knew from reading other reviews that the sizing runs large. The company suggested a size 3 for my 40 lb English setter, so I ordered the 2 based on reviews. It's still too big! I can't believe we need a size 1. Otherwise, I love the design. Much better than the premiere gentle leader, which slides up the nose into the eyes and rubs.
Definitely too big for my 10 pound yorkie. I was able to tighten it around her neck by sewing it and now it works great. It takes a while for the dog to get used to but makes such a difference when walking her!
Tycho is twice the size of a normal Shiba, currently 38 pounds and purebred. He's a rescue, re-homed due to his anxiety issues getting him into trouble. This head halter gives us confidence that we can keep him under control no matter how scared he gets or how many delicious cats he sees. Tycho does know how to throw off the head halter when he's upset, but that doesn't matter. The halter is securely connected to his collar, and by the time he's tossed one, we've caught him by the other and he's safely under control.If you have concerns about pulling during walks or your dog slipping his collar, this is a great solution. It may take a couple tries to get the right size, but the effort is well worth it.
My dog is a puller and I being a petite woman with a bad back found it difficult walking my spunky 65 lb lab. Prior to purchasing the Holt, I had been using the Gentle Leader from Premier and truly liked it. Both collars are similarly designed. The only dislike I had with the Gentle Leader was with the nose loop. It didn't have the supportive cushion my dog required leaving her skin very raw.The Holt collar is designed with a cushioned nose-band which adds extra protection.What I did appropriate with the Premier Gentle Leader was the informative DVD they provided that instructed how to properly fit the collar to the dog and how to properly use it.Transitioning between the two leaders was minimal to nothing. I would recommend either one of these products, they are a life saver!!!
really work as they said it would instant control. nice walking a dog that doesn't pull you off your feet the moment you go out the door. longer walks more at ease
This dog walking collar really made a difference. My dog was pulling alot and I wasn't enjoying the walk. I couldn't wait to get home from the walk. Now, we go sometimes twice the distance we used to as she is not pulling. There is a side piece that hangs down that sometimes my dog can put her paw through and get the collar off. But I have started wrapping that piece around her neck collar so that doesn't distract her. I would definitely recommend this collar if you have a dog that pulls during their walk.
What a great invention! Not only it fits on my doberman/german shepherd mix dog, it also works! My dog tends to pull during the walk, especially when she sees another dog. This training collar distracts her from pulling because it is positioned under her mouth. She did not like it initially and tried to take it off, but then she concentrated on the walk itself.Another nice feature of this collar is that it is adjustable in the front under her nose, so if it is hot outside and the dog has to pant she can open her mouth.The collar is supposed to attach to a regular collar that the dog wears all the time, although I used it as a single collar on my dog.
This walking collar has the greatest design. I do not have to have great upper body strength to control my excited boxer. She walks next to me like she is supposed to. No more pulling me down the street. Bravo
I cannot estimate the endless fortune this will save me. I have a SLR and developed my own film, till I got so tired of the darkroom and the cost! Still, having it developed even from 'quickie' mail order sites cost a fortune. Worse, when you are trying to take a good picture of kitty and she goes zoom zoom zoom and ruin nearly a whole roll of film you want to scream. With this, pop it into my camera and click all day. I held on to my SLR for so long because I felt there was no way something so simply could have such quality! Wow!the colours are true, the images brilliant and SO SHARP. Too a picture of kitty four foot away and you could see a flea on her nose in the picture!Get a good camera like the Fuji FinePix 2800 Zoom, get one of these cards and takes 100s of pictures. It puts the fun back in taking pics!!
As an SG1 fan, I enjoyed the episode very much. People new to the series might have some trouble keeping up; however, isn't that what the DVD sets are for<Grin>.I can't wait for the next one... (That's a HINT!)
A real action-packed adventure. There's never a dull moment in Stargate Continuum. I'd love to give you more details but seeing how it hasn't been released yet, today is July 3rd, I don't want to spoil it for my fellow Stargate brothers and sisters.This is definitely a must have for your collection. You won't be disappointed, at least not much. However, I didn't like how one character had to make a sacrifice in the end. Aside from that, I'm very happy with this movie.
I hope they keep making these direct-to-DVD Stargate films. The TV show was outstanding and I loved all ten seasons. The previous "Ark of Truth" direct-to-DVD movie was terrific and this one maintains the high production quality, storyline and acting.Somehow, they managed to get practically all of the actors portraying the various heros and villians over the years back together for the story. For example, there are lots of cameos by all the best "System Lords" we loved to hate in the TV show.If you're a Stargate fan, you won't want to miss this.My only regret is that I just bought the DVD last week for $15 at Best Buy when I could've rented it here for $3.99, but at least the DVD includes a few hours of bonus material about the production.Two Kentucky thumbs up to the Stargate cast and crew!
If you are a fan of the Stargate series and want to see an end to the series as a movie this is a great movie and a must see and I got this fast after ordering it.
It was a good movie for sci fi people who have already seen the stargate series. came to our house quickly
Wonderful movie to close the stargate sg1 saga. A must see for your whole family. Guaranteed wonder and amusement once again
A nice conclusion to SG1. It was great to see RDA back. It cleared up the last open issue left from TAOT.
This review contains spoilers. Do not read if you don't want to know what's in the film.I liked the move because I love Stargate. I love its characters. However,---The movie was completely lacking in emotional exploration of the characters. Delving into the character impact of separation and isolation in an alternate reality, and in the case of Daniel, the loss of a limb, might have added 10 minutes of time, but it would have significantly improved the movie. I'm tired of lazy, sloppy writing. Stargate is a great show for its themes and characters (and actors, all of them) but it has been poorly treated by its writers. This show needs to be given to someone else, someone who gives a d@#m about art.
A fan since the beginning I've seen every show there was..loved the final 2 hour wrap up of StarGate, even if you never watched a show, this would be fun for some who like Sci-Fi! I enjoyed several of the fun things Ben Browder slipped in while taking Command of the starship... and the fact that many of our past "bad guys" come back for one last peek.. Love owning this... nothing like a rainy day with some snacks and a great Stargate to watch!
Loved seeing Jack again, this is for all of the stargate addicts! I'm not a big fan of the new SG1leader but the movie is still a good watch
What a great addition to the SG-1 series. This is one of the best stories of the series. I've watched it twice and am eager for a third time.It's great to see Jack back, of course. The story line kept me guessing, and the action scenes were very good and not overdone. The CG is absolutely amazing and fits in without looking gimicky.This movie really brought me back to the feel of the first few series, yet we have characters that span all 10 series. I think everyone from the writers, actors, and production crew were spot on with this movie.
When I saw it first time I was under the impression that I was looking at some Oscar prize movie so I had to seen it once more just after ending... Sometime after first 25-30 minutes of the second view I realize that is on DVD... so no Oscar, too bad. It's better than the "ARK", better than "Children of the Gods" sometimes better than first one "Stargate" (Kurt Russel). Rick is great again, as usual... What can I say, it's not only for Stargate fans, it's for anyone and anything...It's just great. And I guess right now O'Neill asked ... what?!
Really enjoyed this. Got it a couple of weeks ago and have watched it twice already, actually did a whole SG1 thing with this film and The Ark of Truth this past weekend, told the wife is was all based on fact, so she left me alone. Sure hope this is not the end of it all. Anyway this film and 'The Ark of Truth' are well worth the money and you will not be sorry you bought them.
From the opening scene, until you realize the movie is already over, this is a great film. Very well done, and worthy of having in a collection for Stargate SG1 junkies!
The entertainament quality is above the average of the series SG1. I think this film reached the quality level of Stargate Atlantis.
I was very upset when they took this series off the air. I'm glad to have these movies but still wish the series was still around, Love this movie.
If you are a Stargate fan, then this movie is a must for you. When a couple of the team begin to disappear into thin air the remaining team hits the Stargate and end up in a 20th century when the Stargate has not yet been invented. We have all of our favorite and familiar characters who, of course, go to the North Arctic and Russia to find the frozen Stargate, make things work allowing them to return to their own time and things are made right and all is right with the world. We watched this as a Prime Member free through our computer/TV 60" monitor. Wonderful.
Another SG-1 mega-episode keeping with the SG-1 tradition. If you liked the TV show, this should also please you. It wasn't something that would do well at the movie theater, but for the price, it is a great night's entertainment. Enjoyable. Sad to see some of the actors in their last SG-1 role (General Hammond, for example), and nice to see some of the other actors from the privious episodes that we haven't seen for a LONG time. I recomend it.
i have the entire stargate sg-1 box set and the ark of truth movie... this one is my favorite!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!! the continued story line of the evil but suave gould Bal is just so well crafted and keeps you on the edge of your seat/sofa/bean bag... what ever your setting on:) if you are a huge sg-1 fan, you have to watch this!
Movie arrived quickly. Just as good as new. A+++++++Surpassed my expectations. Bought the movie cheaper than what I could have rented it.
It was a very enjoyable movie, nice to see so many familiar faces, even if some only make a cameo appearance, like Colin Cunningham.I liked the story, timetravel & alternate realities are always fun. Good quality picture and very impressive scenes on the Arctic. I hope we get to see of these movies. Good to see Don S Davis once more as General Hammond, we will miss him.
SG1 Continuum, is a great movie. The CGI is flawless and over all a great movie. I hope it isn't the last MGM does.
This is my first rice cooker...it was rated one of the best as I did my research and decided to buy based on feedback from other owners. I must say that I totally agree with the majority of owners, its a fantastic product. The cooker is easy to use, easy to clean and delivers a reliable pot of rice every time. I have no idea what would make a cooker better, but for the average person, I doubt you will need anything more than this...you can have TOTAL confidence that you made the right choice when you hit the 'add to cart' button.
A little small for a crowd, but for a small family a perfect rice cooker. Makes perfect rice and super easy clean up.Better than my last cooker all the is rice cooked evenly and keeps the rice warm without making it crunchy on the bottom.
This is one of the best electrical items that I have in my home. It cooks steel oatmeal as well as rice. All these cooked perfectly. It is a breeze to clean and is small and portable. I loved it so much I bought one for my married daughter in Minneapolis. AND she loves it too. I use it at least 2-3 times a week.
Very easy to use...and a good size. Only negative is cleaning the back and top 'valve' area.
I've always cooked rice in a saucepan on a stovetop before but got tired of the pan bubbling over all the time. This cooker is great. It is capable of making quite small amounts of rice too. I routinely cook about one-half a cup of rice in it and it turns out great. Brown rice needs to be soaked for six hours or longer prior to cooking or it really won't turn out very good but that is usually recommended anyway. I use one rounded half-cup brown rice that has been soaked, rinsed and drained, and two-thirds cup water, letting it stand for fifteen minutes while still covered after the cooking cycle is complete. It turns out fluffy and perfect every time. Very easy to clean too, just a quick wipe of the inside cover with a damp sponge, pop out the steam vent and rinse it off, and wash the inner basin with a non-abrasive sponge or cloth. I couldn't possibly be happier with this cooker, I use it nearly every day.
The only problem that I have with this rice cooker is that the directions were not written very well. Once we deciphered the instructions, the Sanyo has been great to use.
Almost anything would have been an improvement over the Aroma rice cooker my new Sanyo replaces. It's easy to use and produces consistently excellent rice every time - and as I was raised by a Japanese mom, I'm kind of a snob in this regard. I agree with complaints that the unit's design doesn't accommodate easy cleaning, but if cleanup is done immediately after each use, it's not too much of a chore. If you allow the accumulated starch to dry in the nooks & crannies around the lid & the closure, it'll be a royal pain.
Had a basic B&D cooker before, this is one step up from that IMO. The size is nice to have more leftover rice for the next dinner. It is easy to clean but the switch sometimes doesn't work and twice the rice wasn't cooking, just on warm. So now I just double check 5-10 min after. Works well for brown rice.
It's easy to use. It's easy to clean up. Functions are simple to understand. I haven't had it for long, so, I don't know anything about it's durability yet.
Very easy to use while you are preparing the rest of your meal. Trouble free operation is the key word here.
i'd read/ researched much before purchasing this item. checked "Consumer Reports" as well as read many reviews about his particular model. most were helpful/ spot on: this is probably the best little bugger out there on the market today for the price (which we thought was reasonable). i'd have given 5/5 stars be it not for the pesky, little, plastic condensation capturer-thingy-device on the back of the unit. it does its job OK but is a bit of a struggle to get re-situated in place after emptying, cleaning, etc. it cooks rice to perfection, clean-up is a breeze, etc. however, the plastic spoon that comes w/ the product doesn't fit very well into the resting "slot" affixed to the side of the top lid. other than those two, slight "inconveniences", the product is terrific.
Being Japanese-American, I have been raised around rice cookers since birth. The old models my family used had the lid bobbing on the steam being generated; the rice was perfect regardless. The "fancy" models now being sold for over a $100 are overkill. This machine follows the "KISS" principle to a T. While the lid doesn't bobble anymore due to the vent, it works fine. The only thing keeping it from 5 stars is that I cannot see the water level markings. They are the same color as the non-stick coating.
This is my first rice cooker. Always used the stove top method before. I only cook for two so this little cooker is perfect. It wipes up with a wet paper towel. It does not seem to be made for cooking large quantities of rice. some of the reviews complain about it being hard to clean, i'm guessing they cook large quantities and it boils up onto the top of the cooker.It is perfect for two people. I'd buy it again.
Before your first time of cooking, you have to hold the rice cook in your chest and wash the inside of the lid under hot water from the tap. I didn't do that until my third time cooking. The first two were terrible with my cooked rice filled with awful plastic smell. After I washed the lid with flowing hot water from the tap, I don't get any plastic smell in my rice any more. The manual should have that instruction. Also I tried to cook my porriage with the lid shut, it is also OK. So far I'm satisfied with it. If it has timing, it would be perfect.
Cooks rice (including brown rice) very well. I also tried quinoa and that came out well too. It is very easy to operate and clean. Only problem is that the exterior gets quite hot.
There aren't too many English-language histories of inter-war Poland, so this book is very welcome. It is easy to read and provides many interesting details on subjects (often regarded these days as obscure) such as inter-war Danzig and Poland's troubled relations with Lithuania and Cezchoslovakia. In many ways, it is popular history more than academic history: it has little to say on the inter-war economy and social structure of Poland. Its account of Polish diplomacy could be a little more rigorous, but the author, though clearly sympathetic to Poland, does not flinch awkward facts. One drawback is that the book hardly draws at all on modern research.
This album probably ain't worth the 4 stars I gave it, but damn it I just like Musiq. His music is so damn soothing, it just calms me down no matter what mood I'm in. He gets love for this album just like the other ones I own. Plus, the boy gets more and more like Stevie Wonder everytime I here him. Everything on this cd lives up to his artistic vision. He has features from some other philly soulstars like Bilal, and one of my personal favorite characters, ATL's Cee-Lo. The top tracks on this are Forthenight, Momentinlife, Dontstop, Soulstar, and Womanopoly. Womanopoly especially caught my ear, cause when I heard he had a song playin on Monopoly the game, I thought it would be cake. And I wasn't feelin it at first but it grew on me cuz it's so catchy and original.
This is the first album I've heard from Musiq and my breath was taken away. The man of neo-soul created a great 3rd album. With songs like Whereareyougoing, Youloveme, Womanopoly, Thereason, there is no doubt that Musiq is music's prodigal son.
I have to say that this Musiq's best cd so far. His lyrics are just so...real. Unlike rappers... he doesn't sing about the same thing over and over...he sings about real situations....like is "babymother" OMG I LOVEEE that song...KEEP IT UP MUSIQ!!!!
I have to disagree with all the naysayers of this album. I feel that Musiq was trying to reach out and experiment with some of these tracks. "Momentinlife" was a nice collaboration with Kindred and Cee-Lo, though I felt "Dontstop" really wasted the potential energy that could have been shared between Musiq's crooning and Bilal's ethereal falsetto. "Forthenight" seems like your classic loverman-get-them-out-the-club-and-into-the-bed type of song, but Musiq is so polite it seems only natural to go with him. Best track of all is "Givemorelove/leaveamessage"(thanks to the sample from Tom Scott, which I did buy to hear the original). I'm only waiting for the next LP.
When I first bought this album, I wasn't sure how I felt about it, unlike my immediate love for the first two. But recently I had the pleasure of seeing Musiq in concert and he made me go and reevaluate/rediscover this classic that I had been sitting on since it first came out!! The entire album from beginning to end is very well put together. Out of the 15 tracks, 11 of them are my favorites. Musiq, keep doing what you do best!!
Soulstar, Soulchild, whatever, just keep the Musiq COMING!!! Musiq is a talented, original artist. Not in an eclectic Erykah Badu kind of way, but more like a Curtis Mayfield. Shucks this CD is so good that the first time I listened to it in my car I stopped at the package store to get a pint of Hennessy.... It's old school brown liquor GOOD!!!! Like a good vintage wine, it keeps getting, better & better with each listen.... His creativity with the Monopoly game in "Womanopoly" is sick!! Fantasia can have her "Baby Mama" anthem, Musiq keeps it real with "Babymother"! Aijuswanalisen!!!
This album was recommended to me by several Musiq fans. And after having it in my cd player for the last 3 days I have to admit that it is a great cd. However compared to his first album it is not his best work. The topics chosen were not as deep as on the first cd and all the guest singers on "Soulstar" were not necessary. Other than that I would recommend this cd along w/ his first. If you bought it you wouldnt be dissapointed.
Pleasantly surprised. Having missed the hype (if there was any) on this album, I purchased it because I own the previous two. Out of the 6 CD's I purchased, it's of the top two. He's original, his lyrics are interesting, music to make you think and move at the same time. Love it.
All of the people that gave Musiq 5 stars are just die-hard Musiq fans. Although I enjoyed this album, it definitely fails in comparison with his other albums. Musiq, who is usually very deep and profound with his lyrics and sends out a thought provoking messages doesn't quite do that this time. He definitely could have kept the single entitled babymother, I mean the title alone speaks for itself. I must say after being a gigantic fan of aijuswanaseing and juslisen, I must reluctantly admit that this one does not reach the bar that I know he can reach. Don't let this discourage you because this is a good album, just not as good as the others.
I love this main. He is the Stevie of our time. His music remains soulful and is entrenched with meaning. I love the beats and lyrics. He continues to explore more of what soul music is, and can be.The intro is bangin'. I love #5 and #10 especially. I can honestly put all 3 albums in rotation and be entertained for hours. Cop this album!
At first I didn't really care for this album, but after a couple of listens, I love it. Neo-soul is here to stay and Musiq is the greatest. My favorite tracks are Womanopoly, Babymother, Who Knows, and so on. This cd is hot and I can't wait for the next one.
Musiq has put to together one solid project with his third effort Soulstar. The album is incredibly self assured and focused. It is rare that I enjoy a CD on first listen, but Soulstar is worthy of such recognition. In addition the use of guest stars such as Cee-lo and Kindred on Momentinlife and Carol Riddick on Soulstar do not seem forced, but a well throughout and executed idea. As I said in the review over a year ago for Juslisten, It took a while for it to grow on me. Soulstar grabbed me on first listen, and I plan to continue to hear what Musiq has to say.
These games play EXACTLY like the original versions I used to play in the old arcade days.Same graphics, sound effects, strategy, etc.Exact ports of the originals.
All the cute and not-so-cute characters are here: Lady, Tramp, the Darlings, Aunt Sara, Si, Am, Jock and Trusty, and they follow the story line of the movie exactly, which is O.K. But there's no "Oh Wow" factor with the pop-ups or pull tabs. This book made me realize that I loved this movie, not just for the story, but for the sweet voice of Lady and those wonderful lullabies. A very well made book that should last through many, many readings.
A great movie, fast, moving, totally capturing. It makes you think, it makes you dance, it makes your heart beat faster, and most important of all it makes you realize how important "a second" of lifetime can be and how it can change everything.
I mean, it's bloody amazing--there is absolutely NOTHING to this film, yet it somehow manages to be utterly compelling. Almost the entire film consists of Lola, um, running. Indeed, the few less-frenetic scenes really do little more than get in the way. But for the most part it's pure action, and it works. And this from someone who, as a rule, finds action films insufferably tedious. The direction is indeed to be commended for so rarely letting up. The soundtrack's perfectly done also--and this from someone who, as a rule, violently dislikes industrial techno. I get the impression that if anything had been done even slightly wrong, the entire film would have fallen apart--but nothing IS, really. As I said, it really doesn't have a helluva lot of substance, but it sure is a rush to watch.
A well done ground hog day type movie. A very well done movie, that keeps up the interest all the way through.
I first saw this film in a film class in college and from that point on I knew I had to have it. It probably isn't one of the best films out there, but it is worth the watch. I'd go over more about the movie, but I'd end up giving to much away.
This film made my heart stop. I subconsciously held my breath in parts, for fear of disturbing its incredible movement and beauty. What an innovative succession of events! Just when you think it's over, Lola stuns you again. Watch this film ALONE. Pay attention. The first experience is key.
To the beat of an incessant techno/deephouse soundtrack, Lola runs, and then runs some more. I couldn't possibly think of another movie with such sheer cinematic buzz, it's cut like an MTV video: blink and you may miss a visual gag.The theme is doozy but interesting -- a slicing of the same reality in time into three perspectives. Blending an innovative mix of animation, still photography, slow motion, and normal cinematography, it illustrates how the smallest change in what a person does can alter the rest of their life, not to mention the lives of others, including complete strangers they pass on the street.Ironic, creative, and simply riveting -- a fabulous kinetic pleasure of a rental. The breathless high-octane soundtrack should be in your dance collections too.
The best film of 1999 in my opinion. It made me think, it held me spellbound, it leaped off the screen, and it was totally fresh. I was very disapointed when it was not nominated for best foreign film by the Academy of Motion Picture Arts and Sciences.
Run to your neighborhood rental house and rent it! What a wonderful contemporary film.
Lola needs to get hold of 100,000 Deutschmarks because her boyfriend Manni left a bag of money on the subway (or light rail). If she doesn't get it in 20 minutes, he will rob the store near the phone booth where he called her. The money belongs to a gangster who will kill Manni if he doesn't get the cash.There are three different scenarios on Lola's mad dash to rescue her boyfriend. It shows how each encounter with people changed their lives.I liked it because it was different from any movie I've seen. It got a little too far out with the very brief moments she brushed by people. But the main parts of the story was good.Well, great idea for a script. Just needed a little tweaking.
The only thing upon which I can agree with the previous viewer is that the character of Manni is indeed a bit annoying--not too bright, and all too willing to blame Lola for his own predicament. This film is so taught, however, that it hardly matters.Run Lola Run is imaginative, mesmerizing, and take-your-breath-away exciting. The amazing visuals work perfectly with an outstanding soundtrack and a highly engaging storyline to create a truly exquisite film experience. Highly, highly recommended!
I saw this one Friday night and soon after bought the dvd. The other reviews give you a plot breakdown, but I will mention a few things I really like. Filmed in Germany(West Berlin) maybe, and lots of outdoor city locations. I have only viewed the sub-titled version, and it works great. A couple dialogue- heavy scenes which require some reading, but not too taxing. I do have a thing for most things German, so I like hearing the language. Also a fine soundtrack in this film! Techno and pulsing, watch this on a home theatre or with a high quality audio system. It really adds to the experience imho. Plus I enjoyed the little "snapshot" stills that Twyker throws in along the way. Very cool.Some negative reviewers say they didn't get the film and it was repetitive. Just go along for the ride and enjoy the sights and sound. In my opinion this is a real good way to spend an hour and a half. Try it out! Thanks for reading my sort of disjointed review.
"Run Lola Run" is a masterpiece so unlike a movie - a movie in the traditional sense, that is, that it's difficult to follow at first. On second and later viewings, it can be viewed for the marvel that it is. It is ingenious in its subtle nuances of passing characters and seemingly throwaway moments that turn out to be so much more, and build the suspense and anticipation, as well as the opprtunity for brilliant twists, throughout the movie. The pulsating sound-track is a stroke of genius, and falls right in step with the relentless pacing of the movie. If you are intolerant of unusual or innovative filmmaking, do not see this movie. But if you have a genuine taste for the bizzare, the creative, the attention-grabbing, and the deviously intelligent, "Run Lola Run" is a movie for you.
This is the best action movie I've ever seen. I've never been a big fan of techno music before, but it is used so effectively in this movie that I found myself drawn to the soundtrack afterward. If you can appreciate cinematography like a fast-paced music video, you will absolutely love this film - guaranteed.
This film is one of the best films I have seen, in many ways, you can't describe it, but it is fast-paced and you will not be bored. The German language in the movie actually adds to the movie, it would not be so good if it was in English. This movie is so innovative. 5 stars from me.
This movie could have ended after 30min. Instead it repeats the first 30 min 2 more times, but with different outcomes. It shows how the little things in life may affect the bigger picture and course of one's life. A bit philosophical of a movie, but it is fast paced. Lola does run a lot!
Good movie. Well-paced. Great music. But try watching it as a cross between Groundhog's Day and X-Men. Seriously. Consider Lola as a super hero- time manipulation, sonic powers (a la Banshee), healing powers.Lola is a super hero.
I liked it. I won't be overly snobish like many of the reviewers, so I will just say this: This is a very entertaining movie with an OK plot and gret music. There, I won't get into the psuedo intelligence like the other reviews.
I usually don't like foreign films but this one is great! This is a fast paced, high energy film. Interesting plot and 3 surprise endings. (Side note:It's nice to see Germany from a everyday person's perspective and not a travel brochure.)
It was good. It is good. and the next I watch it, it will still be good. It's a what if i can go back a hour or two and change events before time run out.
The people here have already summed it up quite well, but I must chime in anyhow. I went to see this movie in the theater twice (the FIRST time I have EVER done so with ANY MOVIE). Needles to say I loved it and am awaiting the dvd release.BUY THIS MOVIE YOU WILL LOVE TO WATCH IT AGAIN AND AGAIN.Don't let the German language version scare you the subtitles are easy to read and it makes you feel as if you are running through Berlin yourself!!!!!!!
Very inventive movie and reminds me of Kieslowski, without the Catholic baggage, in that we see how randmom life isand how small encounters and slight changes in timing can significantly alter one's life and others (without our even being aware of it).This is an interesting ( but not new ) idea to think about, yet it is cleverly presented in an aesthetically pleasing manner in this film. This movie has all the elements of a classic cult film.
I really liked this movie. Visually, it is a very beautiful movie. The characters, even the minor ones, are intriguing. The plot is exciting and revolutionary. And finally, the soundtrack is wicked awesome.Franka Potente is an amazing actress,there is more evidence of this in the Bourne Identity. She has lots of charisma and pulls you into the movie. Manni actually wasn't too bad. He and Lola are both pretty weird people so its ok.Applause to the Germans, you've come up with a really good one here! Sehr gut!
This is one of the best movies I've ever seen. It was so fast-paced and interesting. Oh my god, you absolutely have to see it!!!
This is a brilliant film. Lola the played by Franke Potente is a Red Haired (not natural if you know what I mean)freaky type who gets a call from her boyfriend Manny who is frantic telling her he lost a bag of money that he was taking to Renni a bald headed cimminal type. He states he has 20 minutes to get the money to Renni or he is a dead man. Lola tells him to stay where he is and she rushes out of her home to find $100,000 or is it in Deustch Marks? Anyway this is a very clever story that takes place in real time. So you may be thinking if the movie takes place in real time does it only last for 20 minutes? HMMM, you will have to see the film. The highest recommendation. I would watch it w/o subtitles first then watch it with subtitles. German film 5 plus stars No need to watch it before you buy it. It is easily worth the money
Run Lola Run would have to be one of my all time favourite movies. It is one of the most innovative, and original movies I have ever come across. I could never really tolerate euro-techno until I rented this DVD. The music was composed by talented director/writer Tom Tywker and performed by his leading lady (on- and off screen) Franka Potente, who is brilliant and charismatic as Lola. The story is simple: Lola has 20 minutes tomake up for the loot lost by his hapless boyfriend Manni or Manni will be killed. There are three alternatives to the story, each detailing how one's actions could have consequences on others who cross their path. Many have compared this to other what-if flicks such as "Sliding Doors". But this film benefits from not having a terribly self-conscious Gwyneth Paltrow having another bad attempt at a British accent.The movie is fast, euroccentric, and you wouldn't believe that you'd been staring at the screen for 90-minutes. More exciting than a soccer match.
I believe the movie does well because of the premise of the Movie.The premise in this point is the background ie* the music, the Running & the fates that that lie in the endings.......That being said I have not seen this movie since it was in the theaters, so I may be ambiguous & therefore this may not be the best review & I will be open to critiques.I like this movie & reccomend it to anyone who is in the mood for something different....
only people who actually think throughout the course of the day need to buy this movie. it's fantastic, but it won't do much for drones and zombies who live most of their lives without ever developing any insight on anything. It's interesting and entertaining at the same time, and it leaves you to consider how time plays such a big role in our lives and our encounters w/ people. If you don't buy it you should rent it b/c it will get you to thinking.
I borrowed this movie from my friend to kill some time at work and though he had explain the plot; I still loved it! What he told me didn't exactly tell me what to expect. Espeically how well the music is cordniated with the film. The speical features include a great video; which is of the lead actress's song. The other features didn't interest me so I didn't check them out. If you liked the books that you can choose the outcome like go to page 8 or 16 you'll love this movie. I intially watched it in English Dub audio but the lips were totally off and the voices sounded so weird, so I watched in German with English subtitles. I didn't mind the subtitles. I do enjoy forgein films, so if you like them too, buying this DVD would be a great addition.
Although it is in german when you have the DVD you can change languages to english. The base of the story is Lola's boyfriend must get a whole lot of money in 20 minutes. HOW??? well thats the whole plot.It starts out with this wild cartoon and then turns into the "real life" which it is the most of the movie. The movie is a non-stop whirl-win of fun. The excitment and action (not explosives) is great.I own this movie and although i dont watch it all the time I do find myself going back and watching it whenever i want to see a good action/excitement movie. It has a good plot and the way the movie was put together is new and vibrant. The music supports the film very well also.I would recommend this movie to anyone who likes to talk about doing stuff but doesnt because then you can dream you are Lola on this journey but you never really would be!
I dont think I can actually say enough about this movie to tell you how fantastic and perfectly grand it was to watch. I think having over 50 customer reviews with an average 5 star rating says it all! I bought the movie just off the basis of my friends reviews, and now the movie is on my top ten list of the best movies I have seen. The cinematography, the plot, the music, the actors....all were excellent. I couldn't find a single flaw or even a "they should have done this..." This one is just too good to miss.
For me the PA-2 is great. i dont have any problems with it and it was for a reasonable price. There was one problem but that was due 2 my stupidity. So i just wanna let everyone no to get this product if youre lookin for a mp3 player!!
I purchased this product as a generic alternative to the more expensive Sony original. The two memory sticks are so similar that they may as well have been from the same manufacturer - I can detect absolutely no difference in performance between the two.The Sony memory stick format is useful but somewhat overpriced, so it is a real pleasure to find such a reasonable alternative. Strongly recommended
The basic text of the most exciting playwright of recent decades. The place to start when discovering the American drama as reader, actor, or teacher!
The book arrived on time and in good condition. This is an excellent collection for both theatre enthusiasts, teachers and for a comprehensive sampling of what Shepard is so gifted at constructing.
This collection features his finest and most mature work (Buried Child, Curse, True West) plus the best of his earlier plays (La Turista, The Tooth of Crime). They all showcase his great humor and startling use of language and imagery. Th more mature works deal, unflinchingly with american families. Tongues and Savage Love, which he did in collaboration with Joseph Chaiken, are wonderful, poetic meditations of existence and identity. If you are interested in Shepard as a playwright this is the finest collection of his best work. After this, I recommend seeking out the plays Fool for Love and A Lie of the Mind, for more of his "mature" work and then also Angel City as another prime example of the imaginative flights he took with his earlier work. In case you don't already know, Shepard is one of the most important American playwrights. Period.
Loved this book. I'm a newbie to golf, and this book was full of charm. It's not going to really teach you how to golf, but it will teach you to appreciate the intricacies of the game, and a great personality in it.Plus, it will inspire you to practice, because Hogan was a true student of the game. And that never hurts.
This book was a good book. It kept me want to read on and on. The only reason I gave it **** is because I got kind of confused during the middle of it. Here's my summary on the book:A teenage girl named Beth has to go with her mom and brother to stay with her mom's family. She has to leave behind her boyfriend, Ray, with whom she works at a stained glass store. Her mom ran away from home when she was 17 and hadn't been back since then. When they get to the house, Beth meets her crazy, drunk aunt named Iris. Iris severly dislikes Beth's mom, who's name is Hannah. Beth is not really sure why. In this book, Beth finds out what truly happened the night before Hannah ran away and why she did.This book leaves you hanging on the edge of your seat waiting to see what comes next!! Enjoy!!
Great game... poor price for an ESPN broadcast. None the less a great championship game!
These guys make a great case for finding Miss Right or Miss Right Now on the Internet. There's lots of common-sense advice that literally saved me hundreds of hours in wasted time and thousands of dollars in wasted dating money. The "Women of Internet Dating" section had some very funny stereotypes and I even learned something from their astrology section. Following their advice helped me find my future wife in less than 30 days! This little book is worth it's weight in gold.
If you think Celine Dion is fabulous in English, you should hear her in French. Her sound is much more original, less commericial. 1F4T is a fantastic album. It has an organic, rock sound. You don't need to know french to love this album or any of her last few french albums (d'eux, s'il suffaist d'aimer, chante plamodon). I don't know any french and i'm not some obsessed fan. but i love the french albums anyway because they are the best of an incredible artist whose english output can be quite bland and uninspired sometimes.The track listing:tout l'or des hommesapprends-moile vol d'un angene bouge pastu nagesje t'aime encore (english version with french title is on "One Heart")retiens-moije lui diraimon hommerien n'est vraiment finicontre naturedes milliers de baisersplus the bonus "ghost track" not listed anywhere on the cd:valse adieu
Celine dion is magnificent on this album. Even though its french she's still great. She hits very high notes. Its Just an amazing album. Its very great. It Deserves a grammy award. Its Fantastic you should really bye it.
This album is brilliant! If you buy it, I guarantee it'll be the best album you buy all year!
Without a doubt listening, enjoying and understanding the passion that Celine pours into each one of her songs is one of the great prizes of speaking French. There are no power-ballads and not so many high notes in this album as it is a more intimate and personal. I love it, this is the perfect mixture of pop, rock and country like rythms. I love it, from "Tout l'or des hommes", to "Le vol d'un ange", "Je lui dirai" to her superb performance of "Je t'aime encore", every song is unique and wonderful. Well produced, mixed and arranged, no wonder it was an instant hit in Quebec and France!
This is one of Celine's best albums. I was somewhat disappointed in her One Heart album, but she made amends with this one. I love Celine's voice and own almost all of her English albums and now 5 of her French albums. I only gave it 4 out of 5, because 2 of the songs lose me in the style of presentation. But other than that - grade A.
The tea chest itself is quite pretty. I bought several to give as gifts. There's a nice variety of tea inside and some really good flavors of green tea.The one downside of the chest? That the company pastes a label on the bottom of the chest and it is NOT easily removed. The label covers the entire bottom of the chest. It would be nice if they at least made it so you can remove it without leaving the wood looking worse for wear. I realize a label isn't a big deal; I just prefer to give a gift without the unsightly label.
Bentleys has some of the best teas out there. This box makes a great gift for tea lovers. It has a great variety of green teas (papaya, pomegranate, blueberry, etc.) and each comes individually bagged for freshness. Just steep and enjoy!
standard qualityI'm currently using in my car, I have little time to use, but arrived safely, and are two for the right price. I generally look good
Taxi is an outstanding sitcom and having Bob James score the music is like finding 500 bucks in the back seat of the Sunshine Cab they call "old whip and chill" (no power steering, no heater)--just the best! Bob's music sets the mood and elicits emotions for all the scenes. And, "Angela's Theme," the theme of the show, is like getting a 100 buck tip on a 5 buck fare-amazing! So, if you want to know more, just "gimme a buck," and you'll find out! And meet me at Jim's Mario's for a beer. Or we can go to the Tidepool, where after having several "monsoons,' we'll be three sheets to the wind.
The item was exactly what I ordered and the person who received it as a gift loved it. I'm happy!
I purchased this item for my grandaughter to update her collection. She was well pleased with the gift which gave her many ours of relaxing enjoyment.
I think this is a great series. One can watch it and not really have to think too much - I find it very relaxing.
Season 3 was mostly about chuck and blair in a relationship and while i ADORE those two, I kept waiting for the next episode where there will be some HOT chuck and blair sex like in season 1 and 2 but alas, it NEVER happened! this royally PISSED me off but like the title of this review implies, I love chuck and blair and they are the ONLY reason I watch gossip girl. there were a lot of sweet moments and that was why i bought the dvd, also there were some slightly hot scenes between chuck and blair that were in deleted scenes. I LOVE CHUCK AND BLAIR FOREVER, NOW AND ALWAYS!!!!!!
For those who want more than the Ivies ---- not only an Ivy-rated undergraduate education, but, virtue, leadership training, personal challenge, proving what you're made of, pride in giving something back to your family and America ---- the answer is West Point. EVERYONE has a good chance at the full scholarship. If this sounds like you, go for it.Recommended reading: "West Point: Character Leadership Education...", Norman Thomas Remick.
I had this card for about 2 weeks and the video performance was great. It has good Linux support from the gatos project and works for out of the box installs of Red Hat 7.3 and SUSE 8.0.Unfortunately, because of a bug in the i2c chipset the tv-input in the 7500 model doesn't work reliably. I would recommend the ATI 8500DV instead (also available from Amazon for not that much more).
This album is for you if you enjoy violins, and long ambient pieces. Worth a purchase if you're into that kind of thing.
Need memory, want it cheap? Why buy Sony and pay more? Save some money and get this one, works just like any other.
It makes no sense to purchase this workbook without "Rites of Passage", the companion job search book by John Lucht. If you purchase this workbook on its own to try and save money, you'll find youself going back to order Rites of Passage anyway.This workbook is extremely useful at helping you put structure around following the advice dispensed in "Rites". It forces you to put down your thoughts using a logical and organized approach. This leads you to constructing a far superior resume and cover letter than you would have done otherwise.A very valuable tool for someone seeking a new job in the $100K+ range.
The Executive Job-Changing Workbook by John Lucht is a Companion to Rites of Passage. It has numerous forms that are very useful in organizing a job search. It is clear, easily usable, and helps one control the organization of a varied job search. It is very cleaverly designed to take apart so that you can take one section in a briefcase on interviews. This helps recording and tracking search letters, phone calls, interviews, and thank you letters. A great help in a time consuming process.
This game is fun and easy!! If you played Mario Party 4 for Gamecube and loved it, you'll like this game too. There are alot of short and easy mini-games to play in it. So, it may be too easy for kids older than 7. I love the basketball and the squirting mini-games the most. I've only had the game for a week now but I play it every day when I get home from school.
Good collection of episodes for the price. My family members are big Simpson fans, so we like collecting both the seasons and the specials. Funny, funny stuff.
This is a brand new, year 2001 soft back, 384 page book. It features a great 32 page full color section with 50 photos. More than 100 rare photos are included. A host of black and white vintage photos appear along with interesting text throughout the volume. Chapters provide in depth coverage of nearly 100 stars of the golden era of Motown. There is a wealth of information here. You'll find a Motown 1959 - 1972 "Defining the Sound of Young America" chapter included. Motown music fans will find this an interesting read and great reference.
Bill Dahl is often consulted by other authors to check facts before they publish their works. Now we get the direct line. This book can be read as a reference work or for entertainment, as all the names and dates are seamlessly and accurately included in the real Motown story: Who made the music, from the biggest stars to unsung virtuoso session men; when, where, and, how. A must for any fan of popular music. Oh yeah, lots of great photos, too.
The low capacity cards that digital cameras come with today are such a joke! By getting this card, I can spend more time shooting pictures, which is perfect for getting cutting edge images on to my web site. Oh yeah, get the Flashlink reader, it will save you so much time getting those images off your digital camera and into your PC!
After reading my 1st book by Father Girzone I knew I was hooked. Yes, His writing IS simplistic but you must consider that he is reaching out to a targeted audience. His writing is easy reading for all! Joshua is Jesus come to help the children in a religious torn community. This makes a wonderful bedtime story as well. Need help finding Jesus in your life....find Joseph Girzone 1st!!
Joshua, whom we soon realize is someone very special, returns in this book to a town torn apart by religious intolerance and violence. A parable for the situation in Ireland, as well as other places, it continues to answer that question "What would happen if Jesus returned?" This deeply moving book will make you laugh, bring a tear to your eye, and, most importantly, give you and your heart something to ponder
This is an easy reading, but profound, story of what children can do to change the prejudices of their elders.
Truly love the writing of Joseph Girzone the series of Joshua books. You get so wrapped up in them you don't want to put them down. Great service; had in less than a week. Thanks!
I enjoyed the characters in the book and also the story really kept my interest. The one thing I did not like about the book was the counties that were mentioned are not counties of West Virginia. I am from WV. Charleston and Huntington were mentioned though which is accurage.
This CD is not Touch Sampler 5, which has not yet been released. This is Touch Sampler 00, released to commemorate the millenium. It's a nice CD, and the track listing is right, but the product title is incorrect. See [...]
I can't imagine a more limiting instrument than a music box -- its tones are set in a specific pattern, and it doesn't deviate from that at all. But Colleen somehow makes music boxes magical again. By mixing the traditional plucked sounds with their re-processed and synthesized counterparts, she manages to evoke a fairy tale mysticism. "What's is a Componium, Part 1" goes from thick sonics to singular tones at the end. And even it "Charles's Birthday Card" relies solely on iterations of Pop Goes the Weasel, "Will You Gamelan For Me?" is its own creation immediately. The tinkling comes fast and furious on "What's is a Componium, Part 2," a track that sparkles like moondust. "Calypso in a Box" shows off the more processed side, and has an almost Senor Coconut feel for its short running time. The standout piece here is the final track, "I'll Read You a Story," which appeared on an earlier album, but is always welcome anywhere.
All original hits and songs.This collection has gathered together two separate music disc's and slipped them into one cardboard sleeve. The titles are:1. Absolutely the Best of the Sixties2. The Psychedelic SixtiesThese two are complete with their own artwork and disc's. Great way to get both titles if you don't already have. I already did so be careful.
Keith Carradine as Bowie and Shelly Duvall as Keechie inhabit the mouldering hamlets of the 1930s south so naturally and unaffectedly that your throat tightens. This softer, dreamier Bonnie & Clyde-type tale (filmed in 1941 by Nicholas Ray as "They Live By Night")stands, with "The Long Goodbye" at the pinnacle of Robert Altman's extraordinary 1970s body of work -- even above "McCabe & Mrs. Miller" & "Nashville." Shot like old sepia photographs by Jean Boffety, the film boasts extraordinary supporting work by Bert Remsen, John Shuck, the pre-"Cuckoo's Nest" Louise Fletcher, and one unforgettable little girl. Why this masterpiece is all but forgotten is baffling: it's in a royal line of American movies dealing with average men and women trying to live in the twilight between decency and crime.
This book grabs your attention from the very beginning and holds it to the ending. A must read adventure of the life & death struggle that early Americans faced in the late 1700's on our own soil. We are anxiously awaiting Roy Hays' next book in "The Kentucky Scout Series".
The book recounts a harrowing adventure, but ultimately it is the fearless nature of these people and their indefatigable will to fight back and survive that shines through. Without a doubt arousing tale of the heroic age of the pioneer exploration.
I bought this bra a month ago and using it for daily wear and so far I'm very happy with the fit and comfort. It gives great shape and lift for my petite bust (32C) without the "push up" effect. This is my first le mystere bra, so I cannot compare it to other models of this brand but compared to other brands I've used so far I believe this brand is worth the popularity. In terms of sizing: I think it is true to size in terms of band and cups (at least for me). And the fit: It lifts up well and comfortable enough for all day wear. The bra has convertible straps which can also be worn criss/cross but cannot be removed. The straps are kinda decorated, but wide. This may provide more comfort for larger cups but I personally prefer thinner spaghetti-strapped bras and find them more convenient to wear with tank tops. Overall I like the bra and would consider buying more bras from the same brand if not the same model.
I wanted to say that I just bought the Rugrats game for PlayStation 2 for my 10 yr old son. Although I have not played it, he enjoys it if I sit in the family room and watch him play. I must say, every time I glance at the TV he is playing some new adventure. He is hooked to say the least! He likes it because it has the real Rugrats Nickelodeon characters and I like it because it is not obnoxiously violent like some other games. Two thumbs up from a parent!
When I bought this square I considered it a disposable unit that would probably get bent broken or stolen within short order. After checking it against my Starrett and Mitutoyo squares I was surprised to find out that it was very accurate. Surprisingly, it is also pretty durable. While I am not a big fan of the zinc heads on most consumer grade squares, this one is well made, accurately machined and so far, durable. The etched and painted blade is easy to read although not as easy as the Starrett or Mitutoyo "satin chrome". Granted, you can buy 8 of these squares for the price of one of the Starrett or Mitutoyo units.While I would never consider replacing my 6" Mitutoyo square with this one I will not hesitate to run out and buy another, or two or three Swanson squares when my current one finally does get bent or disappears.Overall, I would give this square five stars for value and four stars for quality.
brenda lee little mis dynamite what a voice she used to visit australia to packed houses and is one of the best early rock nroll artists of all the girls this c.d. has most of her hits and a few extras on it its a pity she doesnt still perform as i am sure she would still pack the house wherever she performed another great record from amazon for my well played collection. jack darby australia
The bulbs are a little higher in price. However they are quality and stand up to rough use..You will get what you pay for.It was easy to find on Amazon.
Great product is exactly what it says. Good replacement for my mirror which was broken. It is slightly different on the inside but the exterior, after installation, is unnoticeable.
First off let me help you novices out there a little bit. Don't buy a video card because of its price, its hype, or its look, do your research! This card is excellent, it is blazingly fast, (it beats geforce 3), and it is a steal... BR>A key feature in the radeon 8500 is the programmable pixel shaders. Let me tell you a little more about them. Geforce 3, 4 and radeon 8500 all share them witht he exception with the Geforce 4 MX. The newest games will use programmable pixel shaders and if you don't have a video card that uses this, then you can't play it. The radeon beats its competition while being half the price! but be cautious because there has been driver issues with ATI and what seems to be "cheating drivers"Pros:blazingly fastcomes from a respectable companyexcellent image qualitycons:driver issues
great for gaming. With dual head monitor support + DVI & TV out, the 64 MB memory on this Card and the extremely affordable pricepoint make it one of the best options available today. If you are a hard-core CG effects person, this won't be the best option, but otherwise, it is the way to go.
OK! Sugar Rush was never my favorite song, but this CD has increaced my enjoyment of this song like 50000%!1. Sugar Rush- Like I said, not my favorite A*Teens song2. Sugar Rush (Earthboun's Sugarcrush mix Short)- O my gosh! Earthbound has taken a slower song and made it one of the BEST techno song i have ever heard!3. Sugar Rush (Earthbound's Sugarcrush mix Long)- As i have said in other interviews, this song only gets better as it gets longer!4. Sugar Rush (M 12 Mix)- Can you say, "The Best remix EVER!" It's like dance style, and the best. I can't say that enough!
Many people have seen this movie, many didn't like it. I, on the other hand, thought it was alright. One complaint I've heard for this film like many remakes is that "it wasn't like the original." Hmm... do you think maybe that's because IT'S NOT THE ORIGINAL? In order to truly like a remake, you have to look past the fact that it is probably not gonna be even close to the original. However, it seems anytime Disney remakes something like Hercules and Mighty Joe Young, they get praised for it even though they take remakes way out of the original context. This movie wasn't too bad. It wasn't scary, but still not too bad. I found it more of a story than horror film.
I thought this was a great movie. Fine, so the story was average, but the fantastic effects and even better sound more than made up for it. I would recommend this film to anyone with a dolby digital setup, just sit back and feel the room shake!
Not so much scary as it is interesting, however some decent performances keep you involved. The story is a little drug out, as this could have been much better at 90 min. as opposed to its 115 min. run time worth seeing never the less.
This movie was one of the first movies I watched on DVD and I did not read the novel "The Haunting of Hill House". That said, I found the movie interesting in the beginning, slow in the middle and action packed at the end.The setting was beautiful and the house had a great gothic look to it, but maybe the house overshadowed the characters some? The movie centered around one nervous character finding out who she really is and then defeating the bad guy at the end. The other actors were just innocent by-standers through most of the movie which hurt the film.I gave it four stars because of Zeta-Jones and the setting itself. This is not a terrible movie, but it could have been so much more.
This is a great 'B' movie.There is no real comparison with the first one (1963).That one was an intellectual haunted house story. This one is just juvenile.The idea that the Dudleys,man and wife caretakers, could take care of a forty acre lawn as well as a monstrous castle by themselves struck me as hilarious."No one from the town will come here" she says.After the catastrophic damage in the house, I really felt for the Dudleys.The picture was just fun.
if you want to give your new home theatre setup with the new subwoofera great workout, then this is one of the dvd's to get, preferably DTS5.1if you can, the plot as it is pretty ordinary, the acting even more so,the soundtrack, great, 4 stars for the soundtrack,
Catherine Zeta Jones and Owen Wilson star in this creepy thriller! This is one scary story of a haunted house that wont rest! Its not like House on Haunted Hill where the house locks you in, this one is just trying to scare you to death while you reside in it! Watch this movie!
If you like super-natural mysteries, then you'd like this film. It is technically a horror film, but it's really not that frightening (though there is a scene in the movie that made my mother jump about three feet), and as a result, is not for people that watch horror films for the fright. As a mystery, however, it is really quite good, and deserves to be watched over and over, just so you can find all the hidden clues for the answer at the end.
This is, of course, not much like the orginal(which I still think is better), but has some good effects and a decent story. I have it, but I bought the original first. This is a Hollywood story. The original is more believable. Watch them both.
This movie had the most potential of any movie I've ever seen, however, somewhere, someone messed up. I like this movie, however. It offers a creepy escape on a Friday night.Final verdict: Worth a look, but only if you are willing to accept it as just a fun and creepy movie.
I saw the original and this movie is just as good. That is really rare. Most re-made versions arent as good. I liked the actors and the special effects are great. I will be first on-line to buy this movie when it comes out. Dont hesitate to see this movie, as well as the original of course.
This is a good movie with a star packed cast. With many twists and turns you never know what is going to happen next. Love It
I liked this movie, it had some realy good special effects and a good story line, it is mildly scary but not nearly as scary as i thought it would be, and some parts were predictable. I think it could have been made a little better, but its entertaining and definatley worth seeing.
If you like very low sound, I really mean low, with a subwoofer, then buy this one. You can impress your friends by seeing this movie at midnight. This DVD is so real you don't want to sleep after watching.
Don't form an opinion against it merely because Hollywood tells you that you shouldn't like it. At least in this remake, there's a believable reason for the house to be haunted instead of "just because" as it was with the original. This was scary when I first watched it and there was enough suspense without gore. Granted, it isn't as scary the second time around, but I've enjoyed it enough to watch it again and again.
I think this is the type of movie that you have to watch at night in order to be scared. I wouldn't call it a horror film, but I wouldn't call it a thriller either. It's just one of those films that scares you. I thought Liam Neeson was great in this movie, the way he cared for Nell. I thought Owen Wilson did pretty good, Catherine Zeta jones character was a little strange, but still a good character to put in. But Nell played by Lili Taylor was great! She had a stunning performace! Now the mansion was simply amazing. I know it was probably just sets but it looked very awesome! Every room was extremely awesome! The sets were the best part of the movie!Acting: 4/5Location: 5/5Music: 4/5Story: 4/5Very good movie!
I found this movie to be a good scary movie to watch, and im sure all will enjoy the suspence and horror of this movie,it is worth watching and I hope all have fun with it...
I think that "A Philadelphia Catholic in King James' Court" was a entertaining and educational book. The book is about a boy named Michael who moves to Kentucky after his father dies. In Kentucky he is astounded to see so many fundamentalists, where in Philadelphia he had seen so many Catholics like himself. While living in Kentucky, Michael learns many things about the Fundamentalist Christians, as well as his own religion, Catholicism. His Uncle continually challenges Michael about his religion and tries to convert him to a Fundamentalist. This book was very interesting and worth the while. This was one of the best apologetics novels I've ever read.
My students were enlightened and interested in the main character's encounters with Biblical Fundamentalist's approach to scripture. The students learned important apologetic information about Catholicism.
After reading "A Philadelphia Catholic in King James's Court", it was a lot better of a book than I thought it would be before I bought it. It was exciting to read in a way, because the story line was very realistic. It seemed almost like the author was telling it about himself. A negative aspect I had in reading this was that it seemed almost impossible for Michael, the "Philadelphia Catholic" to read and comprehend all of the information of the Bible, and be able to explain it in such a short amount of time. This did not seem to be a major fault in the book, and most would probably overlook it anyway. This book gave me an outlook on other peoples view of the Bible and their lifestyles. This was a great book, and I recommend reading it if it is for a class, or just on your own time.
I enjoyed this book very much, to my suprise. When my teacher assigned this book, I thought that I would be bored throughout of the whole book. I did not think that i would be to interested in a book about church and Fundamentalism, but as I got into the book I really started to enjoy it. I thought that it was a very good reading experience for me. As i got deeper and deeper into the book, it just started getting better and better. All of the information about Catholic religion and why mary and peter are respected in the church astonished me. This book gave me a great experience in learning things about my Catholic faith that i never thought i would learn. I am glad my teacher gave me this assignment.
A PHILLY CATHOLIC IN KING JAMES COURT was an excellent book abou the catholic faith. It taught me that Mary was important and that the bread we eat at church is really Jesus. It also taught me how the amish culture in Kentucky was like. The part I didn't like though was that Michael learned the whole Catholic faith in just a couple of weeks. When it actually takes years of study to learn all those tihngs. Other than it was agood book and educational.
I felt this book was very interesting and it gave me a lot more knowledge about Catholicism. Most kids Michael's age would not have shown such an interest for their religion, so it was a little hard to believe. For the most part it was a very good book and gave many important facts.
After reading A Philadelphia Catholic in King James Court by Martin DePorres Kennedy, it got me to thinking more about the religion I practice, Catholicism. As the book starts out, Michael, having just tragically losing his father, is thrown into a world; it would seem he is not ready for. As he gets to know his Uncle Les's fundamentalist view of the bible, he begins to realize not everything they practice does follow the bible. He begins to see arguments arise and he himself is challenged on the ways of the bible. The most significant change seemed to be his debate with Pastor Brown. Though Michael had seemed cornered he slipped out of harms way once again. In my opinion, this book gives an excellent overview of the issues that people have disagreed on and also why there was a split within the church. Overall, the book may have seemed boring to some, but the depth of knowledge it provided made me get a deeper understanding of what we really practice at mass.
First I have to say is that what I got out of this book is not what I expected. Having been envolved in Religious debates, I can relate to nervousness that Michael experienced. Being a Catholic and having questions about my own faith, I found that this book has given me the ability to look into the Bible and find the answers to my questions.
The Book a Philadelphia Catholic in King James Court was a good Novel. The Book had a good story and premise. Based in Kentucky it talked a lot about the Aimish and farm life. The only thing that was remotely bad about the book was some unrealistic events. Overal it was a good book. The book looked and was boring at first but as the plot and storyline started to develop it got a lot better. If any one was wondering about or having doubts of the Roman Catholic faith, I definitely recommend it.
Although unrealistic at times, this book still got accross the Catholic aproach of some major misunderstood topics. The book also presented how and why fundamentalists contradict the Catholic view of these topics. After facing a devastating situation early in the book, Michael overcomes it and defends the Catholic faith against fundamentalists and their interpretation using good apologetic arguments mainly from the Bible. Overall, I thought this book was very interesting although it had many unrealistic parts. This is a good book for people who want to know about the Catholic faith. It shows different aspects of Catholiscism in a well written fictional story.
I have had this book on my shelf for quite a while, and finally got around to reading it after watching a documentary on Columbus on the Discivery Channel. I got inspired to overcome my intellectual laziness, and how pleased I am I did! This book really deserves its reputation as a timeless classic, and the author, a giant of maritime history, did such a fine job that I now want to read his well known biography of John Paul Jones. The text is gripping and the author's insights abound. This is a fine book.
This book is the definitive work on Columbus. Morison is famous for making the same journey that Columbus made with largely the same equipment in order to prepare for writing this book. His experience shines through in the detail thatMorison lavishes on his subject.As is the case with any great biography, Morison has become enamored with his subject, highlighting his strengths and successes while downplaying his weaknesses and failures, but you know that going into any biography and can adjust your interpretation accordingly.The story here is told very well, keeping the reader engaged and turning pages. Additionally, the book dispells many of the myths and common misconceptions about Columbus and really fills in a complete picure of the man.Well worth reading for any fan of history or biography.
Well researched and written tome on Christopher Columbus. It is thorough to the point of excessive and gets to be slow a points but the information included is well presented. The obvious pro Columbus bias is present, but the reader understands this in advance and can adjust as necessary. The research done included the actual sailing of similar ships along the most possible route Columbus took. Another negative during this time is the nautical jargon used by the author which is hard to understand. Morison writes with the understanding that any reader interested in Columbus will identify with the technical verbiage, but he does attempt to simplify the terms without being condescending. Despite these minor bumps in the road, this book is well worth the time to understand Columbus and the rediscovery of America.
This is a great dvd if you like acoustic blues. The camera work is great and the tunes are classic.
Take a travel through your mind, body and soul as you listen to any of the albums by the Art Ensemble of Chicago. I highly recomend that you not only check Urban Bushmen out, but as well as all the other albums. I love the music because I can hear all the love and power behind the music that the Art Ensemble of Chicago creates. It's a definate must in everyones cd collection.
Excellent reading! This was my introduction to George MacDonald's books. Not a soppy romance as today's authors tend to write, but even one that men would enjoy reading for leisure! As I am a GREAT fan of C.S.Lewis' and Tolkien's writings, I was fascinated to find that both these author's drew a lot of their inspiration from MacDonald's writings. I have since read "The Princess & the Goblin", "The Princess & Curdie", "The Golden Key", and "The Light Princess". My husband is currently reading Phantastes and we have also bought Lilith, still to be read. I look forward to getting "The Marquis' Secret" if I can, as I really would like to follow the full story!!
It's got all of the great skating prorams AND its' the full piece of music. It's not some lame edited version. Love it!
If you have a house full of sh*tkickers, and your beer is disappearing from the fridge, and they're starting to make bathtub gin in the outhouse, and your next door neighbor is with the County Sheriff's Department, don't put this CD on the stereo. You'll never get 'em to leave. And granny will tan your hide in the woodshed with a switch.Hmmmm... ON SECOND THOUGHT, TURN THIS UP REAL LOUD, SO'S THE NEIGHBORS WILL COMPLAIN, YA'LL.THIS IS HILLBILLY GRUNGE AT IT'S FINEST.
We bought this disc after seeing Ralph Covert open for the kid's band "Hi-5". The kids love these songs. The adults in the house love the "Big Rig" song and the "Coffee" song just as much as the kids do. I can respect a song that hits that close to home: "and tonight I think I'll have a little vino".Buy this disc for your kids, but you can enjoy it, too.
As a Chicagoan, I am so proud to boast about Ralph's World. These songs are witty, catchy and have great messages. My one year old daughter just loves listening to them in the car. When Tra La La comes on, she starts singing "la la la." My husband cracks up at the song about the eighteen wheeler every time. The only track we don't like it is Harry's Haunted Halloween Circus, but it is easily skipped.
My son is 4 and just absolutely LOVES the songs on Ralph's World At the Bottom of the Sea. He sings the songs all through out the day. His favorites include: The Banana Splits, Surfin in my Imagination, and Eighteen Wheel on a Big Rig, as well as the Coffee Song. Great album and not one that grates on parental nerves either. I enjoy the songs just as much as my son does. Two thumbs up!
What a fantastic cd! Our whole family enjoys it and actually sings along when it's on. Our 1 year old even sings along to the Bean Soup and Rice song ~ he loves it! We bought it after owning Happy Lemons, which is another very "happy" cd....I really hope he makes more.
I'm amazed we haven't worn the darn thing out. Our three-year-old loves this CD (better than the first, haven't yet heard the third!) and we ended up buying one for each car, and one for all our friends...guess I shoulda bought 'em in bulk! I disagree with the reviewer who said this is for 4 years and up--Laura's loved Ralph since she was six months old.
This is an excellent audio tape that explains what clinical depression is. It is a good starting point to help a person recognize what they are feeling. The side on anxiety management is for heavy problems. It might have been better to make two different tapes, but I still would highly recommend it.I've given this tape to people who are obviously hurting. It is a way to help someone help themselves. It is easier to comprehend than reading a book on depression. Plus, it gives you a way to help when you see someone in pain.
I played Cabela's Big game hunter ultimate challenge, and enjoyed it very much. I immediately bought this as soon as it came out. The graphics are even better than Big game hunter, there are tracks behind the vehicles, everything has shadows, and the hunter even leaves footprints behind. The new 'deer finder' arrow is a very cool new feature and gives the game a more arcadey feel. The mission based play of this game is very cool, and the range of levels and deer are just right. The models for the hunters are improved also. Lots of great gadgets and hunting gear are available to the player including a 'predator' style heat vision and a night vision scope ! All in all a lot of fun. A little easiser than BGH but BGH was kinda hard. You can change the difficulty to suit yourself. I am so glad that activision are supporting the genre on consoles !
Since Chomsky established the GB model in the early 1980's, many introductory books have been published. Culicover's book came out by the end of the GB fashion when most people were attracted by Chomsky's new ideas of the minimalist program (MP). However, this book is not out of date at all, since Culicover illustrated the GB theory in a very critical way providing with quite a number of problems which cannot be solved at ease within the GB framework. All those problems are interesting issues that generative syntax has to manage. Though the author gave some suggestions, the issues remained open both to the GB framework and the MP followers. After reading this book, you may realize that the GB model is not as good as most people believe and that the burden of the MP will be heavier when it has to take over what left insolvable in the GB.
The book was in excellent condition you can't even tell that it's been used. Also, it came very fast. Excellent Service and reliability! I would definantely purchase from this person again in the future!
This is a very good book! My sister and I used it to study for the ASVAB. Don't worry too much about the test, look over this book and relax during the test!
cd is a nice addition to help with test taking . The book goes into good detail of the types of questions and does provide the answers and why
I really like this book. It helps me to refresh my mind in a lot of stuff I had forgot! Good book.
THIS BOOK WILL HELP PREPARE YOU FOR THE MILITARY ASVAB TESTS. WAS NOT DISAPPOINTED AND IT WAS HELPFUL TO MY TEENAGE BOYS,
This book helped me achieve a 95E-95M-80G-80A. Electrical and Mechanical were part of my background so I can not attribute all knowledge gained to this book. I am now a 2W151 at Nellis AFB and am glad to be in the USAF
Got this for my kids to look through and prepare for their ASVAB. Checked this out for myself and found it easy to understand. If I would of had this back when I took the ASVAB I would have scored even better than my 82. I would recommend this for any student looking towards a future in the Military.
This book is easy reading. My daughter used this to review for her ASVAB exams - and yes, she passed with flying colors. Hightly recommended.
The Army Recruiter recommends this book for people getting ready to take the ASVAB test. It is easy to read and my son has been studying it without being told.
I was pleasantly surprised because I had begun studying from the ARCO textbook, and I noticed that the explanations for arithmetic problems were not always the easiest to understand. Dummies gave me a thorough explanation for each problem, and its vocab section seemed to have more difficult words, which prompted me to study up on that section. Vocab was the least of my concerns until I saw the words in the practice exams in THIS book as opposed to the ARCO one, and luckily, I saw some of the same words on the actual ASVAB. I didn't study the other portions of the textbook, such as autoshop, and electrical, because my focus was the General Technical score, but as far as arithmetic and verbal, this was very helpful.
This tale is sweet and heartwarming, but be forewarned that it is VERY short. I read it in only a couple minutes. It is bittersweet and touching, not a "happy ending" story, but worthwhile reading.
Twain, Mrs. Clemens and John Brown were dear friends. Twain speaks of him constantly in his autobiography. I bought this story - it is much too brief to call it a book - on his recommendation. The story of Allie's surgery is amazing. Her courage, as depicted, at undergoing such an ordeal is awe-inspiring. His description of the wild young men of his youth is generously and wisely written. The whole tale may take you only twenty minutes to read, but Allie and John Brown will make an impreession, for sure.
I discovered this album while exploring music by Mannheim Steamroller and bought it because I am a fan of Mason Williams' "Classical Gas." An energetic electronic update to the original acoustic is the first performance on the album, and in my opinion "Classical Gas 2005" is every bit as interesting and fun as the original. The remainder of the album varies from hauntingly beautiful (Riding the Low Moon), to epic (The Last Crusade), to western-like (Eddie I'm Ready), to just plain electronic fun (Doot-Doot). The music on this album is too interesting to fade into the background. I find myself being called to stop and listen to its magic. Mason Williams and guitarist Zoe McCulloch make a great team. I'm impressed and pleased with my purchase.
"The Case of the Cunningham Heritage" is the ONLY time the legendary first meeting of Holmes and Watson has been put on film, and "The Red-Headed League", "Shoeless Engineer" ("Engineer's Thumb" made less gory) and "The Pennsylvania Gun" ("Valley of Fear" without the boring flashback) are ALL based on Doyle. So wasn't "The French Interpreter" but that's not in this set. Ronald Howard played Holmes in a likeable way, while H. Marion Crawford was an excellent Watson, and both are closer to the ages Holmes and Watson really were when they first met. The prints could be cleaner, but they're better than what's turned up on local TV stations and come in a nice package. Let's hope they put out the remaining episodes to complete the series. Watch for Michael Gough in "The Perfect Husband" and Natalie Shafer in "The Shy Ballerina".
As Peggy Hall takes you through each exercise, you feel energized and at the same time more at peace with yourself. I have her other DVD's and really enjoy the pace of this one, especially if you want a bit of a challenge. Beautiful scenery too!
I've been doing this (2) times a week, along with swimming a 1/2 mile at the public pool for the past 3 weeks and feel so good. This video really works your body in all the ways you need for strength and flexibility in surfing. I can't wait to get back in the ocean soon, when it gets a little warmer ! And take the power and flow of this yoga, to help me improve my surfing. Instead of working so hard to catch a wave and paddle out, at my age of 57:)
Paul Hofmann writes about his hometown the way any native would, with equal parts admiration and frustration. Sure, he describes the great trattorie, touches on the sordid histories of Rome's luxury hotels, and is continually mesmerized by the city's ancient ruins. But, anecdotes about such topics as the irregularity of the postman's visits, motorino pollution, municipal strikes, and lousy restaurant service, make the book come alive. Thank god this isn't another tired, old, tourist piece about how great it is to live abroad ("A Year in Provence," anyone?) Hofmann's grouping of chapters by month is also innovative and helpful to travelers who want to know what goes on in the city the REST of the year. The book tends to be a bit dull in some places, owing probably to the fact that Hofmann wrote this book in his 70s or 80s. He knows little about hip, modern Rome. Nevertheless, his "diary" makes for a good read and a good history lesson.
I love the pen again pen due to my carpel tunnel syndrome. Amazon charges shipping per package so I order from the seller direct to reduce shipping charges on my large orders. The refills don't last very long due to I write a lot and they are smaller than other refills in order to fit into the pens. Refills are the way to go as they reduce plastic consumption.
The toy makes an appealing "crinkle" sound, and it's a little bit smaller than other similar books on the market -- so my 4-month old grandaughter can handle it a bit better. I was extremely pleased with this toy (as was the baby)!
I used to have an ATI TV PCI card, which is great for image captures, but gave me (and numerous other people I talked to) a headache for video capturing itself. The ADS USB Instant Video is a good deal for the price, and is excellent for good-quality video capturing (Excellent frame rate, just make sure other programs are off and the capturing isn't [messed] up at the start). Plenty of other excellent features, the software is a good-quality editing package. Compared to the ATI card though, capturing images is a bit annoying. Otherwise, it's worth it!Connections are very easy, and it's quite user-friendly and easy to learn, as I'm not a techie!
Wheeler's Deer Wan is perhaps the best showcase for his dual talents of writing and playing. The melodies are stunning and Wheeler gives his sidemen ample room to stretch. He's assembled a Who's Who from the ECM stable: Richie Beirach, John Abercrombie, Ralph Towner & others. The rich orchestrations support the tunes with perfect touches throughout.The soloing on 3/4 in the Afternoon by Wheeler is itself worth the price of the CD. Wheeler's heartfelt take on the melody floats above his accompaniment, building a head of emotion as it reaches its final statement.Anything but 'wan!' Six stars!
Anyone who wants to know a little bit more about Beatrix Potter, the person, will be pleased with this book. Through real-life annecdotes John Heelis conveys what should be obvious but isn't - Beatrix Potter was not a perfect human being, she had tiny flaws just like the rest of us. Sometimes she got cranky, occasionally she was absent-minded with her head in the clouds but mostly she was wonderful - although quite strong willed and opinionated.Those who are fascinated by Beatrix Potter will find the little book a great addition to their library. However, be forewarned - those who are buying this book for a voyeristic look into the intimate details of Beatrix Potter's married life will be sorely disappointed. This very private woman's private life remains private.
At least that was what my previous pedal looked like, it was showing through to the metal. This beauty fit right over the metal and have not had one problem with it.
I bought this product earlier this year to replace my old OE foot pedal cover. The product replaced the OE with no problem. it was easy to put on the pedal. I would buy again , if needed.
This tie was purchased for a family member's wedding. It is exactly what the bride requested and is exactly as described. The seller also included cleaning instructions and was packaged very nicely.
I have read 3 translations of this story and I like them all for different reasons. The story is very readable and has interesting interpretations on several levels. All the friends I recommended the story to loved it.
I actually read another collection of Gogol stories but I have read "Diary of a Madman", "The Nose", and "The Overcoat". The book is worth buying for Diary of a Madman or the Nose alone. These are both great stories that really show the uniqueness and talent of Gogol which seems even more amazing when thinking he was writing in the 19th Century. The Overcoat is a good story but the other two are classics and unbelieveable works of fantasy and social commentary that still seems relevant today.
I really enjoy this book! I love the Japanese art work in it. It's one of my favorite coffee table books.
This is another one of those CDs that you pop into the stereo and know within moments that it's one you will be listening to over and over again for a long time. It feels like a staple in my music collection by the second song.The production is high quality. The songs are thoughtful, emotional and well written. The voice matches the songs beautifully with power and feeling.This CD has it all: outstanding vocals, exceptional musicianship, intelligent lyrics and gives the listener an all around wonderful feeling.(read full review at collectedsounds.com)
This is a really fun toy. I had one as a kid growing up, and had to buy myself another one. This one seems a bit less durable than I remember, if you pull hard on the string, the inner wheel jumps out of it's holes. I am fairly confident that Gyroscope is no longer made by the same company that used to make it. But its very fun, and very interesting. You will need to oil it though, to keep it working properly. Just 2 drops of multi-purpose oil does the trick.
I've purchased several of these as gifts for children I mentor in the public school system. I like them because they are educational and durable and hopefully are an item the child will keep for a long time.
My daughter really enjoyed this. Paint doesn't last long. Washes off sidewalk and clothes fine. Would recommend for the kids to enjoy.
Erich Fromm, displays a different profile of Karl Marx. According to Fromm, Marx is very different than the one told by the Russian Communists. Fromm tries to show the humanist ideas of Marx and he describes Marx's philosophy as a synthesis of humanism and naturalism. There are also good descriptions of what socialism means: "Socialism, for Marx, is a society which permits the actualization of man's essence, by overcoming his alienation.".Fromm describes the Marxist socialism as the heirs of propethic Messianism.This book is really interesting because Fromm tries to explain the humanistic values in socialism.Indeed, all the communist propaganda has claimed that their way is the real Marxist system; however Fromm claims that their system was just a crude communism which neglected human beings and humanistic values.
I chanced on this movie completely by accident. It was in the wrong box. It opened with some goats and French subtitles. I thought, oh boy, this will put me to sleep. Yet the movie works on many levels: on one, it is like a complex detective story, with tiny clues sprinkled throughout gradually coming together at an overwhelming ending. On one level, it is a comedy, poking fun at pompous scientists and ignorant folk. On another, it explores unrequited love, a topic the movies usually avoid. On another it about the lush scenery and quaint village life in France. Yves Montand is a brilliant actor. He packs so much depth into every second he is on screen. He feels like a real person. It is a movie about faces, memorable, complex, elderly, even ugly faces.This movie is the very opposite of fluff.
While I loved both movies, Jean de Florette and the sequel Manon of the Spring, I would rate the first of the pair to to have an edge over the second. They are both masterfully done, and you really can't watch just one of them, as they are an inseparable pair, the first movie forming the background for the second, and the second providing the resolution for the first. Without giving up too much of the story, these movies tell a story of greed, "accidental" murder, and resolution with the likes of Greek tragedy--critically and tenderly revealing the mysterious nature of the human heart. Two of the best set of movies ever in my lifetime. My only criticism of the 2nd movie is the weak portrayal of the young woman, which came down to either poor direction or perhaps a poor casting decision. Overall, this flaw can be overlooked, as these two movies will stand as classics for many years to come.
Originally titled "Manon des sources", this movie is the conclusion to the store "Jean de Florette". It is done in French dialogue & English subtitles.The camera captures the beauty of the French countryside in all its splendour in this movie.Jeans' daughter Manon, has grown up and taken over the family farm, following the tragedy which occurs in the first installment.She seeks to extract revenge on those who have harmed her family.There are some amazing revelations in the movie, which will leave you shocked.A truly wonderful movie, well acted, directed and filmed.It is important to watch the first installment (JdF), before viewing this movie.
Been looking for this DVD for years! I'm glad I finally found one at an affordable price!! I had read that in the Korean Edition, there was a scene in the movie that was blurred, when Manon is bathing, and wondered how important that would be to the movie, or my response to the story, and IT IS NOT. The scene where Manon is bathing is like 2 seconds, or less! Now, I have seen both versions and let me tell you that in the unedited version (US Edition) you still dont see much more so why pay 70 dollars for something that is not crucial and you can barely see when you can own the Korean version DVD for half the price?...So my advise is get the Korean DVD, save your money and get yourself another movie instead! Enjoy.
Needless to say, I love this movie (and Jean de Florette.) I would just like to say that if anyone has bought the rights to it (Criterion?), kindly release it already, since these movies have been out of print for years now. Available used from $90. Get outta here.
I bought this CD because it's one of the few complete recordings of the Suite In Modo Polonico. The sound quality is good, and the guitar tone is good as well. I thought the tempos of the Suite were a little fast, but otherwise, a nice CD reference of Tansman's work.
I read this book as a child, and recently succeeded in finding it again (having forgotten the title.) Good Luck Arizona Man is the story of a white boy raised by Apaches, trying to discover the secrets of his own past and heritage while keeping his Apache identity. He goes on a search for the lost gold of the Apaches, which is tied up with his own mystery. Unfortunately, the mountains are filled with bizarre and dangerous white men also searching for the gold: and the Apache chief has sent men to ensure that the prophesy (he who finds the gold must die) comes trueThe book is humorous and whimsical, with many surprising plot twists. I doubt that the portrait of Apache life and customs is very accurate, but the white men are equally ridiculous. In any case, the characters (and their names--Head Toter, Tied-Up, Miss Utter Delight, Fantail and Poop, Old Wickiup, Missing Toe) are hilarious and unforgettable.
I'm real pleased with the results of digital images shot using the SimpleTech 256MB compactflash as storage. It's speed seems to be on a par with my Microdrives or perhaps a slight bit faster.I think it's great for the price.
Got it in a well packaged unit, took it out, put it in my canon s110 and start taking shots. The pictures takes 1 or 2 seconds less than my other cards(Sandisk and PNY) to write. Able to take about 250 shots in HQ mode at max resolution. Download from a card reader is also super fast. Did not do any specific test but it is at least 20 or 30 seconds faster than the other cards I have when downloading 240MB of jpegs to my PC. Again, amazon is prompt with the service and I am a happy camper. Thanks again amazon for giving us outstanding service and products.
256 MB of storage. That's like 5 million photos or something. (I haven't had the chance nor the reason to fill it up yet...) Huge storage space for a really reasonable price. You really won't need another Flash Card once you've got this one. I've had no problems at all with this. Make sure to get a good Flash Card Reader too, so you can easily transfer your photos from the Card to your hard drive.
The Brass Fantasy was a wonderful group that Lester Bowie led--kind of a late 20th century interpretation of the New Orleans brass band, but playing the music of the day. It's a real kick in the pants to hear some of the pop tunes as they are interpreted here. The tuba player rocks! Forget the oom-pah! My favorite is their interpretation of that jukebox favorite, Crazy. This is a great album for someone with a fairly open mind and a good sense of humor.
Martínez Sobral's symphonic scenes Acuarelas Chapinas, is a real revelation. Magnificently orchestrated pieces, they have an immediate and direct impact. As much as Falla's Nights in the Gardens of Spain or Ives' Three Places in New England, they describe a place, in this case, a city in Latin America circa 1905. Ricardo Castillo's tone poem Xibalbá evoques a world of magic and legends of the Mayan world. This is music that important conductors should take into account to enlarge their repertoires, introducing names from the past that merit the best disclosure.
I found this book to be an easy read. It sufficiently covered the topics indicated with what appears to be a very objective point of view.I think that this book should be a must-read for anyone on either side of the ongoing debate.
Joan Bello adresses feelings I have always had but I was not sure why. Now it makes a lot more sense. One big bonus in reading this book was I now try to pay a lot more attention to my inner self when I am in this higher state of consciousness as opposed to watching TV or something mundane like that. I try to expose myself to more stimulations than I use to. One other thing that I have noticed is I can really feel the depressing nature of alcohol way more than I use to. I have always had the feeling but I did not pay much attention to it. Now I find it really easy to tune into and it turns me off. This book is very interesting, a touch difficult to read in parts but in the end it improves your awareness of yourself and of this little beautiful plant that I have embraced for most of my life.
This is the most LUSH book I have ever read. The content is heady like the humid air of the rainforest. It is dense with wise, human understanding, the style straddling poetry and prose. I'll often re-read a paragraph in breathless amazement of what I've just read. I must take it in small bites - as if it's simply too rich, like a steak with bernaise sauce. But each re-reading brings joy.
I just read Love in the Time of Cholera before this. Marquez has a way with words. They are unlike other fiction I've read. They completely transplant me into the world he creates. As with Love, I felt the environment in every paragraph and experienced the atmosphere the way I imagined the characters t experience it. This novel in particular explores love, pride, deception, family. It evokes feelings of passion, pain, longing, fear of wasted time. I really did enjoy it, I hope my next novel is as giving as this was.
I read this book in my freshman year of college. I loved it. It has many characters that flow together. The story has a magical realism to it. Characters die and come back to life, people live for years on end. It follows the lives of a family that deals with wars, tragic love, and mysterious dealings. I thorougly enjoyed reading this book and I recommend it to anyone who wants to enter a magical world filled with vibrant characters taking on all sorts of political and social issues to heart and then bending them as far as they can go. Think Dali.
Marquez has such an eloquent way with words. He canalso spin an excellent tale as evidenced by this book.But, what I enjoyed most about the book was the strengthand depth of emotion which he was able to convey throughthe written word. This book pulls you into a magical andmorbid world and holds you hostage until the ending. It isan immense book, but well worth the committment. I wouldespecially recommend it to young developing writers. Thisbook will definitely increase your artistic perspectives.
The One Hundred Years of Solitude by Gabriel Garcia Marquez is one of the most interesting novel I have ever read. First it starts with a married couple who are counsins, afraid that they will have a child with a pig tail, a myth about what happens when you marry close relations. This novel has the most confusing set of characters with the same name carried on from generation to generation. And this novel has some of the most interesting events that you will ever read. As you read this novel, you can actually see each charactrer falling into their life of solitude, one by one.This novel is very good, and I highly recommend it.
One Hunderd Years of Solitude left me disturbed.From the happy tale of two young lovers, who carveout a new village for themselves, to the incestousaccount of the last descendants of the family,the book has the power to unnerve the reader. Thestory rambles, so that you feel that time issuspended in Mocando. And yet as charactersgrow older, you notice that time is in fact movingin a circle. The same members of the family are reborn in theArcadia family, reincarnated as the 100 years passby. The forces compelling them to act as theydo, attract and repel you at the same time. Youtry and understand the events and thecharacters, but sheer incredulity and awe asthe story unfolds, leaves you stupefied. I amnot sure I love the book like I do "Jane Eyre"or admire it like I do "War and Peace".But I am powerfully attracted by it, and I'd like toread it again - if only to marvel at a magicalfamily, banished to one hunderd years of solitude.<BR
My 24 year old daughter had to read this for college, she raved about it all during the time they reviewed it in class. I have always been an avid reader and decided to give it a shot. It was......interesting to say the least, a little hard to follow if you haven't read anything deep and introspective. However I loved the story and it was fun to read
Recently in my college English class we were discussing books that we read in high school. My professor asked us to list the ones that we hated on the board and someone listed "One Hundred Years of Solitude". Many people agreed with her, but I must say I do not. I absolutely loved this book! I actually was not required to read it in high school, I was learning Spanish at the time and was looking for a book with elements of Spanish culture. It is long, and drawn out, and confusing and that is what makes it amazing. After finishing it I felt like I had lived it instead of reading it. I highly recommend it. If you are required to read this book in school give it a chance before you toss it aside because it is long, or it looks boring. It takes some time in the beginning to get into it but once you do, if you go into it with an open mind, you will not regret it.
I'd never read anything like this book before. Never even thought about almond trees until this book had me imagining it's smell. Although I was a bit biased at first this book opened me up to a whole new kind of prose. Needless to say this book had me reading every Marquez novel I could find.
A professor suggested Marquez's novel to me a few weeks ago. He has a doctorate in English (creative writing is his specialty) and suggested the novel to a graduating Master's student that felt undereducated. I found the work to be profound, enjoyable, and magical. Marquez is unparalleled in his art. Reviewing some of the previous comments, I am saddened by some of the negative comments. I encourage anyone to read the novel and to allow themselves to be pulled into Marquez's Macondo, from which you may gain new perspectives on time, age, personality, knowledge, details, worth, courage, fear, history, beauty, perception, magic, life, and love. I hope you will enjoy this novel as much as I did and praise it as long as the stars shall shine. This work is a victory of literature.-Foolish Buddha
When reading this epic I came to the conclusion that it is one of the most amazing stories I've ever read. It tells the story of the Buendia family and the creation of Macondo, a village where amazing things take place as a part of everyday life. We follow the Buendias from their fouding of Macondo and down to their descendents a hundred years later. This fiction portray several other interesting characters as well as they come to Macondo for a quick visit. Some more frequently than others. I read this in swedish so I won't comment the language.
I have read this extraordinary book in Rabassa's excellent translation...and now wil read it in Spanish to compare....like many others, the book took several attempts on my part to make it through...but once I did, I was drawn into a world that seemed to breathe outside of town and yet not so far from our reality...here the world is seen with eyes outside of linear time. beholding things such as ice for the first time.. you will find even eferences to the Ascension with Remedios the Beauty rising upward lost beyond the reaches of the birds of memory...or the plague of insomnia, with forgetfulness and reality slipping away with the meaning of words...here you will find passions celebrated among butterflies and scorpions...it is epic, full of revolutions, passions, discoveries, magic, all flowing from the banana town whose solitude was to be wiped by the winds....
This is by far, the best novel i have ever read in my whole 29 years . . . I was dreaming through the pages of this epic story of 7 generations , , wonderful by all means.
This book frustrates me, but in a good way. Reading it, get this feeling of how difficult life is to understand. It's just such a great book-- it makes you laugh, it depresses you, it makes you think and it just leaves mesmerized. Go ahead and buy this book, read it, and you won't be left feeling disappointed.
This book makes me want to learn Spanish so I can read it in Marquez's original language.This story is an epic of a kind you've never read. No heroes, no great voyage - just a family and their town. It's a kind of Book of Genesis for the Buendia family, a family that you will know intimately by the end of the novel as if it's your own.Marquez skillfully blends the tangible realities of hard life with supernatural interludes that help make this book one of the most beautifully poetic that I've ever read. It's the kind of book that when you finish - incidentally having one of the most perfect endings put to paper - you will sit back and think about it for a while. You will walk the hallways of the Buendia house long after you finish this book and swear that you've known the many people that lived and died there. And you will miss them.This book is a masterpiece. Put this first on your list.
This surrealistic excursion, told matter of factly in a style reminiscient of James Joyce, traces the life of several generations of the Buendia family, ordinary folks living ordinary lives in a small Colombian town who accidentally become witnesses to such monumental events as civil war, plagues, social oppresion while cherishing passionate encounters and obsessive fixations on obscure activities. Only in the final pages does it become clear that all which has transpired over the generations was foretold as the rise and fall of the Buendia family by the mystical gypsy Maquiliades. I suspect this literary masterpiece is more impressive in its original Spanish version, but its constant surprises and matter of fact style compel the reader's attention.
This is my favorite novel by some distance. The novel is simultaneously the story of several generations of an extended family and the story of the entire human race from the beginning of history. It is full of magic not only in the sense that magical things happen, but also in its glowing prose and deeply sympathetic portrayals of its characters. The repetition and near-repetitions of names over the generations invite the reader to conflate information about different characters, demonstrating the interconnectedness of the family members. Maybe it doesn't matter if we keep their identities straight, and maybe we're not even supposed to. Let the plot swirl and let Marquez work his magic. Then step outside and notice how the world shimmers and glows.
This is the best book I've read since The Triumph and the Glory. The quality of the writing is just superb. The characters so unrelentingly vivid they become as familiar as family. A very good book, I highly recommend it and cam just about guarantee that you will like it. Five stars.
This is one of those books that you will make all of your friends read once you have experienced its magic. It will take your through a hundred years of deaths, births, tragedies, and joys of a cursed family. And the best part is the ending - a conclusion that will leave you breathless!
One Hundred Years of Solitude chronicles 100 years of a family (of Buendia) and a village (city) that the "first of the family line" founded. The prose is lyrical and flows as smoothly as a river. That is, sometimes there are rapids and other times calm. The genre is magical realism, and it is fascinating watching the magic evolve with the family and village. After finishing this book, I'm not 100% certain what Marquez meant by it, though. It has anti-war and anti-oppressive-regime themes, but there's something more that I haven't quite put my finger on yet. I may need to re-read it after letting it settle for a while.
It's a sophisticated read with MANY subplots (most of which include characters with the same name). It can be confusing at times, but it's a good book once you learn each character. I read this book 5 times since 2008 and each time I read it, I discover something new. Don't expect a book you can just read once and move on with your life. It's not that simple.
Most likely the greatest epic I have ever read. The story grips you, pulls you in, and commands 100% of your concentration. Marquez deserves two Nobel Prizes for this tale.
This story really does take a geniune effort to read. With that it is a fantastic journey that will toy with your emotions in both positive and negative ways. A little confusing at times, but with steady reading it all comes together. Wonderful piece of literature!
This book blew my mind. I can be a bit slow and confusing (there are many characters with the same of very similar names) but the writing is of a caliber seldom seen. The story is intense and the people stick with you for years!
One Hundred Years of Solitude is one of the most fascinating books I have ever read ( and I have read thousands).Marquez is a giant. His skill is like that of a mythical creature, like a Phoenix combined with a hundred great authors.The pure fact that this book was written by one man is amazing. I don't want to say anything about the story. If you care about great literature, do not let life pass by without reading Marquez' masterpiece.
This book captivates you from beginning to end. I fell in love with the characters and enjoyed the colorful lives of each one. The symbolism and translation make this book one of a kind.
This is a book that comes but once in a lifetime. Everyone should read it. It is an interesting journey that will allow your mind and senses to places they've never been before. Don't be scared by its number of pages, it is an adventure one should undergo at least once.
It takes a writer like Garcia to undertake a novel of such mythic proportions. He weaves magic and fantasy into the politics of progress and greed, the loves, hates, incest and lies of human existence. Macondo is every place and Buendia is every man and woman. Garcia draws the reader to experience the depth and purity of the soul even as he constantly parodies its high moral ground by bodily functions and the smell of human pain and suffering. He lulls the reader into the bliss of solitude but forces them to confront the unbearable loneliness that it breeds. Here is life in all her forms!
Marquez creates a unique fictional world, a town called Macondo in the middle of the South American jungle.The language is lush, the characters unique. Marquez finally trusts the reader to accept fantasy and reality as equal partners in an ongoing unfolding of life.This is the only novel I've read four times. It works like magic, like great wine, like a wonderful piece of music.
I have ony read the first 100 pages of this book and the adjective "engrossing" is but an understatement. From the moment the family patriarch becomes obsessed with the magnets and alchemy equipment of the gypsies to the marriage of Rebeca, this literary trip has so far been an odysseey which leaves most everybody's family trees for wanting.Aside from the title theme of desolation is the less obvious but equally salient theme of discovery and its relationship to the science/magic dichotomy (I guess that this is the essence of this so-called "magical realism" phenomenon). Rarely has this subject matter been tackled with such perceptiveness and aesthetic. Though I have only read the beginning, I find myself wishing that the book were even longer than it already is.Thank you, Gabriel Garcia Marquez!
I found this book a little difficult getting started due to the way the author seems to skip aroundand introduces so many new characters but after about a third through the book, I began to get into it.The over all scope of the novel and the intimate details of emotions and feelings gives the story a realsense of feeling. It was a slow read as I kept going back and forth with it for about four weeks but I amhappy to have read it and now have a better understanding of another place and another culture.
I guess that is where this book is usually categorized in. Apparently, Gabriel Garcia Marquez popularized the genre. I loved the book and would put it in the top five of my list. There are people who I've talked to that thinks it was confusing or complicated. That was not the case for me. It's true that there were many characters (and it does not help that a lot of them are named similarly). But, I think each of them is distinct and was developed very well. The book is not about the town of Macondo...it's about the people who lived there. And, you will be able to relate to the book because of its very human characters set in an environment that is often very real but occasionally eerily surreal. That's magical realism for you.
One Hundred .... was the first book by García Marquez I read, since then I have read all his work, but I will never be so impressed by a book as I was with this one, the moment I finished it, I began again. The last pages got me so much that I kept doing as Aureliano was doing at the moment, trying to skip some bits to reach the end and find out what was the mistery of the book. Is a masterpice that everyone should read at least three times. It might not be the most beautiful one I've ever read, that is for sure ' Love in the times of cholera', but it is, for sure, the most powerfull.
I was surprised at how little was lost in the translation of this book. Garcia writes this novel as if it were poetry, he has a wonderful use of language that seems to braid mystical as well as humurous aspects into his writing. This is a novel that I won't forget and recommend readily.
I read this book during one of my sophomore literature courses (course selection) and I was kind of blown away. It's the type of book that you pick up and really can't put back down without being mysteriously drawn back to it. Within the bounds of the book, you get sucked into wondering how in the world the Buendía family became so [messed] up and end up marvelling at the "progress" of their town. I didn't give it five stars because I thought that it became kind of murky towards the end, kind of hard to follow. Be warned though, this is a pretty dark book, and if you're one to desire that resolution occur for the sake of having an ending, then don't read this - it might make you angry. If you don't mind a bit of random humor and can breeze past the bit of vulgarity that's in the book, then press on. It's a great read, especially on a rainy day when tornadoes are on the prowl.
This book seems to move beyond so many other books not only in its message, but also in the beauty of description. The intricacy and almost surrealism of the plot draws the reader in so intently its exhilarating. Also, the tone is calming as you learn of the Buendia family and their history. You will come away from this book with a sharper eye for the magical aspects of everyday life, as well as a few hours of absolute escape and bliss. Read it. You're not likely to regret it!
I read this book many many years ago when I was 14. I did not read it in English or Spanish. At the time I didn't know either one. I read it in Persian, but that did not diminish the effect it had on me at all. I guess the translation must have been good. I must have read the book some 12 times over the period of that year. And still, every once in while as I am driving my car, a passage from the book comes to my mind and takes me back to the magic that it was. I do not want to read this book again. I don't think that after getting accustomed to the reality of life around me my heart can handle such surge of emotions as it did then. If you haven't read it though, and you are able to pull yourself back to reality after finishing the book, I strongly recommend it.
I just finished reading this book, and like most fresh reads it is staying on my mind. The writing from the first chapter is so fanciful and descriptive it compares to no other. I loved and hated this book at the same time. It is dark, it is about family and war and infidelity and love. It doesn't mention the word solitude until you're about half way through - and when Marquez does mention it, he keeps mentioning it and it seems to be the obvious title for the book. It is almost like when he first says it, you experience his "Ah, ha" moment. Being a happy go lucky person myself, I found myself rooting for happiness, and there is happiness. It is a good read. It comes full circle. Enjoy
Magic realism plus rich, beautiful latin culture combines to make a beautiful novel of a town's history. So many wonderfully impossible things happen that this was just a treat to read, even during the heart wrenching moments. I think it's one of the riskier books for Oprah's club, but I can't wait to see what people say. Splendid!
I am an avid book reader, but I have never read anything like this book. It is definitely different. Reviews on Oprah's book club site stated how many people cried at the end. I didn't--I didn't really like any of the characters. I do not know if it was because of a cultural difference or what. Basically I think it was because I could not get over the way Marquez writes about women...and the incest. Let's just say I was totally amazed to find out the author was actually married. However, it is a real experience to read and discuss this book with just about anyone. And the ending is superb--one of the best I've ever read.
My first couple of tries at reading this book didn't go very far. I never made it beyond the first chapter. Then on a visit to Colombia I was determined to read this book. I kept at it. Before long I was totally absorbed into the story, which is truly fascinating and amazing. Now I don't know why I could not get into it on my earlier attempts. I'm so glad that I persisted. So, the book that I originally couldn't get into, finally became one of my favorite novels.
This is a stunning literary masterpiece. It takes some patience to get into but once you are involved in the story, it is difficult to put down. God, after I finished reading the book it felt like I went into shock. The prose is gorgeous but it is the larger story, stories within stories, and metaphors that are so striking. Will stay with me for the rest of my life.
A few writers in each generation are gifted with such writing talent that they create books that make you catch your breath. Gabriel Garcia Marquez is one of those writers. His gift with prose, the way he uses language, his storytelling ability is staggering. This is an engrossing read from the very first sentence. You will be captivated by the magical world that has been created and the all too human characters that populate the story.For reading pleasure, I would recommend the Harper Perennial Modern Classics edition of this book, which has those very convenient flaps on the front and back covers that make perfect bookmarks to save your page when you do manage to put the book down!
I read One Hudred Years of SOlitude like 6 times over the years, and it still holds its magic and atmosphyre. Just an unbelievable classic. It feels weary and long at moments, also distracting at moments but its originality and magical ventures arise and fill the soul. Must have.
This is absolutely the most wonderful book I've ever read. I read more than one book every week, so what can I say!! A must read, which you will not want to put down. There's so much to this than just the story.. Beautifully written and wonderously haphazard presentation!
This is the novel that made the author succeed and it's obvious why. A story which seems it's never going to finish, has an incredible ending (I read the last page like a hundred times already). A personal advise would be to get a chart of the family tree, otherwise you may not enjoy it as I have
Wonderful, wonderful! This book is so packed with such magical scenes. Witty. Funny. Outrageous. One of a kind characters. I can read it all over again and still find a lot of details I never noticed before. Everytime I read this the story always seems new. Definitely one book for all who love books.
Garcia-Marquez is my favorite autor and "One Hundred Years of Solitude" is a wonderful book, one that should be read by every intelligent reader. He deftly suspends the laws of reality and takes you to a world that will leave you with the feeling that you have just returned from a rejuvenating vacation. This book is not to be missed. The writing is at once mystical and cathartic, and it will leave you breathless.
No wonder this book has become an instant classic. It is. This is probably the best translated book that I've ever read. Very confusing, at first, but very imaginative. More of a fantasy than anything else, really. Much better the second time through. I loved the characters and the setting!
100 Years of Solitude is a must-read for anyone intrested inmagical realism and the beauty of South American literature.It is simply the standard by which all other Latin AmericanNovels will be judged, but putting aside the lofty complimentsfor a moment, 100 Years of Solitude is a necessary journeyfor any reader engaged in the human struggle and the cycle oflife.The novel's lyricism is as simple as a journey down a calm river, yetas complex as the idea of gravity pulling that water down theriver. It is this lyricism that sets Gabriel Garcia Marquezapart from the other story tellers of his time--and a storyteller is exactly what Marquez is, a story teller of grandproportions, that will keep you sitting at the fire with himuntil his epic story is complete.
I wanted to locate my flat panel in a difficult location. Seeing this item gave me hope that I could finally accomplish this. Although quite expensive, the price seemed reasonable compared to what was available in local stores and their even higher prices.My unit I own a 46" flat panel, but decided to take a chance that this item would be adequate. Ordered the item and waited with baited breath. Without any inquiry or such, the mount arrived promptly as advertised. Much to my surprise, the company and up sized my order, I can only assume because of availability, to the next size.It was constructed well beyond my expectations and installed easily. The flat panel is in its new location and given me much more flexiblity with the arranging of my living room.By the way, I don't have any doubt that if they had sent exactly the item I'd order that is would have worked out just as well also.
Being very new to the Atlanta area, I needed some help finding my way around and knowing where to shop for what. This book eased my transition, and more than paid for itself.
Type 2 diabetes is a national epidemic. Lifestyle changes, including diet and exercise, are necessary to prevent complications (heart disease, stroke, vascular disease, blindness) in those with Type 2 diabetes and prevent the disease from occurring in those at high risk. Medical advice regarding diet often leaves patients confused and therefore unable to follow their advice. Kristine Napier defines Type II diabetes and the steps needed to control this disease in a way that is easy to understand. She provides advice and examples to help the reader incorporate her guidelines into their everyday life. Her 28 day guide of menus will help those get started and as always, Kris's recipes are easy to follow and delicious. Last, but not least of importance, is that all of Kris's advice is based on scientific evidence and conforms to national guidelines.
I've been buying a fair amount of very old recordings lately, and I have enjoyed this one more than most. Will Oakland has a high, strong voice that is distinctive and almost sweet-at least on Emmett's Lullaby, Tennessee Moon, and a few of the other standouts. Unfortunately, it appears this is the only recording of his work available. Billy Murray is also a top notch singer, as on Waiting for the Robert E. Lee. The sound quality here is as good as anything prior to 1925 (these songs were recorded in 1912-1914). Basically, this is high quality barbershop quartet music with an excellent falsetto voice that often sings lead.
Terry Pratchett has done it again! "Men At Arms" offers a laughable look at some of the biggest problems facing our world today. Prejudice, crime, anarchy, and segregation are all addressed in his unique, farcical style. This is what parody is all about! Join Corporal Carrot and the rest of the Night Watch as they encounter Trolls, Dwarves, a talking dog and gargoyles in a search for a murderer and a "gonne." You'll never look at the world the same way again
What can I say about this novel? First, as all other discworld novels this makes me laugh. City police try to struggle against crime and anarchy. However city guards aren't such "normal" police. They are trolls and dwarfs, everyone with their own characteristics. This novel is easy to read and very enjoyable where ever you are.
A well-crafted, sharp-witted tale that will be especially appealing to anyone who has ever read Tolkien and his ilk. Discworld is at once absurd and complex, yet held against the fabric of our reality, it's just as plausible. I'm hard pressed to think of a more likable character than Corporal Carrot. The modest anti-gun message was subtle enough to remain unobtrusive.
Assassins, attractive werewolves, smelly talking mongrel dogs ... whats not to love!For personal reasons i can relate to Sam Vines & his continuing evolution is wonderful to watch.Now if he can just obey orders for once ... or maybe that's just not Sam.
I love the Night Watch novels, I am reading the third at the moment, I can't stop! They are funny and surprising and introduce concepts from our world in such a way that parodies and makes a comment on society same time. This book has Leonard of Quirm (Discworld's thinly veiled version of Da Vinci) inventing a dangerous device which is "running" loose on the citizens of Ankh Morpork. A mystery for Captain Vimes and the Night Watch - Carrot, Colon, Nobby and the new recruits to solve - romance, intrigue and hilarity abound, I want more! Thank you amazon kindle for letting me download them instantly, this makes me very happy.
For $15 the sound is surprisingly clear, the ear buds, the controls, & the # of songs (up to 500) are all fine. The item has to be clipped down otherwise it slips off. A worthwhile buy for the gym. Not for someone who needs to select which song to hear - it has two functions: random or order you loaded the songs from your computer. The big negative: your computer has to stay on for 4 hours during the initial charge; if the computer goes to sleep the player stops charging. Same for subsequent charging.
This was an good movie, but I've seen better. It was a little overdone with the evil ice cream man who has glowing red eyes sometimes, the bully who's afraid of a little kid show character, the moneymaking "businessman"(really a middle schooler,)and the success driven pricipal. It had it's funny parts and it's bad parts, but all in all in was an OK movie. Try it out.
This movie is about a kid who thinks he is moving to Chicago from ?So he decides to back at bullies,teachers,etc. Then it turns out he isn't moving!& that's all I can tell!Buy It!
MY KIDS AND I LOVED THE MOVIE. IT'S YOUR USUAL KID OVERCOMING HIS FEARS AND BEATING THE BULLY STORY, BUT IT IS FUNNY. I THINK I MAY HAVE ENJOYED MORE THAN MY KIDS.
I jut enjoy this movie the boy that plays robe the actor is Josh Peck from Drake and Josh show. In my dvd box it had a big picture.
I am not persay a huge fan of kids movies, but this one had me falling over laughing. The kids in this movie are just hillarious, the story with the evil principal is totally worth seeing. Even being a so called grown up, I would watch this over and over and over again! Get it, you will love it as will your kids!
I love this show!! I am VERY DISAPOINTED that the other seasons are not for sale. Shouldnt they be by now? I would buy all of them and be proud to add them to my movie collection.
Good drama, good sense of humor. It has serious topics but doesn't get too preachy or stuffy. Down to earth characters that are real and very likable. I wish it was still going, House can be a little too cold sometimes.
The package came and the item was just as described, new in the shrink wrap. Plays perfectly. Two thumbs up!
I read this book as part of an MBA module. I didnt know anything about Activity Based Costing at the time and so the book was a little difficult since it was not meant to be an introduction to the subject. After I did some research and became more familiar with the material, I realised how great this book is. I have read it twice. The book is well structured and the authors use plenty of real life case studies. The reason I gave it only 4 stars is that I would have rather seen a large section at the end of the book with more detailed information about the case studies. I read some Harvard case studies that were mentioned in the text and it was really helpful because they put things in perspective. I think the authors should have included two or three case studies with their analysis at the end of the book. Other than that, I dont think that there is a better book about the subject out there.
When it all comes down to comparing "Accelerator" with other FSOL works, it becomes apparent that the same ratings systems cannot be used. Afterall, "Accelerator" is FSOL's most accessable album, something which appeals both to hardcore FSOL fans, and the average techno-loving Joe who may not be into the whole "Ambient-Trance" genre which FSOL's "LifeForms" basically defined. And where "LifeForms" is full of natural sounds and music which is hypnotic and almost not music at all, "Accelerator" is full instead of beats, structure, and the usual odd sound clips which are thrown in on occaison to add variety. And while this does make it a good album, it is not FSOL's best; rating third, after "LifeForms" and "Dead Cities".
Despite being released at the turn of the 90's, 'Accelerator' sounds less old-fashioned nowadays than either 'FSOL' or 'LifeForms', and if they are remembered for anything it will be 'Papua New Guinea', their mixture of dub bass, breakbeats and Dead Can Dance. A well-balanced halfway-house between intelligent techno and ambient, 'Accelerator' is frequently gorgeous, and extremely nostalgic. In 1992, it seemed as if intelligent electronic dance music would precipitate an irreversible shift in musical culture, and although FSOL didn't leave much of a legacy, this makes Basement Jaxx doubly pitiable.
Accelerator. If you don't have this album, you don't know anything about electronic music. It's a classic through-and-through. Although it may sound slightly dated, it still stands head-and-shoulders above most techno albums today. With impressive range, from the moody "While Others Cry" and the trance-forerunner "Calcium" to the nu-industrial of "Central Industrial" and the storming "Moscow," Accelerator still is a great listen. This re-release also includes 10 mixes of "Papua New Guinea," a title that should inspire devotion among all fans of electronic music. Blue States does its usual downtempo magic on the track, while Simian makes it sound like the carnival from hell. Hybrid (of course) adds some hard breaks, while Satoshi Tomiie makes some dark house. Some good mixes, but do they hold up to the original? What do you think the answer is?
This disc single-handedly changed my perceptions of modern dance music. Though I originally bought the CD for its "alright" techno tracks (It's Not My Problem, Moscow, Calcium) I slowly warmed up to the more adventurous songs, especially Papua New Guinea. For those who haven't heard the song let me tell you...YOURE MISSING OUT BIG TIME!!! Other good tracks are Expander, Central Industrial, and the remixes.
This is set in play format with a strange inclusion of the antagonists alter ego the two characters are Public the man everyone sees and Private the man no one sees or hears only Public can hear him. Together they make up Gar. The play is set the night before Gar is set to leave Ireland and move to Philadelphia. The story focuses not on his leaving but more on his escape from his unexciting father. The inclusion of Private Gar added humour and explanation of events in the play. An enjoyable play with greats dialog and a good story.
Have you ever sat amongst friends, or maybe even strangers, and swapped stories with each person attempting to make their tale appear to be the most impelling. This is in essence the design of Geoffrey Chauncer's "Canterbury Tales", a collection of stories told by a group of travelers on a pilgrimage to Canterbury Cathedral. Of these stories the most noted are "The Knight's Tale", "The Wife of Bath's Tale", "The Miller's Tale", "The Reeve's Tale", and "The Parson's Tale". Chaucer, born in the early 1340s (the exact date is unknown), lived a most notable life and had a profound impact on English literature. Much of his works are influenced by love and his distain for the Church in the form of satirical humor. The latter due impart to the corruption within the clergy and the condition of the people from their suffering of drought, famine, and disease. Chaucer's work brought to light a new age of literature full of wit, comedy, and daily life.
Chaucer's The Canterbury Tales are nothing short of genius and one of the few glimpses we have into 14th century life today. Romance, Comedy, Adventure and Fantasy - there should be something here to amuse everyone.If you're a little to intimidated by the original Middle-English version then this is the book for you. My suggestion is to read this version first, then get a copy in the original Middle-English and read that.
I bought this book after reading the Pardoner's tale in my High School English class. It's wonderful, and the translation is great, not to mention that Chaucer is one of the best writers of all time. I think that I may slightly prefer Shakespeare, but not by much.. and many of the tales have things in them that I didn't think people even would dare talk about hundreds of years ago.. that was really cool. I will definitely read this book again, when I'm in the mood for it. ^_^
Thoroughly interesting. The organization of this book must of been very creative for the time. A group consisting of everyone from a cook to a knight set out on a religios pilgrimage to Canterbury. A humorous tavern owner suggests a way to help pass the time, everyone tells a story, and the persone who tells the best story gets a free dinner. The stories range from serious tales about chivalry and love (knight) to the disgusting and perverse (summoner). Apparently Chaucer planned to have each member of the party tell two tales, but I suppose he didn't get around to finishing the collection. Also, I think 1 or 2 of the stories are not complete, but that's in every edition you can buy.
Clearly, during Chaucer's time, the english language was looked down on as inderior by the other languages of Europe. The Canterbury tales were important because of the use of the venacular language of england. It represents our first look into our language.
I suppose that any freshman college student has read some of these Tales. I had a professor who read a few of them to us in the Olde English. It was really fun and you really got a grasp of where the English language was coming from - and poetry.I went on from my English class and read the whole works. They are good, classic short stories. You are really going back to the basics here. The stories are all easy to read and are about the everyday type people and their everyday lives. You get classic English literature, history, short story writing techniques, and the roots of the English language all in one medium sized book. Can't beat it. It's a bargain.Richard EdwardNoble - The Hobo Philosopher - Author of:"A Summer with Charlie"
The Canterbury Tales is my very favorite book. I personally enjoy the original Middle English version and would highly suggest it to all who are interested in it. (I purchased a 1929 copy of Everyman's Library Series The Canterbury Tales from my favorite used bookstore.) Though I have read my Everyman's Library version so many times I can repeat many sections word for word, I also own Nevill Coghill's translation and it is delightful. It is one of the best translations of the book which I have read. I, of course, would suggest reading it in Middle English, but if you are frusturated or confused by the language then I would recommend this translation. It sticks closely to the feeling that you get from Chaucer's original text. I gave this 4 stars instead of 5 because the Middle English version will always hold the number one spot in my heart.
This book is more a collection of short stories. Many of them are very funny, there was only one that I found my self getting bored with.
The first story "The Knight's Tale" is on par with "Aucassin and Nicolette" (Andrew Lang), and The Friendship of "Amis and Amile" (Old French Romances, William Morris, which can usually be bought through Alibris as a used book put out by (...)) In my own opinion "The Knight's Tale" is the only reason to purchase or read The Canterbury Tales. It is unmatched if heard on audio book,Blackstone Audiobook, unabridged, read by Fred Williams, ISBN: 0-7861-2239-0.(I purchased mine at audio books on cassette.)
I remember reading this book my soph. yer in high school and sruggling a lot with the translation. But with this addition it is so much easier to fallow. His stories represent one of the motliest crews in English literature: the Wife of Bath who has put away five husbands and is looking for a sixth; the pardoner, the reeve, the clerk, and the knight. THe Millers tale is absolutely histerical and will crack you up. Hope you enkoy reading this book as much as i did.
Well written and beautifully illustrated. A good introduction to Chaucer for young and old. A very good winter read indeed..
*****Chaucer's "Canterbury Tales" are timeless. The tales (mostly in verse, although some are in prose) are told as part of a story-telling contest by a group of pilgrims as they travel together on a journey from Southwark to the shrine of Saint Thomas Becket at Canterbury Cathedral. These stories paint pictures of medieval life, theology, and culture.And this edition is most preferable to me. I highly recommend it!*****
The Canterbury Tales is so appealing due to it's diverseness. Chaucer was involved with every level of society during his time. This is shown with how the characters are so well-rounded. The short, but insightful description of the travelers is also helpful in picturing this group riding on thier way to the shrine of Becket. A great book everyone should read, but one of those you have to be in the mood for. Also don't expect a continuing theme or story, but short stories that sometimes leaves you hanging.
The Canterbury Tales is the chronicle of a contest. A storytelling contest between pilgrims on their way to Canterbury. This is probably the best translation I have read. It does have some downfalls the author excluded some of the tales including the Parson's tale which is actually meant to be a conclusion(Chaucer died before he could finish the tales). Other than that the book is very good. It does break some myths and sterotypes we have about people of that time and some of the stroies are rather humorous and could still be considered humorous in todays society.
In order to understand English litterature and the English language, many have read, or at least tried to read, Chaucers "Canterbury Tales". I too did begin (and sort of finished) the work in Middle English, which is not as hard as one might be lead to think, but is quite labourious and painstakingly slow at times. With this version, a great compromise has been found, translating it as true to the original as possible yet in modern English. I know that every time you make a rewrite or translation, things are lost, but sometimes it is necessary, or just quite convenient. This is one of those times.It is great fun reading the Canterbury Tales. The structure of the work makes it very accesible and easy to pick up after some time away. You could treat it as a whole entity or as a collection of short stories centered around a group of persons on a pilgrimage. One of the books that any decent home library shouldn't be without.
This movie is excellent on its own, but absolutely extraordinary when paired with its sequel, Manon of the Spring. I highly reccomend the two as a pair to anyone considering either.
IN ANSWER TO THE FIRST REVIEW ABOUT THIS MOVIE, MOST PEOPLE (IN THE UNITED STATES) ARE REALLY IGNORANT OF WHAT GOOD FILMS ARE ALL ABOUT. THEY ARE BLINDED BY TODAY'S "HOLLYWOOD" INDUSTRY WHICH IS LESS THAN PERFECT, TO SAY THE LEAST...EVERYONE...: DO YOURSELFS A FAVOR: START WATCHING MORE FOREIGN FILMS..., MOST OF THEM ARE NOT PRETENTIOUS, NOT SHALLOW, NOT HOLLYWOOD..., EVERYONE MIGHT LEARN A THING OR TWO.GREAT FILM, FULL OF GOOD CONTENT AND MEANING!!!
Truly, this is one of my all-time favorite movies. It is a realistic story that has made it possible for me to see how one thinks and how one acts in life, and how everything has its reason in the end. Highly recommended movie, Cheers, Branko Miros
Dear readers, This book was definitly worth reading. Not only does it give information about the finding of the " Unsinkable Ship ", there is also a story going on at the same time about her fateful night. I have to tell you though, it's heart-wrenching and emotional at times. Some of the information it gives is about the machines used to find the TITANIC, and stuff like that. That was a little hard to understand for me, and it probably would also for young children. I hope you enjoy this book, as you go back to the TITANIC.
This book made me cry for alot of reasons. But mostly for the humanity. It the dozens of books that I have read on Titanic, none compares to this one. I liked the author to know that I hate him for it and love him for it just the same. He ruined my day with the harsh reality and changed my life with it's inspiration. Thomas Andrews would be amazed. Oh yes, he would be utterly amazed. -Jaime N. Rinne/Titanic Historian
I read Titanic in the early part of 1997. I found the book fascinating, especially to one who knew very little of the disaster and the uncovering of the broken ship. I have recommended the book as a must read to many of my friends. Skip the movie and read the book!
Listeners of this cd will be reminded that, in the era of just three guitars and a drummer, the British Invasion provided a pleasant change from American sounds in the early 1960s. The sound quality of this cd is remarkable. On "Don't Throw Your Love Away" you can actually hear someone in the studio rustling some papers at the very start of the song. The opening drum riff on "Needles and Pins" will stir the blood of any Mersey listener. This album is nothing but pop....but pure, straight and beautiful pop it is with jingle jangle guitars and high harmonies covering songs that strongly hint of a lost era of innocence. Either you love this stuff ...or you don't!
I've been a fan for Lee Evans for a while and his Live in Scotland DVD is one of his best, not the best just one of. Not too long and not too short, Lee Evans punches out hilarious jokes and sketches with perfect timing and comedic ease. Lee Evans delivers tear jerking laughter while using everyday occurences and impersonations of unknown common people as his subject matter. This DVD is a perfect example of what kind of comedian Evans is. Using physical comedy mixed with voice acting and clever stories, Lee's performance will but a smile on anyones face.A highly recommended comedy DVD from one of Britains most successful and treasured comedians.
Classic genre - underdog trying to make her dreams come true.. A sexy story that surprising ends well..Violet moves to the big city in the hopes of taking her writing career to the next level.. Reality check has her desperate for work in a city where no one ever listens..Coyote Ugly - possibly the sexiest club man has ever seen (a modern day Moulin Rouge) - Enter the young - innocent -inexperienced Violet.. Will she fit into the world of the "Coyotes"??..Cameo appearence by country singing sensation LeAnn Rimes - Little unknown fact - LeAnn provided all the vocals performances for Violet.. Piper apparently can't sing - but boy can she act!5 Stars.. :D .. An Excellent Sexy movie.. :D
I thought that Coyote Ugly was an awesome movie. Piper Perabo has great talent and should be given or sought out for more roles. This movie is a definite must see, as well as, a must have. The music for the movie was right on, although I would have loved to hear Piper's voice on more of the songs. She is definite STAR material... :-)
Coyote Ugly is a sexy "feel good" movie. We get a nice introduction to Piper Perabu, who may well be the next Alicia Silverstone or Cameron Diaz. It is basically a story of a naive girl from New Jersey who comes to New York to persue her dream as a singer/songwriter.When she realizes that she isn't going to be an instant success, she takes a job in club with the title name. Her dancing skills improve and her fear of perfoming in front of crowds starts to diminish. She incidentally meets a nice young man whom she starts seeing, and though there are troubles, her move to the top is going strong by the end of the movie.The plot is very predictable, but the acting is well above average. It was nice to see of movie of this genre with relatively little foul language. I don't believe the "F" word was used at all. All in all, a nice and enjoyable movie that is suitable for most members of the family. I recommend it.
I like this movie. I think it is entertaining. I wanted to have this movie in dvd and add it to my collection.
- This is just a brilliant movie which combines o lot of aspects in youth problemacy..! -I really love this movie....!
I love this movie, we had it on VHS and then our VHS player died so had to replace it with this. Works great.
my husband loves this movie, so I bought it for him as a christmas present to add to his dvd collection
this is definitely more of a chick flick than a guy movie! in all honesty though, its a GREAT movie. although geared more towards younger girls, i'm sure anyone could enjoy this movie! its just an all out great movie and i'd recommend it to anyone!
This is a great movie, one of the best i have seen in a while. It is full of ambition, a young girl who finds a job at the Bar Coyote Ugly, and it is not just a bar job, but her boss if living out her dream and gives her the courage to fullfil her own dreams. Full of laughts with a great ending.
Piper Perabo as an exhibitionist with stage fright? Okay, so you can't just suspend your disbelief with this movie, you have to hang it up in the back closet and forget it even exists for two hours. But the beer flows freely, there's lots of T&A for the guys and nipples-and-ripples for the ladies, and there's a highly improbable but very satisfying cameo by LeAnn Rimes belting out "Can't Fight the Moonlight," a song that, come to think of it, is as slight yet satisfying as this movie is.I won't go into the plot. Not that there's anything to give away, really, and it's secondary to the bar scenes and the music. But if you don't go into this movie expecting acting and an actual story, and just accept it for the on-screen party that it is, it can be a pretty enjoyable time and a great movie for getting down and dirty with your date.
Coyote Ugly may not be the ideal family movie but it is excellent. it tells the story of young female musician whose only dream is to have someone like Whitney Houston or Mariah Carey sing her songs. After moving to New York on her own she is forced to find work in order to remain living in her apartment. She meets up with the Coyotes and finally finds her dreams through them. Excellent movie with a great cast.
As an aspiring singer, I found this film to be closely related to the struggles that musicians go through. Unlike Violet, I don't have stage fright, as a matter of fact, I love being on stage. However, taking 'odd' jobs is something that I'm very relatible to. Even tho I've never taken a job at a bar quite like Coyote Ugly, it shows that when you are trying to achieve a dream, you do whatever possible. So far when it comes to dancing on a bar, I've only ever done it for fun, but it just goes to prove that we don't have an easy time of it trying to make it in the music business, and this type of scenerio is incredibly possible because when you're desperate, you do whatever it takes, even if it means sacrificing a little bit of dignity...even tho you can still have a hell of a lot of fun doing it. Over all this film is easily a 4 because it's not just about girls shaking it on a bar, it's about getting what you want.
I'm pretty sure for all of us guys whose seen the trailer for the first time thought this movie was targeted for the male audience. But guess what, producer Jerry Bruckheimer fooled us! It's a... chick flick! But it's a... good chick flick! Not only is Piper Perabo's character is infectiously loveable, but the other Coyotes are hot and sexy as well. The plot isn't extra-ordinary, but it's fun to watch with the help of the great soundtrack and funny moments. The DVD features a behind-the-scenes look at the movie, cool graphics, and a music video with LeAnn Rimes.
This is not a great movie in the aspects of technique or storytelling. It is movie that does one thing great, entertain. The sole purpose of a movie is to entertain the viewer. "Footloose" and "Dirty Dancing" were not great movies but they will never be forgotten because they entertained the viewer. "Coyote Ugly" is a feel-good about yourself movie. The music energizes the audience. The bar dancing keeps the movie-watchers interested. I went the movie with two friends who were both girls. I am 18 and they are 17. We all really liked the movie. The rest of the night we were dancing around and singing the music that we heard. This is great movie because it leaves a lasting impression on the viewer.
I saw this movie because I`m a Leann Rimes fan and she`s in it.I was pretty impresed with this movie and I highly reccomend it to anyone almost!Definately a must-see!
The strengths of this DVD are : 1) A nice storyline which shows how a country girl tries to survive in NY. 2) Nice music eg. Can't fight the moonlight, etc. throughout the show. 3) Girl-Appeal esp. the innocence of Piper Perabo and the sensuality of the coyotes. 4) Romance with a nice ending :) 5) various commentaries on the movie 6) music video of 'can't fight the moonlight'
I thought that this was going to be a really stupid movie of only bar dancing scenes, but I was wrong there were bar dancing scenes but they also tried to put a story.
I thought that this movie was very good and the girls very hotter than John Goodman in the Mojave Desert. Bruckheimer did a great job and the story line is really good
I am so tired of reading reviews from people who think every movie should be an artistic masterpiece, or at the very least, should have a poignant message. This is one of the most entertaining films my wife and I have seen in a long time, and none of the people involved with its production have anything to apologize for. It unquestionably delivers exactly what Bruckheimer, et al intended, and it does not pretend to be anything else. If I wanted something artistic or meaningful, I would have looked for word "Miramax" on the outside of the box - a studio that has made many wonderful movies, but not the type of high impact, SIMPLE fun Jerry Bruckheimer and the late Don Simpson have delivered so well. Sometimes, it's just what the doctor ordered.Turn out the lights, turn up the volume, break out the popcorn, have a few drinks, and enjoy...
I can watch this over and over again. I had to wait for it to come on tv until I finally bought it
I love this movie,i watched it the first time with my best friend and then realized that i had to have a copy of it because its such a great movie
This album still has the great vocals, and the rock and techno combination. So whats the big difference between this and their self- titled album? The songs on this one don't have the same dark edge and I don't think that Shirley's vocals work as well. That being said its still a good album and worth a buy (after you've purchased their first). Best songs:Temptation Waits- Seductive.I think I'm Paranoid- Has a pretty dark vibe to it.When I grow up- Being a teenager I really relate to the lyrics.Medication- It does for this album what "Queer" did for their first.Special- Catchy.Push it- Interesting lyrics.
Another collection of the hypnotic Shirley Manson tunes. This album is equally entrancing and rocking. I didn't think they could top there 1st cd but they clearly are exceptional musicians. If your a Shirley Manson fan (lover), you've got to get Version 2.0. She will take you away....(again).
With version 2.0 Grabage tries to relive the newness of the first album by upping the techno and yet they fall into a very pop like atmosphere in a series of their songs. But as always the are at the head of the pack.
It sounds right, is the best way to say this. Sometimes an album just clicks, tracks in order, everything moving smoothly together. Such is the sound of VERSION 2.0, a big, liquid album with a song for every mood. Here is a group that enjoys playing together -- see them in concert; they have a good time -- and they spend the album playing with us, doing bleak, doing frantic, doing downright catty. Showing off? They have a right to. This is very good stuff.
i think the songs paranoid, special, push it, and wicked ways were overall the good best songs that have ever been put out by garbage. the rest weren't anything special, but they were good none the less.
When I read professional music critics' reviews about Version 2.0, I read these super technical descriptions and criticisms of the album which honestly, is a waste of time. Why don't they say the truth without further hassle? This album is excellent from the first track to the last. For even those who aren't familiar with Garbage or their first album but just want to rock, this is a great choice. It's excellent--EXCELLENT!
Push It- makes the listener wonder what the heck she's talking about.Special-Interesting song about liking but now hating.Hammering in my Head-A fast techno song.There's not one bad song on this album and I would tell about other songs but... Anyways you cant go wrong!
Garbage returned in '98 with their excellent sophmore album. VERSION 2.0 is so slick, you'll slip on it. Shirley Manson [lead vocals and songwriter] vamps every song for all it's worth. She's slick, sly, and clever in every delivery. VERSION 2.0 is groove heavy with more electroica than their debut back in '95. Garbage became more of a pop band with this album. The hooks and melodies are awesome. Each track is seemless, timeless, pop mixed with rock and electronic influences. VERSION 2.0 is an improvement from their debut. Shirley's voicals are exellent. It's sexy and it goes very well with this awesome album.
Shirley Manson has an incredibly sexy voice, and when she's backed up by awesome techno beats and grinding guitars, Garbage can really make some great music. My favorite tracks are When I Grow Up and Hammering in my Head. After a while, though, the songs can get repetitive, especially towards the end of the cd, but no real harm done. If you want cool guitars with a good beat, you should check out Garbage's Version 2.0!!
after the fanstatic acclaimed debut album, garbage had a rough second album to make.well, version 2.0 is the perfect second album. More pop-electronic and yet with the same dark obscure feeling the first album had.shirley's voice is more adaptaded to the songs and they seem to be more a band than they used to. one of garbage's best caracteristics is that all musics are very good. here you can't say that one or two songs are below the average, because they're all excellent. please listen to this album, that confirms that garbage are one of the best (or why not, the best!) band around!
This is my first garbage CD and I really enjoy it. The words are very powerfull and Shirley Manson's voice is amazing! I highly recommend this CD.
I saw Garbage in concert at The Night 89x Stole X-Mas in Detroit, and they were by far the best group there. This album is excellent. A definate buy!
All I had ever heard of Garbage were a couple of their music videos until my friends persuaded me to buy this CD. Now I listen to it at least twice a week. I usually go for music with lighter lyrics, but I've fallen head-over-heels in love with all these songs, even "Medication". As much as I love the whole CD, I do have favorites: I listen to "When I Grow Up" and "Hammering in My Head" so much I'm bound to wear the CD out!
Garbage has no doubt put out a kickass sophomore album!! I'm completely hooked on the song "You Look So Fine"-it takes me to a different world. Special also is one of the greatest singles out there right now! I got it for Christmas and haven't hardly gotten through a day without listening to it. Once you hear Shirley's voice, there's no turning back, and if you do than there is something wrong with you! I enjoyed this album just as much as their first, but i appreciate this one on a whole different level. There's no trash involved with this garbage. Aside from Pink Floyd, there is no better!!! YOU HAVE GOT TO BUY IT!!!
Shirley Manson's melodious voice flows through each track of Version 2.0 flawlessy and beautiful, backed up by Butch Vig's stellar percussion, and Duke Erikson and Steve Marker's guitar. Taking in each song of Garbage is a joy. Some might be over-syntesized but if you break that barrier you can see and feel the genius that is Garbage. You journey from the Euro-dance style of "Hammering in my head" to the genuine rock-pop sound of "I think I'm paranoid". Garbage Version 2.0 aims to please.
Garbage has released one of the few cd's that can just play through, with every song having a certain flavor and enjoyability. Songs on this album range from dark and stormy (push it) to fast paced rock (when i grow up) and each has a pleasent variety. The songs lyrics are deep and meaningfull, and are easy to relate to, in my opion, version 2.0 is a groundbreaking and interesting album, that is sure to delight many a wide audiance.
Version 2.0 is a refreshing change for Garbage. Much more techno and less guitar, the general feel of the album is lighter than the previous debut album. Shirley Manson's vocals are great, she sounds happy, and she does a lot of her sexy whispering. The songs are catchy and mostly upbeat including the new hit 'Push It'. A few tracks are instrumentally overpowering- the vocals are hard to hear. Some of the lyrics don't make a lot of sense...but overall Version 2.0 is an impressive effort. After you listen to it you'll find yourself humming Garbage tunes trying to sound like Shirley. :)
This is a great album. I bought it because of the singles: I think I'm Paranoid, When I Grow Up, Push It, Special, You Look So Fine - they are all fantastic, but there are other great songs as well. The songs have instant hooklines that make them catchy - but not poppy. Shirley's voice is amazing, and very seductive in a raw kind of way. The songs are atmospheric, good to chill out to, and also good to rock to. Standout tracks are: Push It, I think I'm Paranoid, Temptation Awaits, Special, When I Grow Up, Medication. Temptation Awaits is a fantastic opening track, and the others follow in the same footsteps. This album is different to their debut, although still very recognisable as Garbage. I love this album, I'd recommend it to anyone who liked their first album, also fans of Gran Turismo by The Cardigans would like this, and also fans of Celebrity Skin by Hole. If you like indie/rock that isn't the same dreary stuff that a lot of bands produce - then GET this!
I loved the first CD, but was doubtful about the 2cnd, since I'm used to the first CD being the better one. (Alanis Morissette) I got a pleasant surpise, since this one is just as sweet as the first one!!!
There is no competition...this is my undisputed, absolute favorite CD (since the last release from Garbage). Version 2.0 is addicting, from the lively (and occasionally erratic)techno beats to Shirley Manson's breathy, seductive verbal catharsis (laser recodred for our enjoyment!), it leaves you yearning for more. This CD takes a person on a sort of emotional roller coaster. From "Temptation Waits", a celebration of dependance and obsession to "You look so fine" a melancholy longing for "ever after" (i.e. riding of into sun sets and such...) It's a trip and I fully endorse it (regardless of my insignificance). BUY IT ALREADY!
I have loved Garbage for a long time now... and I have her first two CD's and I am so excited that she's come out with another one. Shirley is AWESOME! I love her voice.. and I don't believe that anyone else has a voice like hers. Garbage ROCKS!!
After missing theirr recent Toronto concert at the phoenix (sold out in 20 minutes!), and reading reviews, I had to buy this CD. So I did... I liked the first album but I LOVE version 2.0. Everything from the clever Album title to the amazing mix of wonderful songs made me fall in love with garbage for real!!!If you're at all unsure about garbage, just buy this CD and see what happens.... But don't forget to get your concert tickets as soon as they go on sale!
I had never heard Garbage before I listened to Version 2.0 at a listening kiosk at Tower Records, but I was immediately hooked. It's like a modernized Pretenders on steroids. I'd definitely recommend it. END
Garbage's higly anticipated second cd three years after their first is a must have for all Garbage fans. It has a faster and more up-beat tempo. Garbage has been nominated 8 times for the video to their great song, "Push It." I'm sure that they'll when all 8. I highly recommend this cd.
This album is a classic. I've had this CD for probably over a year now, and I *still* listen to it often.One of the things that makes this album so amazing is that there are no "duds". Every track seems to work and fit together. The amount of feeling Shirley Manson throws into the songs is amazing, and the melodies seem to only add on to that.Buy it. This is one of those albums that sucks you in from the first track, and doesn't let go. In fact, when you're finished listening to it, you'll want to play the whole thing over. :)
..but this is my go-to album when I want a perk-me-up and to listen to the best. So many great songs on this one. Love "When I Grow Up", "Push It", The Trick Is To Keep Breathing" and "You Look So Fine". Music now just doesn't compare. Which is why I'm excited about the whispers of a new album this coming year. Can't wait.
This is a great album by Garbage! I love the modern and hip beat of "Special."
new and exciting sound, very nifty beat. I really like this one folks, it has a new type of funk that sets it aside from all imatators. If you buy just one cd this year let it be this one, it all starts here.
I was one of those people who dismissed Garbage when they first came out because I was a big fan of Curve. I know, I was a stupid boy. "Version 2.0" is when I realized this is an amazing band. I'd be shocked if any fan of techno, pop, alternative, or girl-fronted-rock-bands didn't love this disc. In itself it's almost the best of Garbage. They all sound like singles. Other than the obvious 3-4 hits, I was most impressed by "Temptation Waits", "Medication", "The Trick Is To Keep Breathing", and "You Look So Fine". If you've ever thought about getting some Garbage, especially this album, do it. Don't be a stupid boy/girl.
I must admit that i don't care as much for the first Garbage CD as I do Version 2.0. This is by far my favorite CD. I like it so much that I listen to it all the time. I know the whole CD by heart(almost). My favorite songs on this album are Temptation Waits, I Think I'm Paranoid, Push It, and Wicked Ways. It realllllyyyyy RRRRROOOOOOCKSSSSS!!!!!!!
I was unsure as to how Garbage planned to mutate their music to produce a whole new CD. I loved the first album, but feared the upcoming release would simply be more of the same. Fortunately, it was! I am not sure how to explain how Butch Vig and Co. manage to keep me interested from song to song other than pure magic.
THIS IS BY FAR THE BEST RELEASE OF 1998! THEY'RE IS ARTISTIC GENIOUS HERE AND THE QUALITY OF THE SONGS ARE OUTSTANDING! SHIRLEY MANSON IS ONE TERRIFIC SONGWRITER
I had just heard a little bit of the song "Push It" and I had to run out and buy the CD, the CD has so much into it that now anything that Garbage has out, I have to find and listen to it. I especially like the song, "The trick is to keep breathing" Shirley Manson's voice is amazing, I can't think of any other way to put it. I recomment this CD totally.
I just started listening to garbage about a month ago. Their latest album Version 2.0 is fantastic! The guitar work along with Shirley Manson's distinctive style of singing ( evident in Temptation waits , I think I'm paranoid , When I grow up, Push it ,You look so fine) is just too good. They are a class apart from all the stale pop groups around us . Garbage, to me is God!
i lvoe garbage, every song on their albums are so good you can just play the whole cd straight. and shirley manson is so hot and butch vig si so cool
Shirley Manson and Co. has done it again! The techno music combined with the raw but truthful lyrics makes this CD one of the best I've listened to. With the combination of slow and fast, moody and light, Version 2.0 shows Shirley Manson's talent as never seen before. The pulsing music stays in your head for hours and you can totally relate to some of the lyrics. This is without a doubt one of my favorite CD's!
Not taking away from this album which is absolutley awesome but i missed the angry edge to shirley's voice, this album was pop where the first one was rock but still absolutley rocks, shoulda won da grammy
wow my friend got me started on garbage a few months ago and that was the start of another big garbage fan!!!this band kicks arse!!!!!!thank you Annie!!!!
After buying a new Pentium 4 system, I was tight for cash. Luckily enough I managed to come upon the Radeon 7000. It has one of the best image qualities I've seen and its performance isn't too bad either.
I've watched One Tree Hill since the first episode the first season. I have to say that I'm not as passionate about the show as I used to be; the characters Lucas and Peyton left and I thought that would ruin the show. However, that just lead to the show growing and getting to know smaller characters more. Season seven of One Tree Hill is amazing and the actors/actresses are great. It's a good show and the dvd allows for episodes to be watched without commercials. It's also the smallest and most compact dvd case out of all of the seasons (I have all 7). I would recommend this item.
I've watched every episode of season 7, I really loved it! I'm a big sophia bush fan, so I love her work. I love the Brooke/Julian relationship, I think they are worth watching. Haley and Nathan are still going strong. I also like the new characters. Of course you feel the emptiness of Lucas and Peyton but the cast really makes up for their absence!! Maybe they will return for a episode or two. I would like to see Brooke's almost adopted daughter make a return also!
When I found out that Lucas and Peyton were off the show, I was very disappointed.I did not think they would be able to coninue the show well without those 2 characters. But, with the new characters, the show is still as amazing as its always been. Very entertaining season, I could not stop watching it!
No problems with order! Received item within time frame. Haven't played the DVDs yet but they are new in packaging so any problems with DVD would not be seller fault.
Rather than skipping this CD and buying only "Strauss Dances," as I recommended in June, buy both and copy them onto two sides of a 90-minute audio cassette.Rolfe Kent's soundtrack holds up very well over time -- except for the last number, a vocal not heard in the movie. Rearrange and re-engineer the songs as you like them. I put "Tivoli-Rutsch Walzer" on the tape where it should have been.You might also find Django Rhinehart's "Honeysuckle Rose," which worked so well in the movie, and insert that where it should be. Lose the "Back Where You Belong" vocal and let Sting sing last.On the other side, let the Gaudier Ensemble serenade you with "Tivoli" and whatever other dances you like. Voila, the perfect tape.
I bought this game for my kids. They all like it and are able to play it easily. Their ages are 3,5,8 and 10 and they all are able to play it and enjoy it. I recomend this game for young kids and beginning gamers.
This movie is by far one of my favorites but you can't take it seriously. In the movie, Chuck's protege "Deke Slater" nabs the terrorist leader Fidal Rasheed by sky-diving out of a stealth fighter over Afganistan and hang-gliding from southern Afganistan to the Indian Ocean in 5 minutes, where a nuclear submarine comes out of nowhere to rescue him. Chuck Norris seems to have forgotten that Afganistan is a landlocked country! The flag-waving (for both America and the great state of Texas) is hilarious. And Chuck Norris tries to take on a Yoda figure role by teaching Deke about using the "mind's eye" to sense his opponents and do things "never thought humanly possible".
In Understanding August Wilson Professor Bogumil covers six of his plays: Ma Rainey's Black Bottom, Fences, Joe Turner's Come and Gone, The Piano Lesson, Two Trains Running, and Seven Guitars. The book opens with a chapter on August Wilson as an African American playwrite that talks about his life as well as what sets his plays apart from thos of other African American playwrites. Professor Bogumil ties in Wilson's plays to societal facotrs, and has crafted a very fine and scholarly work that makes August Wilson's writing more approachable and understandable to anyone from students to casual readers.
This map book has kept me on track several times. I have a garmin GPS as well but sometimes I like to know where I am going before I leave or see if the GPS has picked the way I want to go. The maps also work by them self, once I lent my GPS to a friend and I had to navagate on my own using the the maps to get to a new place, and it worked! I like the binding too, very durable and handy.
Jane Fonda, with Ms. Redgrave, makes this a reasonable and incredible synopsis of the war and difficulties of free-thinkers at this time. When you see the poor publicity Fonda has gotten recently because she's upset about the latest war, remember too, that you need to see her films and read her autobiography. She is brilliant.She's been there; done that. She deserves great recognition for this wonderful, valid, strong, creative experience of her brave, yet scared character here. She and Redgrave portray the best of intellectuals. And lately, intellectuals seem to be forgotten by the movie business. Here is a saga, a journey, worthy of high praise. Doesn't anyone miss the wonderful historic dramas of times past? This is one, with acting worthy of acclaim.
One of the last great films of that remarkable era of film-making--the 1970's--"Julia" stands the test of time as a testament to heroism in drastic times of collusion much like our own. We know the bad guys but think we are too weak to stop them--to make a difference--but the story of "Julia" gives us strength to at least try. I was about to say the films of today do not have this power, but after experiencing the power of some of this year's extraordinary films like "Good Night, and Good Luck," "Brokeback Mountain" and "Syrianna" I find hope in the modern arena. Keep the faith.
Excellent movie about two female friends chronicled from childhood through adulthood. I highly recommend this film. As for the seller of this DVD, I received this item very quickly and was very pleased with the condition. I would definitely purchase from this Seller again.
I must have seen "Julia " over 20 times,and I never get tired of it.Fonda and Redgrave are great,along with Jason Robards.Its amazing this is a true story about a period in Lilian Hellman's life,and what a heroic task she did for her friend,Julia.If you have never seen this movie,please make it a point to, about a time in our history we should never forget.
A wistful, compelling story about the power of female bonds and friendship. Fonda has never been better, Redgrave is luminous as the idealistic Julia, and Jason Robards conveys a worn assuredness as Hellman's husband, writer Dashiell Hammett. Zinnemann's handling of period detail in 1930s New York and Berlin is exquisite, and the film rightfully earned 11 Oscar nominations. A personal favorite.
What a great video! I just received it and went through the routine. The flow was wonderful. (I am not a surfer, have never surfed, I was just looking for a good video, and everybody recommended this to me.) But maybe now I'll be surfing by summer!
I hate excercise dvds, yoga dvds, and instructional videos. I do Yoga for Surfers every night. Its really the only decent, tolerable video out there. Im getting in shape to get back into surfing and its really helping me. It makes my muscles nice and long, lean, and loose. The relaxation part really is fantastic and helps me stay focused to reach my goal of being a surfer again. My only complaint is that its slightly talk-ey for me. I could do with less talking. Overall though, it has lovely music, Peggy Hall is a great teacher, and its very relaxing. I would say its a great purchase for any level.
The plug was exactly what I needed.We used it to blow out the line in winterizing our RV.and it worked.
This will keep my pipes from freezing and it isn't very expensive. I plan to use it at home and on vacation property. Buy it. It can be adapted to blow out at hose bib connections too. It will save on repairs.
This book rocks!! This is the 2d in a Series of books on the topic by Mr Kirby , it picks up where the 1st left off. This is unabashedly a how to book and does it's job clearly and succinctly . Mr Kirby shows the finer points of the art to the student (while not all the techniques are street applicable they demonstrate concepts that are vital to an understanding of the workings of Jujitsu).Mr Kirby also discusses tactics techniques and strategy for use of jj in real situations. The work is excellent and would be complimented by the DVD series Mr Kirby did on the subject. Well Done .
I am simply shocked that this novel, which is perhaps the best piece of American fiction I have ever read, is out of stock. It draws a far more realistic and detailed portrait of the "hard boiled detective" that so many other writers have simply slapped together, then lets us watch, with first fascination, then horror, as he slowly unravels. Even the minor characters are better drawn then they would be in a trilogy all their own, and the entire work shimmers with energy and power. This is a book that demands republishing.
Good book although some aspects are very general. See also Surviving Financial Disasters By Tiffany R. Love it comes with a CD ROM.
I bought this book more for a just in case kind of need. I am not filing bankruptcy but if I ever need to then the book contains all the helpful information that someone would need. It has great examples and definitions.
Crewel Lye is about the journey of Jordan the Barbarian. Like all Xanth books, this one is comical and full of puns. Since Jordan's talent is full regeneration, it adds an interesting viewpoint through the eyes of a person who doesn't care if he gets killed(he'll just come back). I think that anyone who reads the Xanth series should definitely read this one.
My first Piers Anthony book. I can hardly wait for each of the Xanth books to appear.Best fantsy writer.
The DVD Signing Songs introduces children to the benefits of using signs to express themselves through movement, sign language and music. Although signs in this video are not exact, it does provide those learning disabled children an opportunity to start the process of learning how to use their bodies and hands to communicate while having fun at the same time. Lesley Ketcham, a Board Certified Music Therapist, highlights and explains the signs that will be used in the song, then sings while using each sign. She has a lovely singing voice, and for those who have not been introduced to signing videos, Signing Songs would be a great place to start!
One of the best books you will find on the Army Air Force prior to and during World War II. This is one of the few authors that doesn't impose his opinions on the reader. He goes out of his way to give both sides of an issue or a personality. Even such controversial figures as Britain's Bernard Montgomery or our own Douglas MacArthur are treated with an even-handedness that is all too rare. Very entertaining and very informative.
I bought this foot massager because I needed a footrest for my ijoy100 massage chair. I used it couple times after a long walk in the mall,and it soothed my aching legs. My sister bought it two years ago, and she said it improved the circulation on her legs.
Is Jennifer Warnes doomed to do movie music to make a few bucks? With that crystal voice of hers, why doesn't somebody write this broad some good commercial songs where she can show what she's got?
I'm a big Lou Reed fan. I have a couple of his live CD's. I find that he is better live than in the studio. And, this DVD reaffirms that fact for me.It's an excellent playlist, and the energy just continues to grow as the concert progresses. I wish that the concert was longer. That would be my only complaint. The DVD left me wanting just a little bit more to complete the experience.The sound quality is excellent, and the filming is well done in a minimalist way, which is appropriate for the forum in which Lou Reed is playing.
hey i love it but im an old horror movie fan , if you lov the clissic horrors you'll lov this , it realy is great , i love it ,
I love this book because it allowed me to see just how much I have been limiting myself. I enjoyed learning the techniques to achieving your visualizations. The author makes valid points and talked about many specific subjects that I have been questioning recently and even experiencing, so that has helped me directly address the issues. Overall, I'd hiiighly recommend
Just received this book today 11/23/11, will get to reading it over the holiday, since school is closed and I need something interesting to read. The notes in the book will help me to decide on new ideas for the coming year. Thanks.
A complete set list with the artists and timings:1. Back of A Car / Gin Blossoms (1:59)2. Nightime / Afghan Whigs (3:29)3. Ballad of El Goodo / Matthew Sweet (3:08)4. Don't Lie To Me / Juliana Hatfield (2:15)5. You Get What You Deserve / Idle Wilds (2:16)6. Give Me Another Chance / Whiskeytown (3:05)7. When My Baby's Beside Me / Kelly Willis (2:12)8. Jesus Christ / Teenage Fanclub (2:06)9. What's Goin Ahn / The Posies (2:27)10. Thirteen / Wilco (2:29)11. Hot Thing / Big Star (3:04)
I got one of these back in the mid 1990s. It makes pretty good clear pictures that are auto-developing and rather sharp for their size. However, it uses its own type of film and nothing else and I ran into a snag when I let them pile up in a back pocket designed into the camera. The pictures got stuck in there and I ended up ruining a couple trying to pull them out. I imagine others who bought one of these might have run into similar issues. It's not the greatest idea Polaroid came out with, but not a bad attempt.
"Social Things" is a delightful introduction to the field of sociology--an engaging read for anyone interested in the field. It's exceptionally clear and readable, with a brief history highlighted by the contributions of major theorists and schools of thought. But the author's charming and personable voice enlivens the journey and makes it a fascinating and pleasurable excursion. No one need be intimidated!
I thought that this book was informative. He describes the herb, and the tribe(s) that used it, and how. There is several pages on the tribal tradition, but I would have liked to have seen more indepth about several of the more common tribes and their herbal medicinal usage and practices.I really appreciated the author bringing together how the whole person must be treated in order to treat dis-ease. This is really missing in allopathic medicine.I would recommend this book to any herbal practitioner that would like a different view of herbal treatment, using traditional Native American ways.Kathy Miller
A very good comprhreshive book. It has a lot of common problems that you may come across with. A very good reference.
I first started using scar zone when the original formula without the green tea came out. This version with the green tea seems to take longer to produce results for me so it's like you have to use more of the product to see a change. Scar zone is reasonably priced compared to mederma so I would definitely recommend it.
This will with no noubt be one of the classics. It's just perfect. The baseline is an sultry invitation to dance. Kylies gentle vocals do right to those innovative lyrics. "There's a dark secret in me don't keep locked in your heart. Set me free!" What can one do but dance to trance as long as this song stays on. The original verison needs nothing more. It's only just so short. And that la-la-la will go on forever!More eighties retro this one. The follow up "In your eyes" has more true disco flair.
This is another track that I first heard on "Open House Party" with John G. that caught my attention. This song sounds like a slightly uptempo version of Fragma's "Toca's Miracle"(because of the subtle background guitar-plucking efx) or DJ Jurgen's "Higher & Higher". It seems more poppy than it does dance. The beat makes you want to bob your head along with it. I really dig Kylie's voice which sounds like a combo of Maria Rubia and DaMae from Fragma. The lyrics may be a little repetitive for some(this is why I gave it 4 of 5 stars). Although this makes them easy to learn, and stick with you. It's a catchy track, that's for sure! This single is better than the other because they included the album version and 2 remixes, instead of the album version and 2 other trax. I wish they would have put a couple of extra remixes on here, though... I do recommend giving this single a listen. You might not be able to get this song out of your head!...
Years after her hit in the US (and with a steadily growing career in Europe and else where in the world) Kylie Minogue returns to the airwaves with a dance hit that is catchy and hypnotic. At first I was only slightly interested in this tune but the more I heard it, the more I like it. I'm looking foward to the entire cd and I hope it is filled with great dance songs like this one.
As someone who's been following Kylie since her late 1980s, Stock Aitken Waterman years, I was one happy camper when I learned that "Can't Get You Out of My Head" blasted into the US Top Ten. After a disastrous cover of "The Locomotion," Kylie quickly disappeared from the American spotlight while she attained superstardom in the UK. Over the years, she tried to win American audiences back, but with no such luck. Then, years later, came this single, a hypnotic slice of disco minimalism with its undeniable "la la la" hook. Having topped the charts in the UK and in a few other countries, it was poised for similar success stateside. After a long absence, we Americans should be so lucky that we have Kylie back ruling the charts again. "I Can't Get You Out Of My Head" is one of the best and most memorable singles of this, or any other, year.
Kylie Minogue is so freakin' HOT that everytime i see her i wanna get naked and "Can't get you out of my head" is so darn sexy.It's got a pulsating strutting groove that gets your blood boiling and makes you wanna get on the dance floor and do your thang.,This is primo pop dressed up in a super dance groove and it will get any party cookin guaranteed.Personally i recommend getting the entire "Fever" album which will have you on the floor panting for air from all of it's wet and juicy musical savage foreplay.OUCH!Tell Kylie you want the fever and prepare yourself to be cooked to a crisp with Kylie's hot sexy grooves.
It's a great movie but not as good as the others. It has some action and, being a soccer fan, the soccer games and practices were cool. It was OK and that's why it needed 4 stars- it just wasn't as good as the others.
I think this movie was great! I just couldn't stand the bad acting of the guy mary-kate's character liked. He seemed to be angry at her even when they were just talking. yuck!
Switching goals was very good. The plot was better than the average Mary Kate and Ashley movie, but it wasn't as funny or had as good of acting as the others. This movie is good to watch a couple of times, but only a couple times. If you have extra cash though, I say get it. You won't regret it.
I had to read a book for a book report due in a week. I was beginning to feel hopeless before I stumbled onto this in the library. Langston Hughes is an amazing Writer and poet. This was the first of his novels that I have read and I think it couldn't have been more perfect. This book is so rich in its characters and Hughes shows no mercy in telling of the bittersweet culture that engulfs the world of Sandy and his family. After reading this book, the beauty of this people was more evident than ever before. With words that are lovely and flowing and thoughts that are deep and abundant, Hughes is a person whom I wish was still with us.
This watch is a beautiful one. But I am one who is used to watches having just a bit of heft. This bracelet watch LITERALLY feels like a bracelet. There is no "heft" to the watch. If you like that, by all means, buy it. If you don't, you might want to consider something more substantial. I love the watch, and will not return it, but the "lightness" takes some getting used to.
The book is an inspiring, practical Biblically-based manual for moving fromcharity to transformation of community. It is enriched by practical examplesfrom real life experiences in low income communities and working with people with soundtheological underpinnings. It is inspiring;one feels hopeful and notdependent on experts, but that transformation, step by step, can happenwith committed people inspired by hope and small first successes. A mustbook for people working in low income communities, especially with faithconnections.
The sound quality of this rivals the Bose tabletop; certainly its a better value for the price. Its not as attractive and a little larger, but the features are well placed and the remote is very useful.Mine got damaged by a bad surge, so if you get one, use a surge protector with it to preserve it.
I bought one at Target and I wish I had bought two. Now they are out of stock and I can't find one. For the price, this product delivers fine sound. I agree with some previous reviewers on the issue of the battery, but that is a minor point. I love the sound!!! It also has good radio reception for stations that are at the fringe of the FM reception band. I did not buy it as a clock radio, but as a less expensive alternative to Bose. At $400 less than the comparable Bose, I say "go for it'! I hope it is available soon.
I love this game! I bought one 15 or so years ago when my son was young, good first game as it helps teach turn taking. Little kids love it when the crocodile "bites" you! Even timid kids get into the game after an adult gets bitten a few times. Bonus that it's portable, no loose pieces, I purchased this one for my niece's three sons (under the age of 5) and have given it as a gift over and over, really fun game.
I got this as a gift for my 5yr old and he loves it. It's cute, but smaller than you'd think and definitely overpriced at $13.99 plus shipping. In a store, I wouldn't pay more than half of that price for this toy. Be prepared: the top jaw slams down on your finger, and while my son doesn't cry (it doesn't really hurt so much as it surprises you), he does yell "ouch" ...And then continues playing with it. The tooth that makes the crocodile "bite" is random so you never know which one it'll be. The game goes quickly and can be fun for the entire family, which is nice when it's so hard to find games that not only appeal to the whole family, but can be played by families with age ranges from preschool children to older adults. It's a great way to squeeze a family game in on a busy weeknight. It works as a travel game too, since there are no loose pieces and it's a fairly small size.
I bought this for my three children and they all loved it, it was well used for years. It was still in good shape after years of use so I put it in storage. I came across it, and I thought the students I teach might like it. I teach middle school. I put this on my desk and the students race to be the first in the class to play. They loved it so much, I went on Amazon and bought more! I have 5 on my desk, they are used daily by 100's of students, they are dropped almost daily. Students are not late to class. Students do not get tired of this quick fun and durable game. You should purchase this, it is perfect for on top of a desk, kids of every age love it!
this was a gift for a 4 year old - she loves it, and the best part is that she can play it solo as well!! Not the most edicational toy, but a great game to keep the kids busy.
I ordered this product because my daughter loved her cousins. Strangely, when I received it I was surprised that it was a MUCH smaller version than the one her cousin has! I bumped down the durability because of this. It is more of a travel version but it is still a fun game with a nice element of surprise. My daughter enjoyed this at the age of 2-3.
Our son will be getting this for X-mas. He loves crocodiles so we are looking forward to playing it with him.
I actually ended up buying these to update two old cabinets i had come across. Thought they only needed speakers, turned out there was no crossover that was why the speakers were shot in the first place. Then a friend gave me a JBL set (bass mids and highs) from an old big screen tv for free so keeping the project as low cost as possible i baught these. They have nice sound for the price did't expect the results i got out of these, and i am picky about sound and i'm very satisfied. Plus they were easy to figure out how to hook up, all the terminals are marked.
I absoultely LOVE Mero! I just wish that they had more than one single out, because I can't get enough of them! I listen to this single over and over again without getting tired of it. It's a group of two guys, but it's not entirely pop sounding. It's just fun loving music to relax and enjoy.
This series is SO hilarious. I was so upset when I found out that they cancelled it.If you watched it religiously like I did when it was airing on MTV, (2004, I believe?) then you won't de dissapointed. In it's short 13 episode run, it had plenty of laughs. You should get this. Hands down. You'll have plenty of quotes that you can share with your friends for weeks to come.
If you know this show that is probably why you are here and don't need me to tell you how good it is. If you are new then buy it! It is fun and never slows down. Unfortunately there is only one season.
I have this on both DVD and video and there isn't that much difference. DVD you can skip the guitar solos though and get back to David... or pause perfectly. If you do buy a DVD though, make sure you don't have the surround sound on. It sounds much much better when it's just flat together. Although this isn't a concert like you'd see today, it's still entertaining, definitely a classic. Ziggy Stardust and the Spiders just go together. I've got friends that don't know Bowie, but do know Ziggy Stardust. This is a great band, wonderful character, wonderful songs, it all comes together despite the picture quality. You can definitely just put it on and watch it, or work on something and just listen to it. It is worth the buy, especially if you love David Bowie.
This is a wonderful documentary capturing Bowie at his absolute prime musically and creatively. The sound is excellent throughout all the performances. My only complaint is that the limitations of the 16MM film and the lenses they used severely hampered the quality of the images that were captured on stage. Quite often the lenses had issues processing the extreme colors and intensity of the lighting, so what you end up seeing is totally blown out and diffused or even out of focus. Too bad. It would be nice to see them take a better pass at restoration and release this on Bluray. Overall I would recommend for any serious Bowie fan as the music is just too good to pass up. The surround mix is fantastic, clear with a good amount of punch. Worth it just to hear the soundtrack (which I already owned on CD) in 5.1.
Great vid for lovers of Bowie. But this is iconic stuff. Standard material for folks interested or lovers of the form
This horseshoe cat is aweomse! I would like to buy more for my Christmas presents. Very well made and good value.
This amazing book begins with the author exploring with seven women and one man what the feminine consciousness is, why it's coming in now, what its role is and how it will help reshape our world. I can't tell if all eight of these people have reached enlightenment, but if not, they are well on their path, with each having their own spiritual journey and discipline. The book ends with those interviwed saying such similar things, concentrating on four areas: exploring the feminine consciousness, what's important about spiritual practices, the need to go beyond transcendence to transformation in everyday life (and in a balanced way), and finally where we're headed because of our bringing in the feminine consciousness and transformation. It is with heart-felt gratitude to the author for writing this book.
This is probably my dad's and my favorite album that we own simply for it's ridiculusness. Some background:The Bonzos were the "house band" for Monty Python's predicessor, a silly British tv show called "Do Not Adjust Your Set." Since they were that house band, you can't expect their music to be all that serious. If you listen closely to the lyrics, the songs are downright hilarious. I do not reccomend listening to this while doing homework, though. I just finished an essay that would've nomally taken me about one hour to write, revise, and edit, but instead it took me about 1.5 hours because I was listening to Gorilla. It's good for leisure time, but not for homework. In short, I love the Gorilla album.
If you listen to this CD and you don't laugh out loud, Then JACK, YOU ARE DEAD!!! Better yet, just buy the entire collection on the 3 CD set called 'CORNOLOGY'.
I recently ordered the Chamae Rose 2oz bottle and receivd it promptly.Item as described and I will absolutely purchase again!
I enjoyed the movie so much and loved the sound track, which I have really enjoyed and would recommend it to everyone who enjoys music with a Celtic sound.
Just recently finished reading and studying the content of the book Apache Jakarta-Tomcat by James Goodwill. I have used Tomcat as a basic JSP engine for sometime now, but admittedly knew only the basics. Godwill in his book goes through how to setup the Tomcat server, as well as various different utilities and advanced configuration.As a result of reading this book, I now know how to use the Tomcat Manager, configure the tomcat security realms, and integrating Tomcat with Apache. In addition, was learned alot through the examples on struts and SOAP.All in all this book is great for someone looking to broaden their understanding of Tomcat.
Although I had some reservations about the movie, due to the whole Homosexual theme, I soon put aside all differences, and truly enjoyed the movie. It was extremily touching, and the ending was sad but sweet. I liked how Clay was able to put aside his somewhat unenjoyable relationship with James Whale, and remember him fondly for many years afterward.The issue that the movie deals with, has been something of a controversal subject for many years, and I enjoyed how Bill Condon was able to portray this problem senstively and emotionally. A terrific drama for not only Brendan Fraser fans, but also for those that only ever wanted to find love and acceptence.
Without a doubt, those who appreciate fine, character-driven films will find much to like in Bill Condon's 1988 critically acclaimed biopic on legendary horror director James Whale. Ian McKellen delivers his finest performance to date as the charming, charismatic director whose best days are behind him along with Lynn Redgrave as the doting maid and Brendan Fraser as a young gardener who strikes up a quick and quirky friendship with Whale. The beauty of this film lies in its narrow scope with its very small palette of locations and supporting characters, giving the film a very intimate feel in the close confines of the three major players along with the subtlety of their interaction.On the disc itself all you'll get is a poorly transferred trailer and a ho-hum 30 minute featurette that offers little in the way of further value. Also disappointing is the lack of a proper Dolby 5.1 audio track - all you'll get on this shiny disc is a paltry 2.0 mono job.
I finally watched this movie after having read many reviews on it and found it to be very good. I really loved learning about James Whale and his life, and having a look into his psyche. This movie has become one of my new favourites because of it's portrayal of a gay man's life not as simply a one-dimensional character, but as a whole person who just happened to be gay.
I purchased this movie because I am a huge Brendan Fraser fan, but the movie is so moving that I somewhat forgot that Brendan was in it and became so captivated in the story, that I ended up watching it again a second time. It is wonderfully acted! I think it's Brendan's best work ever and Ian Mckellen is outstanding in this movie. For anyone looking for a movie that will move you and having you wanting friends and family to see it, this one will. It's such a powerful drama. One that I will watch over and over. I'm glad to have it in my Collection.
Good movie, especially if you enjoy the old Universal horror movies. Knew little about "Frankenstein" director James Whale, but movie gives much insight.
the nudity could have been left out! It have had the exact impact without. Redgrave was absolutely wonderful! Although I did not agreee with Ian McKellan's Oscar nod, his performance was mediocre compared to Jim Carrey's delightful performance in The Truman Show! The discrete nudity was the only downfall of this well made and written film.
Every now and then comes a movie that reminds you that entertainment can also be an intelligent emotional experience. This poignant story of loneliness and friendship has everything to go for it. Ian Mckellen's performance is once again memorable and Brendon Fraser is at his best. Script, direction and dialogues are brilliantly handled by newcomer director Bill Condon. It should appeal to everyone because it is a movie about life and death, loneliness and friendship. The widescreen edition is remarkable.
What a surprising movie! First, you have one of the screen's great performances by Ian McKellen, and then there's the stunning revelation that Brendan Fraser has great depth and power as an actor and has been pretty much wasted in films up until now (except that he is terrific at comedy). This film on DVD is a marvel. The images are crisp and clean, the sound is clear and distinct, and the music score by Carter Burwell is one of the finest of recent years, subtly entwining itself into the psychological makeup of the characters and storyline. "Gods and Monsters" is a movie of rare depth and directorial eloquence. I cannot recommend it highly enough for thinking moviegoers.
The film is so interesting that the DVD capitalizes on the opportunity of further informing the viewer about the real facts behind the "fact-tion" story of director James Whale. Unfortunately the production of the special features seemed a bit rushed and "unproduced," apparently (according to the director) much the same way as the film itself. Interesting insight into the world of indie film and leaves the audience wondering what glorious heights this one might have reached had the filmmakers had ample time and resources to recognize their vision. Nonetheless, it is a beautifully acted and packaged piece...well worth the time and attention!
The excellent performaces by McKellen, Redgrave and (surprise) Fraser, along with the insightful script and direction by Bill Condon make this one of the year's best films. It makes me want to discover Director James Whale's (whose story this is)works beyond FRANENSTIEN. I would love to see JOURNEY'S END (1930) or THE ROAD BACK (1937). Unnfortunatly the DVD "special edition" is a bit disappointing. The audio commentary by Bill Condon is good, however I do wish more members of the cast had been involved (particularly McKellen). The 30 minute documentary does not shed much light on Director James Whale's tormented life or work. The new FRANKENSTIEN DVD is much better in this regard. Other than a trailer, there are no other "extras" to mention. GODS and MONSTERS is certainly worth a rental, but think twice about purchasing this "collector's edtion".
One of the few recent films that I anticipated to be good and it exceeded my expectations.Sir Ian McKellen once again performs well. The real surprise here is Brendan Fraser. Thanks to Bill Condon's amazing screenplay, Fraser is study of expressive and innocent contrast to McKellen's anguished and self-defeated character. Make a point to get this one. Best screenplays consist of strong dialogue, pacing, and narrative. The Oscars are usually accurrate about that.
I thought I had already reviewed this product. I love this movieI hate when the site updates there sites and can't keep the ratings and notes on the items.
I have to say the movie was much better then I expected it to be..I really enjoyed the ending and the meaning behind him befriending a "strong type " guy...get this movie..u wont be disappointed!!
There is so much to love about this film it's hard to know where to begin. Ian MacKellan is brilliant as the director James Whale; Brandon Fraser is perfect as his "monster", and Lynn Redgrave is wonderful as his long-suffering maid Hanna. The three are the perfect ensemble and compliment each other perfectly.There are so many layers and dimensions to the story. Each time I watch it, I discover more to love about it. I heartily recommend this movie although not everyone will understand the deeper meaning. And it's definitely not for those who are homophobic, but those with an open mind will love it.
As usual, Kevin Bacon does a great job playing someone who is not such a nice guy yet he manages to give his character some humanity. You can tell he researched his character's profession.Brad Renfroe does a good job too and it's so sad that his life was cut short by his life choices. He was a promising actor.The story itself was entertaining enough. I didn't get the boy's attraction to Callista Flockhart's character. She plays it pretty drab inside and out.
This film is very sweet in sense that we get to know what Karchy goes through when he realizes America isnt necessary a place you can get away with telling lies when he meets his idol Billy Magic.Personally I would recommend this movie because it has great performances from Brad Renfro,Kevin Bacon and Calista Flockhart.
Once again, Jerome Doolittle is unafraid to take on issues that are controversial. Via Tom Bethany, the non working workaholic, he inserts some thought provoking insights into the heated debate of abortion. Perhaps the most frightening part is the antagonistic characters may be ousted from Jerome's book and placed into the world and we would be able to identify them. Jerome knows how to weave a story and fill it with humor, comraderie, and perhaps even a touch of wishful thinking.
I personally had no problems getting this game to run. I got it up and running within minutes, and was golfing soon after. I think this game is a joy to play. It gave me the impression of really being able to adjust my body position to hit the ball properly. To ready your swing, you have to set how your feet are positioned and how you angle the golf club, and I thought it was fun being able to do all those things to get the ball to curve just right onto the green, or at the right angle down the fairway. I haven't played many golf games out there, and this particular swing setup was new to me, but I enjoyed it. If you play golf leisurely like I do (but maybe golf video games more frequently), and like to learn about how your body affects your shot, I think you'll enjoy this game as I did.
I have used this organizer for the last 4 years. I recommend it to any one who is interested in keeping track of finances, investments and goals. It deals with all aspects of personal finance including what your family should do in the event of your death. Perfect for anyone, young with no money and millionaires with dirty accountants.
This book is simply excellent. It covers surveying subjects thoroughly and with great technical depth. It taught me to calculate state plane coordinate conversions by hand so that I understand what happens in a computer.This is the type of text that will elevate the PLS profession.
I have always loved the music of Eric Coates. This CD offers a fine interpretation of his music. I would highly recommend it to anyone who likes the Old-English Song. I will broadcast this on Melbourne Radio - GW
Being a student, and advocate of "the Dating Game/seduction/pick up community", let me say thatwhile initially i saw some overlap of some of the material taughtby David D. and others, Corey has done his homework, and isdelivering a good value to men. I learned some new ways to communicatewith women by reading this book. I think to get everything outof it, you will have to reread it a couple of times, but if you'rea guy who has no game, even though the price is a bit steep, (in reality it's essentially an ebook in print)(i.e. average price of a dating ebook is $39.99) it is spot on, and you will get your money's worth!
Martin Deporres Kennedy has a fine gift for storytelling. He pulls you into the story. I read this through in one sitting. The story is a vehicle for introducing theological ideas, often through debates between characters. These debates are very realistic, and may reflect actual arguments that the author haard or participated in. I would strongly recommend this for students. It would be a wonderful thing for Catholic high school religion teachers to assign their class.
Originally published in 1974, Creamer's book was the first "serious" biography of Ruth and remains the standard work on the subject. The first few chapters are a bit slow as the author painstakingly chips away at decades of apocrypha and rumor to reconcile the many conflicting accounts of the Babe's youth. The pace picks up once Ruth reaches the big leagues and really takes off after he's sold to the Yankees. Creamer is frank about the Babe's ravenous appetites and the effect these had on those around him, notably his first wife. Ultimately, Ruth comes off as a jovial, well-meaning but rather selfish man who was fun to be around but not someone you'd want to depend on.This Kindle edition has a hyperlinked table of contents and index but contains no photographs save the cover.
This is a complete and thorough examination of the life and playing career of a baseball icon. The author has done a commendable job of separating the facts from the fanciful fictions that have grown up surrounding George Herman Ruth. While his home run record has been surpassed, I still think one can argue that Ruth was the greatest baseball player when one considers that in addition to his hitting abilities Ruth was an outstanding pitcher. He was shifted to the outfield when his managers determined that he could be of greater value as an everyday player rather than pitching every third or fourth day.
I really enjoyed this book. It gave me a behind the scenes look at the greatest baseball player of all time. Not only did I enjoy the baseball stories, but I also found the stories about the unique personality of ths man very amusing.
For those considering this overhead transperency film, only order it for use with laser printers or laser copy machines. It is not intended for inkjets and needs the laser fuser to "burn in" the image. It works great with the correct printer/copy machine.
My car is a 1994 Honda Civic EX. Save yourself a headache and get this if you have to replace your stereo. Plug and play.
I must admit I bought this anime for my girlfriend, she is just getting into anime and picked it out at random, so it was a very random not really thought about purchase. But I am still plesantly surprised by this purchase. Funny and action work well together in this anime. All the people in the anime are ones you want to learn about. Especially Kenichi himself. Can't wait to check out the rest of the show and hopefully if it ends well I'll be picking up the next season.
Meg Wolitzer accomplishes something astonishing here. She creates a compelling character in Sara Swerdlow even after her sudden death at the end of the first chapter. Surrender, Dorothy is, I think, about how each of us is the sum of our impact on others in our lives - and their collective perceptions of us. I eased through the story, as sad as it frequently is, quickly, and Wolitzer's style is similar to that of some of my favorite authors: Elinor Lipman, Anne Tyler and Stephen McCauley.
I have been looking for a new dress watch for a month. (I am kind of a fussy person). I saw this watch and read the reviews . It made me considered about buying it. I decided to buy this one. I've got it today. I thought of two words on my mind. (everytime when I bought stuff online) "Satisfied" or "Disappointed". After I opened the package. I smiled all day long.Nice watch!!! Good price.!A few things want to mention you all, The watch is a little bit smaller than I expected (But it's not a promblem because my wrist it's so small(6").it fits me perfectly)Don't be panic about the watch doesn't work at the first time. You have to let it charges for a while.(Good function,though! you don't need to worry about changing baterries)I love the lobster claw-clasp because I can adjust it myself. (I always got a problem about paying extra for adjusting the band)Well..I'd recommend this watch to anybody. Buy for yourself or as a gift. You will be happy anyway.Love it!!
I have a tendency to burn out watch batteries, so this watch is perfect for me. No more replacing batteries every 3 to 6 months. Plus as a woman with a larger wrist I have a terrible time finding a feminine looking watch that fits me. This one I have plenty of room and it looks great.
This was the first time I ever bought something off the store online, I wasn't expecting it to come in on time, much or less receive it cause of all the scandaling now a days. Very impressed and can't wait to buy more online
This dictionary has come in handy for doing homework in my Pathophysiology class. Reasonable price since it has covered some topics that were not in my textbook, lectures, or searching online.
They should really raise the star point system here, because anything by Mosby is worth the buy. I have the Mosby's Medical Dictionary for Nursing and Allied Health Professionals, and when I saw this book in the store, I was trying to figure out the difference, because of the color. This one offers just as many details as my previous book. This is important, because it is an easy read, and it is necessary for each household to have, for children to study off of, to the housewife that just wants to be informed. Mosby has been following me through nursing school, and anything they sell as a study aide will have a place in my home.
It is interesting listening to this album. Even though many of the songs date back 35 years and all of them are over 20 years old this album is like ABBA -it hasn't dated with time. Sure some of the songs have that 1970's feel, but many of them don't. The opening song has uses Thamas Arne's Rule Brittania tune. But the "How do you do" song is the classic, a song that even today sounds fresh.Sadly Mouth is now dead, (December 2004 of a heart attack.) and maybe that adds something to this album too.But the real star of this Album is Maggie MacNeal. Her music is as fresh and beautiful and up to date now as when it was first released 30 years ago. "When your lady says Goodbye" is a real classic of pigant musical beauty. One of the greatest tragedies of this album is that Maggie MacNeal has been all but forgotten today. Neither she nor her music deserve to be forgotten...
I am a faculty member at a law school. When we considered revamping our curriculum, I gave the committee members passages from this book to read, where the Academy's approach is made clear. Universally, the response was: "Yeah, that's how we should do things. But we have to pursue a feel-good approach now." Heinlein understands that character matters, and that institutions should encourage responsibility, not undermine it. That, I suppose, is why he was never an administrator.... Nonetheless, this is not only a terrific story, but one -- like all of Heinlein's juniors -- with a point.
I first read this book in 1970, a time that seems so long ago now it's hard to remember just what it was like. I happened upon it on my school library shelves, among the "H" books, among five other Heinleins. I read all of them, but this one was still the one that impressed me the most. Even though it's been nearly fifty years after its first publication, even though things didn't work out like Heinlein proposed, I can still recommend this as a good book to jump-start someone's interest in science fiction.
Shipping was quick and the condition of this used paperback book was as described. I was completely satisfied with this purchase.
This book is an excellent adventure in the Heinlein series. He once again creates a captivating set of charecters that drwas the auidence in. The story is set in space, as the main charecter is attempting to become a part of the elite space patrol. It is a story about duty, honor, and becoming a man with responsibility
JFC Fuller has always been erudite and his reaction to the general-ship in World War I makes an excellent read.I however do wish that the digitisation had been better since each page needs a change of font size in this Kindle edition, when read on an I pad.
This is a gorgeous ring. I love the unique design and how it sparkles and shines. I've received some very nice compliments too.
The quality was more than I expected for the price. Bought this for work and it's perfect for the food biz.
A friend gave me this book (the spiral edition) in 1973, and it truly changed my life -- I became a vegetarian immediately. This is where I learned how to cook and eat all kinds of food that I'd never seen before, especially beans. I am not crazy about the "breakfast" recipes, but the breads in this cookbook are great. I have over a hundred cookbooks, and I still make the lasagne with adzuki beans (complicated) and the potato soup (easy). Almost every page in my book is either stained or annotated or both.The only disadvantage to this cookbook is that many recipes call for dairy products and eggs -- things that I still enjoy after 29 years, but that I am not allowed to eat as often these days!This is a classic, educational cookbook for vegetarians.
This product is not just for kids, but very good for adult drivers who do not ordinarily have passengers in the car. I put all my "junk" in it which used to be jumbled on the seat beside me. When I am going to have someone else in the car, I just pull it out and put it in the back seat. So much nicer than tossing stuff from the front to the back to make room for a passenger! It looks so neat and holds everything I need.
Faith Wish is a great book that mature teenaged girls can relate to. AnneMarie, a beautiful, 17-year-old underachiever, has been put on an academic contract and will not graduate with her high-school class - to her dismay. When she attends a tabernacle meeting led by Brother Jackson, a charismatic, handsome self-proclaimed minister, she becomes a true Christian. After discovering she is pregnant with Brother Jackson's child, she turns to him for help, and he takes her to a spiritual redemption camp to find guidance. There, she sheds her old skin and past sins, including sex, drugs, and smoking. Unfortunately, all does not end well, as she struggles to find answers to her dilemna.
I've been using this card regularly since 2003 in different PC laptops. I got it as a gift with my 1st iPod and have used it for countless hard drives, including for audio recording purposes. Audio & video people take note this has the sought-after TI chipset. All in all it's been rock solid. My only concern now is whether it works under Windows 7.
I bought this to use with an Apple IPod. It is a great card and works well for the most part, but it does NOT work with my IPod. Even though it is recommended by Apple (...), it can't supply (enough?) power and the IPod's battery drains in seconds.
Its great information made me just want to read more it showed me how i can achieve things on mind and spirit in this religion amazing!
With great production quality and packed full of instruction, education, and entertainment, Aradia's DVD is a valuable addition to a belly dancer's collection. Very useful tips of the similarities and differences in Middle Eastern dance styles and clear, pleasant instruction. Includes warm-up, instruction, beautiful performance clips from various shows, and full performances in different costumes. Great music by DJZen & John Bilezikjian.
We went to a pool with a dear friend. She shared this with my son. Little did she know that this curious toy would be such a hit. My son loved it. I had to go buy two for us -- one for him and one to share, so he could have water wars. We took them to a lagoon with some friends and the kids all took to it right away.It's a water canon, a bullhorn, a funnel, and even a strange device that the kids rigged up to pull a body board around. This is durable, with a lot of play value for toddlers up to teens. Well, if you want it played with as intended (pull cone down large side first and water flies out the other end), they'd have to be at least 6 years old -- younger kids have problems doing it. The water can shoot quite high, if they do it right. But even if they can't make it shoot, the kids will figure out something to do with it.
We are witnesses by Jacob Boas, is a GREAT book to read it gives you different views of teenagers that went through diffuculty during the holocaust. As you know, the person who was in charge of the holocaust was Hitler. All the teeangers talked about hope they always had the hope to live and to have their own family. They never talked about hate, they never said they hate hitler the only thing that they said was that he was responsible for what was happening. This was shocking to me because I would hate the person who had my family killed. Wouldn't you?
I was introduced to this band by some friends. Not only are their covers better than some of the original recordings but Brian's love songs are amazing. Give a listen this cd, specifically I'm Gonna Stay and the title track, The Great Symphony.
Book came quickly and was in acceptable condition. I couldn't make it with all my textbooks if it wasn't for resale of them. Thank You!
Right into the book one of the authors (Norean) talks about the necessity of getting out of our own way in the battle to lose weight. She had my attention from that moment on. Most of us know how to lose weight, it's our attitudes that need adjusting. This book is easy to read, with helpful information on every page. I read it with a Magic Marker in my hand, marking passages to read again. It was pretty well marked up by the time I finished the book. AND, it's got to be the FIRST weight loss book I've ever read cover to cover. I highly recommend it. It's written with compassion.
Finally a book that is written in every day language that nonprofessional people can understand. After struggling with my weight for about 10 years now, it was refreshing to read a book that MAKES SENSE! While some of the excercises are not easy, just keep with it and you too will begin to understand why you over-eat. I am not saying that I agree with all of the Wilbert's reason, but they made me look deep inside myself. (And you know, it is much easier to pass by those cookies that they have at business meetings because I now believe in me. I can do it, I can overcome.) I have combined the book with a comercial lifesytle and use elements of each to help me loose weight. I am truley grateful for the Wilbert's for writing this book.
This book goes right to the heart of the matter - answering the question so often asked: Why do so many fail at weight loss when they know what to do? The narrative is authentic, ringing true from personal experience and case histories. Developing a new way of thinking is challenging and these authors, while providing encouragement, are realistic about the difficult road one must travel to change thought patterns. I found it very valuable.
I Loved this Movie Plain And Simple It is A MUST SEE. Zoey Saldana has a huge impact in this film. I have multiple copies of this film in my home some how lol but it is well worth it. A must see buy it. Pop some popcorn and enjoy :)
I have watched "The Man Who Never Was" several times over the years.This movie is a dramatization of a real-life intelligence action - "Operation Mincemeat"There really was a Major William Martin, sort of. As portrayed in the film this name was fictitious, but there really was a person whose body was used in an operation like the one depicted.This film is not for the action/adventure movie buff. There are no explosions, there is no gunplay, no chase scenes...well, sort of.The movie is actually a very reverent telling of an important extremely successful operation. You will like this if you enjoy military history and espionage.4 stars - a solid film worth seeing.
It IS a true tale and a lot of the detail is correct - till about half way through when an "Irish spy" arrives in the UK on behalf of the Germans. Not needed in the real world story - the twist is needed to add some tension at the end of the film.Clifton Webb acts like Clifton Webb - that is to say like a plank of wood! However for the period it is well done.Spot the pennant number on a Castle Class frigate in the background of one scene and then go and watch "The Cruel Sea". Guess the Admiralty "lent" the British cinema the same ship in more than one movie!Topical (early 2008) because as of late the identiy of the "body" used in the real war has become subject of fresh debate.
If this was a fictional story it still would be a good story.The plot seems proposterous and not within the relm of reallity, but it actually worked and is credited with saving thousands of lives both American and British. Patton and Montgomery would have had a much harder time taking Sicily if not for this brillient piece of espinoage. No vulgar language, no gore, just a good movie to watch. Well worth your time.
I had always tought of clifton Webb as that weird guy who starred only in The Stars And Stripes For Ever, A 1950's verson of The Titanic and Cheaper By The Dozen. He comes a accross as a brilliant ex attorney, an Hercules Poirot type almost, trying to think one step ahead of the Gerries in this wonderful espionage thriller.True there are no big battle scenes but how all the pieces come together and the tension that builds when the German spy comes to check on things was masterful. Everything fits.I had read the book on this tale at 15 and now at 42 have seen the film for the first time and give it 4 + stars.
I loved this movie. It is a true story told honestly. It holds you in suspense like any good thriller. Of course it is dated, but that adds to its quality. Also, it was in color and I feel that helped. Very few people know that a corpse played a very important part in WWII when it was used as a decoy by the British to fool the Germans that they planned an invasion in a different place to where it did happen. The Germans were not fools, and they sent an Irish agent to check out the corpse story. That was where it got really exciting. For its age and subject matter, the movie was quite impressive. Also the dvd has excellent quality color and sound. It survived surprisingly well over the years. You won't be disappointed if you like WWII movies.
I rate "The Man Who Never Was" as an excellent and exciting World War II movie. Why can't movies be made like this anymore? Recent World War II movies are not accurate and place too much emphasis on effects. In my opinion, the more "special effects" a movie has, the more fake it is. Anyhow, "The Man Who Never Was" describes the true events of the British trying to confuse the Germans as to where the Allies will invade - Sicily or Greece. By arranging to have a dead body wash ashore in Spain with top-secret documents, the British cause the Germans to alter their defenses, thus saving the Allies from suffering even more casualties. How the British found a body, the details that they had to come up with to make the Germans believe the body was for real, and the subsequent German effort to determine whether or not the information found on the body was accurate, all make for an exciting story which moves at a swift pace. This is really a great World War II movie.
This film would have been much more famous if Hitchcock had directed it. Ronald Neame does and excellent job. A true story of the Second World War with great locations (another good chance to get a look at the Spain of those times). But the fact that it is a true historical story makes it interesting enough.Besides, there's Gloria Graham doing an amazingly wonderful performance. It just amazed me how well she was in this role.This is the second film by Neame that I watch (after Tunes of Glory, which is even better) and both are wonderful movies.Typical, I would say, of the good-natured, common-man, and respectul films the British used to do before the Beatles generation. A bygone era of which this film reminds me with melancholy.The only thing that lessens a bit the value of "The Man Who never Was", in my opinion, is the other female character, who does not do such an excellent job as the rest of the cast.
Mark is a phenomenally talented singer, songwriter, and blues harp player. Why the entire world doesn't know about him is a mystery. His clever, witty lyrics, powerful voice, and musicianship stand out on every cut of this CD. I already owned it, but bought this one as a gift for my sister who lives across the country, heard him live once, and was a goner!
Men's Fitness has some great workout/exercise tips as well as some good dieting tips as well. It was easy to read on the kindle fire also.
I got this subscription as a gift for my husband. He loves it. He's really into staying fit and taking care of himself, like many other 20-30 year olds. And this magazine does a great job of writing about topics that are important to young male readers. A great buy. :)
I've been a longtime subscriber to Men's Fitness. As one of the other reviewers said, this magazine used to be better. It still has a great deal of workout, diet and fitness information, but it's not as good as it once was. I think the magazine is losing its focus a bit as each issue does seem to have more and more about sex, pornography, etc.The only reason I give it 4 stars is because a lot of the workout and fitness information is still very useful (otherwise I would give it fewer), but I used to feel this magazine was worthy of 5 stars.
I ordered this and it seemed to take a while to get the first magazine... Then when it showed up I got two the same day. I was pleasantly surprised to see that MF had changed their format and I had a chance to read the first and second issues. They are full of information and have a good division between the sound bite articles and articles that go into a good depth on a person or health issue.Overall a good read if you take the time to read it.
Some really great articles. I've pulled three or four fantastic workouts out of this magazine.
Nice and simple to use, especially for a beginner who is not looking to spend a fortune on the basics.Rust a little to quick if left out side (mostly my fault) but is easy enough to clean. They are sharp and do the job and I got 2 for my money. The also have a traditional Japanese look to them which I like!
After listening to tracks off this CD on KKSF in San Francisco 15 years ago, I decided to search high and low for one of the last albums on the Columbia label by the jazz piano legend. I finally found a used version in a second hand book store for 5 bucks! It was worth the wait. "My Love Leads You Home" & "Shamballa" are the highlights on this 7 track CD, which I wish could have been longer. To this day, Ramsey Lewis continues to entertain and gives us a hard to find treasure!Buy it if you can find it!!
Merche (Mercedes Trujillo Callealta) is one of a number of fresh, young Spanish artists. As I understand it, she gave up a career in education to concentrate on music. As far as I am concerned it was a great decision. Her first album, on which she not only sings but also wrote most of the words and music, is a combination of great dance rhythms and a few excellent ballads. She has a strong, beautiful voice, and it is no wonder that her intitial foray into the music world has been a big hit in her native country. Personally, since I received this CD, I have listened to it again and again, and have not even begun to tire of it. Highly recommended!
This book provided a fascinating review of early Middle Eastern mythology starting from Mesopotamian culture and proceeding through to Judaism and early Christianity. It also includes a discussion of the importance of myth and ritual as a basis for religious and socialogical structure. The area I found most interesting was the discussion of the influence of the mythology of early civilizations on Judeo-Christian belief and scripture.
I am so glad I found out about this book. Reading it was a major eye opener for me in understanding the early myths from the area where my own (former) religion originated. S. H. Hooke is an expert in mythology, and he does a fantastic job of showing the connections between the myths of the Middle East. For me personally, this helped me see how the roots of Christianity (particularly with ancient Hebrew religions) was inspired greatly by earlier myths. Whether it was the author's intention or not, it also helped me realize that the religion I once thought was real was, in fact, nothing more than a myth that was not unlike so many similar myths of the time and place.Jeff Mark, author ofChristian No More
Azucar Moreno is a Spanish band with 2 lead lady singers. I first came across this group in the flamenco movie "El Amor Brugo" - the original classic music is composed by De Falla, a Spanish composer. Via Amazon I was able to purchase 4 albums by Azucar Moreno. The Exitos Originales album has the true Flamenco pop music - it also features the song "Azucar Moreno" that appears in the movie I spoke of. The other tracks are similar in nature and could have been part of that movie. This makes the album vary Flamenco balanced.
This pamphlet serves as a wonderful resource to both those in profesional fields dealing with child abuse as well as those lay persons just entering this world through their consideration of foster parenting. As a researcher I was greatful for such a compact, to the point resource. As someone working with parents I was greatful for the open and easy to understand writing style of Eliana Gil. I have found all of Eliana Gil's works most useful and am greatful that this resource is available to those out there who may not be as interested in her works which are written in a more scholarly (although still understandable) voice.
I really love Los fantasmas del Caribe they have great music and sound. I love all their material from Caramelo to Mas Y Mas. I completly recommend all their cds. They will have u dancing all night.
One of the best Lego books out. Very high quality graphics and pictures. A nice collection of great projects. Full of interesting topics and tricks for Mindstorms. Covers RCX code, Robolab, NQC, and Visual Basic. RCX communication, Internet control, data logging, etc. Includes a CD and a useful parts list. Enough material to keep young minds and adults busy playing and learning.
Somewhere in this great history book there's a game. The authors have definitely done their homework in studying the culture of late 16th century Japan. They've also got a great filmography and bibliography at the back. As far as content is concerned, Sengoku sets the bar quite high for historical RPGs. The actual conversion of this historical information into a playable game is, however, a bit awkward. The book is also seriously hampered by the amateurish artwork and layout reminiscent of RPGs of 30 years ago. Still, I've worn the cover off my copy of the book so its obviously a worthwhile read.
it's a nice bra for support. i like it because it's full coverage. it's pretty much the same as my other victoria secret bras. but i paid less. :)
Gordon Wenham has produced a first-class exegetical commentary of Genesis. The bibliographies cover a full range of topics and authors. For each section of the biblical text, he begins with textual notes which are quite valuable to those familiar with the ancient languages. Next he addresses issues of form and structure. Finally, he provides a verse-by-verse commentary. In the process, he addresses various approaches and viewpoints in an even-handed and fair way.
I cannot imagine a less user-friendly layout than the Word Biblical Commentary Series. The series is uneven, and occasionally goes overboard in literary/source criticism. But one up-to-date, critical commentary on Genesis should be on our shelves, and this is about the best.
My daughter loves these! The only thing I wish they would change would be to make the package recyclable.
Everyone is a little leery of hospitals, but Good Cheer has good reason to make Judith and Renie nervous. Two high profile patients have recently died after fairly routine surgery. Judith needs a hip replacement, and Renie is scheduled for shoulder surgery. The night after their operations, a well known ex football player in the next room dies as well. Since they have nothing to do but think about what's going on, Judith and Renie put their minds to solving the mystery and to find out aabout the other strange things happening at Good Cheer hospital.This is the best that this series has produced in a long time. Hospitals are naturally creepy and this one is really strange. The setting of a hospital isolated after a snow storm really adds to the drama. Enjoy it, I did!
Judith McMonigle Flynn needs to have a hip replacement, coincidentally at the same time that her cousin Renie is having shoulder surgery. They are a little apprehensive about their admission to Good Cheer Hospital, because there seems to be a rash of deaths of basically healthy people who have recently had surgery at the hospital. There is a rumor of a takeover of Good Cheer and there are plenty of quirky hospital employees as well as relatives of the deceased which gives Judith a long list of suspects. Her husband is working on a case dealing with homeless people and Judith suspects that there is a connection to the case she's working on. Undaunted by her surgery, Judith travels around the hospital in her wheel chair and, as usual, manages to solve the mystery before the police. This is another enjoyable book in the Bed-and-Breakfast series.
I think this C.D. is great. She has a wonderful voice. I love the beats, they are really good. Most of the reviews I have seen always compare the singer to Britney Spears though(Not just Stacie's reviews). I love Brit, she is my fav. singer. I wish that everyone would stop trashing Britney because she shows her stomach. Regardless of what she wears she is still a christian, no one's perfect anyways. As christians we must not judge, people seem to think that christians are judgmental and scrutinizers. Christians, think about what you say before you say it. There is no need to talk badly of others-just something to think about.
Stacie's voice is strong and clear. This album (can I still call it an "album"? I'm dating myslef!) is superb. My young daughter loves it too and it is a joy to hear her singing the words. My only complaint is that the male voice in the background is really unnecessary. Her powerful voice can stand on it's own. Overall, it's superb and outstanding!
I really loved this CD! *___* There wasn't one song on this CD I didn't like, but my favorites were: Ride, 0.0 Baby, So Pray, Holdin' On, and Everything.But I give every song (...Except the interludes...) 5/5. ^__^
this cd is a great christian cd that appeals to teans and still shows somewhat of a christian sound. stacie has a great voice thats very mature 14.
Stacie Orrico has managed to take Christian music to another level with Genuine! Anyone who dares to call her "the Britney Spears of Christian music" needs a wake-up call! Britney is awesome, but Stacie will put her to shame! Such songs as Don't Look At Me, O.O. Baby, Stay True, and Holdin' On both have a groove and a message. Then, there's the ballads, like Without Love, Everything, and Dear Friend, a song Stacie herself wrote for her anorexic friend. This album is filled, not with artificial things, but that which is genuine...no pun intended. Although Stacie has tapped into the teen pop phenomenon respresented by such secular artists as Mandy Moore, Christina Aguilera, and of course, Britney Spears, Stacie sings about real life issues, such as peer pressure, idolizing someone else, temptation to do wrong, and even marriage and dating. Stacie is the coolest Christian singer ever. Rock on!
I paid 50 cents for this. Which was not bad at all. It was in good conditions for the price. One of the song did skip a little. But over all it was great for the price.
As a historic re-enactor, I'm always looking for good music. I also liked the 1 click purchase feature and downloads.You don't get liner notes. This is something Amazon should work on!I would recommend this to folks who enjoy the period.
If you are a Chuck Norris fan like me you will enjoy this movie.I remember watching this movie yrs ago remembered the movie but not its proper name until amazon suggested movies to me.
Fast delivery and in wonderful condition. Would buy again anytime from this person. Thank you.
We bought this to fill a duvet cover for summer. It's light weight, as we needed, and serves its purpose, considering the price and quality. Other similar light weight comforters in the marketplace cost 4+ times this one. No sales tax & no shipping (Amazon Prime) help make this a good deal.
The comforter is not lofty, but does "fluff up" nicely. It's lightweight, but don't let that fool you ... it will keep you warm. I gave it 4 stars only because the loft is low, but it really doesn't affect the warmth of the product. Great for a guest room. Buy it!
The book is very entertaining and leaves you wanting to read more of Sue Kaufman's writings.Not a "life changing" piece, but certainly very engaging story.You become familiar with the heroine and feel involved in the story.I recommend reading this book if you need to relax and have some fun.
It's a classic for a reason, folks. Extremely amusing and spot-on accurate. A very humorous account of the universal quest for meaning that has surely depressed the mess out of us all at some point or other. Style so good you forget to be jealous and just enjoy.A short review is not an insult. I strongly suggest that you find out about this book from one of those professional reviewer sorts. If you do that, you'll buy it. Alternately, just check your local library, get it if they have it, and prepare to get sucked right into reading this as quickly as you possibly can because it's just that damn good.
I found this CD program to have very simple yet powerful ideas that I have already implemented in my life. Michael Russ speaks about the way to make changes is to change the way I talk with myself. Very cool!This is clearly one of the best programs I have ever heard, I think Michael Russ will be one of the up and coming stars in the self help business.
Awesome book, written many years ago but still is relevant to us today in 2012! Hudson Taylor was a man of Godly wisdom! I recommend it to anyone who is looking for a book of inspiration and mission work.
This is not the correct size for the proclear 300 it needs to be cut down to fit. which isnt a problem but it should be mentioned because the part that gets cut down is wasted.
Limbsavers reduce the kick of large calibre mil surp rifles. The slip-ons eliminate the need for stock butt modifications if you can put up with an additional inch of pull. Highly recommended.
Anderson followed up his debut with an equally strong album. By this time the formula for future Anderson albums was in place: strong honky-tonk originals, a love song or two, a novelty song and just plain hardcore country. Two songs from this album went Top 10 Country ("Chicken Truck" and "I'm Just An Old Chunk Of Coal"). There are no liner notes here, but the sound is excellent. Anderson was one of a select few who brought traditional Country back to the charts. If you're a fan of real Country than this makes an excellent purchase.
This product works very well in my smoker. The Pecan smoke flavor is excelent for fish and I was able to save over .20 cents per biscuit by purchasing them through Amazon.
The bisquettes are very good and added flavor to the meat.I would recommend them to anyone wanting to use them.
Adorable songs about Buddy the cat who goes on a trip with just hissuitcase. Great old songs. Kind of jazzy with blues undertones. Thestories of Buddy's journey are timely. Very enjoyable for people wholove Cats and jazz & blues. Love it!Linda
Ry Cooder has held a special place in my head and heart for several decades, I have never been disappointed in his work. Every album has been a new adventure, a journey to new a place somewhat real and somewhat imagined. There are a couple of things about "Buddy" that I find interesting, maybe a bit telling. This is the third album he has used the UFO idea in a song, 1982's 'Slide Area' opens with "A UFO Has Landed In The Ghetto", 2005's masterful 'Chavez Ravine' has "El UFO Cayo" and 2007's 'My Name Is Buddy' has "Green Dog." "Green Dog" also strongly recalls "My Little Town" from 'Chavez Ravine' even using using some of the same lyrics. As usual, the musicianship and production values are without parallel, the freshness of some of the writing is suspect, though.
Can't go wrong for this price, I mean you're getting a metal step can for this price. The only drawback is its size, but it worked great for what I needed it for.
This is a very affordable product with a very sleek look, and I've been very happy with it. I actually have two of these. My partner and I started using the one we had as a trash can solely for used cat litter, so we got a second one to use for any other bathroom trash. A normal plastic takeout bag fits perfectly as a liner. The only thing I would change is to give it a little more weight towards the bottom of the can so that stepping on the pedal wouldn't make an empty can tilt.
I wanted to try this moisturizer since I love Exuviance foundation. I was hoping I'd also fall in love with this skin treatment. I can't criticize anything specific, but I didn't love it. It has a nice texture, and a little goes a long way. It does make my skin feel soft, and the scent isn't too heavy. For a similar price,though, I think I prefer the Olay Pro-X or Regenerist line. Primary reason? I did have a few small break-outs after using Exuviance Restorative Complex for a couple of weeks. Did the Exuviance cause this? I'm not sure. With the easy availability of Olay, I think I'll return to that family of skin care products.
The best ever, buy and enjoy hours of music by many popular latin singers who have performed over the years. Thank you for the tribute of Celia Cruz befor her death. Buy today.
works ok but not really enough clearance to use on the water heater valve and is made out of plastic
Picked up my Tachikoma from AX '06. To address some questions: Arms and legs do not have a wire frame inside so it will not hold a pose. Eyes do not turn. Tightly stuffed so it will hold its shape. Go ahead and order it, it's too fun not to own.
I've been using these for years but for some reason they are no longer available in any of the grocery stores near me. I like them because they offer enough friction to clean tough stains (especially when used with BarKeeper's Friend) but they don't scratch my stainless steel pots the way steel wool used to. They also work great on my stainless steel cook top. I bought a case which reduced the price per item and spread out the shipping.
We can't find these in stores anymore, which is a shame, since nothing else works as well.
These are just the beat scrubbies I'ver used. They don't scratch and they last forever. None of my local stores carry them anymore.
Ace Hardware still carries this product in regular stock for 1.99 a box. Cheap.There's you source. Sorry amazon vendors.
I did a lot of research, and this product has the best ingredients, and the highest amounts of brown guggul. I have only been taking it about a week but I have lost about 3-4 pounds. It doesn't contain any stimulant like caffeine, so I don't get that jittery feeling. The suggested usage is 1-2 capusules twice a day, the bottle doesn't say whether to take before or after you eat, but I take it before breakfast after my morning coffee. And I have no nausea or anything. I take 2 capsules twice a day, it does raise your body temperature, and has increased my metabolism. I haven't changed my diet or exercised and its working. I will be ordering this again when I run out. And this company had speedy delivery, I received my order within 3 days.
Carlton does it again. The veteran jazz guitarist's second release in as many years does not dissapoint. It is one of the best Jazz albums I've purchased or heard this year. This ten track CD plus one bonus track is full of gems. Especially his cover of the Eagles "I Can't Tell You Why" with R&B artist Shai doing guest vocals on the track. It is a smooth jazz version. He also covers Steve Winwood's "Roll With It". If you're a fan of Carlton, Fourplay or just jazz, check this CD out. It's Carlton at his best.
This is a great CD with wonderful music to listen to. Larry Carlton is a very talented musician and I'll look forward to buying more of his music.
Voodoo-like anti-hero, super hot gun toting anti-heroin, oh yea! If you haven't seen this flik your F^&-ing up.
Steve Miller is probably the world's most underated guitarist. He is also very underated as an artist. Your Saving Grace is no exception. The title track is heavy with emotion and while not writen by Miller, shows off the talent of Tim Davis who was the backbone of the early stuff. The forcefull lovesong "Little Girl" and the civil rights motif "Don't you let nobody" are solid rock tracks with a hint of blues and a lot of attitude. "Baby's House" shows off the piano skills of Nicky Hopkins as well as Miller's strength as a vocalist. If you have Miller's box set you are missing out on the full version of this awesome song. "Motherless Children" has a blues twing and a solid emotional base that makes it a classic. While the album is short, it is a good buy. For the Miller enthusist it is well worth it. If not, you might want to start off his early stuff with Antholgy.
Yes, this is the cd from Japan. It definitely is a much better sound then the USA out of print cd that sell for big bucks. Crisp and clear w/solid bass and much better mid & high frequencies all around. The cd does not come in the standard cd case, so you will have no problem finding it amoung all those standard cases. It does have a seperate sheet with the words and a full replica of the old LP cover. I would recommend purchasing this cd made in Japan before getting an out of print US reversion. I got this cd for only eight buck$ more then a mint LP, which I would have to put on a disk to listen to. Oh, you can pay alot less, for this cd, if you buy it on Amazon.com. Enjoy! (-:
I bought this because I'd heard the opening track "Down in the Desert" and thought it excellent. I was stunned to find the whole CD is supreme...this is surely one of the best kept secrets in all of rock. Thin White Rope are a combination of Television and Sonic Youth and Nick Cave and Pavement and better than all of them. "When Worlds Collide" is one of my most treasured CDs and one of the greatest compilations in the history of rock music.
Truth be told, I wasn't expecting a whole lot of sophistication from the uneducated peasant culture of overwhelmingly rural Haiti. Imagine my surprise, then, to discover that I was being treated to a marvelously tightly integrated ethnographic study-cum-anecdote chrestomathy. In addition to some uniquely Haitian elements, there are, of course, the to-be-expected plethora of archetypal folkloric motifs as catalogued by Aarne and Thomson. The stories were generally brief and worked quite well, and Wolkstein's detailed notes about the physical setting and orator of each tale make the reader feel as if he's actually taking part in a rural Haitian storytelling session under the full moon in the sweltering sugar cane fields. Bravo, Dr. Wolkstein!
I recently had to read An Aqaintance ith darkness for a book report. When i was assigned the book i was not happy to have to read a boring cival war book. An Aquaintance must have been anything but boring. Emily Bransby Pigbush, a 14 year old girl lives in Washington D.C. until her mother dies. she is then sent to live with her Rich Uncle instead of her best friend. It turn out her Uncle who is a Doctor, gets people to body snatch people straight from the grave. The whole thing turns out all right. this is a great book to read if you are a fan of cival war hitory. I enjoyed every moment!
I really liked this book! It is a Classic "Rinaldi". I really like Ann Rinaldi style of writing and it is filled with all sorts of excitement. One thing that was a bit different than most of her books is that is was sort of "dark". It is not a real "happy" book to read although it is very good.
When I first picked up An Aquaintance With Darkness I thought it was going to be just another girl comming of age type historical novel. An Aquaintance With Darkness was so much more. This novel not only vividly described the turmoil in Washington surrounding the end of the American Civil War and the assasination of President Lincoln, but also brought up a pressing moral issue of that time: is it wrong to snatch bodies for medical research? It was interesting to read Emily's veiw point and see her inner struggle to sort out right from wrong. It was exciting to see the focus of the story change from a story of a girl growing up as an orphan to a story of a girl who must choose between what she beleives is right and being loyal to her family and friends. Over all I would say the book was a pleasent surprise.
This book was one of Ann Ranildi's best. It is very emotinal, a some points I was so mad at the girl and a some points I was afraid. The book weaves 2 problums into one so ther's always something you have to look out for, and you don't know what charater to trust. The book takes a historal moment know one will forget and turns it into a book in the eyes of a 14 year old girl, who has no family left but her uncle that betrays her.
This was Ann's best book yet. The charatcters and the story were very well-written and woven into real history that I felt like i was relly there. The medical aspcet of it was interesting as well. I was also intrigued by all the body-snatchers and read more about them . The author presents a fair argument as to whether the bodies should have been left alone or used for mediacl science and I thought that her un-biased nature was commendable. This was a great book and I think this was definately the best yet.
I liked this book, but some of her others were better. I was very surprised at the way doctors found there information at that time. I have never heard of grave robbing before this. This style of writing was different from how she usually writes. I also recommend one of her new ones, The Second Bend in the River.
This book not only kept me reading and reading, it also was suspenseful and thrilling. Emily was a truly wonderful character and all of the other characters had colorful personalities as well. If you like suspense and romance too, get this book today! You'll absolutely love it.
Maxwell Rules particularly when he writes his own material.His new album is testimony to that! Fortunate has some extraordinary remixes and material every fan should own.Matrimony is beautiful but i was disappointed by the middle of the road title track penned by the tedious R.J kelley.
There was a lot of detail and information in this book, but not enough examples and the quantum mechanics section was not covered very well. probably since it would be beyond the scope of the book otherwise.
I love Yoko Kanno. I love Cowboy Bebop. I love the Seatbelts.The remixed versions of the songs are very listenable, I would carry this CD around to listen to as a pick-me-up. I actually think I have done that before."Tank!" Luke Vibert Mix is very poppy and jazzy and fun, I love this version so much. I brought this CD to a dance session in an acting class and this is what we danced to. Everyone loved it."Forever Broke" Fila Brazilia Mix is so beautiful! It's on a mix CD I made of all the Cowboy Bebop songs because it's good for chilling/meditation, dance, study, everything."Piano Black" was given a little more depth.Overall, it's a very listenable CD. If you're a diehard fan of Cowboy Bebop, you may not like what was done to some of the songs on here. It is an interesting fusion of styles.
This kit has all the tools you'll need for a simple repair. The biggest issue is that the screws will get jumbled and are easy to lose (including under the plastic). Other than a little digging through for matches this kit has everything you need including hard to find matching screws!
I'd like to see this on stage, this performance certainly enhanced my interest in this work.
Although handy the box could have a better way to hold in place all the useful screws. Overall it is great purchase.
Kit has a lot if parts. Some are great for certain glasses, others are too small. Would be great if half the kit was full of larger screws.
This repair kit has an excellent selection of lots of various screw sizes and had just what I wanted for my glasses. The cost was not expensive and delivery was fast. I have to use a walker or scooter so going to the store to fix my glasses would have been a big chore. This kit enabled me to do everything at home quickly.
This kit has everything you would ever need to repair a pair of glasses from screws to nose padsI received the kit real fast in about 3 days I was surprised at how many screws there were the screwdriver is easy to use and the nose pads so many this was better then described on amazon store page
After my Gucci sunglasses lost the part that holds the screw I could not find a tool kit that coantain the part and I didn't want to throw my glasses away. I am so glad I found this kit in Amazon. Not only did it have the part I need it, it also has a small screw that attaches to your keychain so you can have with you at all times just in case your sunglasses get loose.
This video is a great way to get in shape, practice your self defense skills and gaze at gorgeous Lorenzo Lamas while you do it. It does help if you've previously taken self defense classes though.
Well, this is a great collection. The artwork is great, but it's the clever conceptions that make these cartoons so funny. There are no stock characters or favorite themes, every panel is original and fresh. Highly recommended.
My copy of this book is nearly destroyed from all the use it receives. This book is not just for winter. Many of the tours described have also turned out to be excellent mountain bike routes and hiking trips. The descriptions of the areas the routes traverse could be expanded, but the route information itself is first class.
I have a real beard and play Santa. Grandson is almost 2, and has a problem with beards. This gave him a chance to put on/take off the beard, and made Christmas much nicer!
I needed a wireless card for my desktop PC as it was moving to another room and I don't currently have the time to run a coaxial connection in there for the cable modem.I picked this card based on the rating and reviews here. I am happy to say that they were very accurate and this is a really good card, especially given that the price is so low compared to other, brand name cards.Installation was very simple and the signal strength and speed are perfect. I was in a hurry so I just used the Windows wireless client instead of the dedicated, included software but perhaps if I get time later, I will try running that.All in all, you simply can't go wrong with this card - right price and very good performance.
I actually purchased a pair of these about a year ago for my home WIFI network from a different site. Since that site no longer has these in stock, I got the next pair (this time for my church) from Amazon. I have had 0 issues with these cards - can't remember a single time where I lost connectivity honestly. Don't think I could ask for more, especially at the price point. Great buy!
The product is excellent. I was getting dropped signals with both of my other wireless adapters, one from Netgear and one from Zonet. This always has excellent signal strength and does not drop the signal.The four stars instead of five is because the instructions are incomprehensible. It gives the feeling they were written by people who did not understand English very well. I wanted to turn on encryption, but have no idea how to do it even after struggling with the poorly written directions. I can turn on encryption for one session, but as soon as I disconnect, it cannot reconnect unless I turn encryption off... Oh, well, it is fine as long as I don't try to mess around with it.
I ordered this just over a month ago, and I recieved it in the time frame that I was told. It is great! My computer works great with it and it was really easy to install! I have never installed one before, but I wanted to try and do it myself and not have to get someone else to do it! It was so easy to do and once installed, I downloaded the disk and it was ready to go...it was really quite simple,and I am far from a computer expert. So if I can do it, so can you! I'm so glad I got it and I will probably be purchasing a couple more in the near future for my kids' computers too!!
I was worried about buying a cheaper card for my desktop, but that has since subsided. This works great.It was easy to set up. I have 100% signal strength from my router that is one floor down and one room over. I have had no dropped signal problems either. Why not buy this one that is cheaper than a more expensive one?
I wanted to get rid of those pesky wires, so after some research I bought one of these to see if it would work in my desktop. The day it arrived I followed the directions and it was picking up my wireless router signal within 5 minutes of opening the package. Needless to say, I bought another one the same day for my wife's desktop and they have worked flawlessly for a month now. Both are XP systems.
I recently purchased this card for a new build. The card worked great at first with the MSI drivers but a few days afterwards I kept getting horrible connection issues. I'd stay connected but webpages would take forever to load and when in WoW I would get lag (people running in place) and disconnects. After reading reviews I tried ralink drivers RT61. These drivers worked great with connectivity but then, every once in a while, caused me to lose total connection followed by a BSOD (blue screen). After dealing with the BSODs I found out that this card runs off the Ralink RT2561 chip, went to Ralink's site and used their updated drivers...everything works fine now.summary:1) use Ralink RT2561 drivers.2) enjoy
Got this card today (06/30/09). Added the card in my Dell Dimension desktop running windows XP, and installed the driver from the CD that came with it and it didn't work! It detected my wireless router but when I entered the WEP key, it just wouldn't connect. Went to the MSI site found the driver for this product and boom it works. Signal strength is excellent.Included driver version is some 1.X and the version on the MSI site is 3.1. On the MSI site under download section search for PC60G and you will find the right driver.How difficult is it to include the right driver with a new product?! Hence the 4 stars, otherwise I would have given 5.
The sturdy, extended antenna is a big plus. I do wish the extension was longer though. It's only about 18in. It does make a difference where I place it. Books seem to be more disruptive than walls.I am using this on my HTPC (which sits on a bookshelf) with the wireless router about 50 ft away through 2 walls. I'm always getting at least normal "yellow" strength. Mostly "green" though.I have XP Pro 64. WPA was fairly easy to setup and the supplied software is pretty intuitive.If you're having problems setting up security though, don't expect much help from the book.Overall a great, inexpensive product. For the price, it could have gotten 5 stars, but I'm picky.
I recently installed this card on an old HP 64 bit desktop that I was upgrading to Windows 7. As the included CD didn't have a Windows 7 driver I went to their website, using another PC of course, and downloaded the correct driver and then let Windows "find" it during installation. I didn't load any of the manufacturer's software at all, I let Windows do everything and its working perfectly. I get instant connection when I power up, the signal is strong and I've yet to drop the connection. The desktop is 2 rooms (thus 2 walls) away from the gateway and directly next to an HD TV, which I use as its monitor, and doesn't pick up any interference. Oh, one more thing, once everything was working "automatic update" downloaded and installed an even newer driver.
If you are buying this card for a windows 7 build you will have to look for drivers online other than that the card works fine. I'm playing online games like CSS on steam and others and it gives me no lag, our wireless modem is two rooms away and I'm getting 4 out of 5 bars which is good but not perfect. I wish they updated the drivers for MAC or hackintosh as some of you might know what that is. The latest drivers for their web side are from 08 for 10.5.x version. No snow leopard support what so ever.
I moved to a location where wireless internet was all that was available and so I needed a wireless adapter for my desktop PC. This product was quick and easy to install and enabled me to be on line immediately. The price was very reasonable and the product works as described.
The computer I installed this in, is in my sons room across the hallway. Without a wall, it would measure probably 50 to 60 feet (maybe a little more) Since I have installed the product it has held at excellent signal. I can't say how well it would work further as I have not tried. I only ran into 1 hiccup after installing. When I turned off the computer and turned it back on, it did not automatically hunt for my access point. So I added my access point to the settings and that fixed that problem. I am very pleased with this product.
I had no issues during installation and setup, so it's a true plug & play item. The cord for the antenna was a bit short though.
I installed the Super G 801.11BG wireless card into an older Dell desktop with 2 OS's on separate hard drives. One OS is ubuntu and the other is XP.With the ubuntu OS,the card worked out of the box without any more tweaking,with the XP OS,I installed the software that came with the card,and it worked without any more tweaking, and still works with ubuntu after upgrading from 8.10 to 9.04.Highly recommend this wireless card and I really like the antenna being on a cable instead of attached to the card on the back of computer.
I had a wireless USB adapter, and it does not compare to this! Easy to install and hasn't dropped signal on me yet
I purchased this to allow my daughter to access the household wireless network. I bought it based on prior reviews and price. (It was to go into a 5 year old desktop that my daughter inherited when we upgraded). It is a Super G and works like a champ on our enhanced N network, even though a bit slow, (but that could be the old computer). I would highly recommend this product for adding onto an existing network and for added flexibility on desktop placement. This one went upstairs no where near any existing LAN cables.
The PCI card dropped in, the software worked, and things were online. It is exactly what I was looking for.
I added this to my windows vista desktop. It seems to work fine. I have been using it for months.
Good but sometime I had to reboot my computer to get it connected with wireless router.
The card works fine, but the included configuration utility repeatedly dropped my wireless connection. I started using the Windows XP configuration utility, and it holds the connection much better.
The stories in "The Mishomis Book" give an excellent background for the Anishnabe culture. I have heard Anishnabe Elders refer to it as a children's bible for the Anishnabe.It begins with the origin of the Anishnabe People. It continues through many of the stories that establish the mores and society of this culture. All of these stories are written in a way children can understand.I highly recommend this book to anyone interested in the culture of the Woodland Indians. It has been a beginning point of understanding this culture for me and, I am certain, many others.
I had to buy this for a college course, and I love it so much that I won't part with it now. My kids are reading it and I think it's a great way to introduce them to Native American tradition.
I've had this receiver for a couple of years, I guess.It still works flawlessly, as did it's Pioneer predecessorbefore it developed a hum in one channel.It has plenty of inputs and outputs. I'm happy that ithas digital audio (fiber optic) input as the only soundoutput my brand new LG TV has is a digital audio.The remote can be a bit fiddly and, like many otherproducts produced abroad, has a less than understandableuser manual. I waded my way through it, and my systemsounds good, but understanding all of the features byreading about them in the manual is difficult.I would certainly consider replacing this receiverwith another Pioneer product. I've used them for yearswith few problems.
this is a good reciver but i got it at circuit city for 120. i live in california so im not sure if they have circuit city's anywhere else.
Since 1980, I have been recommending this reference to over 23, 000 participants in my business writing workshops. I describe the book as invaluable, comprehensive, beautifully organized, and continuously updated. The Gregg Reference Manual is one of two essential tools for business, government and corporate writers: the other is a fat dictionary. The Manual is full of wisdom and articulates sound uniform rules with nicely nuanced exceptions. It is simply my writer's crutch.
I've used this book for years, and I think it's terrific. Why? Four reasons: First, the information about grammar and usage is so mainstream, so consistent with the majority of other important references (The Chicago Manual of Style, for one). Second, it is accurate and reliable. Third, the outstanding index makes it wonderfully easy to use; you can look something up, in everyday terms, and readily find a reference. Fourth, the rules are short and the examples clear; once you've found the rule you need, you can read it, grasp it, and 30 seconds later be on your way.As a full-time trainer of writers and editors, I have used this book with everyone from grammar-challenged support staff to highly educated professional editors. With some classes, I've also used the optional worksheets (sold separately). I can't recommend Gregg highly enough.
This product was just how I remembered it when I used it 30 years ago. Yes the answers are hard to see until you press down real hard. But that is how it was 30 years ago and I did not expect anything different. I would recommend this product to anyone trying to teach their kids addition and subtraction.My children look at it like a computer and love playing with it. It gives them instant answers when they press down and they like that satisfaction.
Excellent book, especially for those who have some knowledge of Java.I found the way the author explains topics very thrilling. He makes topics that had previously seemed very hard, such as RMI, appear very simple. The book is also illustrative and leisurely. The examples are simple and easy to follow.
I've found this book totally different from any other tutorial stuff. In spite of my past programmers expirience in database I've started studying OOP from scratch more than one year ago. I had several books of Java-programming (Deitel&Deitel, Mike Morgan, Peter Norton etc.). I've got prefer this one. Author give to readers the pretty excelent refferences. I would say that this book ought to read whether you beginers in OOP or not. This book will compel you work. It is inexhaustible source for Java programming.
As an experienced C/C++ programmer, I wanted a book that could fairly quickly get me up speed in Java. I'd say that this book met that challenge. Though it's 700+ pages may seem a bit daunting at first, it was an easy read for myself.To finish my first Java project, I had to rely on on-line help and a few other books, so don't expect this to be the only Java book you read. But as a start for an experienced programmer it's quite adequate.
I learned a lot from "Just Java 1.2" and really liked the readable style. The author knows how to get detailed technical points across. The diagrams and pictures really helped too. The CD has a LOT of Java material on it.
As far as filler arcs go, this isn't bad at all. The only thing bad about it is that it's keeping you from the actual main story. For what it is it's alright, I enjoyed watching it. The picture quality is as good as ever, same goes for the English dub. If you've been collecting these sets don't stop now!
I use this on my Mirage OMD -15 , since the speaker has 4 post on the speaker and suggest bi-wiring I needed something that would be able to be run into the same plug into the receiver and all four plugs into the speaker while not splitting the wire. Even though I am not running over long distances I like the fact that I can run 4 16 gauge AWG solid copper wires out of 2 plugs.
I am bothered by the review from dn@microtek.fr. Everyone has a right to his own opinion, but I think this is just vicious anti-Christian retoric. Mr. Tozer is a prolific writer and has several 5 star ratings. Please see the "All Books" list before judging this book only by what this man says.
It is a very good CD! My favorite songs were the ones that people sang.. I am kind of disapoined because I thought the charcters will sings their charcter themes... it was more backround music tho.. very Classical-ish! But a good CD!! 4/31 were sung.. :*( I wish more of them were sung!
This book does a good job of motivating me to keep to my cardio kickboxing class. Even if there are more other good books on martial arts kicking in print. I collect such kind of books. Keep up the good work.
Everything was thought of luminescent dial large enough numbers and a good looking watch at a reasonable price extremely functional
I read an bridged copy of this book when I was just a boy. It was a good book then. I decieded that I would reread this book. I was surpised that not much was taken out. It was still a good book. I am looking into getting more Holmes' books.
When I read the back of the book, I thought this was going to be a fantasy novel. It turns out, while the story is fictional, it could very well be a true story and not far-fetched at all. The characters are slightly confusing, and the middle tends to lag on a bit, but overall, it was a nice read. It's not one of those one-sitter books, but if you have a lot of time on your hands and would like to read an anticipating novel, The Hound of the Baskervilles is a great pick. :)
I have read and enjoyed many a good Sherlock Holmes story (e.g. "The Red-Headed League" is a winner), but at the very top of the book stack I would place "The Hound of the Baskervilles". Who could ever forget the atmosphere that Arthur Conan Doyle evokes by his use of those misty moors!In teaching English (Literature) to a class of 7th & 8th grade boys, I was at first a bit hesitant to introduce this novel as our text. Would a group of squirrelly junior high boys find anything of interest in a book written in 1901? Answer: I needn't have worried. They loved it (and so did I)! The fog from the moors drifted right into our classroom.First-rate mystery tale with one of the most famous fictional characters ever created. ENJOY! (But keep an eye out for a frightful luminescent hound next time you're walking home at night - just in case).
this was one of shelocks best books. this book was suspenceful,exicting, mysterious and shocking. in this book all kind of things happen,i mean think about it ok, your in 1814 and your dad has been atacked by a "hell hound" so you think his son has just enherited his mancion and his money. she he calls sherlock holmes to find out what happend to his father, and as he gets to start looking around the place he finds that the father had another son but did not knew about it. this son was even living on the property, and this son was the killer becuse he whanted to have the manchion. the conflict is great, we have person vs.person, person vs.nature, person vs.animal. this was a great book just to read, allways had surprises and suspence, it was a great mystery.it was a great thing to see that the hound was only a starved animal.
Ah, to settle in with Hound of the Baskervilles was pure delight. I had read this many years ago in an almost obsessive pursuit of reading all things Sherlock Holmes and have only recently taken up my obsession again with the wonderful series by Laurie R. King featuring Sherlock Holmes and Mary Russell. I digress, back to Hound of the Baskervilles. One of the best mysteries in the series. What more could you ask for? A spookylegend about a gruesome phantom dog, murder most foul, the English moor and an ancient creepy mansion. In this story, Dr. Watson has never been more delightful as Holmes' foil and confidant. The mystery evolves to an exiting climax which leaves the reader fufilled but wanting to get their hands on the next Holmes case. Well done!
I was totally into this book, turning page after page to unravel the very clever mystery. I don't give plot "spoilers", so generally this is about how Sherlock Holmes investigates a most unusual mystery involving an interesting "family myth" centering around how a cursed dog stalks and kills them. There are a few plot twists that I didn't see coming, and I was very happy with the book as a whole, it never gets boring, and the characters are very well developed, and will at times keep you guessing. The deductive reasoning of Sherlock Holmes is very rewarding to read, and puts a smile on the readers face. I recommend this one if you want to try out Doyle, or read a mystery novel.
I'm new to audio books. But, I'm afraid I've already been spoiled. I wonder if there could possibly exist a better combination of author and reader. Holmes sounds just the way you'd expect the great sleuth to sound. Deliberate, never rushed and always a gentleman.The story is carefully woven and the presentation of the characters by Timson is masterful. I've listened to it over several times and each time I appreciate a little more the complexity and the detail. The Musical interludes are brief and sparse, but definitely compliment. If you like Sherlock Holmes, Timson is the right reader for the job. I'm buying the big collection now.
The story was a little uneasy at first, but the action and plot and all that good stuff kicks in. Seems to me, just one of those "you have to get into the plot sort of books" I'd recommend it to all, who would like to get into the Sherlock Holmes universe for the first time...
Follow Sherlock Holmes and his trusty colleague, Watson, in one of Sir Arthur Conan Doyle's best murder mystery ever, The Hound of the Baskervilles. Watch while Sherlock Holmes uncovers the mysteries of the Baskerville Hall of London.You and Sherlock Holmes get to discover all the clues of Charles Baskerville's mysterious death and protect Henry Baskerville from being murdered. You listen to stories of the notorious hound. Finally, before its too late, decide who is behind the murder of Charles Baskerville. Was it the baronet, Mr. And Mrs. Stapleton, or was it possibly Laura Lynes? Find out in the end.Sir Arthur Conan Doyle keeps you in suspense throughout the book. He keeps bringing in more leads to the story. The author also provides an interesting and intriguing topic with a tall tale creature tied in.This book is wonderful and would be best appreciated by all readers 10 and up.
The Hound of the Baskervilles, by Arthur Conan Doyle is a piquant mystery that leads you from suspicion to suspicion. Sir Charles Baskerville had recently died of exhaustion after running from the demonic Hound of the Baskervilles, the family curse. While going to claim his inheritance, Sir Henry, the last of the Baskervilles, is warned away from Baskerville Hall by an anonymous note. At any moment, Sir Henry's life might be put into peril by the beast or the culprit behind it, so Dr. Watson accompanies him to Baskerville Hall. Holmes must deduct who is behind these seemingly supernatural occurrences before the hound strikes again.
This book was used as an example of English literature of the period in an English Literature class for 8th graders which I teach. All of the young readers enjoyed the book and I am very pleased with the quality of the item and the children's responses to it.
Dover has never let me down for purchasing great products, printed with excellence in mind at a mind-blowing low price! This book will be no exception.Essentially, Holmes finds himself in a mystery concerning a legend of a supernatural black hound that curses the Baskerville family. Holmes is intrigued, and he sends Watson to watch over the new Baskerville heir.The story is classic Holmes, and the action is fast paced and moving. A fun read with an eye on a classic local legend of the Isles! Highly recommended.
The first in Scenario Productions' "The Adventures Of Sherlock Holmes" series and taken from the Archives of CBC Radio, this superbly presented radio adventure theater production of The Hound Of The Baskervilles is a multicast presentation of a classic Sherlock Holmes story. This two audio cassette audio book has a two hour running time and is enhanced with music and sound effects for the perfect "theater of the mind" listening experience. This radio theater production of The Hound Of The Baskervilles is enthusiastically recommended for all Sherlock Holmes fans and would make a very popular addition to school and community library audio book collections.
This is really good book I reccomend it: Sherlock Holmes and Dr. Watson wait inside. It is late around 11:10 p.m. when they see a flash a light through the window. Then they hear a harsh mean howl at the lights apperance. Sherlock Holmes and Dr. Watson duck down and be really quiet. Then they see the light again, but this time no howl. Then the light flashes again this time more like a flash light, light and sherlock knows it. He says , " My dear Watson I think somebody is out there sending signals to us by light flashes"! Sherlock knows it for sure and then that day they hear that an exscaped prisoner is on the look and he is realted to the Baskervilles!
This book is a wonderful depiction of the Sherlock Holmes world. I think that this is the best depiction of the stories as a whole and is a must read for all ages.
this was good copy, I enjoyed it. Smooth transaction, no problems at all, I will buy more in the future.
I read this book and this is definitely my favorite of all the books I have read. This book is very, very, suspenseful and a little spooky. This was the first Sherlock Holmes book I have read and it got me hooked on Sherlock Holmes. I couldn't put this book down because it was so suspenseful and it was very entertaining. I would recommend this book to anyone.
Nice, basic book version of this classic Sherlock Holmes story. Comments/vocabulary in the back is a nice touch for those trying to learn from literature. Not deluxe, but worth the low price.
Before there was CSI and the magic of solving a crime in less than 60 minutes we had Sherlock Holmes. This was always my favorite Sherlock Holmes story and the most scary Holmes book I ever read. Many movies were made from this book, but if you want the real deal, without the interpetations, you have to read the book. Plenty of atmosphere in a Holmes book, with a little imagination you can find yourself knocking on the door at 221B Baker street with a curious matter that needs Mr. Holmes attention.R HemingwayPast Twilight
I had this printer working within minutes of opening the box. Very fast with quality print. An excellent value.
This is a great baby record book. The pages are so thorough and laid out so simply. I gave it to my cousin and she just loved it! I only gave it four stars because it didn't include a pouch or pocket page which I saw and liked in many other books, to keep newspaper clippings, the band from the hospital etc. Otherwise it is a great book!
This is the book whose relative failure made Svevo abandon his literary career for a decade or two until a young Irishman named James Joyce happened upon it while tutoring the then old man in English and realized its greatness. It's a wonderful story, the one of the future luminary resuscitating the old, broken spirit and it gave me the impetus to even pick up a Svevo book (that one being The Confessions of Zeno). But what is here? It is a very engaging, very biting, very vivid story, and one that is told with wit, grace and style. But (and there is usually a but) it clearly pales against his later masterpiece. If given a choice, I would definitely recommend Zeno over this one, but this is still a truly excellent read. The story of liasons gone awry, psychological musings and other problems of that then new creature, the Modern Neurotic, are the spine of this story, and they provide sturdy support... even if they get a better treatment in his next book.
i dont own this, but i ahve all the MP3s and i just have to say that this cd is awesome!!!
This is the absolute best of Sailor Moon right here. Not only is Sailor Moon Sailor Stars the best season ever the sonds are the GREATEST!
This is a very good CD. If I could just stop playing Finsbury Park I could really enjoy the other songs even more.Very talented lady!
I purchased this system a year ago and have been dreading having to change the filter. I HATE changing filters on anything because it's never as easy as the manufacturer claims. I just changed the filter and it took me about 2 minutes. Super easy! I love this product! My skin isn't all itchy when I take a shower anymore!
What else is there to say about a John Wayne movie that has not been said. Good fast service and good movie.
I HAVE SEEN THIS MOVIE MANY TIMES PRIOR TO BUYING IT. I BOUGHT IT ON LINE AS A PACKAGE DEAL WITH 2 OTHER DVD'S. EVEN WALMART WANTED TO MUCH MONEY AND I WENT TO SEVERAL BEFORE I FOUND ONE. I LIKE JOHN WAYNE, BUT I BOUGHT IT FOR THE FONDA ACTING. HE PLAYS THE PART WELL.
DVD newcomer "Fort Apache" (1948) looks great, with minimal wear on its crisp black-and-white images (from original nitrate elements) and bugle-brisk audio. The film, ironically, finds Henry Fonda playing the maddeningly hawkish cavalry commander against John Wayne's humanistic officer willing to risk all for peace and justice.The (single) DVD has no documentary on the exciting and heartfelt film, a shame. It does include a 15-minute piece on Monument Valley, covering Ford's significant and seemingly beneficial role in the Indian reservation's history. The Navajo, paid good wages for their appearances, called him "Giant Soldier." "I've kissed more babies than a politician," Ford said."Part of his vision of the world was that we're all very small in the scheme of things," film historian Joseph McBride says. "I think (Monument Valley) gives a dimension of moral seriousness to his work that was intensified as he went along."[...]
Fort Apache, is one of the best westerns and war movies. Henry Fonda is great as the crazy commander, John waynes knowlegable calvaryman part is a great balance to Fondas. The Irish sargent and the confederate veteran stand out too. The Apaches are less villified than usual, with the focus on the Calvarys problems.
John Ford and John Wayne teamed up to do many films during their days in Hollywood and this western adventure is among the best horse operas ever made. Set in picturesque Monument Valley, a favorite Ford outdoor setting, the movie tells of life in an army outpost in Arizona and the unease of officers and enlisted men under the command of a disgruntled, by-the-book lieutenant colonel. Henry Fonda is excellent as the martinent who alienates his men and clashes with Wayne's Captain York throughout the film, their differences exploding during a peace parley with the Apaches which ends in a rousing cavalry-Indian engagement near the end of the movie. Ford's regulars, led by Ward Bond, Victor McLaglen and Hank Worden are among the cast members, and Shirley Temple and John Agar provide the romantic angle in the proceedings. The black and white cinematography by Archie Stout is striking and Richard Hageman's wistful score are among the film's top notch production values.
John Ford was one of the greatest directors to ever step on a movie set. He was proficient in many genres but won his most acclaim for his Westerns - especially those starring John Wayne. Fort Apache ranks among his best offerings, having not only great direction but also two super stars at the peak of their powers. Duke Wayne and Hank Fonda play contrasting characters who share one thing in common - the call to duty. The scenery is glorious and the pacing sublime in this highly recommended film.
Hey not many people I know watch the apprentice but pretty soon everybody I know will play the computer game of it! It totally rocks! You have to try it. Donald Trump is amazing. I love the game. And I got it from amazon for a really cheap price. Amazon has the cheapest prices you could imagine.
I bought this for a little Valentine's day gift for my 2.5yo. He has good fine motor skills for his age, so he can handle the tiny size. He's not into coloring the pictures in yet, just lots of enthusiastic stamping, counting, making animal sounds, and naming the animals and colors, which this is great for. I do think that if your child wants to color the pictures in, you'll want the bigger stampers. But this set is so cute, easy to store, and the 4-color stamp pad is nice. A lot of fun in a tiny package, and definitely worth the 6 bucks!
looks nice. i purchased this as a gift & it has not been used yet. so i can't really rate it.
The "golden era" of Hollywood had film scores written by the likes of Rozsa, Steiner, Newman, Herrmann, and Friedhofer. Hugo Friedhofer is primarily remembered for his Academy Award winning music to THE BEST YEARS OF OUR LIVES. Most of his scores are rich orchestral masterpieces but he is not as well known as well as some of his contemporaries. Still, his music is worth a listen today.Marco Polo continues recording music from "forgotten" film classics with commendable performances by the Moscow Symphony Orchestra. This CD contains superb music from four of his earlier works: ADVENTURES OF MARCO POLO -- 1937, 13 min.; THE LODGER -- 1944, 20 min.; RAINS OF RANCHIPUR -- 1955, 15 min.; SEVEN CITIES OF GOLD -- 1955, 25 min.Digital recording on Marco Polo CD.
I have to say that this DVD series is somewhat frustrating. There were some moments when I felt like turning it off so stupid it was and then at others it really hit home. This isn't a great series start but it is a decent one and I'll buy the rest of the series.
OK, first I'll admit to a strong bias. My day job is to limit orbital debris creation from NASA satellites, so any series that recognizes the importance of my daily struggle is an automatic win with me.That said, I think the show is interesting, and something I could see watching on Saturday mornings for fun. They've included enough interpersonal relationship stuff to keep it interesting, but with the backdrop of nerdy space facts. I love to destroy these kinds of shows on technical inaccuracies, but I find that harder to do with this series. The writers seem to have made the effort to actually research their topic a little bit, and tried to stick to facts. There are a few inventions to fit the story lines, but for the most part they try to be reasonably accurate.The interviews in the bonus tracks are pretty good, and I use them in my classes on orbital debris.
My husband loves steam trains. This was a Christmas present for him. He has spent many enjoyable hours watching it.
I stumbled upon this series while looking for train shows for my 6 year old son...he loves the show so much we have almost every show to date and will definitely buy this dvd. He has even begun to say "Hello, my name is Kieran and ever since I was little I have loved trains."I have to agree Matt is awesome...he is grown kid playing with real life trains....I learned so much about trains and the history about them that I can't wait til next season....Trains rule at our house! We are train hunters...no matter where trains are we will find them.
An avid fan of trans, and model railroading, I love this show. It's the favorite show of my 4 year old who watches an episode at least daily, and knows more about the operations of railroads than most adults because of this show.The camera work is well done, and captures the hard steel and movement of a train. Matt Bown is a great host who adds excitement and his love of trains with the audience, giving great descriptions of the technical aspects of railroading. You'll walk away from the show with a greater understanding of trains and a deeper love for them as well.The extras are nice, as there are some scenes from nearly every episode that never aired. I would liked to have seen some audio commentary though.
This 1964 book is a testament to the individual's ability to imagine and build one's own home. It is a book to be inspired by. I read the book while overseas and immediately became convinced that I could build my own home. After retirement, my wife and I did just that, with great success. Do not buy this book thinking that it will provide explicit directions. The engineering is old and often outdated. Read it rather as an evocative tribute to human ingenuity and ability. This should not be your last book on building design, but it might very well be your best first book.
I happen to love books written completely in letter format, so I enjoyed "Hands Across the Moon." It's the story of two friends who are separated during their junior year because one of them must move to Ecuador with her family. The book documents their year apart through the letters that they use to keep in touch with. I am not so sure everything that happens is COMPLETELY realistic, but it is realistic enough.The only thing I would say that I didn't like was not enough information was given about the characters' families. There isn't much detail--but that makes the letters real. At the end of the book, I found myself wondering what happened next.I think it's worth the read.
If you have an hour to two hours, and have any interest in Native American History from an Indian perspective, Tiana's story of Bighorse is a gem to find! Short, but sweet, this biography was told out of love, but also told because the the Indian's perspective of American History is often muted and/or erased. This book definitely keeps their spirit alive!
I've met the author - Tiana Bighorse Butler. Her pride shines through as she tells the stories of her father. Written in Navajo english, the reader is taken into the traditional navajo way of life. Wonderful stories give an honest perspective and a clear understanding of warriors in that point of time. Buy this book!! Compelling reading that you'll never forget!!
I'm practically an albino so I've had no luck with this type of product until now. The coloring is gradual and looks like a light base golden brown and has a nice scent. Good as it gets.
Barry Tarshis has given us a remarkably well done guidebook to that often complicated language we call "English". It is a priceless helping hand for everyone - students, writers, professionals, and just plain folks. Bravo Mr. Tarshis!
After reading "Seduce Me! How to Ignite Your Partner's Passion", I immediately made arrangements to purchase an initial order of 50 copies for our medical office. Through our patient-centered obstetrics and gynecology practice, we treat thousands of women annually and receive questions and concerns about sexual libido daily.I found this book to be very informative, presenting scientific biochemical data and psychological insights in a manner that any of our patients could easily comprehend.Beyond that, the recommendations offer clear and fun solutions, addressing both sexual and relationship issues. I would estimate that 1 in 4 women I see daily ask me about problems with sexual desire and fulfillment, and I am very pleased to be able to provide "Seduce Me!" to them as an excellent and enjoyable resource.
This book is truly a literary classic! Although written over 400 years ago, this allegory of the Christian life is still relevant today. It still speaks to incredible depths of the Christian experience, the struggles as well as the joys. You'll feel the emotion of "Christian" as he encouters a number of characters, all named for their particular life experience.I have read this book 4 times in the last 10 years, and plan to again this year. Everytime I pick it up my relationship with God is strengthened. I have also refered to it many times in conversation. What more could you ask for in a book!If you're not comfortable with the old english, then try a modern language version. Either way you won't be disappointed. I guarantee it!
I read The Pilgrim's Progress as a child and recently reread it in order to do a comparative essay on allegorical journeys for my english class. The other book I read for the assignment was Heart of Darkness, by Joseph Conrad, and I found that Bunyan's novel equaled or exceeded Conrad's in every way. While Conrad used far more symbolism and allusions, I felt that Bunyan still did a better job of making the reader identify with his character's journey. The Pilgrim's Progress is a wonderfully written story that inspires hope and confidence in God to help his people though their own journeys.
This is a super album. Not to diss the British but The UNTOUCHABLES outta L.A. mastered that soul/ska sound better than THE ENGLISGH BEAT. "I Confess" is the only song I can deal with by those guys.The UNTOUCHABLES are far more intelleGENT and talented with their sound selection. Favorites "I Spy For The F.B.I.", "Freak In The Streets", "What's Gone Wrong", "Free Yourself", "Piece Of Your Love", "Steppin' Stone (Live)", "Shine On" and My Kind Of Girl". This CD keeps you on the move.I cannot give them 100% props though, their style tends to get a little corny but it's ok, it's ok. I'm not dissing the THE ENGLISH BEAT at all, but with that beat they need some UNTOUCHABLE soul..like this!!!!
The Untouchables were knocking around SoCal back in the early 80's putting out their brand of Soulful Ska. This is great stuff in the English Beat Selecter mode with some Soul And Funk thrown in the mix. Songs like Wild Child, I Spy For The FBI and Free Yourself should move you, unless you're dead. A few songs sound dated (80's production)but for the most part very fresh. This CD contains ALL of the music recorded/released by Stiff UK ( The US Enigma EP The Lp on MCA and B-sides and single versions of lp tracks)So happy that this was reissued! What are you waiting for.. come on and FREE YOURSELF!
My opinion about this book is it joins a long list of similar books that pick out parts of the decisions that were made in 1945 about use of the atomic bomb and criticize U.S. leaders who made decisions under the press of time and circumstance and in dealing with a Japanese military, which totally ran the country. In such a situation, someone like the author of this book (and there are many others like him) can go back and question the decision to use the atomic bomb against Japan from the safe distance of more than 50 years. In my review of the handling of the atomic bomb in August, 1945, with very minor exceptions, the leaders of the United States made the correct decision based on all the facts.uwcharlie
I bought this book for school.. I have not read it yet but it arrived in perfect condition.. Very fast shipping.
The undisputed master of funk served this up in 1982, and it has stored well. Including the classic, often-sampled "Atomic Dog" and other summer-lovin' tracks, "Computer Games" paved the way for the high-tech funk/hip-hop fusion we have today. There's dance tracks, chill tracks, and evrything in between. Don't miss this classic.
I chose this version of "Emma" because it was free with Amazon Prime. "Emma" and "Mr. Knightly" especially are likeable characters. What comes across poignantly is the economic/social need of early nineteenth-century women to marry in order to survive and to avoid spinsterhood and governess positions. The eponynous Emma is convincingly severe throughout the series. I recommend this production as being a good rendering of the original novel, the outlook of the people at the time, and also an interesting taste of 1970's acting and styles.
This book contains a comprehensive assessment of the North American Free Trade Agreement. Authors from all three countries probe different aspects of the deal; they provide an overall assessment as well as detaailed examination of some of the critical issues and sectors that will be affected.In addition to assessments of NAFTA from Canada, Mexico, and the United States, the book examines specific issues, namely, the enviroment, agriculture, investment provisions, rules of origin, the trade in automotive goods, dispute settlement, energy, the textile and apparel sector, and the financial sector. -- from book's back cover
If you enjoy movies that make you uneasy yet you keep watching because of a voyeueristic mix of repulsion and fascination, then look no further--here's the one you've been looking for.Brando was considered a legend, and this movie is proof; "acting" is too small a word to describe the performance he gave here.Pain. Confusion. Lust. Grasping at redemption as it slithers through your fingers--it's all right here, folks.This movie is a carousel of torment. There's an anonymous person riding next to you, and both of you have to laugh at it all, just to keep from crying.
It's hard to believe that, in its prime, this was considered maybe the greatest picture ever made. It wasn't and it isn't. And yet, Barbieri's score and Storaro's cinematography are still a delight to both ear and eye (although you can see the camera's reflection on a window pane at the last scene!).Regarding sex, there's not much to be said. In fact, there was a lot said and little to be seen. Brando gives "the performance of a lifetime", which in his case, after seeing "Superman", is probably true. Maria Schneider is so, so; Jean Pierre Laúd is execrable and Mássimo Girotti all but steals the show as Brando's funny-you-should-ask rival. All in all, much ado about... butter!
you"re fired, your fired I I Og wer adgf faerb asdb[okn dswlelkb dlf twd. I oo peradts sdg sodmr. Bye.
I remember seeing this movie for the first time about a billion yrs ago and thinking, `So THIS is what being a superb actor is all about.' Brando, playing an expat in Paris who is in despair over his wife's very recent suicide, never once seems to be acting, never seems aware of camera or audience, never seems to consider how others will view him or his role or this movie. Unbelievable.The film was shocking when it was first made in 1973, especially for the graphic and (at that time) `unusual' sexual scenes - and it still makes viewers squirm a bit, but his odd and almost voiceless relationship with Maria Schneider is not self-serving on either end. It's dispassionate and anonymous sex, meant as a Band-Aid on a wound too painful to be dealt with in any other way.Super, super, super.
I wanted for a long time to see this movie and I wasn't dissapointed. Interesting subject, great cinema.
The movie is good, as I thought it would be, but the entire movie is in French, so be prepared to read subtitles. It took me several tries to watch it all the way through. My fault; I should have known.
Ohmijesus, arriviste in Paris lets go of one branch to grab onto what she thinks is an established man of importance. Brando who raped faerie queen Vivien Leigh in A Streetcar Named Desire has his bereaved, many-varied way with badly cloaked Toxic Ambition. This is why men break up over the telephone or via email or better yet just VANISH. This is a precursor to Fatal Attraction. I think this movie is supposed to be annoying, off-putting and unattractive. His dead wife is the daughter of a French Resistence member. Could this be important to the movie?
Marlon Brando was an extraordinay actor, and this is what you see in this movie, a great Mr. Brando performance.I had great expectations about this movie. But I'm a little disapointed. I think the picture will be erotic in a superlative degree, but no, is a good drama story with some erotic content. I like more other movies with more erotic content as The Lover, In the Realm of the Senses, David Lynch's Lost Highway, and, as well I like other movies with some erotic content tha can be considered bizarre as David Lynch's Blue Velvet, Heavenly Creatures, among others.
Marlon Brando was a mrevel. Very unorthodox acting style. The movie, however, contains lots of sexual scenes that must be kept away from children. Very unusual story.
Friend had me watch, "Last Tango in Paris." I couldn't find it in any video store so I immediately looked it up on Amazon.com and abracadra...it was found! Great price and was shipped quickly to my house. How convenient!!! Keep up the awesome work. I use Amazon for book club on a monthly basis and I am really pleased with everything. Wish I could get better shipping prices...For example, my last book was only a one penny, but the shipping was over 2 dollars. Wish you could ship more than one book, better price.Happy customer, Riley
I'm going to break the trend of a life time on Amazon now and comment on the actual item in question the blu ray disk of the movie "Last Tango in Paris" and not the movie itself. The good news is the film has a had a very subtle remastering for blu ray with the studio being sensitive to the source material while keeping the original palette of the movie without making it look to artificial in Hi Def. As long as you don't have your black levels set to high you won't be disappointed. Sound is a big improvement with a mono DTS remastering which does the job making the most important aspect the dialogue crystal clear. No extras but the trailer I'm afraid.
We all know about Shakespeare, so a review of his writing is not required. However, I would like to say that the Everyman's Library series are worth getting. Unlike omnibus editions (such as the Riverside Shakespeare), these are actually portable so you don't need a table to hold them up while you are reading. The Everyman's Library series have good hardbindings, are conveniently sized to carry around, and have illuminating and extensive introductions. The typeface used is old, but the letters are large and easily readable (something that is a concern with some other editions).Tragedies, Volume 1 contains: Hamlet; Othello; King Lear; Machbeth
This review is not about the product -- Everyman Tragedies Volume 2, which is wonderful -- but a warning to use care when purchasing. My first time through, I clicked into the "New" options from $0.73, and was directed to several well priced books. The only problem is, they are not the volume advertised on this page. Instead it's three plays in an unattractive volume from something called Ann Arbor Media. So be careful!
None of the other reviews here refer to what is actually being offered on this page: the 3-volume set of Shakespeare's plays (Histories, Tragedies, Comedies) published by The Heritage Press, commonly known as The Heritage Shakespeare.This set became an instant classic when it was published in 1958, and if you're interested in a beautifully printed, edited, and illustrated edition of the plays at a reasonable price, you cannot go wrong with the Heritage.
Marco Borsato wasn't one of my favourite singers here in Holland. But that changed when I heard several of the songs on this album. As soon as the CD got out, I run to the store and bought the album. There are several slow songs, but also some songs with ritme. Marco Borsato is on his best at this CD and I think it is even better than his new album Luid en Duidelijk. A "must have" Cd for every Borsato fan!
This is a fascinating and valuable look at the United States presented with a number of rarely seemed photographs. You will learn something here even if you think you know the whole story of our nation's 200+ years. The only caveats are a few photos which, while presenting some of the true (and unfortunate) incidents of our history, may be too graphic for children (and some adults!) Overall a fine volume worthy of any library.
Mark's book is an excellent, easy to understand read, which I found extremely helpful.Most books on TOC deal with a lot of theory, or case studies. This is the first book I've read that goes into incredible detail on how to implement TOC using the author's years of experience in this field.A must-read if you are plannig to implement TOC.
It's small for the money. I'm just used to a minimum of 6" when I pay this price. Also, the Revoltech Joint system is nice if I plan on reposing a figure often, but I don't. I do so once in a while and when joints get loose I apply a little clear mounting/holding wax in inconspicuous spots. Also, with regular-ball-jointed figs I don't have to "click" to the next lock-step position; with this I do. I just don't buy the marketing hype.That all said this is a great-looking fig. Does it fall under mecha? If so, Revoltech mechs always look uber hip. If only they'd be sized to fit in with other figs, like DCD, Matty DC or Hasbro Marvel figs.It's educational in learning about Giant Robo, a former pop culture phenom from Japan that was updated in the nineties. Wiki has some great articles on it.
This is more entertaining than anything should be allowed to be. Avoid operating heavy machinery while listening.And don't listen to it while asleep or you'll wake up on the floor wondering how you came to be so elevated.
I liked this. Better than the first one, I think, although I have to go re-read that one. I especially liked the way the characters are developing into more complex people. The scenes at sea are wonderful, but I have to say that I'm glad she didn't leave them in Scotland. Too much Scotland these days in love stories. Don't people realize it's wet and cold there most of the time? I'm looking forward to the next installment back on the ny frontier. Give me mosquitos over scotsmen anyday.I also have a theory about the reviews here that call this book boring (there are about five of them, I think). There are three reasons that come to mind to call this boring: somebody glued the pages together on you, you're brain dead, you've got something against the author. I suspect those reviews were all written by the same boring person. A vendetta? Sour grapes? Oxygen deprivation? Who knows.
I didn't enjoy this one as much as the first one, but I usually think the first book in a series is the best anyway. All in all this is an excellent series, recommend!
I felt the first book in the series started off a little weak and definitely grew in strength as the novel progressed. However, I enjoyed "Dawn on a Distant Shore" from start to finish and went on to purchase the other titles in the series right away. My only complaint is that this book did not have a Kindle edition.
The kind of book that makes you turn off the phone and ignore the kids. Those two reviewers here who said "boring"? I'm wondering if they read the same book. I suppose they need a nuclear explosion or the like to keep them happy. What I like is, interesting characters in challenging situations, and you've got that here in abundance.The first one was very good, but this one is even better. More tightly written. Miss Donati has come into her stride. Bring on Hidden Wolf!
Bought this to go camping with my kids who are young. I can set the tent up in 15 minutes without help; no hassles. And the first time I set it up, I shattered one of the fiberglass poles; it still worked, but called the company -- mailed it back and got a new on in 4 weeks; great customer service.
I just got this to replace a little 2 people tent as my daughter is old enough now to go camping whit us. Yes It is very roomy for the three of us but I can for sure use the extra space. We camp at a lagoon 35F at night to 55F at noon. No condensation, good wind protection and resistance. Very well constructed. You will need help to put on the canopy on windy situations. It's a very good option between a 3 seasons and a 2 seasons because of the protection and waterproof and the big windows and height.
We have owned this tent for seven months now and can attest that the manufacturer description and majority of other reviews are spot on (thus far)! While we have yet to put it through any rough weather tests, we have found the tent to possess a practical design, spacious interior, a height that makes it comfortable for standing, well made, and easy to put up and take down. The only suggestion I would have for Eureka is to include metal tent stakes instead of the cheap easily breakable plastic ones.
You certainly wouldn't want to take this backpacking, but for use at a campground, this tent would be hard to beat. I purchased it from a gold box offer shortly before Memorial Day, and just got back from a camping trip. Everyone was jealous of this HUGE tent. I am 6'5'' and could stand up comfortably in the center of this tent.It rained 2 of the 3 nights we were out there, and one night it POURED. Despite the usual loudness of the rain on the fly, this was a pleasant experience. No rain got into the tent, and thanks to the ceiling vents and well designed fly, we stayed cool and happy the entire night.Easy to set up, easy to take down. Easy to shake off after a rainfall to pack up immediately.1 adult and 4 kids was no problem, everyone had PLENTY of personal space. I imagine 4 adults fit in quite comfortably.Eureka hasn't let me down, and if you are in the market for a HUGE tent, this is the one to get.
The powerful and melodic music from Virginia City really stands out against today's soundtracks of rolling drums and string chords. Oddly, the volume on my disk is rather low. Enjoy some of the very best movie music here!
Not official NFL product but saved money and quality was good enough. This product will keep your head warm and show your Team pride.
Not only was it a great scare for our Halloween movie scareathon, it was a great bargain and in excellent condition. Thank you
WHEN THE MOVIE STARTED I WAS NOT SURE ABOUT WHAT EXACTLY WAS THE PLOT ABOUT, AND THAT REALLY WORKED GOOD FOR ME. AFTER A VERY SHOCKING SCENE OF AN ACCIDENT, SIX WOMEN DECIDED TO EXPLORE A CAVE AND THEY FIND WHAT TRUE HORROR IS. I WAS SHOCKED AND STUCK TO MY SIT FROM THE BEGINNING TILL THE END OF THE MOVIE. THIS MOVIE IS SO GOOD AND WELL DONE, DIRECTED AND EDITED. VISUAL EFFECTS ARE OUTSTANDING. I WON'T TELL ANYTHING ELSE TO AVOID TO SPOIL IT WHEN YOU WATCH IT. BUT TRUST ME, THIS MOVIES IS SO GOOD THAT NOW, I WILL FOLLOW CLOSER ALL WORKS BY DIRECTOR NEIL MARSHALL. SOMETHING YOU NEED TO KNOW IS THAT THE MOVIE HAS WON 3 IMPORTANT AWARDS,1- British Independent Film Award "Best Director: Neil Marshall"2- British Independent Film Award "Best Technical Achievement"3- Empire Award "Best Horror Movie"AND HAS 4 OTHER NOMINATIONS... THE MOVIE IS A TOTAL SUCCESS, THUMPS UP FOR NEIL MARSHALL
This is a great movie for the horror film buff. Not only does it provide the viewer with the guts, gore, and blood that we all love, but it also explores real fears, such as clostrophobia, lonliness, and betrayal. The movie does a good job of making the monsters seem somewhat human and the viewer almost feels a sense of sorrow for the creatures, who are unable to see, but have evolved a keen sense of hearing in their underground caveworld. The ending isn't a typical horror film ending, where the heroine makes it out alive. That, alone, makes the movie worth watching. I believe this one was definitely worth money.
I started enjoying the film, once the caving started..Deep down below the surface, everthing starts getting creepy, tightand your heart starts beating faster...as our adventurers are about tofind out that they are not alone.Above average creepiness with great direction puts this movie above othercave movies. Should'nt dissapoint.Extra features are great...when the film is good. You get to see the workand effort of all involved....and some of these predator actors are someof the best around. Enjoy.
Do not buy this film if you are afraid of small dark cramped spaces underground. This movie will scare the bee-jabbers out of you. Other than that -- it's a good thrill ride.
Yes, I know what you're thinking. "Another one of those pick em' off one-at-a-time horror flicks..." And it is. But it's also more then that. This movie actually made me scream and I'm getting freaked out just writing about it in this dark, dark room. A bloodbath that makes you squirm...all the while enjoying the effect the adrenalin rush has on you. I am not claustrophobic, but there are a few scenes that made me feel like I was trapped in a rocky cave with no means of escaping. "The Descent" broke one of the basic major rules of writing a horror story. I can't tell you which one, but don't expect a big twist after you travel through this never-ending cave, fighting for your life. I'd say rent it first and then see if you want to buy it....it's not for everyone.
Before this film no other film has even come close to scaring me. Those films mentioned above are like watching the Teletubbies in comparison to this film. I even consciously considered getting up and leaving the cinema through this film because I thought my mind just couldn't handle the tension any more. The action simply never stops once it starts. And, I won't spoil anything, but the first gory scene of the film: that kind of stuff shouldn't even be allowed! I never thought the line could be moved so far.
This is a great and powerful movie. It starts out slow but then it gets going. It is a great movie and everything about it is great. If you are into horror and monster like creatures then you will like this movie.
First no spoilers here but I will say theier is a build up in the movie,but when it hits the fan,it really hits the fan.I havnt had that feeling in my gut in a long time,not since the first Alien film,they felt similiar to me.This movie is not for the faint of heart although not as gorry as some previous movies when its used here it is very effective,this movie will make you feel unsettled,this is for sure the best creature film i've seen in years,bring your nerves.Sum it up I wont be in any caves for sure anytime in the near future,and yes go ahead and buy this no need to waste your money on a rent you will want this in your collection.Instant Classic
When watching this movie, I feel like I'm in that labyrinthine cave so far underground--just as I find myself on the mountain and in the crevasse when viewing Touching the Void. I found the troglodytes very believable as well. The character development was quite adequate. The acting was fine. I found nothing that detracted from the experience except the very last 10 seconds (which I won't give away). I find this movie to be an engrossing terrorific adventure.
I only have one word for this Movie ''Awesome'' , the movie have anything one horror movie need, you need see this movie. 5 star for this.
This movie freaked me out quite a bit, and I'm a bit unsure why. Yes, it's kinda gory, but I think the dark, clostrophobic nature is what got me. Definetly worth at least a rent.
Simply spine chilling!!! After a bit of drama in the beginning to set the relationship between these friends, the movie erupts into an action/thriller that had me biting my nails (something I haven't done for years). This movie is 'otherworldly' and may scare some would-be spelunkers away from dark, creepy caves forever, but it's worth the risk if you love horror. If you liked 'Dog Soldiers', you'll 'bite into' this one. Grab your popcorn and hang on because once the creatures take the stage your eyes are glued wide open. (o.k, so I viewed bloody scenes from between my fingers the first time). I watched it twice and still jumped at a few things I knew were coming. Very well-written. The cave/climbing shots and immense fear factor never go over the top, but they sure do raise your blood pressure a few notches. Excellent horror film! I believe this director is really on a roll.P.S. Be sure to check out the beautiful mountain scenery.Chrissy K. McVay - Author
A Bunch of Women who want to be Men well not all of them, go into a Cave(no pun intended) and meet some interesting Things on the way down(That's what she said), and so these "Things" Or Creatures apparently have it out for them, Short and Silly review but hey it is what is,I did like the Movie and I certainly Enjoyed it More than The Descent 2.
The best horror film to come out in 10 years, easy. If you are in any way claustraphobic this film will be hard to sit through. The cave is terrifying in itself, which is quite an acheivement considering the modest budget. As the women descend deeper into the cave I felt as if I was watching A Stanly Kubrick or a Ridly Scott film. The buidup to the real threat is fantastic, and theaters will be filled with screams when the movie hits the U.S next month. I think the American studio cut the real ending off so they can sell the 'unrated' DVD afterwards. They know they have a hit on their hands, so they will milk it for all it's worth. This version is a must have for any horror fan that doesn't want to wait a year for a proper US release.
Really a bit of a sleeper. Not a ton of press but a great ride none the less. The Blu-ray is a visual improvement over the DVD.
This is a great movie !I wasn't sure what to expect when I bought this, but I'm very glad I took a chance on it. It has beautiful scenery, good actors and it's really quite scary ! Iv'e been in a cave before and went much farther into it than expected for a guy who doesn't like confined spaces. This movie captures the feel and fear involved in exploring the underground. If I ever do go into another one, I will be watching for the freaky creatures that live within the caves of this movie. These guys(or gals)natually freak me out! The way they look, move, and sound are great. There is plenty of suspense and alot of scary scenes.I was a little "put-off" by the ending,which I guess is the prelude to "Decent II", which I haven't seen yet. Over all, it's worth renting, or buying. It's a classic !!
This is a great movie. However, as I commonly say, I can fully enjoy a movie without having to watch it in its entirety. The second half of this movie, i.e., when the monsters really come out, can get a little less than fully entertaining. That notwithstanding, the characters are interesting and engaging, and the concept is fun in an adventurish kind of way. Even better, one of the characters wears an Arcteryx jacket - by far the best adventure gear on the planet (forget Northface or Spyder - overpriced garbage)! HOWEVER, while the movie is great, the Blu-Ray transfer is not so. I owned the original (SD) version, then bought HD because I'm a Blu-Ray junkie, only to be highly disappointed. Lots of noise in the video transfer, far too much in fact for a movie only recently created. I don't advise someone buying to replace their SD version unless they're lost to the Blu-Ray OCD gods like I am.
A bunch of adventure seeking women decide to explore a cave as part of their yearly get together. They discover more than bats and stalactites on this exploration.I had no idea what this movie was about when I started watching it but I was pleasantly surprised. I was not familiar with any of the actresses but they definitely gave it their all in the cramped quarters of the cave. The movie reminded me of some of the best zombie movies but the tension is not left all up to the creatures. The setting plays a huge beautiful role. I highly recommend this film.
I really liked this movie. It had an all female cast but not the typical stereotype of being helpless and defenseless. The movie moves fast and has solid pieces of suspense throughout. The ending catches you off guard, not the usual ending. Good solid acting.
Although the title may say "unedited original cut" it is NOT. The end of this movie in the Americanized ending and not the ORIGINAL UK ending (which is MUCH MUCH MUCH better).Don't fall for the same trick I did at get the crappy American version. Go rent the DVD instead, and make sure you select the alternate ending for the ending!This movie would have been five stars instead of four if it wasn't for the American ending.
Hey amazon shoppers. Just to let you know you can pick up the descent from amazon.co.uk for about 3.99 as we have had it on DVD release for quite a while now over in Britain. So why buy a cinema ticket for that price when you can buy the DVD before it's even released in America for about another 4 months. Hope this helps. Adam
Since other reviewers have pretty much summed up all my thoughts on this movie, I'll leave it at this: Imagine last year's "The Cave" if it didn't suck balls.
Great Technical/Critical Commentary.A little heavy on Source Criticism and weak on the possibility of Mosaic Authorship.Does a great job of handling Hebrew and Literary structure.A must have for the Scholar/Pastor.
Good "keys" are hard to come by, especially for insects. This book was suggested by a well respected Entomologist, and is a good book. However, with the changes brought on by DNA, a new book needs to be done.
I remember as a kid being scared to death by the TV commercials for this one. Every time it came on my sister and I would freak out. I hadn't seen the film years but always remembered it as a real twisted thriller. Well, now it's available again and years later it still remains a great, creepy thriller. Hopkins is sooo young here but already shows what a tremendous actor he is. Ann-Margret was still a true beauty and Burgess Meredith is just great. Eeerie, creepy and well acted. This one is still a winner all these years later. Oh, one other thing, those TV commercials - there on here and there still scary.
ALL I can really say about the movie is that the puppet steals the show. It really didn't matter how weak the story was because the puppet's comments made the show.
With his recent film successes as an actor of note, it is likely that Sir Anthony would not want to be reminded of his work on this modest thriller. He shouldn't be worried, though, because he delivers an outstanding performance as the oft-repeated role of a ventriloquist whose alter ego takes over. His Jekyl/Hyde turn as both Corky and Fats the dummy shows that he, even then, was an actor on the rise.Ample support - no pun intended - is given by Ann-Margret as the love of Corky's youth, Ed Lauter as her husband, and the always dependable Burgess Meredith as the manager/agent who finds out too late how ill his star performer really is.With an ominous yet quiet score from Jerry Goldsmith, the film never descends into gore as is so common in current horror flicks. Although not one of the best of the genre, the flick is still a worthwhile viewing experience.Better than average and the rating reflects a 3 1/2 star rating rounded off to 4.
This is an Anthony Hopkins movie that should be seen by any Anthony Hopkins fan. He is young but what a job of acting. Ann Margret also stars in this movie. I had it on VHS tape and was so happy to find it on Amazon on DVD.I would recommend it.
I like this BluRay release of the Anthony Hopkins/Ann Margret film. The BluRay transfer was done very nicely and the extras were pretty good but could have been better.I really enjoyed the Dennis Alwood interview, Fats and Friends. I do wish there were new interviews with Anthony Hopkins and Ann Margret though. There is an old, archival Anthony Hopkins interview which leaves much to be desired. Though it's better than nothing.
Magic is a timeless suspense film starring Anthony Hopkinks, Ann Margret, and the always entertaining Burgess Meredith(better known as Mic from Rocky.) The story follows an up and coming ventriloquist "Corky" and his dummy "fats" on their near rise to stardom. This is a very entertaining yet creepy film where the dummy is in control of the ventriloquist(very similar to a Twilight Zone episode.) Just watching as Corky can't go more then five minutes without speaking as fats is sheer genius. Great acting plus a very clever story make for a timeless movie, as is the case in "Magic". I definately recommend this classic if you need a change from the typical cookie cutter horror/suspense films out there now.
i got this for my dad. it is super creepy and worth a watch, but don't watch it in the dark.
This movie really scared me when it came out in theaters years ago. It is still pretty exciting and leaves you wondering if the guy is really crazy or his dummy is alive!
I bought this to replace my original HP 4L Laser jet after 15 years. This seems to do a great job so far, much faster downloads and clean print,BUT BEWARE.... IT DOES NOT COME WITH A USB CORD TO CONNECT, so if the printer your replacing has the old stle connecter (as mine did) be ready to spend another $35.00 for a usb cord. That is why I gave it 4 instead of 5 stars.
This little printer prints fast and clearly. I always thought a laser printer would be out of reach for me, cost-wise, but Amazon's price was quite reasonable (in fact it's still the lowest I've seen, a month later). Most of the things I print are in b&w anyway and I love not having to wait while my inkjet printer grinds out a page. I recommend this printer wholeheartedly.
UPDATE:July 22, 2007: The old review stated that I have not changed my ink cartrdige, which was in August of 2005. I still have yet to change it. It has been almost 2 years. Since I am in school, I print hundreds to thousands of text. I am surprised that there is still no fade to the text. My printer has still not jammed and is still printing at quick speeds. I am fully satisfied with this printer and am glad I did not invest in any other printer. I recommend this printer to anyone that wants a cost efficient and very reliable, black and white printer.This HP Printer has lasted me throughout my freshman and sophomore year of college. I have not yet needed to change my ink cartridge: I've printed most likely 1000 pages of text. I've never had a hardware or software issues. When I recieved the product, there was no usb cable, as most printers do not include them (quite lame). I recommend this product to any person who does not need color. Great product and great price!
This is a nice, compact laser printer. If you need something for routine B&W printing, this printer will do the job. I acquired it second hand from a friend, and it has worked really well. I bought an after-market toner from Amazon for $20.00 and it has already gone at least 500 pages. The quality is good for documents and emails, which is primarily what I use it for. It is not super quiet and it is not super fast, but I use it at home to print between 25 and 100 pages per week and it works very well!
Would not sell for 300 even though bought for 80 because this printer is amazing! I have used for maybe 3 years and only replaced the ink cartridge once and print all the time. Quality Prints, Quiet and Nearly Instant prints. What else could you want?IFind one of these. You won't be disappointed.
nice printer, good DPI. doesn't have the bells and whistles of a more procy printer like color or automatic printing on both sides. It meets everything it claims though.
Well made and nice text output. The only criticism I have of this printer is the paper tray. While these have a very small footprint, to load paper, you need to open the tray which sticks out and takes up more space the tray stays open as long as you need to print. Also the paper is exposed, so its subject to curling, fading, etc. Not big issues, but my personal preference is a drawer style. Overall a great printer. Got a great deal on it at Amazon.
This seems to be a pretty good printer so far. I have only had it a couple of weeks. The only complaint so far, is that it prints very slowly. But, what do you want for the price? All in all, I think it was a pretty good value for the money.
I couldn't be happier with this printer. I'm a writer and a writer who doesn't particularly like reading off a computer screen. I can't see the flow, and make easy notes, or get an overall vibe of the thing while reading off a screen.Plus, I'm also starting a PhD program in the next month and so printing is a necessity.I don't need the absolute fastest, and I don't need the absolute best quality. What I need is a solid, laser printer that fits into my decidedly narrow budget.This fit perfectly and it works perfectly as well.I'm very pleased.
We got this printer last year and have really liked it because it works pretty fast and we wanted something to print just text so we wouldn't have to keep replacing inkjet carts. We also got aNETGEAR PS121 USB 2.0 Mini Print Serverand it has all worked on our home network pretty well together, including with a PC that runs Win 98se (which had, much to my suprise, a usb port which was mandatory to set up the print server).
This is a great computer and at such a reasonable price. I haven't had any problems with it whatsoever. It's fast, doesn't jam and I print several pages everyday...unlike the ink-jets, I don't have to replace cartridges frequently.It arrived in a timely manner. I will shop here again.
These laserjets are well designed, work well and are easy to use. (We use 5 of the similar 1012 model and they are good workhorses.The 1020's installation disk is great -- with good pictures, easy instructions that any normal person could follow. Much better than the manuals written in engineering language. HP should be complimented.
Aside from being compact & 15ppm fast, the Hp 1020 printer does a great job of printing checks and deposit slips when used with any checkmaking software and a MICR toner cartridge from checksnet.Tried a few toner cartridges from several sources for my Hp 1020 and discovered that some MICR toner is not as dark, flakes off paper and my checks were unreadable when tested at bank. Went back to checksnet cartridges, everything fine again and better page yield.
I'll keep it simple...I get a lot of 'smooth use' out of this lit'l thing at my small business. Great, no me arrepiento (no regrets)! I wish I could find a laserjet 'all in one' in this 'price effectiveness' range as well.
My first laser printer cost over $1,000, was frustratingly slow, and had good but not great print quality. Fifteen years and about as many printers later, I now have this little 1020 for less than one-fifth the price. I set it up in exactly two minutes. It runs dead quiet (nice in an office environment of so many fans and hums). It has great first page response - and when I'm done typing the letter, I slap the envelope in the manual tray, print it, and I'm done. The print quality is as good as it gets. It is not the fastest printer in the world, but it is more than competitive in this price bracket. And small? Smallest footprint of any laser I've owned, which is also important to me. I can't say enough about this printer - finally, someone got a small printer exactly right for small business.
The HP LaserJet 1020 did not dissapoint me. It is a good laser printer. I bought it for office tasks and it does a very good job. I only wish the package came with a USB cable it needs. It took some time for me to locate one.
This printer has been working flawlessly. This is the second one I have purchased. We decided to put one on each of our computers. No problems whatsover. If you want B&W laser prints without any problems, this printer is perfect and well priced.
I purchased this printer to replace a DeskJet in a dedicated application. The DeskJet was just too slow. I needed a small, low-power printer. This one fit the bill. Startup time is very quick. Printing speed is good and print quality (text only) is excellent.
Really nice printer, it's black and white ink, but does the job better than my higher quality printer,
I don't normally go out of my way to write reviews, but I do appreciate reading them before I buy....so here's one for those considering buying this for their "second office" application. I've had this printer for 3 months now, and it's great for my home office (where I work when I'm not in my office office). Footprint is tiny, no problems with paper feed (like prior top-feed printers I've had), print quality good and crisp, and printouts appear instantly. Good work HP.
I bought this printer to replace my HP Laserjet III, which was approximately 18 years old and only needed service once. The printer was delivered a few days earlier than I expected it. Even though the USB cable didn't come with it, I looked around at home and found that I had a spare one. I preloaded the software supplied with the printer and it was fully functional in under 15 minutes.I'm more than pleased with my selection. I hope this one lasts as long as the HP III did.
This was one of the best movies I've ever seen. It made Padre Pio very real, his life, dedication and suffering. It was a lengthy film but worth ever minute. I highly recommend it to any one at all intersted in the mystical side of our saints and the Church.
How one man's faith kept him through all of life's challenges. Very well played out and very well done!
Movie arrived on time and in great condition. This was a birthday gift for my grandaughter and she was really happy. I watched it and I just loved it, a great movie.
This is the kind of movie I like watching more than once. I have a deep admiration for this man who was able to follow Christ ways in such a heroic way, the movie does a great job also showing the issues within the church which true saints are able to endure and still love it.Very accurate in biographical data, I have to warn you that the dubbing in English (it lacks the proper feeling which can lead you to think that the acting was poor) is poor, the spanish one si really good.The music is beatiful.It's a work of art, highly reccomended, specially if you don't understand what a saint is and what are the merits that make one.The acting is really good, specially considering Father Pio had a complicated italian personallity :-)
This video was FANTASTIC. It was over 3 1/2 hrs and I was rivited. It is a great story and pretty close to article I have read about Padre Pio. Would recommend this highly.
This is one of the best films I have ever seen. Nothing else needs to be said, whoever watches it will understand.
This is a pretty good early 70's album, although I give the nod to Barry's second solo album, "Victory Of Bad Taste", which is unfortunately very rare, as is George Kooyman's second solo album. My favorite track would definetely have to be "Oh Lordy I'm Gonna Try", least favorite would be "Roll Another Rock". If you liked "Golden Earring" (Wall Of Dolls), you'll probably like this.
A good introduction to Plone. But, there are a few typographical errors in code samples that will send you on minor troubleshooting trips. The author also covers some add-ins that cause errors when you try to remove them, again, causing you to do some troubleshooting. Not all bad. A little troubleshooting helps you learn the system.
This novel was a very quick read. The characters were well developed and so was the story line. I loved the way it ended it gave the story a close. I recommend this novel to anyone.
This book is a page turner. It will have you guessing about the ending. I wonder who did Ms. Spencer get the male outlook from, but whoever it is is real. The ending is a shocker, but so is the middle and the beginning. It will keep you laughing.
I enjoyed the book, however, at times, I thought it was slow and very predictable. Sometimes it felt as if the author was dragging the storyline out to add length to the book. On the other hand, it was an easy enjoyable read.
WHEN ALL HELL BREAKS LOOSE is a fantastic book to read on a slow Saturday afternoon. I enjoyed it because I could never have anticipated the twist and turns the story takes. I think Ms. Spencer is on her way to becoming a very popular writer.
An excellent book of "Cat and Mouse" (so to speak). I thought this was an excellent book. It was easy reading, interest....A real page turner with a twist.
This book was great, but any person with a bit of perception could see where it was going. Don't get me wrong, that didn't take from it. Sister got skills. I'm talking about the author, here. Mad props are sent to Camika for such a suspense filled book.
This was a very exciting book. I finished it in 2 days. I cant wait for the next book.
Camika was always serious at ETSU, so to see her actually write a book with humor almost sent me to my grave. I enjoyed the book and it's good to finally see the author relax and live a little. I never thought she'd be an author either. All she ever did that made her smile was play Spades. The book was all that and I'm really just glad to know that I know someone who is taking the bull by the horns and following her dream. Hey Camika, remember that water gun fight with the Omegas and the time we kidnapped the guy we thought was on line for Alpha? Those were the days. I'm a supporter for life! Oo-oop!
For a first effort, I found this book to be well-detailed in creating imagery and character development. Although Shreese's situation with Reverend and Adrian's scandal were easy to predict, Ms. Spencer does a good job with this one...I felt like I was in a jazz club when reading the scenes between Greg's parents. There was some good research put into making that jazz come to life. And for those who felt that Afro-Americans were being insulted and stereotyped, lighten up...It's only fiction! You know, creations from the imagination...
Well my bookclub enjoyed every page of this book she was a new author for us and we got our money worth. Boy Adrian was something else but we knew something wasn't right about her and to do a man like that you are what you are and she didn't have to bring Greg into her life like that, but his mother was a for real women and I'm glad the sister got her head on straight. You will enjoy this book I passed it on and everyone say the same thing I couldn't stop reading.
I dont care what was wrong with this book. If I couldn't put it down then that says a lot! I read the other reviews where people were disappointed and all that, but it takes work and commitment to even write a paragraph let alone a book. Camika, don't let those other comments hinder you because I've yet to read their work. YOur book did have flaws but who's book doesn't? All I can say is the book grabbed my attention and I had to finish it no matter what. That's the definition of a good book. I don't like sappy endings either and yours allowed me to come up with my own conclusions. I'm sure Random House is helping you with everything else. I'm forever in your corner because you've done what most of us only dream about.
This book was an emotional rollercoaster for me. I bought it and read it in 3 days. By the time I finished I was breathing hard and mad at Adrian. She knew better. Maybe she didn't. I need a sequel!
This is a wonderful first effort from Camika Spencer. Drama, however, is a perfect word to describe it. I thought the ideas were set on a great stage of characters, personalities and situations. We were able to follow our main character (Greg) throughout some very difficult and stressful times in his life. I absolutely love the interaction between Greg, his friends, his family, and his coworkers. The character development was absolutely great. There weren't too many that we were confused of who was who or what aura they possessed. I was quite pleased with the book. It was a fairly easy read and there was just enough suspense to keep you looking for the plot and the outcome. Personally, I was pleased to be able to follow Greg as he matured in this situation. I would much rather find my characters changed and mature at the end of a novel, than falling into the same scenarios. Ms. Spencer has done an excellent job with her premier novel. I look forward to more of her work.
"Lilies of the Field" is a great movie. Even though it's in black and white, this movie puts the viewer right in the action. If you've attended Catholic school, you can really identify with the toughness of the German nuns. All characters are believable, and the acting is first rate. I heartily recommend this movie to anyone.
This is one of those movies every movie buff should see at least once. This is a feel good movie to watch when you feel life is being too tough on you. I always liked this movie, but it is surprisingly realistic since I met Helga, a 79yo Berliner visiting the States. Mother Superior is NO caricature, they really do come that way.
Would buy again from this seller. Item arrived quickly, and in condition described.Thanks so much!
A great movie. I don't understand why they don't show it more often. Sidney Poitier's character in this movie harkens back to his performance in "To Sir with Love." Also gives a nostalgic look at the American West. If you don't buy this excellent movie, make sure to rent it sometime. You'll enjoy it!
This is a classic, great movie. It's one that is watchable on a repeat basis. Low key but very meaningful. The movie is in black and white but that actually seems to add to it in the same way that the H. Bogart movies 'Casablanca' and 'Sahara' effectively use that medium.The price is right. It's a keeper. Buy it and sit back and enjoy a great performance.
Good movie with comedy thats subtle and not forced or over the top like modern movies. I know most people will not focus on the humor of this movie but it's what I like about it.
I bought that Ghost face Album a month ago and in all actuallity that is one of the best album I've got in a while. From the intro it was tight, I'm a fan of the wu no matter what people say about them. I respect those who don't bend to trends, be leaders not followers. Toney does his thing on this one with lines like" I keep Big Shurly on my side so what's happen. Get the he'll out of here what other dude would say some ish like that. The album touch mad topic from love to runnin' from them folks. In closing all I got to say is to all those that hold the wu down keep doing it, true Mcin' is over here.
First of all I really would like to give this a 4.5, but of course that's not possible. Ghostface hits us with another dope album, probobly his most solo album yet. There are no Wu-Tang guest appearances, but Rza produces a couple tracks. This album is really soulful, the background vocals and the beats just have that old school feel, which I like. My favorite tracks are Biscuits feat. Trife, Beat The Clock, Metal Lungies feat. Sheek & Styles, It's Over, Holla, Ghostface, Run feat. Jadakiss, and Love feat. Musiq & K. Fox. The other tracks are good, there's no wack stuff on this album. The most important thing about this CD is that it's real Hip-Hop music which I feel is coming back in a big way. If you're a fan of Ghostface or Wu-Tang you should definitley cop this. Don't be fooled by the single Tush with Missy, this isn't a party album, it's a Hip-Hop album.
Let me just say that this is the best cd i have heard in a while. I still love the Wu but here lately it seems that their albums have not been up to par with what i expect from them. But as always Ghost pulls through and makes another great album. I love the b-sides and the best song has to be holla (I think ghost should release it as a single b/c it has a whole new style that many haven't heard before trust me it could be huge).
This album is great! One thing I dont like is that RZA only produced 2 tracks.1:Intro 3/52:Biscuits 5/53:Kunta Fly S**t 4/54:Beat the clock 4/55:Metal Lungies 4/56:Bathtub (Skit) 2/57:Save Me Dear 5/58:Its over 3/59:Keisha's House (skit) 4/510:Tush 5/511:Last Night (skit) 5/512:Holla 5/513:Ghostface 5/514:Be This Way 3/515:The Letter (skit) 2/516:Tooken Back 3/517:Run 5/518:Love 4/5This album is really good. The skits might throw you off a bit. Go out and get it!
ghostface came with his 4th album different because to him the every rapper in the rap game was doing the same thing this album isnt as good as his first 3 albums but it was something new and thats a good thing.
If u are lookin for a good album with some soul into it this is the album to go get. I just bought this album and i only found a few songs that didnt suit me. But I think the following tracks are his best...2. Biscuits 5/54. Beat The Clock 4/55. Metal Lungies 5/513. Ghostface 3/514. Be This Way 4/515. Tooken Back 4/517. Run 5/5
Everytime Ghost releases an album I fall in love with hip-hop all over again. All of his albums top my list of favorite Hip-Hop/Rap albums of all time. It really makes me sad when I see a top ten list and he isn't on it. He is truly underated. This is the only full album that I have brought all year, that is because Ghost's songs flow like one choesive journy through his mind rather then a collection of wannabe club bangas, and as always his beats are beautiful.
Ghostface's new album isn't as good as Supreme Clientele, but it definitely is a hot CD...the last track with musiq called 'love' is nice, and obviously ghost and jada's "RUN!" is sick...there's only 1 song i truly hate on the CD and its the one with a beat with a telephone ringing, it just gets on my nerves...otherwise in my opinion its a pretty hot CD, but not as good as some of Ghost's other albums..
Wow, having just listened to this album in full, I have to say that I wasn't dissappointed at all. The production is fire, Ghostface's lyrics are fire (as always), and the cameo's on this album just add to its greatness.Stand Out Tracks:02. Beat the Clock05. Metal Lungies08. It's Over12. HollaThe only track that I didn't like was #13 Ghostface. It didn't fit this album at all.This album minus the tracks Ghostface and Push = 5 stars.
I must admit, the wu tang member and solo rapper, Ghostface is one of the most talented rappers in the world, this album is getting Killah to the top of the game with amazing lyrics, hot beats and excellent collaberations. Rumors on his next album, said to be produced by Public Enemy leader, Chuck D, will be featuring major collaberations with Outkast, Ludacris, Janet Jackson, WC and a final reunion with Wu Tang. Other than that, this album has memroble tracks like 'Run', 'Holla' and 'Tush'. 'Pretty Toney Album' is ok for the established rap star, but there's more to come.
Ghostface a.k.a Tony Starks a.k.a Pretty Tony a.k.a Ironman is back. Although he is with Def Jam now his style has not changed. He is still the real MC we all have come to know and luv. This is real hiphop right here, not your everyday average, Ice and bling type rap CD. All the beats are bangers (a 70's type feel) and the lyrics are straight fire from start to finish. This needs to be in heavy rotation this summer, since alot of people slept on BULLET PROOF WALLETS (another Ghostface album).Wake up cause real hiphop can not be denied.Put away your Nelly, Chingy, and CashMoney CD for a second and listen to this joint.Instant classic right along with Supreme Clientele (another hot Ghostface album)Since the face been revealed game got real for real
From the first track, I was hooked. I knew I was getting that classic Wu-Tang. Ghostface has been the number one Wu member for a long time and that doesn't change with this cd (even though Masta Killa is making a hell of a come up). I got this cd last week and haven't stopped listening to it. Ghostface spits that hellfire and brimstone raps like it's nothing and his production, even though it's not tight on some tracks, it's still solid and good enough to spend you $11, $12. With the help of a few more Wu members, he makes us realize why we were wu-tang fans to begin and why 1993 was the happiest year of our lives. Get this and Masta Killa's new joint too to add to the Wu collection. But by all means, avoid Meth's new joint and avoid his tv show, as it looks like one of the stupidest things I've ever seen.
I'm been rocking this one heavy rotation since it dropped.La, La, La, Holla- if you hear me!!!!Holla is one of my favorites, so are Beat the Clock, Biscuits,It's Over, & Be This Way. I really like it all except Missy's verse on Tush (just hit skip after Ghosts 2 verses).
Whoever this cat is from indonesia needs to shut his mouth, or chop his fingers off. This album is if not good is great. You can be mad for the new meth album but dont start dissin wu tang. This kid obviously knows nothin about hip hop and the english language. Wu tang still rules forever.
This album is the defifnition of a classic. All the elements are there. Tight beats, tight lyrics this is an excellent product. Ghost has elevated the game. Others rappers need to take notes. Get this joint!
Another hot one from the most consistent man in the Wu. Damn that! One of the most consistent in hip-hop period. Hasn't disappointed yet. And this is hip-hop you can feel. Not this old manufractured crap you see all over MTV every five minutes. Ya'll aint ready for Ghost. Keep it up man and tell the rest of the Wu to step it up. I still got love for them.Wu-Tang Forever babythetza
I would have to agree with the other review in that this nearly 45 minute performance is flawless for the genre. No audience noises or any indication that it's live... which ranks it up there with any studio output from Main. Beautiful sounds that do more than drone, they lift you. The recording has many layers of guitar sounds that are typical of Main's output of treated guitar for gentle outer space travel. Excellent recording quality too. If you're thinking about getting this one, don't wait as they are out of print and supply is very low!
Nevertheless my Son don't speak English (yet), he loves to watch his Thomas & Friends DVDs, of course he has his favorites, like Thomas on site with friends (the one he watch the most) and Thomas and his trusties Friends; this collection fulfill our expectations and gives our Son hours of fun... but we let him watch 30 to 45 minutes a day, the rest of the afternoon he play away of the TV screen, and guess with what... yup, his Thomas and friends Take along toys within others.
I found this book to be very entertaining. We are so used to our creature comforts that we really don't realize how much work daily life was in the 1800s.
thanks for compiling these recipes. They were fun to read, and although I am certain that I am not going to make any of them, it was fun reading them.
This was a quick and enjoyable read for me on the Kindle. I loved reading about keeping house in the 19th century. It's amazing how far we've come, and yet what was relevant and useful then is still so today. I did pick up some tips, but mainly I just came away with a deeper respect for my great-grandmothers and all the women before them. Now, if you'll excuse me, I'm going to go hug my fridge, washing machine, and microwave now!
I love the way this was written. I could just picture a no nonsense pioneer housewife. Not everything would pertain to the modern day but still very good.
This book was in excellent condition. I love it. It is a little bit of history with good ideas for today.
I purchased this book for the Amazon Kindle app on my phone and it's suitable for intermittent short-term reading.This book is written in a very interesting voice: plainspoken but engaging. From the standpoint of a wife and mother who works full-time outside the home, it seems women have always been busybusybusy and the only things that've changed are (some of) the things we're busy at and how we have to get them done.I find myself having to investigate certain words or phrases that've gone out of date, but that's easy with this app's features.
It is not a book, as such, just several wonderful hints that are great to see in this day and time.
It just needs to be said that the movie is what you could expect of having a master, Hopper, playing a character by another, Highsmith, while directed by yet another, Wenders. If you already read Ripley's game, see the movie to find an amazing picture of that odd world depicted by Patricia Highsmith.
I really enjoy the trigun series, and i am thinking of buying the soundtrack. I am curious though, i really want the tune that shows up in nearly every episode. The calm tune that sounds like a flute. I don't know its title or anything, but if you know what I am talking about, could you give me some info on it. thanks. [...]
I agree with Michael Van about the clipped version " Deadly China Hero" as I own "Last Hero in China" which is the movie in its orginal presentation and with Subtitles. This is actually, if placed in order of sequences by year, the Fourth "Once Upon a Time in China" series before OUATIC IV/V came out. Nonetheless, you have to watch this movie as it has, as usual, great martial art scenes. I own all but OUATIC IV and most of Jet Li's DVD's that are available. The 6th version of OUATIC is "Once upon a Time in China and America" also starring Jet Li. Though this may be the 4th Jet Li did as Wong Fei-Hung, you do not have to see the three previous OUATIC's. Order is not important with this version of Wong Fei-Hung but the tales of this Martial Artist (a real actual Chinese Hero) is. Get this DVD and try to get "Last Hero in China" also. In fact, get every Jet Li movie made. You will not be dissappointed. This man is our replacement for Bruce Lee.
This was such an awesome movie.Remove everything you ever knew about the Once upon a time in china series from your head, except for Jet Li playing the serious Wong fei-hung. Then make this movie one of the craziest and funniest movies ever and stick Wong fei-hung in the middle of it. What you have is a very enjoyable movie. And as much as I did like it, the music was the best part for me. For those of you that know the OUATIC series, you know Tsui Hark was the first ones to put lyrics in a movie to the Wong fei-hung theme song. Well then Jing Wong was the second. Great Soundtrack.All you people trying to stick through it all the way, please wait until the end fight.
Anyone who is a Jet Li fan will indeed appreciate the kung-fu sequences in this movie... especially the last one where Li makes his own deadly amalgamation of the Drunken Fist and Shaolin five Fist styles... the result is a superb ending fight! The story is long and irrelevant at parts, but comprehensible. Here's some insight... anything Yuen Woo Ping (renowned director and martial arts choreographer) touches is a classic... Wu Tang Master, Fist Of Legend, Drunken Master... need I say more! Also, the chicken/centipede dance was ridiculous yet amusing.... Purchase!
It is a good movie, but if you already have Last Hero in China, you already have this movie, why they have the same movie with two different names, I don't know.
This is the same movie as Deadly Chinese hero, only they changed the name. If you have Deadly chinese hero, you already have this movie.
Jet Li is amazing in this action filled flick. Outstanding fight sequences, along with a cameo from martial arts film legend Gordon Liu as a bad guy. Some very Original fights, Including a must see battle between the centipede fighters and Jet li, using his newly masterd Rooster style kung fu. Great action, good story, and ofcourse Jet Li make for a spectacular mix.
Loved the song "Teach me to wait", sung as duet with a beat that makes you want to start singing along. The other songs are also very enjoyable with a classic gospel style that was refreshing but not "old timey" enough to feel dated. I especially enjoyed his versions of "Praise the Lord" and "This Day". I bought this album to get the song "Teach me to Wait " which I had heard on a Christian radio called Songtime but I was also very satisfied with the album as a whole.
Pulled from live recordings off of Gong's 2001 tour of the UK, Germany, Norway, Denmark, Itlay and France. Viva la Gong! Nicely assembled and edited by none other than the Gongship space whisper mistress, Gilli Smyth and I must say she did a fine job. Better than the 'Live 2 Infinity' disc. Tracks I thought made this CD a true keeper were "Wise Man", "Doudouk Bloomdido", the mystical "Do You Believe In Magick?", "Can't Kill Me Sax", the classic Gong piece "Invisible Temple" and the awesome closer "Selene". Much of the old gang is here, like Daevid Allen, Mike Howlett, Gilli Smyth {of course}, Didier Malherbe on doudouk, Graham Clark - violin, Theo Travis - flute & sax and Chris Taylor on drums. Most of the line-up when I saw them a year earlier. Took me a while to land down a copy at an affordable price. A worthy cosmic rock release, as well as a definite should-have.
I hate to admitt it, but I was kind of disappointed with this CD. I liked 'Over The Edge' a lot and 'Drown Soda'. I also liked this CD's version of 'Doll Parts'. On the other hand, I wasn't really entertained with the rest.
I really liked this CD, it is courtney and hole at their best early in their career.
If you weren't around in the 70s, or you want to "relive" this era, Ben Fong-Torres' book is a good place to start. It's a collection of many of his Rolling Stone feature articles, along with a brief update of the personalities involved. Having "come of age" in the 70s, it brought back memories of my own and it gave me insights into some of the most famous rock personalities of the 70s and early 1980s.Fong-Torres has an excellent writing style and "captures" a little bit about what made a lot of these musicians "tick." His articles are enjoyable to read or re-read if you've seen them before. While part of the title (A BackStage Pass to 20 Years of Rock n Roll) may seem cliched, it fits here. Fong-Torres in his Rolling Stone articles managed to catch a glimpse of an era now long gone.
While some may question the sound quality on this release, the performance is amazing. As a huge fan of the Lemmy era of Hawkwind, I was overjoyed to find this concert had been released from a superior source tape, as this era is sorely underrepresented in terms of quality live releases. The band apparently performed a few pieces at this show that were never done before or after.Having listened to numerous bootleg recordings in the past, I am not too appalled by the sound found on this particular recording. It certainly is far better than what was found on the dreadful "Bring me the Head of Yuri Gagarin" release as well as some other semi-official Hawkwind releases.In summary, if you are a fan of pre-1976 Hawkwind and are not an absolutist audiophile, this concert is essential listening along with Space Ritual, Greasy Truckers Party, The 1999 Party, and the BBC show from 1972.
I bought this wheeled laptop bag to use at work (in Sales). I end up taking it to Italy to visit family & friends for 3 weeks.Everything I needed (including the computer) was at my reach at all times.Sturdy, it survive check in & out of planes, security, car traveling all over Italy as well as traveling with 3 small kids (with all it involves).This is a must for an organized traveler.
I really like this song and I haven't had a chance to buy it yet but I plan on buying this with the other song "It's So Fine" by Sean Paul. I got the "It's So Fine" album and I have been trying to collect all of his past albums so I can listen to them when I'm driving in my car. Great listen.
I purchased this card because the unique capabilities of our network required it. So I can't speak for it's features...But I only paid $25.00 for it. If you shop for this item on on-line auctions, you can get a very good deal.
A wonderful book for tiny hands and eyes, moveable parts and simple words, bright, clear illustrations, a must for car and engine obsessed little ones.
I would be lost without my coffee mug warmer. I hate to get hot coffee and in 10 minutes it is cold. This warmer does the trick and keeps the mug hot.
I bought this item and have been really happy with it! Having my coffee become lukewarm was a real pet peeve, but no more! Every sip is now just the perfect temperature... not hot enough to burn my tongue, but definitely hot, not warm. A caution... if you forget to put your cup on the warmer and your drink does cool down, the warmer is not hot enough to heat it up.Mr. Coffee MWBLK Mug Warmer
Love it.... Now I can enjoy my entire cup of tea or coffee and take my time... Hot to the last drop!
so far this is the best. Please don't expect this heater can heat up your coffee, this is only keep your coffee warm and stay the temperature around 60 to 70 degree.
...meaning not too hot not too cold- mfg. knows what they're doing in the design... not the self-appointed "critic geniuses" spouting off left and right here.. Yes, put a coaster or lid atop your mug to retain even more heat if you need it warmer (will also lessen evaporation)...just common sense...lol! The diameter of the heated surface is apporoximately 3 and 7/16ths of an inch so it will accomodate a mug that's medium large in size(a little bigger than average).
This warmer does a good job of keeping your beverage hot. But your mug does make a difference. All mugs you buy have the raised ring on the bottom so the entire bottom does not touch the warming plate. You need to look around for a ceramic mug like the ones that are made by hand with a completely flat bottom. You can find them on line. Also the bigger mugs don't work well either. I use an 16 oz. Mug. It's bulb shaped. Wide at the bottom then narrows at the top. I have several that I bought at local craft fairs. It keeps my coffee at a drinkable temp. for hours. Covering the top helps too but I don't need to do that.
Just what I needed since I drink my coffee really slow and with this cup warmer it keeps my coffee warm to the last drop.
Sometimes it takes me forever to get to my coffee, and by then it's cold. Cold coffee sucks! So I microwave it 3-4 times a morning and it progressively tastes worse and worse. Well I tell you: it's all the microwave's fault! I just finished the last sip of a coffee that I poured over 6 hours ago, and it was just as warm and delicious as it was 5 hours and 50 minutes ago (see, I really am slow)! Now that I have my Mr Coffee warmer I am a happy, more efficient worker. I need to get another one for my home! I LOVE, LOVE, LOVE this product!
I am satisfied with this product, BUT some of my coffee mugs are too big to sit properly on the warmer. I have to remember to use a smaller cup in order for it to work properly. I had a warmer I used for several years, but alas it died. It did a wonderful job, can't remember the brand, and it was large enough to accommodate my larger mugs.
Glad to have found this nifty little device. Works as advertised. Keeps your beverage hot without over-cooking it. I think this would work well with a big mug of soup as well. Can't tell you how many half-consumed mugs of coffee have been saved by this. It's great to pick up my mug an hour after I poured the coffee into it and take a hot swig.
This product looks nice and is easy to operate but it doesn't keep coffee hot enough. I'm not one of those people who likes their coffee scalding hot either. It definitely does the trick but that's my only beef with it. It might work better with a closed-top mug.
This warmer will do exactly that - keep coffee "warm", but definitely not hot. I guess if it kept coffee hot they would have called it a coffee "heater"... It's just ok. Keeps coffee from going luke-warm or cold.
I researched the internet and read all the Amazon reviews, and decided to add the Mr. Coffee warmer to my wishlist. My sister bought it for me and I've been using it for less than a week so far. I have to say that I think it preforms quite well. I have not tried putting a room temp or cold beverage on it yet, but will since it may just be strong enough. The less liquid in your mug, the hotter it gets and stays. The first time I used it, there was a melting or burning plastic smell, but this is to be expected and never occured again. This one does not come with a mug which I was dissapointed about, but my "the Office" mug works just fine. I might suggest using it with a mug that has a top or cover since this would maintain heat even better. The black color blends in with my desk and it's quite small as not to be an eye-sore. I'd reccommend this item, and it's saving me time and money since I'm not dumping cold coffee and buying more anymore.
I bought one of these coffee warmers to keep my coffee warm at the office. It really does the job. Note you cannot pour cold coffee into a mug and expect this device to heat it -- that isn't the purpose. If you set your warm coffee on this heater, get up go get something out of the printer, get distracted talk to people, come back to your desk 15 min later your coffee will still be warm, maybe even hot depending on how hot it was when you poured it in there. I love it. I bought one for home too. The success of the coffee warmer is also dependent on your coffee mug. I find it works best with coffee mugs that have a large surface area at the bottom. I would definitely recommend this product -- I already have, I love it.
This little warmer works great. It will not really heat a full cup of cold coffee, but it will keep hot coffee very hot, and will heat up a half cup of coffee very well.
I use this at work. Turn it on before you go to get your coffee in the breakroom. Best if the cup/coffee is already warm.
I bought this for office use. It's pretty good. It does keep my coffee warm through out the day. Nice in winter.
I like this product enough to specifically turned my computer on to write a review. It worked better than expected and kept my beverage warm. It's a mug warmer so, no, it doesn't bring your beverages to a boil (I seem to have read complaints that it doesn't heat up their beverages, though that could be for a similar product.) I think my tea was actually a bit hotter than the original temperature when I pulled it out of the microwave and put it on the warmer. I am just very happy that my tea doesn't turn cold within 5-10 minutes.
I was given this as a christmas gift, and it's more than lived up to my expectations.It won't heat a cold cup of coffee, but it will keep a cup at a very nice temperature for a very long time.Works best if you actually drink the coffee, the less coffee in the cup, the more effective it is... A full cup of coffee left for a couple hours will moderately warm, but if you actually drink the coffee slowly over time, the end will still be a good temp.
Pros:It keeps my mom's coffee warm while she reads her news paper, and it made a awesome gift. It makes candles smell really good too.Cons:Dont spill your coffee on it or its ruined._.
I wanted to like this device....nice long cord .....switch on the base.....nice looking....but...It just did not get hot enough for my taste.....nice and warm but not hot....as we get older we want hotter it seems.....tried different glass and ceramic cups but sorry not hot enough.....heater is 17 watt....would like to have one at about 25 watts.
I bought this to keep my tea and coffee warm while I work at my desk for extended periods of time. The power cord is a decent length, so that I can plug it into my power strip on the floor and fit the cup warmer on the corner of my desk. It keeps beverages the right temperaure--not lukewarm, not scalding hot. Just hot enough to drink without fear of burning your tongue.Has an on/off switch which is nice, you don't have to unplug the device for it to stop heating.Would have preferred to power it through a usb cable though, so that I can really take it everywhere with me!
the warmer works as advertised. Keeps my mug warm. The shipping was delayed so much so that I contacted Amazon... but it did show up within the days Amazon told me.
I find this coffee warmer useful and practical. Some complained that it does not generate enough heat to heat up the coffee, and they are mistaken about the purpose of the product. It is not a coffee maker, it is a coffee warmer. It is good for keeping warm coffee warm, not to make cold coffee hot. I would be better if it can automatically turn on or off with the presence or absence of the mug. At it is, I have to remember turning it off at the end of the day.
Great value for the price. It does only have one setting but it keeps my coffee warm for hours! Because of the pictures I thought this was battery operated so it should be noted this needs to be plugged into an outlet.
the warmer takes a little time but is quickish. the warmer is good quality. its something nice to have around.
This is the 4th mugwarmer that I have bought - still using the other 3 in different places. Had a hard time trying to find one in the stores, so I was thankful to find one on Amazon.com. I selected this one because it was a good price and seemed more substantial than the others. So far it works great - no complaints at all. My other mugwarmers are white. I like the black color because it seems to blend better with my nice wooden office desk. I would recommend it!
This pad does get pretty hot, but how well it keeps your beverage hot really depends on the cup that you use. The problem is that most (all?) mugs have a circular bottom, so the actual surface area that contacts the pad is pretty small. That being said, my drink never really got colder than a step hotter than lukewarm, so I guess it works fine!Safety is somewhat of a concern, though. It uses a simple on/off switch, and I'm not sure what will happen if it is left on for days at a time. I think a system where it is only on when a cup is on it would be awesome.Your cup also sits about an inch higher off the table, so risk of knocking it over is a bit higher.Overall, a good and cheap solution to the everyday first world problem of keeping a hot drink hot.
I have two of these. One is in my home office and the other is in the kitchen. For the most part this is an excellent appliance, as long as you use it to its optimum capability. If you use a deep mug with a narrow circumference your hot beverage isn't going to be as warm as a cup with a wider circumference. Simply put, the mug will stay warmer if it comes in contact with more of the warming base. I found this out rather unintentionally since I usually grab whichever mug is within close reach. I noticed that the wider mug was warmer.Under the best conditions, this mug keeps my morning joe warm for however long it takes for me to scarf down a whole cup. It's nice to have a last sip that is as pleasant as the first.
My oversized mug has a standard-size bottom, and it fits on the heating element with tons of room to spare. I start with a mug of scalding-hot tea and place it on this warmer, and the scalding temperature does come down to the perfect drinkable temperature and there it stays. When the tea level gets really low, though, the tea temperature does rise considerably. I have no complaints. The cord is plenty long enough to put on my cubicle desk, snake across and down through the allotted cord hole a foot or so away, then down to the outlet. The on/off switch isn't smooth, but that's hardly a problem.
The warmer works just fine at keeping coffee warm. The switch on the body of the unit is easy to locate (as opposed to one on the cord). The one downside is that it is too small to hold a very large mug. I guess it just holds the standard size.
I was worried that I would buy this product and it wouldn't work because of the price. The Mr. Coffe mug warmer works and is worth the money.
I was tired of drinking cold coffee. I drink slowly. This little warmer is perfect for me. It does keep liquids pretty warm, not hot. It also seems pretty safe, it does not turn off automatically...but it doesn't get so hot that I worry about starting a fire. It didn't cost a lot, and it is not bad looking. I consider it a good deal, and I would buy it again.
I bought this warmer to use at my desk at work. I like having a mug of herbal tea handy throughout the day. My only complaint is that it doesn't keep my tea as warm as my old warmer did. I do like that this warmer is black. My old warmer was white, and looked pretty bad by the time it died.
4 stars for now, haven't used it, as it is a gift for my uncle. Packaging was nice, shipped on time, and no damage from what I can see. Will update review once my uncle uses it.
I shipped this product to the southern most tip of Africa because nothing comparable was available locally.I fitted the power converter necessary to cater for our 220v, and I now have seriously hot coffee available 24/7.To even boost the heat retention more, I'm using an enamel cup with a lid to keep the heat in.Nothing compares.All in, the shipping + power converter cost more than the cup warmer, but it was worth every cent.Very happy customer.Tam
Bought three for home & offices. Large heating surface keeps hot coffee hot and warms cooled coffee eventually. Wipe the warming surface after spills; it will last much longer.Wish the "on" light was bigger & brighter as reminder to turn off.
This coffee warmer works great. It works better if the cup has a lid, I use a box of guitar stings to cover the mug. My only problem is that I forget to put my coffee cup on it when I am busy reading, etc. I blacked out the white Mr Coffee logo on mine so it remains entirely black except the orange light.
Mr Coffee beverage warmer is as good if not better then I expected. It keeps my coffee and tea as hot as I like it. For those who think it is not hot enough, who wants burned coffee? This warmer keeps my beverages at a nice hot temperature for as long as it takes me to drink them.
I bought this because my mug of coffee/tea gets cold while still being about half full. This solved the problem. It doesn't keep the contents as hot as when it's freshly poured, but hot enough to make large gulps uncomfortable. I would suggest this because it does the job and is priced very reasonably. I picked up an extra one for my desk at work.
This thing works perfectly, it easily heats my mug up and keeps it warm for several hours, keeps my coffee fresh as the moment I poured it. Great gadget to have at your desk.
This has got to be one of the best office companions ever! It really does work! It does its job of keeping my coffee/tea warm. A very good buy and must have!
Ok, so I never finished my coffee before I got this since it always got cold. (Nothing like cold java on a winter's day with the a/c on in the office.) So, I gave this gadget a shot. If you are a coffee sipper like me and don't gulp your coffee in 2 minutes, this is the perfect product for you. It keeps hot cocoa, coffee, and tea and even cup-a-soups at the perfect sipping temperature.The only drawback is that once you are almost done with your drink, you must remember to turn off the switch. Can't blame the manufacturer, though. I forgot to shut mine off and a couple of hours later, my half a cup of coffee became a shot of espresso. Not so yummy.
I finally found a cup warmer that actually keeps my coffee hot! I have a very narrow threshold of how hot I like my coffee (piping hot, if it gets even remotely cooler, I can't stand it). This unit keeps it at nearly the optimal temperature.To further optimize my coffee temperature control, I bought a Titanium coffee mug from REI (very thin with great heat transfer) for about 30$. This set-up is perfect. I can walk away from my desk for any amount of time and return to a perfectly hot cup!You do have to start with a hot cup of joe to begin with though.
I got this for my desk at work so I could nurse my coffee without it getting cold. I love it. My coffee stays warm, and I see no signs of burning/damage on the bottom of my mug. My dad uses one at night for his tea while watching TV. A great gadget, especially for people who are hard to shop for.UPDATE: I've had this item for a year and half. I use it about 3x a week, and it still works great.
The Mr. Coffee Mug warmer is a handy and convenient accessory for both my computer workspace and on my bedside reading table.
I wanted to cut down on the amount of coffee I drank and realized one of the main reasons why I top-off is because it cooled down. Once I got my mug warmer I can now happily sip my cup of coffee throughout the day and it keeps it at just the right temperature. Not blazingly hot but just under that. I've been using it 5 days a week 10 hours a day for 2 months and it has been a solid performer.
Nothing is more annoying that leaving your coffee for a moment only to return to a cold cup of creamer n sugar. Some like it hot, i like it WARM! This product works great and lives up to it's name. It's very affordable and is an easy gift idea that just about anyone that drinks hot beverages would appreciate. It's been very good to me over the holiday season. The only downside is of course the cord, i mean im happy that you plug it in and it's not battery operated, but the cord can get in the way depending on where you place the warmer and can sometimes create a tripping hazard. Other than that, I'm down with this product. Don't you think it's time to warm YOUR mug?
I am constantly having to make trips to the microwave to heat up my tea, coffee, or hot chocolate. I'm a slow drinker, I can't help it. I don't like to gulp my drinks I like to enjoy them. Sometimes for over an hour! And I have high temperature standards. I like my beverages borderline scalding. That being said, I had doubts that this little gadget would keep my beverages HOT (not warm). It does a great job. Other reviewers are correct in that it will not reheat cold beverages but if you put them on the warmer when they are already hot enough to your liking, it will keep it that way for hours. Highly recommend for any slow drinkers out there. Should have gotten one years ago.Update: it's also useful for keeping a small teapot with tea in it warm for hours. I have a little ceramic tea pot that holds maybe 3 cups of liquid. If you make sure the tea is extra hot when you put it in the pot, it will stay pretty warm for a long time.
Pleased with the how the coffee warmer works. Instead of taking a trip to the microwave half way through my morning cup I can now drink the whole thing nice and warm. Doesn't keep the coffee real hot but it does the job pretty nicely.
A nifty little product that does just as its name suggests--it keeps hot liquids quite warm, down to the last drop so you don't end up having to drink cold coffee (or tea or cocoa) from your mug, ever.I like that the cord is long enough that I can safely scoot it out of the way, yet it remains plugged in--I previously bought another brand mug warmer which such a short cord that it was impractical to use, as the cord kept getting (accidentally) yanked out of the outlet. Not good.The red indicator light clearly informs you when the unit is on, and is easy to see. The warmer fits typical sized mugs, so can be used with just about any mug you happen to have. All in all, I highly recommend this upgrade to your hot drink experience.
Make sure you heat up your drink nicely before you put it on the warmer and your drink stays hot until you finish it.I like it.
Mr. Coffee had a very good warmer coffee on my mug cup. Before I bought it, I was usually my mug cup of coffee only warmer less than 10 min to become cold coffee, I was put it in a microwave to reheater mug cup then they went become cold after 15 mins. Now, I use a warmer heater which is stayed warmer till fill it up a coffee will stays warmer an hour, hour, hour forever is excellent it so much. I love it so much better than life without warmer.
I gave it to my boss for Christmas, his coffee was always getting cold because he's too busy to drink it right away. Now he always has a hot, hot cup of coffee.He Loves it!Kathy
One thing about me - I get distracted easily. Usually by the phone, or pretty, shiny articles on the interwebs .. this has a tendency to cause my morning Joe to go tepid very quickly.One evening, as I watched Netflix streaming on my main monitor whilst surfing eBay daily deals on my iPad, I noticed a mug warmer. It was the perfect solution! Not being foolish enough to buy something on eBay without research, I marked it to follow up. And, hey! Guess what!? On the daily deal, it was STILL more expensive than here on Amazon, and that particular model's reviews sucked out loud! However, this dandy little Mr. Coffee mugwump - er, mug warmer - just arrived yesterday and it's AWESOME.This morning, I got my mug settled into it's little spot and - WOWZAH! The coffee stays hot(ish)!The thing doesn't heat the mug to an uncomfortable temperature, and it sure slows down the normal Newtonian heat transfer rate. Four stars!!!
I bought 1 for home and 1 for work. Love them both! Start with hot drink and enjoy for 5-7 hrs. I take hot coffee to work in a thermos and refill my mug as needed. Great inexpensive gift for co-workers. Watch the liquid level carefully though; it gets very hot if the amount of liquid gets really low.
Ten stories spanning nearly twenty years of one of the finest collaborations in the history of science fiction. Pohl plus Kornbluth was a whole greater than the sum of its parts. Three of the ten stories were begun by Kornbluth, and finished by Pohl after his partner's tragic early demise.Contents:Best Friend (1941Critical Mass (1961The Engineer (1955)A Gentle Dying (1961)Marstube (1941)Nightmare With Zeppelins (1958)The Quaker Cannon (1961)Trouble in Time (1940)The World of Myrion Flowers (1961)
This is a wonderful movie, and to think it is a debut film. Man. I had seen "The Magdalene Sisters" twice,and loved it so much that I looked up the director, found this movie, and ordered it on Netflix. It startsoff sort of slow, but gathers speed and intensity, and winds up a home run. This writer/director shouldbe working. His NOT working robs me of pleasure. Mr. Mullan, if ever you check these things (and I knowfamous people sometimes do), for the love of God get off your rump and get to work. If you drink stop. Ifyou drug it, stop. If you're just plain lazy, get some gumption. If you've been this good on your first twofilms, you could be a world-beater.Get back to work. Please. (And the actors are great, down to the tiniest part. Just dynamite stuff all around).
This movie makes great audio. I can't wait for Scottish Independence so we can see kilts in the Olympic Games Opening Ceremony parade. But until then, England should include a Scottish audio option on all their movies and television program(me)s. This movie comes with English subtitles. The first part is reminiscent of After Hours and the ending is a peaceful one.
Being a fan of Peter Mullan, I wanted to see this -- I think his first directing effort. It's hard to take, more than a little over the top -- but in the end, it is incredibly moving and a remarkable work.
With a heavy helping of humor, Jennifer Crusie treats the reader to a fun and witty escapist romance. No, it's probably never going to happen this way, but it's fun, it's charming, and the dogs will warm your hearts too. The Lucy character manages to be smart, cute, sassy and independent, which is a big improvement over some of the lame ladies in romantic fiction. Zach, as the macho policeman, is a bit much but able to be taught. Crusie also allows the reader a certain amount of imagination when it comes to the lustier moments. This book might just be the answer for a cold winter evening.
I enjoyed the book once I got over the readers voice. The book was exciting and fun to listen to i alway enjoy Jennifer cruise books.
This was the first book by Jennifer Crusie that i have read and i just loved it. i had got hold of this book on a very 'bad day'. I was very depressed. it was not easy to make me laugh but this book did it. i laughed out loud... and it felt very good! As from now Crusie is my favorite romance writer. Thank you jennifer for writing this book!
It was a very cute story but I personally prefer ANYONE BUT YOU over this story. The character Zack in this story is a bit rough around the edges for me. Although at the end he did soften up a lot, but I felt his character was very rough. However it was a nice, humorous story, and it does keep the reader interested through out the plot.
I'm a recent Jennifer Crusie fan, and am working on reading all her "old" books. I love her! Her writing is top, and she keeps it realistic enough to be believeable, but humorous too. This was one of her earlier books from the Harlequin "Temptation" line, and we can see what appears to be Harlequin holding her back in someways. "Getting Rid of Bradley" isn't as funny as some of her earlier works. It feels like she's following the rules laid down by Harlequin. However, despite this, it allows her voice to come through. From Lucy with the green hair to the end.. top writing that only gets better!
I will admit to being a bit overwhelmed in the beginning since it jumped in with all these characters and all this action, but it did not take me long to settle down comfortably in the plot. I adored how Crusie allows the reader a certain amount of imagination when it comes to the lustier moments. The characters had a wonderful blend of humor, intelligence, and chemistry. Also, the plot was interesting and had a few twists and turns, but nothing that seemed outlandishly implausible.
This book was entertaining and funny. I recommend this book. It was easy reading and didn't want to put the book down.
This is definitely one of her better reads. It has a hint of mystery to it, and not to much of her love making writing....
This is a great book...It's filled with a hundred spells from various cultures, religions and traditions that work independent of any specific culture, religion or tradition. What's wonderful about it, is that Draja focuses on making magick PRACTICAL. How refreshing! A lot of the spells are simple to perform and require items that are easily available to most people. There are a few spells that i find to be rather peculiar or overly time-consuming, but they're an interesting read at the least. He provides practical spells for most of the situations that people encounter in their daily lives...money, health, jobs, luck, relationships, etc. He does have a slight paternal tone in telling people not to alter the spells, but i take that to simply be a guardrail for the novice magick user. It's a great little sourcebook for spells and as inspiration to help you create your own. Definately a "must-have" for me! =))
An excellent little collection of spells. Not wicca or CM, so if you're looking for those you might be more pleased with some other selection. But it's good solid folk magic, largely of a mixed African and European flavor.I wouldn't say the book is indispensable for the advanced or intermediate practitioner. It's largely addressed at the beginner. But it's a pleasant read, well organised, and contains more useful practical spells than most books on the market these days.I definitely class it as a good value, especially at the price.
This particular piece of literature would be a great reference guide to someone who was well experienced in the art however this is not the type of book that a beginner would want. It is almost all just a listing.
very good book. This book deals with spiruality and goes to the Christian aspect of magic. It is all very good reading and I haven't tried any spells yet but it is very interesting how Draja wrote this book. I highly recomend book to any one intressed in magic and it is good for reference it looks like.
As always, Draja's work is comprehensive and thorough. In this book Draja doesn't so much supply spells as he supplies information about types of spells with some examples. What I found useful about this book is that it serves as a ready made reference guide that a person can draw on if s/he wants to use types of spells. This is a good book to have. It's not Draja's best, but its useful for whatever circumstances the magician might need.
When I purchased this tape I knew nothing about sewing,only how to thread the machine which my mother actually did for me.But I really wanted to learn how to sew and this video has helped me so much.I learned how to read a pattern which I had thought was impossible,how to lay out the fabric and cut it, and then there is the sewing which she actually shows you at the machine.I really love this tape.It has started me on the wonderful world of sewing.If you really are a green beginner then this tape is for you.I even completed the skirt and it looks great.Highly recommended.
Girl with a Suitcase: Ah, first love can be so bittersweet.....Violent Summer: Bittersweet! No one does it like Zurlini.
Purchased this for my 2000 Windstar; price was about 40% cheaper than local parts store for same item. Have had no issues at all with this.
This is one of the best animes, I believe, so far in the history of anime. Kareshi Kanojo No Jijou (His and Her Situation) [...] It opens with the begining "warning" music and then leads straight to the opening song. Then it has several tracks of BEAUTIFUL instrumental music. The next actual vocal song you hear is the "S.O.S" song. I think that's one of my favorites because of the situation they played it in on the show.(When Arima huged Miyazawa) KAWAII! Then you have more breath taking music. The next "song" is a song (dunno what it's called) about monsters that all of Miyazawa's new friends sing. My favorite part is when Tsubasa shouts out. I crack up every time I hear it! Then you have both versions of the ending theme song. But if you have a chance to get this CD, it's totally worth it! Not to mention the cover artwork is very cool. It features evrybody. *-* Ja'ne! ~Aya-chan
I was really pleased after purchasing this CD. Had heard Derryl in person a couple of times and thought he was good. His CD shows his versatility and there wasn't one tune I didn't love. He is also a great performer.
This double CD is fantastic value. The second CD is the best rocksteady compilation I have heard so far: lots of Paragons classics. The first CD is about the best intro to U-Roy you could buy and as he is the granddaddy of DJ toasting a good place to start. As there are nearly 30 tracks on each disc this adds to the value. The only doubt you might have is that it can sometimes be a bit wearing to listen to a whole disc of a single DJ's toasting. But hey! You could play the rocksteady disc all day long and never tire of it!
Great game and lots of fun. I was impressed with graphics and game play. It is well worth the price.
I am 6'1". This bench is a very good fit. It feels sturdy and stable when lifting. There is a good span between the uprights to ensure your hands don't hit when replacing the bar. It was easy to assemble. I have decided to remove the leg lift, but it was not in the way. The padding is comfortable and seems durable. I would definitely recommend this bench for a daily workout.
I bought this bench for my husband as a gift. I'm pretty impressed with the sturdiness so far. It took me over 2 hours to assemble by myself and there were a couple errors in the instructions but nothing I couldn't figure out pretty easily. Overall, a fantastic bargain. He was thrilled.
As an educational consultant who advises kids about finding and applying to New York City schools, I frequently recommend this top Sci High prep book. Arak, the author and a longtime Princeton Review instructor, writes engagingly, and explains to students exactly what they need to know to improve their scores on this competitive test. As a classroom teacher as well as a graduate of another selective public school (Hunter), Arak knows his material. eglickman@abacusguide.com
I just got to say that one of the reasons Macross Plus and Cowboy Bebop succeded were not only because they are great anime but because of their great music score.Yoko Kanno is a master in composing any great song.She uses an unique and unrealistic language in most of them though(That's the reason I like After in the Dark and Pulse so much,it's all about emotions)U just won't believe it till u finally listen to it.I haven't been able to buy it though,I can't find it anywhere(Amazon.com got it though ^^)but I'd listen to every single song on the internet and all of them are great.
Thank you for answering my questions and sending the product in a timely manner as it was described to me.
The brink of time add on cd to the chrono trigger osv was better than the original itsself. The orchestration by yasunori mitsuda was simply amazing, he truly is a master of vgmusic. I would in all ways say he is equal to or better than N. Umetsu (final fantasy). This is a truly captivating cd.
My daughter and I have been watching all the seasons together. After season 8, we were feeling done with the series but couldn't quite let go. Are we ever glad we didn't! This was an action packed season and we thoroughly enjoyed it.
This show lasted for 10 seasons! It was a little silly, but I believe that was intentional. Tom Welling will forever be my favorite Superman! He's the perfect choice. The package arrived on time and in good condition.
Buy all seasons for $9.99 each and save about $50 compared to buying the "complete collection". Just search each season and look for the $9.99 version. It's the same as the complete collections, but cheaper.
I have been watching the Smallville series since season one! The ninth season was not packaged as nice as some of the previous seasons, but the new DVDs are nice and clear to watch. I know there is a season ten, but I also can feel the series is coming to an end. It was nice while it lasted. Ms Mack has been with the series from the start. I loved the part where she could heal people with her touch. She seems like a very nice girl - I wonder what she is actually like?
The condition was awesome, the price definately nice and all the inserts were there. I would definately trust these guys as far as condition goes. Very timely shipping as well before the stated recieve date. Thanks!
Amazon's customer service was beyond wonderful when contacted for this specific item. They worked with me to make sure I was treated fairly and to make sure I was happy. I will definitely continue to shop with Amazon for this particular reason!
I am always satisfied with this show. I get a season every birthday and Christmas for my brother. Thankfully I'm almost to the end of the list. He really loves the extra footage and interviews.
Awesome episode if you know who the wonder-twins are. They even had the monkey, mistakes, and really good intentions. I kept waiting for one of them to say how they wanted to be "super friends" with Clark or Chloe.
Best season out of all of them in my opinion. If you're not a fan of super hero comics, Smallville will definitely change your mind!
I love my movie. I can't wait till I own the whole collection, which should be very very soon. You could say I'm Smallville obsessed.
I've got all of the Smaville seasons and have enjoyed them all. I'm disappointed that the show is ending. I like the characters and the plots.
One of the better WWII romantic movies, one of my 3 favorites. It has excitement, surprise, romance, mystery. Everything that makes a great war story!!! Miss Marlene & Mr. Ray are at their best!
If you enjoy acting and song, this is a must! Marlene's superb acting delighted me through the whole movie. She was enchanting and endearing as this Gypsy character. The gravity of the war times was made easier to watch. If you've not seen this please do settle down for a very enjoyable fun time with these wonderful characters and music.
The replacement battery cartridge arrived a day early, was in great condition, and contained APC batteries as described. As a busy Network Administrator, receiving the correct replacement part as described and a day early is the best case scenario. Thank you.
Reviews about "head wounds" are complete trash, von Richtofen was clearly shot from below and to the right, putting him perfectly within range of the Aussies on the ground...no way could Brown have shot up at him coming from behind and above.Furthermore, had von Richtofen gotten nailed by a fatal head wound then he would not have been conscious to have said the last word "Kaput" to the Aussies who approached his downed machine.He was killed by a single bullet through the right side entering the chest diagonally upward with the slug exiting his left breast. Get off this "Brown got him" garbage, all he got was a short burst off then he skedaddled before his luck was pushed.
For the war buff only. Outstanding flying scenes, even if some of the aircraft types are wrong. John Phillip Law is good as Von Richtofen, though too tall. The Baron was a small man. Don Stroud portrays Roy Brown as sort of a cowboy. Brown was an officer and a gentleman. American actors don't play Canadians well. If you like the flying, I highly recommend Howard Hughes' film 'Hell's Angels' (1930). As real as it gets!
The film has a nice flow and plot. The music is great. It is all geared toward the Italian familia. I love Cher, Nicholas Cage, and Olivia Dukacas in it. They gave great performances. I already loved La Boheme prior to seeing the movie and bought the CD of the movie soundtrack. Anyone wanting to see an enjoyable movie and listen to great music should put this high on your list. It is entertaining and holds your interest, unlike a lot of other movies. It used to be a 4-star movie and is now rated a 3-star movie - but a high 3-star. It is a classic that will be viewed over and over. The music of Puccini will live forever. Once you see the movie, the music flows from scene to scene in your mind.A must buy CD.
wonderful movie. if you can stand the chopped format, get it. If you want letterbox, tape it (December 2003) from TCM. Or look for the rumored widescreen DVD version. (Why they ever made a chopped version for DVD, I'll never understand...)
I received this is great condition and early! No problems whatsoever. Also, the price was very reasonable. I would order from this vendor again.
This is my 10th time screening this incredible movie and now I have the option of buying it in DVD. Bravo toCher and Norman Jewison and Ms. Dukakis
Moonstruck is one of the best gems that's been on the screen---ever. Cher, Nick Cage, Danny Aiello, Olympia Dukakis all put in great performances in this Brooklyn romance, set in today's world, but timeless in it's tale of love. A true romantic comedy with some pricelss one liners in it. And all the time, the wonderful music of Puccini in the background. A must see. END
Yes dear viewer, Moonstruck provides the most sophisticated elements of a good movie could offer. A great story, excellent performers and the fabulous music of Puccini. END
A full cycle of emotions while watching real artists deliver their craft. Cher is beautiful, humorous and devilish while themen in her life complicate it and compliment it.
I DONT CARE WHAT PEOPLE SAY ABOUT CHER, BUT I ENJOY THIS MOVIE SO MUCH I GOT IT IN VHS AND NOW ON DVD.EVEN THOUGH ITS A BIT CRAZY, IT HAS A CLITCH TO IT. LEARNING THAT HER BOYFRIEND HAS TO GO TO PALERMO FOR HIS MOTHER BED-DYING SIDE AND IN THE MEAN TIME LEARNING THAT HE HAS A BROTHER NO ONE EVER TALKS ABOUT.NICOLAS CAGE COULD HAVE MADE A BETTER PREFORMANCE BUT HE IS GOOD.IN THE MEAN TIME SHE LEARNS HER FATHER IS HAVING AN AFFAIR WITH A LADY THAT ONLY WANTS HIS MONEY AND HIS ATTENTION.IN THE MEAN TIME LEARN THE MEANING TO LIFE AND CHOOSING TO LIVE INSTEAD OF LIVING LIFE WITH OUT NO MEANING.
This time it took a bit longer. But I guess it wasn't your fault. Russian Post is to blame. Thanks anyway!
I am a Cher fan. Always was and always will be. That said, I haven't always been a fan of her movies. But this one regardless weather Cher is in it or not is a true classic in every way possible. I must have seen this movie 50 times over the last 12 years and still never tire of it. I use many a catch fraise often from the movie that have become part of my everyday language. This story reminds me of my childhood as I came from a typical Italian family and we all acted very much the same way and lived in the Jersey side of NY in a 3 story house with a view of the Hudson. This movie is dead on the character, the vibe and the humor! If you haven't seen Moonstruck, you don't know what you're missing. I might add, this is one of Nick Cages finest performances!Rich
This movie is funny and well written. If you like to laugh and love a love story buy this movie.
"When you love 'em they drive you crazy because they know they can" is just one of so many truthful, poignant, memorable lines from this intelligent, warm, grown-up story. This isn't just a movie, it's the tradition of story telling at it's finest. The music, settings, and characters tell such a fine, truthful tale, I swear I can smell the food in the kitchen, dining room, or restaurant - you'll see what I mean when you see the movie!
This movie is great! Nick Cage when he was younger and Cher when she was...well...anyhow...they both look great and the story is clever and well built on the same grounds as La Boheme, a Lover's classic Opera tale. Cameos by a lot of great actors of our time. The roots of the Catholic Italians in New York is intriging...and the whole issue of age and it's timelessness...Definitely one for the collection!
I never grow tired of seeing this movie. I am not sureif it is because I am Italian and can relate to so many of the scenes and actions, or if it is the excellent acting that Cher,Nicolas Cage and the others put forth in their roles.A love story that grabs your attention from the first act and holds you glued to your seat throughout the movie.Tender, sweet and loving, yet tinted with such true to life raw emotions. Outstanding.This is one movie that no one should miss seeing! Excellent!
Moonstruck is a movie that easily deserves five stars. However, this DVD edition of Moonstruck has been edited to a full-screen format from the original widescreen. As far as I'm concerned, when publishers edit a film in that manner, they in effect are butchering the film-makers' original vision. One grossly butchered scene involves Cher and Aielo (sp?) together in the front seat of a car: the viewer is allowed to see only one actor at any one time, because the full-screen format will only fit one actor onscreen at once. This causes the audience to miss exactly one-half of each actor's wonderful performance. What a shame.To my knowledge there is no widescreen version of this outstanding movie available on DVD. That's just too bad.
I am a Romantic at heart, love a good love story. Been a Cher fan since day one and she was on TV.
I recently took a bus load of seniors on a bus trip. The trip was 3 hours long. We usually have a movie to show so the time goes faster. I picked Moonstruck. It was very funny and very light hearted. It was quite a hit. The seniors were mostly Italian and they really enjoyed the movie. Some of them missed it when it came out quite a few years ago. It's the first time they showed appreciation of a movie by clapping. I was very pleased.
This is perhaps the most romantic movie I have ever seen. But don't let the word romantic turn you away-this movie is hilarious. There is something in this movie for everyone. Cher and Olympia are great and both deserved the Oscar. It's not full of fluff or trash-it's the perfect date movie.also reccomended: Moulin Rouge, My Big Fat Greek Wedding, About a Boy.*
"Moonstruck" is one of my all time favorite films. Frothy, romantic, and poignant, this film is one to watch over and over again. All of the characters are loveable and endearing. I feel like I am part of the Castarini family every time I watch it. The script is absolutely perfect. Every line is quotable. One of my favorites is Rita's wry, "Cosmo can't OWN the moon!" Puccini's gorgeous melodies from "La Boheme" make the perfect musical backdrop for this contemporary masterpiece. A gem!
THIS COLLECTION IS WORTH THE PRICE..THE ONLY COLLECTION AVAILABLE. UNTIL ONE OF HER OLD LABELS IN THE US DECIDE TO GET TOGETHER AND RELEASE A MORE COMPREHENSIVE COLLECTION THIS IS THE ONE. THERE ARE NO SONGS FROM HER DAYS WITH WARNER BROTHERS OR COLUMBIA. BUT DEFINITELY WORTH THE PRICE OF ADMISSION.
Growing up I heard a lot of folk tales about Paul Bunyan. I was very amused by those stories. This book puts them all together for me. Very enjoyable to read. Lots of fun in these pages.
DR. Graham brings The Holy Spirit alive. It is a easy read in a descriptive and understanding language.The book goes in to detail to explain how the Holy Spirit can be experienced in your life.
Great - awesome- enlightening. Indepth discussion of the Hoy Spirit and how He is applicable in our lives and how He is not for the future but for now
This is more than the story of this doctor's discovery of breast cancer. The book is a fascinating study of how all the men and women at the South Pole not only survive, but how they form a special society and how being at the Pole changes most of them forever.An easy and fascinating read.
Good book, good price. Only problems in the time of release, the book is in good presentation and conditions. I recomended.
Daughter is 11 months old now but we've been using this for a while now.Some individual diapers tend to malfunction (leaks) but overall this is a good product.Typically, a diaper can go 8 hours (will be full and heavy) before it bothers the baby and/or starts leaking.
I've had a lot of trouble finding a paper diaper that fits my 29 1/2" long, 23lb 7 month old boy, he's a wiggler, jumper, tosser, turner, and roller, but these seem to fit really well. We've had no poo up the back (even when he poo'd while jumping in his bouncer) and no leaks overnight, both of which were problems before. I haven't had any rashes from chemicals, dyes, or perfumes which was also a problem with other brands in the past.
Pampers or swaddlers all equally good. Swaddlers comes with additional box packing, such a waste on environment. I like it better because it comes without additional box packing
I am the mother of 4 ranging in ages 1-16 and I have always used Pampers, they are the best. I have tried them all and none of them compare to Baby Dry. I don't have a problem with leaking, they don't tear easily, they have a nice sent, and they are affordable. What else could you ask for?
I really like these diapers! I had fewer leaks with these than with the Pampers Swaddlers, and while I like the contoured fit of the Huggies Pure and Natural, I loved the super absorbency of these. They hold a LOT! My baby is a heavy wetter, and we almost never have a leak with these. Even though they are not as stretchy, I find that they fit just fine compared to the Huggies, and for the price difference and absorbency, I would choose these.
Thanks to Amazon I no longer have to run to the store to get diapers they just show up on my doorstep! And the savings is great!
Pampers will always be my favorite diapers and frankly you get more in the "Baby Dry" than the more tailored pampers that have more gel. My baby doesn't break out with "Baby Dry" like they do with the more tailored ones. The only thing I don't like is they don't hold enough wetness at night. But when you have a baby that pees a gallon, I guess you'll have this. ;)
I have tried Huggies, Pampers and Loves, so far Pampers by far were the best, and for this price of only .17 cents per diaper its a Great Deal! I have priced around and didnt find a better deal for this size. Very Happy
Just noticed I could buy open box pampers for cheaper, this arrived just the outside was opened, but who cares we any how dont keep the box, the pampers where closed in original package.
While I prefer the cruisers it's really not a big deal because the baby dry work just as well they're just not as cute.
I used Pampers swaddlers when my baby was first born and LOVED them!!! It's silly, but since he's outgrown swaddlers and I've started buying less expensive diapers, I've missed the powdery clean smell of Pampers in his room, I also figured they would be a lot better than Huggies because of the price, so I was excited to find a good deal on these Pampers. Turns out they're just fine--they are softer than Huggies, but when they get wet they feel like they are full of gel, kinda weird. I don't think they are worth paying more to get, but I didn't have any problems with them. Oh, and my baby is around 20-21 pounds, and when I am done with this pack, I think I'll move to size 4. He's only 10 months (so a little chubby), and the diapers are getting a little small around his waist. Plus, if he sleeps for a long time, he challenges the capacity.
It doesn't leak, stay dry for a long time, and above all, has a thinner layer that provides flexibility to my daughter's movement. Strongly recommend it.
We have 5-month old B/G twins. I love these diapers. They are thin, yet they protect very well. We haven't had diaper rash yet and will hopefully stay that way. But I do rinse them off almost every time they poop. We tried huggies and they just didn't hold up - too bulky and too many leaks. So go with these!
I find pampers work better for longer leaner babies, toddlers than for chunky babies. Less leakage. Huggies work better for chunky babies.
It was so fast delivery only for 3 days and with free shipping also without any tax.It's cheap then everywhere.
Hi, I bought these diapers for my special needs child. She is 8 years old, but very small so the size 5 fits her just right. These work great and the price is affordable, I subscribed and got a good discount and don't have to worry about running to the store for diapers. The only thing I don't really care for is the tapes that you attach it with are a little too narrow and don't stretch for a more custom fit.
No leaks, no blow outs!! I also love them because it's easy to tell if she has wet or not, other brands are so thick it's kinda hard to tell.
Awesome value, better price than Costco SAMs club. We just subscribed using the trial feature and tried it out. Value buy, enjoy.
I love pampers it's durable. I didn't like it when my baby was 2,3 months old because when he poops it leaks in the back. After he started sitting down and walking it is the perfect diaper for him
LOVE these diapers!! My 8 month old daughter was leaking through her diapers until we found these!!! No more wet sheets in the morning!!! AND, you CAN'T beat 222 diapers for 30 bucks!!! LOVE AmazonMom!!!
We think that these are great diapers. Virtually never have a blowout.What we learned is that the weight recommendation on the box should generally be ignored. The size 5 packaging says 27+ lbs. Our baby started wearing these at around 16-18 lbs.It's really very simple. When the diaper gets full, there's no more room...thus the blowout.With our first child (using the size/weight recommendations), blowouts and ruined clothing were a regular occurance. With our second child (ignoring the size weight recommendations), blowouts are a rarity.
I am so pleased with Amazon Mom especially with buying diapers. The Pampers economy pack gives plenty of diapers to last me until my next delivery. I love the price.
great for the money. Especially if you sign up for subscribe and save and amazon mom discounts. I like it more than many other brands i tried.
great value, great diaper, my 21 month old daughter leaked in every other brand except PAMPERS, i love pampers brand, however i did have to buy a size 5 in the Pampers and in other brands she could wear a size 4 but i wont buy any other brand now.
They work great only had a few times where it leaks not a lot would buy again because of the price. Bought from amazon fast shipping. Amazon rocks.
I subscribed to getting diapers once a month. My question is how can I go in and change the size? My daughter is a size three now but will be in a four pretty soon.
Pampers is the best brand available as compared to others pampers is the best but buying pampers from amazon made my life easy.i dont have to rush to the stores to buy the same box with a higher price,and absolutely loved amazon when i saw the box delivered after 1 day.
Only minus point is this product has no indicator.Product is good better than other ones in market, initially i was worried whether this would leak as i read some reviews, i had never faced leakage till now,there is no leakage in this Baby DRY Pammer product, may be i havent tried for more than 12 hours, absoultely good for a 3-4 month old baby.
This is absolutely the best way to get diapers. Auto ship: 2 boxes per month. In a science fair experiment at our elementary school a 3rd grade student compared Luvs, Huggies, a local store diaper, and Pampers. Pampers won out and this is one item that I stick to!
Good as diaper lasts long. Good during travel and keeps dry, no body rashes. Good for boys under 8 months.
We couldn't be happier with the Pampers products in general. We've had some nasty "messes" on our hands and these keep everything well contained AND are thin for our little man to move around comfortably.
I've been using Pampers Baby Dry diapers ever since my daughter was born 2 years ago. These don't ever leak on us, and blow-outs non-existent. They feel soft and seem comfortable. I've heard about babies getting rashes with the Dry Max line, but these seem great for sensitive bottoms.
it was fast Service and cheap for the amount of diapers I can always pick Amazon for these kind of deliverys ......cool
excellent experience with pampers. i always use pampers only to my son since his birth. pampers is a nice product
These diapers are okay, they have decreased in quality recently. The sides near the butt and inner thigh wear out (2-3 times a month) and and the absorbing crystals fall out all over. This occurs even if the diaper has only been on my two year old for a few hours.
Received the diapers as expected and had no issues. Ordering online was convenient and price was good too. Pampers Baby Dry feels soft. When wet the diapers feel very gel like, don't like that feeling though.
We prefer Pampers diapers & these (at least at the time) were a great deal. No complaints. Don't think they last 12 hr though, but none do.
I've been trying different brands and so far Pampers baby -Dry are my favorite. They are soft, durable, last through the night without leaking, and overall, just very convenient. I would definitely recommend this product.
i loved this item but i gonna move out of the country , so i had to cancel. My baby never had problem with these diapers.thanks.
I only bought pampers because I heard they are the best.. however im rethinking that due to all the poop explosions my daughter has in them!
These diapers have been my go to with both my children. They do not leak overnight, and do not cause any skin irritation like other diapers. If you are looking for a quality diaper, order Baby Dry diapers!
We love Pampers Baby Dry. We have used it with both of our boys. The economy size you get so many diapers for your money. Plus Amazon Mom gives a great discount. And if you can get any coupon codes, you can score a BIG discount on diapers. WE LOVE AMAZON!!
I love the Pampers Baby Dry diapers. My daughter has never had any leaks or diaper rash using them. I bought the economy pack thinking they'd last a while. But at three months old and 11 1/2 pounds, I'm finding that the straps barely fit and that the leg holes are digging into her skin. I'm going to have to give them to my sister-in-law's newborn so they won't go to waste.
Great product, arrives on time in a perfect box each time. Can't beat the great price!
Don't get confused here, this isn't a swaddler style diaper. There is NO, I repeat... NO wetness strip. This diaper came up when we searched for swaddler and its our mistake for not reading closer. The diaper is a bit small in size compared to the swaddler ones and the lack of wetness strip makes it an easy 2nd place choice to the same size Pamper Swaddler.
Pamper diapers are pretty good. They do not hold up as well as huggies as far as leaking goes, but for the price on Amazon its worth it!!
We use Pampers and this product was great for us! It arrived quickly as Amazon promised and was by far the best in affordability. Would recommend to a friend.
Just for those worried (like I was) about getting old non-flextab diapers from ordering this product: I ordered a 160-pack, size 4, in May, and they were the newest version, not the old ones with non-flexible tabs.
ive been purchasing diapers for years.these are perfect they are soft,absorb well even at night.they work better than the new cruisers.i have bought these and cruisers,the old ones worked well.the new ones leak everywhere especially infront.i have never had a poo leak from these diapers.unless your child has diarrhea there shouldnt be any leaks.these are also a better value than the cruisers.
The box of diapers came just as it was; in the original box. It was supposed to be raining quite a bit where we sent the diapers to. So I was a bit disapointed b/c we intended on using the box to transport the rest back home (1800+mi). Other than that it was ok. The so-called 2 day shipping was actually more like 5 days. Don't understand that one? As for the product, I have compared the pampers baby dry and cruisers to huggies little movers. My husband and I both loved the pampers when our son was not walking and crawling every where. Now that he is, we prefer huggies after having a few blow-out diaper accidents. We like pampers in general, however the contoured shape of the little movers has not let us down with the really messy diaper incidents.
Best diapers ever! Believe me, with my two kids I tried a lot! Good leakage protection, thin (what is very good for summer).
Pampers diapers are the best diapers. I would not recommend any other brand of diapers. No matter what stage and/or size your child is, this brand works the best.
these are the nighttime go-to diapers. very seldom is there a leak. they fit well and do the job very well.
As a mom of 4, I have lots of experience with diapers! I tried to go the "cheap" route early on, but quickly discovered that it does not actually save you money to use cheap diapers. Basically, you end up changing them more often and are more likely to experience what I like to call "blow outs." Even when compared to the other name brands, Pampers out performs them every time. They abosorb more and end up saving you money and having to do more washing in the long run. I really love that pampers introduced t he baby dry which are less expensive but just as good as the cruisers from my extensive experience!
I love them on my 14month baby she was using these before bit then started using pamper crusiers but they were a tad bit more expensive when these do the exact same thing. there great hold alot. PAMPERS ARE BETTER THAN HUGGIES.I TRIED THEM AND HAD A HORRIBLE EXPIERNCE. MY BABY WOULDNT HAVE THEM ON EVEN ON 20 MIN WHEN SHE WOULD BE LEAKING. THESE DIAPERS LAST HER GREAT ALL THROUGH THE NIGHT REAL FULL (: BUT NO LEAKING. I HIGHLY RECCOMEND THEM
I love Pampers diapers. I had been using Swaddlers and switched to Baby Dry because it was a lower price. I would say they are pretty comparable. I like the design on the Swaddlers better, the baby dry has blue and is not quite as soft but if you like swaddlers but want to pay a little less I think you'll be happy with the baby dry.
I only bought pampers because I heard they are the best.. however im rethinking that due to all the poop explosions my daughter has in them
I used to buy Pampers' "cruisers" all the time. But after reading some of the reviews here, I decided to give "baby dry" a try. (I'm a forever fan of Pampers, so no need to go to any other brands here.)"baby dry" has proven to be very economical. With 176 diapers in the package , they last a lot longer than the "cruisers" without having to compromise the quality. Price wise it's cheaper too. This is my 2nd order and if nothing goes wrong, I'm gonna continue ordering them. However it does seem to be not as soft as the "cruisers" but it's keeping dry and I don't consider that a critical factor at all. My baby is happy, no diaper rash and stays dry. What more could have one asked for?Mother of an 18-mo daughter
Good diapers. High price, would use store brand instead. Small babies don't pee that much, so save money and buy cheaper diapers.
This is a good quality product. The leakage is almost none. We have been using it for quite some time now and are very satisfied.
Pampers Baby Dry are the best diapers around for daytime use in my opinion. We tried many other kinds before and these were the only ones that would hold in all of my daughter's pee. Wish they were cheaper, but otherwise they're great!
Can't complain here, these are great for what stinks! Great Value, in fact I think we are still on the first box...our child is now 18. lol okay, that is a joke.
Recieved diapers in a good time frame. Recieved deal with diapers on sale and no shipping.
I normally bought pampers swaddlers for my son (just turned 3 months) but found these for a price i just couldnt pass up--it also offered me more diapers than what i would have bought with the swaddlers. After reading all the negative reviews I was really nervous that I had ordered the baby dry without trying them first, so i quick ran out to walmart and bought the smallest pack i could to make sure that they worked for him before i opened the pkg i recieved in the mail. luckily these diapers have been nothing but successful for me and my son (who has really full wet diapers and some big blow outs). I have not had a diaper leak or fail on me yet! Definatly reccomend them, as the price is lower and you get more diapers! If you're hesitant after reading the reviews go and buy a small amount from your local store to try before buying--but i promise its worth it!!!
Diaper works great - my son is dry till morning. Thin diapers. Only bad is on two occasions, we have had the tape break on us .
I like it, it's soft. My baby like it, too. But it is not really dry.my babies' butt are wet and reddish sometimes.
pampers is the best! We tried other brand (maybe the no. 2 brand), but we came back to pampers and would not try any others.
My one year old was on Huggies and I wanted to try Pampers to see if it was better. Although it was very soft on baby's skin, it wasn't sturdy enough for baby's movements. I also felt that I should've bought a size bigger. Now I am back to Huggies.
I love using baby dry on my five month old.. they never leak and my baby sleep from 8pm and I dont change his paper until 5:30 am. I love that they fit just fine not to big not to small. I love these pampers so much that I usually buy a convenience pack instead of buying them separately on the store. I recommend this brand to any mommas out there. Plus they have gifts to grow~ you enter a code and you earn points and then you could buy stuff for free.
My only issue is that they dont last all night and for my kid who drinks milk during the night, I have to change diapers several times during the night ... However, I am not sure if there is any better product out there for my situation!
This diaper seems to keep our baby drier than other brands and they aren't very bulky.The only problem was at night, and I doubt it has anything to do with the diaper. She tends to leak out the top of the diaper at night. So, we put 2 on her at night, one facing forward and one facing backward. Works, so far.
I don't know why people complain about these diapers vs the Pampers cruisers. the only time I have leaks with my 8 month old is when she has an excessively large BM....not that often, and Cruisers wouldn't do much better. When she was littler, I wasted my money buying the swaddlers line for my daughter. The truth is, she doesn't know that difference, and would rather have me put the savings toward her college education.
Had no issues whatsoever and the products came as scheduled in great condition. Much better than driving to the store for diapers and wipes and here I am saving money. I wish I knew about this sooner!
Love pampers and this is a great way to buy them. Price is great and I don't have to walk down the diaper isle every week!
Bought these for my newborn baby.Would definitely recommend them.Most importantly our newborn had no rashes which is common with low quality diapers.
Great price. better than any other shops around here. Great product too.All my family and friends love this product as well.
To be honest, when I first read the box (when my son was a newborn), I thought to myself, why would I ever keep my baby in one diaper for 12 hours (ewwwwww!) but the second he began sleeping through the night, I figured it out (hah!).These diapers are great and we have never had a morning blow outs, despite our son sleeping 12+ hours a night and definitely releasing a lot of substance into the diaper during that time. Moreover, he tends to roll several times at night and gets up and plays actively in his crib for a while (before we realize he is up) and even so, with all the movement, bouncing and a full diaper, there haven't been any leaks.We've put him in other diapers overnight and he's blown through all of those.
Not much to say. They do what they are supposed to. Earlier we tried the discount diapers and they didn't fare too well. Dealing with a few blowouts and peeing through some diapers at night we came back to pampers. You really can tell the quality after using discount brands. I am sure others have the same feeling for other brands but Pampers works well for us. Awesome delivery and price with Amazon Mom and subscribe and save.
These diapers are great for my 2 year old. We haven't had any leaking issues and they are much softer than the huggies she used to have.
I have been using these for a little over 4 yrs...before that, I admit I was a Huggies mom for 9 yrs. But after using Pampers ..Huggies felt like hard paper and did not smell fresh. Overall I like Pampers because they look cute, smell fresh and work well. The only time I've had leaks is when they need to move up a size, and occasionally poo up the back (I'd love to see a tighter elastic fit across the back)
Looking everywhere, these are the best deals, price/diaper. No real issues with leaks (no more than other brands). I have had a few when I go to pull the Velcro, it breaks off. It's happened to about 3-4 diapers. Called customer service and they were great
Cheaper than purchasing in the store. Comes to my house, and it is always a better price. What's not to love?
I love just being able to buy diapers for the month from Amazon and it saves me a lot of money and trips to the store.
these do a very, very good job. huggies supreme hold a bit more liquid but for the price the best you can get. actually like better than the pampers cruisers and they cost less. with the amount in the box - one case is good for almost a month. rarely leak - even w/ a 2 year old at night.
Pampers Baby Dry have been our choice for our 2 year old since he outgrew the Swaddlers. We liked the old Cruisers too and we used to switch back and forth between cruisers and baby dry. But I'm not very fond of the new Dry Max Crusiers. So we have started using Pampers Baby Dry exclusively and have been very happy.
These diapers work very well. My son actually could still fit in size three but I've moved him up and even though they are a little bit big, we never get leaks at all.
as every new parent out there we were completely confused with the whole diaper situation: what brand is better, what are the differences, what size fits, is chlorine-free option important, etc. we've tried/tested almost every brand available on the east coast, including some store brands. Pampers came out on top, hands down.- the absorbency is great. other brands remain wet inside causing diaper rash.- the elastics are snug, but not tight. we didn't have any accidents with leaking. not counting one, when we overtightened the diaper by accident.- the cut and nice and generous. fits chubby legs well.- the material is soft. doesn't feel like you are putting sanding paper on your baby.one complain: very strong powdery smell. but we got used to it.
I love this diapers. They can hold pretty good. And no rash ever. My baby is turning 6 months, only the first box of diapers I did not buy from Amazon. Good deal,A+
We only use these for nighttime so I cannot vouch for them other than that. But our boy sleeps 11-12 hours in them and they DO NOT leak. If they start to fit too small or cut it a little close we just get the next larger size--so they are always a little big on him. They are not as soft as the swaddlers or sensitive, but for a nighttime diaper they hold a lot and also do not give him any type of diaper rash. Baby Dry also does not have dry max.
I used Pampers for my 1st child and doing so again with my 2nd. They fit great on kids who are wider through the hips and behind.
We used to use Pampers Cruisers but have tried Pampers Baby dry diapers and they are great! Absorbant, fastener tabs stay closed, and do not leak! Keep my baby dry and no yucky gel or smell! Thanks pampers :)
Thia baby dry diapers are perfect for a newborn. Great fit and easy to put o and take it of. A lot better price than going to any retail store. Great products def.
I have tried multiple diapers and these work the best. They have the best fit and are great for overnight sleepers.
arrived and satisfied..box kind of beaten up but will see when I open it if any diapers are damaged .If no damage all is well !
It's a good choice. Help me to save some money.It's good enough to keep dry for about 5 hours or up and it's much cheaper than the rest of pampers.
I made the mistake of having my daughter wear Luvs during a fancy party in her honor. Well, they leaked HORRIBLY and ruined her party outfit. I've never had this kind of problem with Pampers, although we do get the occasional leak, especially at the waistband. I've found that a better choice than Pampers Baby-Dry is Pampers Swaddlers, with elastic all the way around the waist in addition to around the legs. Still, if leaks at the waist aren't much of an issue for your little one, the Baby-Dry Pampers will do fine.
I have tried Kirkland and Huggies and this is my favorite diaper so far. My baby is 6 months old now and we use this as overnight diaper. It keeps his bottom dry for around 8 hours. This is also the cheapest overnight diaper I have found so far. With amazon mom and automatic reorder, the price beats most of the other diapers out there.Why I gave 4 instead of 5 - When it gets really wet, it will bunch up and hang down and leak occasionally.
This was a great option for diapers.It easy, quick, and they come right to your door!
these are most absorbent diapers and they never smell. i got the best price from amazon.
I notice so many people complain the shipping problems, I just want to tell my experience, I ordered it on 22,Oct,2004, and received on 27,Oct,2004. What a fast shipping!!!
seems like pampers works best for my son- we tried other brands and they didnt work as well. definitely sticking with pampers!
I used a coupon 2$ off. good price. I look forward to better offer next time ro so. maybe... df
Cheap and good. Really good wipes for the price..smooth and strong. I recommend it to any age baby or child.
Pampers Baby Dry diapers are amazing. They absorbe everything and do just what they say, stay dry. None of those little jelly beads like in other diapers. They hold up to their name. They also smell wonderful with that fresh baby powder scent. Thisa is a great purchase and a great deal.
I save from .04 to.07 per diaper (depending on sizes I have autoshipped and mr mom deductions) as opposed to walmart's price. This adds up to a minimum savings of $7.68 per box up to well over $10 per box on smaller sizes. I have 3 in diapers.
My LO is 3 1/2 months old and is primarily breastfed with 1 bottle of formula a day. I started using the baby dry diapers a few weeks ago ONLY during the night time. And they are awesome! Now my little one rarely poos during the night time now so these baby dry diapers are awesome for me! Most nights they last the whole night and his clothes are still dry.
Pampers are the best for your little ones. The diaper absorb the moisture very well and keep kids skin dry. Surely recommend it.
What can I say...they performed their duties as expected. I like the Pampers diapers and will continue to use them.
I have tried many types of diapers on my five children and Pampers are by far my favorite! They provide the best leak proof coverage and are slim enough that people have thought my older kids were already potty trained. With 30% off through Amazon Mom, these diapers are even cheaper than Parent's Choice. And they are delivered straight to your door! You can't beat that!
Love the Baby Dry diapers w/o dry max! Cruisers have the new dry max which broke my son's little bottom out with sore like blisters. Glad Pamper's is still making this on w/o dry max!Best part about his diaper box was the price! With subscribe and save program and signing up for amazon mom I will get 30% off diapers and free shipping. This price simply cannot be beat, even at membership clubs!Great job amazon! Diapering baby just got cheaper!
Quality as usual good .. very goodBest thing is cost - Lowest anywhere when you take advantage of 10$ off of 49$
I have used pampers since my 10 month old was born. Initially I used the swaddles sensitive, which was great because they had the strip that changed colors when the baby is wet. But now I use the baby dry and have been very happy. Pampers came highly recommended to me, and I highly recommend them to other Moms!
These are fine wipes, nice thickness and scent. But it is seriously irritating that you can't ever pull out just 1 with one hand. I guess they overlap too much. It reminds me of the magic trick with endless scarves tied together that just keep coming out of the top hat. We're constantly shoving them back in the dispenser. This won't keep me from buying again, but it is one of those quietly irritating things you deal with every day.
I had good luck with these diapers, but found the Swaddlers fit better. These Baby Dry don't have the stretchy tabs, so they are harder to get a good fit. I know the size 3 has the stretchy tabs, but I guess the smaller sizes don't. These diapers never leaked! I always have great luck with Pampers products. Would definitely recommend.
I bought these because they were a great price. We had always used the swaddlers before. These actually hold better than the swaddlers. I don't think we have had one leak with these. I have a boy so you know the front is where all pee collects. Once he started rolling over and sleeping on his stomach they don't hold up. I actually switched to cloth for the night time.
After trying several brands only pampers are working for my baby since he has very sensitive skin.I wish they were cheaper but they are definitely the best!
We love these diapers. They keep our little munchkin very dry. At seven months, he's never had a diaper rash. He's been sleeping through the night since two months and ends up with some VERY wet diapers by morning. So to never have had a diaper rash, I am super impressed. As for "blow-outs," I can't comment. Our poor little guy tends to be constipated... But as my sister would tell you, there may not be a diaper out there that can handle some babies' blow-outs.My only advice to parents that think these are too leaky is to try another size before switching. My son is so tall that he'll have to go up a size before the weight guidlines indicate they'll fit. We know it's time to go up a size when he does have lots of leaks.
We have tried a variety of different diapers on our newborn, and these are our favorite. Our baby has never had any issues with leaking or blow outs with these diapers, and they hold so much that we don't have to worry if he sleeps through the night. We definitely prefer these over the Huggies diapers, and I believe we even like them more than the Pampers Swaddlers.
My kids are growing up with Pamper. This is a good price with great quality. We have a small problem in one or two boxes that the diapers have defects (flaps are missing, velcro missing, etc.) but after 4 kids, we come to trust this brand. And the price from Amazon subscription is great too.
We've used pampers for our son and our daughter. For the most part, we haven't had many issues with leaking or fit, until recently. Our son has had a few blow outs but it may be time to move to 4s.
I was using Huggies Little Movers for awhile until they were out of stock of my daughters size so I decided to use Baby Dry. I've used them before and I don't remember them being this cheaply made and flimsy. Honestly, if I had my eyes closed and touched them, I would have mistaken them for Luvs. Not that there is anything wrong with Luvs because the price is so cheap, but I expect the quality to be better for Baby Dry diapers.
As good as expected!! The only con is that it is supposed to fit babies from 17 to 25 pounds but my baby is only 18 pounds and it's already snug. Need to change to next size, other than that very good.
i love these diapers, also they are at a great price. they leak at night sometimes if the baby pees tons of times, which is very normal.
You definitely get a a ton of diapers with this purchase and the price is pretty good when other retailers aren't having diaper sales. The diapers keeps my baby dry especially over night.
I mostly use cloth diapers during the day, but for overnight and going out, I go with disposables. We're on our 3rd baby now, and over the years Pampers has been the ONLY disposable diaper that we can rely on! Have tried cheaper brands sometimes - they're cheaper for a reason! Pampers has consistently given us a diaper that we can count on not leaking. Store brands, Luvs, Huggies have all failed us multiple times, just leak really bad or tear easily. I am rarely brand-loyal, but Pampers is now the only brand of disposable I'll buy. Pampers is a good quality disposable for the times that you need it (I still recommend using mostly cloth and more natural products though!)
This dipers are really good.. They are good for the night too, as good as the diapers that are made specialy for the night..
I use these diapers for my baby, and they work really well for us. They fit her better than the other brands that we have tried, and we have had only a little bit of trouble with leaking, but that has been almost only at night, and with very soggy diapers. They are very soft and absorbent, and I think that it is easier to tell whether the diaper is dirty with Pampers than with other brands, such as Huggies. My daughter and I are both happy with these diapers and will not be switching any time soon.
I used pampers swaddlers for my newborn and loved it. Later, I switched to pampers dry max size 2 which seemed to work fine for my baby. However, I am not a big fan of pampers baby dry size 3 for my 4.5 month old baby. The runny poop leaks from the back sometimes although the diaper has been able to sustain pee wetness overnight. Sadly, I will be trying other brands for the next size.
Wipes smells good. They come out of the dispensor great. They are a little on the thin side. I would buy again.
I have been ordering this for my baby girls. Once tried other brands, but never satisfied until using this one. This is a high quality diaper. Amazon is a great place for shopping diaper since it is free shipping.
We have used Pampers and Huggies diapers since our daughter was born. While we love Pampers' Swaddler line of diapers since they are so soft, Baby Dry is a lot more economical. Still a great diaper and if put on correctly, does not leak and can absorb a lot! And with Amazon's subscribe and save feature, getting these diapers is super convenient and a great deal.
I am very picky when it comes to diapers and I love these diapers! No blow-outs and they were cheaper than buying generic Target Brand diapers! Although I do prefer the Pampers Swaddlers over most diapers, these Baby-Dry held up as well for being much cheaper. Very easy to order off amazon.com, came quickly and free shipping, and inexpensive diapers! Excellent Deal!
We have 4 boys and all of them have used Pampers as they are the only ones that we have found that do not leak for them. The price is wonderful on here as well using Amazon Mom and Subscribe and Save.
I'm now a mom of twin boys and I have an older daughter. I like other diapers as well but for different reasons. I've used Pampers, Huggies, Babies R Us brand, Seventh Generation, Luvs, Target Brand, and many more.My daughter has always been a bit larger in the hip size and I recommend both the Pampers Baby dry and Huggies. Now, that she is older and almost potty trained we still use these in size 5 and they fit great and hold everything in. She can even put these diapers on all by herself! I like the fact that you can get size 5 for $.14 a piece via Subscribe and Save and using Amazon Mom for free shipping. This is the best deal!
Pampaers is my go to diaper and the Baby Dry keeps my baby dry thru the night! Extremely pleased with the product and the pricing on Amazon Mom!!
I have shopped around and this is the best deal for the top quality diapers out there. The time of the free delivery of the diapers from Amazon varies with my two orders. The first time it took a couples of weeks and the second time it arrived in a couple of days. So you should plan ahead to order these big package diapers. But in my opinion, it is well worth it!
I always get size 4 for my little guy, and so I ordered size 4 in Pampers Baby-Dry. I can barely fit them around his waist. My friend and I compared Pampers size 3 and 4 next to each other and we couldn't tell any size difference.
I tried Cruisers and Pampers and Huggies. Huggies Supreme leaked. The only two that did the job were Cruisers and Paprer Baby Dry Diapers. Unfortunatelly Cruisers overpriced although they fit the best. Baby Drys does the job with a more appropriate price tag, but their fit is poorly designed
No diaper is perfect, that's why I gave it 4 stars and not 5. These are however the best we've used so far (and we've used quite a lot of different brands and types). Fewer blow-outs and seems to hold a lot of pee overnight. Thumbs up :)
I love pampers diapers. we tried all brands including some store brands and these were by far my favorite. my child will always be a pampers baby
The product has been arrived on time and was good. The price what I was expected, competitive with other providers. I would love to continue with amazon for my baby diaper needs and toys as well.
These diapers are softer and more compact than the Costco brand I have been using. My son doesn't scratch his waist when he's wearing these. Unfortunately, they don't seem to hold as much as the Costco brand so we have had a few wetness accidents. My son likes to drink A LOT of water. I just have to change him a little more often when he is wearing these diapers.
Pampers baby dry is the only brand that works for my baby... them keep her dry and we have never had leaks!
I've used many diapers on my kids (huggies, kirklands, Target before it was up & up, and cloth) and Pampers are my favorite. I love the soft exterior and how light and thin it is. The other diapers absorb just the same, but how they're made causes them to curl up and that's very inconvenient during a dirty diaper change. Pampers never curl and absorb just as much. I gave it 4 stars instead of 5 because my twins do need their special night diapers or they leak through their PJ's. I was so happy when I found Pampers night diapers the other day though.
I have been using these diapers for my daughter for almost a year now. They are excellent and I almost never have any issues with leakes. I use them both daytime and night. With Prime shipping, they are at my door so quick. Its very convenient, and the box lasts for a month!
I bought a box of pampers dry when it was on sale at Amazon.com + 15% desc subscribe and save. It was really worth! Very convenient to shop on the confort of our home and have it delivered to our door in no time!
Find that this is a good product. Have not had any concerns. Seem to not leak. Prefer over Huggies brand. Would purchase again.
i love subscribe and save!!! i never buy diapers or wipes at the store anymore! and of course, great value!!!
I haven't really strayed from Pampers since my son was born - each time we borrowed a diaper from a friend or went on vacation and had to use another brand, they didn't work as well (tabs not restickable, not as absorbent, etc) and we went back to Pampers. I discovered Baby Dry because we were in Mexico and that was the type of Pampers they had in the Costco there - baby dry is great - they are thin and super absorbent. Amazon is the best place to buy them - especially if you use subscribe and save.
Another reviewer mentioned that Pampers are the best for long, skinny babies. That's what I have, and I can vouch for these being much better than the Huggies that the hospital sent home with us. My son managed to pee out of those without hardly touching the diaper. I have no idea how he did it. These diapers were much better, although they weren't totally blow-out-proof. Now that he has grown out of the Newborn size and into size 1, I am still using the Pampers Baby Dry, and I think they do the job just fine, although if there is a diaper that is 100% leak-proof, I would love to know what it is.
This product is a good value, and Pampers Baby Dry work best for my son. They don't leak, despite the fact he is a super wetter, and I love the Caterpillar Flex sides. Cute Sesame Street designs as well.
I've always loved pampers and this was such a great deal so I jumped on it. Everything came and all was good, but it took 2 weeks for the shipment to get to my home. In that time I had to buy another pack of diapers. All of my other amazon shipments usually only take a few days, maybe a week. I just do.t understand why this one took so long. Besides that things were fantastic.
I was using Pampers Swaddlers when my daughter was a newborn. I found that the baby dry diapers were cheaper than Swaddlers and decided to give them a try. They are not very soft like Swaddlers and are without the indicator strip but they are good and they leak occasionally when she wears them overnight. My daughter is 19 months old now. The shipping is amazingly fast and so I keep ordering them again and again. The price is less when compared to other shopping sites and in stores and it even goes down when Amazon have an e-coupon.
My daughter is 2 years old and we have always used Panpers. I may spend a little bit more but it is worth it for no leaks - ever!
We always love these diapers, they move well with our 14 month old and don't spill. The large pack makes the price per diaper significantly less, and with shipping right to your door who could ask for a better deal.
these diapers do maintain there shape and absorb exceptionally well. They last the night for my 9 month old granddaughter
these are a slight step down from pamper's swaddlers. but they're a little better than cruisers. for the last 4 months or so we've been using costco diapers during the day and baby dry at night. but recently we decided to just use baby dry all the time. these are quality diapers and very absorbent. you can immediately feel the difference between these and costco brand just holding them in your hand. it's worth it even for a little bit more money. but with 'subscribe and save,' free shipping and no tax, it's a total no-brainer.
Switched to these after Pampers downgraded their Cruisers. They work very well for us, not to mention they are more affordable than Cruisers too.
The convenience of ordering diapers and having them delivered free in two days (with Prime shipping) makes me doubt I'll ever go back to buying diapers at the store.
I always search for the cheapest name brand diapers and this is it!!! With the economy the way it is and the bigger the baby gets the less diapers you get this is great!!!! Affordable and they work great!!! I was using the cruisers but I needed to cut down my expenses so this helps some.
We only buy Pampers because of multiple incidents with Huggies and blowouts. The Pampers just feel like better quality.
Pampers Baby Dry are our favorite diapers, we've been together from size 1 to size 6.The only reason why I'm giving this product 4 stars is that within the last 6 months, nearly every box we receive contains few diapers with substandard closures <- the little flaps come right off once you pull them.----On the other hand, we are very impressed with Amazon Mom - it delivers everything it promises, from savings to on-time-delivery.
These work great for my daughter although they seem to run a little small so she grows out of the sizes quick! Leak-proof and she sleeps in them all night!
These diapers have great absorbency.I do not change her diaper in the middle of the night(she sleeps 11 hours)and there are no leaks and no diaper rashes.
These diapers are very good. I would have given it 5 stars if not for the tabs that easily breaks.
I use these overnight for my twins and they are awesome! I was wary at how thin they seemed but they rock at holding the urine. The diapers are heavy and full in the morning but the babies and their pajamas are dry. Great diapers!
my baby stays dry and happy all the time i only use pampers especially the 222 count which is a real value
I am a mom to 7 kids with our 8th on the way. We have used pampers for years. We trust that they are the best and know from experience that it's worth the money. They are gentle on skin and leak proof! Don't waste time trying any other diapers I have tried them all and nothing compares to pampers quality!
As a new mom, I've tried couple of different brands,, and Pampers is the winner. For this specific one, it's great for the cost, but it does not come with wetness indicator... which is something you can live without.. but the ones with it, help quite a bit. But can't complain when you have to change diaper like 12+ times a day, the cost comes as a big player in purchasing such items.
Pampers Baby Dry and Luvs have been our two go-to brands for our active little guy. For Newborn-thru-2, Pampers were definitely our favorites. But once he hit size three, we've gone with both of these numerous times....and about the only thing we can say for sure is we like both better than Huggies!!! We did get one batch of Pampers about 3 months ago where the elastic tabs would sometimes break or come apart, but Pampers to their credit gave us a refund as well as some half-off coupons that we could use at the local Tarzjay! Probably just a random bad batch or something -- no probs on the others.In the end, it really comes down to cost....and if you compare Pampers vs. Luvs, Luvs ends up being a few cents cheaper per diaper. Given the way the Dems and Republicans are ruining the economy, every cent makes a difference. Hence the reason I'm giving Luvs a 5-star and Pampers a 4-star rating -- both are excellent but Luvs are just a little cheaper!
I found that these baby dry diapers hold up well during the night for my son. They are not as soft as pampers cruiers, but work great. I found amazon to be the best price around, (are they were shipped right to our door!)
It is better to buy in bulk like this than the small one. I saved a lot of money and didn'y worry to run out of diaper anytime soon.
I tried Swaddlers, Huggies Snug N Dry and this one.1. Huggies and Baby Dry are functionally equivalent but not as good as swaddlers. This one is softer than Huggies.2. Not as good and leak proof as Pampers Swaddlers.Verdict: Buy Swaddlers upto size 2 and then switch to this one from size 3.
I really like these diapers. They fit my little lady just right and only leak if they get really really full or if she's laying in a strange position. I do prefer the diapers with the wetness indicator, but they don't have value packs that are this large. Overall, I am very satisfied with these diapers. I like them ten time better than huggies!
My daughter occasionally collects a little bit of residue from the diaper down there, but for the most part it's clean, doesn't deteriorate, and holds a lot of water.
These diapers are GREAT! They fit perfectly on my baby, they don't leak and my son can move around in them, they are not restricting at all!
Since our daughter was born, we used only Pampers diapers. They cost a little bit more than the "generic" ones, but you get what you pay for. They fit well and no liquid ever "dripped-out" of them. Go with Pampers and you cannot be wrong.
papers would have been great but the wrong size. They were automatically sent and by the time I received them my son out grew them.
Pampers diapers are very absorbant and fit my babies well. The only thing that I wish Pampers would change is to take the scent off the diapers. Huggies aren't scented, and I prefer them because of that. My babies have gotten rashes because of the perfume.
Have tried all diapers. My boys leak out of all except these baby dry pampers, didn't try the cruisers since they are more expensive. It should say something since all the hospitals I work t use pampers. Swaddles are best for new babies and baby dry from then on out. Amazon has great prices. Love when you have amazon mom and the extra coupon from parenting magazine
I just got these, they are super thin, but seem to hold alot! I like how light weight they are.
I bought a bag of these at the store because they were on sale and used it. It is the best diaper ever! I started using it when my baby was 8 weeks old and she slept for 8 hours! Prior to that we were using the Swaddlers and they were getting soaked after just 4-5 hours. Our baby is almost 11 weeks old now and she's sleeping 11 hours a night and these diapers lasts her that long. These are the best. I have ordered more and will swear by these diapers now!
These work great, I have been using them for my baby boy who was born 7 lbs and is now 10 lbs. The only time we have leaks is when we dont change him at every feeding.The only drawback of these pampers is they dont have the wetness strip. That being said after 2 months of diaper changes I can tell without the strip when he is wet.
I bought the pampers brand due to the deal you get thru amazon, and Im happy with them. This is my first baby, so I really do not know much about diapers, they keep everything in most of the time. I swear she shoots stuff sideways sometimes so it leaks thru her legs but I dont think thats the diapers fault! lol A diaper is a diaper I think!
very good product! good price for the amount too when compared to the stores. this products ships in a short amount of time too.
The baby dry diapers are great. My daughter has been using them since she was 3 months old (now 15 months) and has never had any rashs or leaks in them. I will not be ordering these from Amazon anymore. They have changed the discount on the MOM program so that it's not worth it anymore.
This is the biggest box of diapers that I can find in my area and it's tough for me to get to the store so having these delivered to my door is amazing. They do ship directly in the box, as is, in the picture. So if you live in a condo/apt/etc. and need privacy with your packages or are concerned that someone might take them, maybe not a good idea?
I have used pampers for my son ever since he has been born. Great product and I love the rewards program they have as well.I always buy my Pampers through Amazon, I have yet to find them cheaper (even at Sam's Club). I also love the easy of having them sent right to my door.
Hands down pampers are the best diapers. Never had a problem with leaking or skin breakdown on my baby.
these are much better then huggies , first off huggies run smaller, they dont hold as much for as long eaither, the design seems nice but the over all quality is good just isnt as good in my option for the price dif. ,
We are strictly a Pampers family. We used swaddlers until my son grew out of size 2-3s then we went directly to cruisers. We had a few leakage issues with cruisers, when my son would roll to his belly in the middle of the night, but were happy with them in general. A few friends of ours had been using baby dry's and metioned that they loved them (and that they were a little cheaper than cruisers!) so we decided to give them a try. And we LOVE them. We have not had one overnight leak! The only complaint that I have is that the tabs are made a little cheaper than swaddlers & cruisers, and a few of them have ripped right off as I'm fastening the diaper. I've just learned to be a little gentler with them, and we haven't had a problem since. Overall, I give them an A!
We've tried Costco's diapers and to a limited extent, Huggies... From our experience, Baby Dry are the best at catching leaks and offer the most value.
The main thing with diapers is that you want to get a great deal, and this was one of the best ones we saw. Very pleased.
I have been using these diapers on my 6 week old son for a couple of weeks now an havent had any issues with them like some people say they have. They are thinner then the swaddler dry max but I think these do there job great. I have not had any leaks with these at all. But my son is a sleepy baby and just got out of the NICU so I change his diaper every 3 hours to help wake him up. I do prefer the swaddlers dry max as I think they are a nicer and thicker diaper but if your looking for value for money these are fine.
We love Pampers. They are all we use in our house. I can trust that they will make it through long nights and keep my baby from getting diaper rashes. Love them!
I needed a copy of "Leaves of Grass" that includes the 1855 prose preface. The formatting of this Kindle book is perfect. I know I could read it on my computer for free on some websites, but I wanted a version for my Kindle. This Kindle edition will not disappoint you! I gladly paid $1 for a more "portable" option. I prefer reading on Kindle than the computer screen.
This is a good app that works well with the system and we have had no problems with this app so far.
Love it....Love it! I have been trying to find the book, but I guess an electronic copy works better since I will forever own it on my kindle!
This thick soft-backed "pocket" book has 490 pages. It could be called The Complete Whitman. It contains hundreds of poems.I am a senior citizen who had not read any Whitman for more than 50 years and am enjoying it very much. His descriptions of the 19th century's people, places, and inventions are eye-openers. He was actually a feminist before there was such a concept, and also an abolitionist. He truly believed in equality and democracy. He was a nature lover and wanted to protect the environment.Of course, there are parts I could quibble about, but that would be foolish. Whitman was a man ahead of his time.
I did not like it then as it was a push to read it. I do enjoy it now as there is no grade associated with it!Be in a place where you can put yourself in a different time and place; project what he is writing about in you mind to a simpler time.
A nice book to read when you want to relax and reflect on life. I enjoy the poems but will take awhile to go through the book.
So far I have come across a few typos in this edition. The typesetting is not ideal. The introduction is fine, but line-breaks are placed somewhat arbitrarily in the text of the poem, so that it is necessary to play with the font size and/or words per line to get satisfactory formatting. It is also a shame that the engraving of Whitman included in the first edition of the book is not reproduced. Other than that, it is good to have the original edition of this book for a small price
Overall the highlights edited together to give a sum-up of the Olympics was excellent. It only lacked giving a bit more highlight time to the figure skating. It seemed to be almost omitted. At least the winning performances would have been nice to see.Everything else was great and certainly captured the feel of the Olympics, including the hockey, skiing, snowboarding, etc., as well as the beauty of Vancouver which is a wonderful city.
This beautifully told story belongs in every library, and then....lend it out as often as possible! It's a "classic" of the "Holden Caulfield genre, and although I don't know, I'd imagine it's now, or has been, studied in High School English/writing programs.
I'm now a grandfather. But I've been watching kung fu movies ever since 1961, as a kid growing up in San Francisco Chinatown. This movie rates as one of my all time favorite kung fu movies, and I own about 100 or so.The print isn't very good. The subtitles are hard to read. The story is among the most complicated and convoluted, especially for the non Cantonese speaking. But who watches a kung fu movie for plots?What I really enjoyed about the movie is that it actually shows what the Chinese cinema could actually do. It has tremendous battle scenes. Despite the poor print quality, the movie has some fantastic visuals.The movie is not a documentary. The movie is not an "imagined documentary." A lot of things seem to come out of left field. But it's OK. It's a MOVIE!!Quite frankly, the movie plot could easily be translated into a Star Wars episode!
This is different type of Jet Li movie than his others. I haven't seen this type of fantasy movie and i thought it was great!! I was wondering if anyone knew of other movies in the same genre? The only dissappointment was the subtitles, they were unreadable at times. But if you are able to read them there are some very funny conversations....
This movie was made to be a fantasy/martial arts movie, and it delivers as promised. I have a very extensive collection of Martial Arts movies and I can honestly say that this movie is one of my top 15 favorite movies. I gave it a 4 instead of a five because it does go a little overboard with the fantasy element, but not enough to distract you from the fighting, and believe me, there's a lot of it.
This film is a real giggle. When I watch it, I feel as though I am witnessing some extravagent daydream by an imaginative pre-teen. The effects are really over-the-top, & the things I found most humorous about it were probably not intended as such. Nevertheless, I have watched it several times and I find it very appealing on some level. Jet Li is really sort of wasted in this flick, because so much of it is "magic" & "super secret final techniques" that his real martial arts ability is not truly showcased. One feels that anyone else could have played the part... kind of like finding the special gismo that turns ordinary kids into Power Rangers. Still, it is worth having this film in your collection, especially if your funny bone is tickled by the weird and offbeat.
I stumbled over this movie on a movie channel in a hotel in Bali, at about 3 o'clock in the morning, and I watched the whole thing.Crazy kung-fu story, over the top acting and more Matrix-like action sequences than you can shake a big stick at. The plot may be hard to follow, but if you want plot, watch Meryl Streep. This movie is about kicking ass, and believe me, everyones ass gets kicked. Different fighting styles satisfy the amateur kung-fu-ist, and the over the top wire movements make this seem more like a live action manga.If only the ladies in this film had agreed to nudity, it would get five stars. Oh, well....Seriously, one of the best in the genre.
This DVD is aimed at die-hard Evangelion fans. It also coincides with preproduction of the live-action movie. Evangelion is the Holy Grail of anime TV series.One of the cool things about this DVD is it includes the original episodes and the new versions. Of course, fans will already have the originals, but it's a neat feature.No, there are no previews of the live-action movie, just a Q&A with two production guys from "The Lord of the Rings." They're "really honored to work on this project." You get the idea.Check out: www.shoyustuff.com for more.
After first watching this movie years ago I thought just another John Wayne "B" movie. The more I watched it, the more I realize it was a very good story and very well acted.
Boehme's `Way to Christ' is a contemplative work that can be read as a meditation. He originated the Myth of the Ungrund, but Boehme placed the entire myth under God's control. His work on the Ungrund led to Berdyaev's existential view of God and was foundational for the meonic nothingness found in Berdyaev. `The Way to Christ' might be hard for modern readers to connect with, but if readers take the time to soak in the word, it can add to a person's spiritual journey. The language will not always be obvious or understandable, but Boehm wrote in a context that was very different from 21st century Westerners.
Several vignettes of various lives taken from a seemingly magical summer eve in a masterfully described Finland countryside. This ain't no ordinary prose! While reading this book, I experienced emotions usually felt while listening to my favorite music, looking at a desert sunset or drinking a fine nut-brown ale. The words jump off the page, straight into your mind and create the most vivid, colourful images imaginable. Track down a copy of this book, it's definately a masterpiece!
Sure its a more expensive product, compared to other comparable, or supposedly comparable products, however, you get what you pay for. In this era of mass everything and relatively shoddy quality it is good to see that Samsung, at least from my experience, walks the talk in product quality.Very good viewing, very good set up, no problems, no drama, ahhhhhh, the price of luxury i guess!
Dear Mr. Dixon,Hi, I'm a big, big fan of yours. I just absolutely loved your Flying Express book. It was great when Frank was pushed overboard and had to hang over the the blades for thirty seconds when his hands were really wet. Whew! It was a surprise when you found out Big Malarky, who seemed like a good man (But really wasn't) turned out to be behind the whole scam. I liked how Chet was turning into an Astrologer every time he met the Hardy Boys. I also liked how Zig who was the gangleader, liked Astrology, just like Chet. My favorite part was when the Hardy's found they're boat and Skee didn't know it belonged to them and let them test drive it but he ended up being arrested on the dock. I just wanted to congratulate you on this book and hope you keep on writing more fantastic books.Your fan,(***)
If you're a comics buff who's only into superheros or manga or whatever popular subjects featured in mainstream comics, this book is probably not for you, regardless of the glowing reviews here. Otherwise ... read on.I utterly enjoyed the book. The story is so intense, yet the illustration is minimalistic and poetic. Because of the frugal use of text, I had to revisit some pages just to interpret what exactly happened. But I'm telling you - less is more! The book has the rare quality and artistic appeal of a Criterion Collection classic film. It also reminded me of Art Spiegelman's Maus. If Maus has been studied in schools, Hey Wait should be, too. I hope, through word of mouth, this book as well as others by Jason will get more attention in the States.
I am puzzled by the acidity of the review by "J Onyx", who contrasts the supposedly unscholarly and "Marxist" authors of this collection with the scholarly "gentleman" Robert Bremner, who wrote various works on the history of American Philanthropy. J Onyx even speculates that these historians waited until Professor Bremner was gone before they published their writings.I was one of Professor Bremner's graduate students at Ohio State and assisted him with his revision of his classic work American Philanthropy. Bob Bremner was indeed a gentleman, and he treated other scholars with an irenic spirit even when he disagreed with them. It is impossible for me to imagine Bob Bremner being so uncharitable of other scholars as J Onyx, or engaging in such an acerbic and inaccurate misrepresentation of a work.This is an important collection of well-researched essays. Anybody interested in the role of philanthropy in American history must begin with this volume.
this stuff has really extended the life of my skate shoes... and it also has worked to repair some old slippers that had come apart. this is great buy for any skater for sure.
This is a good product if you have shoes that are worn at the heel but are otherwise still in pretty good condition. Instead of throwing them away and buying a new pair, this will save you money by rebuilding the worn heels and other areas. You can get some more mileage out of the shoe. Be sure to apply in a well ventilated area because the goo stinks, but it's okay once it dries.
This is a terrific item to keep just about any sensible shoe and sandal bottom from wearing out too quickly. I've had great success with it.Unless you are going to doctor-up a lot of needy shoes, athletic ones in particular, at one time, buy the smaller Shoe Goo size. Shoe Goo stored over an extended period of time loses most of its potency.
Great product! When my sneakers start to lose their soles, I reach for the Shoe Goo. Makes a permanent repair that stays flexible. Saves me from buying an expensive new pair of sneaks.
I bought this goo for my son to repair his skating shoes; his shoes get damaged quite often. He used it to repair one pair and it did its job!!! He's happy!
this is a specific use product that I have used for over 20 years. Unfortunatly I cannot seem to find it in the original BLACK color. Shoe Goo still performs as it did in the black color but I do not care for the clear.
My son, who is a skater, needed something to repair his favorite skate shoes, duct tape just didn't look good! He saw a video recommending Shoo Goo, it sounded like just the thing we needed to fix his shoes, so we tried it. It worked great, but I wish that I had chosen the clear, as I chose black and the result was less than I expected. I will definitely buy this product again, but I will choose clear instead of black!
My entire family has used this product since the seventies, and it is JUST AS GREAT as it originally was. You can repair shoe soles for your favorite running shoes, slippers, any rubber-soled shoes. You can put rubber on the bottoms of walking canes for stage, real life, etc. This is like rubber cement repair, only one hundred times better. Do you get the picture?
Shoe Goo works great. The bottom of my tennis shoe was peeling. I applied some shoe goo and glued the sole back on and let it dry 24 hours. Next day the tennis shoe was good. Shoe Goo really works! For the size, I should buy a smaller Shoe Goo.
I bought this for my daughter as a gift, but when it arrived, I had a hard time parting with it!I especially enjoyed all the history in the book, very facinating, and have made quite a few recipes from it, all turning out wonderfully.Beautiful coffee table book as well.
Very nicely constructed, and the service from the seller was truly rare in it's excellence and personally professionaly touch.The zafu was a tiny bit smaller than I expected, but it was exactly what it should have been. It was my expectation that was off. Great item.
I watched this film on a cold saturday night with my 90 year-old grandfather by a warming fire and we were both entranced. After only having seen Love-Hewitt playing teeny boppers and angst-ridden soap stars, this was a refreshign and well-deserved change. She took on the mammoth task of playing one of the world's finest and best know stars graciously and played it to her ability. The most moving parts were her childhood. Frances fisher brought her usual grace and dignity to the part of Audrey's mother and complemented Love-Hewitt perfectly. All in all, a perfect rainy day film and a typical chick-flick!
I thought that honoring Audrey Hepburn was a wonderful idea and ever since I found out about the special, I had wanted to see it. Although, in the beginning, I did not particularly like Hewitt's interpretation of Audrey, after I watched it a few more times, her performance grew on me. I now find myself watching the tape weekend after weekend, hanging on her every word, waiting to see what happens next.(even though I have it memorized.) The story is amazing with all the different love struggles that she goes through. My favorite moments are all her proposals and break ups. I think that anyone who likes a good Romantic flick would love this movie. It is definately worth the watching.
I learned a lot about Audrey Hepburn's childhood that I had never realized before. Beginning in WWII brought the story home and made it real.
I found this film and especially the performance of its lead actor Hewett to be absolutely enchanting. Born in 1960, I grew up with an awareness of Audrey Hepburn, but this TV tribute truly introduced me to the magic of the star. I commend Jennifer Love Hewitt on her performance and thank her for reacquinting me with Audrey. I've recently ordered 8 of the classic Hepburn movies so that I might truly experience the beautiful actress and fascinating culture of her days (and, later, mine). For me, this film accomplished its likely objective: I have come to appreciate Audrey Hepburn in a much greater way. Well done. Buy the video and avoid the commercials on the TV.
Jennifer did a good job portraying the beautiful and legendary Audrey, but again she is no Audrey Hepburn. I enjoyed the story very much and was able to get passed the fact that the resemblance or voice was not exactly like Audrey's. I do recommend it for the story itself, which was heartwarming, but if you are expecting to see an exact duplicate of Audrey, then rent some of Audrey's old films. .
This is just such a classic album. Aloe Blacc finds the right mix of electro-funk and classic hip-hop to make an album diverse in sound. Highly recommended from a hip-hop head.
but doesn't necessarily shed new light on them. The first difficulty is Mr. Douglas's massive ego. The second problem is that, regardless of how unbiased he thinks he is, he cannot look at these cases with a fresh eye. I found myself disagreeing with almost all of his "most likely" suspects and felt that he disregarded relevant information because it didn't fit his theories. I do think that if Mr. Douglas had profiled these cases with no preconceived notions, the outcome would have been significantly different.The book is an interesting look at several famous cases, but don't expect to know whodunit when you finish this book.
A very good book, hard to put down. I was hoping Mr. Douglas was going to tell us the who-dun-it in each case, but most of the cases are very old, and instead, he told us how he would have handled them with today's technology and personality profiling. Still, very interesting.
This book has informed me of things I have never known. I watch a lot of crime shows but Mark and John go behind the scenes and explain how the actual process works. The difficulties of solving a crime and making sure you have the right person. Very interesting read. Could not put it down.
If you're looking for good insights on criminal behaviour, this is it. I liked it and learned a few things I hadn't already explored.
I like true-crime analysis and the older cases were interesting....Details were given and opinions were explored as were possible suspects. I felt sorry for Charles Lindbergh and his wife. The Ramsey case still baffles me and the "police procedures gone wrong" is a scary thought... It made me wonder if a lot of the killers had actually really died or if they are still lurking out there wanting to kill again.
i thought this book had alot of info on the crimes and suspects. i didn't necessarily agree with the author's input on the jon benet ramsey murder but it's still a good read. this book makes you want to protect your children more ;)
This is a great book that any person interested in psychology should have. I know detectives and psychologists who delight in the interesting way that Douglas makes the wisdom of the FBI available to readers. The United States has spent millions of dollars in researching the psychology of criminal behavior, so it should be of no surprize that so much quality information exists. Douglas and Olshaker are doing an excellent job at disseminating this information in a fascinating way. Researchers in other human behaviors should take note of the massive work done by the United States into the criminal mind.
One of the best books I've ever read and everyone should read it to clear up any misconceptions they have regarding any of the cases mentioned in the book. I refer to it often when one of the cases pops back into the news or I hear a new theory regarding any of the cases.
Interesting investigations into the most famous crimes of the past centurys up until recently. The author analyzes, investigates and tells us about the victims of the most popular and notorious murder cases. Some of the cases he investigates are the jon benet ramsey murder, the lindbergh baby kidnapping, the zodiac killer and more. Tons of interesting info and a highly enjoyable read. 4 stars/ good for anyone interested in crime/murder investigations.
This album was originally relased on Virgin records about 1976 and it was playing all over London for about a year. Delroy was working as Bob Marley's road manager at the time. The backing band ISUS consisted of the solid drum and bass from what later became ASWAD. First time I ever went into a studio in London - I was 16 and it was with Delroy who was recording with The Cimmarons a song called "Walking Down Lonely Street" :o) - that was 30 years ago! Anyway - I just ordered this and it's worth it for the first track alone called "Jah Wonderful" - a tune that stuck in my head to this day. Delroy! Those were the days!
This battery pack has a USB port that I can confirm works with the iPhone 3G.The battery is a 1200 mAh NiMH battery that should just about charge an iPhone 3G from 0% to 100%.
The stones are a bit small, and not as colorful as the picture, but the necklace is beautiful and well made. Interesting clasp with a non-rolling chain. Nice.
For someone who likes smooth chill out music with an equal amount of sexy R&B and smooth hook laden pop this is a must own single to add to your collection.
This song has the whole package. It's catchy, fun and infectious. The type of song that everyone is listening to. Cassie definately has enough potential to go far in the music industry.
I first heard this song in my car on the radio and it was the smooth whistle melody and sythesized bass that caught my attention the most. It's one of those songs that you want to turn up your bass and just sit back and relax to. The vocals are are nothing special, but the instrumental alone is what gives this song its unique vibe. I'm excited to see what the rest of the album offers.
This book was advertised as used. I don't know what they used it for but it had never been opened. I'm finding it to be very useful as a guide on how to fully use a table saw. The drawing are excellent and the jigs that I've made so far actually work.
YOU WILL REALLY ENJOY "ACOUSTIC JOURNEY". IT TAKES YOU ON A MUSICAL TRIP TO DIVERSE PLACES AROUND THE WORLD AND DELIVERS A MASTERFUL INTERPRETATION OF EACH WORK AS THOUGH IT WERE HIS OWN. MY FAVORITE TUNE ON THE CD IS "BLUE CHILI" AND DIMITRI'S TANGO. "BLUE CHILI" IS LIKE A SLOW BLUES JAM WITH SOME JAZZY STUFF THROWN IN AS WELL AS SOME ROCK N ROLL RIFFS. "TANGO EN PARAISO" IS A WONDERFUL TROPICAL GROOVE THAT MAKES ME WANT TO ORDER A PINA COLADA AND SIT OUT BY THE POOL. I HIGHLY RECOMMEND THIS CD TO ANYONE WHO JUST DIGS GOOD MUSIC.
What is it anyways? I think the entire premise of this book is based on the history of the concept of secularism and all the definitions associated with it. Because of his legal background, Feldman draws together the cases that have helped shape America's face with the history behind the cases. It is very interesting to see how America's idea of secularism has changed and why. This book is well complimented by Stark and Finke's "Acts of Faith" and "Habits of the Heart" by Bella et all.
I found the video results from this camera outstanding; clear and crisp with perfect color. I also found this camera easier to load tape and battery than my old Hitachi Hi-8. However, I find using the controls of this camera somewhat difficult and cumbersome. If you can't afford a Sony Digital Hi-8 camera, I suggest this JVC compact camcorder. With Super VHS-C tape in the camera and Super VHS tape in the JVC VHS recorder, for the price, you can't go wrong.
This dress is a super cute style & shipped pretty quickly; but I had to exchange it for a smaller size. I went by my 53" bust, so got the 5x, based on the size/measurement chart. Thought that seemed big, even for a Junior's dress; and sure enough, i just stepped into it without unzipping it, and it was HUGE, falling off of me. The top runs about 3" bigger than the sizing/measurement chart indicates. Just wanted people to have a better idea of what size to order.
We really loved the dresses. They were so affordable and they arrived right away. We did have to return two of them for smaller sizes because i think they run a little big but even the exchange process was painless and we had the new sizes within a week and a half. I would definitely buy from them again.
I loved the dress! Ive orderd the dress on two seperate times. The first time I orderd it was to see about the sizes, because I read in the reviews that some people felt it was too big/small. I found that the dress really runs true-to-size. Then I orderd the rest of the dresses for my bridesmaids. The dress is made really well, and will hold up. You dont have to worry about it loosing its shape on the bust area because it has parallel stays. Also it is fitted thru the natural natural waist, so again we didnt worry about the other measurments. Honestly I have seen the dress in bridal stores for twice the price, and im glad that I didnt pay the extra price!! The shipping from PacifiPlex was awesome as well. It tells you to expect it in a week or so, and both times it has shown up in under three days!
Dresses are very nicely made and for the most part fit good. Read reviews about them running big. This is helpful. I actually had to return and reorder twice but it was very easy and they are very fast! I will submit picture after our event! Thanks! Amazon is great!
So it should be noted that this is a JUNIOR dress, so the sizing is junior sizing. If you are not a junior, you may need to size up. I ordered a Large and it was too small, so I ordered an XL and it is too big. SO sad because this really is a beautiful dress!! It is well made, and the style is lovely! It comes with a satin shawl. There is some boning in the bodice which helps it to keep its shape.
i want 5 of these dresses with a white sash but in liliac i really love the dress pl.us i will be getting married in 5 months!!! this dress took my eyes away it wiuld mean soo much to me if you had more than 1 dress.if you did i would be the HAPPIEST WOMAN IN THE WORLD. THIS DRESS IS THE COLOR I WANT AND THE STYLE AND ITS "FREAKY FABLOUS" I LOVE IT TO DEATH!!!SIGNED,ALEXANDRA WILLIAMS
I received the dress in 3 business days. For me, the dress is true to size and a VERY flattering cut. The only thing I have to do is get the sides taken in a notch at the bust line. The fabric quality is great. I'm 5'4 and the dress comes down to mid-shin for me. I love that it comes with detachable spaghetti straps and a shoulder wrap. I'll be wearing this to a company party....but I know that I will wear it again! I'm glad I got this.
The dress was very well made I can not complain about that at all. I knew it was not going to fit when I purchased it based on previous reviews so I expected alterations. But with the money you save the 30 dollars to adjust is nothing.
Its a very beautiful little brown dress. My only problem is I'm a busty gal, and it doesn't zip all the way in the back, but it fits everywhere else. That's a "my body" problem more than a manufacturer problem. Bigger chested women keep that in mind!
I love these dresses on my bridesmaids! They really like them too. If you want the straps on them you have to sew them in. Not a huge deal but I thought they would have hooks to attach them to.
Big thank you to the seller for a very beautiful bridesmaids dresses! The price was reasonable, delivery very quick and customer service was excellent. My bridesmaids will look absolutely beautiful in those dresses next spring at my wedding!
I along with 3 other bridesmaids purchased this dress last summer for my best friends wedding. It looked great on different body types and you can't beat the price. We ALL went a SIZE UP in the dresses. Which is different than some reviewers said. I thought the measurements were accurate but their related size was too big ie. a small should really be called an extra small etc. Even still, I love these dresses so much I think I am going to use them (in different colors of course) for my own wedding!
I bought this dress in royal blue at a little shop in the mall for $90. I had a TON of compliments on it during the wedding and felt like I looked great. Because of the boning in the top and flare out bottom, I didn't feel like I needed any kind of girdle or nylons to control my tummy or rear. I just found this dress an Amazon for $40 cheaper and I since I already know how great it is, I am going to buy it again in black for another wedding I am in later this year! TIP: I would recommend buying one size down from the size suggested on the sizing chart. According to my measurements, I should wear an XL but the L fit me just perfectly with a 38" bust and 31" waist.
The dress is for my bridesmaids and the style is perfect for a back yard wedding. The satin look doesn't make it look cheap. And the price fits in the budget of all bridesmaids; some in college, just bought a house or have multiple people in my bridal party. I had been looking at some Alfred Angelo dresses in the 148-190 price range.There is only one minor set back. For my wedding design I wanted to replace the bow and ribbon with one of another color and there is no easy wash of removing just that ribbon, it's sewn in through all layers around the zipper. But we found a solution without taking the whole dress apart. We are going to attach the new ribbon to the one already there in the back. (Just in case someone else has the same idea).Overall very worth it!!!!!
It is a very lovely dress. I just thought it was going to be a little bit longer. I'm glad it wasn't because i don't need to get it shorten.
I am very pleased with this dress. I bought it for a reception dress for my wedding in October. I was so happy when it arrived. I tried it on and the only alterations that it needs is taken-in in the bust. I have a very small chest so that was what I expected.It does have a very small snag that is on the stomach region that goes all the way around it. But I don't think its too noticeable. And for the price I can't justify complaining.
I actually ordered a 2x for my maid of honor though the size chart put her as a small 3x, and it's still a bit big. I think if she had larger breasts it would be fine though. I ordered it knowing it might be too large so I'm not really worried that I have to have it altered. The material is decent. It's certainly not as nice as what you would get for a $200 dress, but it's not anything like pleather as some people have said and it feels just fine. It's pretty much the same quality that you would expect for a $50 dress. I ordered the dress about a week ago so the delivery was pretty fast. It came the exact day that I was told to expect it. We ordered ice blue which looks almost exactly the same as the silver in the photos but it is actually blue which is what I was hoping. I found it really confusing reading so many posts about how the dress ran large and then a few saying it ran small. In my opinion is does run a bit large.
I ordered this for a Christmas Party I will be attending this year. I ordered red, but became worried it would be more of a fire engine red...it actually turned out to be a deeper color and is GORGEOUS! I am absolutely happy with it. It was delivered quickly. I put it on this morning when I received it and it fits perfectly. The only issue I have is wanting a little shape to the bottom, so I'm having a bit of tulle put on the slip so that it will bell out a bit. However, I would recommend it...I'm a pretty big girl and it fits me well and looks great! Thanks!
I looked high and low for a burnt orange bridesmaid dress with very little success unless I wanted to spend a small fortune. I stumbled upon this lovely dress in pumpkin and both I and the bride found it to be the perfect color and a great simple style. It arrived quickly and painlessly. I took the advice of the other reviewers and completely ignored their size chart. I'm normally a size small top, so that's what I ordered, though my actual measurements are a bit larger than the size small on the chart. The dress fits great and stays up because of the boning. I've seen many of the designer dresses in person and most really aren't made any better or of better materials than this one. It's an amazing value for your money. The only thing that would improve this dress is a lining, though that would drive up the cost. I would highly recommend this dress for bridesmaids. So cute and easy on the wallet, plus it comes in a ton of great colors.
I bought this delightful book for my wife, who planned to pass it along to a group of her friends who share special books among themselves. It was so good, I read it myself! And I found it to be spiritually uplifting. Highly recommended!
There's some very well mixed music on these lovely 3 CDs, and as an avid HH fan I'm in love. Dougal and Gammer (disc 2) are almost overkill in how amazing they are on this CD, it's a total pleasure to listen to hour after hour. It's on loop and I don't realize for the longest time, I'm enjoying it so much.For the beginner getting into happy hardcore, this CD is your gateway.
The word of God set to music. An inspirational message in every song. Lift your spirits.
I recomend everybody to purchase this film. I am admirer of these both great english actors. The movie is full of surprises that take place in a aristocratic english cottage. An amazing garden full of statues is were the movie begin. Inside the cottage there is a world of fantasy with puppets moving everywhere, that seem watch impassive the duel between the two only characters of the film. I do not miss any other actor in the movie, they both are enough. Only great actors as them can get it. John Addison's score is as elegant and playful as the film requires.
The Bottom Line:A fine showcase of actors at the top of their games and a clever mystery, Sleuth is a little long but a fantastically enjoyable movie: rent it!
The film is brilliant -- sets, acting, script are all superb. It's interesting, intelligent, visually beautiful, and creates genuine tension. How wonderful -- a thriller without gore!The DVD is done on the cheap. No bonus materials. The opening credits -- despite this being a 'widescreen' edition -- run off the sides of the screen. The 'matting' is uneven: the black strip below the picture on the screen is thicker on the left side than on the right. And, oddly (because it's over 2 hours long?), you have to turn the DVD over midway through.Glad this wonderful title is available, but a big slap on the wrist to the cheap producer and the sloppy engineer.
Sleuth is a 2 person movie with Sir Lawrence Olivier, and Michael Caine that treats the viewer to a twisting story of ingrigue and humor and suspense, a cat n mouse drama that is well worth owning
Just exactly what we were looking for, the fact that this item can be moved to size I am 100% pleased. This got the job done
The other reviews are good. Trouble right now is that the DVD is becoming unavailable. This import is spoken in English, don't worry, and subtitles can be turned off. It's the full wide screen. The end credits are cut short before the music stops, which spoils that mood, but not "in the middle of the credits". There's a bit of nudity with Rees.The title may mislead people into thinking it's a cheap gore film. No, it's a literate masterpiece, and based on a serious novel.
This 1984 release is very interesting since they recorded all tracks in 10 days straight without any overdubs. The title track, Continental Way, Twilight Solitude are the highlights of this album. Here's the tracklist:1 Zoom2 Down Upbeat3 The Continental Way4 Road Rhythm5 Froufrou6 Home Stretch7 Night Storm8 Cookin'up9 Twilight Solitude10 Air Fantasy
Joel Fotinos, a VP at Penguin Group, narrates this fine audiobook offering the blueprint for Napoleon Hill's wealth strategy to listeners who would understand 'cosmic habitforce', sharing wealth, and more. It's an outstanding guide to wealth-building and riches and is especially lively in audio format, perfect for listening in the car and for any lending library general or business!
I FIND MYSELF SENDING HIS BOOKS TO YOUNG PEOPLE FINDING JOBS AND CAREERS...CHALLENGING THEM IN PRESENT ECONOMY. SO MANY THANK ME FOR SHARING HISMESSAGE.
Get it, read it, listen to it, get into your brain and heart and start to implement the things that are there. It will change your life.
Needed to add a front license plate following my relocation to Texas. This little item solved the problem. Installation was less than five minutes.
Perhaps the Beautiful South's best-known collection of tunes, "0898" carries their signature stylings of rhythm, melody, and groove. From classics heard everywhere on the radio like "Old Red Eyes Is Back" to the more eclectic "We Are Each Other," this album lets listeners slide in and enjoy some great music while the catchy and poignant lyrics beat a path through their brains. "0898" is a wonderful CD to pop in on road trips, on lazy summer afternoons, or after a long day on the job--it will soothe your frazzled nerves and let your mind wander through landscapes of vivid imagery and imagination. Check out their other work for even more entertainment and endearment...you'll be hooked! =) Simply put, this album is BEAUTIFUL!
Today I bought this cd again, since I only had it on tape, and it broke the other day. I never cease to be amazed by the genius of this album, everything feels right about, and such a richness of sounds.. it will probably never show up in official lists with "top 100 of all time", but it has made and will stay my number one.. its great for in the car, when exercising, at home.. everywhere, sheer bliss
Stride Rite's are good shoes and these are priced so low. I don't know why and I won't ask. When I got them, they were nice (looked just like the picture) with a square toe. The size is right on, they are cushy inside, and the bottom is not slippery. My toddler likes wearing them even when he does not have too.
I bought "Buddy Guy & Junior Wells Play the Blues abum" when it first hit the rack.Then again about a month ago. It had the same effect as it did back then...I put it in the cd player, sat down and didn't get up until I'd heard every song on the cd.It is Buddy Guy and Junior at their very best.Rickey Noel Mitchell
Ireally enjoy this CD. What stands out for me, is you start out in New Orleans and start traveling thru Georgia on up to St.Louis and Chicago. All kinds of blues is represented.Buddy Guy and Junior Wells really work well together.
Browse through favorite childhood toys and learn just how much they're worth now in the new twelth edition offering the latest updates in what is justifiably considered to be the toy bible for serious collectors and antique dealers -- Toys & Prices 2005. While small black and white photos and a sampling of color photos are included, the meat of Toys & Prices 2005 lie in alphabetically arranged listings organized into 23 main categories, from games and lunch boxes to space toys and more. Three price ranges reflect different condition ratings: especially valuable considering it's a medium which typically is difficult to preserve from young players.
This is a good book for those into magick and how to work with the Moon. Easy to follow spells
Lots of information I refer back to it often! Really like this book a lot, has become one of my favorites.
I really love this book. I began reading it the first day I got it. I am happy I purchased the book, because this gives me a great explanation on when and when not to perform spells. This has everything I was looking for. I wish this was a larger hardback book with more illustrations of the moon's phases. I use this book in combination with other spell books. I would recommend this to all who are new to crafting. I hope to find more books similar to this.
I bought these mallets as toys for my toddlers to bang on their drum set. I reduced one star because the plastic round part of the mallet may pop off and could be a choking hazard. It can easily be fixed and I really think they're okay to give the kids as long as your watching them (or your kids have matured enough to know not to put the plastic in their mouths). Given that toddlers have a knack for breaking things and/or losing things, I think these were worth buying.
Watching this film, your heart aches because there's so much talent on display here that never got to work together at this length on film again, and you have a sudden sense of how much richer the golden age of Hollywood musicals could have been had African-Americans been given their due .... Anyhow, like everyone else I'm wowed especially by Lena Horne and by the Nicholas Brothers dance sequence. The latter is probably the single most amazing physical achievement in dance ever - you'll see it, not believe what you just saw, and then you'll be irresistably driven to show it to other people. Which is only fair; nobody should die without having seen this!
The connecting thread to this review of African-American entertainment spanning the World Wars is the reminisces of hoofer Bill Williamson(Bill Robinson). This is just a light-hearted pretense to show the rich tapestry that was the African-American contribution to our collective culture. And what a great gathering of contributors here! Robinson, Lena Horne, Cab Calloway, Fats Waller, the Nicholas Brothers, etc. Everybody's at the top of their game in full knowledge that the opportunity to strut their stuff in a major Hollywood production wouldn't be afforded very often. The performances are infectuously joyful betraying the pain many probably felt at being discriminated against. I approached this film initially as a sociological experience and at some point I was sucked into the fun of it all.
My parents used to rave about this film, about Lena Horne and the title song which became her signature tune. Finally I've caught up with it and the wait was worthwhile. This 1943 film has been beautifully restored and the soundtrack is clean as a whistle. I have never seen Fats Waller perform a whole song before let alone two. We see Cab Calloway in his prime, younger audiences catching up with him years later in "The Blues Brothers". The dancing by the original "Mr Bojangles", the Nicholas Brothers and the renowned Katherine Dunham Dance Troupe is beathtaking. Lena Horne is beautiful and her gowns accentuate her beauty. It is highly recommended but I must register a feeling of sadness seeing an all-black cast movie which was they way they had to go back then - some of the stage performers even having to wear blackface on top of their natural complexion.
As a young man watching this movie, it instilled in me a since of pride and dignity knowing the challenges of that era did not stop the greatness that is now forever preserved on dvd. I'd have to agree with the great Gregory Hines who was known for this statment: "The best tap dance number on film...the Nicholas Brothers and the big white staircase". These brothers stole the show for me. Get it for your library.
This film was a showcase for black song-and-dance entertainers from the first half of the 20th century. The plot, such as it was, was thin and simply involved a romance between Lena Horne and Bill `Bojangles' Robinson. Released by 20th Century Fox in 1943, it was in black-and-white. We also had Thomas `Fats' Waller singing and playing his own `Ain't misbehavin'', Cab Calloway with his orchestra doing his frenetic thing with `Geechy Joe' and `Rhythm cocktail', some acrobatic dancing from the Nicholas Brothers, and a full supporting cast of other singers and dancers. Dooley Wilson also appeared but he wasn't given anything to sing or play. The high spot of the film was Lena Horne's singing of the title track by Harold Arlen and Ted Koehler, who also had a hand in the screenplay. An enjoyable 80 min of entertainment.
I saw this on Netflix before buying it for my Dad. He plays the trumpet and loves jazz and standards. This film has some great scenes in it and is very upbeat.
How could you not love this movie? It has Lena Horne, and Cab Calloway just to name a few amazing artists. The music numbers blend seamlessly with the story line. This is a star studded cast of anyone that was anyone back in the day. Incredible, I still love it to this day. I have seen it more times than I can count. It is neat to see all of my favorite people back when they were young. Way cool.
This is another one of those old movies that I had to watch more than once to appreciate. This is largely because of the singing and dancing in the film. At times it was too much and at times it was awesome. Before watching this film I'd never seen Cab Calloway perform or watched a whole film with Lena Horne in it. Both entertainers did a great job. If you're interested in classy entertainment from early black actors this is the film to watch.
To say it was made in the forties, I think that it is an excelent musical, and one of the better ones even if the story line is medioca. the music and thesongs are terrific. G.Jackson.
I purchased the streaming version of this TV Movie. Historally, it's pretty accurate as TV Movies go. The problem is that the streaming from Amazon Instant Video is pretty choppy. There's a studder about every two minutes or so that makes it pretty distracting. Amazon needs to work on the video of this movie. But for $3.95, what can one expect.
History & military enthusiasts will enjoy this film. However, the recreation of Patton's car "accident" does not match up with the facts known about the actual events and "accident" scene. Recent evidence and witness testimony suggests the car crash was a pre-meditated act to assassinate Patton and that a major cover-up of the potential crime scene occurred after the event. The truth behind Patton's demise remains to be fully told and this film leaves out some of those facts. Patton's legacy deserves better.
George C. Scott reprises his role as Patton in the 2nd part of the movie "Patton" It picks up where the movie left off, with the end of WWII to the tragic car accident that left Patton paralyzed. Eva Marie Saint climbs aboard as Mrs. Patton. Beautifully done!
Ladislas Farago wrote the definitive biography of General George S. Patton back in the 70's.... which was the book upon which the film with George C. Scott was based. Even though Patton is a little older, fatter and wiser in this film, it still coveys the historical accuracy of the general's final days. Scott's portrayal of Patton has lost none of its personality and deserves its rightful place as volume two of the Patton story.
If you liked Patton, then you will need to get this DVD to show how his remarkable life ended. A great addition to your WWII collection.
This tape can be the key to opening up a whole new happy life for anyone who wants it. That is exactly what it did for me when I learned the Option Method 17 years ago. On this great intro to the Option Method, Bruce DiMarsico dispells the mystique around unhappiness by exposing the notion that the experience of unhappiness is always based on what someone believes... often erroneously. Questioning the belief(or judgement or assumption) can effectively vaporize the unhappy conclussion. Hearing one of Bruce's original lectures on Option rekindles the fire in me to spread the word to other happiness-seekers. Do yourself a favor... get this tape and let yourself out of YOUR prison of unhappiness. If I can do it, anyone can!
Option method is truly a way of putting thought into feelings. I think it basically encourages to think before we commit to certain idea, and ideas lead to beliefs, beliefs lead to feelings and emotions. Option method is a way to pause, think and take a rational decision, which would most possibly lead to better emotions and therefore happier life.Bruce di marsico says that happiness is an option, and we have to choose it, by thinking through what lead to unhappiness. There are however, certain things which we have to feel unhappy, and are un avoidable.This is similar to cognitive therapy, where mood disorders, depressions, anxiety are treated by changing our feelings by rational and positive thinking. I would recommend Mind over mood, if you like this video by bruce di marsico.This is just my opinion, and I like any comments or suggestions, because I am still learning.
This timeless tape is filled with humor, wisdom and wonderful liberating questions to help you get to the real cause of your emotional pain and self-limitation. I had the life-changing privilege of studying with this inspiring teacher in the early 1970's, followed by the joy of teaching others how to change their unhappy belief systems for over 30 years. I cannot imagine what my life would be like had I not had that opportunity, so I am especially glad that everyone can now hear these simple, powerful ideas from the man who originated the Option Method, himself, Bruce Di Marsico.
Well this cd had some dissapointments, One was the tacky Techno songs. Yes I know this cd was arranged this way, but some just go too far with it. The "Shop" song though is a good take on it. Changing it into a neat jazzy song. Last Battle, and Zeldas Theme arn't too bad either. Anyway to make a long story short, If you arn't a big fan of techno (like myself), but want to own this, go ahead. Just a warning you might be dissapointed.
I thoguht this book was OK but could've been better. It has an exiting plot wiht a hunter trying to hunt the gator[dajun] but the ending is so typical. They end up finding...oops I shouldn't give away the story...but the book's ending is not as fun as it could've been. But if you love animals and a good mystery you should definitly read this book.
FOR THREE NIGHTS BEFORE I WENT TO BED MY MOM READ THE BOOK TO ME. AT THE END I WANTED TO HEAR MORE. DONNA
I just finished reading this wonderful book about the Northern European myths that Tolkien borrowed and reshaped to make the lands, people, and languages of Middle-earth come alive. For the price and content, this is a great value. I highly recommend it to anyone interested in Tolkien's fiction!"
I love:--The 1950s--Movies that are so bad that they're good--Teenage monsters that are 14 years older than their mothers--Boston Cream PieI didn't have any Boston Cream Pie during the movie so I took away one star--otherwise I have to say it's one of the best Teenage Monster films EVER!
This is the first of 5 albums from the band Dune. Some of theirother titles include remakes of "Nothing compares to you"and "Who wants to live forever"
I received only 1 canvas, even though it says it's a pack of 6. The 1 canvas I did get was great and I already painted on it. I had to chat w/ customer service and they advised they would resend me the order 1 day shipping, but then I looked at the delivery estimate and I won't get it until 9/18/12- 10/5/12, which is pointless. I just read all the other reviews and this seems to be a common occurrence.
The item came in record time and in perfect condition. This was the second time that I have ordered this item and I will reorder it again in the future possibly in a different size.
I was having a painting party for my daughter's 12th birthday party and wanted the kids to have something nice to take home with them, but the cost of canvases can really add up!! I found these canvases for a great price and they were perfect for the purpose for which they were used. I'm not an artist myself, so I don't know much about the quality of canvases, but these definitely met our needs and the girls had a ball!
If you liked Salvador's" Chambre Avec Vue" you will love this. If you don't know Salvador imagine a male combination of Astrud Gilberto, Blossom Dearie, and Jane Birkin. I dont know of a male contender for his soft minimal jazz voice except perhaps Jo Gilberto. The song selection is all French ballads, played and sung with a quiet jazz, simple, sort of bossa nova delivery. No French marching songs, clever novelty songs, or over-the -top Piaf theatrics; strictly light, fresh, crisp and airy as a nice bottle of Chablis. Romantic music, not especially for having sex, more for sitting beside your lover and listening. During the week of the recent bombings in America I listened to this CD almost constantly. It was very reassuring that, yes, there is beauty and love in the world.
.....smooth/propulsive/bleep/clever/dark/European/techno/Jarre/Depeche/Visage/Kraftwerk/Moroder/Gorl/Anne Clark/N-Joi/Nitzer Ebb/Skinny Puppy/historical?/Germanic/dancing/Black & White/Art Deco/Man Ray/Arts & Crafts/clean/Frank DeWulf/alien/hypnotic/erotic/invigorating/Orbital/Simian Mobile Disco/IAMX/Sneaker Pimps/disco/futuristic/dada. What more could you ask from a bit of music. This disc is destined to be a classic - at least for me. It will sit in amongst the cd's that I even now listen to on a regular basis from many different decades.Classics never age.
This story is not for the faint at heart. Once you start reading it, there is no way you can put it down. The writing was straightforward. My only wish is that the family that was written about would have been more caring about the lives of their children. How can we let our kids down? The world will never know.
I love this album and I love Laura Shay!! This album takes me back to 2006 when I was young and in love..this album is my soundtrack for that year! Whenever I listen to a song I get goosebumps as I'm reminded of those sweet times!! I highly recommend this not because I have so many fond memories but because it is a beautiful work of art. The lyrics, the music, it is one word which is amazing.
I bought this book because I loved Rose's Bread Bible and I wanted to make really good pies and pastries. Before using this book I had not had a lot of experience making pies, I had made a couple apple pies and pumpkin pies, but they were all kind of blah. Not anymore!! Even with my little experience Rose transformed me into an awesome pie baker!! After I made my first pie from the Pie Bible, people were telling me it was the best pie they had ever had in their life! Now, I have to warn you, her pies do take a while to make. In many cases it's an all day (or multiple days) affair. However, I promise you, if you diligently follow her instructions, the results will be worth it!
Just when I thought that The Cake Bible was the ultimate culinary experience, Rose Levy Beranbaum strikes again. I just bought a copy for my mother who taught me to love and bake my own pies from scratch. She lays it all out for you, step by step, and never leaves you hanging. Not only are there wonderful decadent recipies for pies of all kinds, but also for savory breads as well. How do I feel about this book? To paraphase a famous saying -- you can have my Pastry Bible when you pry it from my cold dead fingers!
Last week I recive the Pie and Pastry Bible and I've already try out three recipes with good result. The children absolutly loves the Peanutbutter mousse pie and me and my husband hacve the pear and ginger cake as a new favourite.
I have used this book on several special occassions. I don't even have to do a trial run before I present the final dessert, because I am confident that every recipe in this book will turn out just as promised. Easy to follow instructions, and ingredients that you find at your local grocery store---what could be better! By using Rose's recipe book, I have become the automatic dessert maker in my family....especially when it comes to pies.
Good recipes, easy to follow instructions but just a few pictures. I think that an author as famous as Rose Levy should spend a little more in pictures.
The book is a real treasure to any baker: all the details, all the step-by-step, it gives confidence and explains the secrets of pastry. I just love it!
This disc consists of four different stories. While only two of them really deal with robots and are the thought provoking stories, the other two are quite watchable. They're all well written and performed. It's a short disc, so you don't get a lot of bang for your buck, but it's worth seeing if you're interested in the social aspects of artificial life.
This is the best coffee maker we've ever had. The coffee stays hot most of the day and doesn't get bitter. Everything works as described and we've had no problems at all.
This is a fictional story, but the tale might as well be real to a Taiwanese. The story starts in near Lukang when KMT soldiers steal the god from a family and he is sent to bring it back. Much of the story focuses around an American newsman stationed in Taipei and how he learns Nationalist Taiwan is not what it seems. The true story behind the fiction is that Sneider met Ed Paine, an eye witness to the 228 massacre and Paine hooked Sneider up with his interpreter. The history is fuzzy, the places are not where they should be, but the story is more an allegory of 50's Taipei with the dreaded race track and deaths. This book is now considered rare following years of KMT student spies stealing it from libraries. --not my review, but Maowang from Forumosa
Love, love, love it!!!! Would buy more CDs by Matthew West any time. Need 8 more words.....love, love, love it!
Good music, good price (cheaper than buying at the store) and arrived within a few days! My whole family likes it!
I'm a massage therapist and have lots of CD's to relax during massage and this is one of my favorites. I had the cassette and finally, many years later found this CD on Amazon and am so excited to listen to my good friend Rainforest Magic again.
When i read this book for a class project i was amazed with it when i realized it was written in 1962. I read it several times as it is not the most easy of reading , but once i did so i thought it was maybe written in the eighties with a backward-looking viewpoint. When i learned the actual date of publishing... i was stupified. Must read for any of Bucky's fans.
I listened to the CD one time with my mom and then I couldn't stop listening to it. My favorite song is Friendness!!
The Satanic Mill by Otfried Preussler is a great book to read. It is about a begger boy called Krabat who gets called to a mill in a dream. The mill is also a Black School. He met a female singer, and they both fell in love. Krabat wanted to leave the mill, but to do that the Singer (the book did not give her name) had to pick him out while he and all the other miller's men were in the form of ravens.This book is very creepy, mysrerious, and unpredictable which, I think, is great. There are several things to focus on, so it doesn't get boring. It's very nervewracking, too. All in all, it is one of the best books I have ever read. I give it a five-star rating.
Ottfried Preussler, a German WW II veteran, wrote about his book: My Krabat tells [...] my personal story, the story of my generation and the story of all young people who get in touch with power and its temptations and who become entangled."The story is based on an old wendish (west slavic) tale of which it takes over only a small part but is also a parable on totalitarian systems, how they are run by means of force and seduction and how the individuals can get away.It is interesting to see that the miller is described not only as the demonic master (which he is) but later on also as a human slave to the haunting journeyman and thus serves only as a cog in the wheel in the evil system.
I purchased this as a replacement for my E-powered MTB. I had a Gates belt before and it stretch out pretty quick. It didn't break, but the stretching bothered me. I installed this Goodyear belt and am able to push more power through the belt without me having to keep adjusting the tension.
Brunner is rightly famous for his masterpieces Stand on Zanzibar, Shockwave Rider, and the Sheep Look Up. However, his earlier pulpish sci-fi such as Polymath is actually a pretty good survival tale on a very interesting planet. Secondly, I did not find its slight disturbing nature annoying at all, perhaps since I have managed to read Sheep Look Up and tons of Philip K. Dick. Yes, Captain Gnomes is unbelievable (but are the villains in 8/9 of fiction?) however Devia and Lex are suprisingly well rounded for characters for such a brief book that probably took Brunner a few months to write. For its one hundred and fifty four or so pages its a suprisingly good read. 4/5
The taste was sensational and well liked by my guests. It tastes just like the Frango Mint Chocolates you would purchase at Marshal Fields. The price seems a little high.
I highly recommend this 1983 version of the Sherlock Holmes mystery. Richardson suits the role of Holmes very well, bringing a confidence and intellectual flare to solving the case.I can't be critical of much in this movie. I enjoyed it immensely on vhs and now, again, on dvd. It's well acted, well scripted, and well produced. I think Ian Richardson is my favourite Sherlock Holmes - although I don't think he played the role as many times as other actors. Again, he brings such confidence in his ability, that as a viewer you don't really think he's not going to solve the mystery.Thumbs up. Enjoy.
Douglas Hickox is among the few directors who have understood the mystic horror of Doyle's terrifying masterpiece. Directing a brilliant Nicholas Clay, Hickox presents the audience with the best film version of the story to date: 4 stars.
The movie was well put together, and thought out. I really liked it and they did stick fairly close to the story, but they did change a few things, and I'm not sure it was for the best. I did like it that they had the Hound and Holmes fight (that did not happen in the movie) but I didn't like it that Mrs. Lions was murdered (that didn't happen either). All in all, I'd give it four out of five stars. The acting was supurb, and I got chills just listening to the sound of the Hound . . .
This session begins with the shimmering peal of a gong, and you enter into the somber, mysterious and intense world of 1964 John Coltrane. "Love Supreme", a poem of great tonal color and emotion, hailed Coltrane's religious awakening and a new period in which he embarked on a mission to uplift people. Prior to the recording of this album, Coltrane's faith was tested by the bombing of a black church in Alabama, and the death of Eric Dolphy and the tumult of the 1960s---civil rights, change, new music, new worlds. All of Coltrane's recorded work from "Love Supreme" forward was groundbreaking on every level. This is not for listeners who are new to Coltrane, or those who wish to hear the mainstream Coltrane of the Prestige and "Blue Train" period. This is for the more serious listener seeking a different and more challenging experience with sound, and with history.
The negative reviews are from people with poor taste and poor ears. As for the review in 'trying-to-write-Ebonics' -titled "What's the hype, dog?" by some idiot from Garden City, MI United States - white guys fronting as black guys is very easily discerned by the knowing. Know that, playa-hatin' white boy!Now - to the album. This is very pure music that comes undiluted from the soul of a highly evolved and empathetic human being - who knows the depths and ecstasies of the human soul - and who has the genius to express every shade of his gigantic wisdom and understanding.You don't need to look up a jazz encyclopaedia and throw words around to understand this - people who do that are usually trying to show off because they lack soul.A healer plays these sounds - a medicine man. Coltrane is truly a Bodhisattva.
For all those seeking the ultimate jazz experience this is THE album. Man seeks for meaning by finding the beautiful aesthetic. Coletrane has helped all of us to find that moment and to think the moment was recorded. A Love Supreme stands right at the border between beauty and chaos. While many later avant garde works and even the later works of Coletrane run past that border and become difficult to listen to, A Love Supreme remains in the realm where the listener is allowed to enter the experience of the artist. A Love Supreme is the ultimate jazz album THE CLASSIC!!
John Coltrane's expressionistic existentialist masterpiece is released in a superbly remastered edition with essential additional material. This album is the turning point for Coltrane, away from his past material that was closer to hard bop and into the realms of free jazz. This was just before he picked up the atonalities that would be trademark of his later recordings but gives the listener a chance of what is to come. Spiritually rich and expressionistic, it is one jazz's greatest albums. If you own the original album, it is worth the purchase for the additional disc. Outtakes of the album with Archie Shepp included, it also has a full length concert of the only time the album was performed publicly. By this time, Coltrane had picked up the dissonance of his later albums and to some listeners will be less satisfying but for those who appreciate Coltrane in all his complexity,is well appreciated. Highly recommended.
I enjoy jazz...I'm far from thoroughly versed in the style though; I have a few key discs in my collection, that's it. A Love Supreme is one of them. A lot of good music sets a mood, but Coltrane's disc really talks...it's amazing. Where some musicians can hint at an idea, Coltrane rattles off a spiritual epic. If you're looking to add some stimulating, startling jazz to your collection (we're not talking Kenny G here...), this is your disc.
John Coltrane is at his best on this recording. Some people dislike it because they believe it is excessively serious, but to me it is deeply emotional and even joyful. It really takes an open mind (and concentration) to enjoy this CD properly, but it will more than reward the listener for the energy he expends.Musically, it would be absurd to attack this recording; the writing, improvisation, and interaction are flawless.One word of warning: If you are someone who listens to music for simple entertainment or background, this is not the CD for you. Listening to this CD in the background would be like reading yourself to sleep with James Joyce's "Ulysses".It really boils down to how you see music. Some people just don't think of music as being a deeply expressive artistic outlet, and that's fine - but they won't enjoy this CD.
All that needs to be said about "A Love Supreme" is --- BUY IT! If this disc is not in your collection, you are missing out on one of the most vital pieces of music ever recorded. No matter what your musical tastes are, I guarantee you will find something of interest in Trane's visceral and evocative performance. A classic of sheer beauty and emotion. Peace.
... I wonder how much the awesome result is due to the Rudy Van gelder re-mastering process rather than to the DSD-SACD new teach. I wonder sometimes if the music major are trying to sell us the n-th remastering and try to make us re-buy our music collection again and again. It would also be nice to compare the same re-mastering hi-rez DVD-A and DSD-SACD.BTW I am astonished how much better it is compared to my vynil (I did not buy the red-book CD waiting for a hi-rez re-issue :-) )5 stars to the music (I'd vote 6 starts if possible ...) and 5 stars to the sound
john coltrane----LONG winded---from the first "breath" of this swAn song we all know as " a love supreme"safe playing taken to exremes----maybe the best Long composition in jAzz ma tazzthe live stuff just hits hard
I'll be the first to admit I really don't know much about jazz or John Coltrane. But in search of something different I picked up this cd. It is certainly a departure from my 4/4 rock world, but I love it. It is adventurous and compelling. If you are like me and are wondering what all the fuss is about, go ahead and give this cd a spin, you'll be glad you did. There is a whole new world inside.
John Coltrane was truely ahead of his time! Vacuum tubes were still the state of the art when this album came out! Yet, the Fidelity is pretty amazing... Jimmy Garrison down-shifting on the Bass on the first cut ( "Acknowlegement" aka "Love Supreme" )with Elvin Jones and McKoy Tyner rounding things out, just Blew My Mind! If you DON'T "feel" this one, you have NO SOUL!
who said this record wasn't all that? I beg your pardon, you don't say. this record is not for a party, it's for your ears. This is pure joy. the guy that gave one star does not like jazz. listen to this late at night after your girlfriend broke up with you. this is life affirming it's hopeful it taps into all your emoticons and beyond. if i knew you i would just make you a copy but it's cheap enough. check it out when you are screwed up or to impress a lady. either way you will score.
This album may serve as an acid test - if you don't like it, you don't like jazz, and never will. The flawless interplay of the four voices in this work builds upon all that came before and anticipates all that came after. Those who don't like it - and these are few an far between - are usually aggressively drowsy conservatives who listen to Coltrane wishing listfully that his genius had not arrived on the scene to disturb the sanguine haze that was American music in the late 50's. A Love Supreme created a new musical idiom in which the depth of human sentiment could be commiunicated. A towering accomplishment.
Came as promised - in great shape - very fair price - and delightful sketches from our state's past. What else can you ask for?
A nice collection of editorials and essays written by Meek over a 50-year period from a college editorial in the 50s to current opinions of potential presidential candidates. His humor is biting and his depth of knowledge is impressive. You may not agree with them all but you WILL think about them.
I am enjoying its use. The only issue is one of manufacturing. The opening that allows for moving of the vibrate off/on control does not align with the control. It is difficult to move the control. I modified the case by making a small cut to it.
I would have wanted to know before buying it that the silicon was hard and is not as soft as I thought. However it is a good protector for the phone.
Es un buen libro y a pesar de tener muchos años, fue de gran utilidad. Pude aprender muchas cosas de la musica que hacia tiempo lo quería aprender. Recomiendo este libro
If by "simple" used in the album's title means less here, than once again, less is more with Evan's Magnet. This guy, one of Norway's music gems, is quite simply a musical genius. Evan's voice is angelic, quite polished, and deeply soothing. What you'll find here in Simple Life, just like Magnet's other albums, is his brilliant mixing of indie folk, beats, rasta jams, horns and strings. It works, and it will hook you. Magnet does this mix, like no other, again here perfectly in Simple Life-just like we've come to love and expect from him time and again. Get this album pronto, like any of his others, you won't be disappointed.
This product should really be called cream perfume.This hand cream has a lovely scent but is the scent is very strong, much stronger than it was in other of the Perlier Peony scent products I've used.If Amazon offered 1/2 stars in their rating stars I would have given it 4-1/2 rather than a 4. The "cream" itself isn't anything special by providing more softness or moisture than much less expensive national brand products and in reality probably a little less.What you're buying this product for is the scent, not the softening.
I like this scent and it is no longer made in this particular configuration...I was happy to find it so reasonably priced here.
I love all this music by the Celtic Woman. I purchased this and one other Christmas cd. I also purchased the Celtic Woman cd. The most beautiful music.
Wonderful, Wonderful - I love it - I'm listening to it even now BEFORE Christmas season - it's ethreal and heavenly.
This album is not what I expected from Moya, based on the four other Moya albums I have. I expected something with a little more Irish/Celtic ambience. The inclusion of a Ukranian song (Carol of the Bells) was rather annoying in an "Irish" Christmas, though the song is pretty good in its own right. For what it is, a straightforward Christmas album with an Irish/Celtic tint, it is quite good.
The product works great on the driver side for a 1993 Jeep Wrangler YJ, but since the prong is angled, I had to mount it upside down on the passenger side because of clearance issues. Overall, it gets the job done
This film is about civil rights. Ads don't do it justice. Very good film! I enjoyed it years ago and am glad to have foundit nonlinear.
Crazy In Alabama is engrossing and entertaining with the excellent re-creation of the mid-60's with respect to cars, fashions, and the civil rights movement.All actors were superbly cast for their roles. Not bad directing Mr. Banderas; You may have another artistic venue or outlet, yet. There are two stories simultaneously being told here. Yes, they are both effective and do meet at the end of the road for purpose and not filler. The title itself is also double edged meaning ; It is indicative of the racial tension and madness in Alabama happening while Lucille is on her cross country/Hollywood quest (to lay certain ghosts of the past to rest as well)...
I bought this pair of silk sleep pants and another pair of satin sleep pants. Although both were fine, the silk is superior in comfort and worth the difference in price.
Great Silk Pants Except My Husband wears a Size Large Pants in everything and with these pants I wish i would of ordered an Extra Large, they are a little short on him (Looks like he's waiting for a flood).I ordered the Burgandy and Blue and the colors are so Deep and Rich.Very Nice. They wash nice also.
My husband was recovering from bypass surgery and could not slide forward to get out of chair, bed etc. With the silk Pajamas he could get to the edge of the the seat and then stand with the aid of the walker. Amazon was the only place I could find this product. That was 6 weeks ago. He likes them so well he won't wear anything else, They have been laundered many times and still look like new
I have ordered this same pajama pant before, and they wear well. The size is also accurate. Color is true to photo.
I have two other Sony VCRs...but except for two short comings are no better. These two failing occur in the pause and slow modes in which there is too much video noise. All other features work quite well, with the flash rewind a dream. The remote also deserves high marks for its ease of use.Best of all is the picture quality which ranges from very good to excellent... I'd rate it a best buy.
this books give one an excellant felling for the hardship of the time. Also give us a deeper respect for our older family members who went through the ordeal
This product fits perfectly on my wrists. It's light but at the same time it adds a little variety to your workout. If you are just a beginner like me, I highly recommend this product.
These are super soft, like a silky terry cloth. These are a bit on the small side for a medium-large framed woman's wrist. However, these are perfect for a child's wrist or even ankle. These are used in my child's therapy, and they fit perfectly on an 8 yr old's wrists and ankles. Very comfortable.
I have small; tiny wrists so the weights fit fine and they are a great enhancement to my daily workout. In fact I wear then almost everyday all day long except when I am sleeping.
The product is well made but just to small to easily get over my hands to place on my wrists....once on they are comfortable..but again too lite for my needs...made for small people I think..i should look for a bigger set...
I agree with the other reviews that you have to have thin wrists for this to fit/be comfortable. I'm quite petite and have a hard time slipping on the wrist weights.
I bought this pillow and I was very nervous that it wouldn't be as lovely as the picture. I'm not one for buying this without touching it but I was pleasantly surprise. It is absolutely lovely and I'm very happy I made the purchase.
This order arrived timely and was exactly what was advertised... now I just need to dedicate time to going through the program.
This Cd contains every track you hear in the video game. If you liked the game, you'll love this cd, just to hear it is like playing the game all over again. A MUST HAVE FOR ZELDA FANS.
I loved that they have EVERY SINGLE music from the game in it, but I was disappointed to find how short some of the tracks are. Most all of them only play one loop of a track, making the songs very short. For example, the Fire Temple track is just over 40 seconds long... I just wish they made this like 3 CDs and extended the tracks to at least 2 minutes each.But that's the only thing I don't like... other than that its great! If you liked the OoT music, this is a must buy!
This is a great cd! It includes all the wonderful music from the 1999 award winning n64 game, The Legend of Zelda: Ocarina of Time.There are 82 tracks to this cd, some that last a few seconds long... some that last a few minutes long. My favorite is the "End Credits." This is the song played after beating the game and is truly beautiful!! I love it!!
first of all, the music on zelda ocarina of time matches the setting you are in. for example, listen to the water temple music. most people get an image of a watery or icy place. the game's songs impressed many people im sure. the game is already great by it self, but the music just takes it to the next level.
I loved the compositions from the game and I think Nobuo Uematsu is a great composer, fitting perfect music for perfect environments.However, I could not abide the repetative synthesised instruments that accompanied the music on most occasions. I recently bought the original FF8, thinking they perhaps implemented real instruments..but no luck.Then I saw this! Absolutely amazing... A single pianist plays 13 of the greatest FF8 tracks, with clever re-arrangements, you can listen to this, fully imersed in the Final Fantasy atmosphere. My highlight must be the card game theme, shuffle or boogie...an excellent take on the 12 bar blues. Anyway, yes, buy this! Also you get it in Japanese packaging...which is always good, for some bizarre reason the have a little plastic see-though sheath which the real case goes in...lovely.
Just like the other Final Fantasy Music Collections, this CD is a "must-have" one (although it's not the best of Uematsu). Since the theme for Final Fantasy VIII is "love", this CD gives you the sense of sweet, loving and relaxing. The first track is "Blue Fields" and followed by a super hit, "Eyes on me", track which is a newly rearranged one (But still very good). The rest of the CD gives you the same sensation. I find this CD is good for my relaxing day and before bed time and everytime I listen to it, I just like it more and more. As I said, if you like final fantasy series and Uematsu's work, you will like this CD.
My family and I took five books about South Africa with us, and this is the book we used and relied on the most. It proved to be the most accurate with what we experienced once there, and the book itself was the easiest to use in its layout and organization.
Although I have yet to visit South Africa (so I can't verify the accuracy) it seems to give you a nice write up on the major tourist areas. Like all guides it can not cover every topic that might be of interest to one particular reader.
This book, as all the Frommer series, is very good to help you plan a trip. The recommendations are often the same as you will find on Tripadvisor which increase my confidence level, but in the book you get really detailed information with contact numbers and websites. They have maps of each area with the interest point marked on it, this is a great planning tool; you can really figure better in what order to schedule visits. Yes, other boks have more photos, this one definitely does not but that is why it's a good planner, it has INFORMATION. Those pretty DK books are nice to look at but useless to plan with. I would like to see them update more frequently but reality is that the information does not really change that often, so all in all the book is great.
I am preparing for a trip to South Africa in May to join my daughter that is studying abroad in Cape Town. I anticipate that the information packed in the pages of this book will be very helpful in making contacts with hotels, adventure planners, and restaurants. With the help from the chapter on Victoria Falls, we anticipate having a successful trip through Zimbabwe as well.
here's another one of agatha christie's classics... the title provides the clue to what the novel's mostly about... a page-turner which will keep readers entertained till the very end...
This is one of Christie's best later works and it shows she can still weave intricate plots and characters together with effective ease. Great atmosphere and story, with Poirot popping up almost toward the end. You'll never see any of the final threads coming. Perhaps her most entertaining book of the 1950's.
The plot is simple, the characters memorable, and the clues, motives, and suspects pure Christie in this wonderful mystery that takes place at an English boarding school for girls.A young prince of a Middle East kingdom is killed in a flying accident and leaves behind a valuable collection of jewels to be smuggled into England by his friend Bob Rawlinson. It is believed the jewels will turn up at Meadowbank School since not only the prince's sister but also the sister and niece of Bob Rawlinson are all students there. Not surprisingly, murder after murder takes place at the prestigious school. Everyone from the headmistress and teachers to the students and parents are suspects until Poirot's clever little grey cells solve the mystery.
As a fan of the horror genre I am very often forced to sit through a book by a well known author that although has the major affect of scaring me out of my wits, rarely gets deep into my own personal life. Mr. Marano has succeeded where others have failed me!From the moment I picked this book up, I just couldn't put it down until I finished the story.The story of two Princes of Hell each trying to take over the world was as gripping as it was frightening, and left me wanting more from this author. His style of prose was just amazing.Of course the real good stuff is the emotional roller coaster you get the privilege to be on from almost page one!This book takes you everywhere, from sorrow to hopeful, and taking little pitstops at each emotion along the way.With characters I could really feel for, the struggle for Earth was just a beautiful mix of great insight and moments of pure suspense.Pick it up if you can, it's a great read!
This was a great buy. It seems it's shrunk lines in my forehead to a nicer size. It's also a great moisturizer for anything, I've used it on my lips, nose, eyes. Nothing irritant about emu oil competitors prices much higher for no reason. You won't be disappointed.
Could not have asked for a smoother transaction. Timely delivery and intact product. Thank you !
Love this oil over or mixed with my other face care products. If you use glycolic washes or treatment, you may want to consider using this afterwards. The bottle with the dropper works fine for easy control over how much you want to use. The product last a very long time making it a real bargain for such good product. For me, there is no offensive smell.I put on a light cream, add Marie Veronique sunscreen, them use my powder foundation. Just let the oil dry a little prior to using your foundation.I will buy again and again!
Not greasy and i feel like I can see a difference already after less than a month. Will buy again,
Slinky Malinki, the star of the story, creeps out of the house at night to look for the other cats in the neighbourhood to play. But what happens when Scarface Claw appears?A very cute book, written in the form of poetry, children learn all about rhyming words and various characteristics of cats.Lovely illustrations, adults would love this book as much as the children.
Not as fun as the second album, not as accessible as the first... probably the best whole album from SDRE. Some great songs... "Two Promises", "100 Million" the title track and "Guitar and Video Games" stand out as some of SDRE's best.Does require a couple of listens to to get truly into, but rewarding in the end.
I'm actually giving it 4.5 stars. I am a huge SDRE fan. I have all their cd's and this one contains some of my favorite SDRE songs and some of the ones I like the least. Pillars, Every Shining Time, and What It Feels Like To Be Something On are amazing. They are beautiful and complex and they alone are worth the $... However, Roses in Water and Prophet are not up to the standards I set for SDRE. Otherwise, this is an amazing CD from one of the best indie/alternative rock bands of the 90's. I definately recommend buying it and also "Diary", their excellent debut cd, if you don't already own it.
I like this album a lot. There's a lot of power and swirling guitars, and the melodies just knock you flat. Enigk's soaring tenor is at its most tremendous here. Every Shining Time you Arrive is a classic, and #9, the title of which contains a dirty word, has one of the most beautiful and jarring transitions I've heard in years. Great CD.On another note, I think it's funny that a previous reviewer, Heidikakis from NY, lifted almost all of her(his?) review from pitchforkmedia.com...Why would someone do that? I'm sure that the folk at pitchforkmedia.com aren't pleased.
I can't believe it's been 13 years since I first heard this CD. Funny thing is I listened for 3 or 4 years before I actually listened to the lyrics too.Another KOD reviewer on Amazon had problem with some of the gay-themed lyrics. If you can't get over that, then frankly you don't deserve to hear it. The guitar effects will put you in a trance, and the songs flow together seamlessly. One of the reasons KOD didn't have mainstream success is their songs are some heavy duty songs about LOVE, both gutwrentching, and glorious.One of the top 10 CD's that changed my life.Just buy it.
This is one of my all-time favorite bands. This album is rather heavy on the synthesizer sounds when compared to their others, which is actually not a quality attribute to my ear, but they pull it off with flying colors. Highly recommended to anyone who likes metal with powerful vocals...EdGuy, Excalion, Iron Maiden, etc.
I read this because my husband had to buy it for a college course and it was actually a really good play to read :) The only part I hate about reading plays is keeping who says what straight!
This is the first play I've read by Anton Chekhov and I am very interested in Russian culture, so it was good play to read about the fall of the Russian aristocracy. However, I don't think the characters are as fully developed as they could have been. Nonetheless, I truly enjoyed reading this play and hopefully some day I can watch it on stage!
EXCELLENT!!! The way they compiled these 3 great voices together is a miracle!!! The sound is simply "awesome". One Hank will sing a part, then another Hank will sing another part, and so on. These are re-mixed upbeat Rock versions of these Hank William's Classics. This cd contains the classic "Men with Broken Hearts" - everyone should hear this song before they die. This is simply a poetic masterpiece, and this 3 Hank's version is "awesome". This is "required" listening for any Hank fan!!! I've seen Hank Jr. perform live and he is great. Thanks and may God Bless!!!
My daughter Sadie and I love this book. The author has a real knack for writing with the voice of a young girl. This girl, Jane, is smart and funny and spunky. It's a great story!
This is a well written book. Truly it is for the true believer in CHRIST.One that is interested in the Coming of the LORD in these last days.
A wonderful DVD, the beginning was a little droll but the movie picked up considerably in the middle. The language is rough, the graphics can get gory, but altogether it is a heartbreaking film. Vietnam at its worst.Michael J. Fox played his part,(as always) to the max, and Sean Penn was not far behind for the evil and crazy leader of the band.Altogether, it's a movie anyone should watch. If not for the truth and final showdown between Fox, and his enemies, but for the wonderful acting and storyline.
This is the best war movie ever made. "Casualties of War" is an amazing accomplishment by director Brian De Palma. The story of a soldier (Michael J. Fox) who reports his squad for the rape and murder of a Vietnamese woman during Vietnam. He lives in fear and is assumed the enemy for not participating in the heinous acts. The squad leader (Sean Penn) has no moral conscious and his ego gets the best of him. Ving Rhames gave a speech about justice and was extremely right on. You can't beat the system, but when it's to do the right thing, then you must try.
I know the soldier on whom the character of Sven was based, and the incident portrayed in the movie impacted his life in a major way. Due to death threats from the comrades he turned in for their crimes, he and his wife decided not to have children. At the time, they felt that the risk to their own lives and any family they might start were too great. Fortunately, nothing ever came of the threats, even after the rapists/murderers got out of prison. But this gentle, compassionate, loving couple was kept from having a family due to the shadow on their lives.American servicemen are just as guilty of such atrocities today. We've already seen stories of how they rape their own female comrades in Iraq and Afghanistan. No wonder the people whose countries we occupy hate the "Ugly Americans."
Interesting film set in Vietnam brings up the whole issue of morality in war. Can morality exist in war? Is there such an animal? In such a graphic film depicting death, carnage and rape where does one draw the line? Penn is excellent as usual but Fox probably cast for his mere presence, as a character of virtue may be the real casualty here that diminishes the impact of the director's intentions. This film contains one of Ennio Morricone's best latter scores.
An enduring statement about the conflicts that exist between morality and circumstance, character and expediancy, steadfastness and complacency, and the war that each of us has to fight for ourselves in our own minds during times of trouble.Great performances from Penn (as usual) and a very (unexpectedly) believable Michael J Fox.The real question is what and who are the real Casualties of war? Not to be missed.
Okay, to first start out, if you aren't into this sort of genre of music (or if you aren't vaguely familiar with the epic saga that is Xenogears), then you might want to consider other options before buying this piece. Packed with a ton of the music from the game, the CD's recording quality is enough to give RPGers that warm, fuzzy feeling of nostalgia all over again. Everything from Lahan to id is in this package, and it's well worth the somewhat high price. A wonderful compliment to possibly the greatest game out there.
I am a beginner and I'm teaching myself. This book was very helpful in teaching me how to begin. It also has a lot of nice designs that I was not afraid to try. I found this book very helpful in getting started.
Love this book! It is always in the car and always helpful. Nice write-ups about the different parks and places to walk. If you like to run around with your dog do buy one of these and leave it in the car.
Just from hearing excerts from the first five songs has convinced me to purchase the CD. I wasn't thrilled with Zurg's Planet; but I liked the rest. If the rest of the songs were as good as the first four - you've got a winner. But, this type of music can be listen to when taking long drives; driving through traffic; or just for your kids to relax to. Well, maybe not. My kids are older, 19 & 21, they will listen while driving, if they were smaller they probably would act out the scenes.Thanks for the sample. Can't wait for the CD!
This is a charming film. Funny and touching. The cast brings a real depth to the characters and situation. You'll laugh at the bad guys and wish you could know the good guys. John Ratzenberger gives an award worthy performance.
I saw a preview of this movie(from Local Color - another winner) and just identified with a couple of the characters and knew I had to see it. It was funny, poignant and something I really connected with and yet it offered a balance. What I mean is that it wasn't overdone in any one area......the relationships unfolded and I felt like I knew most of them. This is the kind of movie that I know I want to see more of and what I'd really love is the soundtrack. The music in the movie was great. Keep on bringing us quality movies like this. Thank you.
A wonderful, "feel good" movie......funny, poignant, delicious. John Ratzenberger shows how multi-faceted his acting abilities are. He's funny, sweet, sexy, lovable. This movie is a "must-see"!
The Third Secret is a timely piece of fiction by Steve Berry. The book is about alleged appearances by the Virgin Mary throughout the last 100 years. Father Colin Michener, the Papal Secretary, is brought into a potential conspiracy by his mentor, Pope Clement. We find that there has been a conspiracy by past Popes to cover up a part of "The Third" Secret", which is part of a Marian appearance. This secret part would allegedly contradict present church doctrine.This is a nice work of fiction, based on a good bit of truth. If you like Dan Brown, you will enjoy this book.
Typical Steven Berry book - action thriller with a historical/fact base. A quick read that keeps the pages turning. I enjoy these books immensely - but this particular book is a little far fetched for me with heavenly appartitions and such.Having siad that, it is great entertainment, and provides enough interesting historical tidbits that it remains classic Berry and a good read.
Although a good read, nice build up, a couple of nasty bad guys including a Pope and his side kick who seemed to have been trained in a terrorist camp, the ending was unbelieveable and a quite strained. I just can't imagine the BVM (Blessed Virgin Mary) agreeing with liberals on the issues of today's citizens. Understanding and empathizing with their plight, yes, but that is as far as I would go.
Sure the "secret" is outrageous, but then, the same can be said about organized religion in general, so I didn't have a problem with it. I loved the book and thought it had a great plot and was an entertaining read, which I believe is what it was intended to be - hello - fiction! It wasn't preachy or didactic and therefore, in general, annoying as so many other authors seem to be with this and similar subjects (case in point - The Last Templar by Raymond Khoury, OMG, bleck!!!). Taken for what it is - a good page turner - it's one of Berry's best, in my opinion, and certainly inspired me to read all of his novels (this was the first I read), none of which have disappointed to date.
pretty good story! i really enjoyed the concept and the books fast pace! looking forward to reading more of the author's works, thumbs up!
It was a good read. Weak ending. I've read worst. His other two books had better endings, however, up until the end it was good. The history lesson was useful. I would buy this book again. Now that I think about it I did buy this next one "the Templar Legacy" so what does that tell you.
Let me begin by saying this novel is in no way similar to the DaVinci Code as teased on the cover. However, it is a good suspenseful story that made it hard for me to put down. Although fictional, the story is built around a number of true facts. I enjoyed the author's very visual descriptions of locale and scenery. I also liked the characters. However, I did find Ambrosi a little hard to believe that he could have elevated to such a high position in the church, but this is fiction. The writing has me interested in reading other works by this author.
This is a well written book that deals with the operation and politics of the Catholic Church, and specifically the Vatican.
Steve Berry has become one of my favourite authors. The Third Secret does not disappoint, Get ready for a thrilling ride.
I read this book in two days and loved it. What is the Third Secret of Fatima and why did it take the Church so long to release it? While this is a fiction novel it poses some very intriguing questions about religion, faith and what we are told to believe. Great book for conspiracy theorists, the curious and the faithful.
This is the second Steve Berry novel I have read, and this was certainly better than the Amber Room. The plot is intriguing and the story held my interest through the end of the novel.The downside to this novel is that the Third Secret isn't all that shocking, and for the second straight novel, there's a five letter word to describe the personality of the lead female character. Is Berry a misogynist or was he going through a divorce while drafting these novels?Also, the antagonists are almost cartoonish. How or why did these individuals become priests in the first place?
This is the first of Steve Berry's books that I've read. I liked it so much that I bought all the novels by him that I could lay my hands on (from my favorite local used books store). It is action packed and well researched. I admit that the conclusion of the book seems a bit far fetched. His depiction of the Vatican's intrigues do not seem very far from the truth though (except perhaps for the murder parts). It is the kind of novel that I find perfect to relax at the end of the day or on vacation.
The author brings the the characters into focus and makes us care about them, or detest them. I don't have much interest in Fatima or the other appearances by Mary, but that is not necessary to enjoy a well researched drama about the oldest continuing institution in history: The Catholic church. The author has linked together events in church history to give a modern view of the Vatican and the modern struggles within the church and within our society. I'm not Catholic, but the book gives on an appraciation for the Vatican and what it means to billions of people.
This book is a great read for anyone, but even better with a background in religion. It has great factual basis yet spins a great fiction book that readers will enjoy. <<spoiler>> great timing too due to a new pope taking office, as well as Catholic issues with marriage, children, etc in the news. I would recommend this to anyone who enjoyed Dan Browns books, and would encourage readers to check out Steve Berry's other novels.
this is a brilliant video. I agree its not a replacement for everyday play and excessive tv watching is not good for anyone....but from first hand practical experience my daughter just loves this and has certainly learned practical things from it...we dont put tv on everyday..just every so often...if she is restless or ill.. ( or mommy really needs to get something done....)she much prefers it to anything else that she has seen in the past...in fact it is the only dvd that she gets excited about.it is also a wonderful format to copy and and gives you simple but great ideas for easy play ( good for a new parent)It is was also the only thing that would stop her crying when she was teething... for this i rate it as one of the most valuable things that we have bought!!!!
This video is super popular with my 19 month old GD. The rest of us can stand it - it is really really not for older kids/adults.She sees any sort of package to be opened and wants to know if there is a new Eebee in it. Even Barney and Elmo can't beat Eebee for her attention. Not sure how long it will last but will really recommend Eebee for the second year of a child's life. <G>
It was once said that the whole of a movie should not be in so much whether you like or disliked a movie, but rather, did it leave a lasting impression upon you? Taking that idea into account, I would have to say that "Singapore Sling" is without a doubt an indelible addition to the film noir genre, albeit the bizarro kind. As one of the reviewers has mentioned before, this movie shouldn't be taken seriously. You should come into this one with an open mind and you'll be rewarded with a beautifully photographed film noir filled with black humor. "Singapore Sling" is like the demented cousin of "Laura", "Sunset Boulevard" and "Grey Gardens". It's your basic detective story but with torture, bizarre erotica, and outstanding overacting. Just make sure the parents are asleep and that you've got the right kind of friend in tow when watching it.
Obviously we live in troubled times. Many are unable to confront the tragic events that recently took place. Others feel it very important that they know what is ahead for all of us. If you are of like mind you will want to read NOSTRADAMUS PREDICTIONS OF WORLD WAR III. It contains a host of material from the seers earlier prophecies right on through to the third anti christ who is said to be living in the Middle East. Does this book have all the answers??? Probably not, but the author does delve into the meaning of Nostradamus words as well as bringing in the visions of other seers from our current era. And, in addition, there are other things besides predictions of World War III to contemplate -- even an invasion from space.
Another interesting book about Nostradamus and his predictions about WWIII. It is wothwhile reading but believing ??? everything. It is well explained that the verses that Nostradums wrote are matter of interpretation.
it was as desceibed. i have nothing else to say, this is very annoying to write this much about the quality of a dvd, stop it.
I bought this product as a gift for a fussy relative who has everything and is very difficult to please. She loved it! Worth every penny.
Rishi Kapoor was superb in his part, post AAA Rishi tried to get off his childhood chocolate boy image and started looking better and acted brilliantly in this Tariq is okay the heroine is nice Zeenat has a small role Amjad Khan is good as the villain Om Shivpuri is good too
I took my GS Service Unit to DC and also our 5th graders over spring break!! To help make the trip "educational" as well as fun - this book is like a journal where the students can keep all their tickets, maps, flyers, and information in one little holder. When the parents ask the kids what they saw and did - the kids can pull this out and SHOW the parents and REVIEW what they did!! Excellent visual - up to date - and instead of asking what's this place is about--- there is a short write up about each place they will visit.Also wonderful for families going on vacation ---- the kids love it!
Festina & Admiral Chee make a great pair of characters in the start of the book. I wish this sort of duo could have continued longer than it had. The humor which was replaced with this duo wasn't as effective. Melaquin seems like an ideal place to settle if it wasn't for the myth surrounding the place. The follow through of adventure was well done but some of the ideas kind of boring, unadventurous. However, the entire idea of Expendables is hilarious and sad at the same time.
I'm getting tired of wading through these novels where the main antagonist is incredibly annoying, but left in the plot because there'd be no reason to continue writing without him (or her). So you just sit there and get annoyed by the character until the book - mercifully - ends.Expendible is not one of these books. The characters are strange but never annoying. If nothing else, they're human without resorting to extremes. The book reads very quickly and cleanly.You'd be inclined to think it's fluff, since it does read well, but there's actually quite a bit of food for thought in there and some very interesting insight into human nature. Go read it now.
I've only just gotten back into reading sci-fi books, and I have to say that this was an interesting story. The characters lead a sad life, but of course all is vindicated in the end. The plot took a twist after they landed on "the planet" (one that I wasn't expecting, I might add), then it became somewhat political, but I still enjoyed it. I'll more than likely read the other books that are part of the series.
THIS A STIRRING SF ADVENTURE THAT PITS A MEMORABLEHEROINE, FESTINA RAMPOS AGAINST A STRANGE ANDDEADLY WORLD WHICH SHE IS STRANDED ON. IN THE 25THCENTURY THERE IS NO WAR, CRIME OR POVERTY BUT IFYOU ARE DEFORMED, CRIPPLED YOU ARE PROBABLY AEXPLORER SENT TO DIFFERENT WORLDS AND YOUR LIFEIS NOT WORTH VERY MUCH. THIS NOVEL OF ADVENTUREAND DISCOVERY WAS FASCINATING AND FESTINA WASA HEROINE YOU CAN EASILY ROOT FOR.
This book surprised me. For being one of Gardner's first books, its a great one. He tosses around tons of different concepts and ideas with ease. He paints a vivid picture of of a universe in which "The Technocracy" regulates lifeform's behavior by eliminating all of the non-sentients. This in it's self makes for some pretty interesting rules. In this story, the main characters must not only deal with these rules, but also bend them. And the way that happens mixes a recipe that isn't your typical sci-fi fare.Very interesting stuff.
Another classic story by author/artist Graham Oakley. The church mice books are his best, the artwork is priceless (and hilarious!). Check his other books out too. They are great.
Robert Slater puts together a factual and wonderfully insightfull collection of Jack Welch's Leadership Secrets. A must read for anyone who wants to be an effective leader.
This book is full of a young girls romance with a prince it is one of the best books i have ever read and if you like this one check out the other 2 in this sereis THEY ROCK just as much!!!!!!!!
This compilation of early (31-34) Calloway features excellent sound quality and a first-rate band backing up the King of Jive. At a great bargain price, this set is recommended for those who like their 30s swing served hot.
I don't have anything to add to the other five-star reviews apart from this: I too received this book in 1979 or 80. I recently dug it out and gave it to my six year old son and he LOVES it. Evidently the passage of time and the advent of video games and digital animation has not dimmed this title's appeal.
I picked up this book for my college class on the study of Native Americans from Civil War to present. Even though this is an educational biography on boarding school life, it is actually quite intriguing. Brenda Child completely covers the topic with very interesting material. I won't say that Boarding School Seasons is one of my favorites, but if you are interested in the topic of Indian boarding schools, then you will actually be suprised at how easy it is for this book to keep your attention. If you are viewing this book for a college course, then your class shouldn't be too hard. This is one of the few college required texts that I actually managed to enjoy
Another book with stories about the trauma that the Boarding Schools caused our Indian People of Turtle Island. Many of us are products of the Historical Trauma that our ancestors endured at the hands of the White Man!
The maps are great as expected from Michelin, but note that this book covers the Gulf Coast only. No complete state is mapped. The Atlantic coast of Florida is not mapped. It covers from Brownsville, TX to Miami, FL but only for about a hundred miles inshore.
This is the only brand of Lory food our flock will accept. Its fruity smell and apparent good taste are the first thing our lories want in the morning and they get very excited waiting for their individual bowls to be passed out.
The book was shipped very well and not damaged from shipping. But, I have to say there was damage from many sharpie marks scrawled on the bottom of the book.
I have always been interested in weird things and this fills my need
Keith Hudson is a thrilling Reggae performer and writer,I'm not a fan of his vocals,however he works within his arrangements,so the songs are crafted personally for his roots style."civilization" was the huge cut from this album that was originally produced in 1976-77' This album is A fine Reggae experience.
Some really good short stories both for readability and philosophy. Bach has written several other good books such as 'Biplane' and 'Nothing by Chance'.
Richard Bach delivers an inspiring story using flight as his spiritual metaphor. A wonderful story. Not as good as Jonathan Livingston Seagull but still worth the read. I file it with my spiritual books to inspire.
I am on an intellectual quest to understand what makes a man a hero and a woman a heroine.Thomas Carlyle did an amazing amount of research and is the first book in a long seriesthat I will read on mythological heroes/heroines and actual heroes/heroines in history.I am interested in how mythological heroes/heroines carried on through the ages and how they influencedactual heroes/heroines throughout history.I was lucky enough to come across this book on archive.org and was able to downloadit and read it for free.The prose of this century is sometimes convoluted which causes you to spend more timetrying to understand and then reflect on the author's words.The book was, as I said, the first read of many to come on an intellectual quest tounderstand the whole 'hero/heroine' concept.I am glad I came across this book. This book piqued my interest more on the whole mythology ofheroism.
I got this for Christmas, it's fantastic. The only draw back is that I still haven't gotten the dual band working correctly due to my schedule. That's the only problem so far that I've been experiencing so far.The reason for 4 instead of 5 stars is the ridiculous amount of updates I had d=to download to be able to get access to everything. But it's still great!
I no longer schedule my day around TV, I can enjoy any program at any time! I set my TIVO at night before going to bed and don't concern myself about missing any of my favorite programs any more! THANK YOU! THANK YOU! THANK YOU!
After spending years with Cox Communications DVRs (Motorola and then Scientific Atlanta) and dealing with all the problems they cause (not recording everything, not recording at all, crashing, dying etc.) we decided to try TiVo. I have yet to find a flaw with this piece of equipment.It records what its supposed to, when its supposed to. I love my new TiVo.
My experience with TiVo started when my daughter gave us a series 2 for Christmas years ago.We have used it daily ever since. Then when she had trouble with hers she gave it to me. It works perfectly if it is kept above 60F. When it is colder the audio becomes distorted with scratchy crackling noise other than that it still works great. If I had the money I would upgrade in a minute. Until that time I will continue to use our series 2 TiVos until they no longer work.TiVo TCD746320 Premiere DVR, BlackTiVo TCD649080 Series 2 80-Hour Dual Tuner Digital Video RecorderTiVo Premiere XL4 TCD758250 HD Digital Video Recorder
I have always had good luck with the Tivo. I have all of my electronic goodies plugged into an UPS so I have never had equiptment damaged by lightning. Probably more due to luck.
When I say that tivo is the best thing out as far as dvr's right now it's an understatement. This product is absolutely wonderful. I am 100% happy with this product. I highly recommend it.
LOTS OF GREAT FEATURES AND WILL HANDLE COMCAST DIGITAL CHANNELS. THE REMOTE IS ANNOYING TO USE.
We selected this product for my daughter because at her apt. the cable signal is still analog. There was only one Ethernet signal in the bedroom so we installed a wireless router. The Tivo needs either a phone hook up or an Internet connection. Since she didn't have a land line and no Internet connection in the living room where she wanted her TV we had to purchase a wireless UBS adapter in order to pick up the signal. Also, had a problem with the security of the router not matching the adapter but once we changed the WAP setting to WEP we were able to complete installation. Once set-up, it seems to be working well. Best of all, we had no problem getting a Tivo tech to speak with us.
I gave this to my wife for Christmas and now we are both hooked on TIVO. Basically, just like everyone says it will, it changes the way you watch TV. Bye-bye commercials. See ya stuff we don't want to watch. Now we really do watch only what we want and we get to watch it on our schedule. Having said that, the reason I did not give it five stars is the setup is quite an undertaking. The hooking it up wasn't too bad, but the oodles of menus that follow take a while, and when we got to the part about linking it into our wireless network it went over our heads. We still have yet to get that feature to function. Even after you purchase separately the wireless network adapter, it seems as though the network itself must be set up in a pretty specific way. Luckily you can still do it through the phone line as well or we would be up a creek. Overall I would say that TIVO makes me happy.
I tried out Tivo because of the special promotion offered by Amazon. A Tivo and a $100 gift certificate was offered for $100. So far for the past month, my wife and I enjoyed the features of Tivo. We like the options of the season pass, freezing programs, rewinding, and skipping commercials.With the gift certificate, we didn't have to tie ourselve to a 1 year contract, and the value of the certificate is good for 6 months. We are are still evaluating the product and have not made a decision whether we will continue the service after 6 months because of the service cost of $17 a month.So far we like, and we would recommend it.
I bought this as a gift for my parents and while I haven't actually seen it in action, they tell me they love it and will never go back to normal tv. The only caveat is that it must be connected to the Internet, and if you don't have an Ethernet cable that you can easily plug into the back, make sure you get the wireless adapter that goes with it (sold separately of course).
My old TiVo is still alive and kicking. Got him as a gift about 8 years ago and bit the bullet and bought lifetime service. Best money I've ever spent. We have other TWC dvrs in the house; always having problems with on demand video, slow relays, delayed remote responses, playback of recorded shows. NEVER have these problems with TiVO. He's changed my life!
Length:: 3:45 MinsIn this video, I explain just what a TiVo is, how it works, and why it is TOTALLY AWESOME.
A mystery filled with wit, and based on the famous Lord Lucan case (a murderer who escaped, and to this day, no one knows if he's alive or dead). Spark has not lost her touch, and this is a short, engaging book that you won't want to put down.
Despite all the protestations by others, I personally love the cover and artwork and the fact that we can finally hear supposedly from the tape that Don sent to UK promoter Roger Eagle something like Bat Chain Puler should have sounded. thios album is raw and energetic work from the captain and his Magic Band. Definitely worth buying.
I'm seeing all these reviews say how awful this CD is. It's a truly amazing CD. "fake a Smile" was not a great choice for a single, and it is a somewhat boring song. "Dead Heart" and "Out of The Dark" are definitely the stand out tracks on this record and are worth the $10 by themselves. Buy The CD. It's one of the best of 2004.
If you are new to playing lottery then this is the book to get. Plenty of charts to get you thinking and analyzing numbers so you can create your OWN systems. I highly recommend this book for all beginning lottery enthusists.
First of all - you need to play to win. Using Gail's books and software can make the winning happen. Some people see patterns and trends very easily using the information and charts available to them in her books and software. Others need to study harder. I've used Gail's books and software for a long time now, and although I haven't hit the "big one" YET, it's just around the corner. These tools can make it happen! As Gail says, "Smart Luck!"
I like the book so far. It gets a little complicated. So, I have to re-read some of the tips, etc. I'm going to win Florida Fantasy 5! Yes!:)~Jeniffer
Weyse's (1774-1842) symphonies sound similar to the middle symphonies of Mozart. None rise to the greatness of Mozart's last six symphonies, but all are enjoyable, with graceful minuets and dramatic finales. The Royal Danish Orchestra under Michael Schonwandt never misses a step, in well-groomed mannered performances. Perhaps the best analogy I can draw is that Weyse is to Mozart as Ferdinand Ries is to Beethoven.
I had not expected 'Never Piss Into The Wind' to packsuch an emotional punch- a punch softened with humorand great wit. This is a homerun, a must read. I willbe sending copies of this jewel to family members forChristmas this year.
Very Fast shipping. Product arrived in perfect condition. Pins were a perfect fit. Washers were all same size there should be one slightly larger than the other per set... No big deal though.... since the washers do not move for proper door functionality I simply wrapped the smaller washer with electrical tape to give it a snugg fit and it works perfectly fine.... other than that small but fixable detail ... Perfect!!
I bought this product for my 98 Chevy S10. It fits great, and it's nice not to have to lift my door up to close it anymore. It doesn't really look exactly like the picture, but I think that's just a generic picture for all the hinge kits. Make sure you put it in from the bottom for the top hinge if yours is like mine. There isn't room to do it from the top, and your hammer can slip and crack your windshield if you're not careful. Otherwise it's a no brainer to put in. All you'll need is a hammer and some pliers.
I have always loved Buffy, since her first dusting, to the tragic events of Joyce Summers. This is a pair of my favorite episodes, the only others are "Hush" and "Prophecy Girl" Buy it!!!! you'll love it, trust me on this one!
... with the exception of two bits, this is NOT the material we saw at the Too Old to Die Young performance at 37 Arts in NYC.I have mixed feelings, because I had a chance to see some other great material on the DVD; but I was disappointed, because I REALLY wanted to have a chance to re-live some hilarious moments we saw live.If you're looking to get a video of the NYC performances, this isn't it. If you're looking for some fresh, fun stuff from Billy, it's right here.
For anyone wanting to discover what is minimalism and wher it came from, this a must. No one has managed to outline and seize precisely the essence of it as well as H. YPMA. Outstanding photos, and a fantastic insigt into London
This is really nice to have when you just want something a little different. It makes drinking a cup of coffee step out of the ordinary.
This will give the casual listener some songs he may never have heard as well as the old Hank standards, but is not to be confused with The Complete Hank Williams boxed set. For some reason the songs recorded in 1952(and others) are not included. If this is not important to you, this is a great value at less than $20. The quality of the recording is excellent as is the packaging. Check out the other sets from Proper Records as each is a great value.Eddy's Song
I usually hear all kinds of new music while listening to the hardcore channels on www.di.fm or in this case, www.happyhardcore.com I really enjoy this fast (140bpm) type of music when I work out, though I like most electronic music in general. Personally, disc 1, mixed by SY is my favorite. I would say that it is mainstream happy hardcore. Disc 2 is more just hardcore/gabber. I find that disc 2 is more annoying than enjoyable to listen too. Disc 3, mixed by Kevin Energy, combines what the first two discs have to offer. Disc 3 starts out happy hardcore but flows towards the end of the CD into more hardcore rave like that found on disc 2. Overall, I like the set and to anyone looking to buy it, it would not be a waste of money in my opinion. The more I listen to it, the better it gets.
A classic aimed at the dressage rider yet applicable to all who desire a true partnership with their horse. Museler provides clear explanations and graphic illustrations on the training of the horse and rider from the basics of balance and feel to correcting disobedience and advanced training. First published in 1937, 'Riding Logic' provides practical steps to achieving the sympathetic partnership advocated by todays natural horsemen
These flakes (often powdery) are better priced (even when ~$15 for 22 oz) than anything available near the metropolitan area where I live. Used to pour this on everything possible before I got sick of the taste, now I sprinkle for a hint of cheesy taste and B12/nutrition.
This nutritional yeast is the same stuff that you can find in the bulk bins at many health food stores. The upside is that it hasn't been pawed through by a zillion shoppers before you and the canister that it comes in is so much sturdier and easier to store in your pantry than the flimsy plastic bags found in most bulk food aisles.The reason that I gave it four stars instead of five is that it is the "small flake" nutritional yeast instead of the "large flake" that I prefer. Plus, although it has a good "cheesy" flavor and is great for using when making vegan dishes or as a topping for popcorn, it does have a very slightly bitter flavor to it that in my experience, some other brands of nutritional yeast don't seem to have.
Blends very easily. Has a mild taste. I put a scoop of nutritional yeast in my breakfast blender shakes (also has water, powdered milk and frozen berries or other fruit, and a sweetener such as stevia). Gives a great nutritional boost - and all those B vitamins are great for the "nerves' before a work day begins and I like the protein in it too. Have been taking yeast for 20 years - it did take a few weeks to get used to the taste when I began, since I only stirred it in milk. With the fruit and a little sweetener - it tastes really good.
Just what I wanted came quickly. Highly recommend both this product and the supplier. Very satisfied. Only need 3 more words... Thanks!
Far superior taste to what I've been buying in bulk at my local health food store. I'm a loyal Kal user now!
Though the item that arrived was not this picture, it is the same 22 oz KAL Nutritional Yeast flakes I purchased before and I'm very satisfied. It takes a little while to get used to the taste but now I put it on pretty much everything. I agree it's slightly cheesy, a little salty tasting (to me), but I really do sprinkle it on pretty much everything savory or spicy. 3 TBS for 9 protein and it's just yummy. Great product, have purchased again, will purchase again.
Keep a small shaker flip top canister (I use the Red Star one) so you can refill when needed. Getting this jumbo size will save you a bundle, especially if you use a lot of yeast. The quality is good, and you can add it to many foods to increase nutritional value.
It's difficult to find flakes of yeast. I like it on home-made popcorn fresh off the stove.It adds a buttery taste to it, and the flakes catch in the crooks and crevices of the popped corn.Discovered it in Portland, OR at an art theater downtown, where they had it in a shaker, next toparmesean cheese and salt, etc.About once a month I HAD to go to that theater, no matter what movie was showing,and have some popcorn with brewer's yeast on it. Finally figured out it was right beforemy menstral cycle, and my body craved B vitamins, which this stuff is packed full of.This is a big container of it, and should last quite a while.I'll tell you, finding FLAKED brewer's years is difficult way down here in my area.
There is a lot of disagreement over the topic this book discusses. I am thankful that RA Torrey does a great job of presenting how the baptism with the Holy Spirit works based on what Scripture teaches.He really does an excellent job explaining the following topics:1. What the Baptism is and what it does2. How the Baptism can be obtained3. Refilling with the Holy Spirit4. How spiritual power is lostGiven all the confusion and discussion about this doctrine, I think it is essential that Christians investigate the topic and decide what to believe. Torrey's book is an excellent starting point for those who seek to learn more.
Excellent product and much less expensive than at the dealer. Shipped on time, easy instructions to replace old filter with the new one.
16 pages of beautiful, black and white illustrations on quality parchment paper. These are the coloring books I turn to when Im ready for something different to color. Personally speaking, I find these to be the most fun, and a great change of pace, because I can use almost any medium for terrific results, in far less time. I prefer using my Tombow markers with water applied, so I get that traslucent watercolor effect, then come back with either more felt marker, and or a soft colored pencil, and crayola crayons, hit it with a hot iron to melt the wax's into the paper for retaining bold yet translucent colors.( I like the buckling effect this also gives) Lot's of fun to color!! Great projects for kids and adults alike. These designs are also great for crafters.
At first I was disappointed with my purchase, but after speaking with the seller, I have reprized my opinion of the business. The book slipped past his quality control, and he is making ammends to me. I get to keep the book I purchased, although not what I hoped for it will suffice and get a percentage off my next purchace. Thank you for being so custumer orientedRackham Fairy Tale Stained Glass Coloring Book (Dover Coloring Book)
You can definitely see the pool in the middle--if you stick your head into the branches! =) I absolutely loooooooove this tree. It is so beautiful and came out of the box almost perfect--haven't even fluffed up the branches yet and it looks wonderful. There are so many lights--800! One thing though, the lights are LED so they don't have that soft yellow glow. Instead it's kind of an ice blue glow, like ice on the branches or very sparkly diamonds. So for those of you who are more interested in the soft yellow glow, don't get this tree. Other than that it's really bright--it lights up the whole room. Very nice tree. Would buy again.
CANDIDE IS ONE THE BEST LOVE STORIES OF ALL TIMES. THE BOOK MADE ME LAUGH, CRY, HATE, BUT MOST ALL LOVE AND SEE THAT TRUE LOVE WILL ALWAYS FIND IT TRUE END. I WAS CAPTURED BY ALL THE CHARACTERS, AND PLACES IN THIS WONDERFUL BOOK. CANDIDE FORBIDDEN LOVE TO MADAME CONGANDE ROYALTY TO THIS COMMONER, CANDIDE. HIS QUEST TO FORGET AND YET BE UNITED TO HIS MOST BELOVED. PROFESSOR PENGLOSS OUT LOOK ON LIFE; THAT WHATEVER HAPPENS IN LIFE IS MEANT TO BE THAT WAY - SETS FORTH THE IDEOLOGY "THAT WE HAVE NO CONTROL OVER OUR DESTINY." COMPARE THAT WITH CONGONDE'S MILITARY BROTHER THAT BELIEVED THAT ONE CAN SET AND CONQUER ONES DESTINY.CANDIDE SHIPWRECKED EXPERIENCE IN ELDORADO WAS JUST GREAT, SHOWING THAT UTOPIA AND UNITY EXIST SOMEWHERE. BUT ALAS CANDIDE CHOSEN COURSE WAS TO LEAVE THIS PLACE OF PERFECT PEACE AND UNITY AND TO SEEK FOREVER HIS TRUE PEACE AND UNITY, HIS BELOVED MADAME CONGONDE.THIS IS A MUST READ BOOK SHORT AND SWEET I RATE THIS BOOK A TRUE CLASSICHENRY
i had to read this for my college english class. i'm not much of a reader of the classics, but i was surprised by how much i like this book. an incredible use of satire and wit.although, i will say, i know i wouldn't have gotten as much out of it if it wasn't for the class i was taking. i still found the story and voltaire's implications quite enjoyable.
When I started this very short book, I expected it to be a drone-fest from the 1700s. However I was pleasantly surprised to find the story gripping, the satire comical and devious, and my time well spent. I even read sections of the book to younger siblings of ages 10 and 6, and they paid attention with great detail. I would highly recommend this book as a classic for a reason.
I just finished reading Candide for an Advanced Placement Senior English class, and suprisingly, I actually enjoyed it. Having toiled through many long, hard books troughout the year, this hilarious, SHORT, easy-to-read book was a relief! I loved the satire, and how Voltaire is constantly poking fun at people and their ideas--at times, I laughed out loud at the way he describes things. Although it is not the best book I've ever read, I definitely recommend it.
I have owned this book for quite awhile but put off reading it, fearing that it would be dull and scholarly. I was in for a wonderful surprise. His philosophy makes a lot of sense and he puts it forth in a simple story accessible to almost everyone. Many, many times I laughed out loud. It was fun as well as enlightening. The term "sixes and sevens" was used; what is the etymology of that expression? The violence is expressed in an absurd way, though we know awful things did and do happen.
Everyone will like this story for different reasons. It's easily read, and one can then toss out the phrase "I, frequent reader of Voltaire, think...". Alternatively, one can read it AND think about it. How strikingly funny it is. How incredibly relevant it remains to this day. How possible it is to challenge blind optimism and yet not wallow in complete despair and self-pity. Above all, I found it to be a very accessible work of philosophy. Ahem. I mean, "I, frequent reader of Voltaire, think it is a rather accessible work of philosophy..."
I picked this book up at the bookshop near Ground Zero. And to my suprise it was not a heavy story that caused one anguish to read it. I thought the story was told in a quick straight forward way that was both fun and educational. I agree if one were to really take this book and ponder over the morals Voltaire tries to preach, then the book wouldn't have been as entertaining to me. Nice and lite read. I recommend it to anyone over the age of 18.I think I know why this book was not taught in many schools, it does have a hint of anti-Semitism.
This is my first attempt at Classic Literature, and I have to say that this one was very interesting, very well thought out, and dowright good. I loved the descriptions, the overall story. It gave me a new appreciation for literature. Short read, finished in a day and a half.Christopher Berry
This is a hilarious romp through the 18th century world that Voltaire knew. This book provided him to make fun of the intellectuals of the day (cannibals who only eat Jesuits) the politics of Europe and the social mores of the elite. His characters include the noble Candide who combines his good heart with his reliance of Gilgamesh like helpers in order to succeed. His hero worship for Dr. Pangloss, the Rasputin like philosopher (and later Martin) bailed him out of some situations but perhaps more importantly his lesser, Cacambo saved his life. All of the fantastic adventures that Candide experienced were all designed to reunite him with his true love Cunegonde.Many years later, Upton Sinclair wrote a "Candide" like, utopian socialist fantasy novel, Metropolis that I was reminded of while reading this novel.
this book was pretty good. it was kind of weird but good. i thought that it wasnt a satire but my lit teacher said that it was so you have to interpret it as one. if you dont then it makes it look like any regular book that you would read.
I saw the show in Chicago and it was brilliant! The story is so honest and heart-felt. Harvey did a magnificent job of not turning the show into a cliched "gay" play.
I love this book! I am a professional graphic designer that does not know how to write any JavaScript. I just wanted to be able to create more dynamic pdf files. The author did a great job explaining the JavaScript used in this book in a way that non programmers can grasp!Mr. Deubert was also very gracious in helping me customize one of the scripts in his book to work for a specific project I had. He stands behind his product!I recommend this to anyone that is a non programmer looking to learn how to use JavaScript with Acrobat.
Purchased this book knowing full well it was outdated, but for a beginner in PDF forms this was and is and excellent purchase. Came through quickly and in Excellent condition. I would recommend this book to anybody who is starting out creating and making forms more user friendly. Great Job, can't wait till the next book gets released... please put it on Kindle, Nook and iPad versions as well as Print.
Of all the books I have purchased lately this is one of the few that I read completely in a timely way. I purchased 3 copies, one of which I sent to my sister, one I have to give to someone?? whenever the spirit moves me. I love to buy from Amazon because the price is usually decent and it saves an old person lots of running around.
What can you say about a sweatshirt? It great, I've been wearing it for years now. I love it.
The illustrations in this book were first to catch my attention. Garden-lovers will feel right at home in these pages. But the story is also beautiful...about a child who has a goal and finds creative ways to achieve it. We found this book in the public library, but we need one to keep at home!
This is a wonderful read. It makes a great bedtime story and it is also beautiful (the wood carvings) and inspiring. This is good for people tired of reading what is wrong with the environment. The Man Who Planted Trees is kind of like a sophisticated Lorax book. Anyway, buy this book and enjoy it!
Jean Jiono's meandering myth works at so many levels I have no idea where to start. The parable touches on personal dedication, patience, the chance of ecological redemption, and ironies introduced when the loner comes to the authorities' attention. The pace seems Zen-like, even monastic, as the speaker touches The Man's life at intervals of years.McCurdy's woodcuts complement the story perfectly, with gently elegant renderings of some selected moments from it. The images' black and white simplicity reinforces the simple life of The Man and the understated character of the writing.But, despite the words and images coming across in such a low-key way, I found the story deeply moving. It inspires me, too -- but inspires me to what? I really couldn't say, but I'm not sure I need to.-- wiredweird
This is a delightful allegory, offering hope to change the world by the persistence of one man, working one day at a time, over many years. Written after the ravages of World War I, this story tells the tree planter in all of us that the seeds of one person's dreams will change the lives of thousands.The wood block prints are an added bonus. I've given this book to sons, to foresters, and to those who need hope in troubled times.
Jean Giono's inspiring little book "The Man Who Planted Trees" explores the contrast between earth husbandry and war-mongering, succeeding on nearly every level. The true power in the work is in it's simplicity, mirrored in Michael McCurdy's wonderfully detailed black-and-white wood engravings which illustrate the work.In a well-written afterword, Norma Goodrich explores Giono's linkage of literature as a balm for hopelessness with a dream to reforest the earth (which may sound like a bit of a stretch, and requires a descent to humanistic sappiness, alas).This book should appeal to readers of all ages.
This book was amazing The way the author made it sad and very exciting. The book made me want to read even more. But why were the adults the only ones to die instead of the kids. The book could've been better and more sad and exciting.
As an adult who loves children's fantasy and survival novels, this was a real page-turner. It sounds morbid to say I 'enjoyed' the book, but I don't think that was the author's intent. I felt a gloom and sense of foreboding dread the entire time. It's gritty, real, and very immersing, even heartbreaking at times to consider the story of these kids and how they would grow and develop without adults in the world. It was reminiscent of Lord of the Flies and Red Dawn, with a little bit of Stephen King's 'The Stand' thrown in for good measure, but it wasn't derivative of any of these.I must also say that the style of writing was very different and engaging - these two authors have a great voice, style, and the prose flows right along - impressive without being obtrusive. I'm very excited about reading the rest of the series.
This is an off white color. More of a vanilla than a white. Ive used it a few times though, and like the color . The shipping tube is a great storage tube when not in use.
the DVD is grainy, and the story does deviate from the text somewhat. The packaging is nicer than the one for the Richardson "Hound of the Baskervilles," but I would still say that the Granada version with Jeremy Brett is the better of the two.
This was the first book by Garwood that I have ever read. She has the most intriguing way of ending almost every chapter with one liners that compels the reader to read on. In chapter 24 she carries the reader on an emotional climax only to have it come racing back to reality with one devastating line.I will definitely have to read more of her works, and would highly recommend her.
I really loved this book. When I read the Secret I thought then that the characters of Brodrick and Ramsey would be great for another book. I'm so glad she used them for this one. Ransom had such a great story with wonderful heroes and villans I loved to hate.
ONCE AGAIN JULIE GARWOOD HAS WRITTEN A BOOK WHERE I CAN'T PUT IT DOWN. ALL I WANT TO DO IS READ, READ, READ. I FEEL THAT I AM BEING TAKEN BACK IN TIME AND THAT I AM ACTUALLY A PART OF THE STORY, A THIRD PARTY, OF COURSE. RANSOM WAS A FUN-LOVING BOOK WITH OLD CHARACTERS RETURNED FROM THE SECRET, AND THEY HAVE A MAJOR ROLE, NOT JUST A FLY-BY- NIGHT MENTION.
The Ransom book by Julie Garwood is truely riviting and the characters come to life. I have this book in paper as well as on Kendal book. this is one of my favorite books by far. I have read this Ransom about 5 times now from cover to cover. Everytime i read it i capture the true essense of Characters. I would love to see the younger generation in the books to come spring to life. I cannot seem to get enough of Julie's, characters; Ian, Brodrick, Ramsey Patrick and their wives, I would love to see the story unfold more.Thank you for your stories they are truley inspirational! A devoted Fan!
I liked this book. The characters are very enjoyable and the plot was interesting. It was a little predictable though...
I have to say that I have read all of Ms. Garwood's books and by far this one is my favorite. I have read it over several times and still love it each and every time!
I must admit, it's been a while since Ms. Garwood has written a really and truly good story. The characters were well-developed and the plot just complicated enough so as not to be predictably boring. She was my first and, still is, my favorite romance author. This one I just COULD NOT put down! I finished it in a day! for anyone who loves historicals, this one is definitely a must read! :)
This is another great book by Garwood. I will admit, though, the beginning was kind of confusing with too many characters all at once. But, if you stick with it, all falls into place and it turns into another great read like all of her others. I'm a fan.
I love Julie Garwood's historical romance novels, especially the ones that have to do with the Highlands. Reading this book was like catching up with old friends from the book The Secret. If you haven't read The Secret you should read that first then read Ransom so that you will be familiar with the characters. You will fall in love with Brodick and his gruff nature but you will see that he is just a pussycat, I just wish that Ramsey and Bridgid's story was a bit more longer. Either way I would definitely recommend this book to read.
I am a huge fan of Julie Garwood. I have read every single book of hers. But Ransom is deffinitely my favourite. Why I loved the book? First of all, the heroine is not a weak, silly girl. She is strong and the way she behaves and holds herself when she is in pain was amazing. Second, I can feel the love between Brodick and Gillian every time I read the book (and I assure you, I have read this book for 4 times already). Besides, every single dialog means something and I never got bored while I was reading the book. The third thing is deffinitely this is not only plain romance between 2 people but also there are intrigues and real conflicts pulling the reader in. There are always something happening through the book so you never get bored. I would like to say a little about why I didnt like the book but there is not even one reason!!! 100% loved it !!!
I loved this story!!! If you are like me and you reread all her stories this will be added. It did not lack or miss anything. I came away from this book with a smile on my face. "Come the Spring" and "The Wedding" just seemed to lack the depth that I've come to expect from Julie Garwood and I was hoping and praying to see the old Julie back in evidence. It was wonderful. Now I would like to read all about Nicholas and Clare's story from "Saving Grace".
To Ms. Garwood: I own every book you have ever written and was absolutely delighted to find some of my most favorite characters in this book. This book is so filled with love and laughter that I *had* to read it from cover to cover, and was sad to finally close the book on such vivid personalities. Should you be inclined to allow any of the other characters fall in love in a third book, I would be thrilled!
I'm one of those people who says she wouldn't be caught dead with a romance novel. Imagine my surprise when a friend loaned this to me and told me it was a mystery, which she knows I love and I finally relized it was a romance! Julie Garwood lovingly developes her characters; she interests, involves and excties this reader and tells me a wonderful story. I ran right out and bought the "prequel" "The Secret" wherein we meet the Maitland clan and many of "Ransom's" characters. My note to Ms Garwood is, 'Please, please', take us home with Gillian Buchannan to the places and people she has not met, and keep us in touch with the Sinclairs and the Maitlands. A trilolgy would be such a joy!!
I'll skip the synopsis since many of the reviews have already thoughtfully provided them. :)After reading The Secret, I knew I just had to pick up its sequel. Brodick was such an interesting character. I feel as though this book dulled Brodick's personality. Throughout the book, I kept hoping that Julie Garwood would show more facets of Brodick's character. Also, I was hoping that she would provide more details about Ramsey and how he found love. The brief glimpses you see of Ramsey and Bridgit are the same scene on repeat. It'd be better if she took out Ramsey's story or make another novel out of it. It would be much more appealing. I'm not saying that this isn't a great love story. It just lacks some of the finer points that have been in her other novels.
Now, when most people think of Historical Romances, they wouldn't be necessarily wrong if they lumped it all into the Harlequin Romance genre. But a well-written Historical Romance or HR for future reference, can be a beautiful thing! I never read an HR for the sexual content, as is the first comment I get when I tell them I'm reading this genre. The sexual content is least of what interests me, if at all! A well written HR explores much more! It is usually a study in period norms which includes dress, habits, transport, architecture, literature, art, lifestyle, fashions, speech, vocabulary, historical facts and characters loosely or not so loosely based in fiction, etc.!!!Julie Garwood captures these features in her characters with Ransom! She has a truly refreshing take on the dashing knight and the princess-in-need-of-rescue theme! ...www.ramblingsofbookworms.blogspot.com
I think my favorite parts of this story involve how the different clans had to work together, here. I feel like we never got to see the fabled Buchanan Spartans, though, which was a bummer for me.Sweet story with one and a half heroines and one and a half heroes. Couple of surprises and highlanders who were, predictably, clueless about their feelings.I think these stories have been charming but I perhaps need to space my reading of them so that they don't feel so similar.Still, a good story, involving and fun and one that leaves you with the "Awww...." and "Finally!" there at the end. :)
I have always loved Julie Garwood's books and am ALWAYS waiting for her to come out with something new. Ransom is not one of her best books, but it was still good. She is such an exceptional writer that it seems hard for her top what she's already done. The characters Brodick and Gillian seemed to be missing something. They just didn't seem like they were as well suited for each other as some of the characters from her other novels. I was actually more interested in Ramsey and Gillian and really think they deserved their own book. That would be a GREAT story, I think.
It was wonderful, I could hardly wait to get home and read it. I was thrilled to find out what happend with Judith and Frances Catherine. Ms Garwood is my favorite author. This was truly one of Ms. Garwoods finest books.
This was actually two romances in one--although the Gillian-Brodick romance takes center stage, and the Bridgid-Ramsey relationship develops in the margins. But you won't mind.Like the other reader who would have liked a little more history, I too would have liked a little more detail from the period. The novel's real strength is that it really moves along...you really feel like you are on an adventure with these characters. While with some novels you can see a predictable conclusion on the horizon, this one really keeps you guessing. I really couldn't guess how things were going to end. What fun!The characters are also very likable--Brodick is a man who wins you over by his compassion and his rough edges.Overall, a very enjoyable read that I too found very hard to put down (I read well into the evening one night!).
I was held completely enthralled through the first half of this book. i loved the setting and it's description. I loved the heroine and the 'wee lad' she took under her wing. My only problems with it were that, for me, there weren't enough love scenes, and they arrived too late in the story...and the fact the author decided to throw in another couple into the mix, without fully fleshing out their story. I think Ms. Garwood should have stuck to her main protagonists and left the other couple for another book
Ramsay Sinclair and Brodick Buchanon, make a reappearance in this new novel as the heroes. Both now Lairds, they must discover who plots to harm Ramsay's young brother. In the process they meet two remarkable women who disrupt their lives and teach them about love. Fun to read, with a lot of action, adventure and ludicrous dialogue between these feisty women and their oh-so-stubborn suitors, this book keeps you turning the pages. However...Aside from the fact that all of the characters fall in love too quickly for me to keep track of, this book was a great read with the exception of the weak ending. Ms. Garwood, made the women appear both weak and weepy, when those words are a far cry from their indomitable characters. A better attempt could have been made to keep the characters true to form.
Good story wish it would continue into another story line. Love this book but where is the next one to follow
I have read all of her books and I think she is a fantastic writer. Ransom is by far one of her BEST books. No body else can compare to her!!
RANSOM was wonderful. A compelling plot and characters that come to life. I laughed and then I cried and then I laughed again. Garwood is the best at weaving a touching story. I highly recommend this book.
Gillian is summoned by the man who murdered her father when she was a child to determine the location of a stolen treasure. As she tries to find a long-lost sister who may have the treasure, Gillian turns to Scottish chieftain Brodick. As he tries to help her find the treasure and save her uncle, she unwittingly marries Brodick, who has decided he will simply take what he wants, a tradition of his people that does not sit well with English-born Gillian. His strength and bravery win her over, however, as the two take on all of England to clear her father's name and restore her family's legacy.This is a well-spun tale. Although the Highlanders are a little edgy and rough, and Gillian keeps changing from flimsy damsel in distress to fighting, serious-wound-enduring heroine, I liked the pair and their many cohorts. Not a believable story in many respects, but an entertaining one.
I compare it to a cross between: Kruder & Dorfmeister vs. DJ Cam's mixed cd... has a lil' of that Theivery Corp. flavor too!It didn't surprise me much, but then again, it didn't put me to sleep either....
I agree that this is a valuable addition to the small library of books for working mothers. But a heads up-- this is more of a bound packet than a book. It has a photocopied-type cover and looks like it was printed on a standard laser printer with double spaced Times New Roman font. Publishers-- someone work with the author to get a shiny new updated version please!
That is the cutest baby on the cover that I've ever seen in my whole life. It's about time that a successful lawyer found a way to structure her career around her family!
Enlightening book on why even though you are a winner in the long run your short term fluctuations can be so large. Great section on bankroll requirements.
The story of young Christopher Chant and how he grows in to both his magic and his inheritance. To Christopher the landscape beyond his bedroom which leads to multiple worlds seems normal. It takes time for adults to realise he can access these worlds, and longer still for Christopher to understand the barriers to his own magic and the full extent of his powers. This book is conceptually vast, yet is also a fast paced adventure/mystery/fantasy story. I greatly enjoyed this book, which I read in one sitting, and look forward to reading the rest of the series.
If you are into fantasy, adventure, humor, or all of the above, you have to read The Lives of Christopher Chant. I own a copy of it and would highly reccomend it to everyone. If you have read this book and enjoyed it, you should also read Witch Week, Charmed Life, The Magicians of Caprona, and everything else written by Diana Wynne Jones.
I have viewed a number of Kettlebell WO's, especially with female instructors. MOst are boring, too aerobic in nature and use light bells. This one is an instructional video at the beginning, emphasizing form always. I admit the rest periods can be longer if you're using a lighter bell weight but up that and you'll be thankful. She gives a rundown of beginning, intermediate and advanced with reps and rest. It's the way to start a program, no doubt.
I was drawn to this DVD because of the title. It is a great workout, both cardio and strength. Lisa herself has communicated with me a few times to check in to see how I was doing and that impressed me a lot. Being new to exercising, I was not sure what to expect from this workout. Lisa's introduction on how to properly use the bells was great and is a workout in itself. I started out using a 10 lb. weight, even though she recommends 15-20 lbs. for women. The workouts are long enough so you feel it, but not too long as to interfere with your daily life. I am impatiently awaiting the second DVD from her. The only thing negative I can say is I wish I would have known what weights were recommended before purchasing. Overall, the exercised are great and really work different muscles than if you just used regular free weights. There are 3 workouts, upper, lower and circuit and all leave me feeling like I got a great workout.
Love it! I have been watching VT since college and I'm 31 and still love them! My son LOVES watching the VT sing-a-longs in the car, and this one was perfect for the Christmas season!
The gorgeous illustrations caught my eye and so I picked up the book for the first time. What a wonderful story. Kipling has a way of writing that just flows and makes reading the story out loud a pleasure just to hear the words.
The book's focus is on carefully explaining what quantum field theory is. Starting from classical field theories, ie. the harmonic chain, Greiner goes on to discuss 2nd quantization for spin 0, 1/2, and spin 1 fields. The results are then applied to derive the perturbation expansion for interacting fields. The last sections on quantization with path integrals is also well written, and contains more details than eg. Sakurai. Throughout, many (sometimes tedious, but) instructive examples are presented that lots of other authors just assume to be understood already.
Well, if you are looking for a synopsis of the series, look at disk 1.This is probably one of my faovrite animes, and it's about time they brought it to the USA.Well now the important notes. This series DVDs as with most anime series DVDs are being released every other month. The doll that comes with the set has her feminine features far to over accentuated. I think mile long legs are great, but 2-3 mile long legs. Just get the regular DVD and save yourself a 10 spot.
I bought this for a backup power for our company data center. It has come in handy a couple of times and it works great. We have not used the radio or the Power utlity much but all features work well enough. I am happy with the Black and Decker lantern and would recommend it.
I purchased this cd when it first came out, largely because it contained some unsung ministry. I was not disappointed. The songs are good, but second to his live ministry. My favorite is the story he tells about picking up a hitchhiker who ends up a little "ripe" from not having bathed, and how easy it was to dismiss him, but how our Heavenly Father puts up and actually loves us through the foul stench of our sin. On this cd, Rich used humor and personal experiences to demonstrate God's love for a fallen people. Definitely worth hearing more than a few times.
1st let me say you're supposed to review the book, not give us a character assassination of Mike Murdock. Mike Murdock has an impeccable record (financial AND spiritual.) Moving on.....this book is filled with scriptures and insights as to how Jesus is a true leader and how you can follow His teachings. A great book for personal and professional development!
It takes a special person to point out the wondorous truths contained in the Bible which have been clamouring for the average person to incorporate them into their lives.Many Thanks and God's blessings to Mike Murdock. And, a wonderful experience awaits the next person to read this book.
This disk captures performances he gave in France, where he lived for years. (He was French Creole and spoke French from his childhood.) If you share my husband's and my enthusiasm for Bechet, don't let this disk get away from you.
I have some of my biggest exams ahead of me in the next week. About a month ago I wasn't sure if i was going to be able to understand all of the information that we've been going over for the entire year of biology. There were some parts that i was really struggling to understand. When i got a hold of BioTutor Excalibur i quickly put it to use. I first attempted just some of the chapters we were on. After seeing how much they helped me with what we were studying i began to use every chapter such as a practice exam. I really feel like i am now ready to take this exam. Thanks BioTutor!
I read this book years ago and now I am writing this because I have come across another book,Tortured for Christ, that I will be picking up. A few years before that was published, however, this one was. Let me tell you, after reading this gripping, sad and eventually triumphant (how else would he have been able to get this in print?) story, I never, never again had any shred of respect for Castro. I probably didn't anyway, but ignorance doesn't excuse it. After reading this, I have never trusted anything I have heard or read about that man or his regime if it purports to be something "good" about communist Cuba. Not the people, the regime. This story is one that needs to be read and shared, especially now as we seem to moving toward "de-thawing" the relationship with this thug. I don't pretend to know much more than what I have read and seen. I'm not of Cuban descent. For what people may think of this dictatorship, this book brings out some sad accuracy.
I first got hooked on autobiographies, when I read a book by Richard Wurmbrand. Then a friend told me about this book and I got it immediately, and read it in about 2 days. I'm not a reader, like seriously, I don't enjoy reading at all. But I couldn't put this book down. Noble Alexander was an incredible man of God and I am humbled and challenged when I read his story. This book will change your life!
This is a terrific book with terrific material to present. It is part of a wonderful series. The organization, text, photos, and drawings are all excellent. More authors/publishers should learn to present architecture this well. It's a book I study often for inspiration as Forbes' work is very elegant and spare: qualities more architects should aspire to incorporate into their work, rather than the stylistic faddish gestures all too common today. This is a favorite book in my library.
Written in Nynorsk, very hard going for someone who only reads Bokmaal as second language. To my surprise, a friend who reads Swedish undestands the language of the book better than I do. Swedish is apparently closer to old Norwegian than is Bokmaal. What's needed for success: a very good Nynorsk-English or Nynorsk-Bokmaal dictionary. However, the reproductions of paintings by Jarle Rosseland would make the book worthwhile even if you can't read it! The feeling of the saga era is strongly captured and protrayed in those pictures. Where to find the book: through a second bookshop in Oslo. I bought mine new in Oslo in 1993.According to the Vinland Saga, Snorri is also the name of the first European child born in America.
Like the other reviewers, really like these levels. Not as pictured. Rubber ends are now yellow not black and the center vile is trimmed with yellow plastic minus the two screws shown. All that aside, they arrived dead solid perfect no thanks to the scant packaging. The levels themselves are great.
Excellent documentary with impressing images of the battle in the winter russian.However, the sounds it's not good. Subtitles in english could be better.
I am a histroy buff, and I thought this was a great movie. Very intense, very good quality production, war is indeed hell....
I just purchased this item from amazon. Its quality is just average. But with 2 knives for less than 10 dollars, it is a good deal. By comparison on average, a retractable knife at HD cost $10. The best quality utility knife I has is a retractable Lenox. Just holding it will convince you, but it costs 15 dollars for one knife.Its quality deserves 3 stars, but the price give it one more.
I have been a punk fan for about 2 years now, and never have I heard such a strong debut album (I think it's their debut). Two of my favourite bands are Lagwagon and Ten Foot Pole. In my opinion, this CD is like a combination of the two bands. The harmonies and melodies are like those characteristic of Lagwagon, and the singer sounds like Dennis from TFP. Put this together with the lightning fast drumming of, say, NOFX, and there you have Over It - The Ready Series.
Every cartoony thing the man has done... Early through Zap and into the 90's. No more need be said. (his commentary is worth the price.
As a former combat engineer of the Vietnam War era, I liked this series because it shows some good history of my field. It has some great old photos which will make this series good for preserving history. Combat Engineers may not get the glory of the Infantry, Armor or Artillery units, but they are vital to any war effort, and this series demonstrates that fact. I am looking forward to the next episodes.
I really love this CD. Halley's songwriting and lyrics combine an incredible emotional depth with a powerful rock and roll sound that will blow you away! These songs have a groove that will make you wish you were dancin' in a club when you listen to them. You'll want to listen again and again to catch every word of the soulful lyrics.cerrato@ptechinc.com
I went to a Hilton and slept on the most comfortable pillow and then bought it. I love the softness of the down with the firmness of the foam that also keeps the quills from poking me in the head.
This reasonably priced, sturdy refrigerator seems to be doing the job it advertised. A great value for this discounted price, it is also an attractive item for your kitchen, bar or pantry. I don't know if they had Houdini doing the counting, though...I cannot possibly imagine how one could configure it into holding SEVENTEEN (!) bottles of wine!
I bought this to use as extra space when my husband comes home from the farmer's market with too much stuff. I didn't want one with the tiny freezer. And I wanted one with an old fashioned compressor, because I try not to use the AC much. It cools quickly, and hardly makes a sound..a faint hum and a few gurgles from time to time. I cant hear it at all from the next room. On a very humid day, which is every day of a Baltimore summer, there is condensation on the front glass. I inserted a piece of the packing styrofoam on the inside and it helps. So I guess the front glass panel is not well insulated...but for 99 dollars from a big box store...its a pretty good deal....I have had it a few weeks. I know compressors can last varying lengths of time...it is the luck of the draw. I will try to remember to update in a year or when it fails....
It's intelligent, insightful, and very funny. Brilliant performances by Julie Walters and Michael Caine in a story that you wish was true. I see very little that can be improved here, and it's one of those very rare films that I'll put back on my little shelf to watch again later.
All I can say is Caine is the bomb and he makes alot of his "I need beans" expressions in this film!
First off - just before I start - Rita is not Cockney. Cockneys come from the East End of London, which is in the Southeast. Rita is a Scouser (like The Beatles) who comes from Liverpool, in the Northwest. Just wanted to clear that one up!I watched this in an English lesson at school, and Walters and Caine give two of the finest performances of their respective careers. The story might be predictable, but that's one of the best things about it. Anything by Willy Russell gets my vote, anyway. Maureen Lipman is also fab.
I believe in the power of education to change people, so as a university professor myself, this is one of my favorite films. Michael Caine, one of the most prolific actors of our time, and Julie Walters both provide memorable performances. And there are wonderful nuances in this film. Notice, for example, how Rita (Walters) has trouble with the door handle as she tries to enter Frank's (Caine's) office the first time. Others have pointed out some of the technological shortcomings on this DVD, but the heartwarming content overshadows any of these non-fatal flaws and makes it a winner nonetheless.
I saw this movie years ago in the theatre, and it totally captivated me. Julie Waters and Michael Caine make a wonderful student and teacher team. You can feel sorry for Michael Caine's character, with his drinking and feelings of worthlessness. I wish I had had a relationship with my teachers as Julie Waters has with Mr. Caine in this film. The end scene at the airport, leaves you feeling that both characters really had found a type of love for each other. It is a beautiful moment when Michael Caine hugs Julie Waters. Watch the facial expressions on both actors, and you will feel a deep warmth in your heart. Watch this video and enjoy and discover what is a keepsake of unspoken love.Sue
If there ever was an album that says "Roll Another Number" it's this mellow, funky little gem. Whenever I listen to this I want to call up the bro's for a BBQ, chill out with some 40's rollin' fatties and talkin' about the ladies. OH YEAH!! If you like this music check out "Jalamanta" and Che- "Sounds of Liberation" if you can find'em. This is music for the people..Get it on!!
brant bjork's music is complete. This is dense,juicy rock. the type of stuff that you'll crank in the car driving 100 miles an hour in the middle of the night.the small minds of rock critics would lean on the old "stoner rock" cliches, but Bjork's stuff is beyond that. these are good sounds...true,thick, spacey, simple. the grooves nail you in the gut and keep you awake through the dark of night. LOUD is the word!
This album rules.its different the other stoner stuff hes played on but who evers listened to Che will know what to expect. it kind of remnds me of a more funkier masters of reality. i can see how some wont appreciate it but you cant please everyone. go for this if you like it mellow, chilled out and melodic
This is an excellent reference book, listing all types of bulbs, from the common garden variety to the more obscure varieties. Listings also include all the hybrids and new cultivars. The book is well set out with many colour photos of the different species. A must for any home library and avid gardeners anywhere.
Great music, really surprising. My demographics - over 60, white male, big into music in 1960s and 70s, not so much now, listen to the best jazz station in the nation 91.1 or KCSM.org. Still rock out. Was a berkeley type for decades. I have seen Johnny Otis three times starting in 1964. Still didn't realize the tremendous variety of his music. Real R&B (not the crap they call R&B today), jazz, blues, race record pop sounds, rock and roll. Great album. Get it.
This is the seminal work on the poor in America, analyzed within the context of government proffered, anti-poverty programs. It is a scathing critique and analysis of the war on poverty, where bold rhetoric and political grandstanding have often supplanted action. The author in his analysis categorizes poverty as a cultural and often institutional way of life that would require radical innovations, social planning, and long term financial investment, were the government really serious about eradicating poverty in America. What is amazing is that the arguments made by the author, when he wrote this over book forty years ago, are still sound today.
This is the seminal work on the poor in America, analyzed within the context of government proffered, anti-poverty programs. It is a scathing critique and analysis of the war on poverty, where bold rhetoric and political grandstanding have often supplanted action. The author in his analysis categorizes poverty as a cultural and often institutional way of life that would require radical innovations, social planning, and long term financial investment, were the government really serious about eradicating poverty in America. What is amazing is that the arguments made by the author, when he wrote this book forty years ago, are still sound today.
I had to read this book for my History 1302 class and I must say I'm glad I chose this book out of all the others. The book was very easy to read, however, it sometimes gets confusing when all the facts about poverty are referenced at the same time. Although this book is short, at certain times it feels like Harrington is dragging out his ideology. Nonetheless, This book opened my eyes to the poverty in America not only in the past, but at its' present state.
I have been teaching Reiki for many years using different books, finally there is a book that is clear and has all the correct information in a format a beginner can understand. This book explains the Reiki story so clearly without disclaiming the original story that appears in most other Reiki books. The pictures of the hand placements are wonderful and I like the additional placements also. I believe the stories throughout the book add a special dimension showing the flexibility and depth that Reiki can be used. This book has taken the number one position in my Reiki library. Thank you, thank you, thank you!
I highly recommend this Reiki book. It is a wonderful guide for a beginner like myself. The photos are clear and the writing is interesting and insightful.
With such names as Jazzanova, Rainer Truby Trio, MAW, Ian Pooley and Cujo (aka Amon Tobin), this compilation could do no wrong. Tracks were selected by Rainer Truby, a well-respected Compost project, and a guy with a low profile and a great musical instinct (check out his Glucklich series). UK's Nuphonic, along with SF's Ubiquity, is TMHO the world's no 1 label in dancefloor-friendly nu-jazz; watch out for their releases, and let everybody else wait 1-2 years for the next 'ground-breaking' and 'genre-defining' compilation from Guidance.
JIM THE BOY is a slight, sweet tale, told in a voice as true as childhood itself. Perhaps its most important lesson is that the word "father" can have countless meanings, all of them important. While this may not exactly be the "great American novel," I enjoyed Tony Earley's simple story of a Depression-era southern boyhood immensely. It has an ageless appeal that will span generations. Well done. - Tim Bazzett, author of LOVE, WAR & POLIO and the REED CITY BOY trilogy.
Jim the Boy by Tony Earley is a sweet novel set in North Carolina during the late 1920's. Unlike other books set in the South of recent memory, though, this book doesn't describe an abused young man or a dysfunctional family but rather one of great strength.Although Jim's father dies only a matter of days before he was born, Jim is raised by his mother and three uncles who never married. Throughout the book, it is these men, who earn their livelihood from farming, who teach Jim some of life's greatest lessons. From learning how to hoe a field to confronting a firends devestating illness to seeing the grandfather he never knew as this old man lays dying, we as readers journey along as Jim experiences life between his tenth and eleventh birthday.Reminiscent of the equally lyrical style found in Plainsong by Kent Haruf, this book is a pleasant read for a summer's day.
This is a book about the spiritual nourishment of a young soul. It is as patiently and impeccably crafted as a fine piece of simple furniture, made without glue, nails, or embellishment. Smooth and beautiful without a false or unnecessary move. Very few authors today have that restraint, finesse, and wisdom.
This book will do more to restore the human heart andantimaterialism than all the polemical works in the world. It isabout dignity and faith, sure of hand, deceptively simple. Buy it. Treasure it. Share it...
The readers who call this 'children's fiction' are missing the point. this novel is an homage to books (like 'the yearling') that remind us why life is good. it counters the trend of life-as-angst. remember reading novels that made you feel GOOD? probably its been since grade school, right? This book isn't for kids; they'd miss all its symbolism and subtlety. it will remond you why you loved reading in the first place. even its cover art made me smile.
Tony Early tells the story of Jim with such straight-forward simplicity that you forget that you are, in fact, just reading a book. You can feel the heat of the sun on the boy's shoulders as he spends a day with his uncles in the corn field; feel his yearning to know the father who died just a week before he was born. I could go on, but I can't top Early. Go read this book! I doubt that I'll read a better one this year.
Probably one of the better short character novels written in recent time.Mr. Early has caught the feelings, time and people of this part of NC in a way that, I think, few have ever done. The wonderful relationships between a boy, his mother and uncles is as close to what a truly caring family could ever be.Read this book.
Jim the Boy by Tony Earley is a wonderful novel...beautifully written, poetic without being overblown or contrived, moral without being preachy. I recommend it highly.
Life during the Great Depression was harsh. We see it through the eyes of a ten year old, boy, Jim. Yet the simplistic rigors or farm life lend strength, discipline, and tenacity to this little boy coming of age in Aliceville, North Carolina. His widowed mother and three endearing uncles help Jim face the turning points in his life with courage. The illness of a friend, the coming of electricity, and the marriage proposal his mother receives expands his world, and his adventures in a different local begin anew. Through his eyes, we remember ourselves as children, and easily identify with his perceptions. Touching and engaging.
I often times have trouble thinking of gifts for my three grown children for Christmas. I ordered each of them Life's, "One Nation" and paged through it after it arrived. Not only is it beautifully put together, but it served as a reminder of the horrifying, heinous crime committed on all of the innocent people at the WTC and the Pentagon. If you ever questioned, for one second, our countries mission to find those cold hearted, controlling, crazy bastards, the book WILL remind you of the rage you felt the day it happened..guaranteed.
This book really showed patriotism. I loved it and the pictures were extreme. It was a great book for anyone, any age. I really enjoyed the book, but it made me sad.
Pictures. These will remind you. Haunting. Sad. Heart wrenching. Moving. These words won't do it for you. The book will give you more. Over 3000 people died that day. This book will help you to never forget what happened to them and us.
It is a beautiful book. Horrific, unforgettable images and a lot of tragic emotions. I would not mind to see a bit less of the American point of view, less sentimentality and more universal view, but that's only my opinion. Overall, it's a keeper.
This book contains some great photos of 9/11. Among the most striking are the dual page spreads on pages 72-73 and 92-93. Take a look for yourself at the unburnt paper everwhere and the satalite photo of the "Dust Plume/Cloud" respectively.Then do yourself a favor and take a look at the only foresic scientific study of the evidence.Where Did the Towers Go? Evidence of Directed Free-energy Technology on 9/11
i just want to say this is one of the most moveing and inspiring books iv ever read.Its history and its worth every cent and more.i bought 5 books as gifts for christmas. and everyone loved them.every picture is detailed to what happend..and the storys in the book is from the personal lifes of everyone like fireman.police man.ect..you got to buy it ..!!!!Roger.
Just like all books on patterns, this gives you the feeling of 'oh, this is soooo obvious' the first reading it. The fact is that a second after reading it you start thinking and talking about brown bags, angles and evangelists and refer to the book all the time. Linda and Mary Lynn give us an idiom, a very very useful idiom.Also, the book is funny. Must read.
Bill Engvall is totally funny in this video, espically when he talks about taking his F16 flight.
If you want to spend a fun evening with someone, watchingthis DVD is the perfect way to do it. It had us both institches. Bill Engvall is funny, funny, funny and doesn'thave to use foul words to do it.
I first saw 15degrees off cool on Comedy Central. I can't remember when last I laughed so hard. It was hilarious especially his last story about the air force.
Bill Engvall has been around for a long time and has produced some very funny CDs/DVDs. This is also great but not quite as good as previous efforts. Maybe Bill is a bit tired - what with movies, TV shows etc. Still worth buying however.
Both my cats love to dig their claws into these cardboard scratchers. They're indoor/outdoor cats, and when they're in the mood to sharpen their claws, they tend to use whatever piece of furniture happens to be closest. I've never been able to break them of this habit, so these things are a godsend. As long as I keep several lying around, they'll use them instead of table legs and upholstered chairs.
Since I am owned by nine cats and am grandmama to three more, I have bought numerous cardboard scratchers. Cosmic Pet Double Wide Scratcher is by far the best. The cardboard frame and scratcher are both durable, lasting many months. When one side is shredded, the scratcher can be turned over so the other side can be used. Packets of Cosmic Pet catnip are included for sprinkling over the scratcher. I think Cosmic Catnip is as good as my homegrown...much fresher looking and less junk-filled than many other catnip products. My cats certainly look forward to it. The double wide size is most suited for my fat cats.
We can't say enough about this cat scratcher. No other cardboard scratchers can come close to this brand. Plus, the extra wide version is wonderful for my big Ally/Tom cats. They are all around 12 pounds. We have three cats and two scratchers last quite a long time since you can flip them. They love to lay on them and even bite them. Wonderful, wonderful, wonderful product!
In a selflessly honest appreciation for bare life, this book opens to a yearning for that which the modern human is in search of; the straining of life against its inevitable end to recapture innocence, grace before the fall, love, or what is even more mysterious, forever lost, and finally unattainable. The anxiety of these stories is deafening as you hope against hope for your own salvation along with the characters' in their quiet desperation for another life, so exigent as to be a matter of life and death; a struggle too unfathomable to dare come into consciousness, though felt every moment throughout the living flesh. You will find yourself in this book.
This is the album in which the Sci-fi, metal saga of the Iron Savior starts. Kai Hansen's influence and style are more than evident here. For me it's one of the best albums of the 90's. The concept of the story is really good and the song writing and the performance brilliant.I would really like to see this concept taken into a big budget movie, is fantastic. The following 3 albums continue and expand the story, but this is the first episode. Great music and a great idea. Recommended to all metalheads.
As an instructor of business writing, the exercises in the text are excellent. The chapters a bit dense for the casual student. However, the overall work teaches and focuses on true problems in the work place. The e-mail and memo writing materials nail it.
Smooth transaction. Got my book on time. Recommend others to buy textbooks from this person.
This was one of c-murders best album also look at Bossaline and life or deathTRU RECORDS
1st OF I AM A NL FAN 4 LIFE C CAME TIGHT ON THIS 1 I DONT EVEN HAVE THIS BUT I HEARD EVERY SONG WHAT U BOUT IS DA BEST SONG ON THERE I GOT ALL C'S CD'S BUT THIS MIGHT BE BETTER THAN LIFE OR DEATH I SUGGEST EVERY NO LIMIT FAN 2 GET THIS ESPECIALLY 4 THE BEATS.
yo, c-murder comes out w/ his 3rd solo album here...not as good as life or death but much better than his last album he put out...i gave it 4 cuz 5 for the first 4 for the third and 3 for the second albums he has made...he seems to start on top fall and regain himself...he is one of the few rapers that has a mellow blend and sound...sure he doesn't have much new to say this time around, but whose to say that thats a bad thing....hes got a sound that many dont have and thats what keeps people listening to him and geting others to come to him.....no one else on no limit has the ideas he has...'p' is a sell out...and silkk just i dunno, hes up and down on every song he does...those r the three origionals and since mystikal has now left no limit.all they got to help em is c here...i say that you should get this album cuz not much sounds like it...solid effort and will be listenin to this more down the road..peace
This is probably C-Murder's best album yet! Too Much Noise is my favorite song from it but the other songs that I like on here are Concrete Jungle, How A Thug Like It, Want Beef, Ride, Staring At The Walls, On Da Block, What You Bout, Where Do We Go, NL Iggaz, That Calliope, They Want My Money, Down For My N's(which is the exact same song from Snoop Dogg's album No Limit Top Dogg), and Street Thugs. Thug In Yo Life is an ok song, but the beat is kinda weak. Oh yeah, and the Otis Commercial and the Interlude right after it are hilarious! If I had a choice I would give this album 4.5 stars but I can only give it 4. If you don't believe me, go check this album out today and see for yourself!
This is first cd he produced on his own so I cut him some slack. It is a original concept for his cd. I love the guest appearences and the albums rhymes.
A book able to explain VB 6 in simple words with simplicity,I just bought the book for a program (VB 98) dated back to 1998, but a good book from the use I am given to it. All the topics are treated with sense and simplicity, making the language of programming easy. Good for everyone interested to learn the basics of VB 98.
I have read all of the series and I thought this was definately one of the best ones. I hated to see it end. My favorites though are the first 3 in the series. But this one was good and it had a surprise ending with some sci-fi thrown in. Fred Saberhagen is one of the all-time best in this genre, do yourself a favor and read his books.
I used this book for an undergraduate course in Analysis and was pleased with it. It is well-organized with poignant examples. The physical construction of the book, however, proved not to be as good as the content and it is quite worn.
I purchased this Cosmic Pet Alpine scratcher replacement kit and it fits perfect in my Whisker City Play cavern cat scratcher box. I just took the refill, pulled the two halves apart and have 2 refills for the Whisker City scratcher.
Johnny as a sociopath???? See it! If you are a fan you'll like it. Would have been a pretty good low budget thriler even without Cash, but it's a lot more fun with him.
This is one of the few religious books that just tells one side (the Roman Catholic faith) with no antagonism to any other side and no self-righteous pontificating! It is also very accurate as to what the Catholic Church professes to believe and why. This makes it a good book for non-Catholics to read who just want to know what Catholics really believe and function in their church.But it no easy read. This book is for serious study and not recreational reading.
I am in the process of converting to Catholicism after being raised Presbyterian. I found this book not only to be an easy-to-read and understand explanation of the basics of Catholic catechism, but an outstanding reminder of what Christianity means, should stand for and should strive to be.The topics are in depth, and there are subtle references to refute fundamentalist arguments often heard in 21st century America.I enjoyed this book and would recommend it!
I usually read more than one book together and found this a very good companion to Vatican II, the Crisis and the Promise. Even though, I am aware of most of the issues that are covered in these books, I find Alan Schreck to be an interesting writer on these topics. I find both books easy late night reading unlike many others that actually help me to go to sleep. I have actually found it hard to put down these books until I finish a chapter. His writings are highly readable and thoroughly convincing.
Clearly written explanation of the specific areas where Protestants have the most difficulty with Catholic teaching. I bought two, just so I'd have one to lend and one to keep!
In the preface to this new, revised 20th anniversary edition of Catholic and Christian, author Alan Schreck reflects upon the centrality of the Eucharist at the core of the Catholic tradition as John Paul II calls us to enter the "Year of the Eucharist". This book covers all of the topics we Catholics are frequently asked about in conversation by our non-Catholic friends: Mary, the Communion of Saints, the Pope and more. The book is not only of value for its apologetic purposes, but also for any Catholic (or for individuals wanting to inform themselves about the Faith) who wants to learn more about the traditions at the core of our Church. The topics covered remain timely in an era when many are striving to understand the true teachings of the Church.
I don't think I can say anything else that the previous reviewers haven't already noted. I have rated this book 5 stars simply because it earned it. However, I do have a quick reminder... that the book's purpose is to EXPLAIN, not to CONVERT.
I'm planning on loaning this book out to some of my Protestant friends who have misconceptions about Catholicism. Mr. Schreck successfully refutes such notions as "the Catholic Church puts its own hierarchy above scripture," "the Catholic Church teaches Pelagian works righteousness," and "Catholics deify Mary and the Saints." Mr. Schreck has done an excellent job of stating what Catholics really believe, as well as presenting the Scriptural foundations of those beliefs.
Hodges & Davis were great, and I wish more of their stuff were readily available. But this one appears to be a duplicate of "In a Mellow Tone". It has the same two artists and the same track list as ASIN B000008B9R. (Damn. And there were so few albums of these guys as it was!)
This is an excellent learning tool for those who want tolearn crochet. I'm an avid knitter but want to learncrochet especially in-the-round as I want to make my ownhats and caps, but I just couldn't find a book to get mestarted.This book has wonderful photos and close-ups of every technique.The projects are slanted towards younger adults but can beadapted for any age. A very well-thought-out book and easilyportable as it closes with its own velcro clasp. I highly recommend.
The first ep, on the tape is one where a new teacher shows up. If you've ever had a motivational speaker come to your school, this one will be hilarious. He is a perfect exaggeration of the people that always come to mine and I guess that's why I found it so funny. The second ep is where a new disciple shows up. He's totally against fighting and stealing, but is willing to do anything to learn master Happosai's techniques. This one's okay. I laughed a couple times through it, but overall any ranma fan should get this one. Plus Ukyo's in the first ep. My all time fav character. I wanted to give it 4 1/2 stars except it wouldn't let me. This was a great xmas gift.
I bought this for my adult friend who has a Pug, she just loves it, it is as cute as a button, all Pug-lovers would get a kick out of this little guy! Great transaction, speedy shipping, would highly recommend seller! Thanks!
"We shall break down all the walls-to let the green wind blow free from end to end-across the earth."No ordinary SF novel, "WE" questions the wisdom of 1920's Russian body politik, The Party. Banned and suppressed there, even today, Zamyatin's distopian nightmare demands of the reader a re-thinking of their rights to choose and the necessity of eternal change, r/evolution.Earnest and beautiful, one man's personal diary of the events surrounding the legislation of mandatory brain operations within a hermetically enclosed city-state, is a subtle, terse and poetic examination of fear of, and need for freedom. I highly reccommended to anyone without hesitation. Zamyatin's philosophical enquiry is personal and lyrical
This is more of a philosphy novel than anything else. There are intertwinnings with beautiful fantasy, pure logic and a personalisation that you will not find in 1984 or Brave N ew World. There are direct references to religion, science experiments that were the buzz of Zamyatin's time and still ring with us today.The main problenm with this book is for people to take it too seriously. This is partly a mix of an author's life and his fiction. The 70s feel is amazing considering the time it was written in. I recommend people not to take to heart that this book may have influenced 1984 and BNW because then you will read too much into this and not enjoy it.
I have alot of interest in the books 1984, and Burgess's 1985 who also wrote Clockwork Orange. This book was hard to read and really didnt make alot of sense most of the time. Is more Science Fiction than anything else-not a view of the future. The main character is found to have a "soul" which of course makes him mentally ill. Has alot of History to it but not much relevance. But Im certainly not the best one to review this book. I enjoyed 1984 very much.
This is a fine resource, though a virtually verbatim adaptation, using Canadian $ and tax law, of the earlier "Managing Your Inheritance" by Card and Miller. Unless you are inheriting in Canada, get the Card and Miller book....
I read "The Daughter of Time" as an adolescent, joined the Richard III Society in my twenties, wandered around Bosworth Field at thirty. Found Derek Jacobi's recording at a book sale last year and have listened to it many times since. Hearing a well-narrated book that you previously embraced while reading it is a unique pleasure. The opposite of loving a book, hating the movie. I am sorry that Derek Jacobi recorded no other Inspector Grant than this single book. His Inspector Grant is much different that Stephen Thorne's - they could never be mistaken for each other, and Stephen Thorne's is also brilliant.
Don't know how I missed Josephine Tey all these years. This is a very unusual, well written mystery. Very definitely a work of its time, as Adam Grant is a detective of his time and place. But well worth the read.
I am not a particular fan of the history of the British Monarchy or of mysteries, but "Daughter of Time" is an intensely intellectual read, albeit fiction. This is not a story for the passive reader, as it randomly visits different points in time, both "present" and past and invokes a series of questions which are ultimatley never answered. The most intiguing element is the supposition that history's account of King Richard III is flawed, either by purposeful acts of those who opposed him, or by mere consequence of events. "Daughter of Time" is quite difficult to follow at times and is best read when one is fully alert; a nice pot of hot tea or coffee will help. Not recommended for junior readers unless mystery is their forte'; the story is severely lacking in action although the tale is quite adventurous. See if you can unravel the mystery, if at all possible, then read "Spring Moon" by Bette Bao-Lord for a refreshing look at the opposite end of the world/political spectrum.
Dynamic and uncomplicated story that keeps unraveling with the speed of an avalanche.Set in an unexpected surroundings (a hospital), the story evolves around the investigationand subsequent discovery of the true reason behind the murders of the Two Princes in 1483.The writing style is engaging, full of interesting fact and witty comedic nuances that make one oblivious to the time it takes to finish the book. The author gets to the heart of matter without painting unnecessary surroundings. It's a well-written, entertaining book and I recommend it if you have an afternoon to kill.by Simon Cleveland
This is one of the 2 or 3 must reads in the entire history of detective fiction. It's also the book that was most responsible for popularizing the revisionist narrative of the life of Richard III. And it's an insightful study into the way history is recorded to suit the interests and prejudices of historians, including the "sainted Thomas More," who is taken to the woodshed.
I had only marginal interest in Richard III before but the book was so compelling that you are drawn into the search for how and why Richard got his reputation and now I am a fan of both Josephine Tey (the late) and Richard. Unusual detective story but the characters were so well differentiated that you will read it again.
I ordered two copies of the Daughter of Time for gifts. They arrived promptly and were in good condition.
I think readers who are more knowledgeable in British history will have even more fun reading this book. Although I am confuse by all the Richards, Edwards and Elizabeths and the lords and the ladies, I still think this is a wonderful story. The case is convincingly presented. I even had a vivid dream in which I was arguing for Richard III's innoncence!
Couldn't resist the Simon & Garfunkel reference.This is easily one of the best mysteries I have ever read, and believe me I do a lot of reading. While admittedly it sometimes gets a little difficult to follow at times, I found the whole premise so different and intriguing from other mysteries I have read that it kept me going. My first thought was it is surprising that other authors haven't really tried to duplicate this type of story, but I think anything would come up short. It's like hollywood trying to remake classics or follow the same storyline (it never works). There is only one "It's a Wonderful Life" and there is only one "Daughter of Time". I am looking forward to reading another Tey novel.
a different approach to what might have happend in the castle when richard III ruled england.you will become your own detective and come to your own conclusions. I looked for more books on richard III ever since josephine tey introduced me to him. Thank you J.T....
This book was recommended to me during a family discussion on whether or not Richard III was guilty of killing his two nephews. I expected this book to be a biography, but it is presented in a fiction form of an inspector and a student looking into the mystery of Richard III while the inspector was bedridden. The dialogue in the book is between the inspector and the student, who is doing the research at the British Museum. The student then brings the research information back to the bedridden inspector. There are some good points made in the book which casts doubt on the general history's portrait of Richard III as the evil uncle. Although the book is well written and make interesting points, I cannot help be wonder whether or not the information is fiction because of the way Tey presented the story. Tey shows alternate theories of what may have happened to the Princes in the Tower.
The format of a "whodunnit" is admirably suited to Josephine Tey's critical look at the reign of Richard III, the ambition of Henry VII, and the fact that it's the winner who writes the history that comes to be accepted as fact, whether or not it is, indeed, factual. This book is an excellent companion-read to Thomas More's "History of Richard III", puts a new term into my working vocabulary ("Tonypandy"), and shows Thomas More to have more(pun intended) of an interest in his future employment under Henry VII than he did of his life under Henry VIII. Too bad the image of Richard III on the cover is not the image described in the book; it would have been better to not put a new cover on this edition -- and that's my only objection.
It is a wonderful product, not greasy andleaves the skin feeling smooth.lt does all that itsays it should do.
I gave these silk Pajamas to my dad for his birthday. He told me " He never felt anything so wonderful in his life". They are without a question the best pajamas in the world!
The pajamas are an excellent quality of silk although I have to admit I have not washed them yet. They ironed easily and look great on my husband. I was impressed with the workmanship and detailed sewing. The 2X I ordered was ample considering at 6'3' and 225 pounds they fit. He is not broad in the shoulders so that problem was solved by having the cuffs shortened. My husband is comfortable in them and that is what counts.
didn't belive i would enjoy the cool comfort. usually i tend to sweat when wearing cotten but the silk was cooler
This is a good quality pajama set and was worth the price I paid with an Amazon discount. Be forewarned that the color is a really bright red though.
I bought these silk pajamas for my husband for our anniversary, and he LOVED them. They're exactly as described - cool when it's warm out, and warm when it's cool out. He wears them all the time and says they're very comfortable.
I bought an Apple iPod Shuffle advertised as "Brand New". After I had purchased the item off Amazon, I receive an e-mail from the seller stating that it was not as advertised and is not brand new. I still ordered the item and was happy with it, as it had no scratches, but was a little bummed because I was counting on a brand new one. iPod works great and my niece loves it.
I'm a college student and use this printer on a pretty regular basis. I've had this printer for about a year and have NEVER had any problems with the paper feed. Maybe it just depends on where they manufactured your printer. Everything I've printed, from Word documents to skydiving pics, has turned out great. I print out all my photos on store brand glossy photo paper (much cheaper) and they look fantastic.Pros: Quick print time, not too noisy, great print quality for documents and photosCons: Plain design, but since you won't be spending all your time looking at it does it really matter?
Pictures are clear, colors are great. Easy to operate the scanner/copier. Color cartridges last a very long time, unlike my previous Canon printer.
Yep, I'm a cartoon fanatic. Especially of the era depicted here and of the Hanna-Barbera/Filmation/Rankin Bass of my own era and the Simpsons.What that said, this film has a lot for the cartoon lover. Bugs Bunny and Mickey Mouse actually in the same scene? A comic duel between Donald and Daffy Duck? Looney Tunes meets the Disney crew? This is an animationphile's dream come true!However, the character of Roger is WAY too silly, stupid, and lacking in appeal for me. Imagine Jerry Lewis as a cartoon rabbit and you get the idea. A bit overdone in that aspect. But the business with Jessica Rabbit is amusing as well as the Robert Hoskins character (who interacts quite well with the cartoons-no mean feat for an actor).Overall, it has it's moments (cartoon freaks will LOVE the ending), but not the kind of thing I want to watch more than twice.
I am a huge fan of Roger Rabbit! It was great ordering products from this company. Not only did I get it in one piece but it still had all the origional stuff inside. I will definately order from this company again.. Thank you!!!
Great flick...!Only issue is that I live in North America, the DVD did not run on my Bose System...I had to return it.
Not too many family movies stand the test of time...this is one of them! A bit too intense for little kids, but my 7 and 10 year old girls love it. We were watching with their grandfather who got a big kick out of it, too. Christoper Lloyd is a terrific villian and there are plot twists worthy of an adult murder mystery. And where else can you see Mickey Mouse and Bugs Bunny sharing the screen?
Not only is Jessica the sexiest woman ever, the movie actually gives a little insite to life in Los Angeles during the time before the freeway system we all know. Most people didnt know LA actually did have a great mass transit system at one time so even though this movie pokes fun at a lot of things it is based on some truths. the coupling of Disney and Warner Bros cartoons was also a first, Mickey and Bugs in the same scene. and did I mention Jessica?
One of my favorites. I recommend it to anyone with kids. Mine is autistic and he loves it. One of his favorites.
This movie is a timeless classic. Jessica Rabbit is still one of the hottest actress in cinama to this day. Excluding Alyson Hannigan and Linda Cardellini. Christopher Lloyde shows he has true gritt.
This is a DVD you should own if you enjoyed this movie that came out nearly 20 years ago! It offers you the inside story on the behind the scenes production and the animation. It was too bad they didn't make a sequel for Roger Rabbit! Bob Hoskins was wonderful in this film. Still,its good entertainment for everyone!
Ok this is THEE best version of this movie. The extras are amazing and you get a behind look on how exactly they made everything.This movie isnt/kinda/ not for kids.Its really adult like humor and also child humor. I suggest parents watching it before they let thier kids watching it.BUT!, if you yourself havenst seen this movie yet... YOUR CRAZY! and you dont know what your missing. I bought this movie just cause its a classic and the extras. And it was a very good desicion. BUY IT!
Great movie. You can tell that the movie filmed doesn't support the HD quality so I wouldn't bother with the HD unless your player only allows it.5 stars for the movie, 2.5 stars for being in HD.
This is a good toothbrush! It's much better than a manual toothbrush. My Sonicare broke and while I was replacing it I went back to using the Crest spinbrush. It brushed my teeth well. It did not hurt my gums or my sensitive teeth. It stimulates and cleans my gums and gets my whole mouth clean. I make sure and use a good sensitive toothpaste and it works well. My last dental cleaning went well and all I had been using was the spinbrush. I use my rinses and floss daily but I think the spinbrush did most of the work. I wish it had a little timer on it. I have to guess how long to brush. You do have to replace the batteries kind of often and changing the brush heads is kind of difficult.
So far so good! This toothbrush is just as good. My last toothbrush lasted for 5 years and is still working well.
Living outside of San Antonio and having friends involved in this project, I remember these kids being here and having prayed for them. I was not expecting to ever see the inside of the stories unfold. My heart is changed forever. Watching the anguish and the joy of these families who are trusting that these Americans are going to heal their children is overwhelming. The beautiful hospitality of the people who opened their homes to these families was deeply inspiring. Their faith in Christ is shown in this remarkable way that leads these Buddhist families to trust in Jesus Christ and to trust and thank Him. I cannot recommend this to you enough. Please watch it. Be challenged from your complacency and moved to heal the broken hearted. Be warned. If you are a parent, this will make you want to go to your children and embrace them.This dvd was graciously provided by Thomas Nelson Publishers for review.
Race to Mars is hard to categorize, but I would describe it as a science based drama.It presents a scenario in which the most promising ideas and technologies for a successful expedition to Mars are played out.
I loved this realistic (almost a documentary) movie. I liked the way the production joinned together all sort of problems that could be spected by crew. I recomend.
Naked Apes and Pond Life is the best Shriekback project since Oil and Gold and is far better crafted than Dancing Years or Sacred City. Though Barry Andrews and Martyn Barker are the only two original Shriekers here and Carl Marsh and Dave Andrews are very much missed since bowing out after Oil and Gold, this is an exciting, melodic, deeply textured and multirhythmic return to form, not to be missed by any ardent or casual Shriekback fan. Definitely worth splurging for the import, as it's unlikely it will ever be domestic (and why has their all-time best, Jam Science, never been released on CD? Hello? Is anyone working on this?).
Shriekback's Barry Andrews is a genius of the highest order. This album has the band ditch all synthesizers (A bold move! Electronics being heretofore their main life-blood.) Andrews' garage sale of the sorts of machines worshiped by pale Englishmen with funny haircuts and their ilk frees him up to add yet another depth to the Shriekback sound. Attempts to express my enthusiasm for works of art like the contents on this CD are ineffable - at least on my part - but I do want to register my 5 stars, and hope that anybody who follows my other recommendations will try this great work of art as well. This is like eavesdropping on Shriekback in a world of no electricity. Thank God somebody was cranking a generator or some such device in order to record this work. AWESOME in the organic, original sense of the word. BUY! BUY! BUY!
As a Mario fan born in the 80's, this movie is an instant classic in my book. Absolutely loved it, and would recommend it to anyone looking for something fun to watch, especially if you want to show your kids some of the cool things to come out of your generation.
This move brings back great memories from when I was a kid and everything related to the Mario Bros. rocked! I used to play the video games all the time, I watched the cartoon and to then have a live action movie; it was the cherry on-top. This movie may not have won an major awards, but if you've ever played Mario Bros. on NES you must see this movie. It is well worth the cost to own.
My son had been looking for this old movie for nearly a year. I told him I could probably find it on Amazon.com so I went to look and sure enough, there it was so I ordered it for him. I am not a big Mario Bros fan but my son sure is happy with the movie.
I use to have this film recorded on vidio and recorded over it and was regreting it. I bought it on Dvd. The quality is exellent and it is in widescreen it's a shame there's no Dvd extra's but it's stil a class film one of my all time favourates. It's based on the video game about Mario and Luigi tryinhg to save Princess Daisy from another dimention where diosaurs are still alive and are trying to get back from earth. I'm also glad that yoshi is on it. It reminds me of the game Super Mario World.It's well worth getting for any Mario fan
this is a fun movie! fantasitic special effects, fine actingand lots of fun moments make this a must see! The creature effects were outstanding! if you havent seen this special effects extravaganza yet, you got to!!!
This movie is rock solid!!! Better than the games... This movie is worth buying so buy it today or else you'll suffer of more cutsie princess movies!
Not much I can say except that this movie is often riffed on for all the wrong reasons.Yes, the movie is indeed flawed in many respects. But at the same time, it has a lot of great set pieces, music, good dialogue, good CG and animatronics, and a a scene using Joe Satroni music.It's just a fun movie, worth riffing on if you hate it, but a fun movie if you appreciate it for exactly what it is supposed to be, a fun ride.
I liked this movie quite a bit. I felt that it was funny, and the special effects were quite nice. It doens't deserve all the bad reviews it's getting. I highly recommmend it.
I know that most people dislike video game movies, especially OLD video game movies, but SMB is just too much fun to pass up. All the characters are hilarious and the special effects are pretty good for such an old movie. The continuity in the plot is well-done as well, its not just a bunch of special effects and gun-shots.I remember watching this movie for the first time when I was seven or eight and loving it. When I saw it on DVD years later I knew I had to buy it, and I STILL laugh the whole time. For someone who grew up through the game revoltion (I still have an original Nintendo system) this movie is as nostaglic as it is funny. I really recommend it.
Why people are absolutely clobbering this movie, I don't know. As a guess, I would say that the title makes you think of the video games, but this is aboslutely *nothing* like the video games, be warned of that from the outset. However if (unlike many others) you can get around the fact that it is completely out of the ordinary for the mario universe, you'll be rewarded to find a great movie with a quite interesting story. I only dock this a star because of the expectations issue. This has no business having "Mario Bros." in the title, but otherwise highly recommended :)
This is fraken amazingI nearly fillied my daiper when i heard the song=AnesthetizeAmazingly filmed and awesome sound.Best prog Rock DVD I have seencheersKev
The band alone is great, but the audio quality is really something of an achievement. It is a live concert and it sounds like studio quality, definitely a must have for fans and music lovers alike.
The sound of this DVD and the performance are amazing! Fear of a Blank Planet is an album that merits to be performed as a whole musical piece and the performance is unbelieveble. Porcupine Tree are definitely at a peak of their career and I hope that the current peak will last. Way Outta Here, Let's Sleep Together, Anesthetize... All songs on the setlist are actually great. They perform three out of for tracks from the great "Nil recurring" as well. A treat for the fans
Recived the limited edition DVD / BluRay Gray cover edition from PT web site. I am simply amazed by the quality of the video and sound. I have seen PT several times though not on thier most recent tour but this make me feel as if I was there. If you a PT fan this is well worth the investment and if not what a great introduction to PT. I intend to introduce PT through this DVD
The mix is good, and I liked almost all the tracks, but there was just something misssing in the cd that only TGN2 had. There was more hard trance/goa in TGN2, and TGN3 is more regular trance, which is still really good. My favorite track on this cd is "Madagascar" by Art of Trance, it just has an awesome background beat. I'm a stern follower of the TGN series, and I think it's one of the better trance mix series out there. TGN3 is a great cd, and I recommend it to anyone who is a trance lover, or hasn't experienced trance yet. Better yet, get this and TGN2, and you'll really be trancin' it up! =)
Before You Think Another Thought is short, insightful and to the point. It is easy to read and the thought process is well developed.There is no question that your circumstances are a direct result of your thought process. While this is a difficult concept for most folks to grasp, it is true and Doyle does a good job of leading the reader to this conclusion.The book is written in simple terms and has a fairly good set of exercises in the appendix.While the concepts are simple, like any process that requires you to change, they are not necessaily easy. In fact the author cautions against trying to make massive changes in your life. Rather giving the sound advice of taking small steps and making one change at a time.These concepts are not new. But they are presented in a fresh and easy to understand manner and can serve as a great way to reinforce what you may have been taught by others.It is certainly worth reading.
Although "Before you Think Another Thought" is a relatively small book (less than 125 pages), it's filled with amazing and easy to understand insights about how our underlying beliefs are creating our experiences on a daily basis.The best news is that, although our limiting beliefs have had a great impact on our lives so far, once we identify & explore them, we have the ability to CHOOSE whether or not to keep them as they are, or to change them. If we choose to change them, and replace them with an empowering belief, our lives will begin to change.Mr. Doyle has included many great illustrations & examples to help the reader better grasp the ideas he presents, and has also included an appendix that includes several tools for identifying, exploring and changing our limited underlying beliefs.Overall, I found this to be an interesting, easy to read book with far reaching implications. I would highly recommend it!
Excellent, profound, and illuminating. This book provides an easy-to-grasp explanation of what governs our experiences in life. It also provides a simple method to quickly eliminate and replace our unpleasant experiences with what we really want. More than a book, it is a manual for better living that you will want to refer to on a regular basis.
The A-Team wasn't only the greatest action show of all time, but it also had the best original instrumental music of any television show to ever exist! Every song played in the background of a scene fit that scene perfectly. The action has yet to be equaled (even in today's world of special effects) and the music would make anyone who hears it feel energized to kick some bandit butt!
When it comes to defining a woman's role, PAST TENSE has blown through the glass ceiling! Both the protagonist and antagonist are dynamic and determined. . . equal opponents squaring off in a fast-paced, tension-filled arena. I loved the wonderful mix of humor, tension, passion, and surprises! Can't wait to see what the author writes next!
I am the author of this book. It is no longer being printed. I gave it only four stars because its 2009 successor is deserving of five stars.Go to the following Amazon.com page to see West Side Publishing's "Armchair Reader: The Last Survivors of Historical Events, Movies, Disasters, and More"Armchair Reader: The Last Survivors of Historical Events, Movies, Disasters, and MoreRobert Ernest Hubbard
The picture quality is good, but when you take the flash off you have to hold still to take a picture or it will blur. If you have the flash on and you are moving or are in a car taking a picture it will not blur.Overall i really like this camera and the wide viewing screen is awesome
This camera was purchased primarily for real estate use. Wide angle photos that capture the whole room, floor and ceiling even. I just too prom photos of my kids at the Hyatt Coconut Point in Bonita Springs, Florida. They've been asked by their friends if we hired a professional photographer. I'm pleased with the equipment and it is very easy to use - without even reading the manual :)
Mr. Erikson wrote a thought-provoking book, but it is certainly a product of his times. Such notions as homosexuality being deviant (his word, not mine) behavior and was more of a symptom of a psychologically damaged individual has not held up to present scientific evidence. Overall, the book is a fascinating dissection of childhood development and how it possibly manifests itself in adulthood. But reading this material wasn't exactly a cake walk. I doubt many casual readers could wade through Mr. Erikson's book without developing MEGO (My Eyes Glaze Over) Syndrome. For what it's worth, I enjoyed most of it.
A profound, orginal work that changes the entire worldview and saves the lives of many young adults by giving them insight into who they are and how they got that way.
Childhood and Society guides its readers far deep into children's mind and its pychological intricacies. Using study of cases carefully chosen and great psychoanalytical knowlege, Erikson, with his long experience, enlight us, making easy to undertand some of the most complicated concepts in Freud's theory.It's sure a worth reading work.
not a huge fan of Mia Farrow but she was EXCELLENT in this! this film centers around her and her husband who live in an old apartment building in NYC and theyre trying to have a baby. They have a few problems with a nosy old couple who turn out to be witches after their baby, and it turns out the husband was in it all along. no one believes her when she suspects these people, so they are all against her. i dont want to tell you the end, that would spoil it, LOL i know its fiction but the only thing i have a problem with the film is the fact that witches are always being portrayed as evil, and they are not...i guess alot of films would not have been made if they didnt believe that.
100 years from now, actress Mia Farrow will be remembered in her role in this classic "horror" movie, much more than her current role as an activist with the United Nations (UN). This aged "horror" movie may be a drag, but shows the supreme acting finesse of Mia Farrow. She plays a naive woman whose husband got too friendly with their Satanist neighbours. She ends up being used, conned and abused. It teaches you not to be too trusting with people with strange practices and behaviours.If you're looking for scary scenes based on 21st century digital standards, there are none. But, back in the late 1960s and early 1970s, this movie was still talked about, at least till "The Exorcist" came around and trumped all horror cards as the best remembered classic horror movie of all time.Recommended viewing:The Exorcist: Director's Cut (Extended Edition)The Exorcist (The Version You've Never Seen)
This is one of my absolute favorite horror movies of all time...no gore, no heavy, cheesy special effects, just plot and suspense-building to the end.
Seen it 40 times. This movie is perfect. It is astonishing that it was made so long ago.The entire movie is a buildup to the final sequence where she accepts the child. Though shocking, we realize it's not the least bit of a surprise - given her devotion to what she carried for so many months.Best line: "He has his father's eyes"
The film adaptation is quite good but not as good as the original novel. Polanski is in his usual spooky form with his direction and Ruth Gordon shines in her role. And what can be said about Mia Farrow that hasn't already been said. Mia Farrow, narrow as an arrow! Flat as a pancake is a bit better: both herself and her performance. The film holds up well over the years. Too bad Mia didn't. But there wasn't much to hold up, even back then. Amazon has a really good price on this one.
Young couple becomes pregnant with the child of the devil and the mother's friends and neighbors try to cover it up. While some might say this is boring, it's really interesting and spellbinding. Gotta love that ending. Popcorn, Pepsi and Pizza.
One of my favorite horror films, this one had my skin crawling. Beautifully real and subtly terrifying. Watch it and love it.
A subtly demonic tale that builds to a shocking climax. Mia Farrow embodies vulnerability as Rosemary, and John Cassavetes is interesting to watch in a rare mainstream role as her soothing husband. Look for a young Charles Grodin playing a doctor in a pivotal scene.
Certainly on my ten-best list, ROSEMARY'S BABY is one of the most frightening films ever made. The genius of the film is that it juxtaposes the mundane with the most beastly and achieves it with little graphic violence. The carnage occurs mostly off-screen and we see the crowd in the street or hear the terrible news over the phone just as we would in real-life.Polanski plays (or preys) masterfully on natural human paranoia and allows the viewer's imagination to construct the most heinous outcome. Mia Farrow is the innocent who is led by her "loving" husband, respected doctor and eccentric neighbors into a woman's worst nightmare.
Roman Polanski does a great job at directing this superb horror movie based on the novel by Ira Levin. Set in the eerie Dakota building in NYC, this witty film is ranked as one of the best classic modern day thrillers. Mia Farrow's performance is good. And Ruth Gordon's is a gem.
Rosemary's baby is a horror classic that should not be missed. Mia Farrow and the rest of the cast is outstanding in this tale of broken trust and Santanic eroticism.This film will be loved by anyone who isn't pregnant.
Yes, Devil Conspiracy at it's finest..this is a true 1960ish classic and another epic from Roman Polanski.How the lifestyle of Doris Day becomes satanic..This Devil worship genre was heavy stuff in the mid 1960's coming as it did with the saga of Sharon Tate, Charles Manson and Polanski somehow tied into all of this.Nonetheless murder is murder and this movie is the depiction of darkness, Lucifer, evil with the premise of the birth of the antichrist.Rosemary herself (a witch not by choice), battles endlessly with herself and her emotions as if reason could win.... This movie blurs all distinction between madness and reality as seen through the eyes of Rosemary.A truly remarkable groundbreaking flick that contrasts good and evil, passion and reason, a highly entertaining movie with a a great cast of future stars.The extras are good.
My 23-month-old LOVES this sticker book. He has been using it almost every day for a month, and he still loves it. I sit with him while he plays with it to help him bring the edges of the stickers up from the pages. The stickers are losing their stickiness now, but it was a good deal for a month of play!
Hit after Hit. A must for all Michael Ball fans. Each new album outdoes his last, yet each are great. The selection of songs is outstanding and each features the true prue voice of Michael in all ranges. Michael again proves he could star in any musical of his choice. His choice of "Immortality" and "Can You Feel the Love" will totally capitivate you!
After listening to Michael Ball on the Complete Symphonic Recording of Les Miserables and seeing him again on the Miz DVD, I must say I was very impressed by this CD. He has a very sultry voice that is one that both soothes and gets the blood pumping. I love "Boy From Nowhere", "Winner Takes It All" and of course the two Phantom of the Opera selections. His vocals are really something else and for a starter Michael Ball CD, this would be the one to buy.
I very highly recommend this album. It's one of Michael Ball's best. He has such a beautiful voice. His rendition of "Not While I'm Around," is so beautiful. All the other songs he sings are great as well. He also does some songs from, "Phantom,". If you listen to it I believe most people would love it and enjoy his voice.
THIS IS MICHAEL BALL'S BEST WORK,YOU WILL FALL IN LOVE WITH HIM ALL OVER AGAIN.THIS CD TOOK MY BREATH AWAY.THE SONG'S A BOY FROM NO WHERE AND THE WINNER TAKES IT ALL ARE MY ALL TIME FAVORITE'S.I HAVE EVERY CD HE HAS MADE,HE GETS 100 STARS FOR THIS ONE.
Look out folks, when Ball is on...he's untouchable. One of those rare artists who gives it all he's got, and then some. Michaelstarted his career in Musical Theatre, his love of performing is completely honest...and it shows.Choosing stand outs, much less highlights is tough, but here goes ~ "SEASON'S OF LOVE"..."THE WINNER TAKES IT ALL"..."CAN YOU FEEL THE LOVE TONIGHT"..."LIFT THE WINGS", the lyrics give Michael the power that creeps deep within your reasoning for "pure enjoyment"...Ball shows his versatility with light tones and tender feelings that make each song his own, gotta love it.Following this entertainer is exciting, just the way he handles himself is magic...his performance is top notch...not many singers today can belt out a tune and keep you spellbound...thank you Hip-O, for giving us a front row seat and CENTRE STAGE!Total Time: 38:18 on 14 Tracks ~ Universal/Hip-O Records 016071 ~ (2002)
Granted, I have not spent a great deal of time learning about China, nor have I ever BEEN to China. But I was very impressed with all of the aspects of China covered in this documentary. The film packs a lot of information into this little package! Contemporary China may both match your expectations and blow them out of the water. If you want to be entertained and informed about a diverse world quite different from the US, I recommend this film!
Very well done video with different indendant living scenarios by native Italians which makes it even more personal and interesting !Narration by ISABELLA ROSELLINI IS WELL DONE WITH AN AUTHENTIC ITALIAN FLAVOR.................BEING ITALIAN THIS IS WELL APPRECIATED.
Unlike most of the reviews here, I was able to play this HD DVD without any problems. I use my Xbox 360 to play HD DVDs, which is able to automatically get any updates that are needed.Anyway, the movie follows the stories of multiple Italian people, all of different ages and background, as they embark on different milestones in their lives. The video is full of beautiful shots with great hi-def detail. The narration really adds to the video as none of the people speak English.I definitely would recommend it to anyone who is a fan of Italy. My wife and I went there a few years ago and were happy to once again see places that we had visited.
The thread That Runs So True autobiographical story is a personal writing about his teaching career. He narrates a several experiences regarding his teaching and how he had to face difficult situation to remain teaching at school with success. However, he persevered and got success with his students. His students demonstrated interest and enjoyed learning as a consequence of his method of teaching with new ideas, trying to get interest and attention from his students. I enjoyed the way he narrates his experiences with tender feelings towards his students and courage to confront different situations as a teacher in the mountain region of Kentucky. I believe The Thread that Runs so True is a great example to follow for teachers and works as an inspiration for them in order to obtain the same results as Jesse Stuart
I first read Jesse Stuart 30 years ago in high school. I remember giving an oral book report to my English teacher and expressing surprise that rural Kentucky teachers continued to teach even when they were not receiving their pay. I remember my teacher telling me-- in all sincerity-- that she would do the same thing. Wow. I never looked at teaching the same way again!The only reason I give this book 4 instead of 5 stars is that I wish Stuart had delved more deeply into the characters in the beginning of the book. There was certainly enough material there for an entire book by itself-- then Stuart could have used his years as a high school principal for a second book.
Reading this book-I couldn't help but feel that I've wasted so muchof my life being unhappy by choice. I'll even venture to say thatthe option method could change the world as we know it if more peopleknew about it and practiced it.A book I'll continue to revisit throughout my life.
the sizing was accurate. they are a good product and true to the description given. i would buy them again.
As Judith, Maggie Smith turns in the performance of a lifetime and oneof the best and most complete portrayals by any actor on film. This isan astonishing film, full of bleak Irish heartbreak, yet with thepromise of hope.Smith is a no less than a revelation in the title role and one cannothelp but route for this desperate character even when all lookshopeless. The screenplay had been fought over for years by actresses ofevery stripe, with, for a while, Jane Fonda, leading the pack ofactresses trying to get Judith onto the screen. It's a good thingMaggie Smith won out.The ensemble cast of actors led by Bob Hoskins is fully up to Smith'sstandard and the emotional wallops this movie packs are big onesindeed.George Delarue's score is simply perfect underlying with the exactweight and gravity - and sweetness - of every situation.When is this thing coming out on DVD? It's simply ridiculous it hasn'tyet appeared.Highest recommendation.
Chance for the Future simply moves. It has action, adventure, elements of surprise, some comedy, and is a good read. I'm an avid science fiction reader and this book held my attention. I think that even those who would never pick up a sci-fi novel (including my wife and daughter) would enjoy this book because the lead character is a strong female. For his first novel, Carhart has done a good job. Take a Chance with Chance for The Future.
The only thing i have to say is that the assembly was not as easy as i thought and at the end i had to bring it to a bike shop to get the final touches. but as soon as it was assembeled i had a lot of fun with it. It is a cool to bike around with.
I bought two of these bikes, before Christmas and when they were selling for one-fifty, which was an awesome price for an awesome bike. The bikes were relatively easy to put together - you have to install the handle-bars, seat post and seat, from wheel and the front disk brake (the only really tricky part), and it took me about an hour. Everything else is pre-assembled, and that is done very well too.The quality of the bike is just great - everything feels really solid and well-built. My only complaint is that for an all-aluminum frame they are surprisingly heavy, so even with the 21 speeds this is not a good bike for anyone living in a particularly hilly area.But even at two-fifty, these bikes are half the price of comparable comfort bikes at your local bike shop, and you can't even find comfort bikes with disk brakes from what I can see, so that makes the deal for me.
This bike was fairly easy to assemple ... Though I must mention that I did not get assembly instructions as others have noted as well. I did find it rater easy to assemble once thinking about it though .. I spent probably about 45 min in all, and other 20Min tuning the disk brakes and height adjustments.My GF says it is a great ride, really smooth, and brakes work great ... comfortable seat. Worth the sale price I got it at .. not worth full price ;-)
Free shipping arrived in 5 days as advertised. Shipping box was torn up with a minor blemish on the paint. Assembly took 45 minutes, there were no instructions. I had to reinstall the front forks (remember, front and rear disk brakes are on the same side) got em backwards the first time. Both derailers needed adjusting to shift correctly and quietly. Welds are a bit rough but the bike is a good deal and the quality is good. I might buy another for myself.
The bike was every thing advertised and more. It was delivered promptly, but the box was in shreds thank goodness by some miracle everything stayed inside and assembly was a snap.
This player is a great one! But this player would not be good for jogging,because it skips a little when you jog.
I was really surprised at how much I enjoyed this book. It's the true story of the 19th century whaleship that was attacked and sunk by a sperm whale, and the 93-day ordeal of the crew fighting to survive (most didn't) in the three small whaleboats. (And of course, the book "Moby-Dick" was in part based on this event.)I thought the author did a fantastic job of telling the story, and while doing so injected bits of relevant history and science that helps the reader better understand the story and its context. It got me interested in doing additional reading on the whaling industry. (And who knows. . . maybe I'll be able to visit Nantucket someday!)
One of the best books I've read in a very long time. The author Nathaniel Philbrick does an absolutely superb job narrating the tragic tale of the whaleship Essex; not only does he give you an up close view of the ordeal the stranded sailors went through but he also gives a detailed (and interesting) look into the whaling business as well as life on the island of Nantucket in the late 1800s. From beginning to end I was caught up in the story, it would be a true shame if "In the Heart of the Sea" doesn't become a classic and the story of the Essex's crew becomes lost once more in the mists of time.
Excellent read and excellent story.if done right this would be an awesome film.Getting the period right, the ship of the early 1800s, the whale attach and the story of survival -shown realistically and not exploitvily or gratuitious, the whale attack.this is a story begging to be told on the big screen. It would also make more people aware of this story that is, when first told of it, very hard to believe.
I actually haven't had a chance to read it yet but I will say that anything by Nathaniel Philbrick has to be very good. More to the point, "In the Heart of the Sea" did not win the National Book Award for nothing!
I'm not a fisherman or do I have much interest in boats, the ocean, etc. My brother-in-law recommended this book and I cannot use enough superlatives to describe what an enjoyable book this is. The historical details are intriguing and the story of the ill-fated whaling voyage is truly riveting. Even though you know how it ends, the story is so engrossing that I read this in a matter of days. Bring it to the beach, I guarantee you will not be disappointed.
I am only about 2/3 through this book, but just have to say it is the most rip-roaring adventure book I have ever read! It is full of information about the early 1800s, the whaling industry, the sea, and about whales that I have never known. It is all fascinating! Although I am a girl (ahem!), I am loving every word of this book, as I also loved THE ENDURANCE and INTO THIN AIR and A FIRST RATE TRAGEDY recently, not to mention TARZAN, FRANKENSTEIN, etc. from years back. This book is highly recommended whether you fancy yourself an adventurer (armchair adventurers okay) or not.
first of all, despite all the nice explanation of Essex, it's doubtful that this book won the national book award. i think there are bunch of books out there which wait for winning the award, and certainly have better stuffs. but i can't criticize this book. (i'm not a book-review-person or what..) anyway... this book was just a regular book to me.
This book is a wonderfully written true tale of the disaster of the whaleship Essex. This crew of Nantucketers and off-islanders endured the most horrible adventure at sea. An enourmous Sperm Whale rams the boat and sends these men into a 90-day whirlwind of starvation, dehydration, delusion, despair, insanity, death, and eventual recovery. The way Nathaniel Philbrick depicts every aspect of their hellish journey puts you at the helm. I highly recommend this book for those who want to know what REALLY happened to the crew of the whaleship Essex back in the early 19th century, and how Melville was inspired to write his famous novel "Moby Dick".
I found this to be one of the most engaging books I have read in a long time. I read it in three nights and was sad when it was over. The author appears to have done a LOT of research on this subject, amply illustrated by his extensive notes at the end of the book. It's great to read a book that is both well-researched and well-written. My only complaint, a small one, is that I wish he had spent more time discussing the racial dynamics of the crew. Unlike some authors, Philbrick definitely didn't ignore this topic. But when the African-American members of the boats die off and are eaten, one by one, I was totally incredulous. How could this have happened? I thought Philbrick could have spent more time discussing other historic shipwrecks where there were racial issues involved. Perhaps, however, there really wasn't enough data to go on. Anyway, as I said, I greatly enjoyed this book.
This was a compelling story that kept me interested until the last page. Nathanial Philbrick told me more than I ever wanted to know about whaling in the early 19th century and the tragedy of the Essex. The actual sinking of the ship by a sperm whale is stunning enough, but the tale of survival by the crew members was even more remarkable. I would recommend this book to anyone.
This is a great nautical introduction for the landlubber. Philbrick does a great job of telling the straight story of Nantucket, of whaling, of this journey, of what happened to the men, and of what happened to their legend.Philbrick especially does a great job of filling-in-the-blanks when the historical record is thin. When the men are adrift with minimal food for weeks, he uses WWII-era experiments to speculate what probably happened to the men's physiology and psychology. He interviews contemporary whale experts to evaluate the likelihood of the reputed whale behavior.Overall, a great story well-told and well-researched, and deserving of the National Book Award. It inspired me to make a trip to the New Bedford Whaling museum!
I read this book a couple of years ago, but scenes from the novel, masterfully painted by Nathaniel Philbrick, are still with me. Few books in my life have engaged me as this one did. It's the kind you just want to recommend to whomever you can, because you know they're going to enjoy it also. I know this all sounds like hyperbole, but Philbrick, in my opinion, is a gifted writer. He expertly describes the events taking place, and as I was reading I was also making the movie in my head. I think it would be a fantastic movie (unless hollywood ruins it of course).A MUST read.
Was great,It put you right there with those poor soles,that went through that terrible ordeal.I learned a lot about that time and place also.It was a quick read
Having read the Mayflower by Mr. Philbrick some time ago and knowing how he was motivated to write that book, it interested me as to his motivation for this book. I was not dissapointed as the book is through in facts and presentation. As you already know, his writing is very vivid and complete not leaving the reader constantly guessing or speculating as to what transpired. Also it was a selection for our Sailing Book Club which motivated us to read it. Glad we did.
Philbrick is a good writer. Sometimes I felt pulled between the history of Nantucket, an inside look into whaling and the story of the Essex. Each is interesting and deserves its own book. The story of the Essex is incredibly powerful, and I feel that Philbrick treated the terrible survival struggles of the crew at an arm's length. The details were there, just not the emotion. He came close, but this story - with the struggle, errors of judgment, tragedy and cannibalism, had the potential to stand with the classic tales of Bly or Shackleton, but this telling didn't quite deliver.
I enjoyed reading this book. However, it did make me nauseated. Author goes into a lot of detail.
What a fantastic story told in a fascinating way. I've read many books about maritime disasters, and this one has gone to the top of the list. Nathaniel Philbrick is a great story-teller and meticulous researcher. I'm very, very impressed.
One fantastic book! Expertly written and researched, Heart of the Sea is a must. I read it in one day. Absorbing. Don't miss it. And give it to the children, too.
I haven't read this book, but I was wondering how this book stacks up with the Penguin version 'The Loss of the Whale Ship Essex, Sunk By A Whale?' From what I understand, this novel is a retelling of events while the Penguin Classics is the actual accounts of two of the crew members? I'm a bit torn as to which one I should read/purchase. All comments are very much appreciated.
I just finished this last night...wow! The narration is lively and keeps the pace of the story while the author imparts a great deal of information that could have been dull but is not. The prose is so vivid that I could not eat while reading the passages about dismembering the whale; I could almost smell the burning oil and feel the slick decks. Amazing that men made a living this way! I can hardly wait to start Philbrick's MAYFLOWER.
This is a great peice of work. Nathaniel Philbrick uses a wonderful, empathetic style when telling this tragic story. If you like history, adventure, and sailing you may want to read this one twice.
Margo Guryan fans, take note : This CD consists of the same material as the "Demos" CD on another label, right down to the running order and some of the liner notes. It does include two extra tracks ("Why Do I Cry?" and "Under My Umbrella", neither written by Guryan) tacked on the end, though, so if you don't already have the "Demos" CD, this is now the better choice. As far as the music goes : Excellent! Although these tracks are demos, the arrangements are unexpectedly full (strings, woodwinds, backing vocals) and could easily pass as finished commercial recordings. Guryan's vocals are as charmingly ethereal as always and she has a rare gift for melody and nuance in her songwriting. Although many of the songs overlap with those on the terrific "Take a Picture", many are heard here in quite different arrangements, making this an essential purchase for fans.
Nice, relaxed writing style. Good information for anyone interested in learning about veneering from the ground up.
This is a really, really good book. The format is excellent (color photos, well organized) and he covers all of the important topics including flattening veneer, substrates, shop-made equipment and of course, cutting and fitting veneer.However, there is a big gap in his coverage: the use of a vacuum press.I've used a vacuum press numerous times and have excellent results. Mr. Barton, on the other hand, has never wanted to make the capital investment (~$700) in a quality vacuum press and consequently a lot of his projects didn't go well. Because he didn't have success with a retrofitted vacuum cleaner and thin plastic bags (both are inadequate for the task), he ignores a very useful tool.
Good product. Purchased the same once before so I knew what I was getting. If I can get something that works for me and pay half the cost of a famous name brand, I'll certainly do it. Was shipped quickly as usual. What more can be said about this product, ahhh, not too much. Thanks amazon.com .
"Almayer's Folly" adequately introduces the theme of culture conflict, an angle that is expressed more fully in Conrad's later works. I would certainly recommend this to anyone familiar with Conrad's body of work, which is not to say that readers new to his work should avoid this novel.
As this is Conrad's first novel, it is not fair to expect the sort of power that illuminates his later works. However, Almayer's Folly is a good, solid novel which shows the potential for Conrad's later greatness. A love story at its heart, Almayer's Folly also provides a last look at classical imperialism and the crossroads of multiple cultures. A short novel, I would heartily recommend it.
This is a disarming little movie about a woman athlete and her coach. It is a somewhat romantic comedy but it is more about developing a female athlete and coaching her to be a winner. Katherine Hepburn was apparently a terrific athlete and Garson and Kanin wrote their screenplay around her. It is not a raccuous or exaggerated romantic comedy like Adam's Rib or even Woman of the Year. It is much smaller but very charming. Take it for what it is and don't expect it to be like the other films. This is not what Pat and Mike are about.
Having heard a live performance of Eight Seasons given by Tasmin Little at De La Warr pavilion,Bexhill was enthusiastic to get a copy. The performance by Gidon Kremer does not disappoint. The Vivaldi is as fresh as ever, far less mannered than the Nigel Kennedy version, and with the revolutionary 'naturalistic' effects of the seasons that make it so endearing a piece played with sensitivity and grace. The Piazzola 4 Seasons of Buenos Aires is similarly responsive to the atmospheres of the city but composed with amazing a-tonal effects. Huge glissandi and sonorous climaxes along with cool, lazy tango rhythms make a complete musical portrait of the sounds of the city. Very exciting music making - very rewarding listening
Parts of this recording are so beautiful that when I listen while working, I have to pause what I am doing and close my eyes. I don't remember how I ended up buying this CD (it certainly wasn't planned), but I am so grateful.My rabbit hates it though. When I listen to it at home, he stamps his feet. So I can only listen to it at work. :(
This mower used to be made by Agri-Fab, but they stopped producing it. I have one and it is awesome. The blade spins freely, so it doesn't have very much resistence when pushing. All the other Great States / American Lawnmower Company mowers that I know of have contact blades, which dull quickly and make the mower difficult to push. I would check out Sunlawn mowers if I were planning to buy another reel mower.
SNZ and BBVD are good, but these guys from Minneapolis smoke! In no way are the Hotheads latecomers to the "swing scene;" they owe more to the wilder, dirtier jazz of the late 20s. This is actually their third album, with two prior albums (and some minor changes with musicians) as the Straw Dogs. Check it out...you won't be disappointed!
Funny, smart, erudite, Steve Chandler affirms that our biggest and most powerful erogenous zone is our brain. Chandler deflates the myth that love just happens---true love, whether of a friend or a spouse or a pet, is cultivated and created, over and over again. Great stuff.
A couple years ago the author of this book (who didn't know me, nor I him) sent me a free copy. I have no idea why......but I am thankful now that he did. It sat on my shelf for about two years. But I eventually picked it up with the desire to become more "relationship oriented."The chapters are nice and short -- they can be ingested in about twenty minutes. That's very convenient for me. He also does a fine job making profound relationship-truths simple to understand.This books has been a great help to me.Like a little seed that Steve planted in my life, it is now shooting up and bringing forth good fruit.Thanks for the book, Steve!
Plumb started out with a sound to really grab you. As the band has grown (and now changed to just a single person), the sound has matured. This collection is a good overview of some of their better songs. If you've never heard Plumb, this is an ok start, but I'd suggest just skipping it and going straight for CandyCoatedWaterDrops instead. Half of the songs on this collection are from that release, and it's worth owning. Still, the radio hits ("Stranded", "Here With Me") are on this disc, and the price can't be beat.
I appreciate the favorable comments made by all of the reviewers. For the record, however, in response to Peter George: my note on Stonewall Jackson accurately observes that the Confederate forces under his command repulsed the Union army at the first Bull Run and forced their retreat to Washington. I elsewhere add (chapter V, note 14) that J. E. Johnston commanded all Confederate forces in the battle. Peter Bridges also seems to object that my notes are too detailed, even "demeaning" to "educated Penguin readers," yet that my note re. Bailie Jarvie is not detailed enough. I can only reply that my notes are intended to aid precisely those undergraduates who require them, not the pedants who are perfectly entitled to ignore them.
Written shortly after the end of the Civil War this novel covers all of the bases -- politics, battles, social issues, and personal relationships -- affected by the war. It does this with a depth not usually seen in Civil War novels and particularly those written in the 20th century. De Forest does not insult the reader's intelligence and his characters are not just stereotypes but have real flesh and blood. (Well, except maybe for the heroine!) If you enjoy this book try A Fool's Errand for a good novel about Reconstruction also written shortly after the end of the Civil War.
I decided to drop my land line only to realize that my Tivo was now very unhappy! I checked out several options for providing wireless connectivity and decided to go with this one. Good choice. It was a breeze to setup and has operated very reliably so far - a couple of months at this point.
love the wireless adapter but...it kills me that Newegg can have the same product at my house in 2 days with free shipping but it takes Amazon 2 WEEKS. Buhbye amazon
works fine..connects to my wireless network and doesn't tie up the phone line when downloading. no complaints..
I live outside the US in Bermuda and having my Tivo connect through my phone lines was costing me a small fortune in international calls. I bought the Tivo network adaptor and plugged it in. Within minutes it had automatically configured itself to my network and now I download all my Tivo updates through the internet which costs me nothing. I am very pleased with this purchase. It was very simple to install and once running you can simply forget about it.
The TiVo wireless adapter is easy to install: plug it into the back of your TiVo and you're ready to go. My only difficulty was in getting it to agree with myLinksys WRT55AG Dual-Band Wireless A+G Access Point + Cable/DSL Router with 4-Port 10/100 Switch, which seems like a common configuration. It was a frustrating half an hour before I was able to get everything to play nicely together. (The detection process wasn't as easy as I thought it would be in this plug and play era.) You definitely need to know how your network is set up and be prepared to play with your wireless network configuration application.That said, once I got everything working correctly, the thing has been extremely easy to use: in fact, I haven't had to do anything to it since we put it in. The additional TiVo features that come with always-on access may appeal to some; for us, knowing that we can remotely program a show in a short time frame and still catch it is pretty cool.
If you can't connect your TiVo using an Ethernet cord then this is the next best thing. This is the only wireless adapter that you should using if you own a TiVo. This adapter was specifically design for TiVo.
The build quality is incredible on this. It feels, well, as good as it's price. Yes, it's a pricy g wireless adapter, but it's integration into the Tivo console and speed are worth it. My room to room transfers are not much faster right now, but I understand that will improve when I get the other Tivo on one of these. I've been using wireless adapter/bridges on my Tivos and having to configure them seperatly sucks. I love how the Tivo can setup this wireless adapter as if it were integrated. I wish it was N, but my network is not N either so it's a moot point.I think the only thing better would be to hard wire your Tivo into the network.
I hooked it up and it worked immediately...no problems and it was quite a bit cheaper than ordering the exact same thing from Tivo
I ordered a new TiVO box for my living room and then realized I'd have to run some cables which I wasn't looking forward to. I checked the web site and discovered that I could go wireless. This little gem is worth its weight in platnum! I was concerned that it might not work well but I was very wrong. We have three TiVO boxes and now all of them are wireless. I HIGHLY recomend this product. It looks nice and sort of blends into any room. It's easy to install and comes with everything you need. (except a wireless "g" router and the TiVO box)Buy with confidence.
These TiVo adapters work great and take TiVo to the next level. Having a TiVo network has been great for scheduling, watching shows from other TiVo's in the house and downloading movies and shows from Amazon.If you are a TV fan and love your TiVo, you will appreciate it even more once you buy the adapters and set up a home network!
This thing works really well. It's a little slow but that's Comcast's fault, because their internet service sucks! But this Item is pretty cool and works great too!
I would have to use a phone connection for Tivo without this adapter because my broadband source is several rooms away and I'm not going to run ethernet cable through the apartment. The phone works, but generally it only connects once in the middle of the night. With a broadband connection Tivo will connect more frequently at all times of the day - among several other advantages.Techno-novices take note: you must have a wireless router to make use of this adapter, but if your TV is close to a wired ethernet source (as was the case at my old house) you do not need this!Be sure to go into your settings and see what % connectivity you're getting - I went from less than 60% up to 79/80% with a slight change in the angle of the hinged portion and where I positioned the device. It's quite small so it takes up very little room.
We have two of these, used to network our Series 2 and Series 3 Tivos. Easy to set up and use, have had no problems in the 8 months we've been using 'em (and LOVE being able to stream from Netflix!)
This adapter is great. I no longer have to connect to the TIVO service with a telephone line. By connecting through my broadband, I have a lot more options on how to use my service. Set up was easy, and reception is excellent.
Works just as described. Plugged it in and the TIVO found my new wireless network and was communicating in just a few minutes. Significantly less expensive here than on the TIVO site.
Just unpackage it, plug into the back of the TIVO box, and TIVO does the rest (prompts you to change to your wireless router). Simple.
Easy as pie to hook up and works in a jiff! Great connection and I couldn't be happier with it!
The Adapter works great with my new HD Tivo and was $30 cheaper than one I bought at Best Buy for my older Series 3.
When we purchased the Series 3 Tivo I had to upgrade the wireless adapter from the one I had used with a Series 2 Tivo. Installation was a snap and it has worked flawlessly. It is absolutly essential in order to view Netflix videos as easy as it is to watch an old TIVO recording. Networking to a computer it makes it possible to transfer programs between TIVO units, transfer programs to your computer, and to publish photos and music from you computer to your TV.
Installed in seconds. Great performance. Excellent to eliminate phone line dependency.
Love it! It was easy to setup and connect to my home network with no problems. It also works with my WAP encryption enabled.
B4 I purchased this device I had a phone wire wrapped from my computer to the phone jack and a lot of clutter. Now there are no wires and no clutter. The Tivo wireless device works like a charm. You plug it in and it does the rest. Simple. Love it!
Bought this item for half or what a local computer store wanted. Worked right out of the box. Very good product.
I had some problems with my TiVO not taking PWA2 at first but once my system finally updated, 2 days later, I have been enjoying not having to many wires running around in the room. Go wireless, it is great!
The adapter works very well. I spent a long time trying to find a compatible adapter for my Tivo but none of the available adapters worked. This one is worth the money and it hasn't caused me a single problem yet. It gets excellent range, requires no set up, and has a great connection. Well worth it.
As others have said, this product is very easy to set up. We use it with our Series 2 Duel Tuner Tivo. Now that we're set up on the wireless network we can go to Tivo's website and schedule TV shows for our TiVo to record. We also downloaded TiVo to Go. The wireless adaptor allows us to send recorded programs from our TiVo to our computers (which can then be viewed or transfered to an ipod video or burned on DVD). The wireless adapter also allows us to listen to our favorite podcasts on the TV (this is a feature of the TiVo service), listen to the music we have saved on our computer through our TV and view pictures saved on our computer through the TV. Not bad for price.
All the other statements are true about download speed due to its ability to help in decompressing data. However I have a Mac and you can't do Tivo to Go but over all I think it is very helpful no matter what and I just bought another one for my S3. God Bless Tivo
I've gone through two other adapters, one being DLink which constantly loss the connection or couldnt see my network, this adapter works great. Installation was nothing: you just connect to TIVO and run the network install, the adapter found the network and settings on its own.Highly recommend this one.
We plugged in our Tivo box, and realized that we needed a phone line plugged in to obtain up-to-date program guides. Unfortunately, our phone line was all the way on the opposing corner of the room. We couldn't leave the line plugged in, strewn across the floor, so we would routinely have to plug in a phone cord, let it update, then unplug it again. We saw that Tivo had this Wireless USB adapter, but found it much cheaper on Amazon. We plugged it in, Tivo recognized it, we followed the onscreen prompts, and tada!! Couldn't been simpler! An added perk is that, when we bought additional ones for other rooms, not only to we never have to worry about tying up the phone line, but we now have all the Tivo units networked together, so if we record something in the living room, we can watch it in the bedroom! How cool is that! I would recommend this to everyone who has Tivo and a wireless network setup in their house.
I was looking for a way to connect to tivo without using a phone line. Tivo does not support phone service over Cable so I needed to invest in another way to connect. This is easy to hook up and works well. Amazon had the best price I could find.
I was dragging a 75 ft telephone cord up to my TIVO every 10 days or so. Most of the time it could not make a connection. If it did make a connection, it failed to complete download. It was ridiculous.It would call 5-6-7 times and I had to have this cord laying around until it was successful. It took 10 minutes to hook up the adapter to my wireless DSL upstairs. Now, I don't ever think about it. What took me so long!!!!
Tivo Wireless G USB Nework Adapter for Tivo Series 2 works great. I have two tivo's which this allowed me to link so I can record different shows and watch them in either room and don't have to have wires everywhere. I like it, no love it. The price on amazon was about 20% cheaper than in stores I looked at. I would recommend if you have the need and interest.
The TiVo AG0100 wireless adapter is quite a distance from my router but I get fantastic and fast data transfer. The product was very easy to install, it took about 3 minutes.
My husband and I recently purchased a Series 3 HD Tivo and ordered this to avoid having to go the phone line connection route. This adapter works really well with strong signal strength!One issue...I was listening to Pandora one day and it was skipping like a CD (and this happened again another day). I couldn't get it to stop so I just turned it off. I called Tivo's customer service to see why this may be happening, and they said to try unplugging it for 15 seconds and then reconnecting it. This fixed the issue for the moment. They said it's usually a network issue. However, I don't believe it's an issue with my network (as I never have problems with it), and that this adapter sometimes gets off track somehow. I guess I will continue to troubleshoot this way. Overall, it's an excellent product that has a small glitch every now and then. Aside from that, we haven't had any problems with streaming Video on Demand or regular recorded TV.
It has made my life a lot easier since giving up on those remote phone jacks for me tivo connections. Now I dont have to make a connection every 5-7 days or at all unless there has been a real power outage or router difficulty.what a joy
It works. The walls and distance between devices in my house pretty much dont let anything below wireless G cards and devices get reception but this gets like 78% signal. Definitely not as fast as going with the wired option though. I'd recommend.
Love being able to connect to any of the TiVos in my home from any one of them. It's a great product.
There is little to say about this little item apart from the fact that it makes life with a TiVo DVR even easier and your connections and downloads much faster. Works exactly as described and is a total breeze to install. It looks very low profile and sleek and is small enough to sit anywhere (and disappear) in your a/v set up. Superb product.
I wanted to upgrade my older TiVo-compatible 802.11b Linksys wireless adapter to 54g to get faster transfers between my TiVo Desktop, so, at first, I tried the IOGear 54g USB wireless adapter which I already owned, but it seems that TiVo has made sure that its box will only work (or work best) with its own branded wireless adapter (its website says that the AG0100 is the only one that will support WPA security).If you can get past their marketing extortion and bite the bullet, this attractive adapter works like a gem. I have the popular Linksys Wireless-G broadband router and configured it to use WPA2 security. While the TiVo website only mentions support for WPA for the AG0100, I did not have an issue with compatibility. I simply plug it in, entered my network password, and it connected with a strong signal.
We ordered 2 of these for our 2 series 2 tivo's and so far, we have not had one hitch in the system. These are super easy to install, they pick up the network quickly and they have worked well so far.i recommend spending the extra money to buy the Tivo brand. it's more money, but less hassel and more satisfaction.
This is a great wireless device. The only thing that gave me a hard time was trying to connect it. I had to go into my Wireless router and change the settings from WAP to WEP encrytion. But once that was taken care of, it worked great.
Great product, works extremely well. My modem is in my basement and the adapter is upstairs. I get an 85% signal strength. Highly recommend.
This TIVO Network Adapter is the ONLY way to go to set up your TIVO. I have my TIVO in my bedroom set up with one of these and my computer is at the other end of the house. I have a Linksys wireless router on my computer and this USB works perfectly!! I have two walls in between the wireless router and the TIVO in the bedroom and it connects to the TIVO service every time. Don't waste your money on other USB Adapters, I did and I had a very hard time getting my previous USB adapter ( a linksys USB adapter) to connect to my network. As soon as I hooked up this little baby to my network...BAM....I was connected. You will not be disappointed with this USB. Trust Me!
I bought the wireless adapter to pair up with Tivo Premier. Talk about piece of cake! I took the adapter out of the package, plugged it into the USB in the back of the Tivo, ran the wireless setup and was up and running. Just be aware there are two versions of the adapter; one for wireless A/B/G and the another for N.
TiVo AG0100 Wireless G USB Network Adapter for TiVo Series2 & Series3 DVRsthis works great!We purchased from Amazon and saved almost $30.00 it was $60.00 at Radio Shack for same exact thing.
This little gizmo works as promised. It's great if you want to transfer shows from one TV to another in your house. You can also download programs to your laptop providing you have TiVo to Go Plus. I'll never get stuck with another clunker of a movie on an airplane again.It took me a little time to figure out that in the "setting up" stage of connecting your adapter, you weren't supposed to enter the router's password but rather the complicated encryption key.
I was so thrilled with the easy of use for this USB product that I ordered a second one for my older Humax TiVo. I had previously conntected my Toshiba (w/CD Player) to the wireless router for my broadband network. I now have all three TiVo connected where they can "see" my router and now no telephone connections. This product worked immediately upon connecting to both my new HD Tivo and my very old Humax. i really enjoy the capability to transfer recordings from one TiVo to another because of the wireless connections.
This product simply plugs into the TiVo, and it works like a charm, utilizing TiVo'z Internet capabilities including Netflix, Yahoo, YouTube, etc.Hopefully TiVo also will introduce a Wireless N as well as thie Wireless G adapter
Works right away, no configuration needed.... Just plug and play. Great price on Amazon too. Bestbuy sells this for twice as much!!
It was inconvenient to arrange a telephone line access where my TIVO is placed, so I bought this wireless adapter. With the additional download and installation of the PC software, I can access media residing on the home network. This was not a driving reason for the purchase - just a nice extra.Installation and use of the adapter couldn't be easier. It was nice to have something work first try.I cannot rate customer service since I had no occasion to use it.
Easy installation. Tivo has a rating of reception, and I couldn't get it to go more than 50-58%. But it still works.
I was very pleased with the ease it was to use Amazon. When I received the item, I did not scrutinize it. When my friend went to install it, he noticed a burned hole in the package similar to a cigarette burn. I do not smoke. I asked Amazon to replace the cord which was burned as well but said that they would replace the complete adapter but my friend used my camera wire to install. Amazon did give me credit and if my installer had not already installed the adapter with my camera cord, I would have replaced the complete set.It would have cost me more to have my friend come back to install it again.
Prior to using this gadget we strung a phone cord across our living room to connect our older model Tivo, several times a week. The only thing you really need to know before you buy this product is that it is not WPA compatible, you must set your network for WEP instead. Don't know what I just said? Check out the configuration of your network, and I hope it becomes clear.
If you have a wireless connection at home, you need this now. basically, you plug and play - and enter your wireless network's password - and you will never worry about updating your TIVo again. Great reception - I have my wireless box upstairs and on the other side of the house, and the TIVO wireless receiver downstairs and on the other end of the house: no connectivity or throughput issues.
I got this for my TiVo series 2 box so I could use a better method of network encryption other than WEP. Worked great for that. It's heavy enough that it doesn't fly around like other plastic type devices. Seems to be a bit expensive.
Don't forget the Tivo Wireless G USB Network Adapter. If you already have broadband internet access with a wireless network, you can transfer shows between your Tivo box and computer or laptop. The deal from Amazon saved me about 70% over the full retail price offered on the Tivo website. Get it, you won't regret this purchase either!!
The Tivo wifi adapter works like a charm, no idea if others work as well, reports seem to indicate if you want full fucntion, use this one, I can't argue as it works. Yes, it's a bit pricey, great price at Amazon, but it sure appears to be a quality piece, it's heavy, well finished, and even has indicators on it to show status and activity.
This item works exactly as it says, just plug it in and the TiVo recognizes it right away. I bought a different brand before checking the TiVo compatibility chart, and it didn't work.
Just in case there are readers considering the new TiVo Series3 HD box, this TiVo Wireless G works with it too. Mine arrived today and I plugged it right in and in less than 5 seconds, the Series3 had it installed. Very slick the way that TiVo wireless install process works!
Having never dabbled much in wireless connectivity for a computer, much less for my Tivo, I was a bit nervous when we moved to a house where I couldn't connect my Tivo directly into my router. All of my online research also indicated that the Tivo was pretty finicky when it came to wireless connectivity.With that in mind, I bypassed other wireless bridges and bought the Tivo version. I can't say for sure that the other bridges wouldn't have worked, but the Tivo one works nicely. I was pretty apprehensive, but I just plugged it into the back of my Series 2 Tivo. I just had to change a setting on my Tivo and enter my WEP (or is it WPA? I can never remember) password. Bingo - everything worked like a charm.It was easy - as easy as electronics stuff SHOULD be but never is.
Works fine with little to no configuration or setup. On a tivo it works right out of the box.
After reading problems with other usb wi-fi adapters I thought that the additional $15 ( $25 for one obtained from CC or Best Buy versus $40 at Amazon) was well worth it if we did not have to hook up the TiVo to a telephone every night and IT was well WORTH it. Set up was easy and I have had no hitch for the past month. The router is upstairs 30 feet away and the signal strength is >80 %. Unless someone has time to get the wireless adapters locally and tinker with it and return it if it does not function ( what with the current gas prices) I would recommend getting this one. A better option would be using LAN link if the house was hardwired
I have had my Tivo for about four years now. Every two weeks I have had to plug a phone line into the box for updates. I could not just leave it connected because I had to run it from another room in the house. Needless to say this got old. I started looking at compatible adapters and none of the retail stores had any in stock every time I checked. I found Amazon had this one at a reasonable price compared to the alternatives.I connected the adapter to my Tivo right out of the box and it installed and found my wireless network. Plug and Play! This was nice and easy!
This wireless adapter works extremely well. I have used Linksys adapter with my TIVO, but the connectivity was poor and inconsistent. This device if very effective and looks nice!
I've used the Tivo wireless adapter for a couple years on an older box with no problems. I hooked the PremierXL and TiVo wireless adapter up and put the Tivo box's MAC (Media Access Control) address into the router. I have to restrict my network using MAC addresses due to my location.Nothing happened, it could not find my network. Over and over.2 hours later I took the adapter off and looked at the bottom to see if it was the correct one. Well, what do I see there but a MAC address for the adapter. Duh.I added that back into to the routers approved MAC addresses-and it worked first time, right away.Lesson: don't forget the adapter has its own MAC address. And you will have to add it if you restrict your network to certain MAC addresses.
The unit works pretty well most of the time but sometimes looses wireless connection with my cable modem. My installation places the receiver one floor below the cable modem with about 60 feet between the modem and receiver. The best signal strength noted so far is about 40% or less. Placement of the receiver can be critical, when I first installed it no signal was received from the modem and I had to relocate it higher in the room to get a only a minimal signal but it did work.
Setup was a breeze. It took very little time for the setup and recognition of the adaptor by my computer. It updates with the Tivo server and links to my pictures very well. I'm going to link with my Rhapsody server tonight and don't anticipate any problems. Anyone having Tivo should use it to it's full potential by getting one of these.
I installed this so that I could get my TiVo Hi Def unit to broadband wirelessly. So far, it works great. I have had no problems with the connection to my wireless router.
I wish this little doohickey had been available the first time I set up my TiVo wirelessly! I originally used a Linksys adapter and spent probably 4 hours trying to get it to work. With the TiVo adapter you just plug it in and continue with the on screen set up. The box recognizes the adapter immediately!Well worth the $50 price tag.
I had this working in under 10 minutes and it works perfectly. Now we don't have a phone cord running across the floor!
The TiVo Wireless Adapter works great. As far as setting it up and using it, there's really nothing to it - Just plug it in and tell your TiVo your wireless ID and Key (password).
I own two Series 2 TiVOs. Each one had a Linksys WUSB12 wireless network adapter (slowing my entire wireless network down to B speed).I did this:1. Took out the WUSB12 adapters2. Plugged in the TiVO Wireless G USB adapters3. Restarted both TiVOs, just to be safe4. Adjusted my Linksys router to Wireless-G mode (instead of Mixed mode)BAM. DONE. My TiVO-To-Go transfers were now over a gajillion percent faster. "6 hours remaining" became "1 hour remaining".I have no complaints.
Had to get this when we canceled our land line. OK so it cost some money, but it let us get rid of the wire, and it works quickly.I was also concerned that it wouldn't be compatible with my wireless network since I run a WPA2 with long complex name and password. But it was a breeze to set up, it connected right away, and the steps getting there were fairly well explained.I'm thinking about getting one for my inlaws, to free up the clutter from their phone line as well.
Yes, this costs 2x as much as a non-Tivo wireless-g adapter, but it seems to be the only one that actually works reliably with a Tivo, and I get better signal strength than with my old Linksys. Plus, it looks and feels really high quality.
Absolutely foolproof setup - took about three minutes. I guess it could have taken four minutes if I'd had to try a different network password, but I got lucky and remembered it on the first try. Guess I should include the two minutes it took me to open the box, so I'll say six minutes, tops!
I was so thrilled when TIVO came out with this wireless adapter !! With cell phones increasingly replacing the need for a land line, TIVO hopped on the wagon. The only reason I had a land line was for my TIVO service. With the wireless adapter, I had my land line disconnected and am happy to save that monthly expense.Adapter works great and I've had no problems with it over the last 10 months or so since I purchased it.It was easy to get working !
Very good product. I paid $20 less than the Tivo site was charging. Very happy with this. My signal between PC and Tivo have no problems once I switched to Linksy's router instead of the gateway that came from Verizon.
I have been using my netgear wireless adapter for the last couple of years with some problems here and there. I finally caved in and bought one of these since the price is now under $40.Worked like a charm. Setup and ready to go in 20 minutes or less.Recommended.
it works fine, as good as wired, and better than a phone line. what all it can do depends on what kind of tivo dvr you have. netflix and youtube are only on the series 3 and hd models. but again the tivo wireless adapter itself is great,,,, was worth the amazon price... JJ
After moving, I didn't have easy access to an ethernet cable anymore. I needed to go wireless and this was the answer. It's cheaper than the same product on the Tivo site and works well.
I looked into using a wireless router instead of this adapter, but really couldn't find anything (for less money) that seemed worthwhile. The cost is really the only downside to this product; we have two TiVo brand adapters and we've never had a problem with either one.
this is a great product! I am very glad I bought it here rather than tivo.com, it saved me $$$...it was easy to set up and didn't take long for tivo to update with it...we have not set up any of the extra features, but when we have time we will. for now, not using the phone line is all we were concerned with (we switched to Vonage).
The TiVo adapter is practically effortless to install. Once installed, the TiVo Series2 recognizes the adapter easily, then you can walk through the configuration to set it up on the wireless network. The only challenging part is the cumbersome entry of the SSID, due to the TiVo interface for text entry. But once it was configured, it connected OK and is far superior to using the phone line by any means.
I hooked this baby up to a D-Link MIMO wireless router. It connnected immediately and the entire setup took no more than 15 mintutes. Of course, I did ROFM (a little bit). The router is at least 40' away from the adapter and on another level of the house. Reception is great and I'm streaming Live365 programming to my stereo via Tivo as I type this.Highly recommended product.
I changed out my old (but reliable) Linksys USB adapter for the Tivo 802.11g on my Toshiba Tivo DVR and transfer speeds to PC network improved by two and one half times. Very satisfied - plugged straight in, Tivo recognized the adapter and I was up and running. Nice looking product including dual green LEDs.
Pros:Works amazing! Love it. Uses wireless internet connection to upload the show times and titles.Highly suggest this product if your looking for a wireless adapter for your TiVo.Was a plug and play periphrial. Plug it in and your Series2 TiVo finds it right away.Great product and experience. Much like every TiVo product I own.Cons:The price seems a little steep but not too bad because it works like a charms
It works great and the price was cheaper here at Amazon than what TIVO sells it for on their website.
this adapter is pretty good looking.It practically installed itself.All I had to do was connect the cord and tivo popped put a message that it found a network and guided me thru the rest of the process.I highly recommend it.Lets you enjoy all the web features of tivo.
Assembly was pretty straight forward, and when you're all done with the TV on top ... looks pretty slick. Strap in back secures TV, and cover in front does the same.Due to support beams in back, my receiver had to go right in the middle on the 2nd shelf. Those same beams, could possibly get in the way of wiring on the top shelf if putting components two across. In fact, I need to get a couple of right-angle connectors in my case. There is also a chance since the glass is at an angle on the sides, that one foot of a componenent all the way to either side may not touch the glass. I also wish the top shelf was a little taller for stacking components.Even with these quibbles, I am very happy with the stand, because the quality is very nice, and the end result looks great & feels solid.
This is a fabulous book written in classic Hardy style. It's full of twists, turns, and surprises. Just when you think you know where Hardy is leading you, he throws in another detail, which leaves you dumbfounded and believing that no other than Thomas Hardy could pull this off.
Thomas Hardy's books are somewhat difficult to read, but this book, set in an English market town, is well worth reading to obtain a picture of life in rural England during that time period along with a complex tale of an ambitious man's rise and ultimate fall. A man rising from the ranks of farm laborers builds himself up to become a successful grain merchant and leading citizen of the town. Events of his past emerge to place a shadow over his success, and his greed and some bad judgement lead to his ruin. Like most of Hardy's books, it is a tragedy for the main character.
The excellent use of language to desciribe the character and nteractions of the main characters was very polished and held my attention completely throughout. I liked the way the story unfolded, not a "just so" tale but one full of true to life human strenths and weakneses. The description of the enviorenment and tracking the history of Casterbridge and he normal day to day life of the enhabiants was interesting and made me feel almost that I was there. I would recommend "The Mayor of Casterbridge" to any lover of historical novels.
What a story! What a tragedy! The Mayor of Casterbridge faces secrets told and untold, misunderstandings, betrayals, loves won and lost... a bona fide soap opera set in a faraway time! Yes, some of the coincidences are a little too convenient, but they kept me reading into the wee hours of the morning! And in the end I cried. This book's characters help us to consider the effects on others of the way we live our own lives. We are truly sorry for the way the Mayor lived his.
"Rhonda Findley and I are the co-authors of New Orleans Unleashed. We created this book, along with the photographer, Vanessa Brown Louvier. There have been some postings giving me more credit than I'm due and suggesting that I was the sole author of the book, which is incorrect. I'd like to clarify that this was a group project. There were no stars, except for Indy the Dog. I hope you all enjoy our wonderful project."
From the first time that I heard her on the Next Friday soundtrack, I was impressed by her voice. Listening to her album, you get to hear a great voice over quality production. To top this off, she did a remake of Guy's "Let's Chill" and it is tight. SHe is one of those artist who gives an even mixture of music tempo on her CD. There are ballads, fast tempo and mid tempo on here and the songs have meaning. "Still Your Son" and "She Can't" same to be personal songs and you feel them. Great CD.
This book has been one of many great books I have come across it has broadened my mind in so many wonderful ways. My search for truth still continues and not only is this book outstanding but, I do recommend it for those who's' minds are seekers of continuous knowledge.
This is a qood quality vest, and it will work for a festival. I would say that it's more costume quality than I expected, and the gold grommets are pretty noticable. The vest doesn't look as much like suede in person. But my husband really likes it, and he will be wearing it.
The only thing better than playing frisbee, is playing frisbee in the dark! Especially when the frisbee glows! I'm no serious diskhead but for some leisurely summer evening fun this is the frisbees knees.
I am proud of the way Butch made all that money from the streets and while doing it, he exposes the hypocrisy of the government that tries to bring him down. they charge him with running a criminal enterprise, yet the government controls liquor, "pharmacueticals", and cigarettes which is equally or more damaging than heroine. This was a story was really one of the best books Ive ever read, honestly....because its based on a true story. Someone needs to make a movie out of this quick!!! I wonder who would play Butch....
I kind of missed out on this game. I played every RE games well except for the outbreaks and the gameboy version. I didnt have a dreamcase so i couldn't really get this game. Though i did have a PS2, i really didn't pay attention to this game, rather from 1-5. This game is amazing, the graphics is stunning and the hazy structure adds a scary visual to the game. Lots of gameplay hours and fun. Claire is too legit of a character, much like RE2. Claire should make an appearance in the newest RE.
Welllll, what I can say..this movie is "DIFFERENT"..GOOD, but DIFFERENT. If you are a TRUE Kurt Cobain/Nirvana fan, you'll learn to appreciate it. It hurts to see this is what Kurt might have gone through! (I HOPE NOT), but the movie itself is very "QUIET". He doenst say much. The "song" scene" is the emotional part, Pitt definately played a good role!..I recommend YOU WATCH it..only if you're a TRUE FAN, otherwise, dont waste your time, you wont find it interesting.
I live in Seattle and I cant see why anyone could ever talk crap about dear ol Kurt and put him down,He was the nicest guy and cared more about other people than himself.I saw Nirvana in concert in Oct.93 in Phx,Az were I used to live and when I saw Kurt play and sing it was perfect without a flaw.It hurts me that anyone could ever talk about Kurt like he was just nothing or over rated,Where in the hell were you in 94 you fool, Nirvana changed the whole world and you sit ther and say he had no talent.If it wasnt for Nirvana & Kurt ther would be no Lame bandwagon Pearl Jam.
This is a wonderful wealth of curriculum for parents who are interested in teaching their preschoolers! It has wonderful Christian resources and I highly recommend it!
Panned by critics and written strictly to make money, I still find the story compelling and Faulkner's treatment of it excellent.
I thought that the book was a great review for the test and saw much of the material on the test. However, the test bank was down the week before my exam which was when I wanted to do the questions. That was very disappointing, but I did the test questions on the AAFP website which were both helpful and provided CME credit as well.Addendum: I just got my scores today, and I rocked the boards! I ended up in the 95th percentile. I also attended a course, but I felt that this book really put me over the top. It was great at some of the esoterica on the boards. My only beef is that I could not gain access to the online questions at all. Mine did not come with a CD, you had to log onto a website with a number provided in the front of the book. The week before my exam the website was down completely. I ended up not needing it, but it did stress me out right before the boards. Good luck and buy this book!!!
I have tried board review courses, CD-ROMs and other board review books in the past. This one hits all the important subjects you'll find on the actual exam in a format very similar to the exam itself. I would recommend it and plan on using it again for future exam recertifications.
This is a great CD. Repin is a great player, and he does justice to all the compositions. The Lalo is wonderfull, although the last movement is not totaly clean, the style is great and it is a great listen. The Chausson does not have enough tension, and the overdone reverbration is obvious. The Ravel is strong, but it doesn't beat the Heifetz version!
There is a tendency to write of the musicians of bond as fluff because they are provocative in the way they dress.Like most young people these girls are aware of their sexuality but what I hear in the music is professionals who take their music very seriously.I often listen to this DVD at work and when I can't watch the concert I run the program in the background while I have something else on the screen and I enjoy the performance just as much.A definite recommend!
Overall, I find this DVD quite enjoyable as "the Duel", "dallas", "bond theme" "alexander the great" and "victory" simply blew me away. However, at the same time, their other compositions don't quite work for me, as they were over-orchestrated. It is overall interesting though, as the four violinists are very talented.
I heard about BOND with my nephew and I fall in love with these group! They bond to my heart and my fascination of violin music. This is a new concept in violin performance. I recommend this DVD, because you can enjoy music and see the passion of the performance of these girls. I buy a new violin. My children see it and play with them the violin, dance and sing. I am going to buy other BOND presentation. It is a good choice.Vivian
Ever since I started playing the violin, people were raving about this orchestra band called Bond. I borrowed my friend Paulina's DVD of the Royal Albert Hall concert and I loved every minute of it. I recommend this to the people who love violin and would enjoy watching the girls play electric orchestra instruments.
What's not to love? Four beautiful women playing beautiful music! My only criticism is that it's way too short, but I'd imagine they'll be coming out with a new DVD soon, which I'd definitely buy!
Good quality of music and great show. Lively modern mix of classical and rock music. If you like electrified classical music you will like this.
The music goes from melodramatic to exciting. The performance is interesting. The four lady musicians are attractive. The DVD is a beautiful picture. What else can you ask for?The only bad thing is most of the time the sound from the instruments of the 4 ladies is drowned out by background music.Still, they do make classical music sound exciting, and contemporary.
Although I can't place my finger on it, I feel it lacked something for me to give it a five star rating. The concert was entertaining. The ladies are extremely sexy and talented. If you like this style of music or this group, I would still recommend it.
I spent a lot of time trying to find supportive athletic underwear that doesn't bunch up or get sweaty. These are the ones! I use them for Crossfit, running, hiking, etc. They're pretty snug, but keep everything under control and cool. However, I would not want to use these as every-day underwear; they are much too tight for that. The longest I've worn them is about 4 hours on a hike.I'm not certain but it appears these are no longer made by Under Armour, at least under the same name. Luckily I purchased 10 pairs--I've had these for about 9 months and they are holding up perfectly when washed (cold water) and air dried. I'm a size 29 waist, 5'10", 145 lbs, and the smalls are perfect. Absolutely zero leg ride-up even when squatting, running, etc.
I got these shorts in order to get gear for my first mud run. These are awesome. They kept the mud and sweat out of all the right places. I would def recommend.
Good buy and the colour is what I really want. Can't be any better. The compression, stretchability and feel is fantastic. Pricing is also reasonable.
I use this compression short regularly for longer hikes and bicycle rides. Won't go back to using cotton undergarments for sports - No Chaffing, mostly dry even after long hikes/rides, dries overnight.
I purchased these for the man in my life. Compared to other similar items, these rate the best quality and just overall fit/likeablility. They are holding up well with frequent use and frequent washing. I would recommend these to anyone!
Bought two of these compression shorts, it is a great buy! It may cost a bit, but it is worth the price cause it will get the job done no matter what!
This is a great undergarment to keep my fat thighs rubbing together on long walks. I found these more comfy if I wore them without underwear.
its under armour you can not go wrong if you do not own a pair then you need to trust me get some
Be sure that you check on Under Armour's website to find sizing. I'm about a size 30 waist and thought I needed a small, turns out that I actually needed a medium size. They feel so cool and they're so flexible. Sometimes I just want to wear them as regular underwear! Great quality product, way to go Under Armour :)
if your going for more of just an under layer and not a layer of protection from sliding, id go with teh performance breifs.
it arrived extremely late, to the point where i wondered if i had been robbed. Be prepared for an extra 2-3 weeks on the shipping estimate.
These work so well. I got a black pair for Christmas and needed a pair of white ones for my white soccer shorts. They help so much in recovery and I couldn't recommend them more.
excelente el producto lo recomiendo, llego en buenas condiciones. el empaque es muy bueno, no estaba abierto y a tiempo!!
Would recommend over any other brand not because its Under Armour but the fact that it is really great and stays tight to hold everything in place during exercise when using the treadmill or doing some Insanity Workout DVDs. Great Product if your considering this its worth the extra buck because of how durable it is.
These are nice, although I wish they'd be a little longer and the waist not so high. When I go running I have to fold the waist down. They seem to bee good quality, although they are pretty expensive.
love them, wwear them all the time, great for working out, if u have any doubts, dont hesitate, and buy
I bought the compression shorts for running and general workouts. The fit comfortably, and are exactly what I wanted. Under Armour makes great stuff, even though it can be costly.
Great Product!! very useful, good quality, i love it, the price it is ok, and the size two. I will buy it again!!
These are very comfortable and fit and work great. I wear them under my 10" UA shorts so they don't peek out the bottom like some of the other compression shorts.The compression shorts really help avoid the leg rubbing of shorts or creeping when on the treadmill or elliptical. I'm ordering more.
I bought these because I play Ultimate Frisbee, I bought one initially and loved it so I bought another one. I wish they were a little longer but they work fine nevertheless.
This was my first purchase from UnderArmour, and I'm sure it won't be the last if the rest of their products are as good as this one. The fit is perfect as well as the support. I'm not knowledgeable enough to talk about the technical features so all I can say is that I'll buy a few more as I can't imagine wearing anything else. It feels that good.
Bought this as a lower-cost alternative to Futuro's "Infinity" knee support (see my review of that). This is reasonably supportive, does the job I need it for, smaller (so it works better under clothes, etc) but less comfortable than the "Infinity". Not as good kneecap stabilization, either. I use this for shorter and less vigorous workouts and sometimes normal day-to-day activities; bends more easily than the larger support so more comfortable to sit. Pretty much stays in place (if you measure and get the right size...). Box says "hand wash" but I use washer/dryer cold/low and it seems fine. Latex rubber so those allergic need to beware.
Little Charlie and the Nightcats continue to showcase their brand of California Jump blues with their new release "That's Big". The Nightcats style has always involved a unique combination of swing, jazz, R&B and Chicago blues all combined with often comical real life lyrics. On "Desperate Man" for example, vocalist/harpist Rick Estrin laments over being in love with a woman he just can't stand. While the title track "That's Big" places the big woman, as the object of his desire. There are a couple of guest appearances on the CD that are noteworthy. Rusty Zinn plays guitar on the instrumental "Bluto's Back" and guitar and vocals on the slow paced R&B number, "It Better Get Better". While Icepick James Harman joins the fun singing backup vocals on "That's Big". This disc has it all, guitars, harp, organ, sax, piano and plenty of wit and fun. Another winner for Chalie Baty and Rick Estrin.
If you are a blues fan and have yet to experience the West Coast Blues scene or Little Charlie and the Nightcats in particular, BUY this CD! 'Little' Charlie and Rusty Zinn offer up some smokin' solos on "Bluto's Back" that boggle the mind. Once you hear this offering, you'll be back to the store buying all the rest. Great party music! Also recommend Rod Piazza, Rusty Zinn, Kid Ramos.
"A Star Is Born" the 1937 release is excellent drama and with the theme of fame and popularity. It is done in Technicolor, and is not the musical version with Judy Garland done in the 1950's. This original stars Janet Gaynor as a promising Hollywood starlet known as "Vicki Lester" - she came from a farm family, and her original name was Esther Blodgett. Sometimes her character tends to be an overly sweet hayseed, but she keeps her vital with excellent acting. Frederick March stars as the established movie star, "Norman Maine" who falls in love with and helps Esther start her career, but he realizes as her star rises, his is fading. He is a heavy drinker, older and a proud man. Seeing that he is sinking into obscurity, he cannot play second fiddle and commits suicide.This version stands up well even today and has great stars such as Gaynor and March as well as supporting cast of Adolphe Menjou, Andy Devine, Carole Landis, and Lionel Stander.
This product is great. Your milk supply will increase just like promissed in 1 - 4 days. The only down side is the taste. I recommend positioning the dropper way at the back of the throat so you don't taste it as much when you drop it in your mouth. After a little while, the taste doesn't bother you as much. It really works, so I truely recommend it.
When I started using this, I was a bit skeptical. But within a week I saw a differences. I use to only be able to pump 2 oz at most and after starting with this product I would get 6- 8 oz every time I pumped. Its great! Yes the taste is bitter but the milk starts flowing!
Great product Just as promised. It really does work . just dont drink anything before or after using it. I highly recommend it
I've been using this product for over a week after having supply issues at 11months when i started working, it workds for sure, tastes like crap like everyone says, the only weird thing that i haven't read anyone else say is... my armpits smell diferent! like the maplely smell the product has... i tried taking the pills instead and the same thing happens, ut doesn't bother me that much i just find it funny
...but it's disgusting. It's taste equivalent would be what I imagine stuffing your face full of dandelions and old socks would be. It says not to drink but 1-2 ounces of liquid after you take it but it's a nearly impossible task, unless you like suffering. I would recommend it only to those who don't gag very easily. But if you are desperate for help with milk, hold your nose and droppers up!
This CD is quite a bit different than these guys first CD, but it is the same in that every single song is worth listening to. This CD is a little more mellow than the first, but is still very upbeat. This is one of my favorite albums, it just doesnt get old.
This is a fictional account of a true event in history, but it is loaded with factual imformation. If you enjoy reading conspiracy theories you will love this book. The questions raised in the book are quite interesting. The reader should have fun trying to separate the fictional events from the factual ones. Many have described it as a real page-turner.
These are nice trim-duty end clips. I wouldn't want to snip anything larger than 18gauge wire, but they are great for trim work.
This book was an intricate victorian mystery with historical overtones and I enjoyed it. But I was confused during the whole book, looking for Lyman Breeland to be revealed as some kind of dual personality or undercover spy, because the flyleaf write-up on the hardbound version refers to him as Lyman Breedlove. What gives? I spent the whole book looking to solve this puzzle and by the end it was obviously a (major) publishing faux pas. Anybody else find this?
Here you'll find Elton John's music transcribed down to a tee. This is a welcome change to nonsensical 'interpretations' that conspicuously sound exactly the same as the melody line. You want to play 'Bennie and the Jets' from the starting heavy chords to the verse to the jazzy piano solo, here you go. Blue Eyes, Rocket Man, Someone Saved My Life Tonight (excellent song)... it's all here. In some instances (like Honky Cat for example), there's just no point in bothering to learn the music EXACTLY, because Elton John just improvised within chords in the first place. So it's best for you to do the same unless you want to pore through pages of the same music phrased slightly differently. Next time it would be better to include the more 'precise' songs in Elton's catalogue.Anyway, this is a great collection. Some of the songs aren't very well known but get the album they're on and you're away. Hours of fun.
this books whose 1928 version is highly sought after, capitalizes on the former, but includes more modern topics of relevance to today. the lions share of this text is unchanged as to style and philosophy. highly based on advanced calculus. for an exhaustive review see the following: [...].
Interesting Texas stories told with a twang that rings true. Bigfoot was pure macho. He came to Texas to kill the man who killed a family member of his, and ended up killing many men who were trying their dang-dist to kill him.
If Big Foot Wallace actually experienced these events he was a great frontiersman, Or was he a great storyteller? Everyone interested in western history will enjoy this book.
Fits me as if it were custom tailored. I highly reccomend this item. I have paid twice as much for shirts nowhere near as good as this one.
I listened to this CD multiple times and I never got tired of it. I'm serious I even experienced several *astral projections* because it perfectly resonates to deep relaxation centers and it's hard to explain but it's gorgeous and incredible. I call this album "mind candy" because it gives me most delicious sensations and I "go under" very quickly and experience profound deep relaxation - to the point I really did have astral projections. It's the most amazing albumn I have EVER heard and I own a lot of CDs of this genre. THIS ALBUM IS THE ONE TO GET YOU WON'T BE SORRY - it's simply FANTASTIC BEYOND DESCRIPTION!!!
I bought this doll for my daughter 2 years ago and just recently purchased this as a gift for a 7 year old. The food is pretty difficult to get into the dolls mouth, but the girls don't seem to care. They think the mess is fun (keep a wet washcloth and maybe a kitchen towel handy) and really get a kick out of the doll using her potty. You have be pretty patient to get the food in properly and then sit the doll just right in order for her to pass the pretend food.The bottle part is no problem, but lots of other dolls that cost considerably less will drink a bottle and use a potty.If you are the patient type and don't mind a mess at the kitchen table, then this doll is ok. If you want your daughter to entertain herself then get a cheaper doll that can use the potty.
This product was purchased for my daughter and son-in law for Christmas. They love it! I will buy more paintings from this company and highly recommend to others.
This book takes place in Soledad,CA. It taking about two migrant workers Lennie and George. George is "small and quick and dark of face". "Lennie, a huge man has the mind of a young child". George like a father that taking care his trouble son Lennie. Lennie is a trouble maker, he made a lot of trouble. Finally George can't help Lennie and he use a gun point on the back of lennie's head.Read on to find out what happened next.I give this book 5 stars, beacuse I like John Steinbeck's books.
Of Mice and Men by John Steinbeck was set during the Great Depression in CA. In this book there are two characters called Lennie and George. They are the two migrant workers, who had travel together and they want to save some money and buy a ranch of their own. George is a small person, ¡quick and dark of face¡. He always takes care of Lennie and he act like a father to Lennie. Lennie is a huge man and has a mind of a child. He always gets into trouble. Every time when Lennie gets into trouble, George always gets him out of the trouble. Lennie acts like a son to George. Will George and Lennie make their dream come true or will Lennie¡s weak mind and strong body destroy their dream?The book Of Mice and Men is a good book. I will rate it as four stars. In this book, it has a lot of conflicts and events. Also it tells us how important friendship is event if it is a very hard time. Friendship will help you get through anything.
The book "Of Mice and Men" by John Steinbeck, takes place in Soledad, C.A.,during the Great Depresion.The two main characters of the book are George and Lennie.They are good friends.Their relationship is complex and is like father and son.One of the theme of the book is " Friendship".This is the case of Lennie and George.But do you think that this relationship will be forever?Personally,I recommend this book because it is interesting,and it is a really good story, I give 5 stars to it.I learned that friendship is valuable and when you have a really good friend he/she can become more than a friend "a Family".
I thought the book was preatty cool. I liked it because it's a good story about friendship and how these two guys who have been through everything together were forced to break their friendship because of a tragic accident. It was a very sad book, but overall I thought it was preatty cool!!!
I just recently read John Steinbeck`s classic "Of Mice and Men", and I enjoyed it very much. Steinbeck`s technique of making books come alive is very visible in this novel. The story between the two main characters George and Lennie was very touching, and their experiences on a farm were richly described. But I think that this coming-of-age tale could of been so much better if it were longer and more elaborate. Other than the length, "Of Mice and Men" is a fantastic book.
I was reading cambridge histories of China when I was 11, but literary "classics" had never impressed me. (Although I've liked "classic" poems & short stories for years.) This was good & the ending was sad, but made sense. It was even foreshadowed. If you think this should've had a happy ending stick with TV sitcoms or kids books. If anyone else knows of a "classic" this readable I'd love to hear about it.
This book was on the requirement list to enter Honors English I in my town's high school. I found the book very intriguing. It shows you both life at its worst, and at its best. (Please don't ask me to elaborate :) !) The book also gives you an outlook on human nature as a whole. I found this book to be one of the most touching stories I have ever had the priviledge to read.
Of Mice and Men was a wonderful book that went to the heart of the readers. Steinbeck did a great job of making the reader feel the pain of the tragedy that never should have happened. I give this book a 10 because it was heart warming but sad and it also gave you a good insight on how each character reacted and what they were like.
George and Lennie are very good friends. They are always doing things together and travel together. Lennie is the one who always makes trouble and Veorge always helps him. But now, Lennie just causes a serious problem that Veorge even can't help. Lennie is a huge guy, has a ind of a young child, and George is small and quick. Two of them are totally the opposite, not only the way they look, and the way they act, but they have a same dream. I like this book and I will recommend you to read it, because it is great and it will always give you surprise. Also, you will learn their friendship.
George and Lennie were the best of friends. Lennie was a huge man. He was a hard worker. Lennie was not very smart. He got himself into alot of trouble because he could not understand many situations. Lennie's main concern was to pet nice things and that is what got him into the most trouble. With his size, Lennie did not even understand his own strength. George took care of Lennie. He did all the thinking that Lennie could not do himself. He had patience with Lennie, while other could not. No matter what he still stuck with Lennie and took care of him. Together, they had a dream and wanted so bad to reach it that they felt it was always within one step their grasp.This book showed the greatness of friendship. I would recommend this book to my friends because it shows the meaning of friendship and patience. This book is about dreams and how important they are in pushing someone to reach them.
Fiendship is very important to everyone. In this book Lennie always does something wrong, but he never know what is wrong. George is his only friend, always protects him from danger. They belong to each other. The ranch of Soledad is where they work. In this new work place, Lennie really keeps George in hot water and George has to make a hard choice. They have a sweet dream of land , which belongs to themselves. Will this dream come true? I like this book, because Steinbeck's story is so exciting that I held my breath until I finish reading to the end.
Two men travel together looking for work. They meet some workers named Curley, Slim, Candy, Carlson, and Crooks who live in a ranch.Lenny and George have to solve many problems in their lives. Lenny has to go through many difficulties as he is mentally challenged.In this novel we can see how the people from low social classes are treated inferiorly.In this tragic novel only one gets out alive!
This is my favorite Steinbeck novel. It is a beautiful story and a must read. One of the few books that I would like to read again. Simply put, this is the story of a TRUE friendship between two men, one of whom is mentally challenged. Read it!!
This piece is ultimate Steinbeck. The author has limited his characters to two major ones and a few ancillary ones. The book is short, however, the tale is told thoroughly. The reader feels so very sorry for George. George is a study of loyalty, decency and patience and how one feels so utterly responsible for the life of another human being-in this case his childhood friend, Lennie, who is somewhat mentally challenged. This book is a sad account of the fragility of human beings and how one person will be loyal to the other person til the end-even if he needs to commit murder to show it. The character, Candy, is so very pathetic too and his comments about " a stranger killing my old dog" are so very sad! One tends to think that it was because of Candy feeling badly about a stranger killing his dog that George does what he does. This is a beautiful book!
This is an authentic, somber tragedy, set in early 20th century California. We follow a dreamer, and his companion who is a child in a giant's body. They travel from place to place on foot to find work then to finally end up on a farm where dreams and life come to an end.Stienbeck depicts these pathetic, hard, and lost lives with an eye for detail. This is a simple story with a simple dialect. A good read.LORD BlessScott
I've always made a big deal about how much I do not like Steinbeck or Hemingway, but after reading a couple of both of theirs this year, I have to admit that I LOVE both. As far as Steinbeck, I know that I still despise The Grapes of Wrath, but this is an incredible book. Especially short and easy to read, the writing is simply superb. The characters are well-developed, the dialogue is simple and to the point, and the descriptions are detailed. This book deserves it's frequent consideration as a classic. And while I still can't imagine ever liking GOW, I can no longer dismiss Steinbeck.
of mice and men is a great book.my favorite character is lennie. lennie is my favorite character because he is so kind, he listens to george and he loves rabbits. lennie is always talking about livin off the fat of the land and tendin the rabbits. lennie is always getting himself and george into trouble and george always get them out. george has to take care of lennie because he has no one else. lennie has to be careful on the ranch because the bosses son curly sufers from little man sindrom and he hates leinne because he is so big. this book is filled with suspence so i would recommend you to read it
the story of two young men George and Lennie,who travel together and share the same dream of being their own bosses and own a ranch which is the american dream.The story takes place at the Salinas river banks and at a ranch in California.It's prety good except for its lenght and sort of tragedyyou should read it do to its moral lessons.one of the major themes is lonelinessoverall a good book
John Steinbeck's Of Mice and Men is a wonderful book about life in the 1930's. Steinbeck tells about two men trying to make money and live on their own land, as many men drempt of back then. This was shown through one metaphore of Lennie (one of the main characters) wanting to tend to the rabbits. The rabbits really represented them being free.The characters in this book were really unique. George and Lennie are the main characters and they always stick together. Lennie is mentally sick, yet George sticks with him. The characters were a very beliavable pair because how they acted and their dreams of being free were very realistic.This is a good book to read for young americans and i gave it four stars. Although it is only 107 pages long there is a lot of content and makes you want to keep reading it. Many people dislkike the language in the book, but other people dont realize that this book shows the language that everyone hears in our society every day.
This audio production for "Of Mice and Men" by Gary Sinise is nothing short of brilliant. Over the years, Mr. Sinise has made John Steinbeck's work a part of his life, being involved with it in various mediums: live plays, a film, and this audio recording. As a result, he seems to have developed a deep connection to this story, and a lively and powerful rendering of the characters is what results. It is the perfect performance of a perfect book.
Have you ever read abook where you could relate to the characters? I have and this is why I liked OF MICE ANd MEN by John Stienback. Ialso like this book because it kept my attention. There weren't many chapters so it made it seem like it went faster.I enjoyed this book but theres one part I don't like. Just as the book got good one of the main characters accidently kills another. I wasn't expecting this.This author has a way of describing characters that made me relate to them. This made the story more interesting, so did the climax. I couldn't put the book down and the climax was the best part. this authors descriptive writing kept my attention with a great chapter book.
As an English teacher I believe this is a novel that we should all read because of its iconic status in American literature. Many allusions are made to Lenny Smalls in film and literature which would go totally misunderstood if one had not read the novel. It is a quick and easy read.
I love this book. This was my first Steinbeck novel, and I thought it was great
This books is on most reading lists, and it is easy to understand why. Beyond merely a 'classic,' the book stands next to 1984 as literature that remains good reading long after it was written. The language is modern, the symbolism deep, and the story short but compelling.I've read Steinbeck's Grapes of Wrath, a book I did not enjoy very much. If you have enjoyed one of his previous books, regardless of the experience, I suggest picking up this book. If you haven't read his other works, I strongly suggest picking this one up first.
This is one of these books that are on what I call the "Moby D" list.There are book and movies that you have to read and or see so that you can be a well rounded individual. At least in theory. I plan to make another list of books that everyone should read before they die. This is one of them so hop to it. Insightful and endearing and a easy read for a young adult. Great character studies.
This bok was a great value and was perfectly described in the description. There wasm't a single flaw with it and would definitely reccomend buying it from amazon for the great deal.
This is a great Book plain and simple. It displays a great ironic message of love and friendship. The story is deeply moving and evokes terrific emotion. As the story moves along you feel you know and love the characters yourself. You really feel for the characters and their situations. I love this book.
I thought this book to be one of the best novels that I've read. I also did a duo interpertation of this book for speech and my partner and I did very well we took sixth in state. Anyone who gave it less than at least five stars can't see the true meanings and feelings that the author intended for this book. It show's peoples differences with one another, but how they can still be connected. This book was awesome.
It was a good book and I enjoyed reading it. I got into it when I started reading it, but I thought it had to much foul language, and I didnt really like the way it ended.
A great read from start to finish. I loked the characters and there emotion from the start to the shocking ending. This book has everything in it romance,suspense,drama,humor. The book is written great and it deals greatly with the depression. It shows how real friends act and how they deal with the emotion they went through.
Of Mice and Men was a very good book in my opinion. I liked it because it was about two guys pursuing a dream. George is a very smart person who knows what he wants out of life. Lennie on the other hand isn't very smart and gets into trouble alot. George basically take cares of Lennie and trys to keep him out of trouble. They both start working on a ranch in California and try to earn money so they can have there own place with a few acres. The ending is very good and unexpected that is what makes this novel great.
I thought that Of Mice and Men was a pretty good book. It told a story of a relationship between two friends. How they traveled around together and how they tried to find and keep a job. If you don't like cussing in a book then this is not the one to read. Otherwise it was really good.
This story is about two rural farm workers, Lennie and George. They try and acheive their dream of owning their own house on an acre of land. They are close to reaching their goal with the help of Candy, and old swamper on the farm, but Lennie "done another bad thing".I liked this book. It showed the theme of friendship throughout the whole book. It is very realistic. I would recommend this book for young adults.Ms. Redmon-Period 6
In John Steinbeck 1937 novel there are two men one named Lennie who is a tall, big, squared man who faces mental problems and his friend, George, who has known Lennie for as long as he can remember. George is a skinny man that sometimes gets annoyed by Lennie's mental problems. Lennie and George live and work on a simple and plain ranch and have many dreams and stories behind ranch they work at. The ending of this book is very shocking. I suggest that kids of the age 13 and below should not read this book. If you want a steady pace and shocking ending book, then you got to read "Of Mice and Men".
John Steinbeck's Of Mice and Men is definitely now one of my favorite literature novels that I have read in English class. This book was one that I could actually picture in my head and imagine what was really happening in the story. I found myself not wanting to put it down until I finished reading it completely. George and Lenny, otherwise known as John Malkovich and Gary Sinise, were great characters and each perfect for the part that they contributed in the story. These two characters had a remarkable relationship and the way Steinbeck portrayed it told me a lot. They shared good times, bad times, and sad times together, but no matter what, there was still a connection between them. Though I was required to read it I am now very thankful that I did. It was a great novel and I would honestly recommend it to anyone who is looking for a good piece of literature.
A story of two men contrasting in physical & mental conditions but united in a deep & trusting bond whose dreams are shattered by life's sinister twist;is handled very well by Steinbeck's gifted touch for the realistic.His lyrical catch-scapes prove daunting & impenetrable though,hindering the flow of the dialogues bet. the characters,where the strength of the novel lies.His style of prose fits more for a screenplay,& it's no wonder that the film of this work was done so well.The end is a dissapointment when one has seen the film;nevertheless,the work is a moving portrayal of human relationships in the inevitability of man's destiny & his helplesness in trying to avert it.
Great book! My question- what would have happened after George killed Lenny? My class is doing a mock Trial of a time when they come to get George for murdering Lenny. As his defense attorney, I will show how Lenny's murder was not pre meditated as George was mostly convinced by Slim.
This book was one that i wish i would of read when i was suppose to in 9th grade. It was once we reached the middle of the book i realized how good it was. I am one of those students who hate reading those long novels about nothing important. Even though my teacher said it was one of the shortest novels we would ever read! After only reading the middle to the end. I just had to check this book out for myself! Once you begin this book, you may think it starts off boring..but keep going becuase youll never want to put it down. It teackes you about loyalty and friendship in real life situations. This is a book i would read over and over again!.Try this book out..you'll really like it!
The books appears to be merely entertaining until you reach the end. Memorable characters. Excellent ending. Colorful setting. This is some of the best American literture.Also of interest: you know the big dog in Looney Tunes cartoons that always asks the smaller dog to tell him about "the bunnies". That character is taken from this book.
When asked I tell people OF MICE AND MEN is my favorite book.My youngest son had to read it for ninth grade English class and was exclaiming over it. I have read it numerous times but not for many years. I bought a copy and read it again. It is always good. The dark themes remind me that the misfits of the world have a place but too often it is a place with tragic consequences that effect us all and always will.
These are the two words I have to describe this book. It's a short work of genius, and it fully immerses you in its world for the all-too-short time that it lasts. With its masterfully crafted characterization and storyline woven so perfectly, it has you tightly wrapped around its proverbial fingers until its heartbreaking conclusion.
This was a very brief but very engaging story wonderfully read by Gary Sinise. It is very touching and I didn't want it to end the way it did but I knew it had to. Great Story.
The book "Of Mice and Men" is about two men trying to survive in the great depression. One of the characters, Lennie, is a mentally retarded person that cant remember anything and likes to pet things. The other man, George, is a smart guy that is burdened with taking care of Lennie. These people are trying to make money to live on a farm. They come and work on this ranch where they meet many surprising people. This stories themes are dreams because Geaorge and Lennie dream about living on a farm and other dreams. Another theme is violence because it tells about some violence in the book. This also shows how life was in the great depression.
Mice and Men is a violent and dramatic novel. The two main characters were Lennie and George. Lennie was a big, kind of "slow", quite retarted man and George was smaller and smart. One theme of this book was loneliness. Curly's wife would always come to the bunk house to talk to someone and be with someone because Curly was never there. Another theme of the book was about dreams. Lennie and George dreamed of living on a farm with cows, chickens and rabbits. Conflicts occured many times in this story. Lennie killed birds, mice and even a person. He never meant to do the things he did it was all out of curiosity of feeling on soft things. One more conflict of the story is when Curly doesn't like big people because he's small. Curly took Lennie the wrong way and causesd them to fight. Therefore, this book was interesting and exciting.
Time after time steinbeck has been able to tell a story and capture my attention with great words which flow off the pages. Mice and men is a great story of two men and their lot in life. You'll laugh and cry as you read this tale. And it will challenge you to ask questions you never though were there to ask.
This is a tragic story about two friends that travel together. There friendship is unique. These two frineds, Lennie and George make a very good team together. Lennie is a very big and strong person and is very slow but George is much smaller guy with the brains. It talks about their life in farming and how they travel together to make there dream come true until it takes a twisting turn.
I loved of Mice and Men. The relationship between George and Lennie has a very special meaning. The twists and turns of the story kept me on the edge of my seat. I couldn't put it down.
In "Of mice and men" there are two main characters .George , the small and smart one. And Lennie the big, strong and dumb one. These two lifelong friends travel around looking for work.They both just lost their jobs because of Lennie's bad behavior. Now, they have got new jobs and George are vigorously trying to keep Lenny out of trouble .Lennie does not get into trouble intentionally , but he is so retarded that he doesnt understand much , this leads to a number of incidents .The story of the book is good because it has many unexpected twists and turns.Especially @ the end when George does what he do . Recommended to people who like reading short novels and generally like good books .
Of Mice and Men is an incredible story from then american south west. It tells the story of George Milton and Lennie Small' two travelers looking for work on ranches.George is "small and quick and dark of face" while Lennie is big and bulky. George is the more dominant person because he is the smarter person. Lennie needs George because he is mentally handicap. They both have the same goal: to own a small peice of land and live of the fat of the land. They make some friends while making some enemies. The story has a gripping climax and will keep you reading. Two thumbs way up!
Its a sad but very good book I think it was writen well. I am yet a middle schooler and like this book you might as well read it now and read it again in high school any way good book.
I am so very glad that I read this book as an adult for the first time (and had no real idea what it was even about). I read it in one sitting - it is only short and the language is very easy. That is not the challenge of this book!Under an hour to read and oh my god - the ending still makes me gasp...But it is a book that you could probably only read with the intense emotion once and that time should not be wasted on a 17 year old! Once you know the ending it will stay with you forever.This book it a masterpiece.
Of Mice and Men is an amazing tale of two men on a voyage to live big! George is a man of low tolerance, and is traveling with the slow, but warm-hearted, Lenny. I think the book was a well written story of how you can't take advantage of anyone, especially if they don't know that you are doing it. Also, that you can't be too hard on a person who doesn't understand, because then they never will. I think it was a good book because it provided many lessons that included those ones. John Steinbeck introduced, and protrayed the characters in a manner that was very intriguing and realistic. The way he showed Lenny to not be prejudice against Crooks because he didn't see the difference in them privded a good connection with how real people should act. All around Of Mice and Men was a very good book and I would recommend it because it can change the way you think about certain people.
The book Of Mice And Men by: John Steinbeck was a pretty good book, not the best i have seen but pretty good. In the story there are two hobo's named Lennie(retarted) and George(sane). They have a dream of living off the fat of the land. They go arould the country looking for jobs to get a little bit of money for some support. They end up at a ranch working with alot of guys their age and enjoying the stay, but not for long. Lennie has been getting george in trouble all of his life, and now was not any different. In the end Lennie kills Curly's wife and George has to kill him. In the end, George shoots Lennie in the back of the head, with Carlson's gun. I would recomend this book to everyone who likes funny, but depressing books, John Steinbeck is a very good writer.
The story oif Mice and Men is a good book because there is never really a dull moment. I expected the book to be about mice. I later found out it was really about. This book was about two lowlife farmers who are trying to get their own stake. George is the brighter one who is in charge of the operation. So the book takes place in a rural area in California. I t is a fiction book. It's a rally good book so you should check it out.
George and Lennie are two guys who are travailing and looking to earn enough money to buy some land.They get to work on a ranch and meet an old man named Candy and a young man named Slim. Then the bosses son Curly starts some truble becouse he is smaller than Lenny so he is mad. It is all taking place in a dry and dusty and hot time. So it will make you sweat to read this book. it is a good book for the more mature audiences due to the language.But it is a great book! check it out at your local library today.
I liked this book, Of Mice and Men, more than any book I've read in a while. This book was a fast paced easy to understand book that was great for a person like me who doesn't like books all that much. It was a great plot that didn't make me want to go to sleep and had a very unexpected ending that left you with plenty to think about after it was all said and done. I would reccomend this book to anyone who likes to read or hates to read, I don't think that it matters. Anyway fantastic book!
We had to read this book in English class and I really liked it.It was touching and it made me cry. I really liked Lennie
In a world where everyone is on prozac, high school's decide to include such tragic books as Steinbeck's Of Mice And Men in our curriculum. People don't really have a right to complain about the youth of America's obbsession with death when they are the one's causing it.
I thought the book was o.k. but it didn't really make any sense. The chaacters were all strange and they had no real part of the book except to revole around Lennie and George. But I think people should read it to find out abou how things were in that time.
The wonderful narrative style that Steinbeck uses here helps to make the book even more brutal and touching. Unlike others, I feel that this book is not too short. In its brevity, Steinbeck has still effectively portrayed the difficulties of the life of ranch hands in the 1930s.The special relationship that Lennie and George share is especially heartwarming, and is the focal point of our compassion. Lennie's childlike innocence is also enduring and when we see how he has unknowingly killed Curly's wife, we cannot help but feel that George's decision to kill him instead of letting him face the wrath of the mob is the right one. That way he will still die preserving his innocence.All in all a deeply moving novel that is both heartwarming yet tough and brutal, like the life of a ranch hand.
I think that this book was one of Steinbeck's better books. But I think that Lennie's character is too childish and stupid. Also, I think that George is pretty cool, but sometimes too over demanding and bossy, to Lennie. For the most part though, I thought it was a good book. I would recommend it to someone who has a special younger or older friend in their life. On a scale of 1 to 10, I give it an 8.5. This book is not recommended for those that are overly sensitive people (see ending). Hope you enjoy the book; try chekcing out some of Steinbeck's other works. Enjoy, and happy reading!
What is great about this novel is it's simple plot yet complex psychological interplay of the characters who affect each other like a woven mesh. All of them have good intentions but tragedy was inescapable. Real life stuff. Great read.
George Milton and Lennie Small are two on the road workers. Barely surviving off of less than minimum wage, they have a dream of owning their own farming ranch. Lennie being retarded, is protected by George, making them continuous "farm buddies". Then one day Lennie gets scared of a girl trying to seduce him, and accidentally kills her. Lennie runs away with a search party after him. Written by John Steinbeck in 1937 it is widely honored around the country!
Steinbeck tells a spectacular story about two men. One is George Milton, the other is Lennie Small. I will not tell you everything that happens, but it is worth reading. I like the foreshadowing he used with Old Candy's dog (you will have to read the book to understand).
This is a very beautifully written book. It's the first Steinbeck book I've ever read, I started yesterday night and just couldn't put it down until I had read it. The words are vividly descriptive and the characters almost come alive in your mind. Steinbeck sort of fades in and out of scenes by describing what is happening in the surroundings, making it a very pleasant experienced to read this book. He picks you up gently in the start of a chapter and puts you down just as gently in the end.The plot is brilliant, I love the story about this odd couple travelling together, the dilemma, a story told with a vivid and subtly humorous language.This is absolutely a 5 star book.
602 reviews of this book have been written to date, with an average rating of 4.5 stars! What more needs to be said?The story and popularity of this book are of course well known, so I will briefly tell you my Of Mice and Men story:I was in grade eleven (but taking grade ten English), hated school, had loser "friends" who I studdornly refused to disassociate with despite the fact that I knew deep down they would ruin me, when we had to do a reading assignment for English class. Not wanting to be bothered by it all, I chose the shortest one that I could find: Of Mice and Men. My teacher tried to get me to read a longer book--why then was Of Mice and Men on the list then???--but I refused. Well, I read the book and loved it, loved it so much that I have been an avid reader ever since.
I thought Of Mice and Men was a good book so thats why i gave it a 4 out of 5 stars. The people in the book were relastic and they seemed like they would be the type of people that lived back in the 1930's. Also how they talked seemed like that would be how they talked back then. In this book there was racisim so that is the social issue in this book..and yea..i don't really have anything else to say but it was a pretty good book.
I liked the book alot, for being a required book to read in a junior english class, it wasn't a bad selection. My favorite character is probably, George, cause I mean he stuck with Lennie almost to the very end and he put up with all this problems.The plot of the book is interseting because the time period their really wasn't much to life when your a traveling ranch hand. I like the slick ways of Slim, he's also an interseting character. But, most of all out of the whole book I want a old dog that can't see and can't even walk because their so useful...joke. Good decision to kill that dog it probably was in pain.But the book dispite it's few slow parts I believed it to be an awesome book.
This book is a very brief but moving tale that will leave you thinking. Stienbeck's mastery here is in character development. He creates a cornicopia of characters in a genius way, quick and to the point. Somehow, in such a short amount of time, he creates characters you feel you've known your whole life.The scenery is well built as well, and the story itself is interesting and timeless. It could be set in 2006 just as easily, and still be relevant. It's a very relaxing read, and flows smoothly.You wont want to put this book down, and you'll only be busy about an hour reading it. This book is just as entertaining as I'm sure it was in 1937, and can be called a classic.
I loved this book! It was read by Gary Sinise and I love his voice. It arrived quickly and in the condition I was expecting. I'm very happy with my purchase.
This book is a really good book and I recomend it to kids to read. It is really showing and it really grabs the reader. Overall this book was well written but has a few flaws in it.
I had to read Of Mice and Men as summer reading for my freshman year in high school. It's a very good book. Overrall, I enjoyed it. There were just some little things I couldn't handle. Because I'm very sensitive, I wasn't comfortable with certain scenes in the book. I had trouble reading those parts and I couldn't understand why it happened that way. John Steinbeck did a good job on this one, on the other hand. It's well-written and interesting, it just has some flaws. I still own the book and I still read it every now and then. But it will never be classified as one of my favorite books. I recommend it for anyone, but if you're like me, and you have trouble reading about violence and troubling scenes, you might want to hold off for awhile. I don't want anyone to miss out on a book like this, but I don't want anyone to become upset over it, either.
The book show the real life of two men. One who are crazy and another who try to survive and helped his crazy friend. It show's the real world of our times, but in another century.
One of my all-time favorite books. Appropriate for maybe thirteen years and older. But don't at all think this is a book intended for teens, it's got some adult themes and has a crazy ending worth reading.
I read it in the 9th grade which was about two or three years ago. I loved it. I thought it very well written. I love George and Lennie. I love George's hate/love relationship with Lennie, and how he takes care of him and look out for him even though Lennie gets him into a lot of trouble. I loved the ending and how Lennie was thinking of the farm that George and him have dreamed about. I cried at the end of the story it was so amazing yet terribly sad. You really connect with how the characters feel at or by the end of the novel.thank you for your time,Loran
For those who have never read Of Mice and Men AND for those who have - this is an exquisitely read version of Steinbeck's classic tale.
Having taught at an inner city school with extremely reluctant readers, I always found joy in witnessing kids get into this book. I have had students confess they had never before read a "chapter" book, but they actually read this one.Steinbeck's characteriztion, his timeless themes, and his crafty step into a deeper world of symbolism and realism reach to students...I highly recommend reading it with the audio tapes as well. Gary Sinise does an outstanding read...There simply is no better George.
This book is wierd because in the end the main character shoots his mentally challenged frined in the back of the head, and hes tellin him a story abot his happiness
This book is a tragic tale of two farm laborers who wander around to own a land of their own. They both are an unlikely pair. George is a short and smart man. Lennie is an enormous man with a childish mind. They both are very different yet they have formed a family. They ran away from their hometown to escape the law and started to work on a ranch in the Salians valley but trouble awaits them every corner. This is a great book for the ages of thirteen or over. If you love adventure and fun then you should read this book!
Lennie is big with a mind of a kid and George is a good person,always is taking care of lennie, he is small and black.They have a big dream.This book talk abaut lonliness, love,friendship,discrimination,alienation,disappointment,death,and dreams.It is a good book,i like it because i learned abaut the dreams, something tha everybody has, but some of they came true. I recommend this book because a lot of people have learned somrthing from this book and it is easy to understand the life of the migrant workers.Read it.
Of Mice and Men by John Steinback is a great book to read.It is a book about how George, a small quick guy helps Lennie, a big guy, who is not very smart.Through the story George always helps Lennie.This book makes you want to keep on reading to find out what happens.My favorite part about Of Mice and Men is that it has a sad ending.It's not one of those boring story's where it has a happy endind.This book is more unique.
Of Mice and Men is truely one of Steinbeck's most well-written and moving novels. The story is a simple one, with a few others branching off of it. The main plot consists of a smart, young, productive man taking care of a friend who is extremely strong, large, and partially slow. It is a tear-jerking story that I feel everyone should read. If you end up liking this, the movie with Gary Sinise is just as good, if not better! A must read!I conclude with only one negative comment. If you are sensitive about profanity in books, I suggest you not read this. It is packed to the brim... Compared to the book, though, the movie is profanely mild, in fact. A surprising move for Hollywood.
I strongly advise everyone to read "Of Mice and Men" by John Steinbeck. This is one of the best books I've ever read. It has everything from comedy to drama. This is one of those must-read books. Here's a little review of the book. There are two main characters in this book named Lennie and George. These two men are best friends who travel together wherever they go. The story starts off when Lennie and George have to run away from their job in a town called Weed. They travel to a new job on a ranch where many things happen. At first the story doesn't seem too interesting, but you have to read to the end for the very best part. And trust me, it's worth it. I won't give it away, but the ending will definitely make you quite emotional.
The story is about two guys who go to a ranch to find jobs. George is a small guy who is smart. Lennie is a big guy who is very slow. Lennie gets in lots of trouble with wanting to pet soft things like mice and velvet. When they get the job Lennie gets in lots of trouble with other workers at the ranch. There is a girl on the ranch, which gets Lennie in lots of trouble at the end of the story. I think it is a good book to read.
Never required to read this book in school. Now, in my mid 50's have finally read it. It is superb. Great character studies. A short book, but one I will never forget. Makes me hungry for more Steinbeck. Is densely packed with incredibly colorful descriptions, yet still leaves room for one's imagination to fill in some details. Probably can appreciate more now than would have in high school. Steinbeck was a genius.
very pleased with the service and a great book. i had to read it for english many years ago and I fell in love with the story.
This novel surpassed all my expectations. It was assigned as summer reading and I'm so happy that it was. This is not a story with direct characterization that tells you everthing right away but a story of characters without names and forshadowing. This book can lead to a discussion for hours. It will make you reconsider your values and judgements.
It was a short and interesting story, not complicated and easy to read. You would like it too. I recommendIt.
What more do you want? its a simple paper back book, looks good, decent enough cover, what else? its a book
This is an easy classic to knock off the list in two hours. Like many people I saw the movie first, though a good 15 years prior. I'll admit John Malkovich popped in my head many times, but I was able to form my own images also. It's amazing how even a simple and short story can can draw you in so deeply. It was easy to smell the country air, and visualize the ranch. I suspect this book is disliked by some, and removed from a few libraries because the "N" word is dropped many times. But hey, that's a sign of the times. Great book overall. Quite moving at the end.
I like Of Mice And Men by John Steinbeck because the definition of the characters was so realistic. I also liked the fact that it was in the novella form so the possibility that the story might drag did not happen.I would recommend Of Mice And Men not only to afficionados of Steinbeck, but to virtually anyone who enjoys real-life prose.
I think the book "Of Mice and Men" was a really good book. It is one of my favorites. I like it because it emphasizes the great friendship of these two guys that are trying to make a livng after the depression when money wasn't worth much. I thought it was interesting how John Steinbeck chose to have the setting of this story in Salinas and that's where he was born. I think George is a strong character and his good qualities are useful in my years to come.
I would definitely recommend this book to anyone , espeacialy people who love books with traveling and books with a little violence involved in it. It can be a little confusing at first but when you start getting into it, it is a fantastic book!
The story, Of Mice & Men was a laid back but humorous. I thought it was a great book. The characters all were individual. They all had their own distinct personalities. Lennie was my favorite character. He was a big guy that wasn't to bright. Actually I felt bad for him. I also felt bad for the mice he killed. Well the story is mostly about two guys working on a ranch, but dream of having a place of their own. Lennie who was strong but had a mind of his own, wanted rabbits. He couldn't get off the subject bout those rabbits. I really liked the book but the one thing I didn't like was how it ended. I was hoping that they would get Lennie's dream about having a place of their own and livin off the fat of the lan.
Great book about a friendship between two men. It's worth reading. The only thing that could have been changed was the development of the characters. Don't read a lot of the reveiws because some of the readers thought they should tell the entire story including the ending,
Of Mice And Men is one of my alltime favorite books. It is so thought provocking, and is a book that should be read by every one. So If You haven't read this book, do yourself a favor, and read it!
this is an absolute MUST SEE for both the morrissey-obsessed and morrissey-hater... Jackie Buscarino and Eduardo Acosta are hillarious!!!!!!!!! i think i could watch this movie 100 times over.
This fun book tells "lyric-like" tales of some of the main creatures found in the southwestern desert. You can almost hear music when you read it! It's very clever! I highly recommend it for toddlers to second graders. The illustrations are great too. A really cute book!Desert Songwriter/Patty Horn
While there are many books about job finding on the NET. Ms. Smith's book is written for the average person not the net-head. You'll learn how to navigate the net and bring home the information you need to become a successful online candidate!
The other two reviewers raved about this, so maybe it's just me, but the title should be "The most simplistic recipes ever created". There is actually a recipe for a toasted cheese sandwhich. If you do not already know how to make this, then this book may be too advanced. Pass on this unless you can't come up with a can of soup, chicken & bag of veggies on your own.I give it 4 stars only because it is Betty Crocker and it has great pictures.
I really like this cookbook. It's not overwhelming. I have already made a recipe and it turned out really good!
many of the names are still out there for resources. would prefer a newer edition for assisting client in our area
If you're a fan of this band or any of the related bands (Field Mice, Trembling Blue Stars, any Sarah records band) this is definatly a release for you. Most of these b-sides and comp tracks are very rare at this point and tough to track down. The songs that didn't appear on the albums were just as good as the ones that did. Twee as f**k!!!
Andy Borowitz is a precious national asset - a hip, modern-day Will Rogers whose hilarious new send-up of corporate culture and the nation's ongoing corporate corruption scandals adds up to insightful and hilarious social commentary.
Borowitz has written a truly funny book, and it's extra special because it's a satire of another concept others have taken so seriously. It's not so funny, though, when you really get "surprised" from behind in prison, if you know what I mean.
Excellent Service. Fab CD. If you have never heard Walter Jackson sing then that is why you probably don't have any of his cd's yet. Phenomenal!
I bought this book when my twins were 9 months old and I wanted some guidance on daytime napping, and a lot of friends had recommended Healthy Sleep Habits... I didn't mean to buy 'Your fussy Baby', since mine are too old for that- so be careful when you buy this package that you get both books. I had already read a lot of books on sleep training, and while there were some really good tips here, I found 'The Contented Little Baby Book' by Gina Ford more direct. Weissbluth allows for more discretion which I think a mother needs, and overall I think this is a very good book to be read in conjunction with other philosophies, and you can adapt what works for your style and babies. A must-read if your baby doesn't sleep very much and you think it is OK that way- it's not!
I read this book with my first son and didn't want to try it cause it felt cruel and too rigid. But, nine months later no one was getting any sleep and when I tried the sleep methods in the book my son went to sleep in his crib and slept through the night. It took a couple days to get him used to the situation, but I wished I would have done it sooner. When we had our second child I thought I knew it all, but new sleep problems arose and again I turned to this book found the answers, didn't like them, but did them anyways and guess what? They worked.
This book is a wonderful book for people who are intested in the beach and WWII!! I liked this book because it was thrilling and exciting! It always keeps your attention and you always know what it happening! Nell Wise Wechter did a wonderful job! You will find that the introduction is just as good as the book! If you have not read this book, you should! Now I know why it is on Battle of the Books for the year 2001!
Texas tenor saxophonist Arnett Cobb's "Movin' Right Along" was recorded the day after his excellentMore Party Timeon February 17, 1961, and features the same band too -- Bobby Timmons on piano, Sam Jones on bass, Art Taylor on drums and Buck Clark on conga. (One track, "Fast Ride," is from 2/16/61 and has Tommy Flanagan replacing Timmons and Danny Barrajanos replacing Clark. Amusingly, "More Party Time" also has one track from 2/17 -- why didn't they just put all the 16th songs on one album and all the 17th ones on the other?) If you like your jazz laden with the blues, with plenty of lone star state swagger, then this is your kind of party. But you'll need to move right along and get this CD if you are interested, it is quickly going out-of-print.
well, actually she's hunting for a mysterious heir who's going to inherit a fortune, if she can find them. Devlin Rafferty is hiding in Ireland, trying to heal emotional wounds that threaten to tear him apart. Ultimately, Laura finds her heir, and a love she never believed possible on the Emerald Isle. But is Devlin's love strong enough to overcome his pain? I laughed, and I sniffled as I read Laura and Devlin's story, Sex, Lies and Leprechauns . I'll be watching for Renee Roszel's new releases, and her extensive backlist.
Simply put this is the best math dictionary out there for the high school level and for most college students. Maybe there are some more appropriate ones for upper level college math/science students. I have found the descriptions and links in the text very clear and appropriate for most students. I greatly prefer this one over the Oxford math dictionary.I highly recommend it for high school math students (and make sure you keep it until you are done with college). When more detail is needed beyond this text there's always google.
Adam Sandler plays a guy that is about to giveup on love until he meets Drew Barrymore whohas a short-term memory loss, where she forgetseverything the next day; she can only rememberanything that has happened before the tragicmoment in her life that messed up her brain.
Just from watching the previews, I knew that it was a good movie. Little did I know that I was wrong. This is the best movie to watch with a boyfriend/girlfriend. It's classic Adam Sandler comedy along with Drew Barrymore charm!
Adam Sandler, typically a vulgar, careless person, expressed a totally different side of his acting abilities in this film. Instead of playing an entirely comedic role, Sandler was a loving, caring man who developed a relationship with a beautiful woman, Drew Barrymore. Barrymore as well, playing the part of a gorgeous young lady plagued by the occurrence of a car accident, does a beautiful job of portraying her character. She falls in love with Sandler, but the car wreck causes her to relive a single day of her life over and over, causing her to forget all about her meeting with Sandler. Once Sandler figures out her handicap, he desperately tries to conjure up a way to help her remember him and their relationship to preserve the love they feel for each other. I highly recommend this movie. It is worth seeing multiple times.-Cdawg
I saw the previews on TV for this movie and finally talked my husband into renting it. (He usually pick out all the movies and they are usually kick-em-up types or blow-em-up ones.) My husband rented 3 movies that night, and this one was a "token" chick flick "for me."He put off watching it the first night, but the second night we watched it because the other movie was way too long. We were both moved by this movie and came away absolutely "in love" with it. My husband even had to admit that "my movie" was an "us movie."This movie is just really fun to watch and takes you on a journey that involves so many emotions--just what to look for in a good film.
Adam S. and Drew B. make a bangup team in this movie! Drew is beautiful and quite an innocent soul. It had a satisfying, yet surprising ending. A good twist.It's refreshing to watch a comedy with characters who HAVE character. Makes for an uplifting viewing.Drew B's character wakes up every morning thinking it's her father's birthday . . . the same day in which she had an auto accident that injured her memory.Adam Sandler falls for her and figures out a way for them to live happily ever after.Heartwarming and hilarious!
Every time I watch this movie, it makes me 'feel GOOD'! It proves that LOVE will find a way (although sometimes it takes a genius to figure out what that way will be).I loved the romantic parts of this movie, especially the idea of the 'first kiss' which Drew Barrymore got to experience over and over because of her short term memory problem.It could have been better without the crude humor but the relationship between Adam Sandler's character and Drew Barrymore's charactor is reason enough to watch this movie.The ending never fails to give me chills..it's heartwarming and terrific!
Yes Adam does always play the same role in every movie he does but I knew that going in. Overall I found this movie to be cute and sweet. I thought Drew Berrymore's character was great, she did a wonderful job and I thought her comedic timing was great.I also thought Doug(Lucy's brother;played by Sean Astin)he was so funny. I thought Sean Astin was extremely funny in this role.Rob Schiender is funny, but he is also always playing the same weird bizarre/your character scares me roles that he got a bit annoying. Overall though I thought this movie was really good and is a perfect movie to see if you are on a date!
This is the best movie I have seen in a LONG time, I dont know what it is that has made me watch it over 60 times already, and I am far from being sick of it, I seen it 4 times in theatres and I waited the 3 months until the day it was released to buy it, if you haven't yet seen it, watch it, better yet buy it, you wont be dissapointed, and I promise you no matter how many times you watch it, it is still as great as the first time!!!!!
To be so much in love, to try to get your loved one to fall in love with you again and again every single day... what more can I say? It's all told with Sandler's performance...
Adam Sandler and Drew Barrymore give memorable performances in this very funny romantic comedy. Don't worry guys this isn't a total chick flick just kinda. This movie was shot in the very beautiful state of Hawaii. Of course the Sandman makes this movie very worth buying.
im sad that the regular dvd had more special features than the blu ray version, i loved watching the music videos and such on the regular dvd, this one is just blah but good
my husband and I went to see this movie, and it had some great laughs, we love adam sandler and drew barrymore in the wedding singer and loved them just as much in this movie.
I can't say much that the other reviewers haven't already said. This movie has some freaking hilarious scenes - my most favorite one is where Adam Sadnler's character is at the diner and fake crying because he is acting as if he doesn't know how to read, wailing and moaning and sobbing to catch the attention of the girl he wants.
I usually despise Adam Sandler. I find his brand of humor cheesy and distasteful. However, I must confess this movie captured me. Drew Barrymore is extremely charming, probably along with Ever After. The soundtrack, which uses mostly songs from the 1980s covered by current artists conveys perfectly the nature of this movie. Rob Schneider, another person I can't stand is actually extremely funny. And Sandler is great, measurate and endearing. Even the scatological jokes work! This is a great, enjoyable date movie, one you can have to fall in love in it again. If it is 4 stars it is because a couple of Sandler's routines irritated me a little bit but the movie was surprisingly good. Rent it or buy it.
The first semi serious movie that i have seen played by Adam Sandler and co-stars Drew Barrymore and after watching the movie i found it to be better than i expected not only is the movie outragesly funny bad a rather sad side is added to the story enough to make some cry. The movie has the same humour as Adams previuos movies but it just as funny none the less.The movie starts with adams character going at with all the girls but dumping them soon after until one afternoon he finds himself visiting a calm ocean side restaurant where he meets Lucy(Drew Barrymore) who day after day he would fall in love with until he has to think of an appropriate method for her to live her life the best she possibly can.#with a combination of witty and desgusting characters makes the movie a very enjoyable watch with the same original humour of previous Adam sandler movies but is just as enjoyable i would highly recommend you watching the movie yourself.
I won't bore you with the plot of the movie as I assume you have an idea what it's about if you've come this far. I found the film stood up quite well as a romantic comedy. It was both delightfully funny and a bit sad at times (just like life). I am surprised that some of the reviewers have taken the film so seriously and are disturbed by how the critical events are portrayed. It's just a film and it's meant to entertain. It did a great job of that, with the terrific on-screen chemistry of Sandler (although I can't stand him in most other films) and Barrymore.
This movie is nothing less of a classic. It's the kind of feel good movie that reminds you there really are good and loving people in the world, eventhough the man of your dreams is also well known for the "Turkey Song".
it was a lol. (laugh out loud) i tell ya. it isn't rated R it's a 13. pg-13 that is. i loved it it was like so funny i couldn't like stand it it was like that good i could not stop laffing. i like to spell laff and laffing the way i am spelling them. and i love this film and my brother met adam sandler.
Even though nothing in this movie resembles reality, the plot is funny and entertaining. Adam and Drew have chemestry. Overall it is a good natured romantic comedy that makes you daydream about the silly things that people do for love.
I love this movie! It was very funny, yet sweet and touching. Altough the ending was a bit shocking to me,I'll be first in line to buy it when it comes out. Adam and Drew work great together. Hawaii is beautiful, the soundtrack rocks, and this movie is awesom! GO SEE IT!! GO NOW!!
As a previous poster had mentioned, I too am on the fence about Adam Sandler. For every fun movie (Wedding Singer) there was an equally unfunny movie(Little Nicky). I'm glad to see him back in fine form in this selection.I mention that Sandler rewards his fans, it also seems to me that Sandler has to be one of the most loyal friends. In nearly every movie you will see reoccuring bit actors; from Allen Covert, Rob Schneider, Blake Clark and Peter Dante. There was also an homage to friend Chris Farley and the movie "Tommy Boy". If you notice carefully Lucy goes to the Callahan Institute funded by Callahan Motors in Sandusky, Ohio. For a fan of "Tommy Boy" this was a rare treat.The slapstick was toned down in favor of sincerity without being schmaltzy. The chemistry between Barrymore and Sandler that worked in "Wedding Singer" definitely works again. The ending will leave you oddly touched. Kudos on the soundtrack as well.
Adam Sandler has always surprised me. I don't like silly movies so I tend to avoid actors who appear to be the type who play silly parts. Every movie I've seen with Sandler is funny but not silly. I've come to the point where I tend to seek out Sandler movies now because I enjoy them so much.Recently I took an inventory of our DVD collection and I could not find my copy of 40 First Dates. I found it for a low price here on Amazon.com so ordered it to fill that slot in m library.
i love adam, drew,rob, missi and dan and everyone else in the movie.i love how adam sandler uses all of the same people in his movies.i hope they all keep making these great movies.
Drew Barrymore and Adam Sandler turn their adorable charm up to full blast and its enough to carry this film over the bridge of believabilty. I can't imagine the pressure trying to make someone fall in love with you everyday-then again-maybe it's something that we all should strive for. Surely a task like that would lower the divorce rate. Whenever I run across this film I can't help but smile. That's a good thing, right? Highly recommended.
This is by far my favorite perfume. Glad to see I can still purchase it! And at an affordable price!
Just plain great. Temporary Residence ceases to amaze me with each release, and this is no exception.
After all the decades of my life, I have found the perfect cookbook. The recipes are simple, but it is all in the doing. For example, the way to prepare a pot roast is clear and very simple, but it is all in the way to do it which leads to the best ever potroast that I have made five times now. The amount of cholesterol in this book may make you blanch, but cover the eyes of your doctor and just do it. Eat lots of salad in addition as penance and you can get away with the wonderful recipes of this book from the 40's.
A beautiful rewriting of Faust. A bad guy is killed by anotHer crook when coming out of prison and finds himself in hell. But he is a perfect image of a judge who fights against corruption. So Satan proposes a deal : get into the judge's body and destroy his reputation. But it will not work that way and the bad boy will completely destroy Satan's plan. He negociates then his promotion in hell as a trustee, one of the bosses. He is in a way saved from damnation but in hell itself. Very entertaining and interesting to see how Satan miscalculated his project : a bad guy put in the body of a good guy is transformed by the transfer, and even some of his bad guy's natural reactions fire back and produce the opposite effect : it increases the good image of the judge. In other words one is bad or good according to the surrounding circumstances in which one lives, according to the picture the public has of this one, a good or bad representation.Dr Jacques COULARDEAU
Nick (Claude Rains) never satisfied with the amount of soles caught, has his hat set for an incorruptible judge. He will recruit Eddie Kagle to replace Judge Fredrick Parker (both played by Paul Muni) in exchange for a second chance at life.If you were, raised Catholic then you will recognize the title as you have a devil on one shoulder and an angle on the other and you are struggling in the middle.There is great interaction between Paul Muni and Claude Rains. This move takes unexpected twists and turns. I may remind you a little of "The Devil and Daniel Webster "(1941). However, no one can play "Nick" as well as Claude Rains.I rather like the way they return to the surface. I never trusted those types of elevators. Before you write off Anne Baxter as just another personality in this film, remember that she was also Nefretiri in "The Ten Commandments" (1956)The Devil & Daniel Webster - Criterion Collection
If you can't sleep or it's raining outside and you don't have to work tomorrow, here is a good late night movie to watch. Paul Muni plays a gangster, "Eddie", who has just been released after four years in prison. A gangster pal, "Smiley", picks him up in a car. Suddenly, Eddie is shot and he ends up in Hell. Claude Rains plays the Devil. The Devil decides to let Eddie go back up on Earth. He puts him in another body, a look-alike who is a Judge. All that Eddie can think of is getting even with Smiley for shooting him. But everyone else looks at him as The Judge who is not himself anymore. Ann Baxter plays "Miss Barbara".
A brilliant dark comedy about a dead gangster restored to life in the body of an honorable man (his look-alike). Paul Muni plays the protagonist well, but the film is stolen by Claude Rains as the Devil---one of Rains's all-time best performances. It's an absorbing film, splendidly directed, with an intelligent script that's immensely funny. Deserves a new life.
Paul Muni plays a gangster brought back to life after he was killed by another evil guy named Smiley Williams. Muni makes a deal with the devil (Claude Rains) and he's brought back as a man who's a judge running for governor! Muni doesn't know Cluade Rains is the devil because he just calls himself Nick, and he says he's an ex- con. Anne Baxter plays the fiancee of the judge and Muni likes her a lot. Lots of people see the change in Muni and soon are wondering if it really is him. There's one scene where Muni wants a drink of liquor and a cigar. But since he's now in the judge's body he coughs it up and feels horrible. Later, Muni finds out that Nick is the Devil and starts distrusting him. Somehow even thoguh this is a little serious, it is also quite funny. THis is a good movie! ENJOY!
Saw this old movie on TV and had to have it to show my family. The quality of the movie wasn't very good since it is such an old move, but the story is great. I liked the theory that we'll be shoveling coal in Hell if we have that misfortune to go there. We got a lot of laughs as well as a good moral to the story.
I have this cookbook and I love it and want to buy it for another couple. The recipes are really fun, very good, and well organized. But $99-- what the heck? Doesn't anyone sell a new copy of this for less??
Finally, a cookbook that lets us cook together! The recipes are great, the instructions are clearly described for two people, and the meals are delicious. Cooking has never been more fun. The pork roast is fabulous. We're looking forward to preparing the Ultimate Valentines Day dinner. We also loved the "Marinating the Chef" concept.
I purchased this for my college dorm since we didn't have any pots large enough. I'm very satisfied with the pot itself and I use it all the time, but the steamer is much too thin and I really wish it had some legs for support. Overall good price for your money, but if you're getting it for the steamer I'd look for something else.
air ratchet workes on 4cfms of air witch is about all my compressor can handle. it has good speed and power also workes in tight quarters witch is what i need when i work on my equipment.couple that with good service and quick delivery. works for me.
I met Steven Vincent days after In the Red Zone had been submitted to the publisher. His personal reflections from 9/11, when he stood atop his apartment building and watch the second plane hit, brought tears to my eyes. But that was nothing compared to his remarkable insight into Iraq from his journeys there. Fresh from returning and putting his thoughts into written form, he regaled me for hours with what he learned and what all Americans must know about Iraq. I cannot recommend In the Red Zone more highly.
Evocative of, yet arguably exeeding, the lyrics of Bob Dylan's Time Out Of Mind and the master musicianship of Wide Spread Panic's Ain't Life Grand, The First Sally melds rock with funk and country in a challenging, roaring, at times careening, completely enjoyable musical experience. The album captures the energy of one of the best live acts in the West. Trevor Clendenin and Chris Sheldon's vocals take center stage amidst musicianship pushed to the limits on such Sally staples as Cadillac, Cowboy Vai, and especially the Denver radio favorite Porno Music. Do -not- miss the chance to listen to this first work from Colorado's best rock and roll band. Also check out the Sally's website for tour dates throughout the Mountain West and for a release date on thier soon forthcoming second album.
I found this book to be exptremely informative, easy to understand, and fun to read. There are a lot of unknowns when it comes to adopting a dog -- especially for us first-time dog owners. This book really tackled the big questions I had as well as had easy-to-follow step-by-step training exercises.The author is obviously very much in favor of his own training methods, but he at least explains why he thinks they are the best in order for the reader to research and make up their own mind.I would recommend reading this book to anyone thinking about adopting a dog!
Among all the textbooks I have seen in economics, I have found Mankiw's to be the best. It is clear and concise, addressing all the important intermediate issues in macroeconomics. The description of concepts is simple, and the book benefits from a three pronged approach to teaching - graphical, mathematical, and anecdotal. The student is free to choose whichever one he feels most comfortable learning from.
My wife and I have thoroughly enjoyed this CD. Excellent condition, packaged well, more than expected.
... it's become my favorite video. Joan Blondell and Carole Landis--the "poor man's Betty Grable"--are great as the two party gals who go to a spooky old mansion to claim the inheritance that Landis has been awarded. Billy Burke as Mrs. Topper is a scream and so is her side-kick maid, Patsy Kelly (no one could do a double-take better than patsy) and Rochester, as Cosmo Topper's man servant is hysterical. The beautiful camera-work, the women's gowns, the top-notch special effects and the hysterical sight-gags ranks this with the best of Abbott and Costello comedies. A terrific excuse to while away an hour and a half when you're feeling down or bored. Best Scene: the playful seal and Rochester.
What can I say, my wife and I love these types of old movies. Its great to get out of the every day stress and have a few laughs.
Topper Returns was great clean fun. The actors were great. I loved every minute of the movie. My only complaint was a film problem with a short section of the tape itself. It in no way reflected on the quality of the acting, the problem was a bad tape.
I love this movie! I hadn't seen it in years, but remembered loving it, so today I watched it. I love it. It's funny, mysterious, and dramatic. Plus it's always nice to watch an oldie and realize how different they are from today's. I would definately reccomend this!!
this music is a must listen for people who are piano's lovers and appreciators. the music that stimulatives, bring relaxation and brillian all at onces
It's a bratz babyz doll. It is what it is! Much less skanky than regular full-size bratz. My 8 year old loves it and most of her fellow 2nd grade girl friends have these dolls too. Seems VERY durable, I would be totally comfortable giving this to a 4 or 5 year old.
What agreat idea! Usually I absolutely Hate Baby Bratz Dolls But this is a doll you gotta buy! I'm countin on ya to buy the doll reader!
A delightful tale of the calamities that beset an 18th century English vicar. The story is fast moving and told with wit and humor. The language is archaic but this adds to the charm of the story rather than being an annoyance.
i found the book in a car boot sale it is over a hundred years old ,it was a bit hard with the text,being old ,i had to read the book twice for it to sink in ,what a story best one yet,especialy that it was written so long ago,i havent read the new version, but if its like mine you will enjoy it happy reading .
Her songs are beautiful they flow and the music and words are something you can relate to personliy i enjoyed it very much and you should listen and buy it. some songs that i really injoyed were white houses, annie & who's to say.
Vanessa has done it again! I have been listening to this CD almost non-stop since I picked it up today and I LOVE it! The songs are even better than the songs on the first album (my favorite CD of 2002). You can tell that she has matured as an artist and I can't wait for more. Make sure you check out "Who's to Say" it's great.
This is an even better album than Be Not Nobody - the lyrics and vocals and everything about it is superb! It's not radio-friendly pop like Be Not Nobody was. Fav songs on this cd are: Annie and Half A Week Before the Winter.
Vanessa has definitely changed and it shows in this incredible Cd. I havent taken this CD out of my player yet. It is quite different than her first.. but similar at the same time. The songs are deeper and darker.. this is very apparent later on in the disc. The content is very real .. nothing about this is fake or pretentious. This is a calm cd and moody as well.I saw Vanessa in concert 11-03-2004 at Joe's Pub... if you getta chance I recommend going to check her out.. shes unbelievable.If you like Vanessa's whole debut and not just 1000 miles.. then I think you'll love this cd as well. You can expect her material always to be true to who she is and not some industry garbage. If you truly appreciate piano and real vocals and true talent.. take a listen...
What is all of this about a commercial? Don't be silly. Great work by a talented artist who still needs to grow a bit.
"Harmonium" is obviously a great name for this album.It shows such a difference from her debut album "Be Not Nobody".Music ranges from 'Private Radio',which has a poppy,Hilary Duff like sound about dancing in the moonlight with some sort of fling,to "Who's To Say" which offers a deeper message, of falling in love at too young of an age.The best songs on this album are without a doubt "C'est Lae Vie"("This Is Life"),"The Wreckage",and "Papa".Whether you like Avril Lavigne or Maroon 5 this album is for you.
I have been waiting for this CD for quite some time, and it was worth the wait. I think her first single "White Houses" is an awesome song, and the video is fun! She is very talented, and her growth as an artist is shown on this CD from her last one. In my opinion, there is still some room for growth though, as she continues to develop as an artist. Very much worth buying and listening to overall.
Will and always will be a nessaholic forever. i love this album more then her first album..there seems to be a extra track on the european version of the album. Its called "the streets have no name". favourite tracks are white houses, whos to say, afterglow, san francisco, private radio and the streets have no name.
this album is absolutely amazing! don't worry vanessa carlton i didnt rip you off! I heard the whole album on MSN then went to download the song called Who's to say. after that it was so amazing i went to buy the album! Now who says downloading is a bad thing after all :)anyway the piano is really cool. vanessa carlton is looking better than ever too. and the video inside the enhanced cd is absolutely amazing too! after watching it, it changed my impression of vanessa carlton and i respect her a lot as an artist.. thanks for the great music!-brandon
My daughter and I loved Be Not Nobody, and we love Harmonium too! My daughter hasn't stopped listening to the cd since I bought it, and neither have I. We strongly recommend it to everyone.
Harmonium is such an incredible record, and it completely exceeds my initial expectations for Vanessa Carlton's sophomore album. It is a little different from 2002's Be Not Nobody in the sense that we are allowed to take a deeper look into Vanessa's beautiful, and sometimes dark, soul. I would have to say that most of the treasures on this record are the more upbeat songs. Some of these songs that steal the show are the bittersweet White Houses, a summer song about friendship, love, and loss, and Who's to Say, a song about choosing between family and a relationhip. Also, though a little dark, Annie shines on Harmonium. If you are not already a Nessaholic, you will be once you hear this talented ivory tickler show off her gift. Harmonium is in stores now, so go out and pick it up now!
This is the best album I've heard in a LOOONG time. I love the energy of "Private Radio", the beautiful reflectiveness of "White Houses", and the sarcasm of "Ces't La Vie". I recommend this to anyone who wants music that's real and isn't poppy fake. :)
I just got this cd for Christmas and its real good ! I didnt expect this from Vanessa ! Its way better than the first one ! But there is some songs that I dont really like ! But i guest those song will grow up on me and ill love them !! You definitly have to buy it ! WOOT For VaneSsa!
This is one of those "I bought the first one--liked it--but will I like the next" cd's. But I took a gamble, purchased it, and I'm glad I did. Harmonium is a total mood piece. It puts you in this dark place with hope on the horizon. Like a million beams of sunlight streaming through. White Houses is plain fun ear candy. And San Fransisco is intelligent, catchy, and moving all at the same time. Vanessa pounds on the piano with such fervor in some songs, you feel like she's moving mountains. Then touches the keys so lightly you barely hear the melody. A grand album. Two times the charm.
`The Looking Book' is the perfect title for this cute story about a boy looking for his cat. Young readers will have a great time helping Ned look for Pistachio through twenty-eight pages of colorful, collage-style illustrations."Of course you know it's not much funTo lose a cat upon page ONE."The rhyme and rhythem in this book make it perfect for reading out-loud while the kids search the page for Pistachio. They'll find him popping out of a cupboard door, disguised as a castle guard or camelphloged in a monkeys cage. Of course Ned never seems to see him and enlists the help of a courtly queen, a memory-challenged old man and a faithful horse (who eventually gives up on page twenty-six). This book is a fun adventure with great giggle potential.
Detective Mike Proctor teaches readers the basics of defending themselves in How To Stop A Stalker, a guide for those coping with repeated harassment by potentially violent individuals. From why stalkers follow their victims; to what to do if one is being stalked; the collection of evidence; getting the justice system on one's side; what to do in court, and so much more, How To Stop A Stalker is an absolute "must-read", and bears the very highest recommendation for men and women alike -- because statistical data indicates 1 out of 12 women and 1 out of every 45 men will be stalked in their lifetime. In our troubled times of having to also deal with the threats presented by domestic and foreign terrorism, How To Stop A Stalker is even more relevant to the lives of ordinary citizens and could well save your life and the lives of those dear to you.
Mike Proctor demonstrates that he understands the issue of stalking completely. This is the best resource I have found to facilitate effectively working with law enforcement and prosecutors and using the criminal justice system to protect victims from their stalkers. I strongly recommend this book to anyone who is serious about stopping their stalker or stalkers. Stand up and fight these bullys - stop living in fear, believing that you are powerless to stop them. You can do it!
Heat these in the microwave and have them set out where you are going to sit watching TV while you moisturize your hands after a paraffin dip.After dipping your hands, you can then place them in a plastic liner or plastic bags work well too. Then, place your hands into these mitts.Your moisturizing results will double when you continue to heat the paraffin on your hands. Spas tend to use electrically heated mitts, but these don't need to be plugged in and are also calming and aromatic because of the herbal mixture inside the gloves.~The Rebecca Review
My goodness, this is a WONDERFUL cd, I would HIGHLY recommend Clay Aiken!!!!
I decided to "go for it" and take the plunge and buy this CD not knowing what to expect. Let me tell you, I AM SO GLAD I DID! I absolutely LOVE this CD. Clay's voice is incredible and the music is so relaxing. It is the best album I have bought in a long time. My 5 kids even like it ; ) You will not be disappointed if you love Clay Aiken's voice.
Dork Rock...Please keep your cruel, gross and nasty remarks off here. You show your real character and it is so totally opposite of Clay and his fans. Grow up and find another web page to be so rude. We all wish Ruben well but PLEASE, children read these reviews and it is just not appropriate. I happen to think Clay is one of the best vocalist's to come along in many many years..and it is my right to have that opinion, as it is the right of others to respond positively to those singers they enjoy.
how can anyone use words to describe clay?? WOW!!! i can listen to his songs over and over and over again!
This is easily the best pop album of 2003. This CD showcases Clay's amazing voice with catchy pop tunes and beautiful ballads. I absolutely love this album -- every song!One of the amazing things about Clay is that my 18 year old daughter and my 68 year old father love him, too! Very few of today's artists have such wide appeal.
If this doesn't go platinum quickly I will be surprised. I don't think I can say enough about this album. It's just great!
This is a fantastic first album for the "real" winner of American Idol. This album has none of the American Idolish songs and Clay's vocals are outstanding. This album will set a record for one of the quickest selling albums in music history. Don't delay -- get your copy now!!!
I love this CD. the song "measure of a man says it all!" There are so many people out there that judge people for what they have an not who they are. All of Clay's songs touch your heart! FINALLY someone that is in the spotlight that doen't dress and act like trash! He said "I will never do anything that I would that I would be ashamed of". There are not to many performers out there these days that can say that! He is a one of a kind! He has a truly loving and caring heart! Clay Aiken is what this world needs and this CD is the best CD I have heard in a LONG time! If I had kids I wouldn't be afraid for them to listen to it! Clay is the best! Keep up the great work Clay! And stay true to your heart!
After all the hype and the anticipation leading up to this record, I was sure I'd be disappointed. However, after just one listen of the entire cd, I have never been more happy to have been proven wrong. This cd is fantastic! It is such a solid pop album! Every song is good...many boarder on great. He takes risks on some of the song selections, but he still manages to give the fans what they want and love. Is there a slight element of "cheese" to the cd? Sure, but if anyone can pull it off, it's Clay Aiken. He pours his heart and soul into each song, and, just like AI2, he makes you feel like he's singing each song just for you. Bravo, Clay! You've made your fans proud, and you left us all begging for more! Can't wait to hear the next one!
I find that the judges on American Idol got it ALL WRONG!!! They chose Ruben because they thought he could hold the attention of the people buying the CD's. They were also wrong with Kelly Clarkson. Clay has a voice that crosses all lines and he can sing any song put in front of him and his new CD shows that TALENT. Ruben can only sing one style of song and that will be his undoing. I see CLAY around ten years from now and Ruben a vast memory. I recommend this Album wholeheartdly and and glad that my kids can listed without fear of profanity and other vulgar words.
Clay's album 'Measure of a Man' is such a treat to listen to. Pop music has gone down hill in the past 10 years and it is so refreshing to be able to listen to Clay's voice and actually hear the way should be made. Let us hope that Clay will bring back the good ole music! The whole album is truly fabulous.
I am so pleased with Clay's CD! I had no idea what to expect from this album; I just knew I wanted to support Clay (because he was my fav on American Idol). However, I was blown away by the songs and that wonderful voice of his!! My favorite songs are No More Sad Songs, Run to Me, Perfect Day, and Measure of a Man. This is not an album full of ballads - there is a lot of variety, but they all highlight Clay's amazing voice. Buy it - you won't be disappointed!
This is a terrific CD. It is easy to listen to, has perfect songs, and makes you want to play it over and over again. Clay does a fantastic job. His voice is incredible with such power and range. All songs are unique to Clay and sang as only he can! AMAZING singer and fantastic songs! GET IT NOW!
Dear Amazonians,I think Clay Aiken is a strong addition to the popular music scene. The combination of his youthful good looks and agile voice make for a great pop musician.On a technical note though, and the reason for my four-star rating, during the song "When You Say You Love Me," we can hear Clay clear his voice at the two minute and forty-three second mark (2:43 on your CD player). This is a minor technicality though that I am sure Clay will overcome with his future releases. All-in-all, I think Clay Aiken is a very talented artist who will only improve with time.Go Clay!Take care,--Daniel
This CD is AMAZING there is something in it for everyone. Clay is SO talented and I'm glad that he uses it in a positive way. It is nice to finallly be able to look up to someone. THis album is probally the only TRULLY clean pop album that I have ever heard!!! This CD is so good. All the songs are GREAT!! Every song is different in it's own way. I totally give it 5 STARS!!
I haven't had a CD that I haven't skipped tracks. Even if it's the best of. Clay Aiken had come up with BEST of CLAY on HiS FIRST RELEASE. It's combination of not just pop songs but mix of danceable tunes(Invisible), Country (Perfect Day), Oldies (I Will Carry You), Rock Ripped (No More Sad Songs), Sexy (Touch), Edgy and heart twisting(I Survived You). There is a story in every tract and Artist let's you be a part of that Journey. Fans and Avid Music Listener would not be disappointed. Why are you still reading.. GO BUY ONE and HEAR for YOURSELF.
i couldnt wait for clays album to come out, and i was not disappointed. after listening to some of the garbage the music industry produces today, this album is one that i dont mind my kids listening to and this is an artist my kids can "idolize"
I was concerned about Clay's ability to enter into the pop world, given the songs we fell in love with on AI. My concerns were eliminated the second I pushed play. Amazing album, that captures many of his talents, without overdoing it. I was instantly captivated by the lyrics, the melodies. Absolutely love all but song No. 4. Highly recommend that you add this to you and your family's collections.
This CD is a must buy. Doesn't these songs sung by Clay Aiken already show that HE was supposed to win American idol? I give this cd a 5 stars. AMAZING! I can't wait till his next album
Clay Aiken is everything the music world has been searching for! He has morals that equal his dynamic vocal range. From the beginning note of "Invisible" to the ending note of "Touch" Clay Aiken brings you into a world where good things do happen to the nerdy guys and the runner-up does finish 1st! If you are searching for a true pop superstar...you will find him in Clay Aiken. Every word of every song comes from his heart and can actually be understood! This guy is awesome and I congratulate him on his outstanding 1st album!
This album is flawed, but is still excellent for a freshmen album. The songs have great lyrics and catchy tunes. This is not boyband. Boybands couldn't sing their ways out of a paper bag and all their lyrics contain may 5 words at the most. Clay actually can sing WELL and his songs are meaningful, especially MOAM. You get a variety from teen pop (Invisible) to rock (I Will Carry You, No More Sad Song, I Survive You) to even Beatlesque (Shine) and SALSA (Touch)!! Of course there are the beautiful ballads too. Get this CD, you won't be dissappointed.
I first fell in love with Clay's voice on American Idol. He has a rich, powerful voice with a wide range. I think he can take almost any song and make it sound wonderful. I think he proved that on American Idol. His voice is appealing to people of all ages. I am 62, my Mother is 86, my four daughters are ages 33 to 39, my granddaughter is 12, and we all love his voice and music. My husband is 63 and he admires him as a wonderful, refreshing new talent with a marvelous voice. I loved his CD, Measure of a Man, so much I bought 10 of his CD,s to give as Christmas gifts. I wanted to share something I loved with someone I love. May God continue to bless him and enrich his life. May he always stay the wonderful wholesome young man he is today. That's my Christmas wish for him.
There is no way that Amazon's reviewer can compare Clay to talentless boybands that rely on catchy background music and over-exaggerated dance moves to move CDS. Clay has real talent, something that boybands sorely lack. Even Ruben Studdard, the American Idol champion cannot come close to Clay in terms of voice quality and pure singing talent. IMO, Clay deserves his success, this is a fabulous CD by a very talented singer. And his performance at the American Music Awards was simply stunning, why else would some members of the audience give a standing ovation? Remember that the audience was made up of singers and entertainment industry people, and i'm pretty sure they weren't applauding Ruben's performance, good as it may have been, Clay was just simply spectacular. A great singer and a great CD, they don't make singers like this anymore.
I love this album! In order, my favorites are: Touch, Measure of A Man, No More Sad Songs, I Will Survive You and Invisible. In my opinion, these showcase his voice the best.
Clay has THE voice and it is an awesome gift. The studio/production sound is not. Clay's voice comes through despite the over-production of this cd. This over-production sound (they say "music"?) make so many cds the same. I would love to hear him sing with more simplistic background music, letting his voice carry the songs. Pure Clay! I wonder what type of cd Neil Sedaka would have (or still might?) produce for Clay. Yes, I was looking forward to the complete Clay-rendition of "Solitaire."All in all, this is a GREAT CD, especially for his first one. I admire his morality and greatly appreciate a cd that I can listen to with anyone w/o concern for the lyrics. Thanks, Clay!!! I look forward to your next cd...and your next...and your next......
WOW THIS CD IS AMAZING! I WOULD BUY 700 OF THEM BECAUSE THEY'RE SO GOOD! I LOVE CLAY AIKEN! THIS CD BLEW ME AWAY! WOW, WHAT A VOICE!
This CD definitely secures Clay a place in the music industry. He has strong vocals, that would make you think he's been in the music business MUCH longer than American Idol has been on TV. Clay is a singer who has a future, keep watching, he is already good, and will likely get better.
I'll admit that Clay Aiken can sing. There's no doubt about that. But the question on everyone's mind (as was on Simon Cowell's during the second season of American Idol: The Search for a Superstar) is does Aiken really have a voice for pop music? I agree with Cowell: His voice tends more to the Broadway musicals than to actual top 40 chart-topping. His debut is solid, though. I think he should've won the second season - he had the more distinct voice. MEASURE OF A MAN measures up...but just.
After waiting patiently for Clay's premier CD I was fairly please with the results although I was not fond of the recording sound itself. I think a better job could have been done to bring out that fabulous voice. Plus, they could have mixed it up a bit. All of them had the same basic theme.Out of the 12 tracks, I liked 9 of the songs. Not crazy about I Survived You, Perfect Day or Touch. My favorite ones are Invisable, I will Carry You and No More Sad Songs besides This is the Night.I really think that he sings better live (and that's a talent in itself) but I think this CD is pretty good. I was hoping that they would have included Solitaire. Hopefully, he will do that in a furture CD. All in all, I would recomend it.
Love his singing or hate his singing, he is on his way to the top and there is no stopping him.
CLAY IS THE BEST I'VE HEARD IN YEARS. I just love his voice. It's clear and he sings soooooooo well. Love his album. I'm sooooooooo happy he sold over 600,000 in a week. Wish him the best in the future. I excited for him to do another album in the future. His voice is the best.
I've been looking forward to hearing this album for months. I love it! Clay sounds wonderful. Shine, Perfect Day, and Measure of a Man are probably the most well-written and well developed as far as production and writing on the album, but some of the 'lighter' pop material like Run to Me and Touch are incredibly sensual and full of yearning just the same. I could hear Run to Me on a movie soundtrack. There are a few specific production moments that are lame-that seem to be 'riffing' just to try to fit in more with what's out there and it doesn't quite work, but it only happens on Invisible and Touch. Overall, I really, really LOVE this album and I think harder rock, alternative music listeners would too. Several of the songs appeal to an alternative audience-people just have to get past the fact that Clay didn't write them himself, but he sure does sing the hell out of them. I'm thrilled that RCA found a balance between American Idol Clay and Recording Artist Clay. LOVE IT!
O.K., maybe I am getting old! I was always a rock and roll girl. Give me the Stones or Zeppelin over Manilow or Diamond any day, any way!! But this kid rocks!! I was a Reuben fan at first American Idol glance, but Clay won me over with his song selection, poise and incredible voice. This album would have been better with a stronger producing team, but hey! good first effort. Rock on, Clay!!
Five stars for Clay, three for RCA.Clay's debut album has the same problem as his single--it's overproduced, and he is overpackaged. He sounds too boy-band-pop-star-ish to me (more nasal-y head voice than full-throated and chesty like he sounds on his demos).On the other hand, the song choices are good for him and go well together. There is integrity in the album itself, and I think he has a right to be proud of it. Overall, though, I think he's more of a live-in-person performer than a studio performer. He gets energy from his audiences, and his singing is a gift to them.Hopefully Clay will find a way to integrate his love for both music and teaching. The next Mr. Rogers? I'd gladly enroll in the School of Clay.
Clay Aiken has an amazing God given gift! All of his songs are well done and decent songs. They have nice lyrics that in no way would offend anyone. As a mother with small children, I would recommend this to everyone! Clay's phenomenal voice is one I could listen to every day, and have ever since getting the CD last Thursday! He has amazing range and diversity! Do yourself a favor and buy this one!
This is a great cd. Clay's voice is wonderful and the songs really grow on you. The people that gave this cd a bad review were either tone deaf or are Ruben fans that are upset because Clay will sell more cds then Ruben. Clay should have been the American Idol winner and the sales will prove it.
Clay Aiken's great set of pipes and classic style are a win/win for this CD. The CD has a variety of songs in different styles and is appealing to all ages.
What a performance!!! Clay sang "Invisible" in 2003 and then ushered in the new year with "The Way" from his CD Measure of a Man on MTVs 2004 show. He was totally awesome! Even though Clay has not personally written these songs, like on AI-2 he takes them and makes them his own!Way to go Clay in 2004!!! I would buy this CD
I received this CD as a gift for Christmas, and all I that I can say is WOW! Whenever I had the chance, I listened to Clay during the American Idol competition and my opinion was that he should have won.I enjoy all of the songs that are on this CD, but my favorites are "The Way," "Invisible," "I Survived You," "Measure of a Man," and of course, the smash single from the summer, "This is the Night." I can't wait to wear out this CD in my cars CD player and my CD player at work. No worries though, if I wear out this CD I will just buy another one!Buy this CD, because IT IS EXCELLENT! No one else out there even comes close to the talent of Clay Aiken. He will be around for a long time to come!Oh, and Janet, thanks for giving me this wonderful CD! :)
clay's awesome, and he's only gonna get better, his next album will prove that i'm sure, and hopefully it will show off a little more of his voice, maybe throw in a few acappela songs, that would be great, anyway if you like clay you'll like this, and even if you don't like him yet you just might after listening
Some other reviewer posted that people are saying negative things or critiquing his album just due to CNN's comments. Clay is not perfect nor is his record company but it is a great album and I find myself going to back to the orginal A I tapes I have just to hear him sing out the songs like "Everlasting Love" and "BOTW" to hear that amazing range. Thats all.
I love this CD and couldn't wait for it to come out. I have loved Clay's voice from the first AI tryout. It just seems that anything he sings becomes a beautiful song. I have listened to the first CD so much my family is ready to kick me out. They are just glad I am playing a new one. This CD has great songs that any age can listen to. I just wish they would stop putting so many back up singers, and loud music to back him. We want to hear Clay. We don't want anything so loud that you can't hear that beautiful voice on it's own. He has such a stong voice - he doesn't need all the stuff many singers use - to make them sound good. He is all class and I will love him forever.
I rooted for Clay all throughout American Idol 2 and knew that his CD would be amazing. I listened to this CD and was not disappointed a bit. His voice is so beautiful, and the songs are very very well written. Great Job Clay! Thankyou for sharing your incredible talents with the world.
First off let me say that I listen to all types of music...I really liked Clay on American Idol so I decided to give his new CD a try...It really seems like the studio guys have changed Clay's voice a little bit on the CD...He definitely sounded better on TV...It's kinda weird...All of the songs are perfectly written with great meaning and the music is top notch but it still seems like it his voice does not mesh or blend with the music...Does anyone else get this feeling ?? Anyway...I guess if you are a diehard Clay fan pick this one up...If not...defintely listen before you buy....
This CD really reflects the artist. Every track is excellent! If you are a Clay fan, I highly recommend this CD. If you aren't yet a fan, after hearing this you will be!
Love Clay, love his incredible voice, love this CD. Each time I listen, I have a new favorite. Some songs inspire, some make me want to dance, and some just make me feel good. As a fan of all the old standards, easy listening, etc., a future album of all covers would be nice too. In fact, I believe I would be happy to hear Clay sing just about every song ever written.
OH MY GAULD!!!!!!!!!! THIS CD IS FANTASTIC!!!!!!!!!!My mother, my daughter & myself can't get enough of it! This cd will be played for generations to come.Favorite...The Way.
I LOVE THIS CD. A VERY REFRESHING AND UNIQUE SOUND FROM THE NEWEST SUPERSTAR IN THE MUSIC INDUSTRY!
I love Clay. Loved him on AI2, and I think he has loads of talent. I bought the CD the day it came out, and initially I liked it but thought all the songs sounded the same. Then I listened again...and again...and again...and it's now in my car, at work, and at home. I love this CD! Clay does a fine job with all of the songs, and although I was hoping for those stronger songs, vocally, this CD is a great example of Clay's style and personality. I am looking forward to buying Ruben Studdard's CD and comparing which CD I enjoy best. Oh, and I read the liner notes on Clay's CD and saw that Danielle Broisebois sings background vocals on a couple of Clay's songs, which are terrific and encouraged me to buy Danielle's older CD (Arrive All Over You) and I'm enjoying her vocals as well!
I had to buy two copies of this CD - one for my car and one for work because I can't stop listening to it. Clay's voice is wonderful and never faulters! I haven't stopped listening to it since it was initially released. I can't wait for the second one!
Clay Aiken makes a stunning debut on his first album 'Measure of a Man'. This CD sold over 600,000 copies in the first week of release in the USA, and it's easy to see why. Clay's vocals have to be heard to be believed. His version of the Neil Sedaka classic 'Solitaire' is amazing, and he makes this song his own. Other stand-outs are 'The`Way', 'Invisible', 'Run to Me', 'Perfect Day' and the title track 'Measure of a Man'. You can't go wrong with this album.
Perfection! The whole family loves the CD and him! You dont need your skip button with this CD.
I think Clay's CD is ABSOLUTELY GREAT!I listen to it every day. I would just like to make a point to all the Clay bashers/Ruben Studdards' fans out there. You had BETTER WATCH OUT! If you are intentionally trying to bash Clays' CD to lower its ratings, then you should prepare yourselves for when Ruben's CD comes out. Clay's fans far out number Rubens' fans and when push comes to shove..... What's that saying WHAT GOES AROUND, COMES AROUND!? Grow up,take your toys and go home. Oh and by the way Clay's CD is doing just great despite your rude comments.
I love Clay Aiken's voice. I voted for him on American Idol and think that he should have (did??) win. His talent is partially wasted in this CD. Some of the songs are very weak. I would love to hear him sing Elton John or Johnny Mathis songs, because he is that good. Having bought this CD, I hope that he gets better producers next time. He is a Superstar but was given a mediocre song list on this CD.
To Jaan Uhelszki, Amazon editorial reviewer: Have you ever heard'N Sync or Backstreet Boys' interpetation of "Solitaire"?Hm.......
Amazon, thank you for rushing my CD - arrived yesterday and I have listened to it constantly and carefully - all the way through, then repeating each song over several times; find that I have to tear myself away to listen to the next one. Love the album - think that Clay reviewed himself the best with his talk show comment - "progression and improvement" over what he had previously sung. And, I thought he was perfection before.What a beautiful tribute to his Dad's memory!The songs are definitely similar, yet each could stand alone! And each song is amazingly and lovingly offered. Each song makes the listener feel special.Now I know why the Brits yelled out to Prince Charles and Princess Diana as they were leaving hospital after Prince William's birth - "Do it again! Give us another one!"The ONLY way to improve on any of these songs would be to see Clay perform each - live, video, guest appearane, suit, stripes, sweats - wouldn't matter.
This is an excellent c.d!It's great for helping you relax.My favourite songs on it are "Measure of a Man" and "The Way".As other people said,he's the real American Idol!The only bad thing about the c.d is that he didn't put the kinda more upbeat version of Invisible.But it's good how there's no music at the beginning of "Invisible" though.I would like to get the Christmas c.d where Clay sings "The First Nol".I heard a preview on a website and it sounds really good!I'm obsesed with Clay...;-)
I would not want to make this sound like a board to defend Clay Aiken but just wanted to say that comparing him to Josh Groban is like comparing apples and oranges. Josh Groban has a very fine and powerful voice too but it's a trained voice that has been under study for years. Clay's is a natural gift from above and has proven what a versatile singer he is and a total entertainer. he can sing just about anything given to him and make it his own.I am a Josh Groban fan too but I very much wonder if he can do just as much as Clay who is effortless in his renditions.It just seemed ridiculous to compare a pop singer to a neo classic style like Josh Groban. would you compare Celine Dion to Charlotte Church and Andrea Bocelli?
At first I was disappointed that the only song with which I was familiar was This Is The Night...... Now, I LOVE THEM ALL... This album is great and I find myself humming the songs all the time... I would venture to guess that Run To Me will become a classic.... it will be around for a long, long time... Also, how can anyone comment about Clay's looks? He is darling!!! If anyone watched any of the Radio Music awards tonight (Oct 27) and looked at the appearance of some of those characters.... you can appreciate this attractive guy!!! He is a sweetie... Ready for another album, Clay... hope you are working on the next one! Maybe the next one can be a mixture of old and new.... Already anxiously awaiting the next album!!! Clay appeals to all age groups... I am not a teenager, but I did buy three of the albums.... (two as gifts)...Anyone who buys Measure of a Man will not be disappointed.... It it truly great....
I had seen the final episode of the US Idols which starred Clay and Reuben. After seeing what he was capable on that episode I really stood behind him, although I was a bit hesitant as he didn't stand out THAT much.I purchased this ablum, and to my surprise it's really good. Clay is a brilliant singer! I like most of the songs on this cd and I would recommend that if you're out to buy a cd for someone who is a fan of any Idols show (or just loves pop) then Clay's cd won't disappoint.
DOUBLE PLATINUM awarded on Good Morning America from Clive Davis of RCA!!!! WOW!!! So WELL DESERVED!!! Great cd by Clay Aiken!!!!! I love all of the songs, so well done!!! You can hear Clays voice so beautifully! I am so happy for Clay, and for me getting to listen to Measure Of A Man all day long!!! I HIGHLY RECOMEND this cd!!!!
BEAUTIFUL ALBUM!! CLAY MEASURES UP! Could we finaly be seeing a change in the music industry? I think its about time to bring back music thats not about sex,drugs, and singers with potty mouths. Clays a nice young man who does'nt drink, smoke or swear. A good role model for our kids. He's not afraid to express his faith in god or how his faith plays a big role in his life. Clay has won the hearts of millions with his beautiful voice. NOVEMBER 30th IS CLAYS BIRTHDAY. HAPPY BIRTHDAY CLAY!!! "25" WE LOVE YOU!!
At first I was a bit disappointed. But I have listened to this CD many times now and find there are some really good tracks. Clay's fan base is so diverse that he and the producers are trying to have something for everyone on this CD. Therefore, there are bound to be some that each fan likes better than others. I hope that the next CD will include some of the great songs Clay did on AL,like Solitary man, Buttercup , etc. I find Clay's voice powerfully moving and entertaining on this CD and I can't wait for the next one.
The true Clay fans will love this cd. It has songs that apeal to the country and pop fans as well as people who love the power ballad. This cd shows clays diversity and the true power of his voice. It also showcases his ability to put so much emotion into a song that it will make you cry. One warning though once you put it in your cd player you won't be able to stop playing it. If this is an indication of what Clay can do I can't wait for his next cd. It is an amazing debut cd.
Clay has done a great job with 12 "pretty-nice" pop songs. He seems in a comfort zone as a song "stylist." A couple of the songs sound too digitized or synthesized or some other odd sound. Song #4 would be good for Cher, or a country singer. As a real fan of his voice, I wish he had better songs. The songs are neither 'hip' nor 'un-hip.' Just middle-of-of the road Vanilla songs. (Probably the catalog was limited.) On balance, there are at least 8 good, listen over-and-over songs, that showcase his voice and talent.
clay is an awesome performer and he is such and inspiration to me and my family. he has made me want to be a special education teacher and i want to thank him for it i love u clay eventhough i don't know u!!!
This Cd was fantastic. He has such an awesome voice. I am very impressed by the way that he sang those songs because all of them just got me so excited. Clay should have won, Clay really should have one. And he is going to win again on the music sales because this CD is one of my favorites of all time now.
If you really want to know what the experts say, read the review of Clay's album on Billboard.com where the music reviewer cites this album as 'The Best Album of 2003'. Doesn't get any better than that, does it? I'm no expert, but I love listening to anything Clay sings. Do wish though that the producers of this album had included 'Solitaire' along with a couple of other classics. This is the voice of an angel...with the right material he will soar beyond the heavens. Looking forward to the next album!
I HIGHLY recommend this album for ANY Clay Aiken fan! I have watched Clay from day one, when he entered that room with Simon, Randy and Paula, and declared himself the "American Idol". In my opinion, he IS the American Idol! I could not wait for this album to be released and I am NOT disappointed! The first three songs are wonderful---one of my favorites being "Measure of a Man", the title song of this CD. This is only his FIRST album and I predict the next to be even better! Congratulations, Clay, for the release of your first album! I look forward to watching it soar thru the charts!
Personally, I find the reviews on this site to be Clay haters arguing with Clay fans, and vice versa. What I think needs to be done, is take a step back, and look at this CD in a different way.Do you like this CD? Obviously if you hate Clay, there's no way you're going to like this CD and that's that. If you love Clay, you aren't going to hate it.Look at it like this. This CD is all Clay. He puts his message, personality, and voice into the music. If that is what you like, then like it. If you don't, you don't. Don't be biased either way. Look at it from the middle point. We aren't getting anywhere arguing.Clay fans, buy this CD. You'll adore it.Clay haters, don't. You'll dispise it.
I could not wait to buy this CD and it was well worth the wait. I have listened to it a dozen or more time and love all of the songs. Even though this cd was rushed I think it was great, that means his next cd will be even better.
A CD I can listen to without skipping ANY songs. I like them all. True, this is not much of a departure from what we would expect from the AI2 Clay Aiken, but this is only the beginning of a long and successful recording/performing career for Clay. Many of us have been disenfranchised for so long from the music industry. Is the industry paying attention? Have they heard us loud enough? We want soul and beauty back in music. We want someone who isn't spewing filth and profanity to our children. And we want someone who has a conscience beyond making money. Clay has answered all those requests. This was money well spent...my favorite is "The Way". Can't wait to hear Clay on movie soundtracks and see him in solo tours.
I love Clay and have since I first saw him on American Idol. What I mean by "love" is that I love his voice, his personality, his stage presence, and, I think most importantly, his values. His album is a good, solid first effort. But (and I hate to say "but") it's missing something. It's definitely well produced, and his voice is beautiful as always. But I think what's lacking is in the songwriting. Alot of the songs sounded the same to me, and they weren't as different as I thought they would be to what we've been hearing in mainstream pop for the last several years. I will defintely listen to the album, especially during my work day. But I think Clay's team can do better for him next time around. And, where the heck was "Solitaire"?! I had heard it was going to be on the album, and was looking forward to hearing the long version, but it was nowhere to be found. :-(
This cd is way higher than my expectations! I can't quit listening to it! Clay's voice shines through, there's no overproduction.....it's just Clay. And that's what we all fell in love with! I'd recommend this cd to my best friend, little sister, or my grandmother! Definitely something for all ages!
One of the best cds i have heard in a long time. Far surpasses his AI2 performances. This is one cd that is consistently excellent material throughout. I'd recommend this cd to anyone!
I have listened to Measure of a Man by Clay Aiken three times and have not skipped any of the songs. I don't think that I have EVER done that with a CD. It is very enjoyable and he did a terrific job for his first time out and I am looking forward to future CD's because I know they will only get better with experience. I am reserving one star for later when hopefully RCA lets Clay be Clay!
The first time I listened to this CD, I was a little disappointed because it wasn't really the same type of thing that Clay was doing on American Idol. I've listened to it non-stop despite this fact, and I have to admit it - I love it! There are some really cool songs. I love upbeat "Invisible." "No More Sad Songs" is probably one of my favorites, it reminds me of a powerful Paul McCartney ballad. If you have the McCartney CD, 'Flaming Pie' and enjoyed it, this seems kinda similar, but DEFINITELY more powerful and something you will not get sick of as fast! I also like the fact that there are songs that you can relate to that avoid negative images that the record companies try to impose on us as listeners. We can always trust Clay to only give us what he knows we REALLY want. THANK YOU CLAY!
Don't get me wrong; Clay has an AMAZING voice. There's a reason this guy was #2 on American Idol. But his songwriters need a shot of creativity. His lyrics, though heartfelt I'm sure, are about the same generic topics that every pop star sings about: love and loss. These are generally great topics, but not when it's the whole CD. I hope his next CD, if there is one, will have more variety concerning his song topics. I'm still giving this CD 4 stars because his voice just blows the majority of the faults away. I'd buy his Christmas CD if I had the money.
Five stars for Clay, three stars for the producers who chose his material, thus it gets four stars. This guy can sing ANYTHING and sound totally original and breathtaking every time. He will be as big as Sony (is that who produced this?) let's him be. There are two hits on here: Sad Songs is awesome, as his signature song that he sung in the finale, this is the night. The rest are a pleasure to listen to, simply because Clay can do no wrong. He is undoubtedly the next Manilow or Diamond, a cash cow for the record company if they wouldn't hold back on giving him their best material. Hopefully this album will prove that he won't let them down and his next one will be packed with top material.
I just got my cd today and I love it. I think it has something for everyone. The songs are beautiful just listen to the song Measure of a Man and you will see what I am talking about.Clay is a breath of fresh air, as I am sick and tired of not being able to listen to the radio or buy cd's where it is not littered with filth. I love the fact that Clay is taking a stand against this kind of garbage being fed to our kids.
Clay's CD has everything one could want. A stunningly beautiful voice, great lyrics, great songs. Clay's voice is highly recognizable when listening and does bring emotion and life to each song. You can play his CD over and over again. My favs are Invisible, I will carry you, The way, This is the night, Measure of a man, etc, etc. All the songs "Shine". I will never get tired of listening to this, and can't wait to see what is in store for us later. Everyone should buy his CD. You won't be dissapointed!!! Clay - a beautiful voice, a beautiful talent, a truly beautiful man.
Even though he didn't win the season 2 American Idol, it's kinda like he did. There are many reasons why I say so. His album has done dropped and people acturally buy it. He's done had more videos then Ruben as on 3/3/04. He is already on tour. So, in many ways, he was a winner all along. I love this cd and I listen to it ALL the time! I'm not going to do a song by song review like I usually I do. I will however, tell you my favorite songs:This Is The Night (Bonus Cut), The Way, When You Say You Love Me, and Insivible. I will pobability have more favorite songs and when I do, I will edit this review for an up-to-date review on why I love Clay!! Go Clay!! If you LOVE Clay you will LIKE Kelly Clarkson (Season 1 winner.)
I wasn't sure I was going to like this CD because I knew it wouldn't contain older pop songs like Clay sang during AI competition. After my very first listen, I loved it and haven't stopped listening to at least some of it since October.There's a little bit of everything in this CD; something for every taste. My favorite cuts are The Way, When You Say You Love Me, Touch, Invisible, Measure of A Man, I Will Carry You and This is The Night. Clay handles the vocals like he's been singing for years. He sings with passion and feeling.Clay has said in interviews that he wants to record songs with meaningful lyrics and great melodies. He was true to his word and I will never doubt him again.
I haven't liked much recent American pop, but Clay sure is a good singer. I watched him perform "Invisible" on the Billboard Awards... I was completely blown away. Simply amazing. A friend had also sent me his This is The Night/Bridge Over Troubled Water single earlier this year. Amazing as well. Good work, Clay. Hope your future albums are excellent as well.
Clay Aiken has arrived...and with a definate flair for pop...This man knows how to sell a song...he understands when to hold back...and he understands when to hit the "money note"...Songs like "Invisible" and "Touch" are great pop songs, very radio friendly. "The Way" and "Touch" have just the right amount of sex, which sells a song. "Measure of A Man" will give you a glimpse of the future of this mature individual. And of course, his signature song "This is the Night", still gives chills as one of the first glimpses into the soul of the individual.Each song on the album is unique, however, together, they create an incredible debut album.This is an artist, with so much more to offer. I can't wait to see what Clay Aiken will give to pop music next.
Like the man himself, Measure of a Man is a breath of fresh air. Perfect Day is the most distinctive track, diverting from the power ballad style Clay Aiken has perfected, and sure to be a hit on the charts (reminds one of Elton John a bit?). This is the Night continues to evoke strong emothions even several months after we first heard it. My only criticism is that Clay is a top-notch vocalist who should take more risks with his style...he will surely succeed...with pipes like his, how could he not?
I can honestly say that I was pleasantly surprised by this album. After avidly watching American Idol, I had expected Clay's first CD to sound... well, like Barbara Streisand or the like. Being a fan of rock/punk/pop, that did not seem like such a good thing; however, this does not sound anything like those "outdated" musicians and can... no, SHOULD be enjoyed by anyone who can call themselves a lover of music. Even if you do not usually listen to pop music, definitely give this a chance.
I have honestly never bought a CD that I liked all of the songs on . Well, that has changed. This CD does not have a bad song on it. Clay shows that he has arrived. He has stayed true to himself and is here to stay. Highly recommend!!
You know that an artist is popular when he garners so many reviews from so many people that love and hate him but this guy is a rising star!It took a lot of guts to get up in front of a panel of judges to audition for American Idol and then even more guts to sing in front of Simon and the rest of America!This album contains songs from different genres of popular music so there's something for everyone. I personally love them all! Give it a chance. I'm sure that you will NOT be disappointed.We gave Clay a chance and look where he is now!And for those of you who keep saying that he's ugly, take a good look at yourself in the mirror and see what's inside.
I BOUGHT THIS ALBUM AS SOON AS IT HIT THE STORE AND AS SOON AS I LISTENED TO IT I LOVED EVERY TRACK. IM SICK OF LISTENING TO THE STUFF THE DISC JOCKS THINK ARE GOOD SINGERS. RAP AND THE YELLING AND CURSING FOR SHOCK VALUE TO SELL SOMETHING AND CALL IT TALENT. I LIKE ALL TYPES OF MUSIC AS LONG AS THE SINGING IS GOOD AND THE MUSIC IS GOOD BUT SO MANY POP AND ROCK STATIONS DONT KNOW WHAT IS TRUE ARTISTIC WORK ANY MORE. IM NOT SAYING ITS ALL BAD BUT TOO MUCH OF IT IS. CLAY WAS WONDERFUL TO LISTEN TO ON THE SHOW AND EVEN BETTER ON THE NEW ALBUM. ITS RARE TO FIND AN ALBUM THAT ALL THE SONGS ARE GOOD BUT CLAY HAS DONE IT AND I WILL NODOUBT BUY EVERYTHING HE PUTS OUT IN THE FUTURE.I CONTINUE TO LEAVE THIS CD IN MY CAR PLAYER AND LISTEN TO IT OVER AND OVER.
"Measure of a Man" has debuted at No. 1! Billboard has named the CD as Best Pop Album of 2003!Why don't you buy one or more of Clay Aiken's CD? I guarantee you that you will love the lyrics, the music, Clay's wonderful voice, the high and low notes, the emotion that he brings into the 12 tracks, absolutely takes you to another place."Perfect Day" and "Shine" are very Beatlesque songs. I'm sure these 2 songs will do very well. "Invisible" is a catchy song and is already doing very well on the radio in the States; hopefully, our radio stations will play it more often soon. My favourite of the 12 is "Measure of a Man". A wonderful song that makes you stop and think.Buy Clay Aiken today - you won't regret it!
The song choices for this CD are excellent. As the album was playing, I couldn't decide which track I liked better. Not since the Beatles have I been able to say honestly that I loved each and every one of the songs. Invisible, The Way, When You Say You Love Me, Measure of a Man, and Touch are incredible. I hope this is only the first of a long string of great albums. Well done, Clay, well done.
I can't stop listening to this album. Every day my favorite song changes. There are no duds on this album. Clay's wonderful voice in combination talented songwriters make this CD a joy to listen to.
I've read many of the reviews posted on Amazon- most of them echo what I felt when I first heard this CD-- it's the best CD I have bought in a long time. I listen to MOAM at least 2 to 3 times a day- Clay Aiken's voice just makes me feel happy- sounds corny; but in the world we live in today it's nice to feel that again. I didn't realize how snarky, and snotty the music industry was until I read some of the "critics" reviews of this CD- I guess I just don't get it- what's wrong about a pure & honest talent??Do yourself a favor-buy this CD- The Way, Shine, I Will Carry You, I Survived You- in fact the whole CD is excellent-- I never skip a song- I start my day with this CD & I end it with this CD.Clay, next time make it a double CD- & quickly.
I followed Clay through the American Idol process from start to finish and all I can say is I hope this is just the begining of what should be a long and successful career. This CD was fabulous and well worth the wait. There isn't a bad song on it and his voice is simply mesmerizing. I think there are several songs on it that could be hits for him. Anyway you slice it, I will buy as many CD's as this young man records. Not easy for a forty something woman to admit. : ) I am going to purchase the Idols Christmas CD just for the Clay song. My advice, buy it, you won't be sorry.
I personally found that this is one of the best cd's i have ever listened to. Clay aiken is not only the true american idol, but a wonderful young man with a very positve outlook and message. How refreshing. I recently tried to get concert tickets to his tour with kelly clarkson in N.C, only to find them all sold out. Instead I will will be driving to washington d.c to take my 3 year old for her birthday to his concert at the mci center. His voice is so beautiful and almost reverant. I would give this cd 10 stars if it were allowed!!!!!
This is an excellent debut album. The songs were selected before AI2 completed and an exhausted Clay was already recording two weeks later. I have seen how Clay has grown as an artist/performer over the past months. If this album can go double platinum, I shiver to think what the next one will do. There is a lot of time to work on the songs and production. I love all the songs, but MOAM is my favorite. Everyone in my family who has heard the album has asked for it as a Christmas stocking stuffer.
What an absolutely "wonderful" album. Perfection plus.....Clay so knows what we want to hear.....Every single song on this album is beautiful and sung with such emotion. I don't know if I ever will be able to pick a favorite out of these. I love them all. Okay, when is the next album going to be released?
I have read a couple of articles on the new Clay Aiken album, Measure of a Man, and I have to say I am very dissappointed in how people are bashing the albums songs. Personally, I love the album, I think that he can sing any song and make it sound fantastic, because he has an amazing talent. Maybe everyone should stop critizing him for not being what they think he should be, and start appreciating what he truly is, and gifted singer with a strong solid voice.
A showcase for Mr. Aiken's exceptional voice, this power-pop album will have you singing along in no time. Every cut a potential Top 10 hit, there's something for everyone here, from the power-chord-filled ballad 'Run To Me', to the Beatle-esque 'Shine' and 'Perfect Day', to the country-flavored 'When You Say You Love Me', to the breathtakingly beautiful love ballad 'The Way'. A tiny disappointment for this fan: Mr. Aiken's lower register is barely in evidence. Still, that doesn't stop this album from being 100% en-JOY-able.
Well, like some of you I first listened to this CD and was not impressed. There are some good tracks, but they seem to go down hill as the cd goes along. I was particularly dissapointed with the very lifeless rendition of "This is the Night." After an amazing live performance of this song on the show, the recorded version is dead and boring. Clay has an amazing voice but this cd certainly doesn't seem to portray his passion for the music like his live performances did. Still, I do love his voice, and he is an amazing singer. Hopefully this will not be the end and the next cd will bring out more of the mind-blowing vocals that we all know as Clay Aiken. Long and short--If you love Clay it's worth buying this cd, but don't expect an Idol-like performance.
If your musical tastes run to terrific songs sung by a stunningly beautiful voice, this album is for you. It's a quality product from beginning to end. A bit retro without ever sounding dated, each song on the album allows a different facet of Aiken's talent to shine through. If you loved Journey, you'll be thrilled with Run to Me. If you remember Beatlemania, you'll adore Shine. And yet, Aiken is always, uniquely himself. If you know anything of his history, you'll know that No More Sad Songs, while seemingly a breakup song, probably has a different meaning for Aiken. If you know anything of his values, you'll understand why Measure of a Man is the title track. This is, without a doubt, the most enjoyable pop album I've heard in a long time!
Every song in this CD is wonderful! AIKEN proves that real talent still exists and after purchasing this album (along with his earlier single BRIDGE OVER TROUBLED WATER,)it is no wonder why so many people love him. I look forward to his future albums! AIKEN is my IDOL!!!
I think Clay Aiken is the best thing that has happened to music in a long time. This CD is great and I listen to it over and over again. Clay is a fantastic singer, a great person who is sincere, giving and a wonderful all around good human being. I am looking forward to many more CDs from him. I am also looking forward to attending his solo concert tomorrow evening at Sioux Falls, SD. Can't wait.
Clay's first CD is wonderful. It showcases his range and the uniqueness of his voice. Invisible and Touch are upbeat and can easily be danced to. The Way and Measure of a Man highlight Clay's ability to do ballads like no other. When You Say You Love Me has a bit of a country flavour and Shine and I Survived You are on the edgier side. The CD just gets better and better everytime you listen and Clay sings every song with passion and emotion. A great first album.
Clay's Cd is just magnificent. I can honestly say there is not one bad track on the album. Everytime you listen to it, it just gets better and better. Invisible and Touch are upbeat and make you want to get up and dance. When You Say You Love Me has a little bit of a country flavour and The Way and Measure of a Man are pure ballads. And Clay just doesn't sing the lyrics, he is the lyrics. It showcases his amazing range and the uniqueness of his voice. Listen to the CD a few times and you will agree it is a wonderful first album for Clay Aiken.
Clay Aiken has got to be the BEST singer in the world! I LOVE this dude! His first CD, 'Measure of a Man', was absolutely AWESOME!! It includes hit songs such as 'Ivisible', 'The Way', 'When You Say You Love Me', 'No More Sad Songs', and 'Measure of a Man'. Not only are all the songs on the CD an awesome showcase and display of his voice, but they are all appropriate; no cussing or inappropriate references. I'm so proud that of him for being clean and staying true to his values. Kudos for Clay! Go out and buy this CD today! You will not regret it! :)
I really like Measure Of A Man so much, and the thing is I have kids and I can play it loud and don't have to worry about anything bad being said! My daughter loves singing along with Clay. GREAT CD!!! My mom likes it so much too!!! Clay thank you so much for this, truly!!!! Thank you so much!!!
I bought MOAM as soon as it came out and I love it. It's amazing that the disc isn't worn out already. When and if it does, I will just buy another one. lol :) Clay sings with such feeling and each song touches my soul. As for Jaan, I am really upset. If you do not like Clay, why are you giving a review of the album? You have no idea what you are talking about. I agree with the others: Amazon should let you go. Besides, those who have yet to discover Clay (who hasn't) may be swayed by your comments and that would be a shame!
This CD is great. is still think he deserved to win. and it shows. if he has all of his albums like this there is no way he will ever be matched.
I can't remember of any other CD in recent years that has had such a mushroom effect as this wonderful CD. It's popularity just grows and grows. I can see why. I have listened to this CD for a month straight - I CAN'T STOP PLAYING IT!! What wonderful vocal ability!It is of no wonder to me why this CD continually registers in the top 10 best sellers here. It deserves it.If you want to hear wonderful, uplifting, fresh music, and generally just amazing singing, then buy Measure of a Man. You won't be disappointed.
This is absolutely everything I have been waiting for! It has ballads- pop songs- and to my pleasant surprise-- a bit of a rock edge to it. I am normally a heavy metal girl- and that is why my friends and family have a hard time understanding my Clay obsession- but he truly represents a man whose talent goes beyond what was presented on American Idol. Very Impressive Clayton!!
While I did not really follow American Idol or any of that, I decided to give this CD a listen after hearing "Invisible" on the radio and seeing Clay's video on TV. I was really surprised at the voice coming out of this young man! His debut CD is very polished sounding. I really like the beat of "Invisible", "I Will Carry You" is very positive song and I smile when I hear "When You Say You Love Me". The rest of the CD is not groundbreaking, but still worth a listen because of Clay's very smooth, powerful delivery. Thanks
I never watched American Idol and I rarely listen to pop music, but I clicked on this CD one day and listened to the clips just to see what all the fuss was about. I liked what I heard, bought it, and I have played it every day since then. There's just something about it, there's not a bad track on there. Is it the most well-crafted, lyrically sophisticated CD made this year? No, but it is entertaining, catchy, and let's face it, Clay's voice could make the phone book sound good. There isn't anything that is going to appeal to everyone. If you like what you hear from the clips, you're going to like the whole CD.
After listenting to this CD since 10/14/03 numerous times daily---I enjoy each song every time I listen to the CD. "The Way" "Run to Me" "Shine" "Touch" are my front runners right now but I enjoy all the songs. Why is Clay so intesting--his eyes, his mouth and his incredible voice!! Can the guy sing-YES! I saw Clay in concert during the AI tour--he has that quality that comes out and WOWS the crowd and holds you thru each and every performance and he has done the same with his first CD! I will continue buying his music because of his wonderful qualities!!!You go CLAY! And if you have not heard him sing "Noel" on the Holiday CD you are missing probably the best verison of the song I have ever heard!!! Makes you want to stand up and shout to the heavens!Clay measures up in every way as a true entertainer in every way possible!
Buy It!!!... He's such a great singer he is my American Idol!!!you will not be disappointed.
Just fantastic! You won't be disapointed! The "true" winner of AI2 shines!! There isn't a bad song on the album! I couldn't pick a favorite! What are you waiting for?? GO GET IT!
I found this CD excellent. I always enjoy hearing talented singers. The songs on this helped make my drive (I listen to music in the car) a very relaxing experience. He has a very good voice and a lot of natural talent. I think this was a great album to test out his wings and improve upon. I'm sure he'll only get better. I'm looking forward to his follow up work!
I love this CD and do not feel that 838,000 people are wrong about it. Why do fans of this CD have to take such abuse, i.e. we are tone deaf, don't know anything about music, etc. We just happen to like this CD and especially the singer, and are looking forward to many more Clay Aiken CD's. The boy can sing.
I loved Clay Aiken the moment I saw him during the American Idol season 2 auditions (before his dramatic change) and has proved to be the best. I have seen him twice, during the American Idol seasonal tour and the Kelly Clarkson/Clay Aiken Independent tour and he just keeps getting better! My favorite song on his album is "Measure of a Man" because, I feel, that he is talking about God. I also love "The Way" because it's a really romantic song and the music video is absolutely wonderful. I HIGHLY recommend this CD to any American Idol fans or "Claymates"-not that I am one. You won't be disappointed!
I have to say, I too am one of Clay's "older" fans. (Just under 38). He has been labeled as a broadway kind of singer, and the tunes he sang on American Idol were true Clay (belt-em-out) style. I don't hear this on this album. I do like the album, but it wasn't what I expected. I would love to see him do another album, maybe of some show tunes or the like. Don't get me wrong, I could listen to him sing everyday, all day. It just doesn't get any better than that voice... Would love to see Solitaire on the next one. Also got to say I'm loving the articles. Way to go for standing up for yourself and who you are, even though I loved the belly shot on Rolling Stone. I do give you some serious credit. Fighting the big boys can't be easy. Keep the albums coming.
Clay Aiken has a voice that touches my heart and soothes my soul. I love every song on this CD, so it's a tough call to name a favorite when they all gave me chills...and a few brought tears to my eyes. "Run To Me" is so very haunting and beautiful, and "Measure of a Man" and "The Way" are both touching and tender and exquisitely performed. An awesome debut, well worth the wait.
I love this CD!!! It is not too Broadway at all, which is what i was worried about. Although I am sure that Clay could have a sucessful career on Broadway, this album proves that he can sing pop just as well. The songs fit his voice very well and the album is very easy to listen to. I like Rueben as well as Clay and I don't see why you can't just buy both albums. Why pick one when American Idol 2 delivered two amazing and talented performers.
Clay has captured the hearts of America, especially mine, from day one! His ability to sing any song well made him my "American Idol" and this CD is nothing less than perfect! He knows how to make my heart melt! Every song on this album makes you appreciate his voice even more with every note. I found myself eagerly anticipating what the next song would bring! Every song has a wonderful message and is appropriate for any age! I love his pure natural talant! I'm proud to be a Clay Aiken fan!!!
It is evident that the previous reviewer who uses profanity - totally uncalled for - has used this forum to simply bash Clay. He has not purchased the CD nor listened to it. Let's grow up and use this for the reason it is intended - to review the CD, not bash the artist.The CD is awesome, and as time will tell, cream always rises to the top.....
Clay Aiken has a wonderful soothing clear powerful voice. His CD is upbeat and fresh without all the usual sexual overtones found in most songs. I wouldn't label it as romantic, but it deals with relationship issues. It's an excellent CD to listen to in the car before work or while doing things around the house. It's one you can let you kids listen to without wondering what they might hear. With Clive Davis producing you can expect even greater things from Clay in the future.
This cd leaves me speechless, breathless, just amazed. Clay's voice has matured so much since his first audition and this cd emphasizes this. The songs are beautiful. It's worth every penny and every second of waiting and more!!!!! go buy it!!! :D:D:D
All I can say is WOW! I think this is the best CD I have ever owned. All the songs are wonderful. I have already listened to it several times today.
I knew this would be more than a typical cd. It has more meaning than most pop cds. Compare this Clay to the likes of the world's most popular artists, ie, Justin, Britney, even going back to *NSYNC, and one will find that Clay has more depth and range than any recent artist. His songs are not bubble-gum, not by a long shot. They have so much meaning. They are all song beautifully and I guarantee you can listen to this through and through, over and over again. His voice is so soothing, the songs so beautifully written. He is definitely going places with this cd. He is no longer a part of the American Idol franchise. He has been able to break away from that and start his own path. Congrats Clay.
I love Clay and I like this cd, but it's not as awesome as it could be. It doesn't show off his voice which is a shame. He has the most beautiful voice I have ever heard and that is missing on this cd. Hopefully, his next cd will be better.
I bought this cd immediately because I watched some of AI2 and was mesmerized by Clay Aiken's voice. Truthfully, I didn't expect much at first, as it seemed to be a hurriedly put out album. (I expected it to be cover after cover.) But, the first time I listened to MOAM, I was impressed! To those who criticise the lack of "edginess", you can get all the "edginess" you can bear from some of the rest of those "artists" out there....So going on two months later, where is that cd? In my home, my car, my husband's car....you get the picture. Clay should win a grammy for this cd!
out of the 12 songs on this CD, i happen to like 8 of them. i really love track 4 "When You Say You Love Me". one of the stand-outs is "Shine". on track 8, a good song called "I Survived You", Aiken sounds good; but, i can't help but think it would sound better by a country singer. the three songs i didn't like as much were "I Will Carry You", "No More Sad Songs", and "Perfect Day" but who knows? i might grow to like them in the months to come. on "No More Sad Songs", Aiken at times sounds a bit like Tom Jones. "Invisible" and "Touch" are excellent, the CD's opener and closer numbers. Aiken has a touch of drama in his voice and his crystal clear vocals on these songs show us what he's capable of. now, next release, hopefully the mood will be a bit more up-lifting as a whole because i prefer to hear him sing mid/up-tempo songs instead of ballads...but he can belt them out, which you'll notice right away on "I Will Carry You" or "Run To Me".
I have been a Clay fan since he first showed up on AI2. I had been waiting inpatiently for his first album. When I first listened to it I really enjoyed it, but as time goes on I am a little disappointed. Don't get me wrong, I think it is a great album, especially for his first one, but I think that they could have emphasized his voice better. I feel like it was more pop music and back-up singes than Clay's voice. Not all the songs are that way, but quite a few of them are. I buy Clay's CD's because I want to hear his beautiful, soul-stirring voice, but this CD leaves me a little disappointed because it doesn't showcase his voice as well as I would have liked. I would still recommend this CD to anyone. It is very good and I will continue to listen to it and enjoy it. I look forward to his next one.
I really enjoy the Cd, I LOVE Invisible! I heard it in concert, but I love this version so much....I've listened to it over and over. I would have preferred more up beat songs, because I tend to enjoy them more (thus 4 instead of 5 stars)....but Clay can really sing and has such an awesome incredible voice. I also have to say I appreciated what he wrote inside the CD jacket and all he gave thanks to:)
Oh My God! I bought this album knowing I would just hate it. I bought it thinking that he was a cross between Neil Diamond and Pee Wee Herman. I? Was wrong! Aiken has chops. Major chops. This Aiken dude has incredible range. He hits them money notes brilliantly. Even though the lyrics are inredibly banal and unoriginal, Aiken rises above them. He shows incredible promise on this album and then some.Standout songs are Perfect Day, Touch, Invisible, The Way, and No More Sad SongsThrowaway song-Shine
really thought for a first album this kid from north carolina that no-one even heard of a year ago...this was pretty sensational..wasn't sure I was going to buy it but they were playing in the music store..the song was "shine" and I really found it "music to my ears"..now I can say that "the way" and "perfect day" are Clay's best on this cd..the song "measure of a man" is very good also..hope all the other skeptics out there like it as much as I do..would not want to see such a real talent fade away.
Once in a great while an artist comes along that sets the world on it's ear.Elvis did it. The Beatles did it. Heck, people who grew up in the 80's can argue that Duran Duran did it. Now it's Clay Aiken's turn.Make no mistake that this album is Pure Pop Pleasure. From the very catchy kick off track "Invisible" to the extremely sensual closer "Touch" there isn't a bad song in the bunch.Clay's voice soars and stirs the soul. Measure of a Man is without doubt a triumphant debut.
I am really impressed and love the cd. So great to have one in my collection. His voice is so marvellous and powerful. No doubt, his songs are going to touch everyone hearts. He is the one !!!!!
but I found myself really liking Clay Aiken while flipping through channels one evening. He may not have won, but he has won the hearts of Americans all over. I eagerly anticipated this CD. Bought it on release day and loved it immediately! Definately one of the best recording I have heard in a long time. And it's a CD that you can share with anyone and not be afraid of them being offended in any way. Here's hoping that Clay is around for a very long time!
Clay Aiken can sing any song beautifully. Every song on his CD is beautiful and sung perfectly. You can always feel Clay in your heart when he sings. I recommend this CD to everyone. Every age group can listen to this CD. Clay puts his heart in to every performance (as always). For once I bought a CD where I can listen to every song and not have to skip through to one that sounds good because every one is good. My favorites: "Run To Me," "Perfect Day," and "Meaure of a Man."
Who cares if Clay got his beginning from a TV show? Who cares if Clay is very effeminate? Who cares if he doesn't write his materials (that's a songwriter's job, not a singer's)? And who cares if he looks like Howdy Doody?THE ONLY THING THAT MATTER IS CLAY CAN SING LIKE NO ONE HAS EVER SUNG BEFORE. His voice just reaches out to you and when you let down your guard, it sucks you in and never lets go. If the world lets this one slips away, then it's a very sorry world. A singer like this only comes once in a lifetime.
Clay Aiken is one of my favorite singers from American Idol. My negative complaints about this album are: some of the songs on the album have corny lyrics and the album is overproduced. Overall, this album is a decent debut. Favorite songs: I Will Carry You, The Way, Run To Me, Shine, This Is The Night, Perfect Day, Measure Of A Man.
Clay has an absolutely fantastic voice and "Measure of a Man" showcases his voice beautifully. Clay is a true artist and a natural talent unlike I have ever heard before. I will purchase any C.D. that he releases!
Clay Aiken's voice is golden - anbd this cd proves it. you will get ongs with edge, ballads, feel good songs, angsty songs. worth every penny you will spend on it.
I am a big Clay fan. His voice is enchanting. However, much like Kelly Clarkson's CD, Clay's CD is somewhat lacking. I feel that they could have done much better. Almost all of the songs are basically about the same thing - very Celine Dion-esque in a sense that they're very...."you're gonna be alright", if you know what i mean. The best song in my opinion is 'I Survived You'. Bottom Line: It's a good CD, but a little redundant.
I love, love, love this CD very much!!! Clay Aiken's vocals are perfect and sings so well! Clay Aiken deserves a whole lot more radio airplay.
I really liked this cd, and lots of the songs were fun buy Clay kind of threw away some talent on the songs Touch, and Perfect Day. Other than that, it was great! Clay Aiken is kind of a geek, but he is still very entertaining, and I'd like to hear more of him in the future. I would reccomend it to lots of people! It rocks!
Before I begin I must say that I'm a fan of Idols. However I only watched the final show of the American Idols in which Clay was a contestant, so I really didn't know much about him.Why did I get this cd? Well from what I saw he had potential. And I must admit that I was right. This cd is perfect for a gift for someone who is a fan of Idols. Clay has an amazing voice. Why did I only give it 4 stars? Well it's a good cd and all, but it doesn't have that gold quality. Don't get my wrong, I play this often when in the car but there's not a great variety between all the songs. 'Measure Of A Man' is definitely my favourite!If you're into this light-hearted, catchy music then you'll be right at home here. However if you want something deeper I'd suggest looking elsewhere. I don't regret purchasing this cd.
I did not like the songs at first but listened again and found three songs I really like- Touch (wish they would play this on the radio), Measure of a Man, and a country music sounding Do you love me?Look forward to hearing Solitare again soon!
It's about time an artist gave us music that everyone can enjoy. The pop music business, for the most part, thinks all people want to hear about are negative images. I have a feeling sales of this CD will prove people want positive music. It's refreshing to be able to actually understand the lyrics and not feel uncomfortable listening to them. Three generations of our family have been "taken" by Clay Aiken and can't wait to hear more. I highly recommend this CD.
Clay Aiken will be around for many years to come! His first CD, Measure of a man doesn't have a bad track on it. Every one of the songs is suited to Clay's ballad style voice. I think it is one of the best albums I've heard in a long time. Invisible, Shine, Measure of a Man, all great...Clay is here to stay!
Clay Aiken's outstanding voice and song delivery are showcased perfectly on this cd. His vocal power and range are phenomenal and the songs themselves are terrific as well. At long last, a person rises to the top of the charts who is in actual possession of real talent! At long last, a major label has produced a cd with the recognition that the content of the music can be mature without being trash or treating vices as though they're, indeed, acceptable. It's been a long time since I've listened to pop for the simple reason that I was tired of wading through the filth and innuendo to hear a few bars I liked. Clay Aiken appeals to true emotion and feeling. This only came out today and already, I'm anxiously waiting for the next CD.
This young man is so talented.I can't pick a favorite..I like them all.I can't help but notice that a very few amt of those who wrote reviews on Clays album dtd'nt like it.No artist gets a 100 percent in his favor but Clay sure comes close. I've also noticed that those who say they don't like it really don't like it. Read those reviews too. It reads more like they are anger. Why do they express them selves that way? Could it be that they wanted it to fail? I'm a 65 year old grandma... not a clay mate..I'm a clay grandma and I love this cd. Grandma Pence
I love this CD and the more I listen the better it gets. I certainly got my money's worth with this CD. Great going Clay!!
I just loved Clay's singles cd and could not wait for his full lenght one. I played it for my husband and he did not even know it was Clay for the first two songs until I told him. It dosent sound like him in some of the songs. It dosen't have that powerful Clay sound that we all became to love. Don't get me wrong its a wonderful cd but I was hoping for the same power in his voice like his first singles. It's like the made him change his sound a bit. I still love his music and will continue to buy it.I am sure his next one will be even better as he is so new at this right now.
I bought this CD the day it came out in Oct and I am still playing it every day. I can't remember ever owning a CD that I would listen to every song and still play that CD everyday five months later! Well worth the money I spent on it.It is a shame that people are using this review area to bash Mr. Aiken because he is out selling the person that actually won American Idol. I didn't watch the show so I can't say why someone would feel the need to do this? I bought the CD because after hearing Mr. Aiken's "This is the Night" on the radio I fell in love with his voice. I am looking forward to his next album!
I like this debut very much. Clay did not win American Idol but he is a success after the show. Clay reminds me of a young Barry Manilow. I like that Clay is a clean cut guy and that his cd and lyrics are clean as well, that's a nice and refreshing change in celebrities and music. This is a wonderful cd. I can't wait to see Clay's career flourish and I hope to see Clay Aiken have a wonderful career for a long time to come. He truly deserves it.There are no lyrics printed on the cd booklet and I don't think you really need them either, it would have been nice but its not necessary. You can hear Clay sing the lyrics clearly and fans like me can sing along with him. Still I wish that the record label had printed the lyrics, that would have been a nice addition. The cd booklet also pulls out into a poster of Clay.
My favorite is "The Way". Great song for him and he delivers."I Will Carry You" is another goodie. There are a couple of songs that seem a little odd for him (almost country-ish....yuk), but he still does a great job with them.Buy the CD!
This CD is packed with absolutely wonderful songs, I can't stop playing it! There's a little bit of everything, so if you don't like one, just skip to the next track. What am I saying? How could you not LOVE CLAY AIKEN!
I enjoyed every song on this album. Clay and his producers did a great job picking out songs that showcase Clay's wonderful voice. The songs were all unique and I predict that there will be several number one songs generated off this CD. Congratulations Clay, you did a fantastic job!!
At first hearing the album sounded kinda bland. But some of the songs really grow on you, just like Clay. Have a listen to "The Way", "When You Say You Love Me" and "Run to Me" - they're songs you can sing/sway to, and I'd certainly take this album with me on long drives.
Clay Aiken shows that you can still sing songs without the language. His respect for himself as well as for others is projected very well through his music. I am proud to be from Raleigh and can't wait to go to a concert with my daughters, yes I am a mom. To be able to capture an audience of all ages is just amazing.
This is an exceptional CD. In today's world, a clean-cut guy singing clean-cut songs is, indeed, rare, and needless to say refreshing. Clay's clear voice excels. His voice and the lyrics complement each other. As in all CD's there are some songs you like more than others. I have my favorites on this CD. I strongly disagree with a rating I read in our local newspaper giving this CD a D+. All I can say is "to each his own."
Oh my god!!this cd is great..it has awesome lyrics,music,melodys,and tunes.whoever doesnt like this album is crazy!all the songs are spirtual lifting and they really touch ur heart!not to mention clay is so cute and has a great voice...he is a good guy.if you dont like him u have to like this grat cd..with beautiful songs!thank u clay ...for makin my day.....theres no mistakin,i luv aiken!
I am a very big fan of Clay Aiken, and I look forward to seeing how he grows as an artist. It does feel a bit overproduced, but at the same time, I'd buy a cd of Clay sing twinkle twinkle little star, just to hear his voice.
IF YOU HAVEN'T ALREADY BOUGHT THIS CD, YOU NEED TOO!!!!! Every song is so excellent and Clay's talent is proved over and over. Beat that Ruben! Also, The American Idol Holiday CD is awsome!!!
This CD is absolutley excellent. I adore Clay and I don't know of any other singers with such a pure, and REAL voice. I just hate how singers today are for image. Clay's not about image at all, even though his has improved! Anyway, my favorite songs are The Way, I Survived You, and Measure of a Man. The Way is SO romantic, it's perfect, he sings it beautifully. Then I think that I Survived You is about how his biological father abused him when he was a child. It was obviously very sad, but it made me think. Then Measure of a Man was very good too. I definitley suggest you buy it!
This album is so perfectly done! Solid mid-tempo power ballads and that one uptempo last song "Touch", which does sound funky. It does have that late-'80s feel, reminiscent of what Michael Bolton was doing during his reign of hits. Clay makes you feel every word, every lyric, as if he's gone through those situations with his loved one. "Invisible" has that Bon Jovi feel with the loud, bombastic guitars. Would have sounded good in 1986 too. And "The Way" sounds so beautiful with its gorgeous landscapes. Liked the title song, the country-flavored "When You Say You Love Me", "Run To Me", "Shine", "Perfect Day", the Whitesnake sounding "I Will Carry You" and others. This is a star right now and he is just selling like crazy with this album! Hope that the next album is just as exciting as this one!
Clay is an amazing talent. This has rapidly become my favorite CD. I listen to it over and over when I am traveling, which is all the time. If you enjoy listening to inspirational songs by a pure and wonderfully gifted young artist, this is the CD for you! Enjoy.
This album is just wonderful. Each song is a winner. The more I listen to it the better it gets.
As AI watchers know, Clay can sing anything. But his best performances (Solitare) were the ones where instrmentation was sparse and his voice, the star. Clay's at his best here on tracks(Touch, When You Say, MOAM, Perfect Day) where his voice carries the day; at worst (Run to Me) when the beat, music overpower the song (smaltzy over-processed pop). He deserves better than adult contemporary songs which try to dress him up as the new Micheal Bolton. On future outings, hopefully the label will let Clay experiment with more diverse songwriters and styles (maybe even something accapella, RCA?) that allow more of the power, range, and phrasing that makes Clay's voice special to shine through more. I do, however, love "The Way"! RCA has a witty, personable star with a VOICE on its hands. Don't let Clay/his voice get lost in the glitzy world of over-stylized pop.
As a fan of the American Idol franchise, I can say that this CD does not measure up to Clay's voice. I listen to Kelly Clarkson's CD "Thankful" and I see a CD that had some effort put into it. However, because Clay and Kelly are separate artists, their styles are different. Clay's voice had "soul" during his performances on AI 2, but on his CD "Measure of a Man", I hear no feeling put into it. Songs like "Invisible", "I Survived You" and "Measure of a Man" are the best songs on the album. Clay, here is some words of advice, on your next album, dont follow what the music company wants you to do. You can sing very good and don't need to be poppy.
This guy is the real deal. I expected this CD to be great and Clay didn't let anyone down. He'll be around for a long time. I hope to see him write or collaberate with other writers on his future projects.I think both Clay & Ruben have dealt with whatever controversy there has been with class and respect for one another, I just wish their fans would follow suit. The reality of the situation is... they both won. At this point, who came in first really doesn't matter.
Clay is the new-age Frank Sinatra. I have listened to nothing else since I got the CD on 10/14.Clay is an amazing singer who appeals to many different age groups. In my home alone, we are 3 people...13, 40, 74.I don't have a favorite song as they all showcase Clay's talent. This album is well worth the money.
WOW!!! Great Album!! I love listening to this CD over and over and over again! Thank you so much Clay, Love ALL of the songs, it is hard to pick a favorite, but I will try, I really love Measure of a Man, The Way, I Will Carry You, Perfect Day, Touch, When You Say You Love Me, Run To Me, No More Sad Songs and of course This Is The Night!!! Great job sweetie!! Clay will be making Christmas shopping easy this year!!! My goodness, I will be buying some more of this cd!!!!! 5 STARS!!!!
I received this CD as a gift at Christmas and I have to admit I was pleasantly surprised how good this recording is and enjoyable to listen to. If I had not received "Measure of a Man" as a present, I have to admit I most likely, would not have bought it. Only having gained my knowledge about Clay from the constant media barrage during the "American Idol" frenzy and having only seen the final episode of the contest, I really had not heard much from this singer before the CD. I do admit I was impressed by Clay during the "Idol" finale (and, yes, he clearly deserved to win as Ruben, although a seemingly nice fellow, sings out of tune). "Measure of a Man" is a solid collection of pop rock and a nice showcase for Clay's pleasant tenor. His voice, though a bit generic, shows some good stylistic touches that really help to elevate the quality of the material.A good job by Clay Aiken all around and a very listenable CD.
This album is a must-own for all those people who want a role model to look up to and admire. His personal views and emotional convictions can be heard throughout this album. Clay's strong, powerful voice combined with the wonderfully worded lyrics make this project an essential to every music collection. Most every person can find a song to suit their musical tastes on this album. Up-tempo songs like "Invisible" and "I Will Carry You" start the album off just right. "Measure of a Man" and "Run to Me" are really thought provoking and amazingly real. And it's not just a few song that are great, but the whole album is awesome. I don't get tired of listening to each song over and over. There is always something new and exciting that I discover each time I listen to this album. I can't wait to see what other amazing music Clay introduces to the world. Until that time, I'm going to listen to my Clay Aiken cd again and again and again.
Clay Aiken is one of the most talented singers out there. Not only does he have a voice from heaven but is an all around nice guy. What I love the most about this guy is that he's not afraid to be himself. He doesn't follow the fads and raunchy behavior the music industry is so used to. Clay is so unique, refreshing and is a joy to listen to. I am a fan forever!!! I absolutely love his voice, music and of course the man.
Okay, Yes, I'm a fan of Clay, and in being one, I like his music. I thought that this album was good for what it was. It was a teen-pop album. Anyone who watched one eppisode of American Idol, knows that Clay is capable of so much more. I do not believe that this album lives up to his potential as an artist. After listening to his rendition of "Bridge Over Troubled Waters," this album lacks that energy. I would have like an album that challened Clay. But with all of this said, I still like the album.
This is a great album for a young artists first. You can hum and sway to the music. Clay has a wonderful voice and it should be "showcased" better than in pop rock songs. I know he will mature and his next album will include songs that feature that voice like it did in his rendition of Bridge Over Troubled Waters.
This is an awesome album...way to go Clay ...We have waited for months for this album and now that it is here we are all learning the words and singing right along with Clay...Can't wait to see him in Concert, and hear more songs from this amazing young man. He thrills all ages..What an amazing ambassador you have..Clay is also OUR American Idol in CANADA as well..Please come here on your concert tour too
This cd is great, his voice is infactuating. I bought this cd and immediately bought one for my entire family. I recommend this cd to anyone, who wants good happy music. Who would have thought me, a fan of death metal, glitch, and trip-hop would have listend to a clay aiken cd, and liked it.Of course i'm lying though.
Clay's voice soars to new territory on this CD, particularly on songs like "Touch" and "Run to Me" and "Invisible", which could otherwise be categorized as ho-hum pop music, if Clay wasn't singing them. The lyrics are a little corny, but Clay makes them sound sincere. The vocal range of most of these songs is not very great, and thus they don't properly show off Clay's unique tenor to-die-for voice.I wish that the "experts" who molded some of these songs would have kept their involvement in the project to a minimum, and left the songs pure, instead of processing them with pop synthesizer sounds. I can hear that on any modern day pop album, and it is not very special. On the other hand, I can only hear Clay's voice on a few CD's. And his true voice is great enough that it shouldn't be crowded by synthesizer warble.
I have to admit that I bought this album wanting to love it because I loved Clay Aiken so much on the show. I loved his voice and he seems like a very kind and good person. And though I won't go so far as to say it's the best album to come along in years, I enjoy it. I especially enjoy "Measure of a Man", "The Way" and "When You Say You Love Me". I am a little disappointed that he doesn't sound exactly like the Clay I heard on the show. It was that voice that made me buy the CD. However, he does sound great, and I would definitely consider the album worth a listen.
I am a great fan of Clay Aiken, but the reason I like him is because of his unusual voice and sound. I don't think this album showcases that style and sound in the way it could. He needs to get more orginial sounding songs and stay away from the Backstreet Boys/trendy/pop stuff. He's just too good for it. Good job, Clay! But you can do so much better. Think Elvis Costello or Lyle Lovett. Two very orginal singers who have real staying power. Not poppy but real music. "Invisible" will be a hit but it won't keep him around for 50 years.
Before I bought this cd, I already knew Clay had an amazing voice--but WOW! Beautiful ballads, especially "Measure of a Man". "Invisible" was a great first single that got a lot of radio and tv play. No offense to Ruben, but Clay's single was much more popular, and I think he should have been the winner. Good job, Clay!
Even though Clay was runner up on American Idol, he proved his talent and ability with this great album. If you like pop/adult contemporary music, this album has something for you. The album starts off with great songs such as "Invisible", "I Will Carry You" and "The Way", and the latter two will be singles for sure. The country-pop of "When You Say You Love Me" leads into the almost intense "No More Sad Song". Then comes the beautiful "Run To Me" and the inspirational "Shine". This is followed by the great "I Survived You" and Clay's #1 single "This Is The Night". Then comes a trio of simply wonderful tunes: the glorious "Perfect Day", the passionate "Measure of a Man", and the sensual "Touch". Clay's voice is remarkable on every song, and there truly is something for all pop fans here. Billboard didn't name this the best pop album of 2003 for nothing.
Clay has a wonderful, unique voice which most singers do not have. It is hard to believe that such a beautiful comes out such a tall skinny dude!
Like everybody else, I rushed out to buy Clay's Album. It took listening to it twice to start catching on to the songs. Like others, I wish there had been a couple more songs that I had known. There are a couple though, that I think will be hits. Congrats Clay! I look forward to your next album!
Refreshingly different from today's mainstream POP music. Clay has a beautiful voice--but it gets washed out sometimes by the overproduction of the background music/vocals. I would love to hear Clay do the complete version of "To Love Somebody" like he sang it on AI. Although "Invisible" and "Measure of a Man" are getting all the airtime on tv and radio, this CD has other songs that I think are much better (try tracks 5 and 12).
No matter how many times you listen to this CD you are astonished by the strength and purity of this man's talent.All the emotions are here, displayed with style and class.
Finally a male vocalist comes out with a pure pop album that just send me to heaven. There are a few weak songs that stops me from giving this 5 stars. But there are some gems here such as "When You Say You Love Me". Great album and wishing him more sucess.
I PITY THE FOOLS THAT BOUGHT THIS ALBUM!! DON'T WANT TO HEAR NO MORE CLAY AIKEN!! IF I HEAR THE SONG 'INVISIBLE" ONE MORE TIME...I AM GOING TO GO TO LA. AND FIND THAT LITTLE TOOTHPICK WHITE BOY AND BREAK HIM IN HALF!! UGGG!! DON"T BE MAKING NO MORE RECORDS CLAY!! I PITY YOU IF YOU DO!!
I love this cd. I have found that I just want to listen to it over and over. I can't wait until Clay has another cd out.
Clay Aiken's debut album is absolutely incredible. Every song is good. Invisble, I Will Carry You, Measure of a Man, just all the songs are wonderful. His voice has so much range. The songs are ones you can listen to over and over. Buy this CD, you will not be disappointed. Clay Aiken has a refreshing sound and will be around for a long time.
I agree that the songs aren't groundbreaking AND that they are still great! Clay sounds fantastic on everything and I can't begin to pick a favorite! Shine and Perfect Day remind me a little of the Crowded House days, The Way would be a perfect slow song at a high school dance (swoon), Measure of a Man has depth and feeling, When You Say You Love Me has a fun pop/country sound with a beat that just makes you feel happy (would LOVE to hear the rumors of a Clay/Faith Hill duet come true)! I Survived You is wonderful. Each song just gets better with every listen!! I am really glad they didn't try to saddle Clay with a bunch of oldies. Maybe someday, but not now. I look forward to his next CD and hope that Clay continues to add "edge" and a little "funk" without compromising his values. Until then, I will listen to this CD until it wears out and eagerly await his solo tour!
I ran out in the rain to go buy this album over lunch today and I would have made it through a tornado to get to this CD. After listening to "measure of a man", it only confirmed that is was worth it. If you watched Clay during American Idol, you heard the frequent comment about Clay's "broadway" voice. Well, he has toned that down and his voice is just candy for the ears. (not that it was ever bad) Also, the selection of songs on this CD are wonderful. The songs are ones that you can find yourself really paying attention to and can relate to. All I can say is what a great marriage of song and voice. Clay, congrats!! I am your fan!!
This is a terrific album. Combine Clay Aiken's georgeous, soaring pop tenor voice with some great songs and you end up with an album you want to listen to again and again. On most albums there are a few good tracks and others that aren't so great, but every track on "Measure of a Man" is good and I am never tempted to skip over one song or another. "Invisible" is a fun pop-rock song, "The Way" is a romantic ballad, "Shine" is inspirational with beautiful lyrics, "Perfect Day" is a surprising and unusual ballad, "Measure of a Man" is great, but then so are "No More Sad Song" and "Run to Me." I am impressed with this first effort from a singer who - I hope - has a long career turning out music this good.
Note to Jaan: The word "discernable" is spelled "discernible." Wrong again ! You really should read or research before you speak....or write.
I think he is the best! He really is a STAR on my list and "Shines" completely in his new album. It's refreshing to have a talent like this in the music industry and I hope he makes another album. Absolutely heart felt and amazing.
I normally buy CD's for one or two songs, and then burn my own compilations to play in the car.This is one cd that goes in the car stereo as is - too many good songs to choose only one or two.Good music, wonderful voice, crazy hairstyle - looking forward to the next cd from Clay.
MOAM is well-orchestrated and extremely well-sung pop music. I defy anyone not to enjoy the blending of those two elements, especially on "Run to Me", "Shine", and "Perfect Day." The uniqueness about Clay Aiken's voice is that he can lift you to the heights of heaven with it.The only odd thing is the undercurrent of darkness in the lyrics. Clay can absolutely bring someone to giddy joy with his voice. The subtle angst in the songs seem mismatched, yet the whole production is well-executed; imagine if Hanson smeared on a little dark make-up and collaborated with The Cure. That and the loss of the warm rapport Aiken had with a live audience on AI2 can be a little jarring.Yet overall, the CD charms you with its own uniqueness, and there's no reason why you wouldn't buy one for your friend, and a second one for you when the first one gets too scratched from overuse.
I am addicted to this CD. I thoroughly enjoy every song and find myself humming a different song each day. Clay's voice is beautiful and these songs highlight his range and wonderful earnestness. The words are clearly enunciated and as any fan knows, Clay can belt out notes with the best. A couple of the songs are reminiscent of Chicago in that the choruses are catchy and inspire you to sing along to them while driving in your car. My personal favorites are The Way, Perfect Day, Measure of a Man, Run to Me, I Survived You, and Shine. Several of these songs seem to tell a story and you can imagine them being played in a movie soundtrack. I have been a fan of Clay's since American Idol and I am so happy and proud of his accomplishments in this debut album.
If you are a Clay fan, you will like this CD - a lot actually. Song number 12 rocks--and should definitely be the kind of music Clay creates in the future. I am glad I bought this CD--what a refreshing change: clean but good lyrics. Most of the songs are a bit slow, but, Clay's voice is amazing.Thanks Clay.
The CD was even better then I could have wished for! My only complaint is that I wish there have been more songs to listen too! Just listening to the CD makes my heart sing and my soul melt. It has all the flavor that a person could stand! Can't wait until the next CD is released! Clay just keeps getting better with every song he sings!
There is not one song on this CD that I have to skip. I love every single one of them. Thank goodness someone has brought back good pop music. And Clay Aiken has more talent in his little finger I think that any of the so called pop artists out there today. Good for you Clay this CD is a real pleaser.
I am amazed at the number of reviews posted for this album. It has become my favorite and plays once or twice a day in our house and/or car. Actually, had to buy two as my CD changer loader/ejector is broken and you have to unscrew the top, and do all sorts of gymnastics to get CD's in and out....it was easier to buy another for the car. This is an album that gets better with age, it grows and grows on you. It is an album to sing along to, an album to play softly in the background and an album to listen to with headphones. All the songs are good, I don't skip ANY of them, which as I (and other reviewers) usually do. Measure of a Man and The Way are probably my favorites, although Shine is marvelous - well, darn - they are all marvelous and I hightly recommend this CD to all ages. I eagerly await more albums from Clay and predict his career will be spectacular.
I wasn't sure what to expect when I got this album but, it was a lot better than I expected! The songs really flow together well on this album and he has a style all his own! It may not be for everybody but I really like it!
Clay's Measure of a Man CD is wonderful. I usually buy a CD and end up skipping 3 or 4 songs everytime I listen to it, but not this one. I love every single song. Clay has an incredible voice. My 4 year old loves him too. We get in the car and he says "Mom, please put Clay on" and I am only too happy to do it. He is a great role model, and we need them today. And he is singing music that anyone can listen to and love, from my 4 year old to me (34) to my mother (I'd better not say). Thanks, Clay, for being real! and for sharing your beautiful voice and attitude with the world.
Whoever said Clay needs to sing covers of old Frank Sinatra, Johnny Mathis, and other older songs, you are wrong. Clay is establishing himself as an artist, not a kareokie singer. Singing cover tunes would be bad right now. I'm glad he stayed away from cover tunes. He is proving himself and breaking out on his own. These songs cover everything from soft rock to country to pop. He doesn't even have the same vocal styles as Frank Sinatra and Johnny Mathis and Barry Manilow. He has a much stronger instrument and it is used to his advantage in songs like The Way, Run to Me, Perfect Day, and Measure of a Man. Other songs, like When You Say You Love Me, Invisible, and Touch are more uptempo and sexy. Frank Sinatra and Johnny Mathis did not have a lot of range. Clay would only waste his voice if he sang songs from them. In any case, these songs are a perfect showcase of his talent and versatility.
I can't get enough of this marvelous CD. I have to admit I play it over and over again, every day. It is mesmerizing.To those who say the album does not reflect this singer (i.e., he is not a song writer so he doesn't know squat), I say WHO CARES? How many artists out there today actually write their own songs and have lived every word of them?? To naysayers who do not believe a good singing voice makes an artist, well, I think there are about two million people out there who would tend to disagree with that assumption!!I have news for all of you doubters. This IS real music; music that has been sorely missing from the airwaves for years. So,you'd better get used to it - Clay is here to stay.AND I, FOR ONE, WILL CONTINUE TO BUY HIS MUSIC AS LONG AS HE CHOOSES TO GRACE US WITH HIS REFRESHING STYLE AND MARVELOUS VOCAL ABILITIES!Buy Measure of a Man and see for yourself what REAL SINGING is!
Dont you buy it either Honey, you take that money and buy you some reading material on how to spell, or better yet, get back into school, its very clear you are brainless.As for MOAM, it is one of the most refreshing CD's to come on the market in eons, I can understand the words even, isnt that amazing!! You go Clay!!
After eagerly awaiting the release of measure of a man, I purchased it after attending a meeting on Tuesday night. I listened to it on my way home enjoying each song. I would listen to one and say it was the best but then listen to the next one declaring it the best. My favorite on the CD is When You Say You Love Me. Each song displays Clay's talent as a singer displaying all of the ranges that Clay can sing. I enjoyed the CD so much and listen to it over and over on my way in to work and also while at work and on my way home from work. I did lend the CD to my daughter and she too loved it(I will purchase her own CD for her.)I hope Clay will come out with another CD soon maybe singing alot of Neil Sedak's music and even some of Barry Manilow's. Again, every Clay fan will be highly entertained when listening to the CD. Keep up the good work.
everyone MUST go out and buy this wonderful cd by super star Clay Aiken!! it will leave you breathless and wanting more!! don't delay, it will sell out fast!!!
When I first heard this CD, I was very disappointed. It seemed that most of the songs were slow songs. About a week later, I decided to listen to it again. The more I listen to this album, the more I enjoy it. I would have liked some more upbeat songs like "Invisible", but the songs are really great. It's a good "middle of the road" kind of album. My kids and I are having fun with this album but I hope his next one is more upbeat.
It's just such a wonderful thing to have an incredible talent now bringing us family friendly 'pop' content that we can enjoy as a family. And to have an artist that touches the hearts of 12 year olds, as well as 60 year olds, when was the last time we had this. This album will touch the heart of every member of the family, from child to grandparent, while being a new pop album. No one else out there can claim that now. And the songs on it are wonderful, the voice is so amazing. This guy will be around for many, many more years to come!
"Divine Chuckles" is a treasure. "Spirit"'s wisdom, warmth and humor has something great to offer anyone who chooses to listen.
I'm not sure the "Best Of" tag is appropriate as this compilations is just tracks from three albums '87, '89 and '91. Really? That's the "best" you can come up with for a guy who first performed in the late 60's? Anyway, I'm a fan. Here he stretches out a bit adding some Afro and Latin influences to his always excellent musicality and musicianship.
This group have crossed the lines of the typical merengue rythm. the lyrics and the musical compositions are so different and unique. These guys have a style and flavor that other groups don't have. I had the oportunity to see them live and "MY GOD" they are really, really good. their show is incomparable and their dance steps are a mix of the NY, flavor combined with hte true caibean Sazon. Good luck to you guys.
Elder is very talented and I know that he will go far in his musical career. Congrats! from Mari at SourceOne!
Love this band&ALWAY'S WILL,Seen him a dozen times&will continue to do so along with my teenage Son,rather take him to see an old school metal band than a rapper any old night!
When I needed to learn Struts, I went first to the online doc, but found it wanting. I then went to the O'Reilly book on the subject, assuming it would be as good as other O'reilly material, but it just wasn't. I did my due diligence and picked Ted Husted's Struts in Action, and I haven't regretted it at all. It covers what needs to be covered, in a methodical logical fashion. Sadly, this is more than I can say for most tech books, not just the ones on Struts. Virtually every Struts book I looked at covered some things I didn't want to know about and left out stuff about things critical to me. Struts in Action was a valuable learning tool and continues to serve as a great reference.
Although the book has lots of information and has many details, there's really no substitute for actually programming a MVC application with Struts. Struts is simple enough that most of what it offers can be learned by writing applications and looking at the API, which is open-source. The fine grained minutia is not in the book and has to be discovered manually. But, if you own his book, you can just ask Ted!Also, before embarking on a trip with Struts as the framework, it is vital to understand the MVC pattern. That pattern has its advantages and its disadvantages.
We were given the task to design an enterprise application. Of course, ya need a framework and where else do you turn? Struts! This book was one of the better I looked at when it came to concise, clear, and detailed information. It explains why to develop with struts and gives an explaination of how to develop an overall structure that is worth every penny. BUT ... I sure do like examples and, although there are quite a few, none really give the ENTIRE process from A to Z. That would have helped even more! The examples you get are A-C, then G-L, then P-Z. So the info is there, you just need to understand how to implement it.
I don't know why I took so long to buy this single or any of Melanie's other singles.I think Melanie is the best artist out there, I've loved her and her music since her spice girl days.This album is great.I really love "Angel on my Shoulder," its a nice touching song.I would also recommend buying the Goin' Down CD 2(if you don't already have it) because "I Want You Back" is the greatest song ever.It's my fave and if you haven't heard it, you should.
The watch speaks the time clearly, and it is easy to set. What I didn't like was that the watch is not water resistant.The company that actually sells the watch (Maxiaids) is outstanding. I had a problem after receiving the watch, and they exchanged it with absolutely no hassles. They even paid for the return postage.
Actually, it was a stocking stuffer for a blind friend who also has the problem of low sensation in his hands. The design passed his test because he could use it. I couldn't say that for other products that are designed for the blind yet didn't work in a design sense.
This album jams! Yes it is old school influenced but it is a lot catchy fresh techno-pop JAM!
This is one of my favorite CDs that I've heard in the last year. If you don't end up loving it, you're at least guaranteed to think it's pretty funny.This is just one of those records you can't really intellectualize. You hear it, you love it or you hate it. It's all about fun fun fun and, for me, took no work at all to enjoy or "get into".For the late 90's, this was a very bold album to produce. So much pressure is put on electronic artists to sound absolutely new and completely groundbreaking, and this record isn't only tinged with 80's influences-- it often sounds like it was made IN the 80's.Most of these tracks are wonderful, I only find two to be unlistenable "Soft Machine" and "From: Disco To: Disco". The second to last, "Sometimes" is one of the most-played songs in my apartment.Get this CD!
I have a 10mth old girl and she just loves this book. I found the seller great to purchase with. I had no hassel at all. Makes buying fun when you don't have to worry about delays.
This disc was played everyweekend at our parties, so much so it was almost a ritual. Not quite as good as Love Machine but still an awesome disc.
I would consider myself a "radio" Damn Yankees fan, having only heard their radio hits like, "Don't Tread on Me," and, "High Enough." After hearing this Essentials CD though, I see that there's more than meet's the ear. The only song on here that I can't seem to get into is, "Come Again," but all the others are real rockers for me. From the milder, "Silent is Broken," to the fast and heavy, "Piledriver," this CD never stops! The guitars, vocals, bass, and drums, all rock. I tend to give conservative ratings, so that's why I gave this a 4 out of 5 stars, but otherwise, I would highly recommend it for any other "radio" fans like myself.
I used this book with my sixth grade class to explore our theme of ancient heroes. Nye's retelling kept my class totally entranced with Beowulf and his adventures. ALthough it does not follow the original it does introduce young students to the hero, and those students who were more enthralled read other versions. When Nye's retelling is compared with the orginal it opens up discussions...even for sixth graders!!
As an English teacher, I do not like reading abridged and "translated" versions of books; however, Robert Nye does capture the essence of the story in a way that holds students' attention. Furthermore, his version allows me to engage the students in occasional excerpts from the unabridged text, thus allowing for meaningful experiences in critical analysis.
PRINCE songs like "Sister","Sexuality","Delirious" and "Horny Toad" and anything else similar are sounds of DEZ. DEZ didn't write them but the music touched PRINCE,he never had that sound before the DIRTY MIND album. But he did use it when DEZ left to do The MODERNNAIRES for "Let's Go Crazy".DEZ is no longer that wild man,Chinese-bandana wearing,axeman. He's still the axeman,but a born-again one. 13 songs,all of them with heartfelt lyrics to make you think like "Like A Merry Go Round" he talks about the ups and downs that life brings us. "Peacehopejoy" maybe the heaviest song on the CD while most of the disc is mellow but great guitar work.At the end of the album,behind "Real To Me" he gives thanks to fans and JESUS CHRIST and asks you to come along. The CD does not bore,musically,lyrically and spiritually. DEZ would tell you,it's just "The Way I Feel". DEZ I feel ya!
This is a great album for fans of Joey Santiago and his work with the Pixies. If you love his guitar play, then I would definitely suggest buying this.
The strengths of this book are the tips to getting yourself out of trouble. The interesting part of this book are the interviews with the major players in the history of the MAC. Gives a chance to those people to voice their opinion of the state of the MAC.
I taught computer classes at a high school and had every sort of Mac from the SE/30 to IMac in the same room. This book helped me with every computer, with every problem, and stopped many classroom disasters. The format is easy, the index very complete, and you will never need another book for your Mac but this one! The fact that it is concisely and even humorously written is a bonus!
There's something about the lovely young ladies of Ai Yori Aoshi that tugs at the heart strings. Each has their own distinctive personality; so much so that they are basically graphic representations of literary archetypes themselves.The eighth volume of the series is pretty much more of the same that readers have come to expect of Kaoru's possible love interests. Several stories revolve around Chika-chan's innocent infatuation (and her talent at extremely cute, chibi-plushies) and her eventual move to the mansion. There are also a few chapters dealing with Aoi and Kaoru exclusively. It was especially touching to see him subtly introduce Aoi to his Mother in a scene that has been played out just as well in other grand romantic series (Maison Ikkoku comes to mind).All in all, volume eight pleases in the various aspects it encompasses (cuteness, fanservice, romance, drama, comedy, etc.).
The blurb up on the initial description has the stars wrong. Josh Duhamel and James Caan? Woops!Fun to watch, the era is attractive.
I love this show, it looks like it is going to be cancelled, such a waste. If they'd give it time, I think it would grow into a real hit. The story lines are engaging, the acting is wonderful. The premise is unique and interesting. Shows which are different need a time to grow, it is a pity this show will not be given that chance.
I've been watching this on Amazon Instant video because it's on too late for me...I get up at 5:30 on work days. I wasn't sure I was going to like it at first, but as the relationships developed & Dennis Quaid stopped scowling so much, it's grown on me. The bad guys aren't always so bad & the good guys aren't always so good & everybody is about as un-PC as you can get. It's grown on me and is a great relief from the sanitized view of most TV these days when juvenile sex gags & humiliation pass for comedy and nobody dare offend anyone while offending everyone.
Great series featuring the beginnings of Las Vegas. Dennis Quaid is delightful as the Sheriff and I gotta love the mobsters too.
These bags can hold so much debris that I still haven't had to replace the original since I bought the vacuum about 5 months ago!
I had this album on vinyl when it was first released in 1982 and regretted the loss of it for years!! I've been searching online for it and could only find it available for $250+!! I finally found someone selling it for a reasonable price and I GOT IT!! This is by far one the most important musical purchases I've made in years. This CD is astounding...Chaka at her best!!
Barbara Mason is a very underated singer. I never heard of her and purchased this cd by chance it really surprised me that this material wasnt recognized since Im always up on my music. the one song that really stands out is bed and board which is sang with depth. then there is the splendid song with the futures we got each other which really puts you in the mood for some good old soul music.
with a brilliant blend of dazzling melodies (sometimes in the vein of early Split Enz but mostly 60's pop , sometimes bubblegum) tony carbone (who is this fella....i wanna meet him) puts together 13 cuts so cute and so impressive youd like to see BIKERIDE get a break. my fave cuts are 13, 10, and 4.....but all are grand. synths find their place throughout the album giving it a very modern, almost avant-garde feel, fusing the nicest things about pop into some nice jams. granted, one must be sophisticated musically to apppreciate this.JEALOUSY HANGS....dave cass
A Legendary rock 'n' roll performer. A lot of his songs were covered or plagiarized. This is dirty rock 'n' roll with a little jazzy feel. The collection is featuring 29 songs that were recorded between 1953 and 1958. Some songs are issued here for the first time ("My New Pink Suedes", "Rock 'n' Roll School",...).
Clapton has said of The Band's "Music from Big Pink" that it "changed my life." "No Reason to Cry" may not be Clapton at his best, but if you like The Band (as I do), then you'll probably enjoy this compact disc.Many of the songs sound like they could be from The Band, except for Clapton's voice. Robbie Robertson, Rick Danko and Richard Manuel play backup for Clapton, and members of The Band wrote two of the tracks: "Beautiful Thing" and "All Our Past Times." Danko shares lead vocals with Clapton on "All Our Past Times."There are two outstanding tracks on this cd: "Hello Old Friend" and "Black Summer Rain." "Black Summer Rain" evokes The Band's "It Makes No Difference" both in sound and lyrics ("...and the sun don't shine anymore, and the rain falls down on my door..."). Listen to the two songs one after another and you'll see what I mean.This album ain't Clapton's greatest but, to me, it's still good and well worth experiencing.
This album was to have been a collaborative work of Bob Dylan and Eric Clapton. But Dylan just liked to play his music and get on with it, while Slow Hand was forever and a day refining and refining and refining. So Dylan, frustrated, laid down "Sign Language" and then just walked away from the project. That song happens to be the best track on an otherwise not-too-shabby effort in its own right, but the question always will beg to be asked...what might have been?For some reason this work is never recognized for its intrinsic qualities, but in some respects it represents the best of what the various Eric Clapton personae were about. Dylan, of course, is Dylan. Good stuff!
I think this album/cd is the most under-rated project of Eric Clapton. It has a fine bunch of tunes and various styles and sounds very much like the fine material on "Slowhand".
Clapton just has so many great albums. No Reason To Cry is no exception. Every song on the album is great. Buy it.
I read roughly a book a week. This is one of my favourites. I've re-read it enough to have two copies fall apart. It's a challenging read, but a great one.
This is clearly one of the greatest SF novels of all time, but the novice reader of Science Fiction should put off reading it till they are more familiar with the genre. Zelazny was a master of one of the special joys of SF: the joy of figuring out what is going on. (note that in the first Amber novel, the narrator has amnesia and you are right there with him figuring out what is going on....) At first glance Lord of Light might seem a religious mish mash, but in fact is a techno/politico masterpiece (a really wild technolgy but not so unfamiliar politics...) Combined with the out of order chapters, it is easy to see how someone who had not read much science ficture could find this book incomprehensible. But it will give great enjoyment to the more experienced reader, (and re-reader.)
This is a great book, but it is also a long and complex book. It is not a fast read. It would help if you knew something of the Hindu and Buddhist beliefs. I was suspicious at first that the author would write and write and write and then end the book without finishing it, if you know what I mean. I HATE it when a writer does that. Rest assured that Roger Zelazny finishes what he starts. If you want proof, then read his book This Immortal. It too, is a great book but way easier to read than Lord of Light. Zelazny is a fantastic writer. The images he creates in you might are nothing short of spectacular. When the book was written in 1967 motion picture special effects were not up to the task. Now though, in 2002, after Lord of the Rings, I wonder...
I read this novel in 1970 a couple of years after it was first published, and probably half a dozen times since. This story works on many levels, making it enjoyable to a wide audience. Its works as an adventure novel, a mythological fable, and as hard sci-fi with a sharp edge of social conscience. The characters are well developed throughout the story, but only late in the plot line do we really begin to understand their true motivations. And from start to finish, there's enough mystery, intrigue, and action to satisfy most anyone. In the end, the story works as a parable illustrating the greed, and lust for power common in human nature and history. It shows as well, that the true motivation of our "heroes" is seldom what it appears on the surface to be. So, whether you enjoy Lord of Light as a fantasy, an adventurous escape from reality, hard Sci-Fi, or as social commentary on human weaknesses, excesses, and strengths, enjoy it you most certainly will!
I've read science fiction since the third grade, and I've read alot. I am now in my early forties and have recently reread Lord of Light. It is still my favorite book. It is thought provoking, full of colorful characters, and as is often the case in Zelazny's books, it has a reluctant hero/protagonist (Sam/Buddah) whose primary attribute is his humanity. Ultimately, Sam's heroism is demonstrated by his ability to convince his peer's of their own ties to humanity.
My Bosch vacuum was a couple of years old and had seen some fairly heavy use. I had begun to notice stinky air at the exhaust when even a new bag was only partially full. By replacing the existing filter with the Micro/Charcoal filter I have eliminated the stinky exhaust.
This is the best series of books I have found for history for 9-12 year olds. I teach 4th and 5th graders and they love these books. They have interesting pictures and are written at the perfect level. I like all the art project ideas they include, the organized method in which they are written, and the timeline which runs the bottom of the pages. This is a great resource. I can't recommend it highly enough.
I have been looking for this album in CD form since my turntable died and never could. This is one of my all time favorites and I was devistated when I couldn't listen to it. It brings back some very pleasant memories and I always long for them when I hear this great album. I hope everyone gets a chance to listen to the great vocal qualities of the members of LRB. They blend in a way few bands ever have. The words of Cool Change are powerful and speak of a point in my life when I knew it really was time for a change. What a great album!
Just received this item today. It finally arrived, not sure wh it took so long from McLendons.Just sprayed it on my plants, I'll let you all know how it works when I have results.
Because the author " lived" the revolution, this is a very interesting book. Incredibly detailed from an emotional and time reference. I really enjoyed. Difficult read-not for those who like light fiction or broad quick history.. Must be a history buff to read. You might need a reference to read i.e. Wikepedia-I did.
This documentary was good! It talks about the real truth about Jim Jones! And I Quote people were blinded by this coward and has mislead them about taking them to the promise land, and that's how people were killed, a few survived. And his wife "Merciline" is responsible for the people at the temple as well. it is a sad story. A real sad story.It really breaks my heart to see people died in vain! Just remember things ain't always peaches and cream.Dee SmallsDecatur GA
I've had this album since it was released. It was unusual then, and it's unusual now - but still good. Like a dark Tindersticks with distorted guitar. If you want to hear something different, try this.
Love Redkin Spray Starch! I can go to bed with wet hair and still style as usual in the mornings -- (and my hair doesn't break or feel damaged!) I would definitely recommed this product for women with longer hair styles - mine is about shoulder-length. Feels sticky at first, but the heat breaks the product down and hair feels natural.
in a quick reading of 'restless souls' i find persons of courage and determination who look beyond echoes to provide voices that help move us beyond traditionally divisive conceptions of faith and value toward building inclusive community characterized by respect, justice, and mercy. i look forward to spending more time here. gr
This is a fantastic resource. I have just received my copy and already I am in love with it. It is very well-written, and strikes a nice balance between the structure of the langauge and usability. I especially like that the author is no fan of prescriptivists, and so presents "Hindi as she is spoke". I would not say that it is "better" than Snell's TYH, but it takes a slightly different approach, and is, in my opinion a great complement to the other work.My only gripes are the way that all the devanagari is stuck at the back (grr!) and that I had to buy the book and CD separately. Even with those minuses, it is absolutely worth it, and I would rate it a must have.
I found it clear, gradual and (most over all) aware of the non-linguistic rules related to conversation. I disagree with the "London reader": I found the romanization good and easy to follow... maybe it's 'cause I'm italian or 'cause I was teaching myself Hindi just for pleasure, so I wasn't expecting nothing more than an aid!
This is a fantastic book! I am a teacher and graduate student, but I could never manage to read the Bible. The significance of the passages always escaped me, the Bible seemed overwhelming and confusing, and I couldn't fathom how people could read so much into a single line. This book is exactly what I have been needing. The authors pick out a huge variety of Bible readings, and then explain their significance and context in a way that's both profound and completely understandable. I am finally able to see "the big picture." It's also removing a source of guilt from my life - one of those things that you don't realize is such a thorn in your side until it's gone. I've wanted to read the Bible for so long, but previously it just never "clicked."
I,v read this series three times and it still fasinates me!!!! ....sabrin
An American student in Oxford finds a way into the land of Albion, an ancient mythical version of Great Britain, where he is confronted with a rising battle between Good and and an ancient Evil.While the crux of the story is made up of pretty good light-fantasy gravitating around the Celtic folklore with occasional light Christian archetype overtones, surprisingly I actually preferred the earlier part of the book before Lewis (and his mate Simon) cross into the "other side". I just felt that the anticipation and humour that Lawhead shows in the current day part of the yarn gets lost and diluted once in Albion.While this is a shame, it's still a worthy book to take with you on a summer holiday.
I stumbled upon this book at work one day, and after finishing it I bought the entire series for myself to add to my library.
I got this book for free as a limited-time offer for Kindle, so I might be a little biased. That being said, I still think it's worth either buying or renting from the library. What's unique about it is that it is largely told from the first-person perspective of Lewis, an American college student studying at Oxford University in the UK. Lewis, following after his friend Simon, enters into the world of Albion which is styled after Celtic history and mythology. Many people are opposed to the book because of its Christian themes but I would say give it try anyway. It's a refreshing and unique take on historical fantasy.
For those who love Celtic fiction, this is a must have. At times Lawhead suffers from mid-book doldrums, and this book is no exception; however, this is probably my favorite Lawhead book. Too bad the final one of the series has such a horrible ending and practically annihilates all of the hard work the author put into the first two books.4.5 stars
Good book.well written and keeps your attention all the way through.excellent discriptive writing.
I've been an avid fan of Stephen Lawhead's work for some years now, and I truly believe that the Song of Albion triology is his best work to date. Our world is but a shadow compared to the world Lawhead creates when Lewis and Simon cross over into the Otherworld. It's incredibly vivid and the plot is so engaging and well thought out that you can't help but be drawn into it. Celtic mythology is also something so different from any other culture in the world, and Stephen Lawhead the master of the Celtic/Fantasy genre. I can't speak highly enough of these books, and for me they sit equal with 'Magician' and just below 'The Lord of The Rings' as all time fantasy classics.
I love the SprinBrush heads for my toothbrush. These work so much better as both heads move and give me really clean teeth.
I had studied a lot of techniques but Meisner. One day at the book store I decided to buy this book to start learning Meisner and when I finished the first one I ordered the rest right away. The technique is explained very clear. It is helpful for me as a teacher. I don't know how can he simplify this complicated exercises into something very concrete. It is a REAL workbook!
AEROSMITH WILL FOREVER AND ALWAYS WILL BE. ONE OF THE BEST ROCK GROUPS OF ALL TIME."DREAM ON" IS JUST AS GOOD A CLASSIC AS "STAIRWAY TO HEAVEN"AEROSMITH SONG'S WILL BE PLAYED ON THE RADIO UNTIL THE SUN BURNS OUT!THE LATE 80"S AND EARLY 90'S:THE CD'S IN THIS SET.ARE THE ONES THAT MADE AEROSMITH THE MOST MONEY.THESE CD'S IN THE SET MADE THEM A GROUP THAT COULD DO NO WRONG.3 HIT ALBUMS IN A ROW MADE THE TROUBLES IN THE PAST.BE PUT TO REST AND ONLY LEARN FROM THE WRONG!THESE WERE THE THE CD'S THAT AEROSMITH MADE VIDEO'S TO.AND MADE THEM A LEADING GROUP TO A WHOLE NEW GENERATION.THEY TOURED TO SOLD OUT CONCERTS EVERYWHERE BECAUSE THESE CD'S WHERE HIT MAKEING MACHINES.[AND THESE CD'S PROVED THAT GRUNGE/ALTERNATIVE COULD NOT STOP A REAL ROCK GROUP]{THESE CD'S ARE ONLY A SAMPLE TO AEROSMITH'S MUSIC COLLECTION}"BUT WHAT A PERFECT SAMPLE TO THE WORLD OF MUSIC:AEROSMITH"(ROME,NEW YORK :HOME OF WOODSTOCK 1999)
Intriguing and excellently written music paired with delightfully surprising lyrics and an engaging, intimate style make this album a must-buy. If you like John Mayer, Josh Kelly, you'll adore Andy!!!!
This is an great serie. I don't have or want cable, I saw the show online and wanted to buy the DVD. Could not find in stores so I went to Amazon to find the show I want to buy. THe company delieved in a timely manner. How I just have to get season three, can't waite. I recommend this company they have reasonable prices and fast delievery.
Thanks, Amazon, for making it so easy to keep getting seasons of my absolute favorite television series. Sanctuary and all the Stargate series are great!!! My whole family love Helen Magnus and her crew. Even gotmy husband, who is strictly a sports and western fan, to watch and now he's hooked. Never need to worry thatmerchandise will be anything but perfect when it arrives, barring any problems during transit.
I love this show. It keeps evolving ... change is good! The characters farmed from the SG1 and SGA series are great! I was missing Rodney when I first watched the webisodes!!!! Danial Jackson, Todd and Beckett!!! LOVE IT!!! The stories are fresh! Ugh I hate the "continued" at the end of the season!!! I am impatient!!! I like the new monsters weekly! Always a bad guy to contend with! I look forward to season three!!!
Sanctuary is the best and very imaginative in it story lines. I love Amanda Tapping and the whole cast, they are so talented. The bonus features were great too, I liked hearing what they had to say about an episode or anything else. I love Sanctuary, I can not wait for season 3.Big Fan,Christine Martin
I was most impressed with the follow-up to Season 1. I so like the imagination which comes out in the range of creatures that are a part of the show.I am now looking at purchsing Season 3.
Season two built on season one perfectly. I love this series and cannot wait until season three has been released so I can find out what happens to Will (and the world) in relation to Kali.
When I first got the bag I thought the color was a bit too neon for me but I decided that the great features of the bag far outweighed the color. Now, I am way over the color and actually really like it now. I think this bag is amazing. I love all the room, tons of pockets, it's easy to wear, it's iPod friendly and I really like that it hangs from my stroller. I think they thought of just about everything when designing this bag. I recommend this bag to every mom out there. Don't be afraid of the green. It's totally retro and it grows on you very fast. I'd buy it all over again.
I picked this CD up in spain and upon coming back to the united states was surprised that ADF's CDs were nowhere to be found in american record stores. But after a listen to Community music you can understand why. This album has grooves that infect your mind and some of the most powerful anti-capitalistic lyrics around. If your a fan of reggae, dub, indian music, techo, or just meaningful music, this cd is a must buy.
First published in Hungary in 1940, this is the first English publcation of this novel.The story is an erotic telling of the story of Giacomo Casanova after his escape from Venice's most infamous jail. He goes to Bolzano to rebuild his life and to resume his life of seduction. He picks Bolzano because of his history with the place and this particular lady. The story picks up when her husband, the elderly duke ....Well you can guess the story from there. It marks the second novel of Sandai Marai that's in print. It also makes you wonder what other great novels were printed in a time, place and language waiting to be rediscovered.
If a book is new to me, I tend to skip the intros, whether the translator's, author's or critic's. I picked CAZANOVA up based on a review I scanned, without reading closely. So it wasn't until near the end of it that I realized "this cannot be a contemporary novel". One of its characters--and a remarkable one--espoused as fine and powerful a description of true romantic love as exists in literature, I felt. The sad thing was, in reading it, I knew this was a dated novel. That notion of romantic love was in that "fine and private place/where none I fear do embrace", as far as I could tell.This novel is about love. In a sense, it makes a lovely headstone for the notion of romantic love.
This is the second watch I have bought that is the same style but different color. The watch itself is wonderful! The only problem I see is that the color stated Sky Blue and when the watch came to my door, its more turqouise not sky blue at all? Which was fine because it was a gift and my mother in law loves turqouise but i was expecting sky blue!
these are the best ever fit and comfort shoes i have ever purchased online I am on my feet for hours and my feet feel great , Jessica Simpson shoes are to die for.
I love this shoe! I tried it on at Macy's and looooved it! I actually bought the wrong size on Amazon and had to return them but i will definitely get them again in the correct size! Because of the patent leather they fit really snug so i'd go with your size or just a 1/2 size below your normal size. These make your legs look long and gorgeous move over boots I believe these pumps were made for walking the streets of our city and the hallways at the office! Jessica's shoes are so beautiful and fit great. Work it girls!
well fitting and sexy shoes. unique subtle colors. i highly recommend. i have many pairs of jessica simpson shoes, and i've been very pleased with each one.
Really cute sexy shoe but they do run small and they are very high as well but it said they were stilettos. I love them and I also look the red color.
These were rather expensive to purchase over the internet. I've been able to find Bunn filters much cheaper locally. I am happy with the response from this seller.
uyytui gyuh k !èyui hjuyuy ihuhui jhihui jhuiytfrty rere ddszq edss ezqf gdret trdredtr drez e d
this cd is the bomb. all the song are hot. the no limit camp is bad and bigger then ever. what happened to them punk nigg** cash money click??? tell them haters to back off and the real to step up and buy this cd. you heard?
If your looking for a guide to help you understand and interpret your dreams, this book is excellent! With the knowledge and awareness attained in this book you open yourself to having more fruitful experiences when you dream.this book helped me solve many of my own dream realm puzzles
Sylvia is talented and can help with dreams. She has helped a lot of people in life. suggestive Recommending: = The Discovery of Dreams A-Z.
The best thing about this book is the practical advice she provides about helping children deal with and eliminate nightmares. Her insights into protecting children from needless violent images are excellent. I can't say it strongly enough she provides sensible suggestions that if implemented would benefit generations of children.
While most dream books focus on the symbolism within the dreams, Sylvia focuses more on the different types of dreams, offering a fresh perspective on dream analysis. According to Ms. Browne, there are five different types of dreams. Release, Wish, Information, Prophetic, and Astral Travel. Within each section, she not only explains what the category means, but also provides examples for them. One of the last chapters of the book contains examples of various dreams submitted by readers, some a combination of two or more categories.While there are tons of books on dream symbolism, this is the first book I've come across that actually helps you to categorize the dream. Since dreams are mostly symbolic in nature and very personal, thereby, a bit cryptic, being able to categorize the dream first is a BIG help in deciphering it.I strongly recommend this book as part of further studies in dream analysis, including Carl Jung's 'Man and His Symbols'
THIS Film IS rated - even though the amazon description above says it is not...and it is definetly R! I bought this, thinking mild sex and fart jokes (ala Kung Pow humor) but was surprised to find so many obscenities and overt sexual references. I'm not a prude, but I'd hoped to share this with my preteens...NO WAY! It IS hilarious, however, so if you don't have young kids around, ENJOY!
Resident evil: outbreak file 1 and 2 are amazing online games to buy. The only problem is that if you don't have PS2 online you shouldn't even bother renting this series, not to mention buying it. Outbreak one and two are only to be taken seriously if the consumer has online and really wants to have fun, get scared, and possibly win scenarios with help from other people. So many things can go wrong in each scenario, leaving people to have to save eachother, rather then caring only about themselves. This series has amazing enemies to face and non-stop scares just waiting to be experienced. Playing at midnight on the weekends, in the dark, especially gives the game life.The only problem from my perspective is that the loading pages last so long, but w/e its just a game to pass the time. Definately a serious thought to buy this game if online is available.
I hesitated ordering File 2 but couldn't resist having another Resident Evil game for just $20. Over all it's a fun game to play. It's just that the dumb A.I. characters are a pain to deal with. Most of the time just keeping them alive is a full time job. With friends like that who needs enemies? However coming down the home stretch and completing the game is a good feeling.
Oh,my real name is Jordan R.Brown and yeah,I'm using my mom's account.Just letting you know.I'm a huge fan of Resident Evil movies and games.But,when I first played this game,it was good and then I got it.I'm not even afriad of Resident Evil monsters but,I like Resident Evil Outbreak better but,there are some things missing in file #2 but,i'm not sure but,overall it's good but,it's just missing some things and parts that are making any sence but,yeah i agree with with all of you.The puzzles are complicated but,I think "UnderBelly and "Despert Times" are one of the most puzzles one because,it seems very frustrating and confusing and plus,they are some characters that you need for those chapters.But,I still think it's a good game but,I still like Resident Evil Outbreak better.Resident Evil is one of the best horror games I ever played.Resident Evil Rules!!
With multiple objectives, this game will keep you coming back to play again and again. First, find the way out. Second, search for secret items. Third, see how quickly the scenario can be completed. Fourth, do the first three objectives in one of the four difficulty levels.Some fans may find it a bit boring after Resident Evil 4 as this game has more of a classic Resident Evil feel. Also, even on the easier modes, this game is very challenging. It's not for the impatient or easily frustrated.I gave it five out of five for fun, overall play and another 5 for replay value. No Resident Evil collection is complete without this game.
Reverend Gainous presents a tremendous challenge to move beyond the medicraty of sideline Christianity by moving into a position of power and faith, which leads to ultimate victory that all believers can enjoy. His practical and personal experiences adds life to each phase of development in order to become the contenders that God expects for Christians to be. I salute this work and highly recommend it for it's excellence toward bringing believers into the reality of the personal sacrifices and price to be paid to truly enjoy God given victories. The athletic and military analagies allows the reader to relate to biblical and spiritual principles from a practical perspective.
Reverend Gainous offer us in his book more than strong inspirational quotes and passages...he offer us the clear roadmap in how to take charge of our affairs in life and became a true successful contender in the eyes of The Lord.
I thought it was very helpful for the odd situation. What was lacking was something for the 52 degree spring angle.
Wayne,I searched the web for some good info on crown molding. Your book is nothing short of fantastic. After making my own templates I felt confident enough for the real thing. Every cut was perfect. No gaps....WOW. Your tables combined with the "Exact Angle Squares" made for a most satisfying project. The only down side is my new "Honey Do" list. It just keeps growing and growing.ThanksBill
This book gives a thorough overview of Monotype printing. It starts out with materials needed, then goes on to talk about hand transfers, press transfers and doing monotypes in acrylic, watercolor, oil and printmaking inks. It covers mixed media and stencils, masks, etc. It has much practical/useful information in each section on both techniques and materials. There are examples of each type of work covered, athough I would have liked to see a larger "gallery" of work by different artist. A very good book if you are interested in monotypes.
The scenes in these stories lingered in my thoughts long after I put the book down. The most intriguing aspect was the contrast between the cold and detached environments where the characters interact and the sensuality that infuses everything. I enjoy visiting worlds beyond my own, and this book took me there.
The scenes in these stories lingered in my thoughts long after I put the book down. The most intriguing aspect of many scenes was the contrast between the cold and detached environments where the characters interact and the sensuality that infuses everything. I enjoy visiting worlds beyond my own, and this book took me there.
this product was shipped promptly and is of good quality. it helps relieve the pain of tendinitis in the forearm but most importantly, when worn, it is a constant reminder to take it easy. pains often come on quickly but healing requires time.
Thank goodness I bought these. I have tennis elbow in both elbows because of my career. (Flower design.) I have been suffering for quite awhile and I just got these braces and put them on and I can immediately feel a difference. My fiance better watch out, I can already tell this will help my bowling! A great relief for a great price!
I'm experiencing classic tennis elbow, from too much bad technique with the backhand, and playing a guy who hits the ball with a lot of pace and deep into my backhand corner. The elbow support works pretty well. Stays in place w' the velcro strap. Only thing I'd suggest as improvement is a somewhat larger, higher area that pushes down on the forearm muscle and tendon. Overall, it works well.
I like this elbow support very much. I am wearing it right now and have had it on all day. It is very comfortable. It is so hard to find the right support, that I was so glad that I found it on Amazon.com. I have had a nerve problem for many years and have had to wear a support just about every day. If I don't I have major pain down my arm and into my fingers. This support does what it is intended to do.
The Futuro Tennis Elbow Support is a good value. The product is durable and provides good support. One unexpected problem was the width of the product. For Tennis it works well. For lifting and carrying things the thickness prevents full flexion of the elbow and causes irritation by rubbing.
Though this cd cannot live up to the awesome power of Pangaea or Agharta it still is a powerful cd. This is heavy music powered not only by jazz funk but by an otherworldliness that only Miles Davis could create. This is heavily influential on anyone from DJ Spooky to Tortoise. As for the album itself, Dave Liebman can't compare to Sonny Fortune as a saxophonist and the sound is a little iffy but hey this is 70's Miles and that said you can't go wrong.
This concert was recorded not too long after Pete Cosey joined the band and the material took a distinctly funk direction rather than the jazz-rock that proceeded the On the Corner album.The band comes out swinging with Turnaroundphrase, which sounds closer to James Brown than other versions I have heard, though the sound is marred for a few minutes the bass and drums lock in around a swirling pool of funk. The second song I believe, is Tune in 5 with great funk guitar intro and Miles spacey trumpet, moving towards Ife with it's heart beat bass, brilliant guitar soloing, and percussion.
Honestly, I rely heavily on reviews, which is why I must comment on these. They are awesome! I have never bought a pair of boots at this price that are so comfortable. I love them. I typically wear Vasque hiking boots or Montrails, but I did not want to spend over seventy-five dollars on boots. After all, they are just going to get muddy and trashed, right?These fit the bill, and they are plenty good for hiking. I cannot comment on the waterproof capabilities because I do not plan on using them when it is wet. I just don't want to chance ruining these. Although, they are very well made boots and I highly recommend them if you do not want to spend too much money on hiking boots. Save your money and buy these if they are still priced fairly (under sixty-five dollars). Don't go after those one hundred dollar or more pairs of boots. It is simply just wasting your money. These work as well as any hiking boots that I have ever worn for walking.
Jarrow is a solid company that has tested well in independent labs. And it's just B5, so overall I give this 4 stars. However, I took off a star because I bought it for my wife for some acne issues. Has not helped at all. Not to say for others it won't, but for her it did not.
I now have all three grades, and find them indispensable! After I purchased this, I read the home vs professional style, and have to say that I don't have a problem with the home series.
This is another high quality item from microplane. I use this regularly. Its quick and easy to pull out and grate some cheese. I gave this 4 stars instead of 5 only because this does a great job grating hard cheeses like parmesan, but is not a good choice for grating softer cheeses like mozarella. For softer items, I use a small rotary shredder by zyliss.
Vendor provide prompt response ; take care and fix the problem right away. You couldn't ask anything more.
I have been in the martial arts for a long time and I always recommendstudents and parents of students to read this book.It so happens the Master Peter Urban was my SENSEI back in the 60's.There has been a lot of SENSEI'S but nothing like Master Peter Urban.
Two co-workers and I ordered these shirts. We are all extremely satisfied with them. These shirts are an excellent value. We would recommend them highly to all our friends and colleagues.
i wasn't expecting much at first but this is actually top quality in any standards. First i bought one to make sure the size fits and then i bought more, many more.
These are very good shirts, especially when you consider the excellent low cost. I have about 8 of these and have washed and dried 4 of them at least 15 times. Shirt looks EXCELLENT and I am very happy with them.Collars still look flat and smooth.I certainly recommend them.Is it the best shirt I've ever owned.....surely not, but it is a good product in good colors.
First, a horrifying coincidence happened when the UPS man dropped the package containing my Bill Blass Dress Shirt with Fashion Pointed Collar onto my doorstep just as The General, my wife's wiener dog, was exiting through his doggy door . The weight of this seemingly light package crushed The General's aft legs on impact as he went for his morning tinkle. The General gimped back into the house, without tinkling, limping and screeching. Since my wife was gone, and I had recently seen a program on the Discovery Channel about amputation, I decided to take it upon myself to help The General out of his misery. As I was cutting off his hind legs, my wife came home. End of story. Apart from that, it's a lovely shirt, and I'd recommend it to anyone! Good luck.
Ordered this as a gift for a friend and they absolutely love it! Its very durable and just plain fun to serve out of.
This is would have to be without doubt one of the best live concerts on DVD. Buy it, put it on and turn it up full blast. You won't be disappointed, I assure you.
I just watched this DVD for the first time,and what a show! The Scorpions prove again that they are the BEST LIVE BAND EVER! I have been saying that for 30 years now and this DVD proves it again. The band is awesome. And with guests Uli Jon Roth,Micheal Schenker, and Herman Rarebell this is truly a must have for any Scorpions fan.It was shot during the tour for the Unbreakable album,and the track list covers all era's of the band's extensive record catalog.From Speedy's Coming and Pictured Life to Love 'Em or Leave 'Em.This show ROCKS! Crank up the surround sound and enjoy!
Killy only does the inro and trailer section. Jens Husted and Chris Ryman skiing together,as in their Black Diamond video, do the demonstrations. Sybervison presents the skiers perfect turns from all angles, in slow motion and reverse photography so the viewer can see how all body parts work together in linking short and medium radius turns on moderate, steep, mogul and powder conditions. The Killy and Black Diamod tapes are both excellent. The music is great as well. Even though the tape was made 15 years ago the form is timeless. Watch this video several times a week during the ski season to implant the image of perfect turns in your head. Ski and watch again. You will improve. Add to this video Ellen Post Fosters Skiing and the Art of carving which describes the subtle differences with the new shaped Skis and your collection of training videos will be complete.
The name "New Triumvirat" was the result of legal action taken by former members Dick Frangenberg and Hans Bathelt, who left the band after "Old Loves Die Hard". Fritz and Barry Palmer recruited drummer Curt Cress (an amazing musician who played at the German jazz-rock outfit Passport) and bassist Dieter Petereit and recorded another concept album dealing with the Roman empire. "Pompeei" is not as good as "Spartacus", but still deserves careful listening today. Good music, good lyrics and (pardon me, Grand Funk!!), good singin', good playin'.
I liked many things about this book. The author, Jules Verne, is very good at describing and harnessing the imagination of the reader. He made the story very interesting too. It's amazing, to me, how much of this fiction book is quite accurate. I didn't dislike much of the book except many times Verne got so descriptive that he stayed on the same subject for up to 5 pages. Which in turn tired me of the book. Other than that I enjoyed the book immensely. I'd recommend this book to everyone for hope that they will realize when this book was written and take into account how much imagination was put into it. If people only learn one thing from this book, it should be to have an imagination
i just like to say that it is worth 5stars and its worth reading more than once.it 's interesting!!!! kartik mahajan age 12
This book is pretty exciting from start to finish. If you have read other Verne and not this one, then it is highly recommended. The only beef I have is that Verne gets too descriptive with the fish in each sea. It almost becomes redundant and the picture for me always seems to look the same. A lot of action and its a lot of fun trying to figure out the mystery behind Captain Nemo.
After watching the Disney movie 20,000 Leagues, I wanted to read the real story to see what else it had to tell. It was a very good read, long, but good.
It was really good. And I think if u like Jules Verne's stories you should read twenty thousand leagues under the sea
Jules Verne's Twenty Thousand Leagues Under the Sea, is a great book packed with adventure and suspense. In 1866, there is a mission to kill a giant cetacean out at sea. A group of men go out to kill the strange creature, which turns out to be something unexpected. The men are taken prisoners of the strange creature and have to find a way to escape! Jule Verne was a great author born in Naotes, France in 1828. He always was fascinated by science, which inspired him to write about submarines, television, atomic bombs, and automobiles even before they were invented! Twenty Thousand Leagues Under the Sea is fantastic!! Read it!!!!!
This book was an amazing book that I could not put down after I started reading it. If you like adventure and a little bit of fictional history you will love this book. In Twenty Thousand Leagues under the Sea there are lots of great adventure scenes. I also like how Jules Verne describes everything in such detail. I would definitely recommend this book.
The book in e-transfer format for Kindle is very fast and hassle free. The book is in very good condition and the contents are excellent to read. Worth possessing. ---thanks
I want to read it again! This is a awesome book. I like this better than Journey to the Center of the Earth. It's a little long but its worth the time it takes to read it. An exciting journey is waiting for you with in the pages of the wonderful classic book. My fave parts are when they; visit Atlantis, go hunting underwater, and go pearl diving. However, I still want to know more about Captain Nemo. The book didn't answer all my questions about him. God bless ya.
Literary classic that I am glad that I read. I just wish I read it years ago. I will have to go back to my childhood home to see if I can find the book I had when I was a child.
I enjoyed the book thoroughly and never seemed to be amazed by the incredible imagination portrayed by the author and how eerily accurate we now know him to have been
A classic is a classic, but additional features in this edition make it a great choice. Nice illustrations, too!
20,000 LEAGUES UNDER THE SEA is a great book by Jules Verne. It is about a ship that gets attacked by a giant sea monster. Professor Aronnay sets off in his steel plated submarine to find the monster. Captain Nemo is near, and agrees to to go into a new world. He doesn't expect a sea monster, though! Lots of action in this book - blowing things up, great escapes, and. . . you can find out the rest for yourself!
Only four stars because of the amount of skimming I had to do because of the massive quantity of scientific nomenclature for the fish and other creatures encountered. Beyond that, this book is an amazing adventure story with triumphs and dangers that make you feel the atmosphere of almost every scene! It makes the movie seem mundane.
I love Jules Verne's writing. This book is small enough to fit in a purse or glove box so you can take it with you anywhere. If you like steampunk fiction, or old west, read some Jules Verne
I LOVE this book!!!<3I gave this rating because this book is awesome!! Also because I could imagine the book in my head
In this book there are three main characters,Ned Land, Professor Aronnax, and Captain Nemo. The book Twenty thousand Leagues Under the Sea was veryinteresting. It is very suspensful and you are always thinkingthat the characters are going to die. Their are mant differentsurvival scenes. For example one scene captain Nemo sees anindian gets attacked by a shark so he he jumps in the water and tackels the shark. He almost gets killed but Ned Land throws hisharpoon and kills the shark.This book reminds me of the ocean because they are always traveling through the ocean in their submarine. This book is very exciting because they are always going on different adventures. The book makes me think about when I first road on a sailboat. In the beginning of this book they are sailing on a boat.
We are reading the unabridged version to the kids and this is an indespensible aid for understanding the descriptive story. The pictures are great and very accurate to the descriptions. Historical notes put the story in context of when it was written (i.e. marvels at an electric engine, extant knowledge of sea life, predictions about underwater scuba gear). The kids can follow along in this while I read and the text is very close. I heartily recommend it as a reading aid.
The original story is lush with great vocabulary and detailed description, a little work, but well worth it. I'm reading it aloud to my 10, 9, and 6 year olds. The DK illustrated abridgement is a good supplement too.
It's amazing to consider how prescient this book was, in its descriptions of submarine travel. The extensive descriptions of oceanic life border, at times, on tedious, but must have been novel and more exciting to the original audience. The main shortcoming of the book is that very little explanation is given of Captain Nemo's background or motivation until the last few chapters, and even then only a hint and a shadow of explanation are given.This is apparently not the best English translation, but it was not too difficult.
Twenty thousand leagues under the sea. I found it a fascinating and wonderful piece of science fiction. It was difficult to put down
Sure the language has changed since it was written, and it was translated from French. But the ideas hold up great, the plot is cool, and the characters are entertaining. A great read, entertaining to see what J.V. predicted correctly and what was totally off. The introduction was pretty cr*ppy. It tried to make J.V. seem like a futurist without peer. One example - he predicted the escape velocity of a rocket. I believe an Italian dude figured that out in the 1600's.Want to read a good classic? This is it. Need to discover a tried and true sci-fi original? Ditto.
20,000 Leagues Under the Sea is a great classic that everyone should read but give yourself plenty of time! It does take a while to let all the details soak in, details, details, details! There are plenty of them, so if you are a reader who doesn't quite understand every aspect of the book that you are reading pick up 20,000 Leagues Under the Sea and have no fear! Get someone to read it with you so they can share the exciting and wonderful world of the ocean and all its parts in the eyes of Jules Verne. No one should go through life having never reading this wonderful classic by Jules Verne. His descriptive talents are absolutely wonderful and explain every subject in the book. I recommend this book to anyone in need of an adventure for the mind. Enjoy!
This is Jules Verne's most famous novel, and it still holds up pretty well. It has a slower, more deliberate pace than today's readers are probably used to, but it is still a good read. I don't think I need to say much about it, because the story is pretty well known. But I will say that Captain Nemo is a very intiguing character, and people interested in Victorian Era fiction should definitely get this book.
Confusing Title: My husband and I were talking the other night about the Jules Verne novel 20,000 Under the Sea and we both admited to having been confused by the title at one time. 20,000 leagues (60,000 miles or 111,120 kilometers) is 8.5 thousand times deeper than the deepest point on the ocean. 20,000 leagues is the distance the two men traveled on the Nautilus.Obsession Worse than Nemo: I remember in 6th grade a group of boys did a huge series of blue prints for the Nautilus based on the book. I thought it was a waste of time back then and still do but apparently lots of folks don't. The blue prints of the Nautilus feature in Clive Cussler's book Valhalla Rising. And there's an entire website devoted to blue prints and 3D models.Closing thoughts: I much prefer the sequel to 20,000 Leagues Under the Sea. If you get a chance, read The Mysterious Island.
Jules Verne is one of the most captivating and poetic writers ever in existence. All of his novels are complete masterpieces, but this novel is the best one I have ever read. Its intricate plot line and complicated writing style make the novel seem both romantic and adventerous. Although for some the writing style may be too round-a-bout, I find it completely matches the story-line. The unusual adventure needs a writing syle to complement its exciting subtleness, and Jules Verne does just that. Read this from cover to cover and don't skip a word, because each and every one is of significance.
Excellent book for young adults and grownups alike. It is difficult to imagine that this book was first published in 1870.I still have my original copy; the annotated Walter James Miller edition(1976) by Thomas Y. Crowell Company.Was Verne the first true science fiction writer in the world? I'm not sure, but Nemo is a complicated figure. Anti-colonialist, scientific & engineering genius, expatriate, madman? Professor Pierre Aronnax, Conseil, and Ned Land provide the foils for Nemo's adventures. Highly recommended!
Sheer adventure narrative for the aquatic zoology and oceanography nerd. Captain Nemo the prototype for the mad at mankind genius villain; bad yet sympathy-deserving.Actually challenging reading: many 50 science terms.
This book is a good book. I like this book beacause Buster won the Brain.IT is a cool book to read.IT is a funny book. THE END.
I don't understand why some people expect Brian Mcknight's new music to sound just like his old music. If I wanted to hear his old cds then I would pull them out of my cd case. Every time an artist puts out a cd, in some way it reflects HIS experiences in life. Not his fans. We should be thankful that a such a talented musican, singer-songwriter gives us the privilege of sharing it with him. I'm just happy to have another Brian Mcknight cd to add to my collection.
I bought this while in the throes of tech-horror. I was trying to get a wireless network going with my mac and stereo and spent days fooling with settings and rebooting my old Actiontec wireless modem each time. Yuk! A mac tech suggested a new modem. It didn't help with the network--noone could figure out why, but I never could set one up. However, I'm very happy with the modem. It's strong, it restarts and connects flawlessly, and I've had absolutely no trouble with it. As far as I'm concerned, the best electronic equipment is the stuff that I can just forget about. The zoom is just that.
If you're interested in hearing first-hand from the cast & producers of SNL, this is the book for you. Definitely long as it deals with everything from the beginning to early 2000's. I found it distracting at times the organization of interview snippets in certain chapters, but definitely worth a read if you're a fan of SNL.
there was a time when SNL was on the Cutting edge of TV.but those days have long past&too be honest the plug on the Show should have been pulled at least 11-12 years back.but in it's early days it set the standards for shows like In Living Color"&what you see with "Madd TV" among other shows.I always wondered why the Show had so few African-American Cast Members over the years?Eddie Murphy is Missing something badly in here for me.of course you would want too hear Eddie Murphy reflect on the show.interesting stories on John Belushi.He was something else.this book deals with alot of various topics.
I'm a big fan of SNL, so I was quite excited to get into this book. It did not let me down. The reading is very easy, and the format facilitates the transmission of information one wouldn't normally know: the writers, actors, producers, etc. do most of the talking here in short interview snippets, filled in occasionally by explanations of context from the authors of the book. It's a great situation, which allows for memorable moments like Will Ferrell saying Chevy Chase was the worst host he ever worked with. It's fascinating stuff, and I'd recommend it to any SNL fan.
This book is a must read for anyone who grew up watching Saturday Night Live, even in the bad years. I really enjoyed reading this book because it gave first hand accounts of events,from several different points of view. The thing that struck me most about reading this was how much talent Lorne Michaels had and misused through the years. He is nothing, if not short sighted!I also love how cast members and writers all just aired their dirty laundry. All of the feuds and petty arguments came through! What can I say, I'm sycophantic for the original cast, and several of the later casts. If you are a fan of SNL, any cast, this book is for you!
...It's a fun book, full of fascinating stories, and if you like SNL, the odds are overwhelming you'll like Live from NY too. Thanks!
This book may look big in size but it is a quick read. It is mostly old cast members, writers, and hosts talking about the show. It is the most honest look at the show that I have ever seen. It is sweet, touching, funny, and raw. I couldn't put down. I was fascinated by people who actually knew John Belushi talking about his last days. Also Adam Sandler's dismissile from SNL. No matter what cast is your favorite this behind the scenes book will give you a new perspective of the show.
This book, comprised mostly of interviews with people that have worked on the Saturday Night Live over the years, really works thanks to the editing. As one person tells an anecdote, Miller & Shales follow it up with someone else telling a contradicting story, or with more details from another source.The story spans 28 years of the show's history, and does so in great detail. However, Doug Hill and Jeff Weingrad's "Saturday Night: A Backstage History of Saturday Night Live" does a better job of chronicling the earliest days of the show.
A legitimate page turner. As a fan of SNL I enjoyed each moment. I particularly enjoyed discovering that some whom I thought to be jerks turned out to be very likeable...of course the opposite also applies. To those who say SNL is "not as good as it used to be" I say it is so much better than it used to be. Don't get me wrong, I loved the originals and the Crystal, Guest, Short and Shearer years were fabulous, but Farley and Murphy and Gross and MacDonald and Sanz and Meadows and Ferrell and Morgan and Kataan and Fey and Fallon and Dratch are also great. It has big problems of course, too many hosts whose movie is opening that week, and characters repeated too often, but on the whole, it's always exciting and funny. I only wish that 'Live From New York' included more cast members.
I really enjoyed reading this book and felt like I got an insiders look into SNL. The book allowed everyone to say their peace and give their side of the story. It was interesting to see all of the dynamics from the executives, to Loren, to the writers and the actors. I felt like i could really form my own opinion based on the testimonies of the people involved. It was an easy to read format with little blurbs from each person involved in a particular topic/cast/year. The writers would all a paragraph here and there to help transition between topics.
If you're a hardcore SNL fan who is interested in learning the history of the show, this book is for you. If you want to read about what happened the behind-the-scenes--the sex, drugs, and so on--this book is for you. I liked the way the people involved told the bulk of the story. I loved the first 25-30% of the book but then it felt like I was reading the same story from one season to the next: this guy did these drugs, this woman was sleeping with this guy, this one wasn't too popular with other cast members ... and then that season ended and another began. I couldn't finish it.
I loved the book. Living in the mid west, you're not privy to rumors and stories in the local paper about SNL. I loved reading inside stories and such. The only bad thing I could say was that the book should have put some thumbnail pictures up of those quoted. It was hard with the lesser known cast members that were quoted, and trying to remember who they were.
This is an amazing, in-depth book which everyone should read! C. H. Mackintosh has the Spirit-filled ability to travel wonderfully deep into the Word of God. I recommend this book to anyone who appreciates a closer walk with God!
I am a HUGE fan of CS Lewis Narnia Chronicles. I read them as a child and reread them routinely. This second production (Prince Caspian) took some liberties I didn't really care for, but in a general way it was good. IF you have kids, FIRST try to get them to read the books. I can't imagine seeing these movies without having read them. CS Lewis is also the author of many GREAT Christian books.'Screwtape Letters' is another GREAT book by Mr. Lewis and has a lot of humor, along with very clear issues with the "other side" for us older children.
I really enjoyed this movie. The sound effects are great. It's way more intense than the first one. I haven't read any of the books but, I would really like for there to be another movie. I believe the it has a really sad ending. All in all, it's a good flick. Watch it today if you like fantasy.
It is a good movie overall, but way too predictable and after seeing the first movie, it was a step down. I would recomend the movie. It was worth the money.
My child loved this-me, not so much. Very elaborate and well-made movies but when it's over, I came away with little in terms of lasting impressions.
Ok , this is a wonderful movie... The two chronicles movies are my absolute favorite movies... I saw it in the theatre on opening weakend. I am a huge fan. This 3 disc collectors edition was money WELL SPENT. It has hours of behind the scenes, which is what i like.. .. the only problem was, The dvd came, in a non-padded envelope, and the the whole dvd case was cracked and broken. I am surprised the discs were not harmed... Oh well. It was worth the money.. I just wish that it had been better and more properly shipped
This was good to watch as a marathon with the whole family. One of the disc, maybe #2, didn't seem to work at first. But we tried it again and let it stay in the player for over a minute and then it started working. (A minute is a long time in this day and age of instant gratification.)
I got this series for my Daughter, she loves the entire series.. I find this quite entertaining we have watched this second movie twice since it arrived
I thorougly enjoyed watching the Chronicles of Narnia movies. They are greatly entertaining and the 3D amazing. Recommended for the whole family.
The movie was very good. It was close to the book. I think the first movie was better.
With More Action and Violence in The Chronicles of Narnia: Prince Caspian I would say this is one of the best Narnia Movies I have seen. I do wish it had more of adventure like the first movie.About 85% of the movie was one big battle. It doesn't beat The "Lord of The Rings" Trilogy in action, but it does have more creatures. As a movie critic for Prince Caspian, I give this 4 out of a possible 5 stars.
As the previous film of "The Chronicles of Narnia" septalogy, "Prince Caspian" honours the original fantasy novel by Professor C. S. Lewis (1898-1963) with its high standard of acting, cinematography, special effects, and, of course, a good screen play. As the previous one did, this film grows on the viewer, and, when seen for the first time, although impressive and endearing, it is perhaps not as deeply successful as when seen repeatedly, allowing the viewer to better capture many beautiful details missed before.
Classic 3-disk Chronicles of Narnia - Prince Caspian:I can only comment that the disk came 2-3 days after my order, so it was really delivered fast.Due to the combination of many situations over the past month we have been unable to watch the film, outtakes, etc. I'm sure the quality will be excellent, and I look forward to a breathing spell to watch it all.
Full of action, cool war scenes, and engaging characters, "Prince Caspian" is by far the BEST NARNIA MOVIE YET!!! (and yes, I have seen all three several times!)There is one scene with two 'things' named Thirst and Hunger that is pretty... well, scary for younger kids.Other than that, this is a great family film!
When it came out on the "big screen" the film was not nearly as well receieved as The Lion, The Witch, and The Wardrobe was. I admit that when I first saw it, I thought it was not quite as complex as the first one. However, after watching it again (I bought this and The L,W&W so my children could see them before watching Dawn Treader at the theater) my opinion has changed. I greatly enjoyed this film, even with the differences from the book. (The differences from the books in each of the movies, including Dawn Treader, might disappoint faithful fans of C.S. Lewis, and I understand. Yet, in some ways, the differences provide for broadened ideas of how the same or similar truths can be told.)
This is a great movie. It is very entertaining. I will look forward to seeing the other movies in this series!
While I realise this was not pure C. S. Lewis, I think this film was true to the spirit (especially the Christian spirit) of his books. In fact I have found the two movies in this series to be charming and well-made. Aside from this, I find them to be in some ways more vibrant and compelling than Lewis' often wooden tales. I hope many will see this movie--consider it a vote for good family entertainment. For, in these movies we seldom experience anything approaching the self-indulgence and brattiness found in the Harry Potter films, or the frantic pacing, slang dialogue, raunch and general noise of the Disney/Pixar movies. As for the story, it is a simple good-vs-bad tale. There is no lengthy quest involved--the kings and queens merely need to rally the Narnians to repell an occupying army--but the characters keep us engaged and they are convincingly played by the actors.
I saw "Prince Caspian" immediately after watching "The Lion, The Witch, and the Wardrobe" on TV. I was blown away by LWW, and I knew I had to watch Prince Caspian.Get this, I wasn't a fan of Narnia (or didn't even knew about Narnia, for that matter).So I decided to watch trailers for Prince Caspian, and it looked AMAZING!I watched it in theater, and I was just blown away. So, I saw it three more time in theaters.ANYONE will like this movie... It's just beyond amazing.I own the DVD now, and I surely will be watching this just about every weekend!Buy it...
I ordered this movie for the whole family. We all enjoyed the first one.Quick delivery as usual, no problems, 5 stars again.
This was a good movie I liked it, but since this is the last movie that all four of the Pevensies are in Narnia together I really have no desire to watch the last film.The battle scene was awesome but not as good and the first film battle. But this wasn't a bad movie, I might buy it on DVD.
A bit off from the book in terms of accuracy, but still a great story line and movie. I'm glad to own it.
My 7-yr-old daughter and I had loved the Lion, the Witch, and the Wardrobe, and we were looking forward to watching Prince of Narnia. This movie does not disappoint! We loved the story; it even has a romantic element in it, which surpised me, but it's all innocent. Lot more fighting scenes than the first movie, but my daughter didn't mind at all. We were disappointed, however, due to the fact that this DVD didn't have any fun special features, such as bloopers, like the LWW DVD had.
This is a great and fun family movies. The video is excellent. The audio, 7.1 DTS master audio was some what disappointing. The audio was average and by far, does not make the top 25 list for best sound (audio track) on blu ray.
I really like it. Of course I am a sucker for these fantasy movies. I even liked Golden Compass. This one was better quality than the first. But just didn't move me as much. I have only seen it once in theater and once on disc. Maybe as I view it more, it will get me.
This is a good movie but I think the first one is way better. So bad Disney don't want to make another one
Good movie, but my kids were sad that at the end of the movie, the 2 older children aren't allowed to return to Narnia in the next installment. "Their work is done" is the reason given by Aslan. But still a good movie.
The first in this series was so excellent because relationships were primary and special effects and fighting was secondary. Unfortunately, this order got reversed in the sequel, "Prince Caspian". The special effects are astounding, and the fight scenes are ad nauseum; I just wish the relationships would have been more developed. I love Aslan, and we only get a glimpse of him here as opposed to The Lion, the Witch, and the Wardrobe. #3???? Let's hope for the best!
Now I have the complete set. I've enjoyed these dvd's since they first came out. I watch them quite often.
We liked the movie.2.5 hoursOverall good entertainment and linkage to first movie was good.Movie scheme is darker, not as close to the book as we'd like but action in HD was good. Depth and color stood out, but when much is night based it takes away a bit. Blu-Ray is suppose to be able to enhance even the night time movie filming, but this one didn't seem too. Two different HD TVs.Definitely teenager and up movie. Not one for the younger kids.Recommend:
As always, Disney has produced another first-rate production of the Chronicles of Narnia. The acting, wardrobe, scenerey and graphics are flawless and leave you with a deep desire for more. I can only say that for the extra $2.00 or less, the Disney production is light-years superior to the mediocre, cheap crud that the BBC produced.
Not like the first but it is a very dark story in the beginning. Good special effects. Narnia is taken down a different path in this story line.
Great little knot guide! Good illustrations and directions are included. Nice small pocket size or put it in your workshop...
Hard to add anything to the discussion, as it has all been said. This was a good purchase. I will make one comment I didn't see elswhere: the brass rivet that holds the cards together has a big enough opening to thread a piece of 550 through as a lanyard or threaded onto the hank of rope in a pack.
I purchased this item in the hopes of helping myself and my son to be better knot tiers. These little cards do a great job at educating in the art of the knot. The cards are thick plastic and should last a lifetime. If you are looking for a minimal tool to help boost your knot tying skills, a product which is long lasting, and for relatively cheap? Check this one out.
I ordered this mainly to learn some Knots. This is nice to throw in the backpack and take out for a camping trip. Use the examples to try out some knots.Good product. Very useful.
My nephew wanted these for his survival kit. The cards are straightforward for him, and he's practiced them on his own. He takes them with him on his camping trips now, and likes to use these practical and functional knots. He's very happy with the cards. They're light, small, and waterproof.
It is light weight and small so you can bring it on any adventure. Its easy to use and fun. I think most people would be very happy with this purchase.
Ok - this is a durable, compact, and clear guide for tying knots. I keep it in my truck so that I can always reference the right way to lash something down. The cards are made out of plastic so they aren't going anywhere and the ink seems to stay on the cards well so far.
The booklet is perfect for attaching to a backpack. The illustration is simple & also tells you which knots are best to use in a situation requiring tying knots. A must for anyone camping outdoors in a tent or mountain climbing.
Now I can tie a slip knot. A small, yet simple card with more of the most used knots you should probably know how to tie.
I have 4 boys and don't know if our busy schedules will allow for boyscouts. This is one item that will help alleviate that. Road trips, rainy days or even before bed we get our rope and try out these awesome knots. These are hard plastic cards riveted together so you don't have to worry about losing or damaging them with a little moisture.
Although Celine Dion nearly does with a couple of her numbers there is no female singer who can "cry" a tune like Connie Francis ! Her voice never ever fails to brings home to us as listeners' a true love, lost, unrequited or just never ever found. One indeed wonders to what heights this amazing performer could have taken her career if her vicious rape in a hotel room never happened. To the diva of my youth and the diva of my life time, long may your voice be heard on radios' gaga-gaga . . .
A good listen. Connie Francis was a favorite of my mother while I was growing up. Many of the songs on this CD are familiar favorites. Connie's voice with clarity and emotion brings heartache and hope alive for the listener.
With great examples from the world of business and deep metaphysical truth, The Smart Spot builds a bridge from commerce to spirit that's 'Spot On'.Patricia Aburdene, coauthor, "Megatrends" series
First book I've read that makes sense / is understandable to normal people. Unlike the usual stupifying fare, felt I could use some of this in the real world. Diagrams were helpful. Definitely a different take on intuition....
This book perks up considerably after the "first" installment of Midshipman Hornblower. Told from an outside perspective (which works admirably, thanks to a likable and relatable narrator), it zips along with high stakes, good action, and some worthwhile character development. Looking forward to the next in the series.
C.S. Forester created a superb naval drama that gave me an inside look at the life of a sailor serving in the Royal Navy on the wooden war ship Renown. With Hornblower, and his companion Bush dealing with their befuddled Captain and fighting off the attacks by the Spanish this book kept me reading page after page. I believe this is one of the best books in the Hornblower series and I would encourage anyone with an eye for historical novels to check this series out.
I think that it is a pretty nice shirt for 10 bucks. Something comparative at K&G would run between $15 and $20. It has a $45 tag on it, and I'm not sure about that - but for a good daily dress shirt I'll but 5 more of them.
Having read a number of Custer books, and visited the sight twice anything on the bookshelf about this subject is an immediate purchase.The character development in the first half of the book took a while ( thus 4 rather than 5 stars) but once that was over the story was unraveled in very readable, interesting and fascinating style. The explanation of the deployment of the troops before the Last Stand was really well done and as good an explanation and description as I have read on the subject. This will not be the last book on the subject but it will surely rank as one of the best. Thanks for the epilogue. Great to know what happened to the people involved.
This book gives an excellent insight into Booker T's life. The unknowns, the lack of a childhood and the fear that existed then is unimaginable. This book gives inspiration to those who would be thinking of giving up.
I ordered this for my grandson, but this book is filled with history, history of those that have been forgotten, but have contributed so much to this society, which has produced such great black men like Obama. It if wasn't for them, he would've never achieved the accomplishments he has.
Wow! What an amazing story! It is fascinating to read Booker T. Washington's account of a childhood in slavery followed by his rise to national prominence as the founder of the Tuskegee Institute.While some may argue that Washington was naive and overly accomodating, I was amazed at his ability to forgive and see the best in people. He did not nurse grudges or let others bring him down. Whether or not you feel that he should have spoken up more for judicial equality, you have to admit that he was a strong, dedicated man of character.Everyone: white, black, brown, or any other shade, can benefit from reading the autobiography of this great American.
I decided to read this book while on vacation. The story of Booker Talliaferro Washington touched my heart. I am a 64 year old white man born in Booker T Washingtons home state of Virginia. It hurt me to think of that great man being a slave. A genius of his calibre cannot be held down. It is my wish that all people could read his story. I was humbled when I read this book. I wish that his legacy had endured more among the black population of this country. His message of hope through education and love of labor for its own rewards is a profound statement of love and commitment to his race. He is in my mind one of the greatest men who ever lived. God bless the man and his memory. Please read this book.
This book taught: That African people should be educating themselves, African people should have their own industry, African people should be able to depend on themselves, and more.
I think Up from Slavery is a good book, its for all readers who want to learn about black heritage. Booker is a young man eager to learn and have a education. Washington was born in Virgina at a slave hut. Washington attended the school Hampton. In order for him to get in this fine school, he had to sweep and clean the speaking room, one day the superintendent came by with a white glove and ran her finger across every piece of furniture, no dust. The superintendent was so impressed she enrolled him at Hampton, this just lets you know how much he wanted to learn.
I knew next to nothing about Booker T. Washington prior to reading this book. Now I feel honored to have had his story shared with me. Despite the risk of sounding cliche, he has become an inspiration and hero to me. If not for his convictions and spirit, he would have been quite ordinary. Instead, he accomplished incredible goals, overcoming unimaginable feats, and has reached an inumerable amount of people, generation after generation. This book is a mainstay on my bedside table. Required reading for all.
I greatly enjoyed this book! I admire Booker T. Washington for his endless pursuit of education. This book is a great inspiration to any student. The only thing that I was disappointed with was the fact that Mr. Washington did not get into his personal or family life. I agree that school can change a person, And I believe that education can greatly shape who a person is, but I don't belive that education is the only thing that molds us. I would have loved to find out as much about Mr. Washington's private life as I learned about his schooling, and his work for schools. Despite all this, I think this book is wonderful. If you know a high school student, or college student, give this book to them as a gift. It is a good read.
In the past, I have tried and tried to keep and journal and just didn't keep it. I would write in it for a few days and then forget to write in it. When my 13th birthday rolled around, my mom got me "Dreams- A Notebook Journal" and told me to try to keep it. Since my birthday, I have written in it everyday. I love the journal's design and how the pages look inside. I would recommend this to any young girl looking for a good journal to write their personal thoughts and dreams in.
This is the sound of London's Sonic Mook Experiment club trying to outscuzz New York and LA and it works exceedingly well. Guitar feedback and perversity but never at the expense of danceability. Imagine Death in Vegas but less dirge-y and with a bit more squelchy electro fun at various tempos. It is unmixed.
Both my wife and I read this book in almost one sitting; it was very compelling. Her descriptions of the cold, the storm, and her relationships with the other climbers were right-on. This is the world of climbing as it exists today, and it gives excellent insite into the high-mountain disasters of recent history. I've climbed over 100 mountains higher than 11,000 feet--several of which were winter ascents and required technical ability. I'm not a professional mountain climber and I've never hired a guide. But I probably will hire a guide some day. To put this book down because the author isn't a full-time mountain climber is weak. I have a professional life outside of mountain climbing. That's the reality of modern climbing--is my experiance somehow less authentic because of that? This author was there, her writing is compelling, I enjoyed it immensely!
This is a nice and interesting book. It combine Chinese wisdom with investment strategy. It is very helpful when you make investement decision.
In recent years I have been learning a lot about value investing as opposed to stock speculating. One of the books I've found most helpful in this process is this book from Curtis Montgomery. His application of the time tested ideas of Sun Tzu to the sometimes crazy world of investing is at times quite sublime. Filled with many examples from the real world of investing, this book is a great introduction to value investing.
It's amazing how the reasoning and the tactics of an ancient Chinese warrior apply to the modern day stock investor. The battlefields are different but the strategies sre the same. The author makes these comparisons in an easy-to-read style. No wonder he's known throughout Asia as the "Singapore Sage". It is a fine piece of work.
Marion Roach, NPR correspondent, is a redhead, and aims to get to the bottom of redhead mythology in our culture. She discusses the oldest famous redheads, like Lilith (Adam's pre-Eve wife in the bible), Set, and Mary Magdalene. She also gets into the genetics of red hair, and explains why it's rare. She also discusses the historical attributes associated with red hair through time. It was formerly thought that Jews were redheads, and later, that redheads were not to be trusted. More currently, red hair is associated with sexual prowess and a hot temper. This book is a fun and intellectually satisfying read, especially for redheads.
i actually got this book as a replacement for a friend whose book i borrowed and accidentally destroyed the cover, so now i have her old copy. im not a red head, but she recommended the book so i read it. i dont really like the author's tone, though thats more of a personal preference. it is very interesting and easy to read, so it was easy for me to look past the fact that i found the author to be a bit annoying.
I learned a bit about redheads--not as much as I would have liked to, but it was well written
I loved this book when I was in 3rd grade and now I am reading it to my 2nd and K. They love it too! Every night we read 2 chapters so we got through it in less then a week. Now I have little inventors running all around the house. Should pay dividends come science fair time!Charlie
This is the one that started it all for me. The most exciting book about a smart kid you will ever find. It's been overdue ...for a long time.
The description of another Hicks / Alvin book elsewhere mentioned his sister Daphne, known as "the pest", and that triggered childhood memories. I started searching on the author and the character, and I recognized this title.I had this book, and loved it. I got one of the rocket engines described and duplicated his rocket running along a cable device. I believe I played with other ideas mentioned in this book (does this have the bed maker? I think it's this book).I don't think I still have it, so maybe I'll have to get a new copy. At least now I know where to look on my bookshelves! And I'll have to try some of the others. I had several experiences with kid's book series I only saw small parts of as a kid that I've enjoyed later.
The table came about 2 days BEFORE the posted delivery date. That was a plus. It was easy to assemble, did it by myself within 30 minutes. Instructions was clear. The quality was very good not the best but for the price it was worth it. All solid wood construction. The only thing that I saw that could have been better was the sie screws/bolts that held the legs onto the lower frame. The holes were not recessed therefore the tops of the screws were visable and were not quite all the way flush with the frame. Not a big problem and most people would not notice it. Overall a very good product at a very reasonable price.
I was happy to receive more or less what I was looking for -- a cheap, solidly constructed table that looked exactly like the item pictured. Clearly this isn't a top-of-the-line table, but it looks like it does in the pictures and doesn't wobble or feel like it might collapse if you sat something on it. In short, it doesn't much stand out one way or the other (neither an amazing piece of artistic-furniture nor a cheap-looking accent piece), which is exactly why I like it. The table is delivered in a thin, squarish box and requires a little bit of assembly, but it'll take you about 5 minutes to throw together so it's definitely not exactly difficult or intensive to assemble.
As others had said, this table is CHERRY. I bought it because I needed a larger table for my walnut chess board and the woods do not match at all -- though the table matches my cherry bookshelves perfectly (which is what I was hoping for from the other reviews). If you order from Amazon directly the packaging will be second to none and the table will arrive quickly.My only complaint was one little chip on the inside of one leg, but it's well hidden. This is a great product and you should buy without hesitation.
Love the table it is very well made and sturdy. The first shipment had to be sent back because the apron was lined up incorrectly. That was a hassle, as well as it took me over 3 months to receive the table in the first place (they had trouble locating it in the warehouse). But I am very pleased with the actual table! It is far more beautiful than the pictures depict. Beautiful wood and very elegant. Very easy assembly.
before you order, make sure this is the color you want. if you order "golden oak", it is not the real golden oak, or at least this is not what I think is golden oak. the moment i opened the box, I was like, oh.. no! the top is like the veneer (yellowish white). so, i have to return and order the honey oak. in terms of quality, construction and assembly, it is great. putting the top part of the table is kinda tricky, so it took time. i was able to assemble in 10 mins, being a man with handyman inclination. you just need the right hexa-keys. but real solid and no compromise with the quality. this is exactly the quality I was looking for to adore the living room. thanks amazon for the super hassle-free return policy.then I got the honey oak that exactly mathced my other furnitures and even the wood-flooring in my dining area. wow! beautiful looking table with a solid quality. adds great value to our living room!
The product itself is beautiful and sturdy, but due to rather iffy packaging, the finish was chipped off in a NUMBER of places. It makes me worry about how it'll hold up looks wise with three active toddler boys, a dog and a cat. Over all though, it's VERY sturdy and looks great for the price!
Great bicycle sized nalgene. I bought it thinking it was a 32oz. but it turned out it fit perfectly in my bike water bottle holder.
FYI. Note that this description doesn't match the manufacturer's. The Samsung website states that this model has a 10 speaker (2-way) sound system with 15-Watts per channel for a total of 30-Watts. I didn't get clarification with their customer department.
I've used this product for years. I'm fair and with one morning application, I'm able to spend the entire day outdoors in the southern CA sun. Some great things about this product is that it doesn't sting like some other sunscreens, it has a good consistency (not thick or greasy), lasts a really long time, and really works.The only downside is that it makes a fair one like myself look somewhat pasty. It is a white lotion and leaves a bit of a white finish. I really wish Eucerin would market a tinted version.
I enjoyed this book for the most part, having read it several years ago. I was not only disappointed but surprised at the lack of research that resulted in the remark that in the United States, Southerners evidently believed that shooting at a tree with mistletoe would cause the plant to fall to the ground. In the most exact sense that is true: mistletoe grows at the top of tall oak trees, and actually shooting it down is the easiest and safest way to obtain it; not some "whammy" ignorant people use to obtain a desired object. I think a little more work would have resulted in a little less disdain.
My family was looking to develop our own traditions and to understand why traditions where as they are today. This book was a wonderful source.
This beefy book will provide me with a wealth of info each year as I weave a Solstice celebration into my busy holiday schedule. Getting back to my Scandinavian ancestral heritage is important to me as I age, and this book is a thoroughly researched and comprehensive tool for observing this special event.
I bought this book because I wanted to learn more about the traditions of Winter Solstice and how they related to American Christmas. To that end it was great. It had way more than I needed so I did skip sections but for someone wanting more history than I needed, I'm sure they'd find it fascinating.
But when all things are considered the book is not really that bad, in fact certain quotes are very uplifting. I would rather read this then one of the 5 thousand Chicken Soup for the Souls any day of the week.
A great read with some helpful tips for neophytes. This book offers some ideas that would be beneficial to someone just starting or about to start a radio career. If you have a few years experience, this book will tell you little information that you haven't read in industry magazines. For those obsessed with radio it is still worth buying because it chronicles an amazing career.
Album editing is a terrible terrible thing. Sometimes it can lead to an amazing song sounding horrible (i.e. Capleton Pure Sodom version on More Fire) and on Thug Nature it reigns supreme. Songs like the opener Coochie Daddy and Buck a Catty are nearly destroyed by the record company's torrid display of editing. However, if you set the editing aside, which is terribly difficult to do, you end up with a pretty good record from the now veteran Spragga. Apparently Spragga set out to make a straight head knocking dancehall album, and he succeeded in doing just that. Check out "Analogy" on the Superstar, also used by the following track "Bait", "Stunna" and "Di Rooster". My personal favorite is "Playa" with one of the wickedest rhythms I've heard in a long time. Overall, if you can get past the editing its a very good album, definitely worth buying if you're a Benz fan, or maybe if you're a hip-hop fan that is starting to listen to dancehall.
The other reviews helped me decide to purchase this item. I was not disappointed. I am pleased with the quality, and particularly like the large bale on the back that enables you to use a thicker chain.
Fun series. I used to watch it growing up and I found it incredible that I was able to find the whole series on DVD! Thank you Amazon.com
The Dolph Ziggler-Kofi Kingston-IC title match while not a good bout, it was still better then their bout at SummerSlam a month back. The Bout between The Big Show & CM Punk was one-sided but sweet. The United States title match between Daniel Bryan & The Miz was a entertaining,back-and-forth,high-tech match of the night. The Melina-Michelle McCool-Title Unification-LumberJill match was not great but pretty good. The No Holds Barred match for the World's title was a smash-mouth,hard-hitting brawl. The Tag Team Turmoil match for the Tag Team titles was a lousy,clustered filler. The 6 Pack Elimination match for the WWE title was a entertaining,hard-hitting,smash-mouth,double-teaming,brawling bout. I give this PPV a 7 out of 10.
The installation of drivers for this card was easy, and I now have easy access to firewire and USB 2.0 on my notebook. There is an optional AC adapter available for this product, but for use on my desk, I just use a firewire/USB hub combo that is powered. I have nine hardware devices daisy-chained from this card to powered hubs with no problems at all. It is recommended to only use one USB port at a time unpowered, such as on the road. I don't expect to need more than that if I'm mobile.
Not bad for a down alternative - color matches the color scheme in bedroom - nice olve color - nice sheen to it - looks expensive.
I've been an Eliza fan since I first heard her sing "Hard Times in Babylon" and I thought I had every album she'd done. "Retrospecto" is an excellent collection of hard to find songs. What drew me to the CD was "Wild Horse" which also appears on a Putumayo CD "Women's Work." When I realized there were 19 other songs here, I grabbed the collection. I'm quite pleased.Favorites include:Wild Horse--luminous, you can almost see the wild horse of the singer's dreamsBuffalo Gals--great fun cowgirl songHer Melancholy Muse--beautiful pianoThis is maybe not the best introduction to Eliza. I'd think about "Hard Times in Babylon," "Beautiful World" or perhaps "Land of Milk and Honey", but this is still a great CD if you know her work and love her voice.Rebecca Kyle, July 2009
I ordered this watch back in 2006. I wore it every day for the last 6 years and it had many hours in the pool/water and close to 100 dives on it, with one dive as deep as 137 feet back in 2008. Awesome watch. However, the last time I took it in to have the battery changed, the jeweler (I guess) didn't put it back together correctly and it flooded 2 weeks ago. So, it is no longer working. Although I did love this watch and it's smaller size (I'm not a large male with big wrists) I am going to purchase an automatic watch this time so I don't have rely on jewelers to change out the battery.
I have always one issue or another with my glasses and tiny screws. This thing is awsome. Got essentially all the precision drivers that you might need, unless you have a fairly exotic frame (I got some form Germany, Japan, USA and Denmark, it works on all).
I bought two of these as gifts to musically talented children in the Ukraine and Belarus, because I wanted to deliver a self teaching piano. This is a wonderful keyboard, capable of teaching a very wide variety of songs to a beginning student.
I love this movie and could watch it many times. It includes the best part of an earlier Harold Lloyd movie, the football scene from The Freshman. There is also a wonderful scene where he hangs from a lion off the side of a building.The only thing wrong with this DVD is that the transfer is not the best. The video and sound quality could be better, but is not horrible like the Milky Way DVD from the same company.
Can Mr. Nevins do no wrong? His remixes for Elvis, The Blackout All-Stars, Kelly Clarkson, and Madonna have been wonderful, and he continues this tradition with Anastacia.1. Left Outside Alone (Radio Edit) (10/10, 3:59): Great.2. Get Ready (Album Version) (9.9/10, 3:33): Eh. An entertaining, but forgettable, track. She cusses a lot too.3. Left Outside Alone (J. Nevins Global Edit) (11/10, 3:49): Awesome rock-flavored mix.4. Left Outside Alone (J. Nevins Global Club Mix) (11/10, 8:10): Takes awhile to get started, but still AWESOME!!!5. Left Outside Alone (Jason Nevins Mixshow) (2000/10, 5:31): The absolute BEST remix he's ever done. More of a tribal feel than the others.Buy this if you love remixes or are an Anastacia fan. You won't be disappointed.
Ann odd assortment of songs and impressions. There is one stand out, the utterely incredibly edifying and majikal Necromancing the Cunning linguist by Gene Loves Jezebel (Who are a Triple X records band I beleieve?). It's truly bewitching and I for one am intrigued. There's something ELSE going on here and I want to learn more. The rest of the CD is insignifigant in this company but not without charm.
Adzuki ( or Azuki) beans are ment to be used in asian sweets. You can make sweet bean paste by boiling the beans for 30-40 min, (changing the water out at least twice) draining and mashing the beans with sugar.(strain the paste if you do not like the bean skins) What you get is a paste that can be put on ice cream, fill pasteries or stuff into Mochi Cakes.
Years ago I heard from someone taking a statistics class that this book was required but strangely entertaining and reasonably priced for a book on statistics.I needed to understand some statistics that have been thrown my way so I got the book. It explains statistics in clear, easy-to-understand language and has very entertaining cartoons to show examples.One example: It shows a mythical company and lists the salaries of every employee. Then it asks: "Are you an employee who wants to argue pay is too low or the boss, who wants to argue pay is too high?" It then shows that whethere you use an oveall average, an average between the highest and lowest pay, or a median pay will make the pay appear different--one method makes it look high, one makes it look low. Very, very interesting.Also entertaining, but probably not meant to be is the fact that having been written in the 1950's, the pay scale examples are very low. ($2,000 a YEAR?) Just add a zero to everything.
I graduated college in 1961 with an engineering degree from a highly rated school. A required non-engineering course was economics. I remember very little from that class except for a little red book authored by someone named Huff and that that book was one of the most enjoyable and educational books from my whole college career. [After an exhaustivesearch for the book, I found it and] I grabbed it! This book has saved me untold dollars by teaching me to look at most statistics with a very jaundiced eye and to laugh at most commercials. I just put my copy in with the materials I use to teach a class at a local community college since I expect that we [will be able to use the book to discussvarious issues related to current day politics.] I am also ordering several copies for gifts including one for my college freshman grandaughter. So what if the author states that a Yale graduate is doing well at an annual salary of $24,000. Everything else is current.
"How to Lie with Statistics" should be required reading before allowing anyone in today's world to call themselves an adult. And, yes, there should be strict testing for understanding this book before anyone is allowed to leave public (or private) schools and take part in real life.This book shows some of the ways media such as newspapers, TV, internet, etc. decieve you. Besides the media (especially advertisers); politicians, lawyers, and all sorts of other folks behave like confidence men and try to get your money, your trust, your vote, and your beliefs.IMMUNIZE YOURSELF! Read this book. Buy this book. Study this book. Memorize this book!This book will help you avoid the crooked people.
This is a classic introduction to the language of statistics and how a few well placed numbers/graphs/terms can distort reality. I use this as a supplementary reading for my undergrad students and they love it. It helps to clarify why language, numbers, and representations are so dangerous.
I currently teach statistics in Cincinnati, Ohio. The book How to lie with statistics held my attention from beginning to end. It not only informs the reader of common pitfalls in statistical studies, but it does so in a highly entertaining fashion. I believe that my students will enjoy the book, and I hope that they will start to enjoy statistics as well. The book was written some time ago and the figures are very outdated. I believe my students will find that amusing and will be even more interested in the reading.
The author in this book discuss little stories about ancient statistics that may or maynot be true. It's an interesting book with many photos to illustrate the sense of statistics and it's easy to read you can finish it in a day or too depending on your time. Very thin book with only 128 pages, I was able to fit it right into my pocket book with no problems. It's a very good book belive it or not I had to do a paper on it which was easy because the book give me plenty of ideas and examples to use which help me complete my project.
How to lie with Statistics covers all the uses of statistics through a hit list of it's abuses. By covering how to lie with statistics the author teaches both awareness of misleading statistics and also the basics of this branch of mathematics. It is amazing how subtle a misleading statistic can be. For example there are many types of averages, the mean median and mode. In some cases they produce different results so a statistics compiler can choose the one favorable to him or her. I hoped to get a birds eye view of statistics from this book so as to improve my awareness of the constant abuse of statistics that occurs in the media. I believe I got that and more out of this book.
I have just finish reading this book and, in my opinion, I thought that it is a very simple and funny whey to learn statistic.However, for people who intend to purchase something with more details about tests and analyses, I don't recommend this book.
It was great! I know the author's daughter, and she really wanted a copy of her father's book. So it was nice to get a great copy of the book.
Well written, if maintaining a 1950s style. I personally didn't learn much from this as a math-geek, but it was fun to read. I'll eventually have my teen read it.
The book is written in a highly readable format, with a wry sense of humor in the narrative. At the same time book clearly feels quite dated when talking about 20's and 30's. I do think the reporting is not as bad anymore as it is described about the newspaper of early to mid 20th century.At the same time, you will most likely run into such statistical jiggering in water hole topics and on channels like FOX. This books shows you how to critically all such information and take most of aggregated information and surveys with a grain *or mountain) of salt.
This is a great book. It does however have at least one SERIOUS short coming. The figures are very out of date. It would be nice if the examples were taken from the 90's or at least the 80's. Most of the statistics in this book are from the 40's and 50's. Good general information but could use some additional updating.
As I read and watch the endless political rantings from advocates on all sides in this, the political season, my thoughts turn to this book. This book is a short, insightful read, and the perfect primer to get your mind in the right place to sort through all the mud soon to be slung at us, the voters. I've just pulled it off my top honors bookshelf to read again.
very interesting and good. so many years and still true! looks like statistics never change. should be read by everyone.
This is a great collection of polkas. The arrangements look great. If you're a beginner be warned, it doesn't have any fingering at all.
As a band director, I recently purchased this item for use in my classroom. The stand is consturcted of quality guage steel and is quite sturdy. Being that I often play many different instruments with students, it is nice that it holds multiple instruments.The only negative is that the top peice threads into the tripod for storage. These threads sometimes become loose and you have to periodically tighten the top part. If you use it mostly in a stationary location you might want to put some lock-tight on the threads.Good product, would recommed to students and professionals.
I bought this for my teenage grandson and the reason I chose this magazine is because years ago I had always enjoyed it! Well, it proved that it has staying power through the years. My grandson enjoys it also an looks forward to each and every issue.
Easy gift to give and long lasting read! My son-in-law really likes this one so much that we got it for him again.
One of the greatest Ellington's solloists can hardly be adequatly presented on a single cd, and that's the main reason why I give only four stars to this collection of romantic but swinging music.Could the choice of the great alto-sax player's tracks have been better?Probably, but there are more than enough top class performances on this CD, so anyone interested in learning what Johnny Hodges was all about - in Ellington's band and in smaller groups - is well advised to purchase this edition.
HOW AWESOME - I CERTAINLY HOPE THEY DO MORE, I SAW THEY AT A CONCERT AND WAS TOTALLY BLOWN AWAY AND WAS SO HAPPY TO FIND THIS CD TO LISTEN TO AND SHARE WITH MY FIREND, I BOUGHT THREE OF THEM!
buy this kind of movies all the time good and funny you'll enjoy it.i collect old time movies, this is one you will watch over and over again.
I first read this book over 20 years ago, while a high school student in Connecticut (Mr. Tryon's birthplace). I never saw the movie because I was afraid "Hollywood" would ruin a perfect story. I have never read a novel since that is as suspenseful or frightening. Please bring this masterpiece back so other generations may enjoy(?) it.
Tryon does everything exactly right in this novel, a classic psychological horror story. I envy anyone encountering it for the first time.
My dad introduced me to the work of Thomas Tryon. A few months ago he found a handful of books up in the garage that he'd read when he was in high school, and some of Tryon's novels were among them. I cooked through Harvest Home and was very impressed with with his masterful descriptions and breathtaking plot twists/revelations. Then I read The Other... I was completely blown away. You can't miss this book. It's a masterpiece. It's not frightening in a slasher, better-look-over-your-shoulder-type way, but the concept will chill you, without a doubt. It's such a good story, and it's executed so well... It's the best book I've read in a very long time. I would recommend it to anyone who is the mood for a good, haunting, thought-provoking piece of literature. My hat is off to Thomas Tryon... I can't wait to get my hands on another one of his works.
cheeks grove is the hook on this cd . chico has that groovy back beat and always a top notch band....worth a listen BIG DADDY
Currently I am enroled in a Children's Literature class reviewing poetry. I selected this poetry collection because I am focusing on Elementary School children and the development of poems in their curriculum. This collection is creative and magnified in language and the illustrations are delightful, delicate paintings done by Pamela Paparone. Each illustration addds wry humor and gives the reader a better understanding of the Two-legged, Four-legged, No-legged Friends that we have.
This is my favorite album this year. Although folks are calling it a "concept" album, I prefer to think of it a a rock opera wedged somewhere between Sgt Peppers and Eldorado. My 16 year old daughter and I are currently fighting about which song is the best, but we love them all.
I first obtained this product in a gourmet chocolate shop in Punta Gorda, Florida. I enjoyed it very much, but after returning home to Maryland I had no idea where I could purchase more. I went to Amazon and there it was. Thank you, Amazon.
This was a different type of book for me from this author. The heroine Emily is a reporter that in her quest to expose a US Senator as being "unstable", suddenly gets stuck with a ghost that follows her home. The story is entertaining, and has very good moments. I was kind of surprised about her relatively easy access to a US Senator- Lee. They develop a relationship that eventually leads into love. An interesting triangle between Emily, Lee and the ghost. I recommend it.
I really enjoyed this book.Thought it was exciting at times and made me sad at times.It was a real page turner.
Once again Nick Kemp mixes music and voice to produce deep states of relaxation, whilst pointing to the deeper truths that are available to all. You may find a mantra here, or simply sounds and word.Either way this CD is highly recommended for anyone who has considered this idea... "when you've seen beyond your SELF, you may find peace of mind is waiting there."
Unit only has less than 50 hrs on the lamp as of November 2006, but has been easy to use and quite reliable. The case shipped with the unit, however, started to come apart about a year ago, and when I called in Nov. of 2006 they said there would only have been a 90 day warranty on the case, so they wanted $35 for a replacement case. I wasn't happy, but what can you do.Biggest problem most users have driving this with a laptop is they get confused by the toggle keystrokes used to power up the outside video port. It can be particularly confusing if your video card has dual monitor capability, in which case the cursor actually moves from one "screen" to another (one being the laptop screen, the other being the outside screen or in this case the projector screen.
This cookbook is filled with easy to make recipes that are light(er) than standard and that also taste good. I say "light(er)" because some recipes like the easy chicken stroganoff use ingredients like light sour cream and pasta. While it isnt the lightest meal, it is lighter than is relatives and still tastes good. All of the recipes list calories, fat, carbs etc..I do not think I have actually made anything from this book that wasn't good and I have cooked at least 30 of the books recipes at least once.I am a pretty lazy cook and selfish with my free time. I do not want to mess with something that has tons of ingredients, long preparation or long cooking times. When I use this book I target recipes that can be made in around an hour or less and that have a simple list of ingredients. There are many to choose from in that category.I have recommended this book to all of my friends and several co-workers.
I got the "Dead-on" hammer, I love it. However, in the website they would give a free Pry bar with it. I didn't get the free pry bar. their website sometimes confused me.
I enjoyed this book. Ruark honestly describes his fear as he faces the dangerous game animals of 1950s east Africa. If you are a hunter you will appreciate this book. If you are not a hunter and don't have a special interest in East Africa then this book will likely hold little appeal for you.
Ruarks style and attention to details make this book leap off the page. Visions of the African landscape appear in your mind. Ruark describes the sights, smells, and the very face of Africa. Also the foreshadowing of his alcoholism is recounted time and again. I can't wait to read it again!
I purchased this any several more for my husband. He loves to read and to be informed on many different things. This coming year the oportunity came up for him to go to Africa to hunt. As he is an avid hunter and hunts all over this continent each year he jumped at the oportunity. Now part of his prep he is reading about the great safaries of the past,Ruark Hemingway Roosevelt Botington etc. We really enjoyed this book as he wrote about all aspects of the trip with very little editing. I t was about bravery in foreign country but also about his humility at the very differnt struggles of the people and thier cultures. I think everyone who reads this will be entertained in thier own way and will take something away from this that they will never forget. Happy reading and remember read some of the books on the back shelves you may just find a treasure.
This is by far and away the BEST book I've ever read about a hunting safari in Africa. Ruark and his writing are in a class by himself. ALL the other books about him like Use Enough Gun were published after his untimely death. NONE of them compare. They are collections of articles and/or very short stories (some fiction) that collectively don't hold a candle to Horn of the Hunter. His writing makes you feel like you are beside him sharing his experiences. You will not regret buying this book. Simply the best!!
I loved his stories of Africa! The book took me back to a better time when being on safari meant you could be killed by very dangerous animals or reptiles but humans were not quite as high up the list in the danger catalogue.
Brother is a good movie. With the classic structure and style from the kitano's movies (it means slow, explosive and very emotional), now adding a different background: LA. (With a sceen from the beach like all his movies!) If you like the classical movies about jakuzas, samurais, and all the ethic from budo, hara kiris... etc. you'll love it. And if you like gangster movies with mexicans "Cholos" "pendejos", B-boys, nigg**S and that stuff, you'll love it too. Is not his best movie but is one of the most i liked.
Kitano's first (and only) feature film foray into English language territory, BROTHER may be Kitano at his simplest, but most certainly at his coolest - since Hana Bi, anyway.Kitano plays a disgraced Yakuza foot soldier whose extreme behaviour sees him exiled in the US, where his younger brother lives. Kitano starts his new life exactly where his old life left of - with extreme violence.This is Kitano at the height of his self-destructive performances. Separated from his "family", adrift in a banal culture, with little understanding of the language, his fast and fiery rise to power is bested only by his rapid decline.One gripe: when are we going to see more features - particularly commentaries - on Kitano DVDs. Even ZATOICHI is barren of such DVD basics.
I'll get around to writing a better review eventually. I liked the movie, and just wanted to point out that Denny revenge scene wasn't too light because he wasn't finished. Because of the ending events happened differently then he thought they were going to.
Takeshi knows his crime drama and this film, while not as thoughtful as Fireworks, is stunning. If you enjoy a different style of pacing and characters with character then his movies are up your alley. Violent and then peaceful, Brother is more a work of art than just a yakuza film.
Hands down the greatest movie of 2001.WOW!what a gangster perfect mafia pic.TAKESHI "BEAT" KITANO IS THE MAN!He directed and stars in this great action mobster YakuZA flick evryone would love.It is well thought out and concept is great.A blen of SCARFACE and RESERVOIR DOGS but very different and unique .After you see this movie you will rush to the video store and buy it i assure you! WOW *****"s.Check out also "FIREWORKS" with Beat Tkeshi also directed and "SONATINE".BROTHER IS UNBELIEVABLE!!!!!!!!BUY OR RENT AT ALL COSTS_---"TWO THUMBS UP, WAY UP!"______EMAIL ME about what you think or info ...ENJOY!!!!!!!!!!
The Denso spark wires were what I expected. I was a little disappointed that they did not have the seperators already attached. But all in all a good buy.
Well you know your really never sure about taking a pill with no actual effect like a pain reliever but all my research on Vitrin points out that its one of the best out there on the market especially if your not getting all your fruits and Veggies!
I ordered this book for an essay writing class, and I was worried it wasn't going to come in time but it did, in fact before I expected it to. The book itself is pretty good, but you have to be prepared for Berger's writing style.
Words of Wisdom. Much of this book is based on scare tactics that are pretty funny actually. I liked the book for its comedy. Worth the money.
How To Answer A MormonIt enables the average Christian to refute Mormon missionaries with ease!.........Sword Of The Lord:Here's practical advice on how to bring a Christian witness to Mormons. Eight false prophecies from Mormon documents are discussed including the location of the "Ten Lost Tribes" and the discovery of people inhabiting the Moon..........Christian Bookseller's Association:This is a book we have needed for a long time. I have been confused with this problem. This book has some good guidelines on dealing with this issue
I liked this book; it had many interesting and complex parts. First, one of my opinions- I think that Harriet talks very rudely to her friends and to others. She really needs to tone down her emotions and act more like the sensible and polite girl that I know she can be.Ok... now for the actual summary part of my review...The book mostly focuses on Beth Ellen, Harriet's "summer" best friend when Sport and Jamie aren't around. Through out the story, Beth Ellen and Harriet make new friends (like Jessie Mae, a poor country girl), and Beth Ellen's long-lost mother comes back from Paris with her new husband, Wallace. By the end of the tale, together, Beth Ellen and Harriet have solved a huge mystery and become closer than they were before. Check out The Long Secret By Louise Fitzhugh to find out the rest of the story!- A Happy Reader
This is truly an excellent book, and a great sequel to "Harriet the Spy." I read this in 2nd grade, almost immediatley after I finished "Harriet the Spy" and loved it. I wish Louise Fitzhugh would have written more. Louise Fitzhugh is a great author, and her books will always be classics in my library.
There's no question that this is a "sequel" to Harriet the Spy, but a fan of the first book shouldn't go in expecting more of the same. The heart of this book is not Harriet but Beth Ellen, and her shyer, more introspective nature give The Long Secret a completely different vibe. The result is a touching, beautifully observed book about one of the most challenging times of life: the point where you're just emerging from childhood and start seeing adults -- and yourself -- more clearly. It's a very funny book and a compelling mystery, but it's not just fun and games. I found the emotional currents of this book quite intense as a child, but I wouldn't trade it for anything.
Condor Joe is the most human and endearing character of the show. He reminds me of Clint Eastwood in "The Good, the Bad, and the Ugly". Just one tough son of a bitch.
In this country where English is a foreign language, it is good to know that some fight to preserve its propriety and eloquence.
If you like quirky and odd stories about strange things in bizarre circumstances with truly unbelieveable endings, then you must purchase this tome immediately.The story is about Riggs Bombay, a boy who isn't afraid of one single thing, and an old man, named Periphery Stowe, who may know the story of the whole entire universe. But no one can ask him because he's fallen fast asleep. And suddenly, the world isn't working the same as it was before.The prose boarders on the poetic. The artwork is beautiful. And the story contains elements of mythology, and psychology as well as Wagner's own, personal cosmology mixed with his quirky sense of humor.If you liked Madeline L'Engle's "A Wrinkle in Time" and "A Wind in the Door" as an adult, or "Sophie's World" by Jostein Gaarder, then I think you'll like this too.
Characters brimming with personality, and locations beyond imagination, it's hard not to get lost in the imagination of Periphery Stowe right along with Riggs.Though at times showing evidence of being a first novel, it hardly detracts from the beatiful prose and obvious skill the author has for writing.spread it around to your neighbors, your kids, your neighbors kids, all will enjoy.I'm just wondering what tricks Wagner has up his sleeve for his next book..
Danny is someone I used to see at Tommy Makems in New York all the time and I always enjoyed his shows. I have a couple of his early albums and used to tell him when I saw him that he needed to record "The Town I Loved So Well" because his live version was the best I had ever heard. When I saw this cd contained that song I ordered it right away. I was not disappointed he did a good job with the song of course it is not the same as in his show but still nice to hear.The rest of the disc is pretty good, not great but solid, he has a great voice and can really play guitar though some of the arrangements were a little over the top.The great thing about Amazon is you can preview the music now before you buy so give this a try it might be just the thing you are looking for.
I got this for my grandson for his birthday, it fit his new bow great, got bow for his birthday also. He was the happiest kid in town
When I purchased this item, I was looking for an item that I could wear everyday, with the idea of purchasing 1 for each day of the week. The sizing is a little tricky, inspite of measuring myself. I ordered 1 size up. I had to have my husband help me put on this garment, which he could hardly do without laughing. Once the garment was on his jaw dropped to see that there was a BIG difference. The compression is awesome! This garment really helped my lower back pain! It lifted my breast, reduced my saddlebags, but most of all flattened my stomach. It was a little difficult to slide my pants on over this garment, because of the outter rubber shell. I was able to wear this garment for almost 10 hours. All in all I like this garment, but it needs to be redesigned with the crouch opening a little further to the back for potty time. This garment is magical and it delivered!
ok so I haven't had the squeem for too long to give a long term review (just received today) but I can say that it is torture just putting it on! It took me a full 30 minutes to fasten all the hook and eye closures and adjust it. With that being said, it looks very promising and am excited to see what it does in 30+ days of full time wear. Very excited. I do like it so far (the few hours I've been wearing it)
This is a compilation of hundreds of photographs taken thatcapture the spirit and liveliness of the Church of Jesus Christof Latter-day Saints. There is an excellent introducation byRoger Rosenblatt and an essay by Gordon B. Hickley, thePresident of the Church. The style and flow of the book isvery much modelled on the "Day in the Life..." series of books.
Washington DC was a thoroughly planned city - it did not evolve haphazardly. Those who have looked at a map of DC spot immediately the symmetry that structures the City. This book is a well-researched argument that behind the city structure lies a Masonically-inspired tribute to Virgo. I enjoyed parts of the book, but found that it presumed familiarity and/or sympathy with astrology and could have used a more thorough editing process (I found the book jumped around a lot and I had trouble following some of the themes. I would recommend this book to those who live and work in Washington DC who always suspected there was something suspicious behind the symmetry, but who also have the ability not to get bogged down too much in astrological arcana.
... The story of Patty Bergen when she's only 12 is a great story and actually quite believable. I really recommend reading it.
This book was a compelling story of a young but lost Jewish girl that didn't know where she belonged. Her parents did not love her, but to keep a good name in town, kept her around. She befriended a natzi prisoner and with the help of her loving cook, Ruth, kept her secret friend hidden from the world that rejected her and found a love that would always be remembered and never replaced. And if your reading this I DEFINITLY recomend this book!!!
I first read this novel after I saw the movie with Kristy MacNichol back in the 1970s. I am now an English teacher and have taught this novel twice to my eighth graders; I will be using it again this year. I'm doing this online review to illustrate to my students how it's done! I think it's a great way to go public in a real-life writing situation.
A Jewish girl and German Soldier?? During the Holocaust that would've never been thought of. Patricia Bergen, who goes by Patty, goes through basically her whole life being criticized by her parents. Either her hair isn't perfect or she doesn't wear the very BEST of clothes, but the one perfect thing about her is her personality. When a German Soldier comes to her father's store, a friendly, yet upmost important relationship comes between them. She does everything in her power to keep them together. I give this story four stars! It puts you in the shoes of Patricia Bergen. But what happens,...is for you to find out.
Patty Bergen, a 12 year old jewish girl, who shelters and feeds Frederick Anton Reiker, a german soldier who escaped a prisoner camp. At the same rediscover what a true friendship means and loses the love of her loved ones. Does Patty risk everything she has for one man? Well we'll say no more.You must read Summer of my German Soldier.
I thought this was an excellent book, very sad. It shows the power of friendship. I'm a christian, I believe that the Germans were very decieved, I think that Patty Bergen had alot of courage to do what she, even though she was just a fictional character. Doesn't Jesus love every body, I still think the Germans were wrong, but they can still be forgiven, thats what this book shows.
I've read meany books. I didn't realy think i had one favorit until "Summer of my German Soldier"It made me laugh. It made me cry. I grew to know the crectors, 5to love or hate them, I aprecate my faimaly and all I have. some of you might be thinking ok this is a love story. It's that but it's so much more.
Summer of my german soldier is an exallent book. I read it at age 13, and it was a page turner. I would definatly recomend it. You get a slight history lesson, but not too much. I wont ever forget Anton and Patty!
This wonderful book stole my heart away. Patty Bergen, the main character, is so realistic you find yourself thinking that she is going to jump right off the page and come to life. This book is suberbly written and shows the tragedy of war and how it affects people. The ending was so wonderfully written, introspective, and sad that I couldn't stop crying for a half hour!!
This is a nice trainer but it's noisier than expected. It's also not that convenient to put a bike in and take it out but if you can leave it up somewhere and not switch bikes very often it will work well. Overall we are pleased with it.
I am quite pleased with this bike trainer, but there are some drawbacks. At first, I was bothered by the loud noise it made when I tried to watch TV with it. However, I later changed the tires on my bike to much smoother tires without treads which made the bike trainer/bike much quieter. One other thing that slightly irritated me was the fact that the bike trainer does not have adjustable settings like some other bike trainers have to make it easier or more difficult to pedal against. Nevertheless, I still think this is a great product because of the great price and the ease with which the bike trainer can be initially setup.
This was a present for my boyfriend. He seems to like it. It arrived in a very reasonable time. It seems to be very sturdy and easy to operate.
Little America starts from an interesting concept, the son of a CIA officer wants to understand what he saw growing up. And is written in an unusual style - mixing past and present even within sentences. These two together are both the strength and the weakness of the novel.In having it told by the son as he investigates the life of the father of 50 years earlier, the story often loses the immediacy of a thriller. It ends up being more of a mystery of the son uncovering the past than a spy novel. But there isn't really much mystery to solve, and consequently, the final revelations, though surprising, fall somewhat flat.Nevertheless, it is well written and seemingly well researched and offers important insights to the world of Middle East politics. Overall, it succeeds as a literary novel about a son trying to understand his father, even if it isn't quite the thriller that seems to be promised.
I am much satisfied with the book and its dealer's rapid service. I would like them to send a receipt as soon as possible.
This CD is awsome! It has tons of great artists and really good remixed songs. It's perfect for partys where theres lots of energy and people are dancing. It is targeted for people who enjoy pop music and I'm surprised that no body has revieved it before! I had this CD but it was misplaced and I absoloutely loved it although I did get tired of the Eminem remix after a while. The oridginal "My Name Is" was soooo much better!
I absolutely love this thing. I use it constantly, for both rice and oatmeal. It almost has a happy little personality of its own. The rice it makes is delicious, with a texture that is not achievable by boiling in a pan. I am pleasantly surprised - extremely convenient if you like to eat rice. These folks seem to have thought of everything. Even the measuring is made simple. The pan is very easy to clean; the buttons are logical and not hard to learn. I especially like putting my oatmeal on the timer so that it is all nice and hot, ready for me when I wake up. I can't say enough good things, and I am not a person who likes to have appliances cluttering up my kitchen.
This rice cooker cooks perfect rice everytime...and it can keep the rice perfect for a day or so. Spend the extra $$ and get this one. 1 cup....10 cups....dont matter....it always does a great job. Very high quality product.
The rice cooker has a lot of functions that we love!! Mostly we like all the automated settings that it has. The "throw the stuff in there and start at a certain time" is awesome! Especially because the housekeeper can prepare the rice for us and set it to start cooking later on that day. The little chime that it plays when the rice is done is really cute. Sometimes the rice is a little hard for our hispanic taste...perhaps, that texture is fine for other cooking styles. It takes soooooooooooooooooooooo long to cook. We like making the rice mushy like our cuban parents made for us which takes a long time. It is a really nice size, especially if making large amounts of rice is necessary in your kitchen. It is perfect for when we have guests. The design is cute but it does take up a lot of counter space. Overall, if I would be purchasing one again, I might not opt for this one but i'm not completely disatisfied.
I think this is a must have album for any dance music fan of any age I love the music and the words are quite catchy and memorable i find myself singing some of these tunes around the house.. ENJOY it's a no brainer.. Vernon E. Boardman Portsmouth, NH
This is the first Rick Astley compilation in the US, and it covers all his chart hits in the US and UK from 1987-1993. Good, 2002 up-to-date liner notes with chart (US and UK) information, photos and solid sound. This is a perfect CD for Astley beginners and fans who want all the hits in one place.
The series is good, but it seems like it would have been better at 24 episodes since it's pretty dense and doesn't cover everything in the game.Note that this only covers the first game in the series.It's good to have along side the game to help follow along with the extremely dense plot in the game.
This does wonders for teeth and gums.First time I ordered although I used it often when in N.Y.where relatives introduced me to this product.
I usually use the Soft-Picks, but purchased Brushpicks because the pricing is much better. First time I used one, I poked my gum. Ouch!So I'm more careful now and they do work well. I have a broken tooth waiting to be fixed in a month. It collects whatever I eat and the Brushpicks do a great job of cleaning it out.I do like the case. They do not spill and dispense easily.
When I am feeling lazy I love that these are quicker and easier than flossing. If you're careful they do the trick every time (but don't tell your dentist - he'll say they hurt your gums ...sure- if you use them like a pick axe...). Only problem: I can't find them anywhere - likely they are too good a value. You get a lot of them for a small price - so I'm guessing that's why my Walgreen's stopped carrying them in favor of fewer for more. I tried to order them online through amazon but it was about $20 to ship a $2.99 product...
I have used dental picks for years, I have found them to be better than flossing and much easier to use. These dental picks have a new wrinkle for me, one end is brush-like and it is really useful for getting under bridges where food has a tendency to accumulate. Nice product.
I found Doctor's Brush Picks several years ago & fell in love with them. I find them gentle & easy to use which translates to my be able to keep my gums healthier. Unfortunately I can no longer find them in stores. The price on Amazon is good & being able to purchase in a larger quanity is a huge plus.
These brushpicks are the best on the market. A friend got me started on them and I used to buy them at a chain store, but now they don't carry them anymore. I could not find them anywhere until I looked at Amazon. I am so glad the Amazon still carrys them. Please Amazon, always carry this one product.
Love these toothpicks -- makes well and very functional ... have a bridge and this toothpicks works great / highly recommend.
These picks are effective, very handy and come in a compact container from which they are easily removed, but won't spill.
I purchased this product as a replacement for a more costly one. It performed perfectly and, for the price, is hard to beat.
This is such a little dust bag that holds an important part of your sanding life. The bag is made well and functions exactly like it is supposed to. Although it is a little pricey, it is necessary to have.
This bike rack could not be any easier to use. The simple design fits my SUV perfectly. Very happy with this product.
It's surprising how easy it is to strap this onto my Prius and pull it back off. It only takes about 2-3 minutes to put it into place, and the same again to put two bikes on it. It took a bit of getting used to how the tie straps work, but once I did, it's quick and easy. The rack is also very light. But the bikes stay very firmly in place. We drove four hours with these over both small state roads and interstate highways, and the bikes barely wobbled, we never feared them sliding or falling off.
After extensive research of reviews, I purchased a Saris Bones 2 for our car . The Saris rack is versatile and well-designed. It even has stickers where you can record your optimal angle (of the rack) so you can have a quick setup in future uses.It can be hard to get the bikes on and the bike-securing straps are hard to pull, but you get used to it. I called to ask for a longer stabilizer strap which they are sending for free. Their customer service is top notch.
PROS:Takes 5 minutes to install or removeFine in all weatherLooks coolSturdyCONS:Front tire is permitted limited movement (using a $2 bungee cord to secure it works well)No way to secure the bike or carrier with a lock for security
I've only used the bike rack once but it worked just fine. Easy to mount and steady on a long drive.
Since I drive a hatchback ('04 Pontiac Vibe) with room for a couple of bikes in the back, I don't have a ton of experience with bike racks. I recently moved 300 miles to another state, and I needed that space for boxes of stuff. I considered buying a roof-mount system, but the minimal amount of use didn't justify the rather high buy-in price for such systems. A relative loaned me a used (not sure what brand/model) rear-mount rack, but I was pretty apprehensive about the low quality and instability of the loaner rack. I picked the Saris for its blend of affordability and stability, and I was not disappointed. It weathered 260+ miles of interstate and a good chunk of bumpy city roads without any problems. I loaded a heavier, steel-framed Surly Cross Check nearest the vehicle and a lighter, aluminum & carbon Trek road bike on the outside.
Finally I found bike rack that fit for my car 1995 Toyota Celica. This mount rack goes over the spoiler. It's very sturdy to carry my two mountain bikes.
Extremely easy to set up, works on both my 2010 Acura TL and 2004 Pontiac Vibe. I wish the space between the bikes was a little bigger, but it is not an issue. I used dog collars to fasten the wheels of both bikes together so they didn't bang around on the expressway. I thought about buying the 3 bike model for the extra room but if you are only hauling 2 bikes this model will be just fine. We ride road bikes and this rack got them to and from our destinations with ease and scratch free. The fastening strips have a nice padded lining that secures the bike so it won't mess up the paint. Great product!!!
I recently bought my first bike (Trek 3900) and was looking for trunk mount. Couple of local bike dealers suggested me this stand. Initially I was overwhelmed with the price of it. But later I realized that its a quality product and if I have spent $600 odd for my bike it would be worth to get a quality stand for it. I didn't wish to mount my bike to some cheap stand and repent later.The stand is robust but very light weight. When not in use, you can fold it to a very small size and store it easily. The quality of straps is really good.The only thing I have a concern for is that when you mount this to the trunk, there is no integral way to lock the stand to the car. I was hoping that it had a mechanism that enables to lock it to the trunk while being able use the trunk normally.
It's huge, and slow going, but the book is quite detailed and generally clear explaining the concepts.
Peter Lawrence strikes a balanced tone in his account of the Madang 'Cargo Cults', considering it is a work of early to mid twentieth century. This book is cited by various authors (such as Frederick Errington and Deborah Gewertz) in the debate over the meaning of Yali's question - why does his people not have cargo, and why do these 'others' from beyond the sea have so much? Lawrence clearly has his own agenda and his own predjudices, but this is a highly readable account of a fascinating period in human history, one which is so visible to us in the Pacific, but may have been rehearsed in various guises at many periods in history. Pidgin English is itself a fascinating subject, of which I must learn more. It seems to work like an inverted mirror in which humans from industrialised societies cannot recognise their own reflection. Road belong Cargo, indeed.
i love these old B Movies. I remember watching these films many years ago and it;s a pleasure to see them again.
The book was delivered in perfect condition and vey quickly. Having read the book I would totally recommend it. Informative, complete but maybe not ideal for a newbie.
..................that packs lbs onto your harvest. Gains, gains and more gains. If I have any questions I turn to The Cannabis Grow Bible: the definitive guide to growing marijuana for recreational and medical use, because the answer is always in here and always top stuff. I have gone from respectable harvests to super sized gains. This is a walkthrough from start to finish that shows you all the pros and cons of doing it this way or that way. You get loads of alternatives on each of the growing methods. It even shows you how to build your own hydroponics if you want hydro. It is very cheap to grow an unbelievable bulk of quality skunk if you learn how with this book. I want to say thanks, thanks, thanks for the excellence that I found in here.
Valuable resourse. Very easy reading. Lots of pictures and news clippings. A bit opinionated, but I liked it.
The only disparaging thing I can say about this book is that it caused me to purchase a better dictionary.
My mother used this book over thirty years ago to name my sisters and myself -- and we still have the dog-eared/broken spined original, complete with circled, what-were-you-thinking, thank-God-you-didn't-call-me-that names. (Makes for a great keepsake.) I often use baby name books in my line of work and have at least five, but this one is by far the best: great definitions and "foreign" variations of common names put it above the rest, plus a surprisingly informative astrology section. I had to deduct a star, though, because even the latest addition neglects proper pronunciations, which is disappointing.Another good one: try The New Age Baby Name Book by Sue Browder if still in print; over 3000 African, Hindu, Arabic, Native American and Occult/mythological names. Enjoy, and happy naming!
There is something about Amelia Bedelia that captures the attention of children, my 7 year old son can't get enough of her. If you want your child to discover the joys of laughter and fun in a book then you have to buy this!
My daughter used to read Amelia Bedelia books and LOVED them! I bought these for her daughter (my granddaughter) who also loves them and is learning to read. They are funny and silly books with good morals.
I had so much fun working out to this video, when it was over I wanted to do it again. The routines are challenging, but it just makes it more fun to do. If you love to dance, you will love this video.
I've done the video twice now and I can actually say I've enjoyed getting back to aerobics (had a baby and no time for the gym now!). The music is really fun (though different than I expected) and Donna's attitude just keeps you going.I felt a little spastic with some of the moves (been away from the gym WAAAY to long) but after the second run through I think I'll be moving right along on the next workout. Maybe it was just me but the queing could be a little better - - experienced aerobics folks shouldn't have any problems though.I'm looking forward to my next workout, how often can you say that! I'd say this is a great beginner or intermediate workout that easy to adjust to your ability.
I truly enjoy this tape and I began to feel the benefits almost immediately. I'm motivated to exercise because she makes it fun. The steps are challenging but it is extremely rewarding when you get the routines down.
This is a great intermediate video. It's one of my favorites. It's set to Motown music and it's very fun. The moves are dancy but Donna has great cueing and after a couple of times you get it down. I don't like videos that are easy the first couple of times through because I get bored to fast. I recommend this video to anyone who enjoys dancy aerobics. IT'S FUN!
Yeah, aren't you tired of the so called rap music nowadays? Labels are springing up outta nowhere and putting out the same ole garbage. Let me tell you straight, it ain't entertaining when it sounds like something you could have made up. How long has it been since someone came off with some ill flow and you couldn't wait to learn the verses? "The Arrival" is still on point even six years after it's release. The big thing is when he spits, he's actually talking about something. People are afraid today to say when something is garbage. There are levels to attain too and being gifted with word flow is no small feat. Check out this slept on album and get back to some real hip hop.DJ Come of Age
The author relates his experience to even the most novice hunter (myself). He has a scientific, common-sense approach to deer hunting that gives confidence in his methods and makes you want to use them. His section on deer vocalizations can be confusing, but who can communicate inarticulate sounds thru plain text... However, it is fairly easy to find recordings of deer calls on the internet to clarify this matter.
Thanks to Mr. Fidduccia's wonderfull section on Late Rut, I bagged a nice 12-point! To whoever reads this: I strongly recommend you purchase this book. It is well worth the money!!
This book is fabulous in terms of getting to know Diana Vreeland. Her sense of voice is impeccable, and she talks to readers as if they are right there in her house having casual conversation. She tells wonderful stories of the twentieth century that many people would find interesting. I liked that she talked not only about fashion, but also of important historical events. She tells of seeing Nazis, living through Prohibition, and even scandal in British royalty. That said, she does tend to jump from topic to topic. Her transitions are quick and spontaneous. I do wish she had spent more time on each of her stories. All in all, this book is great to read to get a great picture of the marvelous Diana Vreeland.
I like the CD, but it's nothing amazing. It's got pretty good tunes and although I do recommend it, you wouldn't be missing anything if you didn't buy it.
Elton John returns with 11 very seductive tracks on this release. The melodies are strong and he sounds great! Particular stand-outs include "Someday Out Of The Blue," which is the first single, "Trust Me," "My Heart Dances," and "Friends Never Say Goodbye." A few more EJ tracks would have been better than the instrumentals included at the end of the album. Overall this is a fine body of work. The first single is probably the catchiest of the songs on this release, and a good follow-up single to this one would be "Trust Me."
As a pretty keen follower of Elton's music, it was a nice suprise to hear the new album and to hear instantly a clear and deliberate return to the standards set by post 70's albums such as 'made in England', 'Sleeping with the Past', 2 low 4 zero and 'Ice on Fire'. There was no self indulgent introspection or experimentation, just music for the sake of music, with singable melodies and good thick chords. I agree with an earlier review that comments on his voice and piano being more prominent in the mix making a big difference. Great to hear the big fella having a go again.
Our local reviewer said" Show Tunes Diminish El Dorado!" Excuse me, but I am reviewing the album,not the movie! I love this CD! And be it show tunes or not, I think it's great! I've listened to it for about 2 weeks now, and consider it one of my fav. Show tunes are in order, "The Trail We Blaze", "It's Tough to Be A God", But I also like "16th Century Man" which reminds me of New Orleans "Funk" , and I'm from South LA. Thanks , Elton John, for something new and refreshing! You win, in my book!
The fact that this is a soundtrack for an animated movie is gonna turn people off, and it's too bad, because this is a wonderful and very sophisticated piece of work by an insanely talented person...It's also too bad that "Somewhere out of the Blue" was chosen to be the single released to radio. It may be the weakest track on the album. It's not horrible, but it pales against some of the others. The title track is great. "Friends Never Say Goodbye" is beautiful. "16th Century Man" is an absolute classic (with great lyrics by Tim Rice). And the others don't disappoint either.I loved the Lion King soundtrack... but collections like this, along with other recent soundtracks like "Tarzan," deserve rightful places among the best works of their respective artists. It's great to see such outstanding music in these movies -- just unfortunate that so many will never get to hear them because of the cartoon characters on the cover.
Elton John has done it again. "Someday" is my favorite track. "Friends Never Say Goodbye" is another potential hit. John does a great job and the background vocals are incredible.
I'm not a huge fan of Elton John, but I loved this CD! I was hoping for more of the music from the movie itself, especially the Kline/Branagh version of "It's Tough to Be A God", but I was very happy with what I got. I do hope that Dreamworks releases another CD, with more of the score and the Kline/Branagh song, but I'm still very happy with this cd.
Great Elton John / Tim Rice collaboration.. It's bound to bebetter than the movie itself! My only complaint.. why do sections of"Friends never say goodbye" sound SO MUCH like bits from "The Madness of King Scar" from Elton and Rice's "The Lion King"? Major boo boo..Watch the sparks fly! Sorry guys.. but this little flaw overshadows the whole album.. pity.. cause it's bloody good stuff!
Oh how I love this book!Vimala Thakar writes beautifully and gives you lots to think about.I bought this book as it was on the suggested reading list by OM Girl (its a blog). Then I went on to buy her other book on Raja Yoga. She is elegant and insightful and I am so glad I found her.I will keep this book forever and one day when I am a more skilled Yoga Teacher, I will use it in my class and read the quotes.
My mom was appreciative of this gift. She has vivid memories of this time in our history and was pleased to receive the book- she says that at the time we were a united United States and will not ever see this agian , which is sad.
Thanks. I purchased this for my Dad. He was part of that generation. Many thanks!
A lot of reviews make the book's simplicity of style a negative. what a surprise since it doesn't read like textbook and in fact makes history more human, and to me, more significant.
"The Greatest Generation" was inspiring. As a young adult I have yet to experience anything having to do with the war. The horror stories to me are exactly that, just stories. While reading this book I was taken aback. The generation today...Those kids at war now will return with many of the same experiences as those in World War II. It is unusual and sad to see the differences between "The Greatest Generation", and the generation today. The stories in this book are ones of hope, love, courage, bravery, and overcoming adversity. They are happy, sad, and inspiring. I enjoyed reading about those people that everyone has known or heard of, all the way to those people who go unheard and unspoken of. Tom Brokaw did a wonderful job capturing all aspects of World War II from the men in the middle of the battle, to the women fighting their own battles at home. Only time can tell how recent wars could potentially transform our generation into one similar to "The Greatest."
Reading this book makes me sad that my Dad is gone and I never asked him "What did you do in the war, Daddy". What an opportunity I missed!
Wonderful collection of stories about our WWII heros with nice commentary from the NBC newsman. Women and minorities are dutifully included, with the exception of the homosexual community. Tom's researchers could've dug a wee bit deeper. But all in all, it's a beautiful book with well-written, moving remembrances and photographs.
This book has so much to offer. For the younger generation, it offers us a glimpse of something we've been told about, but can't truly grasp.World War II brought out the best in our nation. We came together under a common cause and were more united than ever. The young men and women of that generation, my age now and younger, were The Greatest Generation without a doubt.These amazing people have shared their stories with Mr. Brokaw, and it is just incredible to learn about the personal contributions that people made for the sake of our country.I recommend this book to anyone who wants a greater appreciation for the sacrifices of previous generations. This book will move you, and you will wholeheartedly have a new appreciation for these people.
I am shocked that anyone could find this book "tedious and condescending." I must vehemently disagree with the reviewer who states that The Greatest Generation "minimizes every other generation of people." It does no such thing; it is a moving tribute to a generation that deserves such a tribute. If it weren't for the struggles and heroism of that generation, we might not be here today. The reviewer I refer to writes, "if Mr. Brokaw and others think that my generation hasn't faced death, despair, fear, illness and poverty, he and they are not truly connected to the world in which they live now." To this reviewer, I must say that the current generations of Baby Boomers and Gen X'ers do NOT face such struggle on the same massive level as those who lived (or died) during the Depression and the World Wars. Today's "myriad of stresses that cloud everyday life" cannot be compared to the stresses endured by what Brokaw rightly calls the "Great Generation."
Brokaw does a commendable job of describing how the "Greatest Generation" earned its name. For those who are interested in which generation is likely to be the next great one, I highly recommend a new book titled "Millennials Rising" by generational authors Neil Howe and Bill Strauss. They believe that in the cycle of generations, today's youngsters--the Millennials (born 1982 to the present)--will replace the G.I. generation as the next great generation. The Millennials are already reversing many of the negative social trends associated with the last generation of young adults, i.e. the Generation Xers.
With true stories about simple American heroes, The Greatest Generation is worthy of comparison to the best books about the men and women who fought and won WWII, The Winds of War, The Stephen Ambrose books, and The Triumph & the Glory come to mind, but perhaps the greatest praise for the greatest generation is THAT EVEN TOM BROKAW WAS ABLE TO RECOGNIZE HONOR AND DECENCY WHEN HE SAW IT. There's hope for NBC News yet!
Tom Brokaw provides a book which extends beyond dry facts and makes the events and lives come alive for the reader with the personal accounts of the people he interviewed. Highly memorable.
This book was an interesting colaboration of stories by Tom Brokaw. It takes place during World War 2 and touches on every subject for combat heroes overseas to heroes in America making supplies for those overseas. I really enjoyed this book even though some of the stories were a little slow and not action packed. Still they were writen with good insight to give you the feeling you actually know the person. There were many man and women who put their lives on the line for their country and they need to be remembered so that the youth of America will learn the lessons they are telling. Overall this was a good book with good explanations and descriptions even with the occasional story that I think should have been left out.
If there is one word which comes to mind as I read Brokaw's book it was the word "character." What is lacking in our culture is character. It seems that character emerges from a culture which has experienced great hardship, deprivation, danger and the overcoming of great odds. Our generation (baby boomers) has had everything given to it. We expect it and feel that effort and challenge and hard work are unacceptable. As a result ours is a generation lacking "character."
I purchased this CD for a college assignment on the war generation. I picked a perfect book. Tom Brokaw truly captures an entire generation with detailed accounts of their heroic challenges they faced. I believe that the only downfall to this book is Tom Brokaw's voice. As nice as it sound on TV doing the news, it seems to be a bit monotone. It started to drive me nuts several times while listening. I guess that's why I chose to purchase the book on CD so I could just stop it at any time and then pick it back up an hour or two later. Overall, it is well worth the money.
I agree with Mr. Brokaw on many points and he is correct in saying that this generation brought about change This generation passed innovative legislation. I don't agree that it's the greatest generation perhaps compared to recent generations; lest we forget the generation that fought the war of Independence or the Civil War. If we forget history we are doomed.
I read this book and finally began to understand all the things that my dad would never talk about concerning the war. The stories are well written and thought provoking. The very fact that these people came home and did their best to be good citizens and make good lives without complaining speaks volumes about that generation. Now we saw soldiers crying about having to leave their families during Desert Storm. Do we think it was any easier for the generation during WWII? This book shows us how "me centered" we are. Another thing, now soldiers came back from the Viet Nam or Desert Storm wars and blame everything on their military experience. The WWII generation sucked it up and went on with their lives. They got over it. Makes me sort of ashamed of the way my generation deals with life experiences.
would be one way to describe Tom Browkaw's collection of stories about the lives of a generation that have been underappreciated. Another way to characterize his book, however, would be to say that after reading it, we should all have a better understanding of why Memorial Day is a holiday. The lives that Brokaw chronicles for us are a microcosm of a generation that shaped the world in the 20th century. As someone who had a very limited understanding of WWII, I now feel that I have more knowledge of the sacrifices countless men and women made. The book was especially useful for giving parents some diverse examples human responses to adversity. Browkaw did an excellent job at making the spector of war become more personal for us all.
The book is favorably received by the children of the subject generation. Perhaps more should be told of the elderly mothers and fathers of WWII generation who made physically demanding sacrifices. Despite losing close family members, they took in married daughters and their children, rented rooms to soldiers (and their wives), worked long beyond middle age, and graciously gave up comforts due them to encourage and make the chaotic existence tolerable for the rest of us.
Tom Brokaw does an excellent job of interviewing and capturing the impact of WWII on the lives of these heroes and heroines. The war experience was the common bond that elevated this generation to strive for greatness not only for their own lives but for the entire nation. Brokaw, drawing from his vast experience and skills as a newscaster, is able to extract stories of great bravery and self responsibility from each of the individuals interviewed. He brings out the sense of loyalty, duty, honor, respect and self worth, not found in today's generation.
I am tremendously inspired by the stories contained in this book. The American spirit during WWII is unequalled especially compared to the sick societies of Japan and Germany. Whether this generation is the "greatest" or not, there is no doubt in my mind that the cooperative effort that was required to defend freedom and defeat the fascists is without a doubt the greatest effort in history.
Tom Brokaw did a wonderful job with this book. You can really feel what all those people went through and all of the sacrifices they had to make. My faverite chapter in the book was the one about Thomas and Eileen Broderick. Thomas was a paratrooper in World War Two. He jumped into a shootout one time and a bullet hit him right in the head. He later found out that he would be blind for the rest of his life. This is just one of the many tragic and touching stories in this wonderful book. I recomend you go out and buy this book right away.
This book was nothing what I expected. I can now understand where some of the great people of today came from. Tom writes as if he were in awe of these people. I know I was after I read the book. This book covers the time before and during WWII. You can see the people he writes about selling newspapers, building planes, women flying the planes. This is a really feel good book. You will come away feeling great about your relatives who lived during this time. This book answered many "Why" questions. If you have been lucky enough to live in a close family, this will give you the reason so many familys are close, and what true family values are all about. You have heard many politicians speak of this, but this book has the answer. I didn't put it down until it was finished. I don't like Tom, but I respect his writing ability and the way he presented this book.
I read the book and I've read some of the reviews. The book is an easy read. It is not a literary breakthrough, but a good story about a sometimes forgotten generation. The accusations by reader/reviewers of racism, bias, poor research, poor enunciation are surprising. It is too bad we cannot read and enjoy a book for what it is: A tribute to some of those who fought and preserved our freedom. I didn't expect to read a factual history, detailed analysis, of the period and I am surprised that others did. I enjoyed the stories, the point of view and even the parts that I found too wordy and somewhat boring. But, I guess I'm too tolerant.
When I began this book, I knew it was about my parents' generation. I did not understand that it covered so thoroughly their sacrifices in and around World War II. Throughout the book, I thought about my uncle, who was in Europe and Japan during the war. I gained a greater understanding of the way members of my family, my friends' parents and people in the public eye behaved. Tom Brokaw presents a compelling picture of the values and fortitude that contribute positively to the fabric of our society. Without pointing out the differences, he demonstrates very well what we have lost in our generation. His words are minimal and important. He does not write one word that does not need to be included. The stories are spare; he draws us into the lives of the people he presents. I finished the book reluctantly, glad I read it, filled with a new understanding and wanting more. Thank goodness there is a sequel!
Tom Brokaw tells us in his words, and in the words of others, just how heroic the people who grew up with nothing and fought for their country are. The book is not a literary masterpiece, just a compilation of compelling stories about real people and real struggle....a struggle that always results in a sense of pride and responsibility that just doesn't seem to exist today. Some of the book is more interesting than others; Brokaw seems to want to be as politically correct as possible, covering every possible race, creed, and gender.It does, in the final analysis, give the reader insight into the true battles of the 1940's and insight into the spoiled nature of those growing up in the late 20th century.
The Golden Dawn by Israel Regardie updated by the Ciceros is a very complete edition. It is a hard read, only because of the detail and sheer volume of information. But it is very illuminating.
I read this when i was completley new to the golden dawn studies. I would have to say the golden dawn is a really indepth studied, and wouldn't have anyone read these book just out of sheer interests. This book gives a good foundation, but going on to reading the more advanced and classic books by isreal regardie,alister crowler, and Mathers, this book cant tell you the half of it. A good read, but the golden dawn is extrmeley confusing to those unfamiliar!
"The Golden Dawn" is one of the most respected systems of magic in the world: over a century old, it has its roots in long-reaching traditions. The Essential Golden Dawn is a beginner's guide geared for newcomers to Golden Dawn. The Essential Golden Dawn is written by experts on the topic and explores both the history and the spirituality of this tradition, explaining ideas of magic and magical philosophy and exploring the teachings and basics of the Golden Dawn belief system. An outstanding introduction.
The strengths of this production lie in the detailed instructions for the preparation of various types of tea, mainly Chinese, and the bits and pieces of tea lore imparted in the interviews (although individuals familiar with the world of tea aren't going to learn much new from them--but it does bill itself as an "introduction" so no surprise there). The videography is artful and the selection of tea vessels used during the preparation of the various teas is a visual delight. My only real complaint is that the amount of footage of the processing is much less than I expected from reading the promotional blurb. Personally I would have liked to have more material on the processing.
This is one of the most informative DVD's on tea,and how to prepare tea around today I highly recommend it. Benedic Chin
I am really happy with my radio/cd player, it has great sound, and I am not having to go into my daughter's room to use our stereo, which is right below my neighbors' bedroom, the sound quality is perfect, and I definetely have liked everything that I have purchased from Amazon over the years.
Robert Edwards description and analysis of the Dow Theory is, as Professor Bassetti so astutely states on page 48, a "magisterial presentation". I am proud to have been asked to add my interpretation to the update since Dr. Edwards death. Believe it or not, the Dow Theory is alive and well in the 21st Century and this book will help you understand why.Jack Schannep
I still havn't finished this but what i have studied has been of great help in identifying chart patterns and warning me off otherwise recommended stocks. This edition in particular seems to be the ultimate edition to own as the later editions get away from the original authors' intentions.
Good book, if you really want to learn stock analysis. It gets you thinking for yourself about the movements of stocks. There is no way one can absorb all the information provided within the text. It is a guide and reference for those who want to devote time to stock analysis. I am now more educated on stock trends, but still require the book for periodic refreshers. If you're buying this book for casual reading, find another book. Although very good, this book is very intense and reading it will consume some time. Dedication is required to finish the book, but the potential for success is great, much greater than a lottery ticket.
This book is filled with beautiful pictures that any one would enjoy. I bought it for myself, but my mother ended up with it. The photographs are amazing.
The photographs in this amazing book are not only beautiful, they would have been almost impossible to capture without extreme patience and technical skill. Being a photographer for many years I was amazed to read in the end pages how the images were taken. Using a 4"x5" camera!To be able to place a subject like a cat in front of a large-format camera which manually needs to be carefully focussed on a ground-glass at the back of the camera, the lens set to the required aperture and shutter speed, lens cocked, the film-holder dark-slide inserted and then, above all, choosing the decisive moment to take the exposure, is an amazing feat!What a fantastic photographer, a master artiste.
This is a really cute book with beautiful pictures. I like the quotes that have been included as well.
this cd good yeh it cool i listen and lie down yeh it good buy it but dont hop
You either love 2 Skinnee J's or hate them. I happen to be in the first part of the equation. I have listened to Supermercado numerous times and catch them in concert whenever I can. This CD has been 4 years in the making. It is a good listen. I have had the final release for two days now and have listened to it no less than five times. But where are songs like "Stockholm Love" the first single that was released in 2000? This CD is definately worth buying, but it will be more meaningful if you see some of these songs performed live first.
The 2SJ never cease to amaze me. I've been waiting for "Volumizer" for about a year to come out... the wait was worth it. The album is a concoction of beats and instruments that is sure to make anyone a fan for life. Join the 2SJ army!If you loved "Supermercado" then pick this baby up.
This book is wonderful- I really loved it and laughed out loud more than once. It' not for everybody, but it does have a wonderful sense of humor and it describes perfectly several situations you have lived trough. Too bad for the very British ones that I missed, not being British. But overall a wonderful read.
The cards are a mixture of characters and caricatures of golfers in the far distance past.Masters and duffers combine in an interesting and amusing collection. The dress is so different to what the modern golfer wears. Collectors will value.
This was a very interesting read about the beginning of the modern foodie movement and the Frenchman responsible for it. The historic recipies included make it possible for a modern reader to eat as royalty once did.
Perfect for a tiny bathroom. Was looking for a nautical look and ahcieved that with an upadated twist by picking the brushed nickel.
This book is clear and comprehensive, yet simple enough for a complete beginner. The reader can choose to learn just spoken Hindi or to also learn to read and write since all of the dialogs are written in romanized Hindi as well as in the Devanagari syllabary. The cassettes are necessary, but poor compared to the cassettes from other courses. The dialogs are read only once, very quickly, with almost no opportunity to practice repeating what you hear. The leftover space on the tapes are filled with discussion in English of questionable utility.
If you have been learning Hindi by the Pimsleur language system, you may have wanted a book to answer your questions. This is the book. It is excellent. However, if you plan to use the book and tapes or CD's to learn to speak Hindi, it is lacking. The best of worlds would combine the two into a single system.
I bought this set and was glad I did. I wanted to learn to speak, read, and write hindi. Within 2 weeks of buying the book, I was able to pronounce and recognize the hindi characters, as well as begin to read some words. I cannot say that I became conversational, but I can pick up words here and there when someone speaks to me. I appreciate the listen and speak lessons that the tapes/cds provide. It is really important to learn the different sounds of hindi, especially some of the sounds are not ones we use in english at all. I recommend this for beginners. if you really want to advance though, you have to take what you learn, and talk to a native speaker, because that is the only way you will advance is if you use what you learned. This covers the basics to get started.
I got this for a friend who had a miscarriage. I first read it and was very moved, often to tears. An excellent book! Recommend getting this along with two other (in my opinion) even BETTER books: I'll Hold You in Heaven Remembrance Book and Mommy, Please Don't Cry.
This book was very good to help with the healing process. I used it for a journal and it's a great reference book! I would recommend this to anyone who has lost a child.
Thank you, Kathe, for openly sharing your journey through the grief. This spiritual publication has opened up so many different emotions for me, so many unexpected feelings of loss, guilt, anger... After taking the journey myself, I have begun to walk again -- with others -- through their grief and pain. Thank you for providing the structure and 'path' which opens up the possibility for healing. Wonderful work, guided by God...
This is the perfect book for those of us who have faced the sudden and unexpected end of a pregnancy. I didn't know how to grieve my loss, after all, I had never seen or held or touched or heard my baby, but all the same, I felt an unexplainable depth of pain and loss. This book helped me to validate my unborn child's existence, give him or her an identity, and work through the process of healing. Five months after my loss, I still hurt and grieve and ache for my baby, but I know I'm on the road to recovery and will continue to recover with the help of books like this one. I also ordered one for my mother, who suffered a miscarriage 33 years ago...she said it even helped her to deal with the loss of that "unknown" child so long ago. I would recommend this to anyone who has suffered a pregnancy loss, who has lost a young child, or who loves someone who is going through such a difficult time as that.
I read/journaled in this book after my second miscarriage. It helped me with things that I did not even know I needed help with. I liked the guided questions and found them to be very helpful. I also know someone who read this 6 months after her miscarriage and she found she had already worked through a lot of the things that the book touches upon. Overall great book and made me feel more normal with the reactions I have had.
This CD highlights one boys voice mostly. He has an angelic voice and is very talented, but if you didn't know it was a boy singing, you might think it was a girl or even an adult.I was hoping this CD would have more of a boyhood quality to it. Meaning, the singing would have lots of treble, but also an unmistakable boy sound. I was also hoping that I would hear more of the rest of the choir, rather than just the one boy.It is a very peaceful CD though, and I do not regret buying it.
I feel so sad because I can't find the Boys air choir's CDs in China.But I bought them when I saw them on Amazon by friend's help.Oh,their voices are so beautiful!In fact,5 stars is really really not enough for their CDs!And there is a question I really need your help:Why don't you have their 3-CD box set named "Angel's Music Box"(It's really a beautiful box set!) or their 3rd album "Air"? I trust Amazon could get them!
This release from New Direction was blessed. The tracks on this cd in my opinion are for easy listeners. A cd for those who need to get a away and reflect on their lives and relationship with CHRIST.
They are back the girl group that has a 4x platinum cd (that means they sold over four million copies of SURVIVOR). Man i was really hesitent to buying this cd because, face it they kinda died out a whille a go, but anyways I have boughten remix cds that i am not very happy with (example: ALL SAINTS- The Remix Album) This cd is excellent I can't get over the tracks, My favorite song is jumpin jumpin (remix) lil bow wow rox on this track. Also the song EMOTIONS (remix) is great some one below stated that it does not play smoothely, my [butt] ! Its a grat dance tune. Take my advice, trust me (I have over 250 cds, this is definitly in the top 30) and go buy this kick [butt] cd!
THIS ALBUM HAS SO MANY GOOD THINGS ABOUT IT.THE WHOLE CD IS NOTHING BUT BOOTYSMAKIN GOOD.(BOOTYLICIOUS LICK'EN GOOD)THE REASON I GAVE DC(3) A 5 IS BECAUSE NOT ONLY DO THEY HAVE KELLY,MICHELLE, AND B'EYONCE IN IT.IT ALSO HAVE MY OLD TWO GIRLS.LATOYA AND LATAVIA.THIS WHOLE CD IS THE BOMB.AND I REALLY THINK U SHOULD GET IT. DC(3) 3EVER.
I found that these worked very well on my toyota camry and the price was great as well. Would have been five stars but the rotors were made in China. I had ordered some Beck/Arnley rotors in the past that were from South America and was hoping for the same for these. They still work just as well and fit the same but I was hoping to get away from buying from China. I have had very good luck with Beck/Arnley products in the past and will continue to use them in the future.
Jean Goldkette should be mentioned along with Paul Whiteman when people talk about the great white jazz bands of the 1920s. Besides his exciting arrangements, he was an innovator. When other bands used a tuba, Goldkette use a bass. And while other bands used a banjo, Goldkette had a guitar player. Another reason Goldkette's arrangement are recognizable: jazz violin solos. Many bands simply had the violinist in the background playing the main melody. Goldkette had Joe Venuti fiddling away. The only drawback to this recording is the haphazard use of noise reduction. Sometimes it's not there, other times it's in full force, and that causes a distraction from the great music.
This disc contains a brief history of great music from the '20's interspersed with embarassing schlock that would make a mother wince. Most people will buy it, and justly so, to hear Bix; however, after listening, the discerning buyer will be happy that he has heard Steve Brown, a very under-rated musician, at his best. Frank Trambauer carries his friend Bix, either through direct inspiration or with wonderful counterpoint in several of the songs. Some of the cuts, like I Didn't Know, have been mastered through a string telephone. But carping about the sound when you're listening to history, or complaining that Chauncey Morehouse was only permitted one high-hat and a snare in the studio, and thus criticising his drumming seems tawdry.This is a great addition for both jazz neophyte and discerning collector of twenties memoribilia. But when you hear the "restoration" [sic], you will mourn again the passing of John Davies, who knew how to treat this sort of material.
Well lets face it, who doesn't like a nice warm muff? No seriously this thing is great. It warms up nicely in about 5 minutes in the microwave and stays warm for a good 10-15 minutes, which is plenty of time for me to warm up my wrist before stretching exercises. Also, it smells great, although some in the house have complained that the aroma is overpowering - get bent. It looks to be well constructed and I expect it to hold up for a long time. Sure it was a little pricey considering it's a freaking bean bag, but it definitely performs as promised so I can't complain.
This is such a great video to teach your child about self esteem. Plus, it's just plain silly! I really like Larry Boy and his suction cup ears. Boy, do these guys really like to act silly! My toddler just loves watching these guys and it really is refreshing to see something so positive for a change.
Vivo en El Salvador y tengo una niña de 3 años, compré el video para enseñarlo en la escuela dominical, mi sorpresa fué que al verlo yo en la casa mi niña de 3 años se interesó en el video y me preguntaba que era lo que decían los vegetales (ella no habla inglés). A medida se desarrollaba el video yo le contaba la historia.... El dia siguiente ella me pidió ver el video nuevamente y a medida ella veía el video, se lo contaba a su primito.... NO IMPORTA EL IDIOMA, las historias de la Biblia llegan al corazón, no al entendimiento....Ahora estoy pensando en comprar otro video para la escuela dominical, porque mi niña no quiere soltar el que actualmente tengo.
My daughter loves this David and Goliath re-telling. So do my nephews, who received this video for Christmas. They sing along to the catchy songs and laugh at the jokes, but most importantly - they *get* the message.The Veggie Tales series is popular in my family, My husband and I adore the silly songs, my 30 year old brother likes to watch them, and even the great grandma appreciates them! Fun, clean humor is such a rarity nowadays that adults have to "resort" to kids videos.
This is one of the best VeggieTales movies ever! Jr. Asapargus (Dave) fights a giant pickle (Golieth) in the retelling of a biblical classic. Larry the Cucumber (not a pickle) gets two thumbs up for the silly song "I Love My Lips". Sunday morning values and Saturday morning fun!
This was so awesome and I wish that I actually own the whole series
Veggie Tales: Dave and the Giant Pickleexcellent movie for children involving religious background from the bible with a musical twist. my granddaughter loved it.
Quite a few suspects and a nasty murder--but the victim was really asking for it. You will probably guess whodunnit, but there is still a lot of fun getting there. Good essence of time and place with the characters being well drawn. A little long, but a speedy reader can handle it.
Never thought this would see the light of day on CD. I wore out my viynl copy, back when we were playing at being mods. Secret Affair definately played second fiddle to The Jam, and only because Weller & Co thought of it all first (second time around). This is a wonderful platter, its not angst ridden, a stab at genuine pop music, a nod toward the 60's but original in its concept. As a band they were too clean cut to be taken seriously by the UK music press (and unfortunately, lumped in with the rest of the Mod bandwagon) but play & write they could. From the opening title cut, to the added extra tracks this is well worth the cash, and now they've re-issued the 2 following albums, also worth a listen. An album representative of a period in time when it was truly great to be young...Keep the faith! P.S. The Greatest Hits album is a winner, the best of all 3 releases, sound as a pound...
This is a good pair of soccer shoes very durable and comfortablegreat sole Black/White have better look.¡¡
This is a very comfortable pillow but it is smaller than I thought it would be. It seems like it is for a kid rather than for an adult. Being from Pacific Coast, it is a very high quality pillow and the microfiber cover is very soft to the touch. A great product, but a little on the small side.
When I saw this game in the store, I just had to have it! It was too cute for words! But, when we actually played it I was SO glad I picked it up! My whole family loves this game. Everyone can play it right down to our 3 yr old. If you've ever played Left Center Right (LCR), this game is played much like it, but with mice rather than chips. The concept is cute, the game is quick (15 minutes or less), and everyone has fun. What more could you ask for?!
We received this game as a birthday gift for my 4 year old, and we really enjoy it. My only stink about it is the "kitty bowl" which is flimsy and cheap. A real bummer when you have an active kid wanting to play the game; I know I will have to replace the bowl with one of our own soon. That said, the little wooden mice and the dice are sturdy and cute. If we ditch the bowl and put the pieces in a little bag, it could be a good traveling game(restaurant diversion!).
I bought this talking compass for my grandfather who is blind. He has enjoyed taking it on his walk to the mailbox in order to make sure he does not get turned around.
this was a book recommended for a class i was taking; it did deliver solid information; good book : comprehensive and inspiring.
Very easy to install. A awesome product. Has really put a very deep charge into my deep cycle batteries. Love this charger!!
I ordered this the first day I got my boat. I had a 2 bank version of this on my last boat and loved it. I see people get to the ramp with a dead battery and fiddle with charging batteries by taking them out after use and putting them on a charger. With this, you can forget all that and just plug it in and forget it.
The fuzzy logic rice cooker is amazing. It took me over two years of drooling over it before I finally gave in and bought this two hundred dollar appliance. I am so happy that I did. My kitchen is full of top of the line culinary gadgets and this by far is the best. In frequency of use it comes only second after the panini press. I love this machine. I haven't had rice this good since my trip to Japan in 04. I also love the feature that lets me set the exact time for the rice to be finished.
I just bought this thing from Amazon, and once I popped in some sushi rice and it popped out, I could not believe the @#$@#% amazing quality of this thing. It's completely perfect.-Amazing, extremely tasty rice-Easy to clean-Simple to use yet many flexible optionsThings to know before you buy:-The # of cups (not regular measuring cups, but the little plastic cups that come with it) should be equal to the # corresponding to the Water Line for your type of rice in the bowl (NOT cups of water).-If you bought no-wash rice use the green cup, otherwise the clear cup.That's it! It's so delicious and so easy to use. I love it! :D
You need wash & clean the plate under the lid every time.If you put too much water, it will come out from top.45 mins for cooking, a bit long, but you can have the tasty rice finally.I used Korean high pressure rice cooker of my friends', it is about 50 bucks more, but definitely better than this.
Great product. Perfect rice every time. Excellent for brown rice. Keeps rice warm. Also does excellent job of cooking grits. Easy to clean. Takes a little longer to cook rice but the flavor is worth the wait. Pricey but great quality. Would highly recommend this product.
Rice cooker is all that everyone says about it.GREAT!!!With the one exception. The military 24 hour clock that can't be changed.I don't want my rice at 1700 hours.And oh yes the battery that runs the clock can only be changed by Zojirushi.
I'm guessing that for Japanese, this user interface is easier to navigate. For Americans the interface is quirky and the manual is a bit hard to understand, something like all Japanese products used to be when they started to get popular. But once you learn how it works, you can get perfect rice any time and that's worth a lot.The one REALLY annoying thing about this device though is that you can't tell how many minutes are left to cook until it's nearly done. It may be because it doesn't know, but all you have is some time estimates in the manual. This can be a problem in meal planning, but it really does a good job on the rice.
This is a gift for my mother but my sister-in-law has been through many rice cookers and this is the only one she will even look at buying.
I bought one of these many years ago - at least eight. It still works and does a great job. The battery the keeps the clock going on it has given out, and I haven't figured out how to replace it, so I can't program it for future times, but other than that, no problems.
Great rice cooker. However, not a fan of the front facing buttons. I like some of the other models that had buttons that face more towards the top. The front facing buttons sometimes cause the entire rice cooker to slide back when pushing them. The rubber grips on the bottom help.In general, this is a minor problem and it is a great rice cooker.
I have had mine for about over a year now, and it just up and crocked, not sure why. It was faithfull and great for the time I had it, I will miss it, and I am currently awaiting the 3 cup model from zojirushi.
The best rice cooker I've ever owned. I prefer haiga rice,and this does an excellent job. Of course you rarely go wrongwith Zojirushi products.
Ive owned this rice cooker for around 7 years now and it has worked flawlessly. I have absolutely no complaints and would purchase it again. Ive used this unit in two different states without issue. Ive heard the reviews about the battery but I seem to be lucky as it has never gone out. I just purchased the one pound bread maker and really love it so far, waiting awhile to write the review. I would highly recommend this unit above others.
this uses teflon coating. and Sanyo rice cooker uses titanium coating. why not get the Sanyo instead.
It does take a long time (2hrs) from brown rice, but it does come up perfect. I tried the quick cook and the time was down to about 75 minutes. I did see the same unit in the Food Lion from about $60 less. Should have looked there first.
After I read all the comments about this rice cooker, I purchased it. After I purchased it, I saw a 1 or 2 stars comment that we must take this rice cooker to an authorized dealer to replace the battery. That made me worry a while. My worry is gone now as it cooks perfect rice with this Japan made Zojirushi rice cooker. Also, the menu suggested to leave the electric plug on so no need to replace the battery so soon. But, you must unplug it when cleaning. Anyway, this is a good rice cooker but I puchased it more expensive than Ranch 99 Market. I got it at $175 for 5 1/2 cups on line but Ranch 99 is selling it at $145 for 10 cups. Suggest to look around for a good deal.
We just tried it to cook basmati rice but the rice was slightly harder than we like using the "normal" mode. Still testing with different water lever and other mode like "softer". We were will to pay more for this "Made in Japan" hoping it will be better quality and last longer than the typical "Made in China" models. Verdict is still out if it is worth it or not.
We had been using Zojirushi since day one, because it is the most famous brand among rice eating countries. Our first one is a neuro-Fuzzy, meaning it is very forgiving of the amount of water you measure, or the time you soak the rice, it intelligently figure out and give you the best cooked rice. Our 2nd one was a Inverter Heating(IH) which just like it said, invert DC to AC with frequency control, but it needs a thicker special type of inner. Now it goit some scratches on the inner, after many years of using. This is our 3rd one, and I uses kitchen paper towel to clean the inner (never use anything else like sponge to clean, unless you guarantee your sponge is as soft and dirtless as a new paper towel, so there will be no damage to the inner coating), and it performs perfect, as far as display-wise, my kids loves it, because now the menu selection is in ENGLISH.
It does a good job as a rice cooker except it takes a bit long to get the rice cooked.
I use this every day for many years. Recently order inside pot.I also keep 10 cup version at my vacation home.
I have used rice cookers for years, but they have always been the one-time and done type of cooker. And, as a result, I would freeze the rice and reheat it over and over to try and save it. This cooker cooked 3 cups of jasmine rice to fluffy perfection, and, just to test it, kept it that way for 4 days! The myriad of options and alarm, timer, and other settings can be a bit daunting at first, but it was well worth the initial frustrations.
I was poking around looking for a rice cooker for my daughters birthday, and lo and behold, I looked up at the top of the page and it said I bought this in October of 2003.This is the same one I've used almost daily for the last 8+ years and I can tell you it's one of the best purchases I've ever made.I've been through 2 inner pans (the nonstick coating wears off, but those and all other parts are still available) and progressed from simple white rice cooking to now making most of my main meals in it with many ingredients.I've got hundreds of recipes to make rice, pasta, polenta, oatmeal, quinoa, barley, beans, bulgur, or anything that cooks with water and heat, and most all are place ingredients inside, and press cook.A wonderfully reliable little machine that may cost a little more initially, but more than pays for itself in versatility, reliability, and simple no nonsense ease of use.
I wanted to submit my review here based on the older model that I had purchased.The perfect rice cooker: Zojirushi NS-MYC10I've had this rice cooker for more than 6yrs and use it to cook rice every single day. It makes 11 cups of cooked rice.The 5.5 cup volume is a little misleading for us Indians. We normally cook rice, rice:water = 1:2 ratio. So basically this rice cooker cooks a max of 3 3/4 cups of rice (using the cup provided).You will be astonished at the difference in taste between the rice cooked here versus some other cooker. I'm not exaggerating as I've two different rice cookers, the other one being Sanyo.I love the fuzzy logic feature where you can cook different rices & porridge's. The delayed time setting is a blessing... when I bought it at the end of 2005, nobody else had the delayed time setting. Obviously there are newer models now.For a family of 4 (2 kids below ages of 8yrs), this is just the perfect size!
When I first decided to buy a rice cooker I went to my local department store and purchased a small one. WHAT A MESS!!! it went all over the counter, it took longer for clean up then to cook the rice. Well, I returned that brand and started reading bout all the different types of cookers.After I read all the reviews about this rice cooker I decided to give it a tryI am very pleased. It is very consistent no problems.Even the quick cook is good. I cook my brown and white rice and it is perfect each time. I haven't been able to get my steel oats to come out the way I like yet.All in all a good little rice cooker.
Great Rice cooker. but cheaper selling at the local Ranch 99 Supermarket Store $ 149.Amazon, please consider dropping the price for anyone else looking to buy this
Pros:- Cooks the most delicious rice, every time (if you figure out the right setting).- Very easy to clean.- Makes a surprisingly large amount of rice for its compact size.- Very convenient warming setting to keep rice warm and moist during long dinner parties.- Cute jingle to let you know its done.Cons:- Not completely intuitive as to how to use it.- If we have to make something other than pre-washed white rice, we have to read the manual very carefully, take our best guess and hope it comes out ok.- Takes at least 45 minutes to make rice, but that's probably why the rice comes out so well every time.- Only displays cooking time remaining once it gets down to 8 minutes so if there's 30 minutes left, you don't really know how much longer because it doesn't say.
I have reviewed the latest Zojirushi induction rice cooker (NH-VBC18) under that item. Previously, this new model was not available from Amazon.com but now is.If you are in the market for a superb rice cooker, please read my review. The new model is more expensive (approximately $225) but uses magnetic induction technology to produce even heating throughout the cook cycle. I have gotten excellent brown rice with this new machine.
If you're a brown rice cooker in particular, please buy this product, satisfaction guaranteed. If you want fast rice, stick with Rice-a-roni. But if you want rice to die for buy this product.
Lots of people beat stress by turning to large bodies of water. They swim, they fish, they daydream on these waters. The Atlantic, the Pacific, the Gulf--they each have calming properties. But our heroine hasn't heard of the healing properties of blue water, so she turns to an isolated cabin practically buried in the snow. Her healing starts when physical pain from the cold snow intrudes on the life of her mind. Each of her split personalities pulls together as she first succombs to her inner pain then triumphs over it. Survival in a snow bound cabin becomes her first priority. The reader is asked to make a tremendous suspension of disbelief in order to accept the heroine's cat with split personalities too. But if you can accept that she talks to herself as one of several personnas, then why not her cat?
This is a super camera, and its compatability with Hi8 means all of my old tapes can be viewed. The video resolution is great, and it is loaded with special effects. The viewfinder and 4 inch screen are crisp, variable speed zoom is smooth and the battery life excellent. You should be aware that the video is not true digital. The digital refers to still pictures. Nevertheless, this is a well designed and well thought out product.
I use this as a desk chair. I am one of those people at the office you laugh at yes.... but it really helps my back and helps me to do little exercises while I am on the phone.
I bought this to sit on at work. Works awesome. Very durable and the pump it came with works great. Great buy!!
This product is AWESOME! I had purchased a cheaper version (different brand) at Wal-Mart and it deflated daily, it was thin and flimsy material overall it wasn't what I was looking for. I found this Stability Ball here and it is WONDERFUL! The material it's made out of is thick and holds air WAY longer... I think I've had to air it once after receiving it (and I use it daily)! HIGHLY Recommend this product to EVERYONE!
I love this ball. I use it for workouts, and also my chair for at the desk. I find this to be a very sturdy ball. Inflating it was not very hard. I found that if you can use a air compressor that was much easier than the hand pump. It is a very sturdy ball and not a lot of things stick to it which is nice for around the house. It was also big enough for me to use, I am 6'2 so if your tall this will work for you.
Ordered this for doing core training, situps, back hypers, etc. Was fairly easy to inflate with the provided pump. The DVD is okay as it provides a basic blast routine for beginners. Very happy with this purchase and have since purchased the 55 cm as well.
My husband got this ball as an accessory to a workout program he is using. It has served that purpose very well, and also our kids love it. It's pretty big, so to them it's the ultimate toy. I'm happy its anti-burst, and I can see us using it for many years, it is very quality.
It is a good equipment for healthy sitting position and exercising. It was a little bit hard to start with it. You will be fine if you leave more time for yourself to get used to it.
Great price, and very fast shipping. The ball was exactly what i was looking for. Unfortunately, the pump broke the first time I used it.
We got this ball to help with our daughters physical therapy. It was just what we were looking for.
This is much thicker material than my other stability ball - it feels more stable, if you will. It was worth the extra money. I also like the diagrams of exercises around the side. I mostly use it as an office chair at work, but it gives me ideas for the gym.
This 4x memory card has 492 pages of memory. The only drawback is that you select the active page with two slide switches. Not bad if you understand binary, but a little hard for 7 year olds.
The Beta Band's new release is more than an album, it's an experience. From the first chords of "Dry the Rain" to the murmers of "The House Song," listeners will be capitivated, if not a little perplexed. Although the inevitable Beck comparisons could be made, the Beta Band are very different from the country-pop star. Unlike Beck, they produce their own sounds, and their songs certainly aren't anything close to danceable. Yet their county-folk roots shine through, and mix with their rock n' roll power chords, making a truly enjoyable mix of sounds. The lead singer's strong, deep vocals add an edge to the songs, making the Beta Band's U.S. debut one of the most interesting albums of the year. It's one you can listen to again and again, but never hear it exactly the same.
The Beta Band first came to my notice when I saw "High Fidelity". Being intrigued I first picked up the soundtrack, and then this disc. This is a masterful disc. For those listeners who are not adventurous, The Beta Band may not be for you. The band can not be shoehorned into any neat category and the music is 180 degrees from today's incarnation of pop music.Given the previous high marks granted to this disc, "The Three E.P.'s" could have been set up for a big fall in my opinion. Happily this proved not to be the case. This disc has become one of my most heavily played discs and will remain so for a long time. Personal favorites are "Dry The Rain", "She's The One", and "Needles In My Eyes".I must have for the musically adventurous!
While listen to this EP i found that music as discover a new way to reborn. This guys have made a very original and fascinating mixture of diferent sounds and influences of all kind. Just waiting for the album. Keep on with the good work!!
THE BETA BAND is what was good about the Beach Boys and Love & Rockets.
'Meddle'/'Atom Heart Mother' era Pink Floyd. That's not a bad thing -- that's a good thing (I did say 'Meddle' era, not the later stuff, after all) V-e-r-y atmospheric, v-e-r-y psychedelic. Oh, I know, it's probably neither of those things to a lot of you, but that's MY take on this collection. And it's probably a reference more people can relate to than obscure/British bands a lot of people have never heard of. Hey, I LIKE this cd. But I didn't find it groundbreaking. It's simply tilling some ground that hasn't been harvested in a while.
Beck meets the Stones . . . the party starts there . . . by the time the everyone's feeling comfortable with their cocktails . . . Primal Scream drops in for a righteous time. Beg Borrow or steal - Beta Band rocks with some originality of their own and some originality of their early brethen. Probally sound as good in your garage as they do on this album.
If you think that today's young musicians only make hardcore, ska, punk and other kind of noises, you must change your mind right now. Listen to this record, made by four art students. It's delicate, involving, vibrant, at the same time. The first E.P., "Champion Versions", is sublime and the best of them; the third one, "Los Amigos del Beta Bandidos", is excellent; the second one, "The Patty Pattty Sound", is less inspirated than the other two, but pretty good too. In my opinion, the highlights are "Dry the Rain", "B+A" and "It's Over".
i feel guilty listening to this, due to the fact that i have short hair. but it's great stuff. the beta band has succeeded in setting the wild rumblings of the baked mind to music. (if you actually understood that last sentence, you'll love this album....).
How can one say that a small, underappreciated, terrific band was done a disservice by having their music disseminated by a fairly good movie soundtrack? Dry the rain happens to be a great song that isn't necessarily in the same vein as monolith, but a good representation of the band nonetheless. After all, the band wrote it, recorded it, and made it the A side to their first EP. So who cares if their latest albums are more spacey, less poppy. The fact of the matter is, all of their output, including Dry the Rain, is amazing and interesting and innovative. To whoever is reading this 'review' - buy everything you can find by The Beta Band - it's worth it. And don't listen to those who seem to think this music is esoteric and above those who were initiated through Dry the Rain. I bet a good deal of those fans wound up loving the crazy and out stuff the band has to offer as much as the popcraft.
"My college lectures are colloquial, familiar, full of anecdote, and often humorous; they are purposely made so, to suit the occasion. At the end of the week I meet the students, and find them weary . . . and only in a condition to receive something which will attract and secure their attention, and fire their hearts."So starts this timeless collection of lectures that the "Prince of Preachers" presented with insight, humor and passion to aspiring ministers.Fascinating titles include "The Minister's Fainting Fits"; "Posture, Action, Gesture, etc."; and "On the Choice of a Text," there are 28 of Spurgeon's classroom discourses on homiletics. Topics include the call, open-air preaching, ordinary conversations, using illustrations, and conduct outside the church, Amazingly powerful and practical over 100 years after the last lecture was delivered.
Absolutely every subject that a pastor needs to cover in regards to his salvation, personal life, and pulpit ministry is covered extensively in this compilation of Spurgeon's various lectures at the Pastor's College. If you feel the call to the ministry, this will strengthen you if you are truly called. If gives a real glimpse into the life of a devoted preacher and contains exceptional examples from Spurgeon's life. Awesome read.
I am using the book "Lectures to my Students" by C. H. Spurgeon in my Homelitics class. Spurgeon's insights have enlarged my horizions as to how I read and analyse The Holy Scriptures. The book has enhanced my teaching greatly.
If this was a fictional account about the section of New Orleans called "Storyville," no one would ever believe it. That it is true is wonderful, monstrous, fascinating, horrible, and damn good reading. The birthplace of blues, jazz, Dixieland and the beginning of the "Black take" on music that has swept the world and reinvented itself many times...right up to the present. The sex in this book and the way it was practiced and viewed at the time is unbelievable; it boggles the mind. This book cries out to be the basis for a movie, a musical, and/or a TV series. The cast of characters defies explanation. If this book doesn't blow your mind, you don't have one. Great!
Very nice couple of songs. "Winternight" sounds like early Radiohead or Catherine Wheel with a slight Slowdive atmospheric sound in the background. A nice mix. "Jumble Sailing" has kind of the same atmospheric sound to it, but is a cute pop song. Too bad their album "Lido" isn't all like this.
After having owned 3 different headsets I can safely say this has been the best for me. Sound quality is excellent and it is the only one I can effectively use in the car on the highway, others are just not loud enough. A tip I would offer is to not leave it in your car, the cold weather killed the battery and not I am left with a, very light, paper weight. Replacement batteries are $20.
i ended up not using it that often. great in the car, and near distance.however, compare to the cell phone signal, it has some low level noise.you can still continue the conversation, however...
you still feel confined to the phone because you can only get about 10ft away from the phone before it starts getting static!
"Get your fingers ready to twinkle..."That's how storytime begins with this book, which will encourage active participation even in babies who aren't signing.Very cute pictures of babies and helpful captions for parents on the pictures of signs make this a book you will enjoy together again and again.The series is slightly inconsistent in that only one book - Itsy Bitsy Spider - features a lovely REVIEW of signs on the back page (maybe they had an extra page because that song is short?). I found the review very helpful, and wished the other books in the series had one, too...it gives the baby yet another signing sing-along opportunity!Still, I think Twinkle Twinkle is her favourite of all these books, and we have had many MANY requests to read it in just the few weeks it's been here.Recommended for ages 1-2 only, as it's a very basic song that older toddlers will probably not sit still for for long.
These are absolutely the best walking shoes. My husband and I walk 4 miles every morning and I have tried all different kinds of shoes. The Reebok DMX is the most comfortable and I would recommend it to any serious walker.
Face it, Annie Trevelyn is a spoiled brat, progessive thinking for her day or is she trying to rebel by being shocking. She is very naive or just ignores her father's knowledge that actress usually end up being kept by some man. He didn't want that for his child.The problem is that she is not a very lovable brat at that. And Colin McBride or "Laddie" as Trev knew him wasn't exactly interested in that kind of wife. Colin, at thirty two, should have been a bit smarter than to trust her. And to get into trouble by befriending her actor troup, wow!But let's face it - she is the personification of many of todays kids - I guess there are some in all generations. [grin]I will admit to being supprised at who turned out to be the villian - I never guessedRecommended --M [with questions] but I did love finding out about Kate and Trev's extended family.
I enjoyed reading this book written by his mom. It gave me insight into the way Freddie was raised and how he was when he was younger. One thing Freddie had... he was a gifted comedian. I read this book probably 8 years ago and I still cherish my copy. I thank his Mom for writing it and for giving his loyal fans a bit of comfort by hearing her side of the story. God bless her.
I love this CD. Out of all his music that I own this is my favorite. Great diversity of songs. Really shows what he can do. I don't know how you couldn't like it if you like Nelly.
What can I say? I love this cd because it has all my favorite songs from sweat & suit on one cd. I don't have to take one cd out to hear songs from the other cd. Plus i love the fact it has my favorite song on there with Murphy Lee (he needs to drop a new cd) River Don't Runnn. I love the new single Grillz. Way to go Nelly.
Nelly's cd's are always hot. I really like Suit. Sweat is cool. Nelly keep doing what you do.
I love the SweatSuit new cd it is so good.I guarante you'll like atleast 6-8 songs off this ablum.Please support Nelly be getting this ablum.
if you haven't brought the cd yet what are you waiting for.i have his two other cd and i just brought the new and i can't get enough of them i play it over and over again . nelly is the best
Nellys new album SweatSuit is a combination of his older albums Sweat and Suit with 3 nwew tracks on it. i love this album because nelly always has something new and fresh to say. If you love nelly you will love this album.
I bought this rack to halt 2 bikes most of the time, and for this task the rack does a phenomenal job. With 3 bikes however, I find the spacing is a bit tight. I have a Subaru Forester hence it is easy to put the rack at the back without folding it. But for a smaller car folding the rack and expand it again can be a 5 minutes job.
You will not be disappointed with the construction of the bike rack. It's made from very strong and light material that doesn't rust. It fit perfectly on my SUV. I placed 2 bikes on it and drove 70mph on the freeway without a problem. When I stopped to check the bikes, all the tie cables were still tightly fastened and both bikes were in proper placement.There are a couple of downsides however. You might find it difficult to place 3 bikes on there. Also if you own a women's bike, it will sit on the rack at an angle. When it sits at an angle, it makes it difficult to get the third clamp (stabilizer) fastened.
Very practical, solid. Not the quickest to install or take off, but very easy to use. Good quality materials and workmanship.
proeasy to mount and easy to move to another vehiclesolid with no wiggle during drivinglooks like it came with vehiclecon3rd bike position appears to add excessive bending moment to mountstrap buckles take a lot of effort to attach and removedoes not compact easily for storagestill need two other straps to prevent wheels from turning
I've tried all kinds of bike racks over the years - including a very expensive Thule roof rack (don't even get me started) - and this one is hands down the best of them all. It is easy to set up, easy to adjust, and easy to put it on or take it off your car. It stays in place, holds the bike securely, and best of all, it holds the bike away from the car so it won't smash against your trunk or bumper and damage your car. I use mine all the time on my sedan and on my minivan and I've never had any trouble with it at all. All it takes is a simple adjustment to make it fit either vehicle perfectly.
I did a lot of shopping around before making this purchase and I was not disappointed. On a recent 700-mile road trip, our two bikes were safe and secure; they never shifted nor slid despite rain, high winds, and lots of passing trucks. Bravo Bones!!
Looks like a nice rack; too bad they didn't make it clear that it DOES NOT FIT THE 2011 Honda Odyssey before I ordered the rack and had to send it back. The plastic faring on the top of the rear hatch is the problem.
Good, solid rack for shorter trips. After the first time you install it, it becomes very easy to install and remove (3 to 4 minutes to install and less than 1 minute to remove). On a sedan you can leave it on, but on a SUV you have to take it off to get access to the back. The instruction talks of S-Hooks, but the two I've bought do not have S-hooks, which makes it harder to remove the hooks after installation. If you want to take your bikes across country look at hitch-racks.Also, when I bought this rack there was one other review in this space and it was negative. 3 days later and that review has been removed!!It would leave a bad taste in my mouth if I thought Amazon was removing negative reviews just to sell more products.
I purchased this rack to use on a new PRIUS. Works as it should. Lightweight, well padded and strong. Carried two bikes without a hitch (pun). No problems with the padded feet on the rear glass.
This was the third rack I tried on my Prius. Although, it doesn't specifically say it will work, online reviews on the prius boards made me believe this was the best choice and it was. Simple to use, great website with video so its impossible to make a mistake. A part was broken when I recieved my rack , called Saris and they immeadiately put a replacement as well as 2 spares in the mail. Have only used with 2 bikes but it works great & looks awesome on my red car.
I love everything about the Saris Bones--especially the bright red that matches my car!--except the metal clamps that clip onto the trunk at 6 points. There's bound to be a better way to keep them from scratching the paint than my solution of wrapping them in Saran Wrap. Otherwise, it's easy to mount, holds the bikes securely, and did i mention it matches my car perfectly?
This is very good for people looking for a great rack to use for your bikes, It fitts great on my car. One problom i had was that it's a pain having to put the bikes on, because it doesn't fit three 20 inch BMX bikes as well as i thought it would but they will fight once you put a little elbow greese to it . But It's all good!
Giancarlo Menotti does a superb job with making this opera understandable for all ages. It is a wonderful intro of opera for children. I first watched this as a child and now many years later am able to enjoy it again.
I remember seeing Amahl on TV in my teenage years, and it is very hard to find it being produced. So I was delighted to find this original, and at a reasonable price. I got one for myself and one for my granddaughters. Shortly after I ordered it, there was a production on TV (in color, which was nice), but it wasn't as good quality as this original. Thanks for making it available.
Well! I thought this was a lot of fun. It took me back to the time I saw this very performance - the same grainy black and white. My grandkids thought it was extremely primitive. Grainy black and white did nothing for them, they declared the set to be dorky and they were glad there were subtitles because they couldn't understand a word. We all appreciated the slice of history and those young whippersnappers got a greater appreciation for all us oldtimers went through to bring them the slick presentations of today.Delivery was quick, the DVD in 'mint' condition.
While the video presentation of the opera is truly early TV (Black & White, etc), the production is absolutely fabulous. The acting, the voices, the story is very moving. I feel privileged to have it in my collection.
This was a Christmas memory that I had as a child. We always used to watch it. Still lovely today.
I didn't read the description carefully enough and did not realize this was made in 1955. I would have preferred a more modern staging. However, the singing was first rate and I enjoyed it.
I had not seen this since I was a child. How wonderful to see it again. I was just as moved as I was when I was a childPray it Forward: Spiritual Growth Meditations
I cannot confirm whether this is the 1954 version or later (it lists it as 1955 telecast). The original (1951)had Chet Allen as Amahl. This version has Bill McIver. I watched the Hallmark Hall of Fame each year as they showed this wonderful performance. I have been looking for a release of this version for years. This is close enough to the "original" to be collected. The sound and video quality are very good, especially considering what the telecast was like. I have no complaints. The story should be well known from the summary, later versions and the reviews. 50 years have not diminished the greatness and enjoyment of this classic.
This film was asked for by our residents (Assisted Living and Nursing Home). It was a favorite past classic, that was shown on TV, but no longer seems to make the Christmas Movies. The discussion group that followed, was wonderful. It really triggered many memories for our viewers.
This is my second version of this opera. I like both versions. Amahl was very good in this version. ok
I had read "Winter Birds" and "Dream Boy" by Jim Grimsley, so I knew he was a great author. Sci-fi and fantasy are my favorite genres though, so I was really excited to read this book. It's really a great story and Grimsely does a wonderful job in creating his fantasy world. It has great character developement, and the characters also show true emotion. There are so few fantasy books that are geared toward the gay and lesbian community, or even have gay characters, so it's great when we get one that's actually good! Thanks Jim!
The first 70% is a great read, but after the turning point of the story line: the war of the wizards, both the plot and the characters get thinner and flatter, as if the author tried to finished it in a hurry...
A spell binding book. One can not stop reading. Sometimes you start believing, that magic could be real. I felt with Jessex and Kirith Kirin throughout the hole book. One hopes for them to win the great war and above all to be together one day happy and untroubeld. I wish Arthen would be real and I could go there one day to become young again. I'm waiting for a sequel.
Fans of author Mercedes Lackey's novels about the Heralds of Valdemar are sure to enjoy Jim Grimsley's "Kirith Kirin". After reading Grimsley's haunting and beautiful novel "Dream Boy," I was intrigued to see how the writer would handle a fantasy genre piece. Grimsley really delivers...a tome filled with enchanting visions of a world where magic is revered, but little understood except by those who are very adept in the art. Don't let the hundreds of pages of very fine print scare you...Excellent map, glossary, and other appendices make the world portrayed come to life.
My son-in-law could not believe we had not seen this movie so we bought it for a vacation time together. It was interesting, not exactly what we expected but it was fun.
I love this movie and was so glad when it finally came out on DVD. The Emperor Waltz was just an added bonus because I only got it for the first movie.
Well as my title says, "Emporer Waltz" was one of my favorite movies when I was a kid...mainly because there was a poodle in it! I was crazy about dogs when I was a kid and dogs play a pretty large part in this movie! I'll admit plot/script wise it is a little weak, but it was still pretty good! And I really don't even like Bing Crosby! I listened to the other one while doing some other things and it was pretty funny too! I think I had seen it before...but I could be remebering "The Court Jester" which it is somewhat similiar too..either way if you want to watch some funny movies from the 40's or 50's that you haven't seen a million times before I would reccomend these!P.S. It was a little confusing though about the way they set up the DVD...I think the movies are on different sides of the disc, but they had options for both on the main menus...oh well, it needs further investigating.
I bought this movie because I wanted to see A Connecticut Yankee in King Arthur's Court. I hadn't seen it since I was a boy and I remembered really enjoying it. But I had never seen The Emperor Waltz. Both movies are classic Bing movies, where he is the Sauvé ladies man who sings his way into girls' hearts, but I actually found myself enjoying The Emperor Waltz better than Yankee. It wasn't nearly as silly as Yankee and it was quite romantic. If you like Bing movies I'd definitely give these a try.
This book is not bad, it has useful information, it has nice photos (some I've found a little dated).However it is still helpful if you want to create your own little cottage retreat and you can get some inspiration looking at the pictures too.I was still a little disappointed when I've received this book, probably I was expecting more up-to-date photos. I've seen better picture books out there on cottage style. I think this book is still growing on me...I got some use out of it though.
For those late Saturday nights, when all you want to do is watch a good classic thriller with the family, there is really nothing to compare with a good Alfred Hitchcock movie. In secret agent, a young soldier is summoned by his superiors, and finds out that he has been listed in the newspapers as having been killed in action. John Gielgud is excellent in this role, and is complimented by the lovely Madeleine Carroll, a thrill seeking agent who stars as his "wife". Robert Young, more known for his roles in musicals and a few crime dramas, plays the part of an American, and the "third man" in this movie, invoking more than a passing interest in Carroll. The plot twists and turns are well worked out, and the whole movie is worth watching. Peter Lorre is especially at his best, as a bloodthirsty Spanish agent working with Gielgud and Carroll. If you are a fan of Hitchcock films, then I would recommend that you add this movie to your collection.
Three of the best stereolab albums, on the cheap - can't go wrong. Buy it now, and then listen to the first track on 'Mars Audiac Quintet' - 'Three-Dee Melodie'. This is pop at its very finest.
Terrific movie about an experiment that works in more ways than one. A gorgeous girl who always has things going her way loses an athletic scholarship to college when she gets injures-and that was the only way she could pay. To earn the money, she enters a contest where she disguises herself as a fat girl and goes undercover at another school. She soon learns how cruel people can be to severely obese people-especially in high school. Fans of The Big Bang Theory will love seeing Kaley Cuoco (Penny) in this. Limited amount of DVD extras.
Although this film is a tough watch, it's pretty honest about how some people are treated very differently when presented in a less than perfect package. We all are unique and one of a kind, but sometimes our differences become stumbling blocks when we meet less than tolerant people. Some of the best people in the world are oftentimes overlooked, shunned, or mistreated because of how they look. Nobody makes the rules so to speak, but peers usually dictate what is accepted or popular at any given time. Many times I have wondered how different the world would be if we were viewed from the inside out. Our differences make us unique, not less than what we should be.While this film is not too easy to watch at times, it should be viewed by students in this day and time of bullying and separation. Certainly a good study on what might be if we take the time to see that differences can influence our relationships in a great way if we let them.
Quick shipping, good price, nice colors, wish the brown/plum was more plum than brown but otherwise nice! Much better than paying full price or higher price in stores, will order from here again
A very short read, but full of emotion and great story. David Sedaris also highly recommends this read. Try it. you'll like it!
I highly recommend this book. It is a great, behind-the-scenes look at how much work and planning goes into each Open Championship. It's exceptionally well-written, and easy to understand and follow. And reading it on my Kindle made the experience that much more enjoyable.
In his book "Open...Inside the Ropes at Bethpage Black" John Feinstein truly takes you inside the ropes at one of the most talked about golf championships in history. Beyond Golf, the 2002 US Open at Bethpage Black was unusual for so many reasons. From the inner workings at the USGA, The New York State Parks Department, NBC Sports, to the Long Island Railroad, you get a real sense this was more than a typical 72 holes of Golf. Be prepared to miss a few rounds as this is a difficult book to put down.
My 15 year old daughter, and myself worked this together. It is a gorgeous puzzle. Pretty difficult with all the blues, fabrics and small pieces. It was a lot of fun to do as a Christmas activity! I have given it four stars for the oddly shaped pieces, which did make it more difficult. It would also be nice if the pieces were a bit heavier.
This product is coconut waste, and is excellent for potting orchids. Mix with charcoal and your orchids thrive. Coconut is notoriously slow to decompose, and has anti-fungal properties. Easy to work with and the orchids require a lot less water. Drains well.
We had the opportunity to listen to ulu's new CD. It is fantastic! We want to own one to keep in the car and one for the house. And we'll be buying this CD to give to friends. Please let us know as soon it is available to order.
VERY GOOD DVD,NOVA DID AN EXLANT JOB RECREATING THE TWO 747'S CRASHING INTO EACH OTHER.
The author provides an introduction on the history of the domestic cat, and then proceeds to discuss the different breeds in the chapters: Persian or Longhaired; Other Longhaired; Unusual & Semi-longhaired; Shorthaired; Foreign Breeds; Oriental and Siamese; and Pet Cats. All the major pedigree breeds are identified and described with a short history of the breed, to help the prospective owner to decide which variety to choose, as well as the most important points to look out for. The magnificent color photographs capture the full spectrum of the beauty of cats, from the cuteness of the playful kitten to the splendor of champion show winners. It is a delightful read and a valuable reference source to the different breeds of cats. Highly recommended to all people owned by cats.
Book was exactly as I wanted and significantly cheaper then at my school book store (65% cheaper). It looks BRAND NEW, the user said it was "like new", and it came very very fast. I took AP Calculus my Jr. year of high school, and I will be repeating the course as a freshman at my university. I qualified to take the 300 level math which is Calc II, but decided on Math 226, which is Calculus I at my university. The material looks challenging, and for me since I only took AP Stats my senior year, I've forgotten a bit of Calculus. I had a very very good Calculus teacher and feel very confident that I will do very well in this class since I earned a very hard A as the youngest student (16 yrs old) taking the course at my high school.
After checking it out of the library, I found "Goodbye, Columbus" good enough to purchase for my personal collection. What a riot this book is in parts. I had a class in college where we read parts of it to "show what a chauvinist Roth is," but I really didn't get that impression when I read the *entire* novel.And the scene where Ron is listening to his graduation album just cracked me up.Don't remember enough about the short stories to comment with any authority, so I'll leave those alone.
Goodbye Columbus is a book centering around a young lustful relationship in which problems arise due to differences in social class and religion. It is an easy read and is a good choice for someone who wants to read something entertaining. It is best for mature readers who do not mind a sexual theme.
No doubt that Philip Roth is one of our most talented and courageous writers. Too bad this Kindle Edition is so riddled with typos that they distract from the power of the prose.
My seven year old loves this movie. Now he can watch it whenever he likes, so we are all happy.
i expected this movie to be terrible, but might as well see it. I was proved wrong. My favorite part has to be the scene at goofy goober's.FINAL THOUGHT - buy, see, rent, steal,or borrow this movie
this is a decent movie. I mean, the movie is ok, but if you haven't seen the show, you wouldn't know what is going on. I have watched the show avidly over the past 5 years it has been on tv and it is a damn good show because it has a offbeat sense of humor like predesscors before it, Ren and Stimpy and Rocko's Modern Life. It all starts off when Plankton steals the crown of King Neptune, He freezes Mr.Krabs because He thinks he did it but Spongebob says he didn't and sets off on a mission with the dimwitted star Patrick. They meet Neptune's daughter along the way and she helps them have the courage to be men instead of boys. I thought the movie was pretty funny but had some empty spaces where I was just chuckling and there were some not funny parts at all. I liked it, but with my friends, it was a other story. They thought it was weird. The general audience was Teenagers and kids with parents. This movie was good but not as good as it was advertised.
First of all, to you all who said this movie stunk, YOU'RE ALL IDIOTS! This movie is great. People said this is a horrible family movie, wrong! To the person who said if you think the movie is just as good as the tv show, then you haven't seen the show, I know every episode by heart! The movie is a perfect comedy for all ages. Featuring two of the most funny characters in Nickelodeon, this movie is full of humour and surprises. It's definately worth buying. P.S. (SpongeBob isn't gay, he acts like a little kid because that is what the target audience is. Duh.)
The Spongebob Movie is such a hilarious movie! Loads of laughs will leave you wondering why there wasn't such a funny movie released before! This is a story about Spongebob and Patrick's quest to find King Neptune's crown, who is left bald if in lack of this crown. THis is all part of Plankton's Plan Z, which was started to actually work. Even though it is very slap-stik, this movie will not leave you disappointed!
I absolutly LOVED this movie! The jokes were hilarious! The quotes were SO funny! I especaly LOVED it when Patrick said, "Did you see my underwear?" Mindy said, "No, Patrick." "Did you want to?" I HIGHLY reccomend seeing this movie! Defedently see it if you are a HUGE SpongeBob fan, like me!
I wasn't sure what to think, sitting there in the theater with my 2 boys & my husband. I knew there were alot of children in the theater, I never imagined I would hear so much adult laughter outside my own. I have been a Spongebob fan since he came on and knew I would like at least a couple things...I laughed so hard....What a great movie. I think this is a movie for people of all ages. When you are a little older you seem to really appreciate the hilarity put into Spongebob & Patrick's characters. How can you not just bust up every time you hear Spongebob tell Plankton, "...Well, good luck with that!" It is so in his absolutely wonderful character. My husband (50) and myself (31) are the two biggest fans in the house! What a hoot! This movie, well, it ROCKS!
I think it was ok. the surprising thing was that SB and Patrick were the main charactors. what I think they should of done was add more charactors. but otherwise everything was ok.
I bought this for my 7 year old son who loves SpongeBob. He watched it every day during the summer. I would highly recommend this DVD for kids and adults who enjoy watching SpongeBob. It was a delightful movie.
I just had to get this for my son.He is a huge Spongebob fan,and I have to admit,so am I! After seeing it just once on Nickelodeon,he wanted to watch it over and over again,and now he can!
I'm a huge fan of the show so I had to see the movie. This movie is unbelievably hilarious. If you're an adult who wants to go see a funny movie but they're all rated R and the kids are home so you can't go then go with them to this. I know some people who haven't seen it will be like, "Right. This movie looks like it's for kids." Well think again. Most of the jokes in this movie are VERY hidden and only teens and adults will catch on (the Goofy Goober Nut Bar scene is one of them). And the kids will laugh at the occasional fart jokes too. And to give you a heads-up about a funny part then read this and if you don't want to read it then stop reading here.When Spongebob sings the "Goofy Goober Rock" song watch when he's screaming into the microphone on the Krusty Krab floor when the mind-slaves are walking toward him and look at what he's doing. SO FUNNY
Everyone's concerned about it's "crude humor". You don't think your kids ever hear that stuff. Turn on the TV right now. Flick through a few channels like Fox, MTV, VH1. You don't think your kids ever stop and watch it. If you don't like this Movie.You could make your kids bored by making him or her watch Beauty and the Beast. Or Barbie's adventure to Happy Land. I could notice tons of sexual references. Just so you know this is one of the best family oriented movie ever. And they come rare now a days. There is no totally clean 1933 Mickey Mouse short anymore.I think instead of their Kids growing up too quick. I think the parents are adapting to changes in the world slower!
I'm 14 (Not a memeber of the target audience)and my favourite films include South Park,Team America and Ali G but for some reason Spongebob always seems to make me laugh but anyway this is a funny film even if childish but is good and has a few funny scenes likePatrick with the flag inbetween his a** cheeksWhen they got drunk on Ice CreamGoffy goober rock songand much more and it's funny and Spongebob is (Along with Kenan and Kel and Rugrats until Kimi and Dil joined)the only show on Nickelodeon I can watch and say I like (Fairly Odd Parents is s**t,Yu Gi Oh is s**t,All Grown Up is s**t,Mr Bean Animated is s**t and so r the rest)
I bought this movie at best buy,and it is AWESOME!!!!!! There was this really funny part, but I'm not going to spoil the movie. Patrick is so funny! You should really see this movie. You won't be sorry!P.S. I'm a goofy goober! :)
This cartoon is the worse tv show for kids nickelodeon tv shows nowadays is very lacking same with Disney channel they always Have new episode every day Back in those days that way kids don't lose interest , nowadays they always show the same episode and have one new episode once a week
My son and I thoroughly enjoyed this feature-length movie. Lots and lots of laughs!
Questions cover, with excellent difficulty, all areas of exam 70-229. These are the style of questions all Microsoft exams should contain to maintain the credibility of their certifications.This review is a good heads up on how Microsoft is changing their exams to cover hands on work experience versus fact regurgitation. Very handy sample Exam on CD with Questions randomly generated from the Readiness Reveiw.A better publication than the 70-229 Study Kit.
I've been searching for weeks for a compact amplified speaker system that delivered full audio response at low volume. Then I stumbled across this rebuilt Bose clock radio made in an American factory in Framingham, Mass and I realized this could be it.Apparently the capacitors in this unit go bad after years of use and create static. If you replace the capacitors it continues to provide years of service .This rebuilt unit displays the time and offers a wakeup system with AM/FM radio but I only wanted it to plug my mp3 player into the RCA jacks on the back and listen to my favorite music in high fidelity with plenty of bass. The only thing you need to connect an mp3 player,laptop,or tablet to this unit is a cable with a male stereo jack on one end and an RCA male plug on the other. These are available online or at any electronics store.
The Six Sigma Way is an easy reading book and a must have for anyone contemplating the deployment or currently deploying Six Sigma. The book not only gives an A-Z detail on why,who,what and how to rolling out Six Sigma, it is also an excellent reference tool.The author's bring to life the usefullness of Six Sigma through rela-life examples from various industries.The Six Sigma Way practices what it preaches- it's customer focused and friendly.
look how great i am.....i am a member of the senior leadership team which means i just go to meetings all day and really dont do any work....i just blowhard at work all day like i am blowing hard reviewing this book
The book was very easy to follow. I found it especially helpful that the Six Sigma Way gave tips as to which chapters should be read for each level of Six Sigma implementation. Since my company already had it implemented and I was only reading the book for an understanding of what my company was doing, I was able to skip the unneeded portions about implementation. This was a big time saver.
This is a great introduction if you're new to the subject: you'll get the concept, why firms go Six Sigma, etc. The book is likely to gain you to the cause. At the same time, it's very superficial on methodologies and hardly tells you anything about similar efforts of effective engineering like Design for Cost, Design of Experiments, Taguchi methods, etc. Well written and entertaining.
I've built three computers for family using this case and they all love it. A bit wider than the sandard case but about half the height. Glossy black piano finish.... it only appears cramped if you fail to plan... I use modular P/S and tie down all the cords ...getting ready to buy another.
Unfortunately, this case isn't my ideal mATX case (I haven't found one yet), but it's very well made and attractive.Cable management is difficult, but not any more difficult than other mATX SFF cases I've seen.I would really have liked to see a things to make this excellent:1. Black powder coated inside2. A better cable management system3. Slightly repositioned HDD cage4. Larger case fans
This book has many heartwarming stories. It really discribes the way veterinary work was handled years ago. Mr. Herriot is a great story teller.
In has been roughly two decades since I read James Herriot's salubrious "All Creatures..." series, yet when I picked up this "best of" concoction, many of the dulcet vignettes were as fresh in my mind as if I had lived them last week. Although trained as a vet, James Herriot had a true gift with the written word. These tales about pets and their two-legged counterparts shine a light deep into the mechanisms of human nature.While he succeeded admirably as an honorable animal doctor and found worldwide fame as a late-in-life author, perhaps he missed his true calling as a psychologist. The humor, heartbreak, and humanity that he so eloquently captures in these stories shows a sagacious mind. It's no wonder that his time on earth brought many smiles and caused many a tail to wag.
Easy reading, great subjects . Would recommend it to anyone. Am passing it around in the family. Great bit of humor.
Really like using landscape plastic versus the landscape fabric sold in home improvement stores. The plastic does a much better job of killing the weeds below while preventing new weeds- the fabric sold in stores is more expensive and the root system of weeds actually thrive along the material. 4MIL black plastic is my favorite to use with stones especially. Product well priced, good quality, great shipping and made in the USA.
Poster was in perfect condition and it was sent to me in just a few days! Great Seller! A+
This is a great true life story of doctor being deceptive with his patients. Melissa Gilbert does a great job in this movie as the victim of this arrogant doctor.
This is a small book yet Lawrence's genius enables him to see big things in it, especially about those large writers like Melville he felt an affinity to. "Trust the tale and not the teller" is one of his motto's here and he tries to show how the great works go beyond the intentions of their creators.One objection. He is especially hard on Franklin who he makes into a priggish, petty prune of a minor moralist. Franklin was a many - sided genius who was open to kind of creation Lawrence had no sense of.
This passionate brief survey of American Literature contains much spontaneous flowing masterful and original writing. Lawrence famous 'Trust the teller not the tale' is the motto of the work. It argues that the true creative work takes on a life of its own that even its creator cannot completely define and control.Perhaps the most famous essay in this book is Lawrence's hatchet- job of Ben Franklin who he found to be a spiteful, penny- pinching, calculating dead soul. In fact old Ben could be in certain places as lively and probably more lively than Lawrence himself.What however is most important is that Lawrence in this work understands the great subterranean and mysterious genius of a kindred spirit for him, the literary creator of the Great White Whale.
It was a perfect form fit for my 11 year old. We bought the small and it fits exactly how he likes it.
This is probably the best compression t-shirt in the market... I used Nike pro Ultimate before and I have to say that this one is far better in terms of compressing your body... it fits perfectly however the length of the t-shirt is pretty short for me... I wear size s ... I think the new design it's better than the one in terms of fitting... I think Under Armour really listen to customers and continue to provide great products to customers ....Personally I think short sleeve t-shirt is more convenience than the long sleeve t-shirt since most of the time you gonna wear it underneath your t-shirt...
I purchased this for my boyfriend who is a marathon runner and weight lifter. He wears it on his shorter, usually 10 mile runs, and also in the gym. I like the way he looks it in, he likes the feel. I purchased the dark green and it seems to fit true to size. Will probably purchase another for Christmas.
Great shirts. I bought this for work and they work great they keep me dry and fresh when its not
The shirt was for my husband. It was very thin and can be used under some other stuff but he wouldn't wear it by itself.
I got the XL size and found it was a little tighter than I thought it would be. I would get an XXL next time around, but otherwise it's a great product.
With any luck I won't need these to hold the belly before long. I just have to keep up my will power and keep excerizing.
The quality is good, but be aware that Under Armour shirts tend to run very small and tight. Since I always wear medium, I ordered a medium but it was way too tight and I needed a large.
After watching this film, I enjoyed it to the point of tracking down my own copy. If you're a firm, die-hard believer in UFO's and the array of sub-cultures that have sprung up as a result of the first reports back in 1947, you won't like this film. If, however, you are interested in examining some of the people behind the phenomena of the modern-day UFO, and especially the Men in Black reports, this film is a must have. Be aware it is a bubble-bursting, serious look at the lives of Gray Barker and some of his contemporaries. These are the people who nearly single-handedly have set a place in history for the modern UFO enigma. It's funny, it's sad, and it is definitely eye-opening.
Great awareness raised on the real person, Gray Barker, who is responsible for the making of hollowood movies that we have enjoyed. I did not want to miss a second of this documentary. Applause for a well thought out and put together documentary. Great Job!!!!
This album by Muddy Waters was released in 1966. It was basically released to capitalize on the folk and blues revivals (hence the title). The songs consist of a random assortment of songs that had not previously been on an album. The songs were recorded between 1949 and 1964, so the album doesn't really have a uniform sound to it. The older tracks are pretty worn out and scratchy sounding. Despite the audio shortcomings of this CD, there are a lot of classic performances here. If you can find a cheap copy of this CD, it will be worth picking up.
Someone reviewed this CD and said it was Muddy's best and I beg to differ. "Hard Again" is probably his best CD but this one is very good. The selections are all well known but it doesn't matter. If you like the blues and appreciate the various nuances that performers can add to their presentation then you know that no matter how many times you hear Muddy perform, say, "Mannish Boy" (No B ooh chile), each time presents a different revelation. McKinley Morganfield, through his music, remains a giant.
I got some like this at a store. I like them a lot, BUT the shape they give you may or may not fit your eyebrow shape. I had to use scissors and trim each one to fit MY eyebrow shape. Have to use more than one to get it all. Once you cut them to your size they do work really well.Easy and fast.
Really works and is convenient. I don't have to go to the salon anymore. The cold wax is more effective than hot wax.
product disappeared from store shelves here. Glad to find them online. Very quick and easy to use.
Its a great watch for one with a smaller wrist. I have the Storm which has served me well since 1996 (which i hope they can repair, with a new batterry). I wear it every day doing heavy duty Construction Reno's after my years of Diving. These are serious watches (whether diving/swimming or doing serious outdoor activities). An active outdoor guy watch
If you are an old Too Short fan, this album is just what you're looking for. But this cd is tighter than most of his albums. Just check it out and you'll know what I'm talking about.
Personally, I thought Too $hort's last album was a bit weak...Some of the tracks were OK, but not great. This album is much better. Almost all the tracks are awesome, except the 4 and 8th. But the rest is awesome! I just bought this CD and I am totally happy bout it. Yea Oakland!
Short remains steadfast w/this release. Production varies, even E. Sermon drops by w/a dope beat for Short to spit to. If you're a fan you will not be dissapointed. His lyrical pimp hand remains strong throughout the duration of the record. Add it to your collection! PEACE
Definitely Maybe shows The Beatles what they were missing, that gutsiness to give the whole world the Vs. Kicking off with the rip roaring Rock 'n' Roll Star and ending with the lullaby that is Married With Children, this album is certainly the best thing Oasis have ever produced. Never mind all the hype and acclaim that came with Morning Glory, it could never match the extra punch that Definitely Maybe packs. Live Forever and Slide Away are the album's highlights and isn't it curious that from the bad's first three albums, the best song from each wasn't released as a single; Slide Away, Champagne Supernova and Fade In-Out. I'll bet Gas Panic! isn't a single!
I didn't get into Oasis until the latter part of the '90s, but I can readily imagine how revolutionary their debut sounded to British audiences when it first came out. Combining a pummeling guitar surge with the melodicism of the Beatles and the psychedelic sensibilities of the Stone Roses, "Definitely Maybe" still sounds like a world-beater. From Britpop touchstone "Shakermaker" to riff monster "Supersonic" to the melancholy yet anthemic "Slide Away," every track is an era-defining classic. Simply put, this is one of the landmark British debut albums of all time.
Definitely Maybe ranks alongside Sgt. Pepper (concept), Murmur (College radio / alternative), Nevermind (grunge), Too Far to Care (alt country) as truly seminal works of rock and roll. This album single handedly resurrected Brit-pop and stimulated interest in a genre that was in dire need of a jolt of energy.In terms of debut, almost nothing compares to the end to end brilliance of Definitely Maybe. Amazing lyrics, otherworldly guitar by Noel, and the best chops in rock by Liam, culimating with the incredible "Slide Away".If you only own 10 CD's, this is a must.
the first one sometimes became the best one. If you must choose 5 bands from 90' of Brit-music, Oasis must be in the list, but not as the best band, they can be the second best while THE VERVE stand on the top of all. Columbia is the best song forever Oasis had made, i really believe this song and its guitar chords have the power to bring us to the other side of the time-tunel. If you love this album, why don't you try the best album of 90', A storm in the heaven of The Verve?
Oasis is one of the few bands that captures the essence of the '60s while maintaining their own style. This is what sets them apart from others that don't quite make it. Noel writes some of the greatest lyrics around, and Liam sings them in a fashion that grips the listener and makes 'em want more. The band is that good.
I cant tell you what it is about this album that makes it so appealing. If anyone can put thier finger on the undefineable attraction of this musical masterpiece they deserve a round down at the dog and duck. Full of exceptional songs, this has to be a front runner for album of the 90's. Rock 'n' roll star is a great opener which is followed by Shakermaker, a real piece of psycadelica. Other tracks that are prominent are Supersonic (Oasis' first single) and Cigarettes and Alcohol. Others such as Up in the sky and Digsy's dinner are of high standard but it is (contrary to popular belief) Slide Away that is the weakest track of the lot. A must for any self respecting music conneseur. Amazing.
Although I like certain songs more on their later albums, Oasis shines on their debut "Definitely Maybe". Many of the songs on this album rock, and have an alternative feel to them. There's an energy here that Oasis doesn't quite match in it's latter efforts, and songs like "Rock N' Roll Star", "Slide Away", "Columbia" and "Live Forever" are just to name a few of the catchy, pop-rock anthems that you'll find on the album. This would be my pick for the definitive Oasis album.
i don't like oasis. their brand of pretty petulance annoys me for reasons that i honestly can't explain. i've proudly dismissed their popularity and have remained faithfully not a fan. instead, many other brit pop acts have had my attention and dollars: supergrass, suede, super furry animals, radiohead, to name a few.the oasis 'behind the music' on vh1 made references to the more raw, energy-packed "definitely maybe". possibly because i got tired of disliking them, i went out (wearing a good disguise) and bought the album.thankfully, it is all that i had hoped it would be. powerful and bold in attitude, strong songwriting with catchy hooks, and very little of the 'pretty petulance' i've disliked in everything else i've heard up until hearing "definitely maybe".so, to all the oasis non-believers: i recommend it. to all the oasis die-hards who have yet to hear this one: be careful, it might scare you a bit. it's certainly not wimpy and can probably beat you up!
There is not a lot to say, my mates.This one of the best debut albums ever.RocknRoll Star is a very good song,but I fooking like Live Forever, in my opinion the demo versionof this song is better.Supersonic, a fooking good one, too.All in all the the lads from manchestermade a fooking good album.Cheers! Stevie
Wow, when I first heard this album, it changed my outlook on music forever! The rocking melodies and lyrics on this album are what make it good. This album rivals Be Here Now with it's greatness. OASIS ARE THE BEST!!!!!!!
Want to rock'n roll all night and party every day? Then this album is a must for your stereo. And even though the lyrics to "Digsy's Dinner" can be pretty silly, the catchy tune will grow on you.
Slide Away, Supersonic, and Live Forever are some of the best songs ever. but that's not suprising, since Oasis is one of the best bands in the world! I mean, Noel is a genius, Liam's voice is beautiful and Bonehead, Whitey and Guigsy are amazing. If you buy this CD, you're gonna have the best time of your life.
I have recently bought Oasis's Definitely Maybe album as a DUAL-CD, where one side of the CD is the album and the other side is a DVD. The DVD stuff is pretty cool and hilarious at times, especially with this one crazy British guy, who keeps on flipping-out during the interviews. Definitely Maybe is a great album to own, but you know...I always had one problem with it and that is the recording quality itself. The album just sounds muffled! I can't believe recordings from the early 90's already sound a bit primitive now a days, even though they are on CD's. I began to notice this with a lot of my albums from the early and mid 90's. Although, I think Definitely Maybe was recorder with a style/techniques that makes it sound even more muffled. Oh well, it's still a great album and most DEFINITELY Oasis's best.
A perfect blend of medieval/ren faire hard/soft music. Ditto to the other reviews. Thank goodness I can listen through my i-pod otherwise this cd might be thrashed by now! On live the warriors!
I have a 1 year old and a 3 year old. The 1 year old can't open the can, the 3 year old has enough trouble that the adventure isn't worth it. So all the icky goodies stay in the can and not all over the house.
Butt shaking music. If you like bluesy rock you'll love this. Not as refined as there 3rd Cd, much more primitive. Drums and guitar. Play it loud.
So much fun to play! The black key's first album is true blues and full of soul. and it's a limited edition 180 gram vinyl.
Ok seriously folks, friends of mine turned me onto this stuff and this CD (The Big Come Up) is the greatest thing I've heard yet! I can't tell you what an unbelievable mix of blues/garage rock it is, even if you're not totally into that genre-I promise you WILL NOT be disappointed. This never leaves my cd player and my friends all play this at their parties (at NYU). The guitar and drumming beats are so raw and rough which is fantastic and is a great and perfect complement to Dan's smooth strong voice. Play this cd from beginning to end and you'll swear by it. The song "I'll Be Your Man" has Dan swooning you over making you believe he is singing right to you, but fret not you rockers because "The Breaks" will move you and groove you. These two hip guys know how to do things right and I can't wait for them to come to NYC!! Hear they are awesome live and I'm sure it helps that they are as attractive as they are talented! I say goodbye to MTV ... and hello to The Black Keys!
hi all i want to say i like the black keys the 1st time i heard them was on punk-0-rama 8 which is a good cd also so anyways the black keys were on that cd and ever since then ive been wanting to hear more and more of there music its a mix of classical rock thing and blues and kinda the whole hendix thing the black keys were inspierd by led zephlin sooo thats all i have to say oh yeah i like white stripes there a good band too
Once again, Amazon has failed to provide the track list for a CD in their inventory, so here it is....The Black Keys ~ "The Big Come Up"1. Busted (2:34)2. Do The Rump (2:38)3. I'll Be Your Man (2:21)4. Countdown (2:39)5. The Breaks (3:01)6. Run Me Down (2:27)7. Leavin' Trunk (3:00)8. Heavy Soul (2:09)9. She Said, She Said (2:32)10. Them Eyes (2:23)11. Yearnin' (1:59)12. Brooklyn Bound (3:11)13. 240 Years Your Time (23:21)
I was introduced to the Black Key's through they're most recent album, Brothers. Loving what I heard, I snapped up Rubber Factory and The Big Come Up. I have to say, this might be my favorite of the three. Each album has it's fine points, but this one in particular has a rough, almost bootlegged quality of sound to it. Each track is filled with an infectious raw energy that's hard to resist. And "Breaks" is probably my favorite Key's song to date--a catchy-ass screeching guitar lick loops over an almost hip-hop sounding drum beat. Then Auerbach's voice slides in, smooth as ice, and I can't pull the grin off my face.
Wow. At last a british band shows some spirit and produces some prime geek rock. Internal wrangler is a fine slice of alternative rock in the tradition set by the likes of DEVO and Velvet Underground.All songs are strong and the zesty feel of the likes of the title track and others give some energy to the proceedings. It would be nice if their variety expanded but all in all this is a treat for those tired of formulaic rock or repetitive dance music.
If you have read "The Four Agreements", you will not want to miss this excellent and energizing companion book. Like "The Four Agreements", much of the content in this book is based on Eastern philosophies and attaining personal freedom and happiness. This book expands upon "The Four Agreements" by indicating one's life is a dream, a dream that is often dictated by others. In this light, "domestication" is seen as the root of human suffering.There is much to be learned from the Toltec way, and I highly recommend both this book and "Awakening the Buddha Within" by Lama Surya Das. There is much truth and food for thought contained in both these excellent, spiritually refreshing books. The wisdom learned gives direction to the reader on a path towards a more peaceful, serene and happy life.
This is a great book about a girl who gets captured by Delaware Indians I loved it sooo much I suggest it to anyone who loves to read about pioneer life!
This book was one of the most popular on the shelf for independent reading this year, with both male and female middle school students. Perhaps it was because it is based on an actual event. Perhaps the straight forward language used by the author appealed. Whatever the reason, as a teacher, I make note of any book that motivates students to read, and this one did.
I have had the case for a month now and I am very happy with it so far. The case holds my TX nicely. No problems with the belt clip either. Very good product for the price.
I think that it simply does what the manufacturer says it does, which is to protect the Palm, and in my case I've found that it is so. I use my Palm in my pants pockets, and I like the fact that it does not get scratches at all, like the Palm original aluminum case. It does not rattle the Palm because it fits snuggly, unlike the original case. It has a back opening for the tiny speaker, so I think you can hear alarms louder. I've used mine for a month and I haven't have any problem with the plastic hinges that others described. It is somewhat difficult to open, though, that's why I give it 4 stars. You can charge and synch the Palm without open this case, unlike the original one. I do recommend it.
Very sturdy case. I have a little difficulty opening the case without moving the palm pilot upwards. Also not easy to open latch. But the sleek design fits well inside pocket or purse. Opening at bottom is perfect access for charging the device.
I think this product is a must have for those people who need simplicity to carry on your palm TX, and who wants to have a nice looking, excelent finishing and confortable case. I am satisfied about it and I feel more confortable than the existing PALM hard case.hope it would be useful for other customers
Love the product b/c you can take it with you. However you can do a lot of the same things with theknot.com, Wedding Channel and other great sites online. But I still recommend this for any bride who wants to be organized. Could use a part on guest lists and how to pick them, sit them, etc.
This is a wonderfully romantic, tearful, happy, love and friendship movie with great music and the greatest happy end of all times. Maybe you would like "Love of Siam" to be more open gay, but that would destroy its sweet-and-sour quality. If you haven't seen it, order it quickly! If in doubt watch the trailer on youtube first.
once again studs has nailed it inspirational timely and speaks to me today as it did years ago how i miss him but his words are still alive today
The shoe i ordered was the exact show that came in the mail and it actually came a couple days earlier. Great service for a good shoe!!
Pirates of the Caribbean At World's End is a great looking game, visually stunning. That is its strongest feature, and there is a lot of wasted potential but that aside the game is still fun if you are a fan of the movies and like the beat the crap out of things with a sword.
Not difficult to read, provides a look at many aspects of life in the Colonies and Iberia. Useful (especially for those who don't speak Spanish) references and maps in the back. I didn't give it five stars, however, because I think it was a bit choppy in the writing, jumping from place to place. I also think--even though I could be totally off the wall on this one--that the authors tried too hard to hide their bias for one of the women. I'm not much of a social historian, I'm much more of a structuralist, so I do recognize my own bias while reading this.
This is an very good book if you need reference material to draw upon. I would not recommend it for a beginner. Someone who has some drawing experience it is an excellent addition for his or her fantasy reference Libary.I found it interesting reading and gave very good tips on how to increase creativity but not the best how to draw book for the novice. The more advance artist will find it more helpful.
....without watching this episode of one of my favorite TV shows of all time, Northern Exposure. Christmas in Cicely, Alaska as experienced by the quirky, lovable characters of the town. This episode is filled to the brim with the spirit of the season, along with the not-so-spirit-filled attitudes that often go along with the season; in short - real-life! I've always been impressed with the way all the loose ends of the various plot lines are all resolved in the end - usually with only a musical score playing as we watch the characters go about the business of life. This episode is no different. I admit to getting choked up over Joel's gift to Maggie and Holland's gift to Shelly. Watch it and you'll see what I mean!
I am a youth minister and I have used this CD in our youth service for praise and worship. The children love and the music is lively and fun so everyone wants to participate in the worship experience.
If you don't actually like Gospel music you might not like it. It is not "Christian Contemporary", but there are songs that have been revamped to have more of a Gospel feel. My 3 year old loves it, she wasn't used to gospel since she only knows "kiddie" and Christian Contemporary. Now I am able to enjoy the Gospel that I love and she enjoys hearing other children singing praises.
Not a bad three-pack from the Piano Man, including the albums "Piano Man", "52nd Street", and the live album "Kohuept", as performed in the former USSR."Piano Man" and "52nd Street" are both essential Billy Joel classics, and contain such songs as "Travelin' Prayer", "Piano Man", "Ballad of Billy the Kid", "Captain Jack", "Honesty", "Big Shot", "My Life", and "Stiletto". The inclusion of "Kohuept" I think is somewhat debatable.... it's a live disc, so the music is not of the highest quality, although there's a lot of hits on the album. Kohuept is unique more for the concert itself and what it represented at the time (playing in the communist USSR) than for the actual music, and is interesting, but not as good for a collector's pack as say... "Glass Houses", "The Stranger", or "An Innocent Man".All told though, 3 solid albums, and worthy additions to any collection. The Piano Man is great, and this is a pretty economical way to pack in three of his classics.
-and I'm smilin' right back. Three cheers to "Universal" for doing this double feature justice. Both films look and sound wonderful, better than ever. Clearly done with care. "Birth of the Blues" is great fun, featuring excellent and exciting small group dixieland jazz playing. "Blue Skies" is a little hokey-but who cares? Great numbers with Bing and Fred.Not to crazy about leading lady Joan Caulfield though. I just wish they would have cast a girl with more charisma...like Rita Hayworth. Imagine, Fred and Rita dancing in technicolor...don't get me started. Of course, this film contains one of Fred Astaire's best routines-the amazing "Puttin' On The Ritz". Is there anyone on this earth who could rival Astaire's class, timing and smoothness factor in this number? No,there isn't!
I loved this movie. It was entertaining and funny. If your a Bing Crosby fan you will want this one for your collection.
I recently got done reading "The Witch of Blackbird Pond". It was well worth my time. I would reccomend this book to anybody and everybody. I liked this book because it was very easy to understand even though the story took place a long time ago. The author "Speare" made this book enjoyable for all ages. I really liked this book because "Speare" made the book believeable and down to earth, it wasn't anything wild or outrageous. You could tell that "Speare" put a lot of time and effort into the book. I also liked the book because it was a real PAGE TURNER. Page after page the book left me thinking what's going to happen next. The book was just so un-predictable!"Elizabeth G. Speare" did a really nice job on this book. Even if you are reading this book for the first time or the fith time I think you'll enjoy the book "The Witch of Blackbird Pond".
I read "The Witch of Blackbird Pond" when I was fourteen. And now I'm the mother of two kids, I still read it again and again. It's the most wonderful book I've read. Read it, and you will like it.
I liked how this book portrayed life in the 1600s. I've always liked hisorical novels and this one doesn't dissapoint. owever I felt that not enough happened with the witch trial, there should have been more to it. However, I do recommend it.
I am almost 30 years old. But I had to read this book when I was 10. I found the first half so boring I wanted to give up more than once. But my mother and teacher forced me to finish it and it ended up being one of the best books I've ever read. If you truly give this book a chance and appreciate that the first half sets up the second half you will not be disappointed. I still remember my heart jumping the first time I read about the "witch"...
This book is good. My mom said to give the book about 100 pages before seeing if it's good or not. I did and it turned out to be.. pretty good!
The Witch of Blackbird Pond was a very good book. I loved how the characters made history come alive. This book seems like a complete fiction book because of the excitment and adventure the author puts in. I enjoyed reading this wonderful adventure story while at the same time I learned about the Salem With Trials and how the people thought back then. This book really is like a key to the minds of the people that lived in those times and why they weren't acceptant to people different than them.
My daughter had to read this book for school and I read it also to help her with her book report. I was honestly surprised by how much I enjoyed reading this historical fiction. The main character of the book travels to the United States to live with a maternal aunt and her husband after her grandfather who raised her dies. She is accused of being a witch because she knows how to swim well and because she befriends an elderly woman who lives by Blackbird Pond. It is a story of romance, of forgiveness and of family bonding. I would suggest this book to both young and older readers alike.
This is an exelent book. I loved it! This would be a good book for fifth graders!
I really loved the book. One day I just grabbed it off my classes book shelf for a book report, thinking oh great another snoozer, but when I started to read I just couldn't put it down. I'm handing the book report in tomorrow and I'm not worried because since I loved it so much I found all the right words to say.
Kit finds herself alone in the world, and so she makes a decision to surprise her Puritan aunt and uncle and hope that they will take her in. From the start Kit has trouble in her new home; the Puritan lifestyle is strick and not at all exciting, and Kit keeps making mistakes without knowing it. She finds a friend in an old woman who lives by the pond, and unknowingly brings herself and this woman into danger.This book is a great read for children; it's interesting, historically accurate, and not scary.
Kid's classic, an enjoyable read about Puritan New England that isn't especially historically dense, but does bring the period to life
I love this book so much I read passages from it every day. I thought that the author did a really good job with describing it and everything. I thought that she did such a good job, I felt as if I was in the story and I knew the characters. (Hey, I kinda felt as if I were Kit and I knew exactly how she felt about Nat Eaton.) Any way, This book is lovely and helps you understand the Salem Witch Trials and is just a great book to read if you don't have anything to do. It would be nice to see it made into a movie!
The book that read is called the Witch of BlackBird Pond. I liked this book because of the interestind situations that Kit Tyler went through. This book shows a little about how people used to think and feel when we first started with the colonies. I geuss some of you that have moved great distances would know how she felt. I think that if you like history or are interested in the colonies and how they thought you would like this book.
I read the witch of blackbird pond.I didnt like or dislike this book.It had fantastic chapters an awful chapters. The most awfu scenes in this book are where everyone gets judgemental. The overall message in this book wasshard to figure out but i thought it was: never let someone judge you for who you appear to be.I would recomend this book to people who like adventurous historical fiction books.
This is one of my most favorite books. Kit Tyler is the main character. Her parents died, so she went to America to her aunts house. There, was a bad-tempered uncle, sensitive aunt, and two stuck up, but mostly kind girl cousins. This story takes place in Salem Massachusetts in a time when they prosecuted witches. I thought the book was compelling, realistic, and unpredictable. I reccomend this novel to anyone especially if you enjoy historical-fiction.
This book was a great book. It tells the tale of a girl who doesn't fit in and therefore is accused of being a witch. This book is a good book for some one who likes to learn about history and adventure. This book is exciting and you won't want to put it down.
Katherine Taylor (Kit) is a fancy girl from Barbados going to live with her aunt and uncle in New England. When her grandfather died, she had to leave her life from swimming in the ocean to cold winters in Conneticut.I loved reading this book but sadly if you wanted a book about the Salem Witch trails, you may be disapointed with "The Witch of Blackbird Pond". Witches and trails do play into the storyline, but only briefly. None the less, it's a great action/adventure/romance which you'll want to read again!
This book started off pretty slow but it definately had enough excitement to keep me from putting the book down! I really liked the ending! It was one of those 'Awwwww moments'!!~ I bought this book for my step-daughter (7th grader) and decided to read it first. I finished it in 4 hours. I couldn't put it down and I'm not one who likes to read!~ A great book for a teenage girl (12-15).
It was a good story. I thought the title of the book was misleading and an odd choice compared to what the story was really about but I liked how the characters were easy to distinguish from each other and were memerable. A great ending. I learned something from it too, on how people were treated during the war when they were not from this country - which is sad. Though it wasn't one of my favorites, I'm glad I read it.
This was the greatest book i've ever read and i think everyone in the world should read it and i think everyone should buy lots of copies for all their family and friends!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
I've heard from alot of people how boring this book was. For me it was ok. I love the plot but the whole setting in the 1600s was what I didn't like, and one chapter was all dedicated to some political guy, I didn't like that either. So some parts are really boring other are ok and other are REALLY good, for example the last part, I love that part. I love that sorta thing.
The Witch of Blackbird Pond is a good book.Friendship was clearly a theme of this good book, The Witch of Blackbird Pond. Kit, a thirteen year old girl, was friends with Hannah, although the people of Wethersfield said she's a witch. Kit goes to Hannah's house almost every day to keep her company. One day she went there with her friend Nat to help fix Hannah's roof, and when she got home, her uncle Matthew got mad at her. Another day Kit had to hide Hannah because the town thought she made the disease that was going around. Finally... Oh! I shouldn't tell you any more, you'll just have to find out by reading this good book. Enjoy!
The witch of black bird pond is a book about a girl is accused of being a witch. The main character is Kit Tyler. The story is about a girl who came from England and went to the Caribbean and went to New England to live with her cousins. The town that she lived in was a town in Connecticut in 1687.The people accused Kit of being a witch. She could not do anything about it and she was put in a store room. The son of the captain saved her from being persecuted as a witch. She got away from the people that accused her. This book is a good way to understand the way the people who were different were treated in New England in the 1600s.
This is a truly incredible book that I discovered in the classroom when I was about 10, maybe younger. The soap-making scene was excerpted in my history book as a lesson about how the Puritans lived in the 1600s.The detail of life during those harsh times is simply fascinating. Everything from household chores to religious beliefs to politics is covered, but the real beauty of this gem of a book lies in the subtle romance between the title character and a sea captain's son, and in the love that she comes to feel for Hannah, a suspected witch, Prudence, a young, neglected child, and her aunt's family who take her in as one of their own.This book is as pleasurable to read today as it was over 10 years ago. A true classic. For lovers of friendship, romance, loyalty and history, I highly recommend it.
The _Witch of Blackbird Pond_ is a story about a girl by the name of Kit who comes to Wetherfield, Connecticut and has to adjust to her new life. This book is exciting and full of emotion. It is well written and should be read by others.
The Witch of Blackbird Pond is a book about how a 16-year-old girl,Kit, is trying to survive in a new town with people unlike herself. As someone who has never done work in her life, it is hard for Kit to be accepted in a hardworking town. From the first day she came to Wethersfield she was suspected to be a witch as well as her new friend Hannah Tupper. At the same time love is in the air and is causing a problem at the Wood's house. The love plot might be too predictable, but it still very enjoyable to read.
This excellent novel will definitely keep you reading on. There are well thought out cliff hangers at the end of each chapter. A bit of foreshadowing adds to the suspense and mystery. All of the characters that protain to this mystifying classic are well thought out, and well developed. With the help of it's convinvcing atmostphere, this story definately depics the Puritan ways, and gives the reader a unique picture of witch trials. Not only does this novel have a special edge, but it teaches the reader a lesson as well. The lesson that is told in the Witch of Blackbird Pond not only protains to the Colonial times, but could definitely apply to the modern age.
Kit Tyler has lived her whole life in the beautiful, Caribbean country of Barbados. Her first glimpse at her new home in Connecticut tells her that her life in colonial America will be nothing like the beautiful and elegant world she has always known. She doesn't understand the stern and somber people here--especially not the mischievous sailor, Nat Eaton, who always turns up when she least expects it. In her loneliness, she develops a dangerous friendship with an outcast widow many of the townspeople think might be a witch. But how much will that friendship cost her?The Witch of Blackbird Pond is a wonderful story about coping with change and learning to be true to ourselves. Through the gentle affection of the Widow Tupper, Kit learns to find her vocation in life--and in love.
I just received my stroller, and I love it. Looks just like the picture, but better! Very easy to put together, very light to push! So far my dog liked it! I have a boston terrier and a boxer, obviously the terrier will be the one using it! THe only downfall I see so far is the buttons, they snap to the bottom, and it's a little difficult to do, but is do-able! All in all, this is a great product!
This product is great. I bought it for my cat so that he would be able to go outside and he love it. I am able to carry a lot of my items in the basket under where he sits. I love it
The book is short and very well written. It gives you the straight answers to a lot of admissions questions with a large focus on the essay part of the application. I'm convinced that the essay was one of the things that helped me get into Middlebury College. I'd encourage you to buy this book if you are going to be applying to college.
harry is my english teacher and helped me complete my college essay. We are all given his book and it helped a great deal, along with reading it and his help my essay was fabulous and i was also accepted early decision to oberlin. this is a great book, the one you should buy if you are only buying one, it is written exactly as he teaches and "sounds" just like him and i strongly recommend it to all high school students. Its not just dry and boring he makes sure to add humor all through the book
This book is great to aid people when they apply to major colleges. The author include tips and things that he notices, when he was/is an admissions councelor, to help people be accepted into college. The book also teaches the reader on ways the reader could prepare themselves for letters of recommendations, interviews, *essay writting*, and obvious course that students may take in high school that will appear on their transcript. Will definately aid people with college applications.
I am 5'10" and purchased the long in both white and black. The reviews are accurate in saying that the long is truly a long, but I love this purchase. The material quality is high and the style is very nice. The adjustable straps allowed me to pull it up, and while the straps do slip a bit, I could easily pin them in place and adjust according to the length of whatever I have on. I am very happy with this purchase.
I ordered this slip online because it is getting more & more difficult to find larger size lingerie items in department stores--especially full length slips. I like the design and material. It does seem to run a little small, but that's OK becuse I want to lose weight!
The slip fit perfectly. The adjustable straps allowed me to play with the positioning under my dress and the length was on target.
This slip is not gorgeous or luxurious, it is just okay. I wear them as nightgowns or around the house in the summer. One of the straps consistently twists around the hook which is annoying and keeps me from wearing it as often as I would otherwise. At least it was inexpensive but you get what you pay for, especially in this case.
Cd was full of praise to the LORD and very upbeat. Played it everywhere,even @ work.Even made a few copies for my co-workers & boss.Made me really proud to own this little gem.
My criticism would be that people with emotional problems with God's grace can still be good spouses. On the other hand, it certainly helps make the marriage easier and with a higher probability of success to marry someone who is emotionally well-adjusted!A great book to help young adults to look at themselves and their relationships so they will have healthy marriages and families.
This is a great album. Its definitely Merengue Callejero, but with a lot more lyrics and suprises than the usual. There is a lot more thinking and production going on here than in most Merengue. And dont get me wrong I like most Merengue, but Los Potros really have something refreshing going on here. Although Oye Mi Ritmo is the first single and is slamming, the other songs will grow on you tremendously. Vengan Todas Mujeres Latinas is the jam. Rebeca99 and Esa Morena will grow on you if they dont catch you on first listen. I like this album more everytime I listen to it.
For the price this little car has a lot of features head and tailights and the ability to run another at the same time without interference due to the different frequencies available. These cars have been crashed into walls and each other over and over and seem to be ok. The only one that broke took a flight off of a desk and the steering linkage snapped on one wheel when it impacted the floor. Cant really complain about that. I bought extras for the price. What really matters is that it entertains the young ones and is helping them learn the controls before moving to more expensive models.
acting leaves something to be desired but the directing is magnificient and the plot it amazing. an excellent buy
Zoot Suit is a movie I recommend to all (especially Latinos) who are interested in a small portion of neighborhood life in LA during World War II. The musical score is excellent and has a tendency to urge you to increase the volume. The acting is very believable, while the alter ego character (James Olmos) constantly challenges your mind to determine who he is and what he represents - until the end. All in all, very enjoyable.
Very good movie. Well done, directed, written, acted. The story is amazing, it really is. And the music and the way that is made...WOW...!
If you're a fan of Disney music, you can't go wrong with this CD. I especially enjoy "Fantasmic". For those who have never been to a Disney Park, this music is from a terrific "must see" show, staring Mickey and his imagination. I also love "The Siamese Cat Song" from "Lady & The Tramp". Songs from favorites like Jiminey Cricket, Winie The Pooh, to newer the movies "Hercules" & "Pocahontas". The only song I wasn't fond of was "Femininity". This is volume 4 in a collection of 5, all of which are very good. These songs will have you humming through your day!
I read the whole play in one day. It isn't quite as good as the musical, but anyone who likes the music will enjoy the play as well.
I highly recommend the book Rainbow's End by author Bob Adamov. From Civil War intrigue to Lake Erie island suspense, it is action/adventure packed with a touch of romance. Great reading from start to finish.
I have not heard the first two albums in years. Early Bruce is so different than his current music. Hearing "Rosalita" reminded me of all the concerts I went to. Greetings' "Hard to be a Saint in the City" is one my favorite songs ever: urban and edgy. Darkness has always been my favorite Bruce album. It still is.
This is quite simply one of the very best live albums ever. Plain and simple!
I do love that this sells as a 12 pack so I don't have to run out and get more every time I need to change the air filter but what I like even more is that these are excellent, and to my admittedly unprofessional eye, seem to last as long as the special (and expensive) 3M long lasting air filters, even though these are designed to be more frequently changed. From now on, I'll be buying these filters, and hope to continue to buy a 12 pack every 18-24 months, since these don't seem to need to be changed monthly.
the multi pack is a good way to have a fresh fillter whenit needs to be changed.
My review referred to the vinyl version of Be Here Now... -with the perfect large cover-art... -yes, it all makes sense now/then... -listen on headphones... Tape it!...
I don't konw why everybody critic this GREAT album, I think it's Oasis best, we got excellent guitars, a very inspired Liam that can touch the roof with his voice and the other 3. There are also a lot of classics like "d'you know what I mean?" personally the best Oasis Chorus ever, we got "stand by me ", "the girl in the dirty shirt" wich is the best song of the entire album, "don't go away" and a great song that define the hole spirit of the album: All around the world. A piece of advise: don't listen to the critics, first listen to it and you'll see.
I don't see why critics and even other Oasis fans keep downing this album. And I certainly don't see why it was thought such a failure . . ."Some bands will never sell that many records in their whole career" . . . With the exception of Magic Pie (it just rubs me the wrong way) I like every song on this album. Be Here Now is one of my favorite Oasis songs it's just plain head bobbin', foot tappin' fun. Don't go away is by far the best track on this album. And I love Girl In the Dirty Shirt. Oasis rocks and I'd like to talk to anyone who feels the same so e-mail me at yub_yub@excite.com
This is a fantastic album. I bought it after Definately Maybe and What's the Story (Morning Glory). It's longer, rougher, and heavier. It's just filled with great songs. The album as a whole may have some weak points, but songs like D'You Know What I Mean?, Magic Pie, Stand By Me, Fade In-Out, and of course, Don't Go Away, really make this a must-own. The album is a lot of a certain Oasis style that is unlike What's the Story, so I can see how this might be hit or miss for some people (especially if you want short songs, because the avgerage length here is 6 minutes), but I love it. Great stuff, highly recomended.
I don't understand Noel's disdain for this record. Hell, it might be my FAVOURITE Oasis album of all (7) !! I bought the album on August 26, 1997 and it has been close at hand ever since. This is a pure, powerfully agressive masterpiece that I bet will get recieved better as the yrs go by. This record is about as subtle as a nuclear bomb. Raw aggression, yet still very listenable. Unlike the "hard rock" that is played on the radio these days, there is some quality to it. Sure, it's a bit overdone, but that's not necessarily a bad thing. To me, music serves as escapism, a mood changer of sorts and BHN completes that mission with flying colors. If you haven't listened to BHN in some time, try it again. If you have never heard BHN give it a try. THIS IS OASIS in it's purist, rawest form !!! BTW, I got to see them live on the BHN tour !!!!
When I first listened to this album, I thought it was the best Oasis album there was, but as I kept listening, I figured out that this album was missing something. It didn't contain songs that stuck in my head that I wanted to keep listening to like (WTS)MG? and Definitely Maybe did have. It was dissapointing to see this album fade so quickly in the charts, but for their next album, hopefully their new producer will give them more of a new sound. All in all, it was a good album, but not great. Oasis could so much better, I think they got a little lazy and sloppy on this one. Hopefully, the new album will sound better and newer, and hopefully it will fare better in the charts.
oasis is a very talented British rock band reminds me of the early days of the British invasion of the sixties somewhat like a mix of the Beatles and the Rolling stones.Be here now by oasis,is a overall good album so if you,re into British rock? I recommend it and give it 4 stars.
[****] the critics! This is a good rock 'n roll album. I hate it when people compare this to their first two albums.This is the first Oasis album I brought. I didn't like it when I first listen to it, but the songs stay with you.This album has replay value even years after I brought it. After listening to the songs, read the lyrics and you see what I mean.
Be Here Now being Oasis 3rd studio album and their 1997 release was highly anticipated both critics and fans alike. The result is a good album but it is not as good as the prior album (What's the Story) Morning Glory?. The songs are very long and sometimes the sound is a bit bloated. The album did amazing and topped the charts in countries such as France, Austria, Sweden and the UK. Songs that standout on this release are "D'You Know What I Mean?" , "Stand by Me", and "All Around the World". 4/5.
every song on it kicks but the song Magic Pie was not all that good. I still like the song. Oasis rules!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
This album was a great deception. The songs are too long, and some of them could be easily cut of the album (My Big Mouth, I Hope I Think I Know, Fade In/Out). Others could be reduced to 4 minutes, and then they would be classics (Stand By Me, All Around The World, It's Getting Better Man). And at least one b-side should be on the album, "Stay Young", from the first single, "D'You Know What I Mean?". But looking back over 10 years, this is a great album, even with so many problems and overproduction. It's strange that the singles work so much better than the album, and it's because some songs are really very good. If the album was about 20 minutes shorter, it would be one of the best albuns in the nineties. Anyway, it was a great mistake, but it is a great album, and definitely worth listening.
To the tipical Oasis fan, and hell, Oasis themselves, this album was a mess. I think that Oasis did reach a breaking point when they created this album, admitting they were plastered, and strung out on drugs. But this is Oasis at their peak: the vocals and guitar are as huge sounding as ever, the songwriting is as good, if not more endearing, than their first two records. Most people think that Oasis lost their touch after (What's the Story) Morning Glory, but if you really ignore the hype surrounding the band and focus on the music, Oasis have created a magnanimous, influential, and all around ballsy rock and roll album. D'you know what I mean?
"...But I just think theres some good sounds on it and it was just a bit scatty and a bit mentally produced but thats who we are man, but I'd say that one (favourite album), so go f#%ken buy cause theres loads left" Liam Gallaghar July 2000.And it is a great album, Definitley Maybe and Whats the story had the "wonderwalls" and "Supersonics" but nothing like this swirl and giant noise of guitar rock.Its a mega mega album and a triumphant album, and definitley not a dissapointment.
This, to put it bluntly, is an amazing album. Sure, it's not their best, but hey, who cares? To me, Definately Maybe deserved 5.5 stars out of 5. Morning glory deserved 6 stars out of 5, and if I could give a greater rating than 5 on this album, I would. I know it is a bit repititous by the time you get to the last couple of songs, but when the first few songs are as good as this, who cares if they go back on themselves? As long as Oasis are recording quality albums like this one, I'll always be a fan.
If you want the best Oasis for the Oasis sound, purchase "Definately Maybe" or "The Masterplan." If you want a great album of a different sound, buy "Be Here Now." The band was on its best behavior and performance, taking the time to make 12 quality tracks.Some of the top tracks, "D'You Know What I Mean," "Fade In/Out" "Magic Pie" and "All Around the World." I hope that on their next album, Noel takes the time to sing lead on a few more songs. I have yet to hear a bad Oasis song with him singing lead.
This album is great from Oasis but maybe not that great than the other albums. This album has a massive sound of rock n roll with all the guitars and electric sounds. And the songs are quite long. I would say that this album is a sort of rock n roll clishe album. Propably my favorite song from this album is It's Gettin' Better (Man! ) because it has got a massive sound and a good old-fashion rock n roll feeling. It sounds good. There are also good songs like D' You Know What I Mean? Be Here Now and The Girl In The dirty Shirt. Mad fer it!
I can't belive how much bad press this album get's. It's not a classic like Morning glory or def maybe but it has some really great songs. Too bad about Fade in-out and Don't go away, the 2 worst songs on the album.
I don't understand why critics, fans, and even Oasis think this was a failure. It's easily their heaviest album through SOTSOG, and it has lyrics that are maybe the band's best. Sure, some of the songs sound distorted amidst the heavy guitar feedback, but the chourses in "Stand By Me," "D'You Know What I Mean?," and "I Think, I Hope, I Know" still shine through. BE HERE NOW even has some experimentation in songs like the countryish "Fade In-Out" that most of their other releases don't have. The Noel sung "Magic Pie" and the self-absorbed "All Around The World" are the only two songs that I skip over. The rest are simply Oasis playing good rock and roll with guitars roaring right behind them. Similar to the Smashing Pumpkins' ADORE, BE HERE NOW is one of this band's greatest accomplishments that basically was overlooked by fairweather "Wonderwall" fans and critics.
I bought this book for my grandson. We have a dog, who he just loves her. He is beginning to read & loves books. He also loves any animal stories as well, especially dog & horse stories.
It's always a burning desire to capture as close the minute details in a scenary picture or the scenery itself. Water often proved to be the hardest to express its formless self.This book discussed in details the interpretation of water features using the different media like oil, pastel, water colour. All along, it had been thought that watercolour produces the best details with depth. But the book shows that other media can achieve similar effects as well.Many examples are discussed in step-by-step approach and illuatsated in sequences to teach about the built-up, so it's a simplified step to learning. Many medium are explore adding to the variety of expression that beginners can explore.Well formatted and recommended for beginners and intermediate painters.
Had not a clue why I chose this from one of the kindle freebies. a bit of a tough read the style is akin to war and peace. Then I realized it was written in 1917. One day one of my work mates was discussing a date and a strange science fiction movie they saw. I saw a preview and that sparked further motivation and understanding of this book.
Saw John Carter and loved it. Good story, action, and scenery of Mars, etc. Reading Princess of Mars on Kindle.My daughter works on the Mars Rover programs so I know the differences between the real and fantasy.Definitely recommend Edgar Rice Burroughs books to everyone for the entertainment value.
Well written story. Hard to read at first with a cumbersome style of language but as you get into it, the story comes alive with great imagination, character development, emotional development, suspense, romance, action, culture, technology and everything else you want in a good book.
I had never read anything by ERB before this, and now he is one of my favorite classic authors. A Princess of Mars is filled with non stop action and excitement.The book begins with john carter, the main character, revealing his past. He does not know how old he is or when he was born, only that he has seen many generations of his family grow up and pass on.After trying to save a dying friend in an Arizona cave, John wakes up alone on a completely different world. It is on this strange world (mars) that he meets Deja Thorris, the martian princess whom John quickly falls in love with.This book is fun from start to finish. Any fan of classic sci fi should read this facinating book.
I find how interesting it is that Hollywood can take things in a book and switch things around without really deleting parts of the story. "john Carter" was very underrated.
I know the book/series is dated, but it's still a terrific read. This man was so far ahead of his time in imagination and futuristic ideas. I read many of his books as a kid and it has been a treat to read this one again. The chivalry and romance and epic adventure is classic even if the "science" is entirely BS. Burroughs' prose makes you long to know what happens next. Can't wait to read more!
I read five of the books in one week!! I couldn't stop! Plots are excellent, action is fantastic, and the language is great too. I've never read a science fiction series so erudite and absorbing.I have no idea why Tarzan gets all the credit.
The concept of being transported to Mars by an out of the body experiance or being lifted to another place is a masterpiece of wisdom by Burroughs considering his time period of life.. I read this book as a nine year old, and have started my son on the entire series last year.. he says "WOW" this is deep..
The writer of the original Tarzan character books uses his wildly creative imagination to create a story line which follows this hero John Carter from the aftermath of the Civil War to his mysterious transportation to Mars. Carter engages with the nine feet tall red warriors and the "little green men" (Is this where that phrase originated?). Mars is strife with the same racist animosity as his dear Earth. His fantastic ability to power through the gravity of Mars places him in a position of power on the planet and enables him to play the hero in big and small events on Mars. The Princess? Yes, she is lovely and lovable, and a bit of a warrior herself. E. R. Burroughs wrote this book for a WW II audience, so your grand or great-granddad and grandma will remember this writer through his books, movies, and TV shows.
Burroughs is probably better known for TARZAN but I enjoyed the John Carter series much more. This is Adventure in a fantastic setting. READ IT forget about the movie.
Picked this up during the hype of the John Carter movie release. The book is a wonderful classic science fiction story, but one should be aware of the time and society during which it was written. The characters do not have modern sensibilities regarding racism and sexism. Still the work is an enjoyable adventure through a rich world.
I read this book because of the movie. But it was nothing like the movie. I give it four stars though cause it was still an excellent read.
Great story. I recommend it to anybody. I wish I would've read it a long time ago; I feel like I was cheated by not being told about this book series when I was younger.
I loved this book! It is no wonder why disney adapted it to the big screen.As with all books turned into movies, the book is different but better. So if you are looking to follow the story of the film... just rewatch the movie lolthe moment I finished this book I went and purchased the other 6 books in the series... :-)
This is a quick read and fast moving book. Don't watch the movie too you've read it. The movie barely does it justice...unique book I would recommend to all
Great book. Quick read. Interesting story. Wasn't as long as I thought it would be but had a great story line that was a real journey to follow
Extra ordinary in both its imagination and the age in which it was written. By far the best of the Mars books. Burroughs ability to paint landscapes with words and easy delivery of emotional gratification makes this worth the read.
This book is exactly what all sci fi and fantasy books should be: imaginative, full of adventure, plenty of action, and so much more. It is by far the most accessible book written more than 50 years ago that I've ever read, making it suitable for all ages. And, as other reviewers have stated, it is not just for boys. It contains strong female characters,considering the time that it was written. If you like adventure novels, you will love this book. I didn't have a problem with the formatting.
It's amazing to learn that this book pre-dates all of modern science fiction. I only heard about it because of the movie (which I haven't seen), so I picked up the book and read it. Outstanding.
I am sorely disappointed that the movie John Carter did not incorporate more of this great work of fiction. It keeps you riveted from the start, the Barsoom of Mr. Burroughs would be a astonishing place to visit.
I read this book when I was in 5th grade. I read it over and over and it ends with a cliff-hanger that tore at my pre-teen heartstrings for several years until a teacher said to me, "did you read the rest of the series?" WHAT??? Paradise!I was lucky enough to have the hardbound edition illustrated by Frank Frazetta. The reviewer who said that the modern cover illustrations are too risque compared to the earlier covers obviously never SAW the earlier covers. This book is an early classic of pulp fiction and cheesecake/beefcake covers have always been a part of the deal.Burroughs was part of a generation of creative brains who would have thrived in the computer era. Thank god they had the chance to make their mark in literature.
Like Eragon...I first watched the movie and really enjoyed it. Afterwards I read the book and realized that the movie was horribly done when compared to the book.I liked all of the character building in the book and thought it had plenty of humor and action. There was no sex and cussing (that I remember) in the book for those that don't like to read that sort of stuff.On a side note...my inner immaturity laughed when the words 'fagged' and 'ejaculated' were used to describe feelings and expressions.Five stars!
I'll admit it freely- I only bought this book because of how desperately I fell in love with the recent Disney movie "John Carter." I just had to read the original story, and I'm not disappointed. For the time period it was written in, A Princess of Mars is well beyond its time, and absolutely satisfies my need for good writing. The storyline is altered from the movie, but a good read nonetheless. I thoroughly enjoy this book and am regretful of not reading it sooner.
We're very entertaining pulp fare reminiscent of the kind of books I read as a kid. I loved the Tarzan series and John Carter didn't disappoint either. Look forward to the further adventures of John Carter.
Edgar Rice Burroughs, well-known as the creator of "Tarzan," was also a pioneer in the realm of science fiction. "A Princess of Mars" was originally written in serial form in 1912. The story is painted in broad strokes, with generous helpings of adventure, combat, and romance. The writing and dialogue sound quaint and stilted to modern ears, and the plot tends to meander. Borroughs' science may strike us today as a bit silly, but for 1912 it's very creative and imaginative. The detailed portrait of Martian society is fascinating."A Princess of Mars" is a classic, and science fiction fans will enjoy it both for its curiosity quotient and its entertainment value.
Almost 30 years ago, my Dad bought me the entire series. I read through "A Princess of Mars" (my first novel) in three days at the age of 10. I read of the wonderful, fantastic adventures of John Carter, and was hooked--not just on Edgar Rice Burroughs, but also on science fiction, science, and, most importantly, reading.These books are not grandiose intellectual tomes. They are just pure fun! And that pure fun will inspire kids brought up with video games and Pokemon to go back to the basics and learn the joys of reading.Other reviews mention the need to get the second and third books in the series. I recommend you get them all. You'll never be satisfied until you're through them all, and then you'll be disappointed there are no more.
Burroughs tells his stories in a way that captures your mind and involves you. The Princess of Mars we wholly unique and refreshing!
Retired confederate soldier and southern gentleman John Carter is pursued by Indians, and through unexplainable circumstances finds himself transported to Barsoom, also known as the planet Mars. There he finds a dying planet of brutal and untamed savagery, contrasted sharply with the rich cultures of ancient races. Arriving alone, naked and friendless, "A Princess of Mars" tells the tale of how John Carter, with the aid of his earthly strength and agility, sets forth on an incredible adventure against enormous odds to rescue the beautiful Dejah Thoris, the incomparable Princess of Helium.One of Edgar Rice Burrough's earliest works, the first chapter in the Martian series is also one of his finest. A page turning adventure with lots of action make John Carter one of Burrough's most beloved heroes. His imagination ran wild in creating the martian landscape, and this is a delight to read for all ages.
I won't rehash the plot; plenty of reviewers here tell what the story is about. I will say, though, that this book begins the career of Edgar Rice Burroughs and that it's success leads the author to create Tarzan, Pellucidar, and many other stories. And more Barsoom! John Carter, Confederate veteran, fights, runs, leaps, loves, befriends and brings the races of dying Mars together when he isn't busy waging war or rescuing maidens. Actually, he brings the races of dying Mars together WHILE waging war and rescuing maidens. One can clearly see how Tars Tarkas begat Chewbacca, and how John Carter himself begat Flash Gordan, Luke Skywalker, and Superman... yes, Superman.And the second book, _The Gods of Mars_, is even better!
I really like the video "Hoopnotica". The instructions are easy to follow but hard to master. I'm glad I can rewind. I would recommend this video to everyone how wants to learn to hoop.
I enjoyed this DVD since I am totally hooked on hula hoops right now. Its fun yet basic. Just teaches the basic moves and how to start out. I haven't yet mastered the corkscrews and I do wish the corkscrew lesson was more detailed, but this video has a good flow and I really enjoy it.
This was an awesome book but the part where Jackson dies I think is the saddest part of the book because it hurts bad when you lose a best friend
My Book The Gadget was a good book I would recomded this book to someone who like a action book. This book was about a 13 boy who was sent to the war to help his dad. His name was Stephen he was sent from war-torn England so he could help his father, his fathers is becomeing really obcess with the Gadget. What is the Gadget if you want to know what the Gadget is you have to read it a fine out.
The Gadget is a book about a boy who lives with his mother in England during a war. His father lives and works on a military base in Los Alamos. His father is a physicist on the base. He is one of many physicists on the base that is designing and making the A-bomb. The boy meets a friend that lives neer the base and they become good friends. If you like books with action and a little mystery at the same time, this book is for you. This book will keep you guessing all the way till the end.
You only have to see the Jigglers at the live shows to understand what appeal this band has not only in Boston, but all over the country. Jiggle The Handle" is respected by musicians and fans alike, and their jamming is legendary. This album recorded live at The Stone Coast Brewery is a great follow up to "Mrs. White's Party", "Three Sets" and "In It Again".
This is a fairly good import of the erotica single. It features a couple good remixes but I recommend the other Erotica maxi-single listed instead.
This case fit my TX well, with good materials and workmanship. It works to protect while allowing access to all ports and buttons and is easy to open. No complaints on the fit and finish.
Perfect size for my morning latte or cappuccino. I fill it 2/3 full to leave room for a little foam before I transfer the liquid to my 16 oz. travel mug. It pours cleanly from the spout. Stainless steel pitcher can get quite hot to the touch from steaming, obviously, but the handle never does.
Very nice! Great quality. I was surprised, however that I could actually use a bigger one. Even when I make just one latte, my espresso machine does such an awesome job at creating foam - my milk generally foams up and over the pitcher.
Received the item and it is just like advertised. Purchased it to replace a small frothing pitcher so I can foam milk for more than one cup of coffee.Nice quality pitcher.
When I am making my daily latte, I always start by filling this halfway up with milk and putting it in my refrigerator while I get my machine set up. When my espresso machine is ready, I pull it out of the refrigerator and start frothing the milk. I can easily access the milk and make some good froth & heat up the milk quickly. Works great!
This pitcher is well constructed and is the right size to froth enough milk for 2 drinks at once. No need for anything more.
I bought a new latte machine and this cup for milk frothing. I am so glad I bought the 20 Oz as the milk really expands when you froth it. Easy to clean, I do not put it in the dishwasher though, just hand wash. works great
a perfect size for making two cafe macchiato's or similar drink. Heavy SS gage that I expect to last a lifetime.
I've had this steaming pitcher for a month and it is already rusting, however that can be fixed with the right cleaning product so it doesn't really bother me. This pitcher is really sleek looking and holds 20 ounces if you fill it to the top.
This item is just what I needed for our new espresso machine. The item is nice and large enough to froth milk without making a mess.
Nice handle, fits perfectly my espresso machine. Shape of the nose makes sure milk does not spill.Overall, pretty good for its purpose, though a little pricey.
I bought this for my wife to go along with her espresso machine. I like the construction of the pitcher but would have liked it to be a bit heavier.
I have read all of Joan Hess's Claire Malloy mysteries and love them. The author uses clean language, and is very amusing and entertaining. I like a good mystery as well. In this one, she is looking for people's stolen pets. I haven't finished it yet, so it will be fun to see what happened to the animals.
I bougth halo 1-3 book package, so far I read the fall of reach and I am reading the flood, but I already can tell the fall of reach it's and outstabding book from eric, he refer's so many details specially in the space battles, it makes you imagine the cruisers the fights the crossfire, its exciting, I never in mi life read a book so fast, every time I decided to stop mi head did't stop imagine what will happen next or how it would look like.
I received this product on time and it has been a treat to read these books. It was kind of strange though, because my copy of the Fall of Reach is very worn, but the second two books are brand new. I guess I can't complain though. I recommend these books to anyone that is interested in science fiction, even if you have no interest in the Halo series of games.
The books were written very well in the story style of the game. Because of that it added quite a lot of depth to the characters and explained a lot of the less-elaborated on nuances of the storyline.
THis was purchased as a Christmas gift to my nephew. It came rapidly in the mail and was in great condition. My nephew was exstatic to be recieving this. Class A job.... thanks a bunch
If you like the game and don't mind reading you'll love the book. The book the Flood is pretty much a recap of the first game, but First strike is about the area between Halo one and two. Also, Fall of Reach tells where Master Cheif came from.
This books are very useful on understanding the game if you didn't know it before. And if you are a fanatic of Halo you will like all the action involved in this wonderful books.
When i first played the game halo i loved it. The gameplay was great music was beutifully done and supprisingly the story was expertly told.So when a halo book came out i jumped on it to see the back round of the story. And behold it turned out great. But its no literary master piece. To compare it, its like reading a Tom Clancy novel. The author seems to have a technical name for just about every piece of equipment.So to round this review up if you like halo pick up the boxs set but be warned the series is written by two author and you may feel a chnge of writting inbetween the books, but its still all good.
this is actually my second set i bought; i think i lent my first set to a friend who i no longer remember and therefore cannot get back from. obviously i liked these books enough to buy them again despite the fact that i might find my old ones later.
These books are great. It starts off in a suspenseful environment and Eric writes this so well too keep the reader well entertained and keeps it with the videogame.The price and shipping timing were excellent. Go Eric and Go Amazon!!!!
If you are a fan of the Halo games, you shouldn't be wasting your time reading this!
excellent source of entertainment and knowledge of the Halo universe.Love the books, love the game. Love the game, love the books. It's thatsimple.
The author is knowledgable and gets right to the point. Many important questions are raised. I am shocked when I realize the effect on my body of processed "food-shaped products", I am thankful to this author for the challengin my beliefs. Some of the language seems overly critical and extreme, but reasonable solutions are provided, and when I suspended my reactions I could let the good stuff sink in. Share your copy with your MD and see what s/he does with it.---DD
Not necessarily the best collection of Big Band music, but a very nice assortment. It's a good introduction, well worth several listens.
Great product! I received the product quickly and found it to be exactly as expected. It matched well with smaller and larger seperator plates purchased 4+ years ago. The Wedding cake it was used for received excellent reviews.
I bought these cards for my son. He is a big Oakland Raiders fan and he loves them. The quality of the cards is good. Basically, what you see is what you get.
This book is more than about relating to romantic love but also learning to love human kind, parent to child, yourself, etc. I really grasped the concept of how love has to be practiced everyday and like a skilled painter doesn't all of a sudden pick up a brush and create a masterpiece on a canvas, love is also an art that you have to practice everyday. You have to be a loving person in all that you do, not just romantically, not just loving your family, not just loving mankind, etc. It truly makes sense to me and since reading it, I've felt more appreciative and more open minded.
I echo the sentiment that this is not a self-help book. If you're Joe Six Pack looking for some quick-fix PowerPoint presentation style solution to your marriage problems, you won't find that solution here. If that's your lot, just find a therapist who can set you straight in person. This book is a good old-fashioned Marxist-style critique, complete with denunciations of the connection between love and capitalism. In some ways, this book is more about capitalism than it is about love. I just wish Fromm were still around to write a book about Internet dating.
This book contains information to help understanding oneself as well as relationships that one person has. I would recommend it to people who are confused in themselves and the relation that they have with others.
I have found this book to be one of the BEST books ever written about how one should really talk to and take care of oneself. Over the years, the idea of 'learning' how to really take care of oneself is soooooooo important and I have found this book to offer the central theme to both 'having a life' and 'having a good life'. I highly recommend the book to all people from late teens to early 'elders'.
I first read this book about 30 years ago and loved it. I re-read it recently to see if it's still meaningful and: yes, it is. It is not a recipe book on how to love and catch a mate. It's more of a philosophical work on why love is important in our lives, including romantic love, parental love, frindship and love in society at large. It also explains what happens in societies where material values take presedence over love for a fellow human being. The book is a classic, easy to read and understand, and the content should be common knowledge. Unfortunately, it isn't. Highly recommended.
Recomendable para cualquier persona que tenga preguntas en relación con su sanidad amatoria
Very interesting book. Nothing really new, but a lot of obvious stuff we normally don't think about. Will make you think twice about your current relationship, and whether it is worth being in one at all!If you have some spare time and would like to know a side opinion about love - READ IT!
Whenever an embroiderer asks "What book should I get to learn about historical blackwork", the answer is always "Blackwork by Mary Gostelow".This book is very well written, and whilst I do not agree with all her conclusions about what blackwork is - her reasoning is logical and she includes lovely pictures - both of historical and modern blackwork.I would have liked to see some more pictures of historical works (especially colour photos) - and would have liked her to address some popular misconceptions about blackwork.All in all - I really do love this book and it is one that I always recommend.
I ENJOYED THE BOOK A LOT, BEING A MCGREGOR FAN MYSELF,BUT I WOULD PREFER THAT IT HAD MORE INFO ON HIM AND NOT AS MUCH ON HIS FILMS AND THE PEOPLE IN THEM. OVER ALL, THE BOOK WAS GOOD AND HAD A LOT OF INTERESTING FACTS IN IT AND ANY EWAN MCGREGOR FAN WOULD AGREE WITH ME THAT HE IS PRETTY HOT IN THE COLOR PICTURES IN THE BOOK!
An eye-opener. Timely material, but sadly, very few people pay attention to topics like this, only serious seekers of truth. I can recommend this without any reservation as a new way to see the lost art of prayer.
Not only is this man brilliant, he's also very easy on the eyes! ;-)Beyond the obvious, though, the importance of this book at this point in time cannot be overemphasized. When we are all feeling overwhelmed and powerless about what appears to be "World War III," Gregg Braden points out that we are not powerless at all. Utilizing his tremendous awarenss of prophecy and the science of human technology, this man pulls together ancient thinking with current wisdom in a way that creates hope, excitement, and empowerment. I love the way he thinks.
Braden's book has some important information about prayer as a positive force in life and contains material from the Dead Sea Scrolls that's been suppressed by both Jews and Christians alike. But it also offers a hopeful type of prayer that anyone form any religion is able to use.THE ISAIAH EFFECT is a deeply mind-changing book and takes some time to sink in. I'd recommend reading it in small chunks.My only complaint is that Braden could have condensed this into a long magazine article. He repeats himself so many times that I found myself skipping several pages at a time at each sitting.Lynn
I REALL LIKE THIS SONG....VERY CATCHY IN WORDS AS WELL AS MUSIC.MY FAVORITE VERSIONS ARE:THE FULL INTENTION MIXES!GRAB A COPY...WELL WORTH IT!
I own almost every disc that William Parker has performed on and of the albums on which he the leader and primary composer this is the finest. Nice heads and song developement, strong soloing throughout and a spirituality that we do not often find in creative / free music. This is life affirming music that will surely make you think and appreciate what we as a collective share in this human experience. Parker is strong, his playing muscular yet graceful. Honest music presented without pretention. Highly recommended
Consider this the best album in the Blue Series, although it's not in the Blue Series. Powerful, extremely thoughtful and spontaneous improvisation, and a monstrous, earth-shattering groove from Parker and Drake. It also seems just about official with this album that Rob Brown is one of the absolutes of music in our time. His playing is truly singular and always full of surprise. The only question is, "Why hasn't someone given Louis Barnes the album under his own name that he so obviously deserves?"
First of all I have to comment on what someone said about Otep down there, Otep will always kick Sugarcomas ass, in every aspect. Better screams, better lyrics, better music. Actually the screaming here just sounds like she's constipated, but I still love the cd.
I enjoyed this book. The plot is set in medieval England and focuses on a young woman named Eveline who feels herself compelled to marry her deliverer from the Welsh. Her deliverer is forced to embark on a Crusade to the Holy Land before their marriage can take place. The two will be betrothed for at least 3 years, if the man returns alive. In the meantime, he has a very chivalrous and attractive nephew who will stand as Eveline's guardian. I was surprised by the ending which is unlike other Sir Walter Scott books. A good read!
Kathe writes the book in a manner that enables the reader to pick and choose the right devotional resource to fit the moment. This approach provides a flexible, sensitive resource that speaks to a variety of circumstances when one may face the journey of grief. The book truly is a helpful lifetime resource. -- Carol A. Poore, author, writer and speaker specializing in topics of personal purpose, leadership and career/life direction.
Dont Give Up is one of Chicane's most commercially sucessful tracks (alongside Offshore and Saltwater) and i thoroughly reccomend it. One major gripe i have is that there are only three tracks on the CD, thus not making much value for money, but this track , which makes Bryan sound good, is still worth it. The Tomski mix is probably the best, with the strings at the beginning (at around the 2 minute mark)a beautiful addition.
I cannot recommend this CD too highly. It is a stunningly brilliant, eclectic mix of ballads that ranks near the top of the immense body of work that Engelbert has produced in his long and illustrious career. "Definition of Love" was crafted with tender loving care to every aspect involved in its creation. The selection of songs, the lush orchestrations, Engelbert's phrasing and interpretation of his material collectively reinforce my opinion that he is indeed the greatest baritone of the past century. Every track is an absolute gem, but if I had to select only one song it would be "She." Go out and purchase this CD today; in fact, get two copies and give one of them to someone else who appreciates great music that is saturated with Engelbert's unequaled interpretative artistry. I can only hope that The King of Romance continues with his recording career for many more years because vocal talents such as his only come along once in a lifetime.
This is one of the most refreshing books of the subject of running I have ever read. I heard the author speak on CNN and was very intrigued by his technical and philosophical running advice. After reading the book, I tried incorporating many of the ideas into my running form. It really seemed to help lift me to a higher level of running right away. I really feel the difference in my stride and agility, as my running seems more fluid now and less mechanical. I would reccommend this book to any beginner, intermediate or advanced runner looking for a new approach to improving their running performance.
I am 43 and had quit running because of knee and ankle pain. Then I read this book, and discovered that I had literally been pounding the pavement when I ran before. My joints couldn't handle it. Now I have no joint or back pain when I run. I feel like a kid again. This book is the best money I have spent in years. And for the reviewer that thinks this book gives you too much to think about when you run, I recommend forgetting the book and running barefoot. I suspect that you will end up incorporating the really important Chi Running techniques this way. Myself, I'd rather read the book and run with shoes.
ChiRunningMy running coach told me this book would be a requirement for me if I was going to truly attain the goals I set for myself concerning running. I purchased it and have already read the book 3 times over. It truly teaches you a better and easier form of running. I have already increased my speed without any more effort. In fact, less effort. The book touches on every aspect of ones life and teaches you how to have a well balanced, well rounded life.I would recommend this book to anyone that is a serious runner or a beginner runner that wants to really learn to run.
Good, common sense tips here regarding proper, low-impact running technique. The book advises the runner on mental focus and steers readers toward proper posture, foot placement and positioning. The basis of the book is similar to Romanov's Pose Method, also useful for reducing wear and tear.Pain in my hamstrings, knees and calves seems to be reduced using the tips found in Chi Running. Nothing earth-shattering, but worth the price for the frequent runner.
ChiRunning helped me look at my running in a whole new way. It has improved my technique, but probably more importantly it has stimulated my motivation, improved my entire running program, given me tools and techniques to use in other areas of my life. Thank you, Danny Dreyer, for an informative, entertaining book on ChiRunning and ChiLiving!
This book is definately the best book for reference when learning how to run correctly.Its principles add mileage to your daily run. There is a lot of information in the book so I would have it on your shelf for quick reference. If you want to learn how to run... and have always hated the way it makes you feel. This book will get you through the tough spots so you can use running as a fitness regimine as well as a way to clear your mind. WELL DONE!!!
I can truly say that this has made my running more enjoyable, more pain-free, and much more of a learning experience than just a way to suffer through exercise. I've applied it's principles to other areas of my life as well, including biking at the same cadence I'm running (180 bpm for me).
For Kate, who posted a little over a month ago, yes, the running technique in this book will eliminate your shin splints. I've had shin splints for about 15 years, and ChiRunning enabled me to run without my shins hurting. I had never thought that would be possible for me.
Heard many wonderful comments on this book and it was recommended to give as a gift. Receiver seems very pleased with the choice!
Training for the Salt Lake City 2007 (my first) marathon, i got injured and doubted whether I would be able to do it at all. After reading this and applying it's techniques, i found that my technique was all wrong (or non-existent). Determination and commitment were not enough for an endurance race! I thought running was something you 'just did'. Wrong.Not only did I finish under 4 hours, but i had an injury-free race and even felt fine afterwards.That was all due to the book - I can't praise it enough. I also bought the video too. It was the best money I spent on running gear - after my shoes!
First and foremost: do not have it as e-book. This is probably true for most of manual-alike books (I had similar experience with a swimming manual), but with ChiRunning you are going to miss the at-a-glance capability only the paper can give you.Anyway, this is indipendent from the book, that is a GREAT book on running.I have read a great number of books on sport, several manuals and guides: this is something "different". The approach is different: here Danny, the author, start from Tai Chi to get to a new running concept.Well done, interesting even for a convinced Cartesian as myself, always critical towards Oriental disciplines (notwithstanding my long residential experience in Far East).Other than paper edition, I would suggest DVD: ChiRunning videos you can recover from the network are not exaustive (not at all).Probably a stage with a Certified ChiRunning Instructor would be the best completion, but unfortunately courses seem to be available in US only.
I have taken the author's ChiRunning workshop (which was outstanding), and this book details everything he talked about in the workshop, and a lot more on top of that -- plus, I have the book to refer to at my leisure.The techniques for running the author describes are impeccable, because the physics behind them are impeccable. The discussions, diagrams, and photographs are detailed and specific. The metaphysics... they work for the author, and if they work for you, so much the better, but even if they don't, the material in the book will be directly applicable to any fitness runner, racer, triathlete, or sportsperson.When I started doing ChiRunning I acheived *faster*, *easier* running, lower incidence of soreness and no incidence of injury, and feeling better during and after runs. I cannot expect more from a book on running, and have gotten *less*, from several books.
I highly recommend this book. The techniques in the book really do work, no matter what one thinks about the philosophy behind it. I'm 23 and have been running regularly for about 12 years, though only semi-competitively for about a year. In my sophomore year in college, I was training for the possibility of going into OCS and ended up overtraining. I suffered a relatively serious stress fracture by doing the things that the author of this book warns against. I recently completed a marathon using the techniques in this book, and was amazed at the improvement in my time, and the way my body felt after the race. These techniques are solid, especially for experienced runners looking to improve their distances/times. The Eastern philosophy sprinkled throughout the book is entertaining and, as with all philosophy, good brain candy to chew on.
Many young pianists have the manual skills and dexterity to master these pieces but . . . the feeling and interpretation that Ms Bardin brings to us here in nothing less than marvelous. She puts you in another world.
As an aspiring writer, I bought this book to study the style of a well-reputed short story writer. I expected it to be boring reading. Not only did I get an invaluable lesson on how to write tightly woven, meaningful, and highly insightful stories, I enjoyed every one and was sorry when the 1200+ page book ended.
Mr. Trevor's stories are heartbreaking in their simplicity and clarity. Most often, he dissects the illusions which enable people to survive--and which are so very sad. After seven or eight Trevor stories, you begin to wonder if it is even possible to be honest with yourself. In this age where fiction so often is reduced to description, Mr. Trevor still believes in writing about love and death, honor and betrayal, duty and neglect. His physical world is narrow--usually limited to small-town or rural Ireland--but his emotional world is limitless. If you want to know how short stories should be written, read this.
I would have liked a little more Broadway in this CD, but it's wonderful to listen to and the Harlem Gospel Choir rocks me down the freeway on my way home from work.
Baseball Pals is written by Matt Christopher and it is about 97 pages and it has short chapters. If you like baseball books and one were there is a kid that wants to play one spot and there is a kid that is a lot better than him at that spot and they are the best of friends. This book is one that you would like if you have a lower reading level. One thing I didn't like was that there wasn't that much detail on the characters, but there is a lot of detail towards the games and what they are thinking in there heads
This book was a really good book. I especially like how it's a sports novel but also explains life lessons. The story is about two friends that both want to pitch for their baseball team but the team only wants one pitcher, one of the friends is the captain of the team and decides the positions and assigns himself pitcher. The other friend feels left out and they split up. This book has some great morals, 1. Don't single one person out. 2. Let everyone try. 3.realize your friends. By: Dominic, A Sixth Grader from Mainep.s. Matt Christopher ROCKS!!!
the second album in my dee dee list barbara sings as an angel and dee dee plays like a god
This is a great sophmore effort from Sparta. From "The guns of memorial park" to "Splinter" this has to be hands down the biggest suprise album that I purchased in 2004. While hints of At The Drive In still float in their music, Sparta has definetely struck out to seperate themselves. A track for those just getting into the band that you may want to check out is "Vacant Skies" on the Atticus: Dragging the Lake Volume II, A track well worth mentioning. Check out both albums you will not be disappointed at all. Maybe someday we will see a few songs with The Marts Volta and Sparta, can you imagine the possibilites?!?!?!
What's wrong with a band "branching out" and experimenting with their music? Sparta has really grown up since thier first album. Jim Ward's voice "booms" during the song "Guns of Memorial Park" and the lyrics are awesome! Someone else try and decipher the meaning to the lyrics. The song "Tensioning" is powerful accompanied by a beautiful guitar. Ward sounds really "hurt" in this song and reading the lyrics will make you see that he is describing very troubling times.
I think Sparta have finally carved their niche with this album and proved that they can do amazing things post At The Drive-In. Amazing songs pretty much throughout, especially with "While Oceana Sleeps", Breaking The Broken", "Travel By Bloodline". The closer to the album "Splinters" is absolutely amazing. All in all I think a very strong follow-up album to Wiretap Scars. The only reason I'm giving it 4/5 is because I think the production and mixing is a little below what Jerry Finn can do. But again this is simply my opinion and I do realize that they were probably going for a "rawer" sound that the last album.
this cd is awesome. tho i wont say its an improvement from wiretap, they do experiment a little. tracks 1, 3, 4, 5, 6, 8-10, and 14 are all good tracks IMO. but the stand outs are tensioning and while oceana sleeps.
Being a avid werewolf fan I also bought this book cause of the cool cover. Gary does an excellent job making you care deeply for the the main Characters (Kyna and Cyrus). I did not want to finish the book and just wanted it to keep going and never end. I have searched for another book that would stand up to this one as far as the werewolf part and romance. I have not found one yet.
Bertram Wolfe's original 1939 story of Diego Rivera's life and times. The book contains many great photos of his murals, both wide shots and close-ups. There are 167 black and white plates of either his work or of him and Frida, her work and their friends.The Contents include: A Child is Born, Wonder Child, The Education of an Artist, A Painter in Search of Himself, Mexican Interlude, Painter's Parish, On the Road to Cubism, Cubism by the Square Yard, War-time Paris, The Road Back, Angelina Waits, Rediscovery of Mexico, A False Start, A Red Star Rises, Brief Brotherhood, A World on a Wall, Guadalupe Marin, Struggle for Survival, Journey to Moscow, Cast into Outer Darkness, Frieda Kahlo, Revolution in the Academy, Painter of Palaces, Discovering Ameria, This New Age, The Battle of Rockefeller Center, Solitude, No More Walls. The book contains 420 pages.I hope this helps in your decision to purchase this very detail, wonderful out-of-print book.
I have 4 kids 2 with a disability and this song melts my heart everytime I hear it and gives me so much hope.I really cry everytime I listen to it.When you believe,miracles do come true.
I had been looking for a book like this one for a long time and this one fills the bill. However, you're going to need a magnifying glass to read it- the print is REALLY small. I guess they had to use a small font to keep the book a reasonable size, but it induces more than a little eyestrain if you read it for more than a few minutes at a time.
This book provides a good overview of what children should learn year by year, subject by subject, and how parents can help them achieve their educational goals. One reviewer complained that the authors overemphasized the importance of limiting T.V., and reading to kids, but I am a teacher and can tell you that many parents don't bother to take those basic but crucial steps with their kids. The authors offer a good analysis of the problems with public education today (which both parents and schools can contribute to), but their main solution to the problems of the educational system is standardized testing. As a teacher in Texas, where high-stakes testing rules the public school system, I have learned that placing such overwhelming emphasis on an annual test does not raise the standards of students' educations; it has actually caused too many schools to teach to the test, cheat, and neglect the needs of gifted students in order to prep the slower ones for the tests.
I'll declare from the outset that I haven't seen the film, so I don't know if the music unfolds on the disc in the same order as it does in the film. My guess is probably not, and therefore the (much less interesting) orchestral score wouldn't drag the chain like it does on the cd - which is very much an album of 2 distinct halves. The initial block of country, country swing, "novelty" and tex/mex tracks move along very nicely until the disembodied dynamics of the orchestral movements grind towards a finale. Still, the format does make it easier to switch off after the first section, rather than skipping tracks here and there. Hey, maybe that's why the distributors did it that way. Doh!!
After several months of searching, as this book was already out of print, I finally located a used copy and it turned into the best buy for me in a long time. With an extensive index and related subject references at the end of each chapter, navigating the book is easy. It's size is enough to make most readers weak in the knees, but if it's treated more as a reference book to be used as the situation arises, you'll soon reserve a place of honor on the desk for easy reach. Most of the instructions are easy to understand, even for beginners like myself. There are some areas I've avoided for when I feel more comfortable, but that is a very small portion of the book. I do sometimes wish the examples were a little less basic to help take the reader beyond the very simplest concepts of database management. But, then again that's what really makes this book so helpful in the first place. After two years of regular use, I still refer to it for a refresher.
I got a Creative Zen Vision for Christmas and I'm been sold since. First off, Apple's iPod (I have a second generation version and I just sold my Nano) has a great design and easy-to-use interface but honestly, I don't think the sound quality is all that amazing. Reading about Creative's products, I was interested to hear if the sound quality really was better than iPod. The reviews were true - sound quality on this PVP is simply amazing. iPods lacked bass, this player thumps on my Bose QuietComfort 2's. The screen is large enough to watch videos on (I watched several when I flew back to school). The player is meant to be held in your hand and as mentioned... it's meant to play portable video, not to as a replacement to the home theater. Check this player out (or the new Creative Zen Vision: M) before you drop money on the new iPod. You won't regret the decision.
Have had this for almost a year now.Pros:The battery life is good.FM radio and recording.Video out.Removable batteryCan also double as a portable hard disk for photos during travel (bought the flash card adapter for SD card use)Cons:The video angle can get irritating as you have to look straight at it but when (if) found, its very good (but not as good as PSP)I would recommend this over the iPod as I've used both. Its also easier (and MUCH faster) to transfer videos to the Zen than to the iPod.
This was one of the best books I've read all year. I loved reading about all the family members' personalities, some of which were very familiar. My favorite part was the reunion itself, when all the main characters were together. There was more fun stuff going on at the end, at the wedding of a cousin; plus a big surprise at a family meeting. After the reunion the story turns to resolving the personal crises of the cousins in romance-novel fashion, with some overly long, somewhat repetitive love scenes. But the general theme running throughout the story is a strong sense of family that can bring tears to one's eyes. It's all about love.
Excellent book. Lots of twist and turns and it shows the love of family and how love is the glue to keeping any family together. I love Brenda Jackson's books and this one is another one of her well written novels that I thoroughly enjoyed.
This was the first Brenda Jackson book I've read. I was really into the book the whole time but was greatly disappointed in the ending. It seemed to me as thought the author put a lot of details and drama throughout the book and then such a flat/dry ending. Overall a good read. I do recommend it.
A really really great book. A true page turner. Written in Mrs. Jackson's usual style that is uniquely her own. I strongly suggest you pick up a copy and after pick up "The Savvy Sistahs". (the sequel that tells Brandy's story)
This is a reissue of a 1964 work. MacIntyre provides a new introduction that critically reviews what he sees as the strength and weaknesses of the book. The book itself, however, is unchanged from the 1964 text.Beginners will find this a difficult book to work through. MacIntyre presumes the reader has a basic understanding of the ideas and philosophers he discusses.But for those with adequate background this is a wonderful book, full of many insights. Be warned, though, this book is not a neutral review of the subject matter. In this book MacIntyre lays the groundwork for his own particular version of ethics (developed most fully in After Virtue).Much of the book is dense and part of it is, arguably, poorly written. But it is worth the work needed to get through it.
Hawkmoon, Duke of Koln, is a resistance leader in the fight against the Dark Empire. Knowing this, the Mad God, with the power of the amulet of the Runestaff, arranges to kidnap Hawkmoon's wife, Yisselda.The Eternal Champion has no option but to try and get her back, even in the face of the Mad God's power.
Seriously - take this film for what it is, watch some of the best actresses ever chew the scenery and enjoy! Don't expect anything too profound - but watch the faces! Just watching Emmanuel Beart pout is worth the cost of the film alone. This is a film in love with the idea of woman but appalled at the reality. Understand that and all else becomes clear. I rate this as one of my top 50 films because I enjoy watching actors act with subtle changes in facial expressions - only the most skilled can do it (without resorting to stock expressions a la Keanu Reaves)and this film is filled with some of the best.Oh by the way of you are a fan of cheesy French Rock and Roll I deny you not too hum along to the first number. The UK DVD has the full version of this as an extra.
Having caught this cinema release in Dec '02, I was counting the days until I could get my hands on my own copy! I had the girls in work dancing to the internet soundtrack - what a riot!AND WHAT A CAST! Eight beautiful, sexy and wonderful actors.Vanilla DVD a little disappointing - What I would have given for interviews, especially with Catherine and Fanny!A MUST SEE!
I've loved this movie for the longest and I'm so glass that it was available. Great customer service from the vendor and a quality product. So excited to add it to my collection.
it announces the dawn of a terrible war. Nick has landed a new REFERENCE work here, I'm sure he will get lots of high level soundtracks to do in the near future.This soundtrack is immensely powerful and moving. I strongly urge you to listen to it on a powerful system with deep bass capacities!.I HIGHLY recommend it. Repeted listenings is unavoidable, it's so much deep and moving. the movie itself was reference imho.
Like the movie, this score draws the listener into the feel, action, suspense and drama of the story. Like all great scores, this too is great to listen to while reflecting on the events of the movie/true events, and/or prepare you to see it again.
They aren't entirely clear this isn't a linear follow up to the first DVD in the "Series" which is focused on technique and movement. This one is more of a straight up workout dvd that is presented over 3 levels depending on your own fitness level. It's not bad and I do hope the series comes back.
Perhaps the finest spiritual book in print, Kazantzakis' _Zorba_the_Greek_ simultaneously praises the spirit and the body, affirming human existence like no other tale around.Alexis Zorba is a hero the likes of which haven't been seen since Odysseus or Sinbad the Sailor. He combines gruff physicality with love of life without falling into the selfish hedonism one might expect. Zorba is indulgent, but never in such a way that his character is destroyed.Zorba incarnates the soul, both for himself and for the reader. The "Zorbatic" theology provides for the world a God and a belief in that God that refuses to deny life, never turning against what it is to live.
On several unrelated occasions through college and a bit afterwards, I was told by various folk that I "was Zorba," or was like Zorba, or was "a Zorba". I knew of the reference, but having never read the book did not understand its implications. I recommend this book not because I subsequently found the comparison to be flattering (I did), but rather because Kazantzakis is able to grab hold of grand romantic themes - youth, idealism, nationality, tradition - and really give them a solid drubbing. Similarly I would recommend "A Hero For Our Time", by Mikhail Lermontov. Good, earthy, bookworm-bashing timepieces, both.
Alexis Zorba is one of the most highly fleshed out, full bodied characters of all time His philosophy and random acts of "insanity" may very well change your way of thinking and of living life.
Zorba is perhaps the most memorable of characters. His ethos and pathos speak to each of us. He is ebullient, passionate, bruttish and fragile. He is alive with the questions of humanity and the pathos of Greek heroism. It is sad to finish the novel. Comforting to find him waiting in its pages.
Instead of referring to Jessye Norman as "Diva", we should refer to her as the "Supreme Diva". Her interpretation of French and German repertoire is unequalled. Miss Norman's rich, oceanic voice enraptures the listener. Buy this recording...you will not be disappointed.
I have had a pair for over a year. I travel to Europe quite a bit and have been very pleased with them on planes. They really help to make air travel tolerable. However, on trains (Amtrak, MetroNorth) they pick up a slight buzz every once in a while. Also, if my cell phone is powered on and within 1-2 feet of the Bose, they pick up a buzz every 5 minutes - very annoying and makes the Bose almost worthless. Bose technical support responded with a polite, "... There is so much potential for electronic pollution that it is nearly impossible to create an electrnoic product that is not subject to some kind of interference." For $299, they should be able to eliminate the interference or be more upfront with their potential customers. Or at least, engineer them so that you could use them as regular headphones w/o the noise reduction on.If cell phones are allowed on planes, I would not recommend this product.
I am overall very delighted. The headphones are sitting tight on the ears, are comfortable for hours, even if you wear glasses. The mentioned pressure is negligible and at least they produce a warm and pleasent sound. I listen mostly to classical music, so, I can't say much about other categories. With my Ipod they sound great, also with my PSP. I like the feature to disconnect the cords and have a cordless noise canceling device. I tested it in the parked car with the engine on and the A/C running on high. It is as advertised an oasis of silence. I compared them to my AKG HEARO 999 AUDIOSPHERE I, which was twice as much, and I like them more. They are well manufactured, there is no jiggle, and the carriage bag is very nice. Afterall, I don't think they should be used on skateboards (for security reasons!), or in the gym, they are too expensive to risk a damage.
These earphones are fabulous! For my, noisy enviroments aren't a problem anymore. Once you put them on, you are the only one in the room! The earpieces are very comfortable.
I have owned a Bose QC2 for a couple of years and I can assure you that your money is well spent if you are a frequent long haul flyer. As a business traveller who takes more than 100 flights a year, I have tried various types of phones (noise cancel/regular type of various designs - over the ear, in-ear, behind the ear, etc. from Sony, JVC, Panasonic, Grado) and this one comes out winner hands down. If you are an audiophile and do not have requirements for noise cancellation, go for a Grado. But don't leave home without a Bose QC2 if you are a road warrior.P.S. 1) I find QC2 more comfortable than QC3 on long flights.2) Most airlines now offer decent noise cancellation phones on business and first class, but they come with proprietary connectors...so, if you want to listen to your own stuff, stick with the QC2.
As usual, another quality Bose product, however it is tired and has been replaced by a newer version of this model which I understand is more effective at canceling out noises.
my set of Bose QuietComfort 2 Noise cancelling headphones were purchased at a kiosk located in the heart of the Denver International Airport. i had heard of such noise cancel products and the use at the airport and on the flight were the perfect tests. this was over ten years ago the technology had only recently been made available to the public after years of perfection worn by pilots, maintenance workers and all who required phonic protection. The sound quality blew me away as i heard nuances in old familiar recordings i had never noticed and i could even run the vacuum cleaner without interference. The thing that really sold me was the genus of a design that allowed for the ease of replacement of the sound cord, the one part which always seemed to wear out or loss of signal because of weakened wiring, when meanwhile the speakers themselves are perfectly operational. Instead of losing an entire unit for replacement you can simply replace the cord. Perfection. Thank you
This book covers Grant's life from when he was young all the way though to his death. The book showed us what a complex and interesting person Grant was. I truly enjoyed reading this book and found it very hard to put down. The book draws you into Grant's life and lets you experience his life's triumphs and tribulations. Anybody who likes good historical fiction will enjoy this book. My brother also read this book and really enjoyed it.
When I first bought this book, I thought I was taking a chance. But from page one, Robert Skimin takes you on a wonderous journey of one of the most interesting men in US History. It starts out with a few stories from U.S. Grant's early childhood and moves to his years at Westpoint, to the Mexican War, to his life during peacetime. Obviously the main part of the book is dedicated to the Civil War, but that is to be expected. Skimin takes you to Fort Henry, Donelson, Shiloh, Vicksburg, and the Wilderness Campaign. You have Lee surrendering to Grant and the Grant's life after the Civil War, including his scandal-torn presidency. Skimin keeps the book interesting as you follow the life of Ulysses S. Grant. This book is a must read if the Civil War or this point of history is even of slight interest.
Seems to be of good quality, good game board. Price could be lower though as on most things. I paid the price because it was a gift.
Backgammon is a great game to learn and play. My son is learning fast and beating dad already. This board is a great size for all ages, the pieces are weighted well and prvide good gameplay. The vinyl seems durable enough for home use and should provide years of fun. Very good value.
I purchased a new backgammon set and it arrived in perfect condition. The only problem I had was the black pieces. They were somehow discolored on every one. This problem was not present on the white. Everytime I play it the black pieces bother me. I would like instructions on getting another set of black pieces. I feel that I should not have to pay since this set was not cheap. Please advise.Thanks,Gary H.
This backgammon set is beautiful and if you like backgammon, then it is a great addition to your game repitoire and worth the value.
This board is not a top of the line board by any stretch. With that being said, it is was the least expensive in its class. We use it at the beach quite a bit and so far it is holding up well. I worry that the outside cover may get torn when it has been sitting in the sun all day (it tends to get soft). My wife and I enjoy playing against each other... well mostly I enoy it! Winning is fun. Anyway, I suggest this product if you need an inexpensive board that you are not using as a display piece.
In regards to Eric Clapton's recording, many of his songs after Cream, though extraordinary, lack the incredible guitar solos that are on this CD (I can't speak for his stuff before because I haven't heard very much of it). I never knew that rock could be done this well before I heard this CD. "Sunshine Of Your Love", "White Room", and "Crossroads" are definately my favorites. I think "Crossroads" is among the best performances Clapton has ever done. Buy this CD, its the best.
...The cover art from Disraeli Gears and Wheels of Fire! Great music in a compact and complete retrospective. The youthful energy of these takes is balanced with virtuosity. Whoever heard a bassist play guitar-style like Jack Bruce? Or a drummer play as conspicuously as Ginger Baker? And, of course, who ever heard a guitarist wail like the young Eric Clapton? Everyone should own some album with Crossroads on it. As a song not included here says, "Those were the days."
This band had a unique sound.I originaly got into this band because Kiss always mentioned this band as one of their favorite bands.As i am a huge Kiss fan,i am curious at time to listen to their musical origins.I knew Sunshine of your love and White Room.But the rest were not known at all to me.So i decided to get a copy of their best.Man i was not disappointed.Got right into it and couldnt stop playing it.Some songs seem to be addictive,probably recorded them on tapes made out of hippy weed.This collection is a must for fans of Clapton, Bruce, and Baker and the great rock of the late 60s. .Great stuff this,and i reccommend this band.
THIS cd is awesome. I understand the parental advisory on it. They swear like madmen in this cd, yet I still like it. I heard "Stick 'Em Up" on the radio, but that's not the only reason I got this cd. There r many reasonz I got this cd, but it would take me 4ever to state them all. There r a ton of awesome songs on this cd like "Tarfur" and "Weirdo" besides "Stick 'Em Up". I HIGHLY suggest this cd to ANYONE who likes rap-rock.
I bought this CD because I have heard the single Stick 'em up several times on the radio the lyric "Im on the mic like a facist" really jumps out and grabs you. The whole CD is really great, a good mix of hard rap metal stuff and a few slower balladish songs. Quarashi really reminds me a lot of 311 (think "Down") with a little bit of Cypress Hill mixed in. Good stuff, it sounds really smooth. If you like Linkin Park or 311 or any other rap/rock stuff you will like this. (I dont really care about Limp Bizkit anymore, most everything on Chocolate Starfish or whatever is just bad, their act is getting old)
In this world of lame metal/rap fronted by bands such as Limp Bizkit and Kid Rock it has been hard to find new original music. However, Quarashi's "Jinx" brings a whole new and unique sound to music. Their first single "Stick'em Up" is full of heavy guitar laced over some hard hip hop beats. Each song on this album shows the talent and range of Quarashi. Whether it's their harmonies, rhymes, beats, rock ability, or powerful lyrics there is definitely something for everyone on this album.
Having read wilder Sisters, Bad Girl Creek and Now Along Came Mary I'm waiting not so patiently for Good Bye Earl! My favorite so far as been Bad Girl simply becuase I feel like I "Know" the characters...to me they are so typical of they way good friends see eachother, need eachother...and just know eachother. Mary was great with the added characters and dogs! Maybe someone will give me Earl for my birthday!!!
The book was delivered to me quickly. It is in excellent condition INCLUDING the dust jacket. My only issue (it is minor) it is in LARGE print. I do not require large print books...it's a little weird to read. I reviewed the description of the book and it does not mention it being a large print edition. I have no plans to complain or return the book. :)
She has done it again! Another great book in the Bad Girl series. It is true, although we don't get but glimpses here and there of our fav girls, we do get enough to feed the question of what is going on with each of them. This book only took me a couple of hours. I can't put them down! You won't be able to either! Enjoy!
If you are going to make a primative bow, this book is a great read. The book is to the point, easy to read and gives you the knowledge needed to make your first bow. Although there are many books written on to make a primative bow, this book is one of the most recommended.
I think it was a very good book, especially if you are interested in Indian crafts or building a bow and arrow.
This is a really good book, it really brings to mind things that no one could have made-up, its just way too horiffic, but it DOES open your eyes to what power one man can have, and how people follow the majority, not standing up for others.
Limpy takes the guess work out of sausage making. This book should be in every kitchen. From simple to complex, Limpy covers it all. I've tried some of the other sausage books out there. I've yet to find anything as good as this. Limpy brings you into the 21st century with his techniques. Some books are so out-dated you could make people sick. Limpy hides no fact or detail. You can trust him to show you how it's supposed to be done. I've been cutting wild game for over 15 years. I've come to rely on Limpy's book to guide a successful wild game processing business / sausage making business. Thanks for the wonderful book Limpy. Also, thanks for all you gave in Vietnam to make sure the rest of us could live free! Great book!
Having this book for a couple of years now,and trying about 70% of the reciepts I find it on par with most other beginner books. If you follow the directions you can turn out some outstanding tasting and quality sausages with limited equipment or in depth knowledge.
I was a bit disapointed by the CD, I thought it would be much more music that could be recognized from the movie. When I heard the 1st track movie scenes flew across my mind, but that was the only one! Maybe exept for track 13. If you like french rap, this is CD gr8. If you just want the movie music, get the 1st and 13th track somewherelese...
I don't draw, and have no idea about this stuff. But I heard my 16 yr old neice took an art class and became interested in charcoal sketching. Gave it for Christmas and her face lit up like the tree. Was the perfect gift in this case.
Upon my first reading of this book as a rather fundamentalist Christian teenager, I was disappointed with its seeming lack of an "overt" Christian message. During my second reading (and following a conversion to Roman Catholicism) approximately 15 years later, I was moved tremendously by protagonist Orual's tendency to clothe herself in defensive strength rather than yielding to faith. The book suddenly seemed very "modern" to me. I smiled as I wondered what Lewis would think if he were able to see (and indeed, hopefully he is) how accurately the book he wrote some 30 years ago reflects the struggle of women in the '90s. There is something deep lurking in this spare and somber prose for female AND male readers. If you have ever longed to plunge into mystery, to learn to balance your ultra-rational side with the faith-filled portion of your soul, then I strongly recommend this book to you. (By Lori Pike, on a friend's E-Mail)
The book is brilliantly written as long as it concerns itself with Orual's passionate indictment of the gods. It loses its power, however, when Lewis falls prey to his tendency to preach. Part 2 undermines the rest of the book first by telling the reader what to think and then by couching the lessons in an implicitly Christian moral context. In this way, it is reminiscent of "The Last Battle," a coda which mars the otherwise enjoyable "Chronicles of Narnia."
Having heard much about this book from a Wheaton professor, I finally read it with an expectation of receiving great insight. For that, I will have to re-read, I think. There are hints of truths, some of which I know I missed, since I am accustomed to didactic presentations. Didn't quite realize until the end that it is indeed a retelling of an old myth. At any rate, it is an interesting read, even if taken only superficially.
You may find this book slow-going at first, but stay with it. As Orual begins to "find her niche" she develops into a fascinating character and a strong protagonist. I thought this novel was extremely moving and highly enjoyable. I would recommend it to anyone who enjoys C.S. Lewis, mythology, or a story featuring a strong and likable female protagonist.
I recently read Till We Have Faces again, having read it with disappointment over a decade ago when I was still in high school. After my first reading I sold or gave away my copy of the book, thinking I would never desire to read it again. I'm glad I changed my mind and gave it a second shot. It is a gripping tale which probes deep into the soul as it explores the destructive fruits of self-centered love and the need for reality in facing the deformities in our own souls. I couldn't put it down and plan to read it again in the future. Needless to say, I will hang on to this copy . . .
probably one of the most incredible books that I've ever read. Read most of his works, but this one is incisive and piercing every time I revisit the agony of reality it presents. "Lekhem panim" in hebrew refers to the bread of G-d's presence, but literally translated is "bread of faces" and resides in the Holy Place. Something that we need for the nourishment of our souls, and CS Lewis is definitely the consumate baker.
C.S. Lewis is so good at mixing faith with stories. Maybe that's why his stories are the most gripping. This retelling of Psyche and Eros is unpredictable and very moving. If Narnia is for children then "Faces" is a teaching fable for all adults.
UPON THE CHORE OF MOVING ALL OF OUR STUFF TO ANOTHER CITY....I had the job of selecting the ones I will keep. When I came down to Till We Have Faces, I looked thru it till I realized that it was only one I had failed to read! So it will be my next read after unpacking!I have enjoyed the first few reviews here printed! I believe I have More C.S. Lewis than any other Author! It seems that my favorite ones have been The Four Loves, The Seven Storey Mountain, The Asian Journal, New Seeds of Contemplation, CONTEMPLATIVE PRAYER, DIALOGUES WITH SILENCE! AS I RECALL BEING IN LOUISVILLE, I DROVE TO THE MONASTERY OF GETHSEMENE and I saw the little house in which he spent time in Solitude writing.When I sat in the Choir for Morning Prayers, plus later in the day for other times of prayer, I realized the Power of Silence & Prayer connected to the litergy of Chants & Hymns! I surely returned to my Prison Chaplain's office with renewed Vigor!Retired Chaplain Fred W Hood
You will really enjoy this book. Lewis is one of those rare individuals that is able to express the truth with clarity and power, and you can feel it in your heart. I found this book to be beautiful and exciting and believe that one day we will all have faces.
I read this book at a time when I was starting to really dislike C.S. Lewis, but when I read this book I fell head over heels in love with him all over again. This book is PERFECT!!!! All the book is terrific but my favorite parts always fill me up with such joy!!! And oh my dear Lord in heaven, the ending!!!! AAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAHHH!!! I was just in ecstasy over the end, which was by far the finest and most well-developed conclusion EVER!!!!!!!!!!!!!!! Till We Have Faces is a book of such psychological profoundness and depth you could sink into it and never find an end to it's meaning. I'm still not out of it yet and I don't to be.
If you've read the reviews, wondered why everyone raves about TILL WE HAVE FACES, stick with the book till Chapter Ten. It's a little sluggish till you reach Chapter Ten, but make no plans once you turn that page. You won't put it down after that point.I am amused, I think, by the rigid assertions of some reviewers, as to what Lewis was trying to say with this tale. If you are put off by any of those assertions, ignore them. Plain and simple, don't listen to what a single person on here says the book means.Because the first time you read it, you'll understand it one way. The next time, after you yourself have grown, changed, aged, oh sigh, yes even matured, you will understand it another way. You will identify with one character more than another depending on who you are and are becoming, you will read the philosophy/theology differently depending on what you believe at that moment.But -- once read, it's likely you will read it again.
This book was great. i read it for a book club and that helped me to understand the meaning of it all, but it was enjoyable to read as well!
Of the 12 lights I bought, one didn't work. I'm still waiting for the company to tell me how to get the broken one replaced. I'll change my rating when that happens.
Find it interesting! 1st night I had it the power went out for a few minutes and the emergency light came on. I am impressed.
It is really easy to work with it.You can create and write wherever you want, using the whole space or half of the card.Perhaps it just doesn't have a variety of clip arts available, but a least you can import pictures from anywhere.It works perfect well with Avery cards, you just select the model number and print.
I was able to make some nice business cards using both my own photos and the program's graphics. Labels are nice too. The only problem I had was the program having all the types and styles of cards and labels I could purchase. I struggled a bit figuring out how to print on some sheets. It would have been nice to have better directions or help subjects in order to answer my questions. For the price it is a good program.
This was my first experience listening to music from such an early period, and I was spellbound. I'm not qualified tojudge the scholarly accuracy of the performance practices, nor can I compare these to other performances of the same pieces. I can say only that the music has an unearthly beauty of a kind which is not found in later music. The vocal style is different from what we find in baroque, classical and romantic choral pieces. It has a profound purity which comes, at least partly, from an absence of vibrato. There are eight composers represented, among whom Josquin and Palestrina are the best known. (One of the composers is Giacches de Wert, who, contrary to the Amazon listing, is not the conductor! The conductor is Christopher Jackson, and the ensemble is the Montreal Studio of Ancient Music, if I've translated the French correctly.) A beautiful recording. It was my first CD of "early" music, but it will not be my last!
Truly, the music on this CD must be what heaven sounds like! The "Tulerunt Dominum Meus" is outstanding. The only thing that could be added to this CD is a translation from Latin to English. Even so, not knowing the meaning of the words will not keep one from being transported in ecstasy while listening to this gorgeous music.
The opening Gombert Lament is a stunner, as is everything on this disk. It is recorded in a live, but not muddy, acoustic which really puts a beautiful "glow" on the proceedings. This would have gotten 5 stars from me except for the lack of texts and translations.
I have been using this shampoo soap, along with a coal tar shampoo for the past several years. A dermatologist recommended that the use the ZNP bar and the coal tar shampoo to treat dandruff and an itchy scalp. It works.
If you have flakes anywhere on your body znp soap will get rid of them and leave your skin baby soft. I have been using ZNP soap for 30 years and hate to see it unavailable. one bar lasts a very long time. about a year! Please bring the soap back!
I had to get this book for class, not really one of my favorite books, but I did learn a lot and it has helped me both in class and at work. I got it shipped very fast and it came in great condition.
it works pretty well if u don't plan on using it for more than a couple months . it BREAKS EASLY . Even if it is turned off during a thunder storm it has a chance of breaking.
I have used the product before and ordered on line for a better price. It arrived in a timely manner as expected.
These episodes are all hilarious. Squidbillies and Aqua Teen Hunger Force are my favorite adult swim shows and I am disappointed that both shows have decided to switch to a single DVD release format as opposed to the 2 disc sets that they had in the past.What does this mean for the buyer?-Less episodes per set this time around-Key special features are missing. There are no commentaries on this 3rd volume. The "squidbilly circle jerk" (which was my favorite special feature on the first two volumes) doesnt get another sequel. It just feels like there should have been more features.-The packaging is not as deluxe as it was previously.It still deserves a high rating though because they did manage to pack ALOT of stuff onto one disc, but it is a step backward from the first two volumes.
Great movie, got to my home very fast, could not be happier with the quality of the DVD as well!
Really hilarious, but must watch from season 1 to understand all the characters and the point of the show really.
My husband absolutely LOVED this watch. He rides a motorcycle and is very much into the skull theme. It works great and it looks awesome on the wrist.
The recipients of the gift of four Scandinavian Cheeses were pleased and offered thanks for the items as well as for the considerate effort.
This is one of the best bluegrass CD's out there. It's 7 years old and I continue to listen to it. Scott Vestal produces some of the tastiest banjo I've ever heard(and I've listened to Bela and the rest forever). Each musician is a master on their instruments. The beat is immaculate. I've been a banjo player for over 25 years and this is one of my favorites.
Great Movie! Much more serious and well done than the recent Batman movies. (Except for the first two done by Burton)
I watched this movie after watching "The Dark Knight" and "The Dark Knight Rises" so that may be why I gave it the 4 stars...Personally, I would've loved a bit more action and I'm partial to Katie Holmes as Rachel- I liked Maggie better...And this is super long!! I had to force myself to sit and watch it after the first hour and half lolBut it is a good movie!
It is exciting to finally reach an understanding of why there is such acharacter called Batman. We are taken into the life and times of BruceWayne whose personal expierences are responsible for his dedication tofight injustice and bring brightness into the lives of people who arebeing preyed upon by unscrupulous villians. This crusading Dark Knight isaided in his quest by his loyal butler Alfred.
It's rare you find such a treat in the theatres these days. Disappointing acting, unoriginal stories, and recycled plots create a crapfest of bad movies. However, The Dark Knight shows us we don't need to be this way. Heath Ledger, rest his soul, was truly at the top of his game and all the choices were excellent actors. The story line, while obviously somewhat recycled (forgivably so), is as original as its going to get, and the whole movie is carried off without much in the way of flaw. Granted, you can pick things out that are "wrong" but all within the realm of suspension of disbelief.In any case, the movie is worth owning just for Ledger's performance!
I bought this movie for basically the same price it would have cost me to rent it, so I cannot complain. I am not going to offer you a review of the movie, there are better places to find that; I am just going to recommend that, if you like this movie or think you might like this movie at all, it is better to buy it at this price then to rent it for a buck less.
The Bottom Line:The best Batman movie yet made (including The Dark Knight), Batman Begins suffers only from a miscast Katie Holmes and an extremely over-the-top Tom Wilkinson as it portrays Bruce Wayne's transformation into Batman about as realistically as possible; a superhero movie for the modern age.
EXCELLENT!!! I wish I could forget all the other Batman movies, even the ones that Tim Burton directed. Although Michelle Pfeifer was pretty hot as Catwoman. If only ALL Super Hero movies were done like this movie. In my opinion this was even better than Spiderman. Even women that I know who don't like super hero movies love, that's right, LOVE, this movie. It is basically a character driven drama with action. And for once, the villains don't upstage the main character as they did with ALL the previous Batman movies. If you are looking for a Super Hero movie that has it all, look no further. THIS IS IT! I can't wait to see the Dark Knight this summer!!!
what i mean by this batman movie was better than the other twos batman batman 3&4 i think this batman movie is better that following the comics than the 4 batman movies that before it i think as far (micheal keaton,s verison of batman he,s nail ) bale verison not as doesn,t follows the comics and ra,s al Ghul has a pit that makes him young .
The drugs. I mean a Batman movie about drugs. That's all movies are about anymore. Drugs. Can't people come up with something different than drugs. None of the other batman movies were about drugs. Just this one. This was the only flaw of the movie. If the next Batman movie is about drugs in 2008 then I am going to be so mad. Christopher Nolan needs to come up with something other than drugs. And then the train fight. This is pretty much a copy from Spider-Man 2. Correction there are two flaws. Otherwise it had a dark story and great special effects.
I watch the movie on Standard, but I finally watch the HD DVD version. Although the movie was "Ok to par," the HD version is awesome and at times it is brilliant, yet at times it was just "OK," I have it for my HD Collection but it doesn't top some other HD DVD movies (Seasbicuit or Phantom of the Opra). I love the dark side of Batman and that made this movie a little better than a playful hero. I'm happy with the purchase and its a good collection for your HD's.
Where it all began. Amazing movie with a great two movies following. The last movie (Dark Knight Rises) relates back to this movie a couple times so good idea to see this one first.
What can I say that hasn't been said. This first movie of the trilogy is great. Great effort was made to really explore the Batman psyche. They explore what and how does a man become Batman. I don't think you saw Bruce Wayne in the Batman costume in the first 30 minutes of the movie. This more than made up for the previous Batman movies. As a Dark Knight fan I loved this movie.
if you love batman then you will love this movie! we did for sure. it was awesome and we will keep watching it over and over!
This was a gift. The person who received it just loved it. Great detail due to the blue ray. A must see for Batman fans.
This movie arrived within a couple of days. Very good packaging.I am very pleased with the order I placed. Thanks so much!
Would have paid even more for this as I love the new batman series. The HD is very nice and I watch it repeatedly.
A great conclusion to a great series. If you enjoyed the first two films in the series, this a must-watch.
Reminds me of the first edition Batman Comics which I think I read in 1938. If not - that's close. Christian Bales is very good as a sometimes bumbling, sometimes over wrought emotional character out to revenge his parents' untimely deaths. Learning how to be a caped crusader and implementing the many tools on his belt to do battle against evil was something that should have been revealed in other Batman feature films. Michael Caine plays Alfred very well. I first saw this movie on TCM or AMC. Liked it well enough to add to my DVD collection.
Christian Bale, Michael Caine, Liam Neeson, Gary Oldmanand Morgan Freeman star in this 2005 action film basedon the comics. After his parents are murdered, BruceWayne becomes a vigilante hero of Gotham City. I likehow this went back to the dark roots and Christian isgood in it. This dvd set has nice picture and soundplus neat extras. I recommend this good Batman film.
Wonderfully entertaining. Nothing that will stay with you forever like with Lost or Battlestar Galactica but worth the price of a rental. Katie Holmes is particularly good in this.
this is a good movie of how Batman got started and in this day an age of technology and how he learned how to fight and fight an group of people that think the city needs to die.
Thankfully the terrible Batman movie streak has come to an end. I wish to ignore every Batman movie since Batman and Batman Returns. As far as I'm concerned those original 2 and this version are the only ones worth watching. Bale is the best Batman, with all due respect to Keaton.
Christian Bale IS BATMAN I think he was the best to have played the super hero of the past. I think after the orginal Batman the others were poorly written and somewhat of a bore. I mean Val Kilmer and George Clooney there talants are best used in other films such aa Val Kilmer's performance in THE DOORS which he was incrediable in. Lets face it girls would you just love to see George Clooney in those scrubs playing the ever so sexy and slighty turlmoulus Doug Ross on ER. Bale gives something to the charcter that the other actors have not been able to do creditability and mystery.
This is the best movie so far of 05. With dissapointments to both star wars and war of the worlds I decided to go and see this. I was impressed in this movie. You get more of the story of bruce wayne training and learning to be a better fighter to then become the dark night. And don't listen to these other people because this movie is not boring. This has a story and it has great action. If you want to see a gret movie than go see this movie. Or if you want to see crap then listen to the nay sayers and watch fantastic four. But you won't regret watching this movie.
I honestly expected less when I wathced this movie. Best Batman ever....loved the Scarecrow and the plot. Renting the rest of the trilogy tonight!
The movie seemed dark at first; but has a good storyline, kept me on the edge of my seat and Christopher is so good looking!
i mean even with an all star cast they turned out to be a joke. This is how batman was supposed to be interpreted, i know there are many sagas of the comics, but the newer ones all have a darker theme to them.
Had not seen these so got them to watch on a long flight. Enjoyed the flight even though I had to sit in the middle of a row.
Great movie composed of an amazing story and good acting. Batman Begins is one of the best Batman movies up to its release and is followed by an equally enjoyable film, Dark Knight.
Damn good movie with a great cast. Christina Bale IS Batman and Gary Oldman (I am a HUGE fan) breathes life into the Commissioner Gordon character. I can not wait for the sequel!
I thoroughly enjoyed this movie. Great effects, very good plot line... well worth the money and a good change from the previous Batman titles (which, I thought were very good -- hey, it's from a COMIC BOOK)!
Since the final movie in the Dark Knight trilogy came out not too long ago, I decided to get myself up to speed on what had happened so far before its release. And boy am I glad I did. Christian Bale is HOT and I loved seeing him put through his paces.
A great Blu-ray disc with which to start a new Blu-ray disc collection. Can't wait to see the Black Knight when it comes out later (probably around X-mas).
To date, this is the best Matman movie yet. I must admit, I was a bit apprehensive since the Batman movies of the past seemed plain out cheesy, however, Batman Begins proved to be the exact opposite or it's predecessors. Starring Christian Bale, Batman Begins is more "true-to-life" than the one's of the past and emits a dark, goth, atmosphere. More Underworld-like (the movie). You have to see this for yourself.
Ok, here it is in a nutshell, this is almost like a watching a Batman documentary, no over the top villians, no goofy sidekicks, just the complete origin of Batman. Very good acting and well paced, this movie is the polar opposite of Batman & Robyn.
What a great cast... Christian Bale, Tom Wilkinson, Cilian Murphy, Liam Neeson, Michael Caine, Morgan Freeman, and the greatest living actor today... Gary Oldman. What more could you ask for?This movie introduces the beginning of Batman, as well as introduce two new villains from the Batman live-action franchise - Scarecrow and Ra's al Ghul. It has a wonderful mix of comedy, drama, and action, as well as a very nice ending. Gotham never looked as beautifully depicted as Nolan has done. You won't be disappointed with this movie.
Absolutly incredible, Batman Begins is one of the best films ever. Placed upon the shoulders of Blue-Ray, Batman Begins is even better with incredible sound and amazing picture quality.
I already had a regular version of this great film but is was well worth the expense of buying a blu ray version. The excellent quality of the rich colors and super sharpness of the blu ray version was worth the expense. I would recommend this blu-ray disc.
Pretty much everything has already been said about this fantastic movie, which raised the comic book adaptation bar well beyond X-Men, or even Spiderman, has been said; so there is little to add.I noticed a lot of people complain about the fight scenes. They are quick, confusing and chaotic. This is EXACTLY like it is having a bunch of bats swarm by.That is the intent of the fight scenes and it is very accurate.Other then that the major complaint is that this is not a brain dead movie. There are plenty of movies to keep the mouth breathing, knuckle-dragging Budweiser crowd happy. Not every movie needs to be mindless. Go watch Die Hard or something.
I loved it, the action was great . And it kept you going all the way.You should really buy this movie .It is very good.
This sure was a good movie, but Michael Keaton still makes a better Batman. Everyone else is just an immitation of Michael Keaton's Batman role.
This movie made me a Christian Bale fan. He is a fantastic actor and will someday be recognized as great. The special effects are super and the story shows how a person of wealth can be socially valuable. That is a nice twist or departure from demonizing those who were born into wealth.
I know you recent movie goers have just come out of the theatre recently. I did too. We're charged up but don't get out of control. Get a Bat-grip on yourself. The BEST Batman movie was the 1989 Tim Burton original. Batman Returns comes next and Batman Begins is somewhere around there. The Schumacher ones,while not being superb, still have their moments.The Batsuit did make Bale look sometimes like FATman. The Batarangs were rusty looking and not cool enough. I like the action sequences and how the story circled on fear. The early training stuff seemed to go a little too fast.All in all, Batman Begins is a good movie. I just think people need to think twice before they label Bale better than Keaton. HEEEELLL NOO!!! :O
What a great start to a hopeful new trilogy. It was a little long, but easily the smartest of all the batman films today. I very much look forward to the next one.
Batman Begins was a really good film.It gave us a good look on how Bruce Wayne became Batman.Nolan brought back the darker Batman that we all loved from the comics,along with a few new villains which we've never seen in a Batman film,before this one.I was really happy how Christian Bale played Bruce Wayne/Batman.He brought back that seriousness to the role that Michael Keaton had.I thought Ra's al Ghul was a great villain.It was kind of a letdown though,because we did not see much of him in the middle of the movie.Just at the beginning and more at the end.I was not very happy with Johnathan Crane/Scarecrow.I didin't think that a guy putting a potato sack over his head and gassing people was very scary at all.Overall though.This is still a great film and I highly recommend it,if you've never seen it.
Good movie. The first obscure movie of batman. It really makes more credible the hole batman story. Need to be seen in blu ray.
What can I say, Christian Bale is the best Batman yet! Remember when Clooney tried it?Hah! Buy this DVD here and save some bucks!
The blue ray is great and the added comic inside is cool. Great first movie of the series. I have The Dark Knight and obviously awaiting the 3rd
The Dark Knight Series is by far the best Superhero movies I have ever seen!!!! Loved every minute of it!
This is not just an action movie, I was pleasantly surprised to see that the story was interesting and kept you watching.
One of the more attention holding movies that I have recently watched that it made me watch the next in the trilogy.
Classic Batman adventure that delivers with style. Now we can watch the Dark Knight next. We enjoyed it even when we were home sick.Good Job!
Great Beginning to a Trilogy!! Recommend to others to watch the trilogy of Batman. Comes full circle when you see the 3rd Batman movie.
The new Batman movies are awesome. I love Batman, I hope they come out with a third movie soon.
Terrific introduction to the Dark Knight legend. This movie and its sequel assured that Mr Chris Nolan did the best job ever with the caped crusader movies. I already own it in DVD but had to buy the BD version. Specially with a less than $10 price, it is a MUST buy.
Great Movie and great quality dvd! It fit nicely into my collection. I can't wait for the next one to hit theaters!
finally, a batman movie true to the comics.i didn't like the 4 previous batman movies but i loved this movie!! i'm picky when it comes to batman but this one remains true to the character. i have the deluxe edition dvd and its great.highly recommended for "real" batman fans.
This is the best version of Batman to ever hit the screen. It beat Tim Burton's 1989 version all to pieces and back again. It is dark, stylish, and true enough to the comics to make die hards happy without alienating moviegoers who are not up to speed on the comics. Think of it as a wink wink, nudge nudge by use of character names only comic readerswould know.The cast is absolutely superb. Christian Bale brings just the right amount of tormented soul to Bruce Wayne, Michael Caine is perfect as Alfred, and Katie Holmes is as pretty as always. Add in the usual fantastic performances by Morgan Freeman and Liam Neesom, and you have the best comic book based film ever.Please suppot this film so we can get bigger and better movies featuring comic book characters.
This is by far the best Batman series I have seen. It is closer to the dark comics I read as a child and I am looking forward to the second movie The Dark Knight.
Here's the link---> audiostreet.net/phatsk8traxjentaki76The song is called BATMAN BEGINS (2 get FUNKED UP!)Check it out & holla back with any comments!This flick is going 2 be awesome!
I purchased this movie a few weeks before the Dark Knight debuted in theaters. I give it a 4/5 star only because there are almost no bonus features whatsoever on this disc. It is the movie only. Otherwise this is an excellent film for any comic book or batman fan.
This was one of the greatest batman movies i ever seen prior to the dark knight. At first I did not think I was going to like it. I mean afterall I always thought no one can do batman as good as Micheal Keaton. Christian Bale proved it he can do batman in his own way. I reccomend everyone to watch this and the sequel to it The Dark Knight.
This is a great transfer. And the 5 minute prologue gives you a sweet taste of how great The Dark Knight will look on Blu ray.
This is the Batman movie I've been waiting for! Tim Burton's Batman was my favorite until now. The storyline, the action, the sets, acting, this movie surpassed all of the previous batman movies, especially the most recent Joel Schumacher ones which were horrible. The actors picked for Batman and Ras Al Ghul were perfect, as was Scarecrow. This movie is true to the comic book, thankfully, showing it was NOT the Joker who killed Bruce Wayne's parents. It has that mood you must have for a Batman flick, without a type of pseudo-universe created for him like the Tim Burton movies. Too bad Halle Berry didn't wait for this film to become Catwoman. A better director and costume would have made her the ultimate Catwoman.Finally, a director that doesn't base his movie on the campy 60's tv series. I'm already waiting for the sequel.
gone are the campy over the top villans of the last movie series. no adam west silliness either. here we have a story in which we can suspend our disbelief and actually get into the character of bruce wayne/batman. the previous celluloid batmen were little more than cardboard cutouts, but this one lives and breathes. i was a bit skeptical about the new batmobile design but after seeing it in action i am now a believer. i hope this is the beginning of a long and fruitful franchise for the venerable dark knight. the bonus features on the second disk were informative and enjoyable with several mini-documentaries about set and costume design, action sequences, and a very nice segment about the comic writers and artists that were the most inspirational for this film. the bonus comic is also a nice addition to the package.
Batman Begins is an all time favorite of mine and one I wanted to have on blu-ray. The transfer is excellent. At 1080p at 73" (Mitsubishi 2008 DLP) the picuture is stunning. No macroblocking in fast scenes (like in the DVD release). Audio sounds amazing in 7.1.However the extras are a bit slim.
Batman begins is a great movie, there is no doubt about that as I'm sure you all know. That's just it though.. its the only thing great about this set. The postcard picture's are nice but whatever you know? And the comic is alright but it doesn't really have any of the character's you wanna see, it's just the bank job from The Dark Knight so it's no big deal. In the end I can only recommend this movie the the truly HARD CORE hard core fans of the new batman movie's. For me (a fan of batman but not a hard core fanatic) just the blu-ray it's self would have been a better buy.
This is my favorite movie with Star Wars Episode IV Return of the Jedi. It's a dark movie and a tiny bit scary,but it's still great! In the end Batman fights the Ducard in a great battle on the train. It's a great movie!
Darkness, evil, and corruption...thats what you'll get when you watch this movie. But for all the turmoil in Gotham, there is one beacon of hope, though this beacon is quite dark himself. Bruce Wayne, played by the talented Christian Bale, is Batman, a hero for the people w/ his own set of problems...dating back to his parents murder when he was just a boy. Throughout the movie he tries to deal with these issues while saving Gotham from "the bad guy."The special effects in this movie are incredible. Plus the batmobile just kicks a**. I would definitely recommend this movie to anyone looking for some dark, moody entertainment.
Batman Has always been one of my favorite comic heroes. This movie departs from the somewhat whimsical, goofyfied villans of the last few installments and returns to a more serious feel. It explores how Bruce Wayne evolves into Batman from his Ninja like training to his cool gear.His mentor becomes his nemesis in a great finale. This is a really cool movie. I am an amature film maker so the "making of" features on the dvd are a real education. My only critique is that some of the fight scenes are shot so in tight that you don't get a good look at the action.
It's no Dark Knight, but then again, what is...anyway, still better than all the "original" Batman movies. At least the quality of the video is great.
Great addition to my DVD collection. Shipped fast and was in perfect condition when it arrived.
The film is wonderfully written and beautifully shot. Nolan is perfect in the Bruce Wayne/Batman role. He plays the irresponisble playboy well, and is very credible as the fighting machine known as Batman. The movie takes its' time getting him into the Batman suit. A friend of mine who was watching the film with me and not that familar with the comics thought it dragged a bit in the beginning. I have to disagree, but I have read Batman comics since I was 7. This version of Batman seems more alone the lines of the Frank Miller version of the character. A bit on the darker side, it is a more believeable hero for our current world. This is a great character piece as well as a terrific action film. Worth picking up.
If you've seen the first 4 films in the Batman series and go see "Begins" expecting for it to expand on what you already know, you're in for some disappointment. If you're a fan of the animated series, before Robin/Nightwing and Batgirl of course, this is for you. Batman is dark, mysterious, and drives a car that looks like a Lamborghini and a tank's love child.I'm looking forward to the next movie in this revamped series. This is how it should've started 15 years ago, except Christian Bale was probably still in elementary school back then. I hear he's also interested in sequels, so keep it coming!
Don't expect any bat junk like "shark repellant" in this one. It's darker than Tim Burton's and it complexly makes you forget about all the other modern incarnations of PG rated goffery. This film has a great build up and a great explanation of things. Bruce works hard and fails continually, we get to see him develop and suffer and most importantly we get a great new Bat Mobile.The only problem I had with this film is that the scarecrow just seems unnecessary. The movie worked so hard to present a new kind of realism that seems detracted from one that stupid mask appears. Henri Ducard was a good enough villain and the scarecrow just seemed to get in the way.Still all in all, this is a great picture - one that you can easily watch over and over.
Batman and Batman Returns rocked solid and Batman Forever and Batman & Robin ah, they're crap. This one should be the best yet! The first time I saw a prievew for it ah, it was ok. But when I saw a 2nd I was freaken excited! But my main question is... WHO WILL BE THE VILLAIN? IT BETTER BE JOKER OR ELSE I'M GONNA CRY(I'm joking)!!!
but i think if you want dark,scary,violent get this one but i like fantastic four too but maybe they're just if you're in the mood for the OPPOSITE ok? so it's excellent and i like this but i like fantastic four too!!
I did like this Batman movie a lot! I now own all of them (except for the Adam West movie). But there are a few holes in the story that left me wondering.In this first movie, Bruce's parents are killed by the Joker, that's why he wants Joker dead! But in this movie, they are killed by someone else completely.The story keeps changing about how he fell into the bat cave as a boy. In one movie, he falls into the cave while running in angst over his parents death. In Batman Begins, Bruce falls into the bat cave while his parents are still living, and while he's playing around at Wayne Manor.There were a few other things that led me to believe that keeping to the same storyline isn't that important to different directors. But overall, a good film to add to your Batman collection.
I just watched Batman Begins and all I can say is WOW!!!, this is "THE" Batman movie. Its to bad this wasn`t the first of the Batman movies. Its well written with lots of action. The first of the movie is a little slow but the rest makes up for it. If your looking for a couple of hours of good entertainment get this movie.
I heard it once before I went to see the movie. "Once you see this one, the others will not exist..." It's true.The best part about any of the first movies to me is the fact that Jack Nicholson played the Joker. Beyond that, those first movies cannot hold a candle to this film.Dark, cynical, brutal, wicked... All describe this version of the story. The way Batman was originally intended. Christian Bale does an great job of portraying this character. This movie actually shows us Bruce's transformation and hardcore training he goes through in order to become the superhero we all know and love.I got to see it on IMAX too. Outstanding!!!
good film. absorbing. Bale and Holmes have good on screen chemistry. Christopher Nolan nailed it. As a fan of comics, this is what I imagine it to be.
I felt that this movie depicted the Dark Knight as he should have been in previous attempts. I thoroughly enjoyed the movie and will probably watch it several more times.
I recently decided to start increasing the size of my blu-ray collection, by mainly getting some of my favorite movies. Batman Begins is by far one of my favorite movies and an amazing retelling of the Batman legend. Amazon definitely had the best price for the combo you get in the deal. For $7.99 you're not only getting the blu-ray, but you are also getting an on demand rental from Amazon. I have not used the rental yet, but saw it pop in on the Roku box. Movie came in just a few days and the quality could not have been better.Pros:- You get the blu-ray and a rental, so you can watch right away- You can't beat the price, unless you get it used somewhere- It's Batman and it's awesomeCons:- NoneOverall great movie and great price. Well done Amazon.
Fantastic come back for the film series with Christian Bale as the Cape Crusader starting his war on crime. Christopher Nolan recreates the series with a dark mood that almost rivals Tim Burton's first two Batman movies but he does lack the flare and the bravado that Burton brought to those films as well as the underlining sense of evil that Gotham had in it's core. Nolan meanwhile does give a sense of realism to the madness of the city and it's hero and that's where the movie big surprise is. I think that this is a great come back for the series and I hope there will be a sequel to it to see where Batman goes from there.
First of all every time a superhero movie is gonna come out marvel,dc,or any other,kids are always the first in line to go see it but just cause this movie is rated pg-13 doesn't mean it's for kids not like they can't see it but you know.I mean really this batman(which is the best)is how he really is.Batman has always been a dark character who has anger,wants revenge,whether is to kill or bring them to justice and truly this is not a character children want to look up to.He's like the punisher only that he doesn't use guns but cool gadgets and they have the same intesions.This movie is waaay different from any of the other batman films("and george clooney as batman,ARE YOU KIDDING ME!")it takes it more serious and is just a movie for grown ups(not like there's blood,nudity,or anything else)but really once you look at this batman film you will see it really MUCH MORE MATURE,THE WHOLE STORY AND EVERYTHING,BALE RULES!
I've followed this film's production for a good while now. This movie will reboot the Batman franchise. The story will be a treat for Batfans non-Batfans alike.Judging from his interviews, Christian Bale is taking this role very seriously, even dedicated it to his father who passed away the end of last. This man will become the new embodiment of Batman/Bruce Wayne.June 17th everyone...it Begins!!!
I'm not a Batman fan but I enjoyed this movie a lot more than I thought I ever would. The movie has a good story and it fleshed out the main character better than I anticipated. I also like how they didn't use popular villains and still had an excellent story. This moody and thrilling film is something that I'd recommend to both fans of the comics and newcomers alike.While the story is good, its not complex enough for me to give it a 5/5. Nor is the action something to brag about.
I'm in the odd group of people who were not that into The Dark Knight. Christopher Nolan did Bruce Wayne very well. His Batman however, felt a little generic. It wasn't bad, just far less interesting than his take on Bruce Wayne. Batman Begins has more Bruce Wayne than Batman, which is a very good thing for me. It depends really. What do you like more? Bruce Wayne or Batman?
We had movie night at my sisters new place after i told her how great Dark Night Rises. too my surprise my little sis has never seen any of the new Dark Night series. This was a great time for all of us.
I liked Batman Begins because it gives an in-depth description of how batman became batman. I would reccomend it to anyone who likes comics.
This could have only been better if they had included a digital copy to the purchase. They have digital copy available through vudu for the last movie only and that kinda sucked.
My son got this toy for his second birthday and he's still playing with it nearly two years later. When he first got it he did have a hard time building anything with it, but he loved the Bob & Wendy figures - they went everywhere he did.Lately he's been building all kinds of elaborate structures with the bricks and is not limited by the fact that the roofs don't stay - he uses them for ramps and decks and other things. We never tried building the stuff on the box, so I can't really say if that "works" or not. All I know is he's gotten a lot of use out this toy and we're considering buying another set.
I would have given this 5 stars if the audio was re-mastered in 5.1. although it sounds like what you would expect from a 1970's concert. It's great to see one of the best country rock bands from the 70's in a live show. Tommy Aldridge could be the best double bass drummer of all time so he is a show all by himself. For those of you who have always loved 'Raunch n' Roll' this is a must for your collection. I still can't believe they do there own version of the Beatles classic 'Taxman'. It's also cool to hear a live version of 'Jim Dandy' which is not on 'Raunch N' Roll'. If you are a 'Black Oak' fan this will leave you yearning for more.
Haven't had any issues with the size of the frame. It is larger then a road bike frame but fits fine.
Works. Simple product to use. Must be careful in nesting the bottom bracket to make the bike stand straight. I hook it on the down tube, lift the bike and slowly move it forward as I let it down. That helps rotate the stand under the bottom bracket. Need to watch carefully that it is nested properly and not up toward the hook.
Bought one 21 years ago from my local bike shop.Used it to hold my bike up and as a work stand.Doesn't work well with over sized tube bikes since "hook" is too small to hook.Rubber came off awhile ago, but replaced with duct tape.I don't think I'll ever need to buy another one since there's nothing to break or fail.
This is their best album since "One chord to another". It's very hard to find an album that rocks as consistantly as this one. Although, they don't experiment as much as they used to, this album is a keeper. If "The rest of my life" dosen't get your feet movin' and your pulse a racin', nothing will. Will the rest of the world take notice? This is one of Canada's best kept secrets. The secrets out!
I had not heard of Sloan, till I found this cd at a listening station. I felt it rocked enough to buy it for $23 or so, and I was right. I love every song with the great guitar work and tight vocals. The last track was very trippy and reminds me of a 3 minute Monster Magnet song (if you're a MM fan you'll hear it. In short the album was awsome.Then I went back and bought two of their previous albums, Pretty Together and some other one. That was a mistake. I'm glad they've changed their sound to this album, and hope it continues. Their other works are NOT my cup of tea. Soft/lame/ NO good guitar, etc. In short, there was nothing special about them, no good hooks.If you want a rockin cd, this is it. If not, buy their old albums and not this one.
i use it alot and i enjoy it and i put xtra wieght in the water bottle pocket for more resistance and i just love the product and i can eve add a weight where the velcro strap is
Don't think walking is intense enough for you, but running is too intense? Well you can always walk with one of these ten pound vests. This is just super for building up your endurance and believe me, when you're trekking miles away from civilization, carrying everything you need on your back, that endurance you've gained by wearing this vest when you didn't have too really pays off.
Okay, I am a female and have been walking for more than 10 years now, and needed to step it up without a gym or in home machine...After my first try of this vest, I realize it makes you hotter because of the material its made of which is vinyl-like. So be prepared to heat up much faster when wearing this vest.My shoulders are what notice the weight the most- I figured that. They get sore within the first minute of wearing the vest. But then again I also do not use a backpack to school for that same reason-- I have weak shoulders that get very sore very quickly.But those are the ONLY 'negatives' to this vest-- otherwise I wouldn't even notice I was wearing it at all!I just hope it helps me to lose my extra weight. :)
Great film. Walken is the only person who could have played this guy so genuinely. In my view, this is the weirdest, most convincing alien abduction film out there. Unsetling, yes. Go see it because it asks more questions than it answers, which is why we like these films, correct?
Christopher Walken is scarier than the aliens, but the film manages to stir up some creepy paranoia at times. The scenes aboard the spaceship (or whatever it was) were a little weak, but in the cabin and in that long spooky school hallway were well done.
When you get an exercise video, you're never quite sure if it's going to be used once or twice and then just collect dust on your video shelf or if it's one you will use over and over again. The Donna Richardson 4-Day Rotation Workout is one you'll use over and over--I promise! She focuses on upper body, hips and thighs, buns and abs, each within 15 minutes. (You can certainly do more than one segment per day if you're so inclined!) This includes warm-ups and cool-downs. It's a do-able workout and in 15 minutes you'll feel like you did something good for yourself. She also emphasises correct form/posture/breathing for doing each exercise which is very important, too. If you're interested in toning your body and spending 15 minutes a day to do it, I recommend this video.
With only fifteen minutes to spare anyone can exercise. Donna does a great job of giving you a really good workout. Her high energy is catchy. Only thing I did not like about this video were the annoying comments from the two women exercising with Donna.
February, 2003This is an excellent toning video. Donna provides very specific, comprehensive workout routines that quickly and effectively tone all the problem areas of the body--arms, abs, buttocks, and thighs. The exercises are intermediate level, including warm-ups and cool down exercises all in a flexible format that allows you to focus on any part of the body you choose in a variety of different ways. I use this video everyday and alternate it with either one of Donna's "30 Days to Firmer Arms and Abs" or "30 Days to Firmer Thighs". That way I get a complete workout everyday along with the fat burning exercises offered in the 30-day videos. If you use these, you will lose weight quickly and safely.
This is a great workout for all levels. Beginners can start with no weights, intermediates can go for small weights and as you progress you can add ankle weights and heavier dumbells. You can break the video up into 1 segment a day or do any combination. Its great because each segment has it's own warm-up and cool down. I recommend this video because she is a great instructor and very motivating.
Perry Mason Season 6 Volume 2 is fantastic and the wait for the next Season seems a long one. Beautifully restored disc and is giving great pleasure. Roll on the rest of the "Seasons"
The quality, clearness, stories and diction are good. If you enjoy a good court room drama, I recommend these series.
There were no problems with this either. I watched each DVD and all was well. I was both able to hear and see them clearly. So far that hasn't changed. I'm well satisfied. You couldn't be doing things any better than you already are.
This is a great little collection of Rock tunes. They're kind of like Veruca salt meets Area 7 (another great Austrlian band). Hope to see these guys live after listerning to this cd! Well worth a listen.
I was hesitant to buy this for my new MacBook Pro, but I'm glad I did. I took a little getting used to, but it fits very well over the keys with minimal typing interference. It's not completely transparent so it does cloud the key symbols a little bit, but not enough to make them unreadable in normal light or when the backlighting is on. I don't have any problems with it sticking to the screen (I have the regular, not glossy screen) when the cover is closed. This is cheap insurance for your computer. Liquid spills into the keyboard of a laptop computer are a disaster. The repair will be very expensive and will not be covered under warranty.
This Keyboard protector is GREAT for protecting your keys. It actually feels really good to type with also. I wouldn't have any gripes about it if i didn't have cats. They cat hair that is floating around my house all the time gets immediately stuck to the protector and is difficult to get off unless you take it off and wash it. I'd have to do that almost everyday if i wanted to keep it cat hair free...Otherwise it's great and i would highly recommend buying it.
I picked up an iSkin for my MacBook Pro and I think it is great. It fits well and has a good feel about it. The keyboard backlighting is clearly visible under low light conditions. My only gripe is that it seems a little pricey for what it is. Still, I think it is a good investment for a laptop.
Got these to put in my camper, great for a low watt system. I am surprised at the bass response in these little speakers. I wouldn't put them in a high power system (they are rated at 75 watt) but for a low watt system they sound very good and look great too.
A mad scientist builds a female Frankenstein type monster (though it looks male) with the help of the late Dr.Frankenstein's beautiful teenaged daughter and his former assistant. All the while Frankensteins daughter is being fed a secret formula that transforms her into a hidous Edward Hyde type creature at night. A very weird movie with two mnsters, so you wont get bored. Lots of fun from the 50s. During this period Universal's old classic monster films were being rereleased and shown on TV. So a lot of smaller studios decided to release newUniversal style monster movies. FRANKENSTEIN'S DAUGHTER falls into this catagory. Others were FRANKENSTEIN 1970, INDESTRUCTABLE MAN and THE WEREWOLF
Paul Bowles was a great writer who also did us the service of translating many Morroccan writings. One of these writers is Mohammed Mrabet. This little title Mhashish was put out by the City Lights label many years ago. It contains tales largely revolving around the use of kif (or hashish as Americans would call it) It is a delightful collection of tales. Mrabet is a talented writer. He draws up some tantalizing tales that delve into the positive and negative of this state of mind. It is a good introductory volume for the novice (admittedly I am a novice myself) of Morroccan literature. Mr Bowles did us a great favor in translating numerous works by Mrabet. Let us pray to Allah that City Lights finds it in their hearts to reissue these fine collections of exotic literature.
At 31, I was considering the military. I thought it would be something to join and have a job. However, this book gave me the inside of what REALLY goes on in the military, Good and Bad. For me , this book really helped in making my decision.
There is a wide variety of Latin on this CD: some smooth, some stacatto, some furiously fast, a Rumba and a merengue. One track in particular, though, is interesting: Lejos de Ti, which sounds like a track I have called "Yo Naci En Puerto Rico", which is attributed to Hector Lavoe in most places on the Web. However, the quality of the music isn't as good as elsewhere on the disc, in part as the crowd is more than slightly boisterous; the other songs are not live. If you like Canales' sound, this is a good place to go for it
A fabulous history of Seattle in word and photograph. It is a Who's Who listing those that gave Seattle her flavor and distinguished character. This is a must read and study for all native Seattleites as well as for newly arrived residents. The buildings: commercial, residential and schools show the step by step progress that the city has made through the designs of noted architects. From 1853 to date the book covers Seattle's development. It is a first class read and study.
This is a very good story of women relationships, set in the old timey rural South. Charlie Kate was a tough character, but I guess that is what it takes to survive, especially if you are a woman taking care of yourself and your family.
This book is easy reading that takes you back to a simple time. Has a 1930's or 40.s feel to it.
Gibbons' Charms for the Easy Life captures the lives of three generations of southern women. The tale is interwoven with humor, compassion, and Gibbons' brilliant style. The power of this novel transcend the mere power of the written word - it changes and enriches the reader.
I have read several Kaye Gibbon's novels and found this to be a wonderfully passionate and emotional novel. Charlie Kate represents a forward thinking woman who was not afraid to care for sick and desolate people of that era. I found much substance in the novel. I am in the medical profession and felt that Kaye Gibbons did her homework regarding herbal remedies and medical treatments that seemed appropiate. Take time to read this novel it is worth it!
As a librarian, I am always looking for books that appeal to a variety of our clients, as well as, a book that I will enjoy. This book is absolutely wonderful! It moved me by the strength of Charlie Kate and weaving of the tale of war, romance and a coming of age for Margaret. I have read this book 3 times within the last 4 years and the ending always moves me to tears. This is a fabulous book.
This book is about three generations of strong southern women. My favorite character by far was the grandmother and matriarch, Charlie Kate. She is a self taught healer, and treats her patients with a combination of common sense and tradition. Charlie Kate is feisty and isn't afraid to speak her mind or take on the powers that be. I also dearly loved the relationship she has with her granddaughter (and of course it made me think of my own grandmothers often).
Charms of the Easy Life was an eventful filled book that left me wanting to know what happened afterwards, How Sophia and Richard went on with their lives, and if Margaret ever goes to college and what happens with she and Tom. Not only does this book excite you with backwood practice of medicine but it also intrests the minds on if the medicine would actually work. It is the story of three women, defied by men but encouraged each other to continue life and live it to the fullest. It is worth reading and passing on to a friend
I like to keep a second copy of this book handy in case I need to recommend it to someone. I don't ever want to be without it. The women in this story all live on in my mind/heart long after the last time I read it. I was not crazy about Ellen Foster when Oprah went on and on about it...I always thought she should have chosen this book.I guess if you're "forced" to read this for school I would recommend that you have a quick attitude adjustment first. Having been stuck reading some seriously dry assignments long ago in the stone ages, how I WISH a story like this would have been put in my life when I was younger! I can't understand a word of the negative reviews here.It's like chocolate.I understand how people might not like brussel sprouts even though I do. I don't understand how anyone can possibly NOT adore chocolate. That's what Charms for the Easy Life is for me.
This book recognizes that our actions flow from our beliefs. It does an excellent job of using the truths of the Bible to align our beliefs with God's love for us. Our good actions flow from God's profound assurance of freedom and love.
This is probaly the best hiking book of any such types. truly informative. The pages seem to be made of a light density papyprus product...making it ideal for backpacking. The Author has truly captured the essense of hiking out in the Alaska Booneys.
My sister uses this and recommended it to me. It is easy to use, convient and the results are immediatly visable. I use this file in between professinal pedicures. Place the file in the shower and pull your feet across it - you can see the dead skin coming off. Leaves your feet amazingly improved. Priced well.
I am a physicist and this program was quite interesting for me. Difficult research is presented in very simple manner and can be understood by almost everyone. Some facts were new to me and I truly enjoyed watching it. I would give it 5 stars, but there is something on the back of my mind - at the end I found it a little bit too simple in terms of visual contents.
without feeling greasy....on addition to this product I bought a body cellulite massager and the combination works great but this cream without anything else is a great moisterizer; therefore the skin looks renewed and less bumpy. While we were on vacation my husband asked me what could he used on his ankles that were so dry. I gave him this pot of cream and he wouldn't let it go. Nivea is a trade mark of years of great products! Look for my other reviews on their sun kissed products.
I found this book to be very informative and easy to follow if you decide to build a Chimney Swift tower. I built my tower in March 2007 so that I can attract the Swifts to control flying insects like mosquitos and I am still waiting for my first Swift to take residence. My neighbors were very curious about what I was building and I enjoyed educating them about the value of Chimney Swifts. I am sure the Swifts will find the tower eventually.
Few films these days are truly inspired and challenge the viewer to become a better person for having watched the film. This is a rare gem that does just that. This film is crammed full of emotion and heart. It is absolutely a testament to the fact that love, generosity, selflessness, having an appreciation for life and caring for each person we meet will make this world a better place. This film will challenge you to take life and your dreams to the next level. ...And keep those tissues nearby. With this much emotion packed in, you'll definitely need them.
A Brief Conversation And Other Stories presents thirteen vivid short stories by award-winning author Earl Lovelace. This are fictional tales which offer a down-to-earth glimpse into the daily life Trinidad denizens. Ordinary people facing the challenges of the ever-changing rhythm of their world, brought to life with Caribbean zest and style in the narration. Superb crafted literary gems, the stories comprising A Brief Conversation And Other Stories include: A Brief Conversion; The Fire Eater's Journey; The Coward; The Fire Eater's Return; Call Me 'Miss Ross" for Now; Those Heavy Cakes; George and the Bicycle Pump; Fleurs; The Midnight Robber; Joebell and America; Shoemaker Arnold; Victoria and the Blight; and The Gambler's Funeral.
This story is fantastic. The author's grasp of the language and speech of the period is wonderful and completely creates an atmosphere that one cannot help but fall into. This is now one of my favorite books!
WOW! This is one of my favorite books.The story is well written and fairly easy to follow.The archaic english was a bit confusing at first but with kindle's built in dictionary it was actually rather fun.A book i will read over and over.i Certainly reccomend reading.
The Black Arrow was an enjoyable, fast-paced adventure novel. The protagonist was flawed in a way that made him believable and likable. Best of all, his flaws serve the reader as subtle cautionary tales against haste and violence while still providing a very entertaining read.Written for adolescents, I expect that the novel's period-style language would be somewhat difficult for younger readers today although I do think that the lessons are valuable enough that young people should be encouraged to at least attempt what is otherwise a not very challenging read. The ending, the change in the protagonist's goals and his realizations about his own actions were very satisfying.Additionally, I found the free Kindle edition to be adequate and free from distracting format errors or other issues.
A fun, fast-moving adventure story, set in England in the 1400s, at the time of the Wars of the Roses. One thing I like about it is that the hero makes lots of mistakes. He sort of bumbles through the book, barely escaping with this life, and making a hash of most things...much more realistic than most heroes.
This is an ok book. It is action packed and holds your attention. I think that the main charecter, Dick Shelton, is a lot like many people today even though the book takes place in Medieval times. Dick did not know that he was fighting for his enemy Sir Daniel, the man who had killed his father. I think this is one of the best historical fiction books that I have ever read. I hope that you will like it as much as I did.
This Bible by Thomas Nelson is beautiful and simple to understand. I recomend it to the Religious.Nelson Villamor y Fleitas.
It's unfortunate that many of Kirban's books are either out-of-print or hard to get. Many Christians familiar with Grant Jeffrey or Hal Lindsey would find much familar ground in Kirban's works. A born-again Arab, Kirban uses many examples from the Bible and then explains what they mean to us today. "Guide to Survival" mostly concerns Revelation. Kirban takes us down the road showing the prophecies that tell us how the world will end and in what order. Yes, there's quite a bit about the Rapture here, and the time just before the Rapture, as well as a lot of material about what remains left undone for those "Left Behind". The pictures available in the trade paperback edition help emphasize the warnings that Kirban gives to all of us. If you like the "Left Behind" books and want to understand how they really can occur, then I can recommend almost no better writer to start with than Salem Kirban.
I recommend everyone with a video iPod buy this. It is excellent for protecting the screen, as well as the overall finish on the iPod. This is cheap insurance for a very pricey product.
Its excellent, i love it, but try interpreting this in the practical middle brow range of actually doing something with it.Thats not a complain, thats an open ended challenge -- as I've been conjuring with little success for a couple of years: all thoughtswelcome!
this cd is a good buy and you will be glad of your purchase. It has many artists which is nice because you don't have to listen to one artist
Nice to hear a band that doesn't depend on vocals--this music is impressive of its own accord. Very entertaining album, with a little something for everyone--surf, jazz, blues, exotica...goes over great at parties. Excellent guitar work.
its a must have for all the 80s junkiesits a must have for all the 80s junkies born between 66-74its a must have for all the 80s junkies and punk rockers born between 66-74
It contains the autentic Depeche sound, with the gratest songs they ever created. If you never heard any song of Depeche Mode, give a try to this amazing disc, and you will not be disappointed.
This book is a "must have" as it takes the reader to the Shinto/Japanese spiritual roots of Reiki and where Reiki comes from. This book has become my Reiki bible and has deepened my practice. When you perform the exercises, as specified, the energy is undescrible and so very spiritual as it takes the participant to another place and space. If you purchase no other Reiki book this is the book to have.
Whether you are new to Reiki energy or have been practicing for years, this book will give you the knowledge and awareness of a comprehensive approach to using Reiki for self healing. You will come to understand the true history of Reiki, and then move on to learn the various techniques used in Japanese Reiki which will allow you to deepen your practice. These techniques are rarely taught in Western courses, which are typically greatly abbreviated, and often filled with misinformation.Bronwen and Stiene have built a rock solid reputation for the accuracy and integrity of their work.
There is so much emphesus that Reiki is only about healing others, when in fact..."Reiki is about self-practice, self-responsibility and personal development."This book takes you back in time to what reiki is on a personal level, and what Usui-sensei originally taught. Reiki was not meant to be of just "palm healing" only, becoming a Reiki master/teacher and just healing others, look inside yourself and listen, Reiki is all about "you"!Get the book, read it and when you are done, read it AGAIN! There is no other book that can compare!
I liked the power rating and that it will turn on passively with an analog input (such as the stereo out from a flat screen TV). Shipment was lightening fast and packaging was top notch.Amazon has(d) it on sale for 80 bucks, so jumped on it. While the sound is tolerable it doesn't fit in with the quality of the rest of the system. So this will be relegated to anotherroom and I'll go for the Crown Amp like I should have in the first place.
I hooked this up to my BOSE 301 series II speakers and it really works great! I first played my iPod 5g nano through this amp, and while the sound was clean I was a bit disappointed in the volume of sound, then I played my 4g ipod touch and BAM! Much better! Better amp in the 4g iPod touch. I've got PLENTY of volume, in fact more than I'll use. No need for a sub with these 301's as I don't listen to hiphop. The amp foot print is small, discreet, and free of choices, that's really a good thing! Additionally, I like Amazon, this company is always great to do internet business with, and are very smart moving forward in this new economy...down with ebay up with AMAZON!Oh yeah, sittin' here jammin to Ozric Tenticles "Waterfall Cities", and it's soundin' AWESOME!
I used this to power a pair of outdoor Bose speakers on my back deck and it works well. Runs cool; I have the AudioSource Amp installed in a closed kitchen cabinet with no heat problems.My music source is an Apple AirPort Express with Air Tunes (M9470LL/A) connected to the amp through an headphone jack splitter. All my music is stored on an XP PC in iTunes and streamed wirelessly to the Air Tunes box. I have the AirPort Express sound jack connected to two amplifier inputs; 1-a cheap $16 powered PC speaker set (has subwoofer) for listening in the kitchen (sounds great!), and 2 - this AudioSource amplifier. Music quality is good through the AudioSource Amp. I wish it had a bass boost but I think that is a problem with my Bose speakers.A great value.
I purchased this amp to power my outdoor speakers but it would also be great for a simple indoor system. Good,solid quality,excellent sound!! I would highly recommend.
I did not expect much from this little amp but it works !!! Installed it for I pod connection for four speakers in ocean front home in Mexico. With salt air, I did not expect it to last long, like most electronics down there, but it has been cranking for over two years. When it stops working, I will get another one. Think of it as the Keenex of amps............................$75
I wanted an amp to play MP-3 music, and this is perfect----simple, easy to hook up, and good quality sound thru my fairly inexpensive speakers.No complaints.
I like this product. It's low profile and a great value. I connected a radio and cd player to it. The radio should kick out automatically once the CD player starts. My only minor complaint is the radio doesn't kick out until the sound output from the CD is high enough. I once played a CD that has a very quiet passage at the beginning, it didn't switch over until it got louder. If you are just looking for a great amp that you technically declined spouse or significant other can't comprehend, this is the amp for you. The auto power feature on is great. The sound is very clean and faithful. I do wish it had a subwoofer out. That would make it perfect for me.
This is a great product saddled with unclear instructions.The single biggest thing to note about this amp is:Input 1 is signal sensing. If you connect a source in this input that has quiet passages (like classical music), it will turn itself on and off resulting in an audible "click". This was made so it can turn itself on when it senses a signal is completely normal. So, if you plan on using it as an amp, you have one "always on" input. Other than that, it's a nice sounding amp for not a lot of money.
Using as the amp for surround back channels, sounds good, running cool. Would suggest this for anyone needing auxiliary amp.
The directions for installation were very sparse and it took some time and a few mistakes to set up, even though the final setup is quite simple. But once it was up and running, it worked excellently.
This is a fine item with no flaws whatsoever. It has been received as represented by the seller and is in new condition. My only problem has been with its description in the online presentationwhich needed a more thorough exposition, The failure with this item has been all mine due to mytoo cursury search of its attributes. This seller is blameless here, and performed his role admirably and excellently.Respectfully,Courtenay J. Walker
I have a whole-house sound entertainment system, which includes a pair of speakers in the dining room, a pair of speakers in the living room, and a pair of speakers in the bedroom. I have a AirportExpress connected directly to this unit, and it has no problem powering all six pairs of in-ceiling speakers. In fact, this unit is so powerful, I cannot turn the volume up beyond the midpoint because I fear that my windows will break. An excellent product for the price.Note: This unit has a single RCA output, so make sure you use a splitter if you intend to connect multiple pairs of speakers to this amplifier.
My need was to drive extra speakers satellite in two different rooms. It works fine for that purpose but barely. Driving 2 pair of 8" 8 ohm ceiling speakers" wired in parallel with impedance matching volume controls takes about all this amp can put out. Sounds fine and works ok but volume control is set close to max. Frustrating that it shuts down if signal level drops (between selections, etc) but instructions give the work around to prevent it. For the price it is a real bargain but if you need some power think about the next level up.
What a wonderful book. You just have to read it and then you will understand.
My son asked for this book for Christmas. He is a Math teacher. I haven't given it to him yet
A beautiful read. And I mean beautiful. As I read I could envision see the beauty in the patterns being described. It is both history and description. I would definitely recommend this book.
I thought this movie was super cute. Some of the plot points were a little fuzzy, but as far as romantic comedies go, it was fun. Gabrielle Anwar is great, and Sean Astin was pretty fun. I didn't realize that one of the guys is Smith from Sex and the City, so that made it even better! ;)
The overall quality is good, but the fit is tight. If you want a relaxed fit, these may not be to your liking.
I've only recently started using this product to monitor my heart rate and am still in the learning process of how to use the produce efficiently. It has so many things that it can keep track of. I find it to be rather comfortable to use. It monitors my heart rate in % which helps me to stay within my range. I would recommend this product to anyone who is looking to get away from those chest strap monitors.
The author follows the main story of the Scripture passage with imaginative characters and possible cultural embellishments. An easy and enjoyable book with good life lessons in principle.
Thought this book was great. Well written, I could not stop reading.My only issue is with a lot of the other reviews that say this is a Christian book. It is not, Google King Hezekiah and learn that he is of the House of David and Jewish. For those reading that he is of the genealogy of Jesus and assuming he is Christian is forgetting that Jesus himself was Jewish.Sorry for my little rant but please know what you are reading.
I really enjoyed this book. It was exciting and interesting. I'm fairly familiar with my Bible, but this book had me wanting to check and double check things. I'd find myself reading my Bible to see how the story was going to go! My teenage daughter read it first and said she thought I'd like it. She was right! I recommended it to my teenage son and he was on book 2 within a couple days. You just don't want to put it down!I like it when a book can bring a Bible story to life without contradicting the Bible itself. I'm on the 3rd book so far and still loving it!
I wish I could give this book 10 stars. Lynn Austin is a fabulous author and her writing is scripturally sound. Once you start this book, you don't want to put it down until you have read the 5 books in this series. I highly recommend this book and have bought several as gifts for my friends.
Austin brings to life a part of the gospel many wish to skip over. The horror of idolatry is described in ways many refuse to visualize because of the horror that is involved. This is a wonderful portrayal of this dark time in Israel's history and the beginning of the glorious rising out of the darkness of sin.
This is an exciting book to read. The story of God's protection of Hezikiah from his youth. Full of political intrigue it takes places in a dangerous time for Israel both physically and spiritually. The suspense and horror in the book grabs the reader. I will try other books in this series.
This was the first in the series, and i was "hooked" until I finished book#5. Amazing Bible based fiction. I was so encouraged when I saw the characters "come to life" with Ms. Autens' literary skills. Recommend all five as a very good read and study.
This is an excellent historical novel and keeps the reader engaged to the end. I highly recommend it to anyone interested in putting a face on early Biblical historical characters.
I purchased this book for my Kindle app-- mostly b/c it was free. HOWEVER! Once I started reading it, I couldn't stop! In fact, I read the entire series in a week. I know others have said this-- there are a few typos (not really a "big deal" in my opinion ;) ), but the book is so well written. I gained a wonderful insight to biblical history in a way that I've never had before. READ THIS BOOK! :) And go ahead and get the rest of the series, too, while you're at it...
Although this is fiction, it is an interesting way to present what the Bible says about Ahaz and Hezekiah. This book follows Hezekiah from childhood. It is so intriguing. I loved every page. Lynn Austin brings the characters in the Bible alive and makes them so real. I found myself searching the scripture to see what the Bible actually says about what happens during this time. As soon as I finished the book I was downloading the next one in the series.I totally recommend this book. It is a terrific read!
I love to read Bible stories in the fictional form. They add life to the old stories we've heard so often. This book does a great job in telling us the story of the ancient kings. I've read other reviews, and they speak of many typos. Well, in the Kindle edition, they may have corrected some, but they missed quite a few in chapters 18 and 19. Because I am a student of the Bible, I found some of the repetition somewhat tedious. It was still an enjoyable read. I wonder if we could get the rest of the books in the series for free when we find typos in them.
Although familiar with the Old Testament, this particular story is not one with a lot of detail, or often retold. So...the culture was familiar only in a vague way. I really liked the way the author took the few facts from the Bible and constructed a compelling story. I enjoyed it very much!
Lynn Austin beautifully combined the historical facts of Hezekiah's reign with her imagination of how one event may have led to the other. I was constantly looking at my Bible to be sure the scripture references were correct; they were!
This was the first Lynn Austin book I read, and I could not put it down. I quickly read the following books in this series. This first one started out difficult to read, simply because of the subject matter, and almost a year after I read it I still think about it from time to time. Even if you are not a fan of Biblical fiction, I would still highly suggest this book. Well done, Lynn Austin!
This novel grabbed by interest from the very beginning and held it to the last word. Gods and Kings is a beautifully written action packed story. I recommend it to anyone interested in history, religion, action.... its a great read!
I read this book in a day. Couldn't put it down. Just purchased the next book and will start It as soon as i get some sleep!
I really have enjoyed this book for it's amazing details that bring the listed bible scriptures to life. The research that was used makes it more credible as I also go back and read those verses in my own bible.
Downloaded 2nd book as soon as i finished this one, that should tell how i felt about this book.Would recommend it to anyone who has an interest in the history of Israel and enjoys a good story.
A very good book based on facts from the Bible. The facts are taken from several books: Chronicles, Isaiah, Michah and Kings. I thought the author did a great job of filling the missing pieces to make a great story.
I loved this book, did not want to put it down. I really enjoy Francine Rivers books and this was very comparable to her series "Women of the Bible". Can't wait to read more!!!
Lynn Austin has done an amazing job with Gods & Kings. She has breathed life into her characters: wicked King Ahaz, his son Hezekiah, Shebna, and all the others. I was there, watching this cast of characters become living, breathing, human beings who were not just names in the Bible. I felt their pain, their sorrow, and their joy. You won't be able to quit reading until you've read the entire series. God has gifted Austin with an amazing writing ability.
I loved this book so much that I read it straight through! And then I read the rest of them in succession. Austin is a great author, bringing the Biblical characters alive in a way I'd never imagined. This book series will expand your understanding of this Old Testament story of Hezekiah, and it is fascinating!
Lynn Austin's books are ALL great but this series is my most favorite. It's exciting, scary, sad and biblical even though it is fictional. In fact, it drives you to the Bible to check out her historical facts. I felt all the emotions that the characters felt. I wish she would write more biblical fiction. She makes it all come alive!
A very interesting read. The historical content was excellent as it came to life. I could not wait to see what would happen next. Makes you reflect on what values are really important to you and how easily you can be sidetracked and never get back to the place you should be in some instances. On the other hand with some perseverance you can get back on track and be in good standing.
AFter reading this, I had to search the Old Testament for the story of Hezekiah, Ahaz, and Isaiah. Very entertaining read. Can't wait to read the next one.
Lynn Austin is my new favorite author. I really like the way she writes her books. So far I have read 3 of her books and they are all good ones.
I could not put this down. The story put biblical events to life and kept me on the edge of my seat. This is a must read! Can't wait to start the next in the series...
Excellent book. Very vivid imagery through details. Lynn Austin is definitely on my list of authors I like now. Pick this up and read it, it's a must!
This was the first of 5 DVDs I bought of Frank Klausz. So, in a real way this is a review of his videos as a group, besides this one on hand tools. Klausz is always clear and precise. He demonstrates speed in addition to craftsmanship. Be sure to buy his DVD on dovetails and mortise and tenon joints to see Frank further demonstrate hand tools achieving wonderful results. See him use hand tools as an extension of power tool use.Since I first viewed this DVD I have added to my woodworking addiction by more frequently visiting estate sales/flea markets buying old, rusted tools in order to rehab them. This is terribly satisfying work, and my friends and son-in-law really like the vintage gifts that result.When I buy a DVD, such as this one, I figure 3 or 4 good ideas make the Amazon price for the DVD worth the investment. Frank Klausz always provides more than that.
I love this product, it helps keep things moving! I use it twice a day afternoon and evening while dieting. A great product for helping maintain your weight.
This tea works on my fiance's digestive track as she has an issue with colitis and this product along with essential enzymes helps her to absorb and digest foods that otherwise would give her pains while in her digestive track, Thank you for making this product we plan to continue using it as long as we can.
I never drink this tea alone. I always steep it with another tea, such as Oolong or Jasmine because the taste isn't the best. I use honey and sugar to sweeten and down the hatch it goes! Expect some, um, gastrointestinal responses the next day. Sometimes I feel a bit of cramping and sometimes I don't. Sometimes it will take most of the next day for it to 'work'...and sometimes it won't!!
This is far and away the best cinnamon tea I have ever found. It's quite difficult to find a cinnamon tea without added flavors like apple. This is just cinnamon tea, and it's aroma and taste is that of fresh cinnamon. Also I drink this after dinner to curb my carb cravings, and amazingly, it does the trick.
M.C. Beaton is my favorite author - I have all of her books - I so enjoy Agatha and her exploits - please write more
M.C. Beaton can't be beat for the cozy mystery and Agatha Raisin is so much fun. she's 50-ish, stout, and has bearlike eyes. Moreover she's human -- vain, silly, romantic. She's also smart and sassy and independent. Love from Hell is another in a long series of Agatha mysteries, and reads are good as the first ones.
I was a bit put off in the beginning with the poor quality of the DVD, the picture seemed to be grainy. The theater was very dark and you saw very little of the orchestra or the conductor. But when the singers 'warmed up' you were impressed with the voices. Donizetti's music, as always is so melodic you can close your eyes, sit back and soar! The audience was enthusiastic in their applause, prolonged ovations; Leonora was visibly moved to tears after the ovation for one of her arias. The cast was excellant, choreography for ballet scene was superb. I was only slightly disappointed with the set direction and the quality of the filming of the DVD.
Yes, a great performance, the music was beautiful but the quality of the DVD leaves a lot to be desired, the image was blurry and at times looked washed out and the intrusion of the prompter at times drove me to anger, but in spite of everything I am glad that I saw this performance and added it to my collection.Just the joy of hearing Cossotto, Kraus and Raimondi in their prime is worth the price of this item.Warts and all, I highly recommend it.If you are an opera lover you'll enjoy this rarely performed opera.
By far the best recording I have seen of this, one of Donizetti's most famous operas. Alfredo Kraus sings an especially fine Fernando.
Five faces of darkness is almost as good as the original movie. While lacking the print quality of the original, it is excellent in content. Appearences by Trypticon amoung others, is very interesting to the dearest of fans. It's all here, the origen, and many other interesting stories. Although this cinematic masterpiece is no longer published, I wish it were, having watched it. AJauasataian, a awesome transformer also makes an appearance.
This is just Five Faces Of Darkness, the five part third season premier from the original Transformers TV show. If you grew up back then, like me, then you should have already seen this yourself back in the day. If you didn't, or you're new to G1 shows, this is ok but not essential to your enjoying The Transformers: The Movie. The F.H.E. Video of these episodes has been available for rent at my local ... for years & years. Since it's not likely to be available here, check your ... or, better yet, go to ..., check out the CTLP and get your episodes on VHS from one of the many video traders/sellers who have many if not all G1 episodes on tape. That's what I did for the episodes I wanted that haven't been released by Rhino Video yet.
Robocop 3 was released in 1993.The rating is pg-13.Peter Weller is replaced by Robert John Burke(Safe,Limitless).The movie is directed by Fred Dekker(Ricochet),written by Frank Miller.Robocop 3 stars Remy Ryan(Monkey Trouble),Rip Torn(Men In Black,Extreme Prejudice),CCH Pounder(Face Off,Avatar),Mako(Pearl Harbor,Conan the Barbarian),John Castle(Gods and Generals).Omni Consumer Products OCP have created a new armed forces known as the Urban Rehabilitators and call themselves rehabs.They are leaded by Paul McDagget (John Castle).They have better weapons and are more trained than the Detroit Police.They are mostly to kick out the remaining residents of Cadillac Heights and other areas.There is an underground resistance of civilians which the rehabs are tracking down.
Robocop 3 is awesome. i don't understand why so many people don't like it. i think it's a good movie. it's a must see for robocop fans
Robocop 3 wasn't nearly as unintentionally comical as I had hoped. Instead, it's pretty similar to the original Robocop, but with updated movie technics to make the picture and effects at least appear better, even though the storytelling is just as cheesy as it always was.One thing that was very cheesy was the ending where Robocop finds an ability to fly. It was extremely funny watching him fly around the city taking out the bad guys.The amount of action was pretty good, as far as enjoyment in that area is concerned. As for the storytelling aspect, well, a little girl entered the scene in the very beginning that showed her parents getting shoved into a bus, never to be seen again. The little girl, who's a computer genius, becomes friends with Robocop.If you liked the first Robocop, I believe you'll this one just as much. There's plenty of humor as well, mostly from the words Robocop says. Just forget about "flying Robocop" near the end.
Kozinsky's interpretation of Reger's op. 57 is rather controlled; the double fugue glides without shakes, the organ seems to favour it spreading out an uniform sound mantle; if you are fond of this work, and wait for the wise "slowdowns" before theme's repeats, as Wheinberger or Germani did, you'll be disappointed. Moreover Bach's BWV 562, in comparison with so much discography, does not present surprises of great importance. The listener thinks: another organist philologist? Till Karg Elert's spirit on the one hand, on the other Karl Richter appear suddenly to Kozinsky on track n5: it's only possible this way to explain an incredible, rhapsodical, furious interpretation of a real masterpiece, whose I don't know different recordings. Only this one merits more than five stars; but never I saw before someone to face a program so deadly for an anthological CD. Thank's to GM Records.Roberto Ranieri
I was surprised to even find this battery. I have had my Bayco rechargeable light for years and one of the batteries is failing so to find a replacement for it was a very good thing. You have to love Amazon for the variety of items it sells. The battery was shipped quickly and works as advertised. Thanks Amazon!
Great book, however we're using EclipseUML which seems to be more widely used now. It would be nice to be written with that program in mind. Also would be nice if it was converted to American English. Some analagies are hard to understand if you're not familiar with Brittish colloquialisms. Also, author uses Textio class to do outputs. Why not just use the System classes? Seems unnecessary to me and an extra level of confusion for beginners.
Reading Rigoberto Gonzalez's poetics was a feast, a delight on a snowy night in New England. Having just returned from Michoacan, I savored the poet's use of space, diction, and lyricism, mapping a necessary poetics in the American imaginary.It is clear that the poet is meticulous with language. He uses the senses to their maximum potential and creates something wonderful that is poetry. As an aficionado of poetry, I so anticipate such caliber of poetry and prose from Rigoberto Gonzalez in the future.
Alright, it's pricey but if you want the best, most powerful air hammer on the market, this is it, no joke. I work for a GM dealership and do alot of front end work. My snap-on air hammer ph3045 (not blue point) can't compare to this thing. I work with a guy who has one of these and whenever I had trouble he'd break his 717 out and knock whatever it was out without a problem. Ball joints, wheel studs, bearings, no problem. Thats why I bought one. You will not be disappointed! Everyone in my shop always talks about this air hammer as the end all to anything stuck and it never disappoints!
Even though this album is now well over 20 years old, it still hold a special place in my heart. I spent many car trips listening to Hooked On Classics when I was a child. The music is wonderfully arranged to cover a wide variety of classics in a single album.Highly recommended!
After a Tromatic plane crash on an island somewhere off the face of Cuba, a few spirited Tromaville Citizens are about to find out the harsh reality of guerilla warfare. It is only a short period of time before the battle for life and death begins in one of Troma's ultimate masterpieces. If you like Troma, an interesting plot, or just a plain bloodbath, then Troma's war has it all. Though not the best Troma film, it is still worth getting. Unfortunately, it doesn't measure up to the wonderfully black standards of Terror Firmer, but then again, what could? It is still an amazing film, and a good storyline.
One of Tromas Best Movies Besides The Epic Toxic Avenger. The Best Part of The Movie besides the Blood and Guts Was The Guy Who Was AIRBORNE! Killing everyone and Wearing Their Ears. timeless Classic.
Troma's War is a different kind of Troma movie. Sure, it's violent, dumb (in a good way), and has some good t & a. But it's also more of an action movie instead of a horror-comedy, which is what Troma is famous for. It's pretty much non-stop exciting, violent, and action-packed. They don't make them like this anymore, unfortunately. Also, while watching I felt like I was watching a lost entry in the Rambo series, or maybe a sequel to Commando. It's like Rambo and Commando, only done Troma-style, and I'd say it has more action than either of those or the rest in the Rambo series. I recommend Troma's War if you're a fan of Troma movies, or violent shoot em' up action movies. You won't be disappointed.
I tried to order a fair amount of Micheal Jordans and it seems like you bill shipping for each card, I hope thats an error from amazon, if this can be corrected so I can start to order in a small bulk fashion. Thats near 5 dollars per card via amazon.Thank YouDavid
There is a little detective in all of us, but in most cases one wouldn't know where to begin. If you are curious about possible existence of paranormal phenomenon this book gives you that place to start. Whether a skeptic,a believer,this book gives the information needed to begin simple investigations in a manner that is easy to understand. For someone who hasn't had years of experience in the paranormal, or criminal investigation some of the books available can be intimidating. Mr Southalls book however makes you feel that doing your own investigation is within abilities. This book is not perfect, but it give an excellent starting point for the novice to begin investigating from.
The book was an easy read for the in-training investigator. I was however a little disappointed by the one mistake about the Greenbrier Ghost, it said the year, which had the last 2 numbers switched in the paragraph, I probably wouldn't have caught it if it hadn't been for the photograph of the tombstone directly below it.Besides, that little mistake, I found the book enjoyable and it gave me a lot of ideas on what to take into my next investigation.
I used this book as a supplement to a crash course in Statistics for Graduate School. It is very good, but it can be a little skimpy on complete explaination of all the variables in an equation.One good feature of the text is that the next chapter builds on the previous. The complexity of the various statistical equations grows gradually. This is helpful in may respects, but the writer(s) assume that the reader has an EXCEPTIONAL memory and can readily recall details from 1, 2, or 3 chapters back which apply to the current text. I found myself going back and re-reading previous chapters to get a handle on the chapter I was actualy reading.Overall, the book is good but on one should try to use it as their sole book on business statistics.
The story is lovely, and I am quite sure my grandchildren will enjoy it. The illustrations are sharp and colorful. There are two troublesome problems. First there is an incomplete paragraph half way through the book. Even worse is that it takes several taps to enlarge the tiny font. On some pages one tap did it. On others, it took several taps. A few times I gave up.
My mom read this book to me. I liked because it was a new book. I liked the sqeegy bug because he wanted wings and a stinger but instead the spider gave him wings and a light. I would recommend this book. I am 9 years old.
I really liked the cards. I teach a class in creativity and I was able to give them to individual students to encourage their creative growth.
When it comes to being creative, we often need help. Eric Maisel's books have given me great insight into the creative process, as well as concrete suggestions for assistance when creating doesn't come easy. These cards so far haven't helped me in a deep way, but they are fun, and encouraging. They would probably help more if I used them in a more ritualized, consistent way.
This is truly exciting music. Played with passion, this arrangement explores little known Slavik and Eastern European music. The ensemble between the cello and piano is faultless and the richness of the cello sound (played on an 1733 Testore) makes the album memorable. Karen Kaderavek, already a well established cellist, will go far.
Bjork might be somewhat of an acquired taste, but even if you don't like her you have to admit that she is completely original and unlike any other artist out there. Bjork is always ahead of her time! Not all the songs on Post blew my mind but the ones that did (HyperBallad especially) make this album one of my favorites. Become a Bjork fan, you can always wow non-Bjorkers with her wonderful voice and melodic weirdness :) (Plus, Bjork is so adorable! I love seeing her in interviews just to hear her talk! :)
Bjork shows with her album 'Post', tha tshe's not following the comercial way. The song are creative and the CD is a mixture of joy and meditation She finds the inspiration of the texts in her own personality Her voice is a miracle
As much as I enjoy all her work, front to back this is easily my favorite album of hers. The music is as colorful as the cover. "Army Of Me" is nearly industrial pop, "Hyperballad" sounds like just that, and "It's Oh So Quiet", maybe her most popular song ever, sounds like it came right out of a Broadway musical. Two other highlights for me are "Possibly Maybe", which usually puts me in a trance, and "I Miss You", which is just wonderfully wacky, much like it's video. Newcomers should first grab her "Greatest Hits", but after that, "Post" is the most.
This album is a mix of some really great songs, and some bad ones. Army of Me, while a decent song, does not allow Bjork to use her amazingly expressive voice, which is what makes her so good. Hyperballad is the best Bjork song ever, and the song that got me hooked on her. The Modern Things is good, not incredible. It's Oh So Quiet is awesome, great change of pace. Enjoy is decent, but sounds more like a song for Homogenic or Vespertine. You've Been Flirting Again bores me to death every time, I usually skip it. Isobel rocks, good beat and melody. Possibly Maybe also rocks, and falls just short of Hyperballad for the best lyrics on the album. I miss you is an embarrasment, along with the worst Bjork music video I've ever seen. The band that kicks in at about 2:00 saves it a little. Cover me is pretty boring too. Headphones is cool if you listen to it with headphones on.Overall its not the best Bjork album, but you should buy it just for Hyperballad, It's Oh So Quiet, and Isobel.
"Post" is Bjork's most outstanding effort to date. Much anticipated to follow in the success of her previous release "Debut", "Post" has emerged with new and different experiments in sound. The magical blend of dance beats and strong classical instruments like violins and cellos, sets this artist apart from all others. The powerful tracks of this album, are extremely versatile, resembling big-band, orchestral pieces, and funky techno rhythms- yet it is all Bjork. With her extraordinary vocal talents, it almost wouldn't matter what she had to say but we are thankful for the grace and poetry of her lyrics. Bjork is like no other and this album is a true musical experience.
A challenging record that's worth the effort. "Army of Me" and "Isobel" are favorites and the big band arrangements and trademark mysterious weirdness make it stylistically diverse.
"Army of Me" is the supernova exploding, letting off fragments of Bjork's pure creative force through the galaxy of this album. It produces a beautiful chaos...
On this wonderful album you'll find some strong and powerful songs, starting whit the opening track " Army of me " a very powerful song whit a strong lyric, some men may be a little scary of Björk because of her strong confident.The next song Hyper-ballad is a sweet but strange song, also whit a powerful lyric in it. And at last you'll find Possible Maybe a strong song and Björk really shows what a powerful voice she have.
I love this album. All the songs are great and they're so interesting with all the computer like noises in the background. You won't be disappointed with this album!
the first time i heard hyperballad my heart pounded with the beat...and the plaintive strength of her voice...soso moving...isobel and possibly maybe seduce enchant enthralli can't get over how pretty and powerful bjork is
This concert features Ringo playing Beatles classics that he rarely performs live (if ever)... Don't Pass Me By and Octopuses Garden! Ive seen Ringo live several time and these great songs are left out. Considering how great they sound on this concert i hope he considers including them as concert staples. This show lacks the usual greatest hits night of the supporting band (although it has Who Can It Be Now by the Men At Work guy). Wish it included more songs from the band....their contribution is half the show! Instead you get Ringos new material which some songs are surprisingly catchy..others the usual B-side at best type songs. Sound quality and picture on this blu-ray are awesome! Loved it!
"Ringo Starr and the Rounheads- Live" is a 55 minute long, 14 song concert disk released by Soundstage for PBS television, WTTW 11 of Chicago. It is delightful from start to finish, beginning and ending with a Beatles song. Colin Hays (Men at Work) took to the stage as a guest artist to perform "Who Can It Be Now".Among the Beatles songs executed by the group are ones on which Ringo Starr sang lead vocals as a Beatle, or for which he is credited as co-writer of the song: With A Little Help From My Friends, Yellow Submarine, Act Naturally, Don't Pass Me By and Octopus's Garden.While a good Beatles tribute band like "Rain" is around to delight audiences for many more years it's special to watch a real Beatle on stage leading his own band-the real McCoy. Audio and video quality, as well as performance are all excellent.
Having seen Ringo and his All Starr Band play live in Liverpool and Glasgow last June, I pretty much knew what to expect from this Blu-ray. I wasn't disappointed! Ringo plays to a formula that works a treat. He keeps the crowd on their feet pretty much the whole time with so many hits from both Beatle days and his solo career. What a treat to see Don't Pass Me By, complete with piano introduction! The band are tight and the picture and sound quality of the blu-ray are excellent. My only disappointments are that it runs for less than an hour, there are no extras on the disc and information about the gig and musicians is almost non-existent. There is also a mistake in the credits where the band is shown as including "Mark Har". The keyboard player is former Crowded House member Mark Hart. An unforgivable error. Having said all that, the disc is very entertaining and recommended.
I was really impressed with this Blu-ray concert. Ringo performed really well. The musicians on stage were very talented and suited Ringo perfectly.
Granville-Barker's prefaces to Shakespeare are highly regarded as the first such written from a theatrical (as opposed to literary) point of view. This approach pays particularly high dividends in dealing with this, one of WS's least appreciated plays. (I am currently appearing in a production of it in NYC -- in a small role.) Jan Kott, in describing "Troilus and Cressida" in the 60's, called it "amazing and modern." Cymbeline, in the 90's, seems strikingly post-modern, and Granville Barker, writing in the 20's, accurately describes features of the play which speak strongly to our highly collage-like contemporary approach to art. Highly recommended (as is the Arden edition of the play itself, probably the most charming of all the Arden editions).
Cymbeline is one of the later Shakespeare plays that is rarely staged and probably even as rarely read. The plot has elements that are familiar from several of the earlier works and many of the characters borrow from more familiar characters in other plays as well. Nevertheless, Cymbeline is a rewarding play to either view or read. The Arden version that I recently read was useful but for the footnotes which focused on various usages and interpretations of the language over time which I found distracting and finally chose to just ignore. The play itself because of the familiar elements will appeal to those who have read the better known works. Cymbeline revolves around a layered plot that includes the devices of mistaken identity, evil and deception , unbridled ambition and political intrigue. It is a rather long play with 5 acts and 27 scenes. Having the benefit of seeing this well staged would enhance the reader's experience.
I like Kari Anderson her fun nature laughing while exercising It feels good her queues are easy to follow I have just started to do the step and find it enjoyable.
I bought this radio on the basis of online reviews promising outstanding reception. I need to get good reception on a relatively weak local station. I've tried several other radios that couldn't do the job, most recently a Sony that looked great, but could not detect the desired station. The Receptor distinguishes between adjoining stations and brings in the program crisply and clearly. It's also nicely compact.
We bought this radio after looking at a number of table radios at various price points. The radio was shipped quickly & arrived in original packaging. We paid circa $109. Set-up was incredibly easy; the directions are quite user-friendly & straightforward. Setting preset stations & dual alarm times was simple. Out of the box to installed & playing may have taken 10 minutes. Although we set a number of local stations, we use this Boston Acoustics radio exclusively for playing XM satellite radio (Audiovisions) through an inhouse/incar pioneer satellite radio. The sound quality is crystal clear & stunning. The bass is nicely presented without being overbearing. We wondered about the lack of tone controls but this is a total non-issue since the sound is well balanced & rich. We could have spent more for other brands, but the sound quality from this radio is stunning. Would strongly recommend!!
I wanted a kitchen radio(the alarm function was not important)with great sound that I could hear throughout my fairly large apartment and this radio is just delighting me no end. I considered and looked at the Bose and higher-end Boston Acoustic radios and feel that Consumer Reports is spot on rating this their 'best buy' table-top radio. I was wary of warnings about the bass muffling spoken voice(since I mostly listen to NPR)but I'm not having a problem with that at all.
The Gundam series was excellent...and still is to this very day. I really like this product better over the models...although models are awesome, dont get me wrong...I just like playing with the toys and Like how durable they really are. Definetly a worthy catch, Great price for a Nice G-Gundam fighter.Strongly recomended.
This cd was alot different than waiter. The first track is the next eight put together. Long ambiant phases between dark synth driven songs, much more digital than the pervious album. his vice is possibly better in this cd, definatly worth the ep price
This product is exactly what I needed to hold my scrapbook paper and it slides right under my desk. It is heavy duty enough that it holds all my paper with no sagging or bending.
The Complete Book of Food Counts is essential to any successful healthy lifestyle. It is concise, clear and helpful in every way. I just had gastric bypass surgery and this book was recommended by my surgeon to help guide me nutritionally as I begin my new journey to eating right. This book will enable me to do that.
A previous review bemoans the fact that there is "no entry" for saturated fat. If you look at the book, the entries are for particular foods, from abalone to zucchine; and in a separate part, for chain restaurants from Arby's to White Castle. For EACH AND EVERY ONE OF THESE ENTRIES there is a column that lists grams of saturated fat. Also listed are measurements for calories, protein. carbohydrates, sodium, fiber, total fat, cholesteral and percentage of fat. This seems very useful, systematic and honest. Please ignore the ranting of the previous writer, who clearly has not read or does not understand the organization of the book.
This is a great collection of songs from Farnham, Newton-John and Warlow, plus covers of other well known songs. A really good mix of vocal talents and I love the version of Granada done by John Farnham and Anthony Warlow. I'd thoroughly recommend it if you like any of these three artists or just looking for a good concert CD.
A great challenge to get back to timeless basics. A simple but profound reminder of what it takes to impact culture of any age.
3 different relaxation sessions with explanations embedded within, along with hypnotic programing to help release tension, fears and any pre-programmed negatives which might be preventing pregnancy. Also programming for women who have physical problems that might be inhibiting their fertility. All designed to help remove mental blocks from the subconscious to promote healing on the physical level and mental level. Overall the sessions are very relaxing and refreshing.
I liked this book , the story was interesting and it showed different sides of American culture from the eyes of an immigrant farm worker.
This book is about two Mexican brothers,Jesse and Abel who are tired of struggling to be abel to live the next day. They both work long hours in cotton and grape fields to be abel to put themselves through college, but no matter hard they try things always get in their way.Recommendations:I think that i would recommend this book to everyone adults and my peers.I would like my peers to read this book because it would help them to see that no matter who or what comes in their wat , never give up but keep on going because if it is for the good it will only make you a better person.
Well made, solid, very practical. sauce come out delicious. Retain all the flavors!!!I'll recommend this little pan too any one whose looking for good quality.
This is an excellent cookbook, first off it is all vegan so no dairy or eggs are used although she does mention that milk could be substituted for some recipies. I appreciate its vegan content since I am one, but I know that vegetarian meals can be heavy on dairy as well as typical low carb meals. I loved the tofu benedict and made three of the soups (amazing!) there are great side dishes and new ways to try different veggies. I think the sauces and condiments section are a real bonus in this book. If you are looking for more vegan low carb, I also recommend "low carb vegetarian" by Margo DeMello, a little less fancy meals, but we use more of them regularly (especially the *chicken* caesar salad).i also appreciate the thoughtful intro about good and smart carbs, since its pretty much impossible to sustiain healthy balance being vegan and truly low carb.
If you are just looking for ways to make healthier meals for your family this is a winner whether you are a vegetarian or not. The premise of the book is to increase the whole grains, and decrease sweeteners and refined products. These suggestions are good for everyone.Being a numbers geek I appreciate that the book gives all the relevant nutritional information for each recipe. No matter what numbers you are monitoring the data is here for each dish.I particularly enjoyed the recipe for Chipotle Mashed Cauliflower. The Creamy Cucumber Dijon Dressing is also a very nice recipe. If you are looking for another way to get flax into your family I suggest the Apple and Oats Flaxjacks.Overall I got a lot of ideas from this book regarding how to increase the "health factor" in many of my family favorites. If you are interested in better health, this is a nice book to add to the cooking library.
I've been a vegetarian since I was 17 (am 24 now) and always found it hard to avoid eating way too much pasta, bread, and other starches. This cookbook has opened up a whole new world for my boyfriend and I, as we are trying to South Beach Diet. He loves this cookbook, and he's not even a vegetarian! I recommend the chili that uses red lentils (there are two chili recipes), and the Paglio e Fieno w/ Cashew Sauce recipe that uses thinly sliced and steamed zucchini and squash instead of pasta. Tonight we are making one of the Portobello Burger recipes. I can't wait!!
I just received this recipe book and have already identified a number of recipes for meals this week. The recipes contain ingredients that are easy to obtain in my somewhat rural area. I really like that the author provides the nutritional information for each recipe (including calories, fat, protein, carbs, fiber, cholesterol and sodium). Although I was looking for a low-carb vegetarian recipe book, I am also concerned with fat and cholesterol content and the recipes in this book also appear to be conscious of those as well. Lacto-ovo vegetarians could easily substitute regular cheese for soy cheese and add eggs to some of the recipes.
I just got this cook book. Many of the dishes look very good. So far my husband and I have prepared two recipes; both were decent and we would make them again. The ingredients are very easy to find and are not too expensive.The recipes seem to pack a lot of nutrients, and more protein than I usually get, but they also seem like they do not have enough calories to keep a person alive... after each meal my husband is craving more food. Most "main events" have less than 200 calories per serving.Our main complaint is that these dishes are not "quick and easy." (Though the cook book didn't claim to be.) Usually we prefer dishes that can be cooked in under 30 minutes. A lot of these require 15-30 minutes of prep, and then 30-60 minutes baking/simmering. After a long day of work, we usually go for something faster, otherwise we're eating at 10pm. I've come across a couple that are faster, so they may be our repeat dishes.Overall, I like it.
This recipe book isn't fantastic, but it is the best one I've found so far. A significant number of the main dishes have a decent balance of carb to protein ratio (not significantly higher carb than protein) which is hard to find in a low carb veggie recipe book. If anybody else knows of a better one with respect to that feature please respond below.
I purchased two of the Ionic Breeze Professionals with the added ultraviolet bulb that help to kill bacteria. Based on the amount of black gunk that collects on the metal grids each time I clean it, it must be working. I have read the Consumer Reports that it emits unhealthy ozone and the air does have that after a thunderstome smell, but I have not experienced any breathing problems. My wife is a very heavy smoker (unfortunately) and I think these units are removing a lot of the tobacco smell and particulates. Some reviews say the ozone emitted is so low, it isn't really a concern anyway. Not sure who is right. I have found that the low odor water based Goof Off in the orange spray bottle cleans the black gunk right off the grids. Spray on, let it sit for a minute, wipe off with paper towels, rinse off with water and be sure all parts are completely dry before re-assembling and turning the unit on again.
Received the unit and the ad said "like new" - well it was definitely like new and works perfectly.Great buy.
This is a very good album. It was received as described, and I find the content to be very entertaining. It was, overall, a very good purchase.
If your into good ol fast, poppy, catchy punk rock buy this cd!! I've seen Left Unsaid play many times before & everytime it gets better and better!! This cd is pretty old & they really don't play all the songs off this cd that much anymore. I think they play about 3 or 4 of them. I must say all their new stuff is the best I've heard from them yet! but, until their next cd comes out buy this one. You won't be dissapointed. If you like stuff like strung out, blink 182, get up kids, unwritten law, face to face & and more you'll love this cd!
We are doing a neighborhood discussion group based on this book; all of us coming from different spiritual affiliations. I have heard the neighbors saying it is a fresh perspective since they mostly hear the secular pychological views. So, they are ready for a new perspective. I figured the 13 step was like the 12 step for Alcoholics and included a spiritual view. I am sure the author was not meaning to bate and switch; just simply trying to appeal to the masses of all affiliations and of all different levels of understanding trying to offer something different for people to consider. It has dramatically helped me.
The Anger Workbook is an excellent tool to use in groupswhere persons have anger problems. This could be used inrecovery groups, prisons, and large organizations where angeris a problem. I enthusistically recommend it!
This book has been life-changing. I bought it and am nowing buying a copy for my wife. If you reflect on the questions it asks you, you can learn a lot about yourself. I've been able to apply what I've learned about myself and anger management with my wife, kids, co-workers, customers, etc. I would highly recommend buying the Myers-Briggs temperment book, too. Together, these 2 books make for a powerful combination in learning about yourself and others.
Very good information. Very revealing to find anger issues buried deep inside. Christian based.
A friend suggested this book - I have gained a whole new insight to some of the issues I have been dealing with in my life. This book has helped me put a lot of my life experiences in perspective and has helped me understand myself and others so much better. Even if you don't think you have anger issues (which I didn't) this will definitely have an impact and be effective in understanding anger and it's complexities. A must read!!
This book changed the way i veiw anger. Yes, i am a bible believing Christian and this book does use the bible as a source of reference. I learned so much about my anger and the anger of others. It encouraged me and gave me tools to work with to choose to control my anger. I can't wait to read their next book! I also understand how to respond better to angry people. It is a real eye opener!
I turned to the Minirth-Meier series due to familiarity with them. I intentionally chose a book by Christian counselors. While even for me the book was a bit trite at times, its ability to force me into self-examination was very helpful. Through examples, questions and "Do you react in the following ways" type checklists I was able to see myself more clearly, and see the damage I was doing to my family. It helped me identify my emotional "triggers" and find realistic ways to manage and forsee situations that might set me off. Contrary to other reviews, I would not characterize the approach as simply "give it over to God". No, Carter and Minirth squarely placed the responsibility for change at my feet where it belongs, and helped me to see how to begin making the change.
This was a very good book on basic and advanced archery.Reading this as a beginner allowed me to start off right and lets me know all the good habits that I need to be a good archer.I've read it a few times and refer to it every few weeks to make sure I'm not slipping in to target panic.
Ever want to scrub your back and you cant reach it? This brush does the trick. Although it takes a little time to get use to the stiffness it is well worth the effort. My skin has never been so soft!
I really like the feel of the stiff brushes, but my arm reach isn't so great and have a bit of trouble getting to all of my back. Would like a bit longer handle and with a curve would definitly make it easier. Wood gets a bit funky also with age.
THE IS THE BEST BRUSH ON THE MARKET.AFTER CLEANING YOURSELF WITH THIS BRUSH YOU FEEL CLEAN' TRY IT YOU WILL LOVE IT.BUYING TWO MORE.OTHER BRUSHES WHERE TOO SOFT THIS BRUSH IS FIRM.
Good value and love the products. Bought as a gift for my Dad's birthday. recommend to anyone with a car they love.
If you have to buy this individually at the auto parts store, it would cost much more. Mequiars is a good middle of the road car care product, cant go wrong.
This is a Christmas gift for my son. He has a very nice red truck and always keeps it looking nice
What else can one say about Meguiars??Good products - always near the top of the line at a reasonable price.Great stuff for nearly everybody...
This a great combo of cleaning/care products for my car. It was exactly what I was looking for. If you know what all these products are, then you will understand this is a great purchase. Everything included is really all that is needed for a perfectly clean car. The only thing missing is the bucket, water, and a good means of drying (I used one of those super absorbent towels rather than a chamois).
Not certain if this is the best VALUE, but it was certainly convenient. The interior touch up spray is wonderful. Highly recommend Maguires products.
I live in Ecuador, South America.. and have partyed at the most awesome places all over the country, even HERE the song is a HIT !!! when this song comes on it blows EVERYONE away! This song WILL give you the chills and you wont stop movin' !!!
After mentioning this book several times, and keeping us waiting, that she would fictionalize the whole theme and characters... came as a surprise. But then when you see how her series, Canopus in Argos, developed in a science fiction setting, you tend to understand that her best work , sometimes needs to come from a distance. That being said, this novel is a fulfillment of many loose threads, and themes that she, and we all, struggle and deal with in our own ways. Throughout her body of work, a life's work, she continues to keep her eyes open and focused on both the future, AND the past.
After mentioning this book several times, and keeping us waiting, that she would fictionalize the whole theme and characters... came as a surprise. But then when you see how her fictional series, Canopus in Argos, developed in a science fiction setting, you tend to understand that her best work , sometimes needs to come from a distance. That being said, this novel is a fulfillment of many loose threads, and themes that she, and we all, struggle and deal with in our own ways. Throughout her body of work, a life's work, she continues to keep her eyes open and focused on both the future, AND the past.
I have read several works on the historical roots of the conflict, but this book is probably the best overall history in one work. Morris does pretty well at taking an even hand with his writing; although he probably could have shortened it by a couple hundred pages by leaving out some of the "breathless" play-by-play commentary of battle tactics in the various wars. Overall, it is well worth the time invested if you want a better understanding of the subject.
I really enjoyed this one. I don't know where the other reviewers are coming from in calling it biased. I did not see that at all. Morris does not appear to be a fan of Ben Gurion, but he also did not give a lot of attention to the Israeli massacres in Lebanon. He is not into emotionalism in this book but more into just recounting the facts of history. This is not a book to build up one particular side or another on the issue. It is a good book to learn the actual history though.
Benny Morris rose to the forefront of Israel's 'New Historians' in the 1980's with the publication of 'Birth of the Palestinian Refugee Problem,' which provided radically new evidence which altered modern perceptions of the region forever. Morris retains his important findings in Righteous Victims and expands on them, covering virtually the entire history of the Israel-Palestine conflict. I found the earlier chapters leading up to the creation of the State of Israel on the earliest Zionist settlers to be particularly interesting; Morris presents a picture which indicates that the current bloodshed is by no means a product of natural necessity. The ethnic cleansing of Palestine and subsequent military occupation is the cause. However, Morris becomes overly ideological in the concluding sections of the book, allowing his harsh realist politics to creep in. Nevertheless, this is arguably the most comprehensive single volume about the history of the conflict.
This cd is definitely one of the heaviest, most brutal in my collection. Im not exactly sure what these guys are classified as, but I would say they are closer to death metal than hardcore. the vocalist constantly switches between a deep, low growl and a throaty, hardcore style scream. the music itself is blazingly fast and punishing, with blast beats and breakdowns galore. they also put on an amazing live show. my only problem with this album is the filler track (i think its #5). its slow and kind of kills the albums momentum. its the only reason i couldnt give the album 5 stars. but FTiRD is still more than worth picking up
I downloaded Dreaming in Dog Years about a week ago now, just to get a sample of these guys. It starts with a little drum beat, very soft, quite innocent. Just before the fastest vocals I've heard explode from my speakers. It's no exaggeration to say that I actually jumped. It was just what I'd been looking for. These guys have some of the heaviests songs ever written, but still keep an intelligence about them that is welcome. They even manage to be catchy. Just see if your not singing "It's not gonna be allright, and it's not gonna be OK" to your local corner shop owner as you buy your morning mag. Highlights are: Dreaming in Dog Years, That Certain Special Ugly, Catalepsy and Like a Train Through a Pigeon. Rock on to y'all.
I am 11 and this book has helped me tremendously. I believe it has saved me a lot of trouble in the future. Even the delicate subjects are explained in a way the does not make you shudder. J ames has written many other great books. My mom has bringing up boys. It was hard to put this book down. I read it in 3 days. It is the best six dollars and forty four cents I have ever spent.
A worn stylus ruined my first aurra album, I'm so glad to get it again on CD before it becomes no longer available.These songs are truly a classic.
"Are You Single" has the best base line I've yet to hear today, and I'm 44. That track alone is worth whatever amount you pay for the project. My cassette melted in 1980 and I have just now found my replacement in 2004! THANK YOU
A nice small coffee maker for the one coffee drinker in this household. My only complaint is that it does not seem to turn off automatically.
We received on time...number 1. Number 2 we really like this. My girls, ages 9 and 10 are in soccer and the day they got it they spent 2 hours using it. Even my 6 yr old boy uses it and thinks it is awesome. The velcro straps that hold the ball in place are well made. It does take about 3-5 min. to put the straps around the ball depending on if the straps have been tangled with or not. Other than that...great product. I used it myself and it gives you a good workout and helps with coordination of the ball and ball contact reflex.
What could be better than a set of great movies from two great stars!This is a wonderful collection. I hope more sets like this are on the wayfor those of us who love good movies.
powell& loy, they are the quintessential couple--ever! they have the best chemistry. watching them act is like seeing astaire & rogers dance, effortless. whoever their co-stars are, they are still as one. I hardily recommend this multi-dvd ensemble. these films are meant to enjoy, over & over again. you won't be disappointed!
Good movies to bring back old memories! These actors are legendary and having this product at such a good price made my purchase even better.
I am very pleased with this box set. It was delivered sooner than expected and the quality of the DVDs is excellent. The box set has given me many hours of viewing pleasure. It was certainly money well spent! Congratulations Amazon on your superb service!
Love this series. I got them quickly, still watching them from time to time. Good deal, good service.word word
Myrna Loy and William Powell had such great screen chemistry that this set of films was a no-brainer. I bought my wife The Thin Man collection previously. These films have that Loy-Powell chemistry in different settings. My wife loved it.
The first thing to buy after the doctor says..."I think I can hear another heartbeat!" Twin pregnancies ARE different, and as a recent twin Mom, I relied on it from beginning to end of my pregnancy...right to 38 weeks, with over 14 pounds of combined birthweights. It's a great book.
I recieved my steam Wizzard vacume yesturday and I sooo Glad I ordered it. The steam at first takes a bit to get started and it does drip water out (when ur done steaming use the vacume to clean up the water that dripped out :) thats what i did)while its warming up but when the water is warm enough the steaming works great i used it on my couch to remove an accident left by my neice. Steamed it, vacumed it and it came out very well!
This is the most comfortable helmet I've ever owned, its so light I forget I'm wearing it. The chin strap is comfortable and the headlamp clips are a nice plus. The only reason I didn't give it 5 stars is because the size adjustment system doesn't seem as comprehensive as in other Petzl helmets I've owned (an adjustment in the back is the only available). This hasn't been a problem yet but it may be once I start wearing a winter beanie with it as ice climbing season starts. Otherwise great helmet!
I have found this scale to be very accurate and reliable. I can recommend it to anyone who needs an accurate weight check.
The Doctor/Physician Scale I purchase had very little assembly needed and directions made it very simple to put together. As for the delivery time from this seller, I expected to receive it between 5 and 12 days and was very pleasantly surprised to receive it within 3 working days. I would use this seller again with no hesitation.http://www.amazon.com/gp/product/B000FGDXL2/ref=cm_cr_rev_prod_title
I have sons that wrestle. They need a scale that they can depend on. They check there weight multiple times a day. It was easy to put together and is very accurate would highly recommend.
THIS WEIGHT SCALE WAS JUST WHAT I WANTED . IT WAS EASY TO SET UP AND USE . THE SHIPPER WAS VERY FAST IN GETTING IT TO ME , AND OVER ALL I AM VERY HAPPY WITH THIS PURCHASE .
Provided that Pyramid is heard, then it will be a modern string quartet classic. Duval and company lay out different and ever shifting layers of music that terrify and bewilder the listener to the point of how do they do this? The reward is a punishing thematic piece that lays out new territory between modern classicism and jazz, where some terrifying solos result.
Duval and company knock out something special on this recording. An improvised theme runs throughout the cd the leads the musicians into fascinating and terrifying solos. Pyramid finds some new and interesting territory that fills a space between improvisation and modern 12 tone classicism. Under the Pyramid should be destined to be a modern string quartet classic.
If you want to purchase the Little Giant ladder as seen on TV, watch out. The one advertised on TV has a 300 lb. rating and is classified as industrial grade. This one has a 250 lb. rating and is classified as a household rated one. All in all, both are excellent. This one weighs about 6 lbs. ligher than the industrial grade model. In addition, for those struggling with its weight, you could break it down to two ladders and save your back.
Ladder folds well, has a cool design. It does feel a little rickety, maybe the one for more weight is better.
First of all, I have to say that I don't like disco music. Well, I've bought this album and I don't think I've made a mistake. I must admit that there is some I don't agree with (Body language - Freddie, what were you thinking about! ) but, besides Under pressure, Put out the fire and Las palabras de amor, some songs are real good stuff, such as Back chat and Life is real. Moreover, everybody has to admit that the songs are not skunky disco stuff, because in them there is a lot of hidden good ole rock.
Please, for your own safety, dont listen to this album without listening to Queen or QueenII. That might ruin your impression of the gretest band in the world. This album is so exceptionally bad it turns right around and becomes good. These songs are so horribly un-Queenlike, i was rolling around on the floor laughing. Now if you'll excuse me, im going to dance around the room to staying power...
hot space isn't as bad as people say. It was the weakest queen album to that point but it doesn't desearve the bashing it got. staying power and backchat are quite good. On the second side the good songs are action this day, life is real, coolcat,and words of love,and the classic under pressure. I feel body language is ok, but it was the worst single and mistake Queen ever put out. I don't think Queen ever recovered from that mistake in america. radio stations didn't want anything to do with queen after that single, despite alot of great 80's music from Queen. If your a new queen fan this isn't a place to start, save this album for later, but if you have an open mind to music you'll realize there's lots of interesting and fun music to be heard here.
Queen played in 1982 with new sounds; The result was an entertaining record, however much called die hard fans criticized it.
Queen moves forward into the dance rave scene of the times of the 80's. It's not that bad considering. Just don't expect the heavy rock of early Queen here. It's all enjoyable, Freddie's "Song for Lennon", "Put out the Fire", "Calling All Girls" and "Under Pressure" are among their best. Remember, a mediocre Queen album is still better than no Queen album and even a mediocre Queen album is better than most bands could dream of producing.
I know, I read all the reviews of this album as well and thought to myself that this album was probably going to be an embarracement to Queen and that I would also feel embarraced listening to it. However, after purchasing the "Queen Live at the Bowl" DVD, upon hearing "Action This Day", "Back Chat" and "Staying Power" my mind changed rapidly. I went out to buy Hot Space and have never looked back. It's now one of my favourite Queen albums. If you love Queen, you'll love this album just as much as the others. Sure, Queen experimented with a few new sounds, but in my opinion that was not a bad thing to do at all. Don't just think that because certain people don't like it because it's slightly different, that you shouldn't consider getting it!
Hot Space is not the same style as the other queen albums, but they just tried an other style, to see it's success. Not as succesful as they thought, but it is a good album. Songs like Staying Power, Action This Day, Put Out The Fire and others just may not be called worthless. Cause they aren't. Let's see how I rate the songs:Staying Power: 8/10Dancer: 8/10Back Chat: 6/10Body Language: 7/10Action This Day: 8/10Put Out The Fire: 8/10Life Is Real: 7/10Calling All Girls: 7/10Las Palabras De Amor: 9/10Cool Cat: 6/10Under Pressure: 7/10 (I know this is their greatest hit from this album, but I don't like it THAT much)That's my review about this album.Keep On Rocking!!!
If long after you have played the CD, the tune echos in your mind! It true Jonny can pick a mean mandolin -an instrument rarely used in old style bluegrass- but he also shares the spotlight with others in his group. Sam Bush and Jim Hurst can be heard taking a lead, and round out the sound nicely. Listen to "Catch Me If You Can" for a good lesson on harmony, and balance. And Jonny Staats drives a UPS truck by day! With music of this caliber, hopefully not for long.
This is one of those albums that you may not have picked up in its first release back in the very late 1980's, and if you didn't, now is your chance. What you have here is a combination of all the parts that made the 80's metal mixture complete: great vocals and lyrics,cutting and melodic guitarwork, and plenty of keyboards to give the music a much deeper feel and complexity than many of those who were charting at the time. It is easy to see why Gene Simmons, the tongue-master himself, saw fit to produce these guys so all of us could have a listen. "Edge of Your Life", "I Just Wanna Be Loved", and "Lookin for Strange" are standout tracks, as is "Call My Name", a song which is as good as any of the memorable hits we still crank to 10 a decade later. Seize the opportunity to get this one now that it's been re-issued. Don't miss out on them the second time around.
This is a great cd from a great rock band that came from the greatest era (in my opinion) in rock music. This is a cd that I have listened to almost everyday since I got it. It is that good. Every song on there rocks and if you are a fan of House of Lords or even just a fan of 80's rock, this is a cd for your collection.
In the future California, Spike is not happy that Giles separated him and Drusilla, given Drusilla became a flaming torch, courtesy of Buffy and her extraction team.Confronting Giles, he gets the defenestration treatment, and hence goes to give the Council information. Bad move for him, as they torture information out of him, and Xander dusts him in revenge for the death of Anya.The Council, prepared with this intel, decides to move on Giles and his vampires.
As an investing novice I know very little about the financial world before reading this book. Now I understand a great deal, and have a lot more confidence with my money. Through a mixture of wit and wisdom, Tobias entertains while he educates about the wild world of money. This is truly the only investment guide I will ever need.
Have been looking for a book that gives the definitions, basics and more importantly the ratings of the various financial instruments available. This is it. I did not give it a full five stars because there were certain definitions that were obscure and some of the stories, while enjoyable, were overly longwinded. But a great all round book nevertheless.
Its a tail light, product is compatible to OEM works turns red and white =O).Great product would recommend to others.
Within two days of purchase I received the TYC 11-3189-01 Ford Passenger Side Replacement Tail Light Assembly for my dad's Ford F250 1999 model. I had accidentally backed into a tree trunk trying to get it out of a ditch this past winter. Took my dad about 20-30 minutes to instal and it looks like new. Fits perfect!.
Great price. Happy to have purchased a Made in USA product. Not as 'nice' as the more expensive Health O Meter that I use at the Fitness Center, but I did not have to assemble that one. Seems a little 'cheap' with mating parts not fitting like they should. The scale is best used on a very hard surface. Our carpetted area with a large piece of 5/8 inch plywood underneath was tippy. Cement basement floor is solid with no tipping. I would recommend this scale.Amazon Market Place seller, Center Aisle LLC, fulfilled and shipped the scale quickly. Five Stars for them.
I bought this for me cousin who is 18 months old and it was a hit at Christmas. This went along with the Tonka dump tuck and attaches at the back and made a great gift for around 20.00 for both. He was very happy. Parents were happy because this can go with him to about 3 years.
"Angel" is a very pivotal episode from the first season of Buffy the Vampire Slayer when Buffy discovers her boyfriend is a vampire with a soul, but "The Puppet Show" is a below average one, although the tag sequence is a hoot. Why you would want just this tape instead of the entire boxed set is beyond me.
Very pleased. My compact washing machine does not accept liquid bleach. I couldn't find powder bleach in the stores. These packets are perfect. I use 1/2 a packet in each white load. Very economical and I have clean white clothes.
Great video. Thanks Good to see this band in a different setting other than music videos. I'm glad to get this VHS tape.
Applied the product after cleaning my chain and gears, removing 2 years worth of road grime. The lubricant applied easily and made the chain noticeably quieter while riding. Seems to get the job done and I will continue to use this product.
I got this for my mom for mother's day because she has a gorgeous garden. She opted to put it on the deck so she can hear the water when they hang out under their canopy thing. From what I understand about a lot of solar panels is that they should be able to store up some energy; the only major disappointment I came across is that whenever the panel is even half way in the shade, the fountain stops running. When the sun is shinning bright, it trickles away.So if you're planning on using this outside, be prepared for an on again, off again fountain unless you have sun all the time. Mind you, I didn't expect it to work all night; but I did think if it got cloudy for 5 or 10 minutes, it would work throught it.But overall, my mom loves it and everyone that's seen it, adores it.
I read this play after enjoying Pygmalion. Shaw creates a female lead who uses her femininity and supposed delicacy/cluelessness to manipulate those around her, ultimately trapping the Don Juan-esque male lead into marrying her despite his objections to the institution. Although she pretends to be helpless, she actually controls the situation, so I think this counts as a feminist work, although I'm confused about what his ultimate message is. I'm also not sure how the whole philosophy of the life-force, superman thing fits in, but I haven't read much philosophy, and I enjoyed the play regardless. Like all of Shaw's stuff, the play contains social commentary, humor, and wit.
The writings of Bernard Shaw in this particulat play, invites to you use your mind to understand life and philosphy. It has such great insight into many aspects of human nature and at the same time is exteremely funny and really takes you into it's pages. The writing has impecable style and this is truly a classic play.
The book stays almost unknown in the U.S. only because it provides solid evidences of how aggressive India was. It is an offense to those see China as a demon and India as an angle of democracy.
A depressed high schooler commits himself in to a psychiatric ward and discovers himself. After a year of suicidal thoughts and dreams, caused by the stress of getting in to a good school, Craig (Gilchrist) commits himself "accidentely" to a psych ward at the local hospital. While there he meets new friends Noelle (Roberts) and Bobby (Zach Galifianakis) and realizes he has more to give. The subject matter is serious but the movie is actually pretty light-hearted and...kind of funny...(get it?). Galifianakis plays a different role in this then we are used to, but does a good job with it and I would not be surprised to see more like this come his way. I can't talk too much about this without giving anything away but I would definatly pick this one up. A feel good movie about mental patients, how many of those have you seen? I give it a B+.Would I watch again? - Yes, I think I would.
Keir Gilchrist, an impressive kid actor of kid movies, had grown up as well as his character-a sixteen year old sex-experimenting pupil who had checked himself into psycho ward to cure from depression with a single pill only.It is surely a deep-meaningful work for viewers M15+, of a kind of such a medicine and a world in and outside the nut house screened.
Good movie with good story line. Just what I expected from this, good story line with live issues. Not a typical Hollywood movie.
Beautiful movie. Very inspiring. Couldn't have imagined better actors for it, they were perfect! Healing is possible and things look up eventually, it's just a matter of perspective ;)
I liked it. The message was good and there is plenty of relating points. I think they did a good job of blending humor with realistic life experiences. The cast does a good job holding my attention throughout the movie. Worth the watch if you like Sundance type films.
this movie was a mix of a comedy with some profound words. i've always wondered what a mental facility was and this movie has cleared it up for me. i absolutely love craig an noelle they make the cutest couple!
We liked this movie. It has interesting characters and subject that is at times funny, sad and touching. I would recommend it.
Funny and yet very insightful of our human nature . Everyone has issues in their life, learning to handle them is what life is all about. Enjoyed it .
Good teenish movie that is for all the age groups. Funny scenes, some serious ones, and Zach has a couple of solid moments. Give it a chance, it will make you smile in a genuine way. And what would be wrong with that?
My husband and I were really, pleasantly surprised at how GOOD this movie was. We had no idea what it really was about, and it was REALLY good!! NO ( or little) profanity, good characterizations, heart-warming without being sappy. We rate it a 4 and I really want my 29 year old son to see it. He likes "off-beat" movies. This is a winner!!
An interest twist on teen problems and what love maybe all about. The out come isn't in question but the trip is unusal.
I have thoroughly enjoyed reading this book cover to cover. It goes into as much detail as you need to get started and points you to other resources if you want to go deeper into any one subject. This really is a must read for any one who wants to get involved or has been invloved for years in developing better products for end users.It seems that any book from the Adaptive Path team is an excellent resource and only adds to their leadership in this field. Well done Mike and thanks for making my job easier.
The IZ is really cool! I like the colors! It is always entertaining me and it is so cute! I have a red one. I like the way it's body moves! This toy is awesome!
Funky and cool speaker toy. the sound is pretty good, and the noises it makes are a little rude, but funny too. My 11 year old really likes it a lot... especially when it just comes out with something out of the blue. It does make noises during the playback of her iPod, but if she wants to listen to the music without that noise she has plenty of options. We are happy with our purchase.
I love it! So does my 4 year old! He plays with it and creates different tunes & the price was right!!!
This is the very best of Mellencamp on a 3CD set. The only way it could be better is if it were a 4CD set with even more songs! All the favorites; all good! Mellencamp has that classic folk-rock sound; a message with a beat. This CD set is never far from my hands. It is a 100% hands down best buy.
Absolutely wonderful, one of Nevil Shute's best novels. It takes you on a journey of the mind and heart, transporting you to a different world.
Excellent, wish it was longer to look into more of their lives. Education is the key to letting people understand what someone endures to be happy in life
I first heard Nashville Pussy when I bought the soundtrack to Dee Snider's STRANGELAND. I was blown away, I wanted to go out and buy the album right away. They're very cool and fun to listen to. I think they should get a song played on the radio, it would let more people know about them.
With all going right now with the posibility of a War, this THE BEST OPTION TO HAVE FOR EVERYONE TO LAID BACK AND ENJOY SMOOTH, SOULFUL,STRONG AND MAGICAL MUSIC AT HIS HIGH POINT. This is clearly THE BEST R&B; ALBUM EVER MADE. R.Kelly just put out here ALL HIS HEART, MIND, VOICE AND SOUL TO IT. You will love every song on THE CLASSIC ALBUM OF THE MILLENIUM...TP-2.COM. From the first track to the last one. YOU PEOPLE DOESN`T KNOW OF WHAT A CLASSIC PRECIOUS ALBUM ALL ARE MISSING.THERE CAN ONLY BE ONE R.KELLY,as said in the "One Me" Sensual Love and Sexual Beautiful Ego song.GO GOOOOOOOOO NOW...AND BUY 5 COPIES OF THIS MASTERPIECE GEM.
r kelly goes back to his freaky roots on this one, if you wanna hear kelly talk about oral sex for the millionith time please get this, if you love bump-n-grind, 12 play and classic kelly then this is especially for you. fellas, ladies you better protection on this.
If you like R. Kelly, then you will know his type of music. Sexual, he's always talking about "Bumping N' Grinding" and getting it on, and making love. Well this CD has a little more groove to it, the music in the backround is simply magnificent, and the lyrics are heart felt. This is a Must for any CD listener. If you like Jazz, and Rap, and R&B you got it all in one package here. The song "Womans Threat" Is a great song for all you guys who know how women can be, It's such a true song. And alot of the other songs are great..Including heart felt lyrics like "I was supposed to be a man about it, wasn't supposed to leave your side, no way no how...." The songs called I don't mean it, YOU Have to listen to this song, it will bring tears to your eyes...*Sniff sniff* This Cd is strictly great. Buy it and add it to your collection.
I love him...but I have to admit I'm kinda growing up and he's not growing with me. It's good but not his best. My favorite song is I Mean (I Don't Mean It)...totally tight!
This is R Kelly's best album yet...most all the tracks are nothing short of spectacular...all this coming when I was ready to write 2000 off as a bust for new (quality) R&B. What more can I say, the man's gifted. This isnt one of those albums that we have all bought for the one song we like....Kelly gives us 19 "panty droppin" tunes that you wont be able to get enough of (either will your lady). Wasnt a fan of the R album...huge fan of the TP-2 album. Get this one you wont regret it!
Simply R.Kelly can make music at his best.This is a MASTERPIECE that you can enjoy hear it from the first track to the last one without pushing the skip bottom. ALL the 19 songs(produced,written,arranged and performed by Kelly)are BLAZIN AND SLAMMIN GEMS.THIS IS A TRUE CLASSIC,MUCH BETTER THAN 12PLAY ONE. I dont have to tell my favorite songs because the entire album, each and every track is RED HOT.I DONT KNOW ONE PERSON THAT DIDNT LIKE IT. R.KELLY IS MY FAVORITE MALE ARTIST OF ALL TIME.If you love SLOW JAMS,REAL R&B AND SOUL,THIS IS THE BEST OPTION FOR ANYONE. SO GO AND BUY THIS CLASSIC NOW. TRUST ME,ITS WORTH MUCH MORE THAN THE [money].
YES THE ALBUM IS OKAY THATS ALL. NOTHING ON HERE CAN SURPASS WHAT HE HAS DONE ALREADY. HE PAINTS GRAPHIC PICTURE FROM THE DAYZ OF OLD WHETHER ITS FROM 12 PLAY AND I BELIEVE AND SADIE. THERE WERE NO JAMS LIKE HE HAD ON THE R CD W/ THAT KEITH MURRAY JOINT THAT'S STILL AJAM AT ANY PARTY. THIS IS A SEX ME BABY I'M SORRY CD. WITH A GOOD COMMERCIAL SONG I WISH JUST TO MAKE SURE WE GO PLATINUM. YA DIG.
Seems like R.Kelly is getting BETTER AND BETTER, EVERY TIME HE RELEASE A NEW ALBUM. AND THIS IS NO EXCEPTION.THIS IS THE CD THAT I LOOKED FOR A LONG TIME,TRULY A PERFECT CLASSIC. ALL the people that I know LOVE IT TO DEATH, ESPECIALLY: STRIP FOR YOU,R&B; THUG,GREATEST SEX,I DON`T MEAN IT, JUST LIKE THAT,DON`T YOU SAY NO,ONE ME,I WISH AND THE REMIX, WOMAN THREAT, I DECIDED, FEELIN ON YO BOOTY AND THE STORM IS OVER. IF YOU WANT THIS MULTIPLE PLATINUM ALBUM (4X PLATINUM IN U.S.A,AND ANOTHER THREE MILLION COPIES SOLD AROUND THE WORLD),TRUST ME!, IT`S WORTH MUCH MORE THAN THE 15 TO 20 BILLS THAT COST.
i bought this cd today and it was hot, hot, hot as expected. r kelly is talented and yo'all need to get this. it takes you back to the days of 12 play. this needs to be in your cd player right next to the joe and carl thomas for good measure (and pleasure) and keep your levels up.
Any emotion you feel R. Kelly will touch it with this masterpiece of an r&b album. I know R. kelly can be a little overally sexual with his lyrics but overall this album is really good. I recommend it to any who likes r&b artist like Ginuwine. Best track is probably "I wish" which touches anyone who ever lost someone they truly love. Don't let the parental advisory sticker stop you from buying this album. This has to be the best r&b album this year and probably for awhile because you don't see a lot of r&b artists like R.Kelly scoring this big...
Two weeks ago I bought his R. album because I heard some of its singles and I thought it'd be a great album. Finally, my intuition was right and his last album was great, but 30 songs are too many to be different between them. Last week I saw TP-2.COM in a shelf and I decided to buy it thinking that it'd be like R.But not, it's more excellent than his last effort. All the songs have rythm, especially "Like a freak (one of my favourites), all the songs talked about different views of the love, and the song dedicated to his mom is da bomb. "I wish" is his greatest song since "I believe I can fly". I don't get it 5 stars because the theme of sex is very repetitive in the album. There are tones of themes apart from sex. But I think is the best album R. Kelly has done. Well done...
Hello Everyone,I have listened to this cd and I wanted to share my opinion. I enjoyed it. Because everything he talks about is really happening. Like, for instance. The song I wish (to the homies that were lost) It's talking about a guy thats was involved in gangs and stuff like that and he ended up dead. There are so many people that die every day because of stuff like that. It's just nice that that someone finally decided to tell the truth about it. R Kelly did that. Well Thats my opinion. If you don't like it than thats yours.But to anyone that enjoys Rap and R&B I would recomend this cd.
WHAT CAN I SAY??? "TP-2.COM" IS THE BEST ALBUM EVER MADE BY A R&B; SINGER. BUT R.KELLY IS MORE THAN A SINGER...HE IS A LIVING LEGEND. HE IS WHAT MUSIC IS ABOUT. THE WHOLA ALBUM IS VERY PASSIONATE, BEAUTIFUL, RAW,INSPIRING AND DEEP AS HELL. ALL OF THE SONGS ARE MADD HOTT....BUT THE BEST JOINTS ON IT ARE (NOT IN ORDER: "I WISH" & HIS REMIX, " WOMAN'S THREAT", "STRIP FOR YOU", "ONE ME", "JUST LIKE THAT", "I DON'T MEAN IT", "DON'T YOU SY NO", "FEELIN ON YO BOOTY", "THE GREATEST SEX", "I DECIDED", "ALL I REALLY WANT" AND THE INSPIRING GOSPEL "THE STORM IS OVER NOW".IF DON'T HAVE IT, SOON YOU WILL BE ADDICTED TO R.KELLY'S MUSIC AND THIS GIANT PHENOMENAL CLASSIC ALBUM. IS 100 MORE TIMES WORTH THAN ANYOTHER ALBUM FROM OTHER R&B;/SOUL OR HIP-HOP ALBUM. THIS ALBUM HAVE IT ALL. BUY AT LEAST 2 COPIES OF IT. IS THAT AMAZING, I GUARANTEE IT !!!
Encyclopedia Brown is everybody's favorite cook, in this case the food he cooks is a mystery. There is a mystery at the end of each chapter. He knows lots of recipes. One of the mysteries is the cake. Read the book to find out who takes the cake.I recommend this book to people who like to read cooking books as well as a mystery story. If you get hungry as you read a cooking book, I recommend that you should not read it. It has lots of good recipes.
I first met Sonia in her Heart's Desire workshop (which was excellent!) 5 years ago. Since then I've had the privelege of having a reading done by her. It was amazing. Much of what she said has come true, and manifested in my life to my utter amazement! My own psychic awareness has gotten stronger as well, through the use of the book. I can't seem to live without it! It is the one book I take with me on all my travels near or far. I can refer to it for support, or inspiration whenever I feel the need, and it is a wonderful source for that. I'm sure anyone who is looking to improve thier life even the slightest bit will be happy with this purchase. It will change your life... and there are many surprises in store for you if you follow through with the excercizes in the book. Thank you Sonia for being a source of light and inspiration in my life, and so many others!
As always, Sonia takes you on a ride worth the trouble. She is someone with a marvelous gift that she's sharing with us. I'm learning a lot.
I love the book, but the condition wasn't quite what I expected. There was a large area of water damage, but book still readable. So I'm okay with it.
I love all of Sonia`s books. They are the easiest to read and most enjoyable "self help" books I have ever read. I would recommend her books to anyone even if they aren't on a spiritual path to learn how to be psychic.Her books are a gift and I am always sad when they end.
Found this book when looking for that missing something. It seems to celebrate the "coincidences" that no one around me cares about. I never knew they might be helpful. Love the meditation sessions. I'm working on getting rid of the "clutter" one little project at a time. I have high hopes for this book. Great insight even if the psychic part of it doesn't go far. Very good reading.
This book provides a systematic approach to finding your way in the oft-clouded world of the psychic realm. Sonia really has got it all together.
I dont agree with all the views of this book and quickly passed it on. It discusses some valuable advice for new parents of teenagers.
How has so much of this incredibly beautiful music escaped my attention for so long? I knew the Saint-Saens and the Rachmaninov and one of the Faure pieces, but the rest were totally unfamiliar. On this disc, Han-Na Chang brings this rarely heard music out into the light of day, and renders both the unfamiliar and the familiar with superb tone coloring and deeply felt interpretations.This is simply the most beautiful and moving cello playing I have ever heard. It's going to spend a lot of time in my CD player.
If you're into mind games, this is a movie treat for you. I'm glad this dvd is out so i added it to my collection. For the price i paid for this dvd, it is worth it. In this movie, Kim Basinger played a sweet & innocent but daring role into pursuing an opportunity of getting rid of her rich husband (Eric Roberts). The object of her desire is her sister (Uma Thurman) and hunk psychologist (Richard Gere) who all three gamble for deceit and manipulation. The question is, who of the three will prevail? The movie naturally ignites with heavy drama and suspense with metaphores and their meaning. This is what Richard Gere, the psychologist, needs to figure out. I just love that part when Richard Gere entraps Kim Basinger in saying "You're right about double jeopardy". I think this is the best acting role that Kim Basinger had ever pursued over all her other movies even LA Confidential, where she won Golden globe award as best actress.
I do jigsaw puzzles on a regular basis. This puzzle was part of a three-puzzle package at a special price. It is colorful, the picture is interesting. The pieces are of varying shapes. It is 500 pieces, rectangular with four borders. It was challenging for me without being terribly frustrating (I am not an expert at jigsaws, I just like to do them.) The pieces are on the small side. I enjoyed the process and may order from the company again.
This CD is fantastic! John's poetry speaks to the human experience. Several phrases really "struck a chord" with me. In addition to the thought-provoking poetry, the music is awesome. The intricate rhythms develop and change with each song. John uses several culturally diverse instruments to create a sound that is truly a feast for the ears. "Drum Poetry" offers music to dance or do yoga to, or to simply "chill out" to. It is definitely a CD worth adding to your music collection.
This kit was super easy to install. I replaced a regular 4 wire connector. This now makes the trailer brake lights work.
Join Jeff Corwin as he shows us the dry, hot desert of Arizona, the life and death struggle in southeastern Africa, the rain forests of Costa Rica, and the grasslands of the Venezuela. Along the way we learn about life, death, love, and the web of nature. He also pops in facts and short stories, many of which are as funny as you can get without a Nun's outfit, a donkey and a jar of peanut butter.The book itself is a lovely hardcover, with full color photos and something I would be proud to have on my coffee table if I had a coffee table. And it is so enjoyable to read you could easily finish it in a day if you wanted to.
This book helped me to understand better some of the earliest literature so far discovered. It is very well thought out and gives good descriptions of the context and the difficulties of translating the cuniform tablets. The side-by-side Sumerian and translation add to the interest in reading these tales from the time of the earliest cities and a completely polytheistic world model. It is remarkable to me that some of the 'simple' things we understand today were such mysteries and fraught with gods of the gaps in that time and place. Even more so the difference in knowledge between this literature and that of the Greeks and Romans only 2000 years later. I recommend this book to anyone who is curious about the early history of our civilization.
I bought the EZ Can Crusher and Recycler 4 years ago. I love it. Wish I'd had it for longer than the 4 yrs. I have. It's easy to crush the cans flat, and they fall right into the collection bin. I have the bin lined with a plastic garbage bag, so all I have to do is pull the bag, close it and off to the recycle center I go. No mess. For years I used a can crusher mounted on a post on the patio, and had to crush the can then drop in a plastic garbage bag, then move the bag to an out of the way location and do the process all over again until I had the bag full. No more. This unit is all self contained. Hard plastic receptable, easy to clean, durable. If this one ever wears out, I'd definitely want another.
I have done a lot of Symmetric Multi-Processing (SMP) work in Win32 and I was looking for a text that would show me the classes and design patterns used to build multi-threaded applications in the .NET Framework. This book was quite good for that purpose. If I had no exposure to multi-threaded programming prior to reading this book, I still think I would have found it very useful and probably a bit more challenging. This book has plenty of C# and VB.NET examples. However, as a veteran C++ programmer, I don't read VB.NET all that well (because it looks so clunky) so I found myself wishing that each example was shown fully in both languages as some other .NET books are beginning to do. Other than that, I recommend this one for anyone who wants to build robust, multi-threaded .NET applications. The author's language and approach to the material are both very good.
I think that this thing is pretty cool, but it does die kind of quickly and I think it needs a few more games. So if you only play it when youre bored, its really fun and offers somethin to do on long trips.
I luv Neopets but Kougra is not my favorite pet - the Lupe is my favorite pet. It is pernounced loop
Professor Long provides a much needed and long awaited treatment of homosexuality in religious perspectives. His focus on the issues of "gender-threat" and its relation to why some religions are antagonistic to male homosexuality is right on target. He combines his knowledge of religious traditions with a cultural eye that gives the reader tremendous insight. I devoured this book, as should anyone interested in the whole "bible-homo" question.
Dishing out heavy doses of moral philosophy, McDonald always keeps the reader entertained and thought provoked. Not quite on par with some of the earlier McGee's, but never-the-less, vintage McDonald. 30+ years of reading his novels, one can only morn the loss that Travis, Meyer and the rest won't have a new tale to tell.
I was surprised when I saw this movie because it was the first good Juliette Lewis I'd seen. I enjoyed the film very much. It was excellent. I thought the some of the more outre discussions between the kids were a little inappropriate, but all in all, the movie was pretty impressive. and Eliza Dushku really stole the show with her amazing debut. Worth the watch.
THIS MOVIE IS GREAT! IT TELLS ABOUT ALOT OF IMPORTANT VIEWS. I LIKE WATCHING IT 2 A YEAR. BUT, I THINK JUST ABOUT EVERYONE CAN RELATE TO THIS MOVIE. A LITTLE YOUNG ROMANCE, WITH A NEIGHBOOR RIVAL!!
I've been a fan of Eliza Dushku for years. When I first heard about this film, I just had to check it out. I think C. Thomas Howell and Juliette Lewis had a great chemistry. It's one of Juliette's best role. I can't believe how cute Eliza was when she was 10. For her first film she did an incredible job. One bad thing about this movie is that is not on DVD. This movie is worth watching.
For several years I have been constantly checking to see if this movie has come out on DVD yet. Who do we even contact to put in the request?!? I would love this movie on DVD!!!!
Resurrection Day is a great book, even though I did have a hard time finding it. Evidently, it's little-known, despite the fact that Brendan DuBois received an award and much critical praise for Resurrection Day. For anyone who likes the alternate history genre, this book is a must-have. For anyone who's interested in thrillers in general, this book is a must-have.
An oft time time spooky alternative history of a world where the Cuban Missile Crisis ended in war.The story of a newpaper reporter while in the process of reporting on just another murder stumbles across clues to the biggest secret known. There are those that will pay any price to keep him from unraveling the truth.
I have a collection of over 6,000 books,and I have to say that this book is the best book I've read in ten years!It is absolutely riveting.Be prepared to read it one go,you won't be able to put it down.
This book was a fun read that moved along briskly. I was one of millions of very scared pre-adolescents during the Cuban missle crisis. Much of the well researched "alternative history" seemed all too plausible back then, especially to folks such as myself who lived near ground zero of a major SAC base.True, the plot of the book (and ultimate conclusion) was a bit predictable, and some of the characterizations were extremely one dimensional - but for light summer reading, you can't beat this novel.And here's the best endorsement I can give "Resurrection Day": I look forward to the author's next effort.
Although it starts off a bit meandering, Resurrection Day quickly builds into a book difficult to put down. There are two phenomenal stories here. One is what if the Cuban Missile Crisis had turned into WWIII? The other is what the US might be like as a 3rd world nation. Both are compelling.DuBois writes engaging characters and fills his plot with enough turns to make a Ballerina tipsy. I repeatedly tried to geuss the ending, and even the next page, and was always stymied. The conversations flow convincingly, and the story is a joy to read.Here we are given a look at how Americans are like the rest of the world. If you strip them of the technological advantage, and the moral advantage of a well-constructed constitution that is actually followed, they respond like everyone else. Not badly, not well- just as humans, struggling to survive.
estos zapatos son realmente bellos y comodos...la flexibilidad, adicionalmente el envio fue realmente rapido y seguro.recomiendo ampliamente la compra de este producto.muchas gracias
Now that my daughter has received the correct size the sneakers are perfect. I had no bad experience with this vendor. Keep up the good work.
I had the experience of having to exchange these shoes. It was fairly simple and I had no issues. I ordered them as a Christmas present for my daughter. They arrived fairly quickly in the mail. Though we ordered her normal size, they were about 1/2 size too large. So I followed the online instructions and sent them back for an exchange. I received a replacement in just a little over a week. I was impressed with the quick turnaround. The only drawback is that I had to pay to ship them back and also include a check for $7.99 to cover shipping of the new shoes.
This purchase was another gift for Christmas. I bought this particular pair of shoes for my wife. Although it was not a direct Amazon.com purchase and I was redirected to another site, the process was easy. The shoes were shipped fast and on time, there was great communication from the site that sold them. Another great purchase!
I bought these for a gift. The recipient loved them. Apparently it is hard to find the half sizes in stores with this shoe. No complaints with these.
My only probelm with these shoes are that they are not comfortable at all. do buy some type of inserts..
love these shoes. no trouble with purchase. fit just perfect. love these shoes. love this brand. love this color. love
An Excelent choice. They are very good for everyday use. Accesible price. I am very satisfied and I recommend it.
I own 5 pairs of Converse sneaks, my daughter has 3 pairs, and my son has 2 pairs. We all really love our Chucks. But this is my first pair of the low top kind. I love them so much. They are really comfortable and easy to slip on and off, and so very black so they go with any kind of casual clothing well.If you're buying Converse for the first time, be aware they run just a touch big. This is wonderful for my son who has fairly wide feet, but the rest of us usually buy a half size small.
I was very pleased to get these shoes, they're very iconic no matter where you go and look great with just about any casual outfit. But after about 10 months of having these, rips between the rubber parts of the shoe and the cloth began to seperate. I'm not sure whether this is due to how my feet fit within the shoe. After trying to fix the seams myself, the shoes soon began to just fall apart really and just became really unwearable. If they were cheaper I would consider getting a second pair and maybe another different pair of shoes along with them. Overall they're still nice shoes, but they may need to be pampered somewhat for them to last a long time.
i said the always fauthful converse 'cause its simply the best shoe i ever had, they gimme all the confort that i need to walk very much!!!! i mean walk A LOT!!!!
I ordered these and when I got them they were everything I thought they would be. I love em!
THE SHOES WERE A CHRISTMAS PRESENT FOR MY DAD. HE IS OLD SKOOL TO SAY THE LEAST. THE SHOES WERE LIKE PEOPLE BUYING THROWBACK JERSEYS. HE HAS NOT HAD ANY COMPLAINT ABOUT THE SHOES. TRUST ME THE SHOES HAVE GOT TO BE COMFORTABLE OR THEY WOULD HAVE BEEN RETUTNED INSTANTLY.
a great shoe, buy a size below what you usually wear. comfy, durable and a great casual look with jeans.
Converse are great for your feet. They contain little padding, so you maintain a natural walking motion. Its basically one step above being barefoot. I actually use them to weight train. They are also very stylish. Who doesn't love converse?
I bought this Converse sneaker in black. These All Star sneakers look stylish and good with any casual pants I own. I would have given the product 5 stars, EXCEPT, these shoes are like walking on bricks since they have no cushion in the soles for the heels. I understand they're supposed to have the whole classic appeal... but if you're over 30 years old and try to rock a pair of Converse for an entire day, you may encounter some uncomfortable lower back pain. So 4 stars for fashion.
These were a purchase for my 13 year old granddaughter. Although I have not physically seen them because they live in VA and I in MN, she tells me that they are just what she wanted. Pleased with the ease of this transaction and the speed in which they were shipped to her. Thank you.
great product, just as advertised. The item was purchased at a good price and the shipping was fast. I would purchase from this person again. they come highly recommended.thanksusm1975black
Chucks rock! Got these to match with my 2 and 4 year old boys. They love when we all put our chucks on together. These never go out of style.
nice and confort but bigger than real size.maybe is because they are men shoes.anyway, they were enough confortable to use in daily life.
I've been looking for red chucks for a while now. I love these!! I would recommend getting a half size to a full size smaller though, they run quite large.
I have been wearing all stars for way to long now, and these are just as good as I remember. These shoes are iconic, we all know how good these are, the oxfords are a great change of pace from my high tops. These shoes will never go out style!
Shoes arrived in wonderful shape; packaged well; exactly what I ordered.However, we ordered the wrong size. Return went well; advised my account would be credited for purchase price only; but there was no stock available nor could they tell me when they would receive more in the size we needed. If you need a specific size, order it ASAP.
I purchased some Converse Mens Chuck Taylor Sneaker from another store because they had some specials going on and I also had some coupons so I purchased them in the size I have always worn, size 9. Then I try them and wow way too big, felt like a clown at the gym :)I can fit a whole finger in the back of the shoe with my foot in it. Anyway I did some research here on Amazon and bought pair from Amazon, a size 8 and wow !!! I can't believe it Perfect fit, I was about to buy half size smaller but I went with the whole one size smaller instead and I'll say it again PERFECT FIT :)Buy one size smaller ,quality is amazing
My daughter shamed me into wearing these comfortable and stylish shoes, claiming that I was "dated" in wearing my regular running shoes. They are comfortable and I receive many compliments.
I ordered these sneakers for my cousin. He loves them! Great pair of basic sneakers that blends well with any outfit. Great decision, rather than over priced sneakers!
As a home chef and someone who loves entertaining it was fun to get the complements from our guests about my jacket. Not only was the meal special but so was I.
My Daughter loves Tink, and we wanted to find a larger candle for her birthday cake. This one worked great. It is a good size, and has good color to it. It doesn't look overly cheap like some that I've seen. Due to shape and thickness, it would be pretty easy for this to break during shipping but mine did not.
I loved this book, because it is about a relative I had never met. I have met his son, tho
I missed the humor of Nomads but I loved the deviant, Cernus. The man was beyond evil. How did Norman even dream up the slaves that were raised never having laid eyes on a man? A wicked, wicked mind maybe? Still, it was very interesting to read and find out their fate at the end of the book. There was a little too much detail sometimes and yes, there were a few "over-the-top" chapters but it was still a very fun read.
Assasin leads to 4 to7 more books which develop the Kurii vs Priest Kings theme. If you don't read them in order, you may be lost. Each book refers in the opening pages to several events in preceding books. The references are vague, but tie in very well if you read previous books. Among the first five books, this one rates high. With later books Norman dives into Male/Female roles and becomes irritating. This mostly begins with the Kajira caption and Guardian trilogy. After Mercenaries, FORGET IT
I received this scale just last week, and I am happy to report that it is everything I expected. I was sick of spending money on expensive digital (inconsistent) models, that stopped working after only a year or so of use. This unit provides consistent readings at eye level. It was simple to complete assembly of the two main pieces shipped in the box, and was simple to balance (and rebalance as necessary if the scale is moved).
just wanted to see it again after so many years. Still brings a lot of laughs. Too bad it is no longer on TV
Four dynamic soccer programs that are almost a guaranteefor individual and team improvement! Put together very well!The goalie DVD really rocks!Soccer Coaching:Schupak's Soccer 6 Pack DVD SetFor just a few dollars you get 2 more soccer DVDs by Marty Schupak in this popular set.
These four represent the best of the best fromSchupak's Soccer 6 Pack DVD. My favorite is CHAMPIONSHIP SOCCER DRILLS.You won't go wrong with any of these! A purchase that is worth the price!
These four programs were part of the 6 set I bought.All have valuable soccer tips that will give coaches achance to make practices exciting.
Thank you, this item was exactly what I wanted it to be. It is a good purchase on my part. thanks!
Awesome book with deep revelations... If you need to know how and if God can heal you read this book.
Un bon album, pour ceux et celles qui veulent s'imprégner dun flux musical mélangeant la transe,l'éveil sensitif et la relaxation. Du silence aux mélodies, l'album émerveillera les auditeurs friands du nouvel ge, terme que le remplacerais volontiers par ambiant. À conseiller fortement!
I am a big Kaye Gibbons fan, but I found this book to be a little weaker than the rest. The character development (usually a Gibbons strength) was not great. The book rambled a little bit. All that being said, "mediocre" Kaye Gibbons writing is still phenomenal by any standard.
What makes a book 5 stars...maybe a theme that captures an era or an event in time that could stand on its own. Kaye Gibbons comes close to weaving such a story. The characters are beautifully developed and never do they overreach. Instead we have a small story that speaks twenty volumes of the forces that shape children. Maybe more importantly we are left knowing eight characters and the thirsts that are at the core of their lives. Kaye Gibbons is truly gifted in drawing the reader into complexity with a simplicity that seemingly requires little writing effort. Don't be fooled. It's almost as if, at completion, you don't even know what hit you, only that you have been hit.
The most significant strength in the book was the characters. Each character seemed so real and so full of emotion that I felt I was really seeing the story unfold from a first-person point of view. The way each chapter ends makes you want to read on and find out what events will surface next in the jumbled lives of the Barnes family. I strongly recommend this book to all readers!
Other brands just don't cut it, Dunlop double dot is the only ball I play with.
I have been using this gel for many years now. I am old enough that you would think I shouldn't get zits anymore, but every now and then they find their way back into my life, especially in the summer. This product works great for me. I start using it at the first sign that a pimple might be forming and they don't stand a chance. My skin is too dry and sensitive to use harsh products on my entire face, so I only use a small amount directly on the spot. I re-apply at least twice a day, more often if I am at home. If for some reason I do not have this product with me (such as forgot to pack it) they will form, so I know it is this product that is saving me. I am glad to see it on amazon as I just tried to order it from my usual place and they no longer have it.thanks again amazon - and beauty.com.
Lovely music that fills the heart. It's great to listen to country music and hear positive endings to the lyrics. Lisa has done a great project and we sure enjoy her voice!
Definitivamente una obra de arte transgresora, es difícil expresar todo lo que estas imágenes provoca en el espectador, imagenes que logran una estética sofisticada, mística y melancólica. Es una excelente adquisición, mi favorito del autor.
While I am a huge Goren and Eames fan, I was a little disappointed that there was little to no reference to the last episode in which Goren was fired and Eames left the department. This episode acted like it was just another day at Major Case. There was a little reference in the opening scene welcoming them back but that was it. And who is this new captain? What's his background? I truly miss Captain Deakins as he was my favorite captain for this version of Law and Order.Having said that, this was such a relief after having to live through season 9 which was just awful. Truly I am surprised that this Law and Order was renewed. This episode goes back to the earlier days of Criminal Intent and showcases D'Onofrios talent at shaping the case as Bobby Goren. It's also great to have partners who actually work with each other which wasn't happening at all last season. I am very happy to have this duo back even if its just for 10 episodes.
I am sooooo glad you brought back Law & Order Criminal Intent!!! I'd heard you were removing it, along with the Original Law & Order. I wish you hadn't removed the Original Law & Order:( It was my favorite also!! Whomever is writting for L&O; are wonderful writers!Thank you Very much
Disappointingly out of print. The essay on Walt Whitman is alone worth the price of admission. In it RLS is led to discuss the art and craft of poetry with surprising lucidity and characteristic concision. Also essays on Thoreau, Realism, and "Books which Have Influenced Me" are notable, though not all the essays here are literary. Lacking a current edition, fans of literature and 19th century eloquence should go for a used or collector's copy of this wonderful compendium.
This is a great VHS! Watching and hearing Laura sing and dance non-stop is great fun. So sad to have her out of our lives--thank heavens for CDs and tapes.
OK, OK, we get it. You don't like or trust nobility. The heroine, Maddie, spends the first 1/3 of the book in a tedious round of snide insults with the hero, Quin, Marquis of Warefield. If you can make your way past the beginning, once a "truce" of sorts is called between them and she stops being so witchy all the time, I actually came to really like the story. The secondary characters were well done and I enjoyed what they brought to the story. By the end, I would have given this book 5 stars, but once I thought back on the beginning I knew I couldn't. As much as I liked the book, I don't think I'd read it again knowing I'd have to plow through those first annoying chapters.
I recieved this book in perfect shape, better then discribed in sellers profile. Would order from them again
Believe it or not, this book was recomended to me by my language arts teacher in high school and it was one of the first romance novels that I had ever read. The book was extremely enjoyable to read, full of great dialogue and fun characters. I especially loved Rafe, Quin's brother. All in all, it was a great story. I just wish the cover wasn't so scandalous though.
Considering that these recordings are more than 50 years old, they are a real delight, one could well wish for much more of this, here we have really delightful ballet. Galina Ulanova, Maya Pliserskaya are a delight to watch, especially I found The Fountains of Bakhehisarai, with the 43 year old Ulanova and the 28 year old Plisetskaya a real delight, it also reminds one of just how the Soviet Union embraced many nationalities, as did also the earlier Russia, this ballet is one not to miss, also The flames of Paris, provide an interesting view into the French Revolution, again an excellent ballet piece, this DVD IS THOROUGHLY RECOMMENDABLE
This book was written by a British preacher long ago but the material is still relevant, although the language is at times outdated. I read an updated version of this book and then went back to read this and liked the original better! He presents many arguments about people's ideas about God and what constitutes a more realistic image of the Almighty. Interesting reading.
I picked up an early edition of this book at a used book sale recently. I had heard of Phillips, but had not read any of his writings. Unlike an earlier reviewer, I enjoyed the second half of the book much more than the first. I am a C.S. Lewis fan, so I am already quite familiar with the "destructive" views of God which are briefly examined in the first half of this book. But, the second part of the book in which the "constructive" view/feel for God is explored is, in my estimation, good and original stuff. [I liked that Phillips used the word "stuff" so I thought I'd add it here.] Like Lewis, and unlike so many of the more modern Christian writers, Phillips can certainly "turn a phrase". He writes so well that it makes his constructive vision of God, in the person of Jesus, come alive and convince. Christians should share/mention the book when evangelizing; non-Christians should read it to see that God is big enough to handle their questio ns and criticisms.
This book will show you how we all want to define God as we want to, not as God wants. You will see yourself in the pages of this book and hopefully, you will make an honest effort to rise above your restrictive defintion of God. If so, it will have expanded your understanding of your world. This is a good book for a class in spirituality to discuss.
This book helps us learn to accept God as He is rather than as we imagine Him to be. It helps those who have either an authoritarian view of God or a permissive view of Him. We must also face the fact that God does not operate in ways that we can predict. Hence, for example, the challenge of suffering and evil.
...then keep reading to move towards a better understanding of him.In church school classes, in Bible studies, even in pulpits, I constantly encounter people who have a neatly categorized, labeled and filed-away God. The most common thing I see is people who reject a particular doctrine, Scriptural passage, or the like, because they know "God wouldn't do that". And how do they know? Because THEY wouldn't do that if THEY were God. Yes, their God is too small; and probably so is yours and mine. Reading this book will help us realize how great he is.
The first half of this book is devoted to demolishing destructive views of God. Phillips can be as unsparing at this as Nietzsche or Feuerbach. Especially shocking is his section entitled "Pale Galilean." The second half of the book attempts to reformulate the Biblical view of Jesus and to make his sayings palatable and comprehensible to modern readers. Some readers may feel that Phillips "tames" Jesus's hard sayings to the point that they become unrecognizable. On the other hand, for those who are looking to escape from fundamentalism into a more liberal version of Christianity, this book just might be the key.
I love my old Palm M515, but the stylus always seems to go missing. This is my second 3 pack--so glad it's still available on Amazon.
Everyone seems to hate this single but I really like it and I have gotten my roommate into liking prodigy just because of this single. I would agree that it is a bit lacking but I wouldn't guess that they've been trying to make a cd for 6 years, guys. They have to have gone vacation or just a break in general after the Dirtchamber sessions came out. So I would say that's a bit unfair to make that claim. Anyways I'm a diehard prodigy fan and own almost every single song they've put out (except the What Evil Lurks E.P) and I would suggest anyone who is like me to pick up this single.
This is a great refresher for individuals who suffer the effects of living in an alcoholic home.
This album is just amazing. System of a Down are definately a band we are going to hear a lot about in the not so distant future. Toxicity is quite different to their self titled debut, the music and vocals are much better, this is definately a band whom has musically matured.This is a very strong album, Serj Tankians lyrics are good but it is his vocal style which captures my attention. These songs are suprisingly catchy and Serj's range shines out, the guitar and drum work are commendable as well.This album is definately worth picking up. The strongest tracks are "Prison Song", "Forest" and "Chop Suey". The only weak track is "Jet Pilot" which really is why i did not give this album 5 stars.System of a Down are definately on an up.
All the world Ive seen before me passing by. wow. May i take a moment to say thanks for these words you sing. Today was my first time to have the pleasure of hearing song #9. I havent stopped since. Is it bad to listen to the same song over and over. i dont care. i could just get lost in my rage and pain thinking of all we lose each and every day. we may all be helpless in what happens in this world so accept it and let go of everything holding you back. peace
This is how i usualy shop for cds i hear or see the video then if i like i buy the cd When i saw the video for the song chop suey i was impressed. S O A D has a metal / harmoney / guitar thing goin on and i was really feelin it. we all know how some artist have that one good song and the rest is trash. thsi is not the case here. The rest of the cd shockingly good but chop suey is still the best. The bottom line is this: if you liked chop suey then what are you waiting for buy it now. trust me, you wont be disappointed.
System of a Down's s/t debut was an album that totally blew me away. It is among my top 10 fav. albums of all time. That was the year 1998, and it has been 3 years since SOAD has blessed us with their musical goodness, and now 3 years later SOAD has dropped Toxicity. Toxicity has picked up right where s/t left off. The same unexpected time changes and death-metal-like intensity is what SOAD is all about. Serj is sounding better than ever with his distinct hardcore growls, and Daron Malakian returns as one of the industry's most talented guitarists. Toxicity is the album of the year....plain and simple...nothing will top this album.Tracks of note--- Prison Song, Needles, Deer Dance, Chop Suey! ATWA, Science, Toxicity, Psycho and Ariels
One of the best cd's ever!!!!!serj's voice sometimes annoys me so much (when he screams), but not to worry cuz its still a wicked cd!science is a boring trackif i were yall id take a listen to forest, ATWA, aerials,chop suey, prison song,deer dance, you wont know what its like if u dont listen to the whole cd!if u were a true soad fan u would LOVE this cd, and if u werent then listen to the cd, give it a try, who knows wat could happen after!!!!!ATWA ROCKS!!!!!!!
Toxicity is easily one of the best releases of the year, in any genre. System of a down has taken heavy metal and interlaced it with melody and arabic influences to create an entirely new and different sound. It is heavy metal, so the faint hearted may find it a little hard to get past the sheer heaviness of the album. Daron and Serj's lyrics are at times very direct ("Prison Song," "Deer Dance," and definetly "Bounce") and at other times quite mysterious ("Toxicity," "Chop Suey"). Overall, a great album. They showed heaps of promise and their excellent but occasionally poor debut, and delivered on every sliver of it. Very highly recomended. High points on the album include "Chop Suey!", "Prison Song," "Aerials", and "Shimmy."
system of a down can be described as a political band - much like rage against the machine. but this album, written by a band whos known to be a little crazy, writes about everything from the U.S. prison system to pogo sticks. great melodies, especially "Chop Suey!", theyre first single from this cd. u like ANY rock? you'll like this
Awsome cd...almost evry song is worth listening to...prison song,pogo,and chop suey are all realy good.
This is a great album by SOAD. I've had this cd for awhile now and its great to listen to when your mad. They blend a lot of great stuff in this album. Serj's voice is amazing. He can have a raging voice full of angst one minute, and the next have a soft,beautiful voice. This is more polished than their 1st album and the lyrics have matured and gotten better. Musicly though I'm still convinced that their self-titled album was better. It was a lot heavier and explosive. Not to say that this album isn't. They bring out all the stuff on here. They mix raging metal with Serj's powerful voice, to soft, lyricly amazing songs. You can't go wrong on this cd. The best songs are Deer Dance, Chop Suey, Science, Toxicity,Prison Song, and Forest. If you liked their 1st album you'll like this one. Now get out there and buy this CD!!!
as a conservative I really liekd this cd the songs where really cool and yes they did express a liberal view of America but you can't just look at one side of an issue and System of A Down brought up some good points I loved Areals and the Prison Song
I love this cd. Deerdance and chop suey has to be my favorie songs on here. I dont see how anybody dosent like this band...I have all of their CDs including Steal This Album and i love them all but some people say that Steal this album [is bad]...it dosent. If you like any kind of music you should like this so get it!!! I gave this album 5 stars because it is just a great band.
The album is good, good editing, good instrments, good everything, but I don't like politcal lyrics. I just don't like them. Conservative or Liberal, i just don't think music is the proper place to air out politcal views.
Although I did not hear their first album, I still can tell a good album when I hear one. I first heard Chop Suey from a friend, as he was humming it. I liked it, and then heard toxicity on the radio. Then, I knew I needed this. Toxicity has a really great guitar part, accompanied with great sounding drums. And, to show their musical ability, Toxicity is written in 12/8 Time Signature.
I expected to receive the album booklet/art with it, but received it in a generic case without the slightest bit of art. This was not mentioned online though the receipt with the item listed it to not have the art. Just a little disappointed that I'll need to hunt down the booklet and back art is all. however the album itself was in great condition, and read just fine.
Wow, I am speechless after hearing this album. This cd has very good lyrics and ausome riffs. it is the best.
This album is even more amazing than the last album. If you liked "System of a Down" at all, pick up "Toxicity". All the songs here are awesome. They are both heavier and more beautiful than the songs on the last album. And all those anoying voice cracks of Serj are gone in this album. It rocks!
These guys have influences out the wazoo, but they've managed to make their sound distinctly unique to their abilities and their message. With hints of Zappa, King Crimson, Tool and a gypsy caravan tambourine show, we're treated to incredibly tight song after tight song, and with the music ever-present despite the album's heavy politics. They don't treat the record as a chance to preach. They rock you out, and you wake up the next day thinking, "Gee, why do I think funny now?"Classic album, seriously. And I'm not a rock head.
This is an album of a touching and beautiful sort, while still managing to be a hardcore kick-... metal fest. These two qualities will often combine in there style with songs that protest, such as Science, and song that have a message like Chop Suey. I recommend this album to anyone and everyone because I am not a metal head and have this one in my stereo constantly.
Most song on this cd i like. my favorite song is toxicity. i used to like chop suey but man, i've heard it over a million times. well, you won't be wasting your money. SOAD's first CD is pretty much the same. I bought this one first and you should too. It's rockin'. I would like these word to go out to everyone who reads my review "do you cy when angels deserve to die?" and "do angels ever deserve to die" well, bye. Don't forget to buy SOAD's Toxicity and there self-titled album it's not a waste of money.
The guys from SOAD out did themselves with this sophmore album. From the opening track Prison Song you are drawn into the ferocious mayhem and at the same time subtle beauty that only SOAD could create. This album blew me away, there is not a bad song on here and Serj's vocal range goes from soft melody to out right demonic growls. Serj shouts and screams his lyrics over soem truly awesome guitar work by Daron. This album is harder, heavier, more left-of-center politically then their first album. Rage Against the Machine dropped the ball musically speaking and SOAD has picked it up and they have ran with it. I urge all metal fans and RATM fans to go pick this masterpiece up because I know you'll be as blown away as I was.
this album is the messiah. a gift to all true rock fans. system of a down are a 21st century metallica with a surpassing lyrical content to that of rage. the foursome hailing from armenia, based in the wonders of L.A have created a sound so original and astounding it is breath taking! their sound varies from nose-bleeding high tempo thrash metal to relaxing harmonic seronades between serj tankian and daron malakian. all conglomerating to create the 'perfect' rock album. songs to look out for are the two singles; chop suey! and toxicity and personal favourite psycho. this album will give you the highest adrenalin rush possible from a cd. to not purchase this cd would be a sacrilage to oneself and ones generation.
When system of a down's self title came out in 1998, I was most impressed with Serj's scream and the original songs that came out. The songs were fast and Serj's scream hit every song like bullets. I picked up this cd after hearing it off a friend.This album "Toxicity" is much more instrumental. Serj uses his voice more and Darren sings as well in Chop Suey and Needles. This album is much more wacky and different sounding than the first album. Songs like "Bounce" and "Phsycho" jumpy songs that don't capture as well as the other songs but "deer dance" and "jet pilot" not to mention "X" are catchy songs.This cd is great if you would want to hear Serj's voice and how he dramatically uses it in his poetic lyrics.
When I first heard the singles Aerials and Toxicity I knew I had to check this album out. I read some of the reviews on amazon and were more or less accurate to how I feel about this album. The vibrant 'Prison song' starts the show and sets you up for some serious rocking and it just flows from one song to another so easily. Technically they are brilliant Serj Tankian's voice is so unique and hauntingly changes from madness to mellow in seconds. There are, in my opinion 10 great songs on this album but one to look out for (after the favourites Chop suey,deer dance,Toxicity and Aerials) is 'Forest' the drumming and guitars are mind blowing. Buy this album!
This is my second favorite SOAD album. It kicks ass! Here's a song rating:1. Prison Song 5/52. Needles 5/53. Deer Dance 5/54. Jet Pilot 5/55. X 4/56. Chop Suey! 10/57. Bounce 5/58. Forest 5/59. Atwa 4/510. Science 5/511. Shimmy 5/512. Toxicity 5/513. Psycho 5/514. Aerials 9/5Bottom line:: It's a good album
this is the heaviest cd ever I listened to it and the first words out of my mouth were this is the ...best cd ever best song is shimmy next chop suey next forest and last needles if you have every other cd you should buy this one or you'll regret it
after reveiwing this cd, i discovered that system of a down not only revolutionzed modern rock....they also created a new genre. first, all the songs on the cd sound unique. each member of the band is highlighted in each and every second of each track. john dolmayan pounds on his drums and cymbals, making each fill in and beat match perfectly with the music. shavo's smooth bass creates a strong deep tone and Daron's immaculate guitar skills shine on guitar creative melodies and solo's. last but not least, serj tankian's great voice and deep lyrics contribute the finishing touches to perfect the band. i recommend to EVERYONE to buy this cd and give it a chance. you may think it is awkward at first. but soon you will learn to grow upon it and love it. system of a down's cd "toxicity" is truly a remarkable experience.
This CD is really , really awesome. It's not that i only like this heavy metal/rock genre. Quite frankly, i like every type of music, besides country, that is.(heh) This is a review coming a person who likes everything from Dido to Disturbed. rap, rock, whatever, i like it all. This is just a really good CD for anyone who likes any music at all and also has very good taste. Very great work from SOAD that should be enjoyed by everyone
Listen to it for what's wrong. This may sound absurd, but what's right with "Toxicity" is what's wrong. The extremely odd signature changes, the weird voice that Sarje puts forward, and the reverse genious-genious guitar that's played make this record incredible. This is just hard-core head-banging music at it's best. Pick this one up or some heart stopping music.
System of a Down is a great band because unlike everyone else their sound is so original. You can't compare them to any other band. Their lyrics are meaningful and are often humorous. This band is fast and loud and will make you crank it up and slam your head.
I have't read all of the reviews out there for this album but i am sure that there cannot be much left unsaid... Speaking as someone who is fed up with the over produced offerings of so called "Nu-metal" i can say that this is truly a step above filled with Insane chord progressions and arpeggios and wait you can actually make out the Bass guitar part...wow...and vocals that send shivers down my spine and raise the hairs on the back of my neck. I wait with bated breath for a follow up!!
Toxicity is one of the standout albums that i have in my music collection. When I first heard of System Of A Down, i brushed them off as a group that were cahing in on the craze that was sweeping the world, unitl my friend lent me their album. The standout tracks are Toxicity (my favourite track on the album and one of the best songs that I have ever heard), Aerials, Pogo, Needles (for comedy reasons), Chop Suey and Psycho. Toxicity is an album taht you will want to listen to over and over again without getting bored.
I have recently gotten into SOAD and hard rock in general...years after adolescence. I feel like these guys are a healthy outlet for my rage against the neo-con right wing direction our poor country seems to be going. This album's first three songs really pump me up. For the most part SOAD is not boring repetitive [...] like much of hard rock and generally the lyrics are meaningful with some exceptions. Serg's powerful voice gives chills at times. A great album to crank up your kickbox routine, annoy Jesus-freaks, and non-violently expend some warranted pent-up anger.
this Cd is great and has some truthful messages. i like "Deer Dance" its about brutal police and is a great metal song.another one is "Prison Song" its about how america has too many priaons and is true, treatment should be increased, and law enforcement decreased. this is a great CD from a great band, buy it today!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
I bought this album after seeing the "Toxcicity" video on MTV2. I had known a few of System of a Down's songs, but after I heard this song, I really liked it. I must admit, I'm a little dissapointed in the album overall, but nonetheless, I enjoy listening to it. I love the songs Chop Suey, Atwa, and Toxicity. Those songs made the album well worth buying. The other songs, however, all sound alike, but are okay to listen to. Despite this, I do not regret buying this album. Be your own judge.
There are a few CD's out there that are able to be played when you want loud, loud, I mean frikkin loud music. You know the kind to take out some agression, or just to get pumped. Rage Against the Machine was the original LOUD CD, but I think Toxicity might be its equivalent. This CD is excellent.
i just have to say that this album is just great, it follows well in the footsteps of the other.these guys know how to rock, pure and simple.do your self a favor and pick up this loud mess of great rock.
Rarely does a band like System come to the forefront of the underground metal world. They have struck gold (maybe even platinum) with their sophomore album, Toxicity. The amazing creativity behind the minds of Serj Tankian and Daron Malakian are nothing short of godly. The spellbinding blend of political messages and energy-driven music gives the listener an amazing new view of the world. Really! "Prison Song" demonstrates as such. "Science", my favorite song on the album, also gives personal views and provides insight into the mind of Tankian. Though i cannot even compare it to their first album, Toxicity reigns near the top of the best metal albums ever! No lie.
i love this cd! i especially love Chop Suey. Recommendations for this song- Play on the bus to any field show or field tip, the results are usually reaaaallly funny. bnu 4evr.
I feel system is on it's way to developing its new sound, like Shavo said they were trying to do. The self titled was had a harder sound, Toxicity got a more melodic feel to it, and although songs from STA didnt make the Toxicity cut, they sound even more unique. Toxicity is great for those who are in between. If you don't want hardrocking songs like P.L.U.C.K or Soil, and want more focused melodic songs like Chop Suey or Atwa then Toxcity is it. (It still has hard rocking tunes don't worry) Overall a great album. Better to come though.
This album was the best thing ever to happen to S.O.A.D. It has the best S.O.A.D. song's made to date(even better than some songs on "Mezmerize"). This is what put them on the map. A lot of people probably didn't know who S.O.A.D. before this album. Toxicity is by far their best work yet, with songs like "Chop Suey", "Toxicity","Deer Dance", and "Arials" all becoming names of songs that even MTV watchers would recognize. I believe even "Mezmerize" may not even be able to top this one.
People that wont like this CD without even listening to it properly are:1)People Traped in the 70's ( I want more solo's!!!).2)People who think someone who has darker skin then white is a terrorist.( Kill all Sand N%%g%S)3)People who love George Bush ( What a ragga muffin he is i love that chap).4)People who dont know nothing about politics.This aint an AMAZING album but it is good. Reminds me of a heavy version of Mr Bungle, not as diverse though.It uses influences from varios different metal genres, so i wouldnt label it Nu-metal( Korn, Limp bizcuit talk about the same things and play similar music?)Any way every one has an opinion i guess, but make it a bit valid.
soo......new SOAD cd.....its quite entertaining and stuff yet it's odd............but its all good......better than the first.....worse than the 3rd............soooPeace Out...
Good effort, most issues coverd on here are political. So it would not be everybodies taste. Musically it goes in different directions of metal/alternative, it certainly isnt complex music but it is not dull either. Definatly worth checking out.
System of a Down's sophomore album is criticized as being a terrorist album because it came out on 9/11...and because the band members are from a middle eastern nation originally.I'm not surprised, but dissappointed by these racist rants. For one, Armenia is near the middle east but is a Christian nation, not Islamic. For another, even if they were Islamic, it doesnt make them terrorist. What is a terrorist anyway? Christian nations who take over entire nations, exploit resources, destroy cultures, enslave humans, and enforce Christianity? The governments involvement in Iraq is a terrorist act in itself. The events of 9/11 have no connection with Iraq besides stupid Americans who group all of the Middle East and its inhabitants as one collective. There is no hope for this sad country which continues embracing racism even in music, the only thing good in this corrupt world.
SoaD has put out a very good disc with TOXICITY. It was probably one of the most anticipated metal releases this year and it doesnt disappoint. The album has some great melodies to go aling with some straight ahead in your face rock. (Chop Suey) It also has some pretty amusing lyrics (Needles). DEER DANCE is also a great song on this disc. Some of the lyrics are serious and try to make the listener think. JET PILOT, BOUNCE, ATWA, FOREST, and AERIALS are also some of the stand outs here that you will want to listen to. Get this CD now
Let me start off by saying that I didn't care for the last album.This one however is light years ahead of the debut. Sonically it is phenominal, they got great sounds this time out.The songs are heavier and less quirky than the debut. There are some awesome heavy riffs with great grooves, however there are still some of the annoying (IMO) vocal interludes. Basically I tolerate these to get to the cool parts, fortunately those "coolparts" pay off big. Just saw them for "Pledge Of Allegiance"and they were outstanding live.
There is one thing wrong with this album and that is it made me like their s/t effort less. Although there is no 'Sugar' on this album it is pure quality from start to finish. The only song i don't love is Jet Pilot because I think its a bit too heavy in all the wrong ways but its still a good track. Best songs for me were Chop Suey, Forest and ATWA.I reckon Serj is the main reason that SOAD are a brilliant band rather than just a good band but every member pulls their weight. In short a modern day classic.
I am not a fan of the nu-metal scene, but I just had to get this album. My favorite songs on this album are Prison Song, X, Chop Suey!, Forest, the title track, and Ariels. If you are not a fan of the nu-metal scene but would like at least one nu-metal album, let this be the one. Then again, this may not be for you.First half: 3 out of 5Second half: 5 out of 5
Great album. Love the unique sound this band has.I would recommend it. Amazon makes it easy to find music.
It was great! I thoroughly enjoyed listening to this! This is one of my favourite albums by system of a down, and now I finally have it!
This album rules. Since the last release, "System of a Down", the group has been touring alot, and Terj, the lead singer, has developed greatly. All the tracks are excellent, especially Chop Suey! and Aerials. The bonus CD-Rom has some great features for any big fan.
Buy this album now. It is so incredibly rich sounding...like eating pure butter but in convenient music form. Smooth, mellow, strange, quirky, and at times incredibly hard...buy it now.
I'm no expert on tuning or installation, but I was in much need of getting more fuel to my engine. It was running extremely hot after installing an exhaust and air filter.Relatively easy to install, bit of a tight fit. In fact the installation mount had to be improvised as it wasn't the same as indicated in the manual for 2008 FXDF.In any case, easy fit in, install the software on a laptop. restart laptop after installation (OTHERWISE WON'T DETECT THE Power Commander), load the map you want and run it.
Way too short. 37 minutes of videos,(though they are very good videos), is not my idea of a DVD worth the money paid. How would it have hurt to add a couple of more songs to this?
The other review was very helpful. I already own those albums.In fact I own just about ALL of his albums. He IS my favorite.For those that don't have them - get them. Well worth the money.Enyoy,
This is a great book about the life of John Wayne. I think that any fan of his will be pleased with the way it was written. One of the best books written about his life.
I bought this for my Dad for Christmas- we are both HUGE John Wayne fans, and he loooves it, and so do I. HIGHLY recommend it- must have for any and all Duke fans :)
Enjoyed this book very much. Realy got to know the people in this book am looking forward to reading the second book
If you want one book to do it all, get this one.At least it provides you with a vision of most of the issues surrounding infertility.It provides excellent information on female infertility issues.It provides cursory information about male infertility issues.We have recommended and loaned out this book to several friends, and they all were happy with the details provided.
This is a very comprehensive book, filled to the brim with information for the infertility patient. It's a great resource, but some parts are written in a very technical way, with a lot of medical terminology. I didn't read it from cover to cover, but do use it often as a resource.
This book is a must read if you have ever had a "Best friend" thier wild adventure will inspire you to wake up and want to live life to it's fullest! The author keeps you on your seat of excitment to see what happens next. Sisterchicks forever!
Robin has a lot of teen fans who are growing into young adulthood and womanhood. Its great that she has moved into fiction for an older crowd so her fans can grow with her.Sisterchicks is great and there's a website for fellow "sisterchicks" to meet at: http://www.sisterchicks.com
Two of Johnny Cash's oldest albums of which only Fabulous Johnny Cash has been available on CD until now. These are also two of the very few Johnny Cash albums that Columbia has released on CD - it would be great if they stopped making all these Best Of and Greatest Hits albums and started re-releasing the actual albums or let Bear Family make some more of the wonderful Man in Black boxes. This album includes some of songs which are also found on these Greatest Hits etc. Songs like Don't Take Your Guns to Town and Five Feet High and Rising. But it also includes a lot of songs which have never been released on CD (save for the Man in Black boxes). With this CD you get two old albums and the original liners notes. And if you haven't got them on LP already you will hear a lot of new songs.
At times ripping deeper then most fusion jams ever dare go, the overall effects are again sometimes weighed down by the reluctant lulls of drugged out, less inspired distortionesque improv- even so, which is demonstrated with more eloquence then in future releases. With these two seminal albums fused together though, one can hardly pause from admiring the daunting collaborations each band member intuitively made in order to synchronize some of the most jazzily adept experimental rock music ever laid down. Some of it's slower(free-form) parts may alienate the melodic minded, sober listener, although it would be a crime to not own this compilation if at all one is instrumentally inclined.
This meter is a versatile meter for testing of electrical components. It is not rated for branch-circuit or service application, and that does limit it's functionality some. But for bench testing of components and devices it works great.
Very nice multimeter. It's on the large side but the leads are plenty long so you can do your work and see exactly whats on the display!
I GOT THIS PRODUCT AT WALGREENS AND I WAS SCEPTICAL B/C OF THE NAME BUT I GET ON YOUTUBE ALOT AND SEE PRODUCTS REVIEWS SO I DECIDED TO TRY IT. GOOD THING I DID. I WASHED MY HAIR WITH GIOVANNI TEA TREE TRIPLE TREAT AND THEN CONDITIONED WITH THIS PRODUCT,I KEPT IT ON FOR ABOUT 20 MINS IT SAYS 10 BUT I HAVE DRY HAIR SO I DECIDED TO KEEP IT ON A LITTLE LONGER. IT LEFT MY HAIR SOFT AND SMELLING WONDERFUL. I DO SUGGEST DOING ANOTHER DEEP CONDITIONER AFTERWARDS FOR DRY HAIR, BUT THE RESULTS ON MY 4B/4C HAIR WAS GREAT. THE SMELL WAS ABSOLUTLEY YUMMY AND THE PRICE IS MAJOR PLUS. TRY IT ASAP!!!!
Our five year-old started getting into soccer and I immediately found myself over my head with even the basics of the sport. This DVD gave us a bunch of great exercises and ideas and inspiration for him. He is six now and is showing amazing ability (if you knew our family's level of athletic talent you'd understand better why I used the word "amazing.") and I am actually a semi-qualified assistant coach.
With no background in soccer, I was at a loss, and as a new soccer player, so was my son. I took advantage of the "Parent Soccer Coach" DVD as a tool for our family's mutual "Soccer Education". My son enjoyed watching the DVD and used it to reinforce what he was learning on his team. He also seemed to get a lot of self-affirmation from the DVD by pointing out his knowledge & skills.This DVD offers an easy & convenient way to build awareness of soccer for the entire family.
What you would expect from this author. Story could have moved a little faster. A good continuation in the series.
It's an excellent book, but it just... ends. There's no wrap up. No satisfying conclusion, nothing. I only hope there are a couple more in the works.
This movie has all the trappings of a classic western tale enthusiasts have come to expect: gambling in saloons, dancing women, dusty country-weathered men, gun fights and riding off into the sunset. The traveling circus element was great comic relief and I laughed out loud at the scene of 3 or 4 little clowns swinging bats to take down a giant villain! I think folks are judging it to harshly based on the quality of the DVD. I admit, in the beginning the aspect ratio is squeezed together to fit TVs and the picture looks elongated, this is annoying. Then this technique is switched to just chopping of the sides of the wide screen original. Regardless of quality issues, I soon became engrossed in the story and couldn't help but enjoy movie overall.
I didn't think I'd like this book as much as I actually did. It was informative, questioning, and thought provoking. Great for someone who knows little about ecological literacy but wants to know more. A good beginner's book for someone starting to realize the intrinsic value in nature.
it's very easy to recognize about leadership. i read more books about leadership more than 20 books. you know what? this books has importants keys of leadership on techinical side.
I bought this product with the intention of growing them. I followed the instructions of each individual packet, and placed the seeds in the greenhouse with proper heat and water. The majority of the seeds have grown, such as echinaea, milk thistle, burdock, lemon balm, and cayenne. I have not gotten fever few to sprout after a few attempts. It is still a good purchase and they shipped immediately.
The story of Victoria and Albert relationship developing over the years is told so well.From first meetings to marriage and the adjustment of Albert as a man to wait for his duties to evolve overtime.It is so sad how tragic Albert's early death had on a young Quenn Victoria and for the effect of Albert's death on the rest of Victoria's reign. A True love story.
I had seen the movie "Young Victoria" so I wanted to see how Victoria was portrayed as a matured queen. Although I was not disappointed, the setting was quite different, this movie did not have the glamour.
This is not a depiction of the ins and outs of the political aspect of Queen Victoria's reign. It is a love story where balancing duty with depth of feeling, professional with personal relationship, is fully fleshed out.All actors involved deliver great performances. Great chemistry between the lead actors makes the story come alive. It was wonderful to picture the castle, which looks so cold and austere from the outside, as the home of a warm and loving and joyful family. Children gleefully running through the halls on holidays. A father playing with his children. A mother looking on with shining eyes.This movie shows the personal side to the monarchy. It was a delight to watch. I hated to see it end.Add it to your DVD library and prepare yourself for a few hours of total enjoyment.
Lovely film -- great costumes. In terms of the relationship between the Queen and the Prince Consort - it seems accurate to the history I have read.
Depeche Mode appeared on the world with "Speak and Spell", their first album. The new romantic era has appeared,and Depeche Mode were the kings. On this album, there are good songs, like "Dreaming of me" and "Tora Tora Tora". It also contains Depeche's first classic: "Just can't get enough" I really recommend this album to everyone, but it is an all electronic album. If you're fan, you must have it, and if you want to know about music, it would be interesting for you to know the first album of one of the greatest bands of all the time: DEPECHE MODE.
Eventhough Vince Clark sucks at writing some songs on this album, it is still one of my faves. If you're a die hard Depeche Mode fan, this album is a must have.
I've just started listening to Depeche Mode not too long ago, and I fell in love with them instantly. Their music ranges from semi-religious to love to ideals. I love their music. The first song by Depeche Mode I ever heard was "Strangelove" and then "Enjoy The Silence." All of their music is great and I end up loving all their songs, as opposed to buying an album to listen only to maybe one or two tracks. Their music can be soothing or upbeat. You can dance to it or relax. They're a great band and I can't wait for their new album.
This is the version of Speak and Spell to own. It has great bonus tracks ( mostly b-sides of singles taken from the album ) plus the inclusion of Sometimes I Wish I Was Dead ( which Sire/Warner Brothers in the felt the need to delete from the US pressing of this album.) Great synth-pop. Silly lyrics. Total ear candy.
I got this album as a used record the other day just for fun, and now I expect I'm going to have to buy the CD anyway. Instantly recognizable as the work of Vince Clarke, master of the catchy pop tune and the cheesy lyric, there's not a weak point on this album. Side one has my favorite, "New Life" along with another single, "Dreaming of Me", and a few other songs you can't help but laugh along with. Side two shows shades of what is to come with a couple of tracks by Martin Gore, including my favorite DM instrumental of all time, "Big Muff". Even the tunes penned by Clarke are a little darker than usual on side two, including the extended mix of the smash single, "Just Can't Get Enough".
That's because Rhino is now owned by the WEA group and they don't support SACD. They could have used DVD-Audio instead, considering all the trouble they went to creating surround versions. The DTS 96/24 tracks are decent IF you have a newer 96/24 DTS decoder, otherwise you'll get 48/24 output. This same problem will plague the upcoming Genesis reissues as well, you'll only get the SACD layer if you buy the import and that means the videos will be PAL format.
I couldn't ask for better sound and care for the album's restoration and re-release. If you've got the original CD edition, this remaster necessitates a repurchase. If you're a newcomer, SPEAK & SPELL is a real treat, displaying a young and perhaps naive Depeche Mode, with Vince Clarke as their main songwriter. A very memorable and trendsetting album. The bonus DVD's documentary is also first-rate.
If you like battles against ultimate evil, religious overtones, and special effects - with a twist, rent Constantine. Yes, you have to suspend disbelief. Yes, you have to accept somewhat two-dimensional personalities. But if you get past that, you get a nicely shot, tense, supernatural crime saga with a couple of interesting characters. Most folks will have never heard of Constantine or Hellblazer, on which the movie is loosely based, but it's fine if you haven't. The movie is good enough on its own for an enjoyable night.
It seems many of the worst reviews were written by the same person. Fake reviews are usually done to improve the rating by someone that could benefit from higher sales. Between bad reviews from people with an axe to grind and those promoting their own crappy movie, these reviews have become useless.
The idea is decent, the ending is sound, and Keanu Reeves plays his character in a way that reminds me of Agent Smith in the Matrix. I would give Constantine two thumbs up if Rachel Weisz and Tida Swinton had made it together, but that's just me. Since they didn't, it's a decent flick.Lower your expectations, have a few beers and enjoy.
Constantine has accepted his fate and made peace with it. He knows that death and a hellish afterlife are imminent. Flawed and fatalistic, cigarette between his fingers, he plods along throwing himself into one horrific situation after another, in an effort to help a woman he doesn't even know. It's creepy and powerful. Angels, devils and friends. The guilty and innocent. Keanu Reeves is perfect in this role and it's a movie to watch again and again. Liked it a lot. Reminds me of Sandman Slim stories.
I thought this movie was entertaining and fun to watch. As for all the blasphemy complaints. Hello, people! Demons are made up, so taking liberty with terminology like "half-breed" is a non-issue. I, personally, was very happy with their good vs. evil-as-game theory. Cool.
Constantine is based on the D.C. comics characters "Hellblazer",i also dont know too much about the comics, so was gradingjust as a film and have to admit it rocked the house!!!Way to go Keanu, the cast and director. Constantine has somegreat special effects, the acting is particulary good fromeveryone from Reeves to Rachel Weisz.He plays a sort of witchcraft doctor who performs exorcismsand gets rid of demons. Suddenly, well I dont want to revealtoo much, but lets just say that this movie is worth the moneyto see it in the theater. So see "Constantine"!!!
dont listen to any of the moron 1 star posters, they all complain that this is not a scary horror movie. thing is, this movie is not a horror movie you twats. This is more of a theological-sci/fi movie. There was nothing in this movie that disturbed me much, it was a well done movie, based on a comic book.i really liked this movie, and felt like i had to review it once i saww the streak of 1 star reviews, that could very well be all the same person.
i don;t kno why they rated it so low. it is so a good movie. even my friend thinks so. keanu reeves played very good in this movie.im gonna buy it when it comes out. i keep talking about this movie to my friends.the movie is not all that scary maybe at the beginnig when they show a girl possesed. thats like the only cary scene. i think u should buy this movie. i am.
Great story line.....love the ending...when Constantine was face to face with Lou...it always gives me the creeps till this very day.
very good movie, must have on blu ray. although mine was skipping on my ps3 for some reason. amazon was excellent in their customer service replacing the order.
I had seen commercials for the movie Constantine on Tv ad they looked interesting so I rented the movie from my local Blockbuster. Overall I would say the movie was interesting and entertaining. I thought the scenes of Hell looked pretty cool along with those hell-creatures. I also like the gun that Constatine uses. I have never read the comics that this book is based on so I can't really judge the movie on them but I still don't understand why there are so many bad reviews for this movie. It kept me entertained and that is what I want most from a movie even if it isn't 100% loyal to the book or comica that it was based on.
I liked the movie which was based on the comic book Hellblazer. The DVD Special features I enjoyed very much. It gave a more in depth look at the translation from comic to film. I was really impressed as to how the special effects artists were able to create the hell demons. The comic book is very good added bonus.
I had seen this movie when it was first released and was impressed by the special effects. But with my endless quest to find hd movies (blue ray is taking over) I knew I had to purchase this one. And I am not disappointed. The extra features are easy to operate and the movie looks fantastic,not 3D like blue ray seems to bring out in their dvds. Hd movies are just that, it has outstanding clarity but doesn't give that fakey look that blue ray does.
I get the impression that some fans of the Hellblazer books did like approve of this film. I liked the film. It was one of of the few 2005 films that I did like. My advice for the Hellblazer fans is : if you don't like the film, then don't buy the DVD. Otherwise grow up and stop whining.
I have to caveat this review by saying that I wasn't familiar with the comic or graphic novels of this character. That said, I really enjoyed the movie and felt that it blended historical and mythological themes regarding heaven and hell well. The beginning when the primary relic that the film focuses on is found was particularly weak, however all of the characters had at least a few good moments with most of them being recognizable without being cliches.Keanu Reeves has more of an edge in playing John Constantine than in most of his previous efforts, but you'll still find yourself waiting for him to call for George Carlin pick him up in his transdimensional telephone booth ala "Bill and Ted's Excellent Adventure"
I really liked this movie and the style/look of it. I don't read comic books or graffic novels but love movies and I really liked this film. I can't speak from an adaptation point of view.As for the HD side of things. Absolutely, one of the best discs I've seen to date out of about 20+. It is virtually flawless even in darker scenes and the entire movie is sharp (but not overly sharp-edge enhanced)and the colors are really nice. Lots of scenes that I now notice more of stuff in the backgrounds at 56" HD. The DD+ soundtrack is great and I'm sure the DDTrue is amazing eventhough most of us can't decode it yet. It has tons of extra material that I don't care about myself, but it's there.Perfect video transfer- I love HD. Give it a shot if you're choosing your free HD DVD's from promotion. BTW- it took a good 2 months to get mine, but don't give up.
this film is basically about how Keanu Reeves (Human world) fought against the hell creatures. The story here is to mention how he save the lady police officer from death after the lady police officer needs his help to find out why her sister kill herself so strangely as she suspect that her sister somehow is being controlled by certain things in hell to end her life short. What happen, in the ned, to Keanu Reeve(constantine) and the lady police officer? Visit your nearest theatre now for those whom are interested.N/B: There are many moments of shocks in the movie during the fight between Human life and hell creatures where these creatures appeared suddenly....forwarned especially to the weak heart people out there.N/B2: What I could refer to this story is something like fighting between the good and bad like western against terrorist.
Satan is our brother, he will come again. This movie shows how close we are to deliverance. It was an ample chronicle of what could be. The dead are rising now, and soon all will be a river of blood and fire. All vampires should study this film.
This movie has almost no chance to make anybody happy. Constantine graphic novel fans will be disappointed because the character is changed and quite different from the books. Keanu fans won't see Neo (except for some time when Constantine was indecisive) and there aren't super kung fu fight sceens.That said, it's a slow moving, laid-back plot with a lot of back story which takes a bit to figure out. Rachel Weisz is very good but her character isn't developed as completely as it should have been. Keanu plays it very laconic (which, after all, is his strength) and it mostly works. But I think he should have been a bit more animated and I would have been interested in some sparks between him and Rachel.All in all, this is actually a pretty interesting movie, part The End of Days and part The Omen. I did enjoy it and I'm likely to get the dvd. Give it a rent, it's definitely worth a look.
Constantine is great fun, very light - don't take it seriously or you'll regret it. I love the main characters - Gabriel, Constantine, the Fixer with the fetish for bugs. The lead woman was a bit flat, and constantine wasn't as colourful as in the comic... partly due to Keanu's limited acting range (ie "woah!") but also because he was adapted for US audiences.There are even serious plot issues... why exactly is the fabulous christian artefact... owned by the Nazis... to be found in Mexico?But even despite its deficiencies, it's still a lot of fun - packed with great action, powerful scenes and a wonderful moody feel. Even the cheesy shots seem to work - eg Satan gloating over Constantine's imminent death, then receiving a finger for his trouble. and what a fantastic choice of casting that was ;)Watch it, but don't think too deeply about it - it's for fun, not study.
I guess I'll begin with an admission. I moderately enjoyed the film when I first saw it even though I went to see it with someone who really didn't like it. But then a strange thing happened. Usually after I see a "worthless" film, I forget it within a week. However this did not happen with Constantine. I found myself thinking of some of the scenes even weeks after seeing the film. So it is a film that has stuck with me, and that indicates it has something special. I gather from the reviews that it appears to be a love it or leave it movie. I would be interested if the movie has "stayed with" any of the "leave it" group. For me, however, I have slowly fallen in the "love it" category, and I'm looking forward to the DVD.
My husband wanted this for Christmas and he loved it. Ten more words are required so here they are. Take that, tips and guidelines robot!
Both disks were severely scratched upon receipt, but I've played both discs and not skips or problems. Would've rated 5 stars if discs were not scratched. Movie and extras are great!
First of all, I haven't read the comics at all, so I don't know how it matches up to those. Nonetheless, this is one of my favorite movies.It has action, drama, even a little romance plus great characters (acted well, too) and some far-out cultish creatures, symbols, and history. It's just one of those movies that is so in-depth you can really see this other world the author (of the comic) and directors have created.Definietly worth watching again and again. As for the extras, the second disk is very good, especially the part on "Constantine Cosmology" (I enjoyed because Constantine is related to the Hero Cycle of Joseph Campbell, if you are familiar as I am in my learning of mythology). The comic is just the first one, and not the entire series, and interesting to see.
Didn't see this listed but if you put the supplimental disc in an X-box you can play the Constantine video game.
You have got to be kidding me with the earlier reviews. this movie was very good. It's not Oscar winning but entertaining to say the least. This movie provides interesting storyline and great special effects. I don't really think it was set out to be some "exorcist" type horror film. Whatever you do watch it. It's more than worth it.
Ecological understanding is a must for all generations. For those with the courage to think through the implications of an ecological world view and want to learn the scientific concepts which help facilitate greater understanding of natural systems, leading to (hopefully) better decisions regarding resource use, this is a great book. By tackling recursion and non-linear causation at multiple time scales and cognitive levels, Harrie-Jones helps enrich the recuriveness of population level learning. Bateson was, NO DOUBT, one of the most challenging thinkers of his generation. Struggling at all times to keep his focus on how to make nature and communication more intelligible to more people so that they would have the tools and wisdom to see the consequences of their action on both other people and the planet. Rigorous and enchanting cognitive medicine for all those working to make a better world.
A wonderful history of the major patterns. Colour plates with most of the patterns as well. If you want to fish the traditional spey, this si a book to have!!
This was a book for my husband who specializes in literature related to the topic. An out-of-print book and the dealer described condition accurately.
If you have a Jewish/Christian path and are looking for a guide to manifesting things in your life, this is a powerful, but simple method. I experienced almost immediate results through the Psalms. If you find the Wicca and Pagan methods of manifestation too complicated or contrary to your beliefs, I highly recommend this book.
I agree with other reviewers who liked this book, by far one of the best buys I made at the time, it is very powerful when used correctly and you'll see results very quickly if not right away, not to be taken lightly though, this is a serious book ! recommended
While exploring Dragon's Mouth Cavern, the Boxcar children encounter a group of suspicious, unfriendly people, including a man who refuses to identify himself, Mr. Pitt and Mr. Lyme who try to scare the young sleuths away, and Crystal Hollowell, who lies about where she works.Can the Boxcar Children solve this underground mystery?
The Cannibal's Wife is a searing, self-revealing, and frightening book. On a personal level, it is about sadomasochism, gender asymmetry, and abuse of power. On a social level, it is about institutional blindness and complicity. It is ironic that the church may be one of the last locations in which sexual harassment can be practiced without serious repercussion. It is a riveting read.--Margaret R. Miles Dean and Vice President for Academic Affairs The Graduate Theological Union, Berkeley, CA
As a NeoAddict myself, I have spent many hours at neopets.com . Now with this toy, I can take a Yellow Aisha everywhere! It was so much fun playing games to collect neopoints (Neopian currency) then buying food, toys, and etc. Your pet sleeps at certain hours and eats 3 meals per day (you can adjust the time easily). You also have to moniter your pet's happiness, strength, and hunger, because if you don't take care of your pet, it might leave you! I loved this toy and to me it was better than a pet! (The Aisha Pocket Neopet is also available in blue)
These games are really fun. They are ideal if your mom and dad say no after all that begging for a new dog. These games include shops, mini games, and others. The mini games are Poogle Racing, Techno Says, Bag Drop, and Scorchy Slots. Neopets have taken the world by storm and I think you should be 1 of the millions of people to join them.
I've had this CD sitting on my shelf for months because I bought it after hearing Sick Little Suicide on a sampler. Just returned from Warped Tour and heard The Matches live. They were one of the best bands there. Beat out Fall Out Boy, All American Rejects, and the rest. When I got back I put this in my car and I've had it there since. Do youself a favor and if you like some of the new punk, get this. The band has some real talent is not just following a trend.
I heard these guys broke up last year. IF that's true, it's a pity. This CD really impressed me, as it journeyed between Trance, House, and just straight up Pop.i'd recommend it.
I just wanted to reassure everyone that the real Black Crowes are now back! This is truly the best cd I've bought in a long time & I recommend it to all.
On this one, they go back to what they do best. This is a return, musically, to the sound they had on their first CD. They strip away everything else and just get back to basic rock 'n' roll, something they do better than most groups out there. My only minor comlaint is that the songwriting isn't up to their usual standards.
Take a seat on the old stool, and pop in this CD because it is the best rock album out right now. Mike Snowden Plays the lead guitar with such gusto that I sometimes cry when I listen to that one congregation song. Ethan skeels does wonders with his banjo, and Shawn "MINI MAN" Smith plays enter sandman perfectly. Gorbie on the drums couldn't have played any better on this album. If you get any album in your life, get this one. Its awesome. And of course, if you aint down with the black crowes, I got 2 words for ya
I saw the Crowes live at the Aregon in Chicago before I heard the album and they cooked. I bought the album and it was like I was still at the concert. Great fans, great album. Chicago loves the Crowes. I can't wait to see them again May 8th.
i saw the crowes do some warm-up shows at the roxy in LA and they blew the doors off the place with the new stuff. true, they relied heavily on older tunes, but i was impressed with the new songs. that guy audrey (new lead guitarist) seems kinda like a poser, ala "leg up on the floor amp, lean back and play like it's just killing you" but that was forgivable. i miss marc ford. no messin' around with him. amorica is one of the best albums of all time. i can't figure out what anybody's problem with that one was. "by your side" ranks up there with "three snakes" for me. good, solid effort. it's what i love about the crowes. you know what you're going to get, and you sure as hell get it.
The title track here simply soars to this listener's ears. I didn't turn the volume below 9 until the 12th listen of track #3. I was extremely glad to hear the Crowes getting back to rockin' blues, after the indifferent previous releases. When a song hits me as hard as "By Your Side" hits me, you've got somethin! And the rest of the disc is terrific too. "Go tell the congregation" and "virtue & vice" are certainly notable.
After a few mediocre albums, the Black Crowes have recorded their best album. Yes, even better than their excellent 1990 debut, Shake Your Money Maker. From the first song, "Go Faster," to the epic "Virtue and Vice," this album rocks like I thought the Black Crowes would never rock again. It also the absolute best kick drum sound I have ever heard - big, tight and mixed WAY up front. By Your Side gets my vote for best rock album of 1999.
One of the last great southern rock bands is back, and in a big way! By Your Side is a great cd which conveys the southern rock and roll styles that has been sorely missed for the past few years. This is true rock and roll at it's finest. If you enjoy Aerosmith or the Rolling Stones, I recommend this cd. The first single "Kickin My Heart Around" sums up what the Crowes are about. They might not have the most talent in the world, but they are great at what they do, rock hard! A must hear!
To all the 'drugged-out, post-hippie' fans of the Black Crowes..put down your doobies for a week or so and re-listen to this fabulous disc! This is by FAR their best,albeit most 'commercial' sounding release. Obviously, this is not what every fan of the band wanted from them. But if you enjoyed what they were trying to achieve on 'Shake Your Moneymaker', how can anyone deny the musical growth AND extremely catchy vibes of every single song on this masterpiece?! Please don't be put off from buying this because of the negative reviews. This is easily the Black Crowes I'd have liked to have heard way more of. Sadly-they decided to climb back into 'obscurityland'on their final disc,the somewhat lame 'Lions'. What a HUGE disappointment after this gem! Buy NOW & enjoy..
This guide does cover many, if not, all the major aspects of living and working overseas, mainly from an American / Canadian point of view.There is a lot of information packed into ~3 pounds of paper (it IS heavy). There are many handy tips and practical tips, especially for first-timers looking to live and work overseas. But a lot of it can be obtained elsewhere (e.g. from the net). Overall, I would say, if you are after an all-in-one guide / reference book, this is by far the most comprehensive guide in print form I've come across on the market for the American / Canadian market.The key additions to the 4th edition comes in "soft-copy" in a CD-Rom - the printed version remains more or less the same. I found the previous editions sufficiently adequate - unless you are looking for something specific that wasn't covered in the previous editions.
Very solid yet different release by the Clowns this time around. No more Joker Cards to keep you guessing what's next, just The Tempest that thankfully is way better than The Calm. Now that Mike Clark is back on the boards, the wicked ones are noticeably back at home. This one is filled with songs that are sure to make anyone's head bob.
Well ICP or Inner city players are doing it agian with their muzic. This cd is a combo or rap, blues, reggie and soul. I personaly love the song I do this! It is a song that relates what it is like to sell your body for crack. They even go into details about their homosexual love life with a young boy named fresco. I Love this CD!!!!!
I have been listening to ICP for 9 years and I have been really dissapointed with their past few releases. When I heard they were getting back with their old producer, I was suddenly excited to hear a new ICP album for the first time in a few years.Overall, I think this is probably the best ICP album since The Amazing Jeckel Brothers. Bizaar/Bizzar had a few good songs, but I absolutely couldn't stand The Wraith Shangri-la, Hells Pit, or The Calm. I have no idea why they ever got rid of Mike Clark to begin with, but The Tempest obviously shows that Mike Clark is clearly needed to make a decent ICP album. The majority of the songs on this album are great, but I am giving it 4 stars because there were a few songs they really should have done without. But this is The Wraith done right. If they had released this as the 6th joker's card instead, I would have been much happier.
A lot of people are saying that this album isn't wicked, and they're right, but it IS a good album. I think by now we should all except that ICP's wicked days are behind them, but at least with Mike E. Clark back, they can still make good music. Ride The Tempest, Haunted Bumps, Watch My Ride, The Tower, Bitch I Lied and Play My Song are all great tracks, and for the first time in a long time, this ICP cd could stay in your cd player for a while.
I love this book. Its got just enough really interesting history and cultural facts, written in a very readable way. The kind of book you can actually read when you have run out of novels whilst lying on a beach. Most of the write ups for the places we visited were spot on. Really helpful book.
Benjamin Franklin, no matter which way you look at him, was a great American. I love the stories and folktales about him, his life and his wonderful words and sayings. This autobiography of his life was written by Ben Franklin when he was sixty-five. It was written in letter format to his son, and it he reminiscences about his eventfull early life. Throughout we see Benjamin's powerful literary style and his great humour. This autobiography is well worth a visit if only to get a first-hand look at a very colourful historical American.
It is nice to read a book about one of our founding fathers, it is truly an amazing story of Ben, I encourage you to read it.
I believe I read some of it in grade school. I've read it twice as and adult and am still inspired to be a better man.It shows what hard work, good motivesand faith in God and our fellow man can accomplish.
I recomand it in order to see with your own eyes how determination and hard work pays off. A powerful insight into the life of a modest and industrious man.
This autobiography takes one back to colonial times from 1706 through about 1760 and illustrates America's spirit of individual determination. How interesting to compare Franklin's views of personal integrity as a leader to what the USA leaders represent today. The book has led me to John Adams biography by John McCullough to give another view of Franklin and of the times.
this book is a good read and jumps around a lot, but i enjoyed learning and reading it. thank you.
Brilliant honest man. Would have been a leader in any era of civilization. We are blessed he left these words for our benefit.
I find it amazing that Benjamin Franklin discovered and was the first to bring in the follow:Fire DepartmentsLibrariesOf Course Electricity from LighteningAlso he had wonderful insights in to morals and how to live our lives. I wish some of his other papers had survived. He talks about some of his writing being destroyed or taken by the British during the Revolutionary War in America.
I love history, so this written by Benjamin Franklin is very interesting especially since I am descended from people who lived in New England in the same time frame.
This book is a must read for people of all ages. I don't know about the 'Dover Thrift Editions', I got mine at Barnes and Noble, so I suggest you check that version out. Old Ben Franklin was an amazing man, he truly was. This book is one of the best I have ever read. This is a must read for everyone! I can't believe we never read this in school! It should be a mandatory read.Anyway, please read this book and I assure you, you will enjoy this insightful, unprecedented man. I promise you will. How there are so few men of that class today!
I didn't realize that so many of his ideas are used, without knowing where they came from. Thanks for sending this book.
Don't make this the first book you read about Ben Franklin....you wouldn't appreciate it as much or get the most of it. Read a top biography of Benjamin Franklin first (the one byBenjamin Franklin: An American Lifeis great). Once you have a good knowledge about the man's life, personality, and accomplishments/different stages of life, then you can go to this book and really enjoy it.Equip yourself with Ben's life and acquaint yourself with his personality before you tackle his auto biography.
It was interesting to compare the autobiography with the biographies that I have read of his life. It provides good insight into his religious and philosophical views.
As I read this indepth study/profile of Ben Franklin and I read little to believe it was the Ben that signed the declaration of Independence. This was a Super period book on the hardships for life and even on how early White Slavery worked and how Ben survived/dealt with his slavery. Indentured for as much as 20 years and jailed if you tried to run. At every page, I was amazed at what I read. It was also one of the many free KINDLE books I have read and enjoyed. THE BOOK WOULD BE RATED AS 5 STARS except for the out of usage words used in this "period book". Kindle was super at auto-defining those obscure terms. PS Memorize which keys have which letters, they rub off of the Kindle very quickly.
This is one of the first downloads for my new kindle,mainly because it was free and I am sort of a history buff.I wasn't at all disappointed.I found it easy to read and full of fun facts that I just didn't know about Benjamin Franklin.Why don't they teach this stuff in school?If you enjoy history as I do you can't go wrong with this one.
Very interesting read; however the style in that era is not like we write today. Takes a little getting used to then it flows pretty well! I would recommend it!
This book changed my life. I read it while in college and it changed my slacker attitude to that of a scholar. Franklin was a great man in his time. The reviewer "barnesgene@aol.com from Fairfax County, Virginia" is very wrong and a bit snobbish. He does not pretend to be the greatest writer, but Franklin utters the importance of self-knowledge and learning. From a boy to an adult his life story is a grand representation of the scholar in all of us.
It is Franklin's "regularness"--his down-to-earth regularity--that makes this such a great story. Here is a great man who was accomplished in many fields showing us that he is just a regular guy who worked hard. I, for one, don't need to be drowned in pedantry to consider a work valid. He was not attempting to make a philisophical treatise, he was just telling his life's story for the benefit of his son. It is an inspriing story of success filled with amusing anecdotes and common-sense. Read it!
I love that I can get these older writings free for the Kindle. It makes a huge difference in our homeschooling budget.
franklin says he read the book George III's policy's are based on, the 'arcana imperi?' what's that about? and where do I find it?
Earl P's gone now. 38 years sober. He always related to this book and the Rubáiyát of Omar Khayyám. I've just now got my Droid 2 and the kindle app and am reading this book. In Service and Gratitude, Earl...James A.
Benjamin Franklin sure was long winded. Can take forever talking about just about anythign in his life. He was a great man in his day and did alot for his country. We could use more men like him in the whitehouse nowadays.
Far from a "boring read", Franklin's work gives an unique insight into the 18th century working class people. Much that has been written about Franklin is absolute rubbish. His autobiography puts the man in real perspective. Granted he was a bit self centered and, at times, self congradulating, but his accomplishments were many. His wit is often stinging. I was surprised to read about his military activities and yet he was influenced by the Quakers. It's also significant that he talks of his belief in the deity and the fact that he was a presbetyrian. Many "revisionist historians" claim that Franklin was an atheist. This certainly suggests otherwise. Franklin will always be controversial, but never "dull". Another book to peruse is titled FART PROUDLY, also a Franklin work.
Awesome read into one of the great minds of humanity. Everyone should read this I got a lot out of it
I like reading about history, and therefore this fits my interests. This person is a very interesting character that I enjoy to learn about
An amazing man who wrote this autobiography in a chatty way to his son. Fascinating and informative about a very intelligent man.
The joy of reading this autobiography comes from the personality of its writer, as Franklin discusses Franklin. His style is delightful and he feels present, here, now. His body has been dead for over two hundred years, but not his ideas and not his voice. The core of what he writes is strong, but his ideas and rules for living are alive and speak to the present. Before reading this book, I read a few harsh comments on both the book and Franklin. Writers said that Franklin falsely portrays himself as a fine guy and that he really wasn't so fine. I cannot believe that the writer of this autobiography was anything other than the voice that comes across the centuries. Such a strong and vital voice, such a story, such deeds, these could only come from a great man. Not a perfect man, but a great man. I enjoyed so much the library checkout that I immediately got on Amazon and ordered the book for my own library, to read and reread, learning and connecting with the author.
I was surprised as how good this was. I was not looking forward to reading it but there's a LOT under the surface. The was he manipulates the reader with subtlety at times and openly at others is, quite frankly (no pun intended), charming. It contains well written autobiographical stories and contains a lot of interesting and useful information for readers today.This is a great historical book to read. It exposes both the positives and negatives of early American/colonial history. I would definitely recommend this to readers interested in history.
The book is what you expect. It is not an easy read, based on the old language used, but has good information.
This is so far the best book I have ever read...no where else will you get to experience a truly amazing, real life story that will push you to research more on the topics of genius men and women and their thought prosses.
As an Australian not well versed in American history, a lot of the later chapters involving war were lost on me. However Benjamin Franklin is an extremely inspiring person and his list of virtues have found a place in how I want to organize my life and my future.
This is a autobiography of his early years. He actually finished the second half of it thirty years later when he claims he has enough time & before he became too old. The two halves have been edited seamlessly. In this we see just hints of what England's future relations with the colonies will be. Franklin has considerable business relations with the British military & makes his fortune in business by the time he is fifty. He is just getting his feet damp in politics being one of the framers of the Albany Plan of Union in 1754. There is much in this of the Franklin we do not know. It is informal & personal. With all its facinating anedotes it would have been lost to the world if he hadn't been urged to write it. America first true international super star, but by the end of this book, not yet.
Excellent experience! Book as described. Good price. Quick ship. Well packed. Would buy from again.
I have to agreed with the major of reviewers, but I think many have missed the point. As a C++ programmer and Neural Network Developer, the basic concepts of design and reuse are very good. I have remaked may of these into my own NN library and continue to improve upon it. Why he decided to use his own link list instead of the standard template libraries vector or list class is a mystery to me, but was very easy to implement into my library as was many other modifications I have made and expanded. The one thing I didn't care for was his examples as they provided no explaination, nor reason.
A great book for begginers! This book explains how to USE neural networks, but, not WHY neural networks works! Thats the problem ith this book! But is very good!
Leader of this group of men going into the Yukon Gold Field was an English man who had vowed not to cross into American Territory, disliking Americans. He was admired by his three comrades. He was strong willed, would not ask his comrades to do anything he wouldn't do. Even when given advice from knowledgable frontier men he continued on his path losing the lives of two of his men. A wonderful description of the characters of all the men involved in this journey.
LOVE IT!!! My dog has really bad separation anxiety. It was really bad the first few days that she was home. She howled all day. My neighbors told me they got this stuff for their cats, and it did the trick. I rushed to the store that day, and two days later, not even a whimper when I had to go to work. My dog is much more adjusted to me leaving and coming home.
this is the third time I've ordered Farnam's Comfort Zone DAP refill, which I like very much. But I continue to receive CEVA DAP Refill. The Comfort Zone Product is good and we have had some great results. Been using for almost 6 months now and I would not be without it.
For rescue dogs, agitation is a big problem. They need time to adjust to a normal, less stressful life. DAP may help with this, but about the same time I also switched to home made dog food, started adding nutritional supplements to reduce their stress responses, so I'm not sure how much this product contributed to their mellowing. But the next time I introduce a new rescue dog into the pack I'll plug in the DAP aerator just to be sure.
Neat looking toy in terms of color and form. Resembles some kind of jetski or something. Fires four missles. One from the mouth, two from the fins, and one from the cannon on the handlebar apparatus. Mouth opens and tail flaps when rolled on ground. Fins even have a little articulation. Fits figures very nicely. Very fun and aerodynamic looking. Although I don't recommend doing it...I'm tempted to take this baby to the bathtub! Well worth it!
Great little book for the beginner.Portable,so you can take it with you on your nighttime prowling of the universe.Written in a manner that newbies such as myself can understand.A good companion to all my other amateur astronomy books.Inexpensive,as well.Not as comprehensive as those other books,but this is a field guide,and it serves its purpose well.
I bought this book to start off with exploring the night sky and thought I would graduate to something more elaborate later.. Few months down, I am still with this book. It's a neat, compact guide (I carry it in my purse) that will help a beginner but also has enough for someone a little more advanced.
The Cramps are awesome. They have gotten kind of cheesier over the years, but that only makes them more fun. The important thing here is that they rock. This is seriously cool music. There are a couple of songs on the album that are a bit too silly (Stay Sick had the same problem) but overall it is a great rockin listen.
Every Smoker should have at least one of these. New cars don't come with ash trays anymore but they seem to have plenty of cupholders. It slip easily into any cupholder, front, back, or way in the back (for mini vans) where smokers get ban to with an open window. The closing lid helps to extinguish anything not completely put out. The lid prevents spills or messes (when lid is closed) if knocked over. The unit is easy removed to move to another location plus ease of properly disposing of contents. It can be used as a "stand-alone" unit so you don't have to look for a place to flick your ash or put out butts. High quality materials used in its costruction and has a nice appearance.
Great product - fits nicely in cupholder and is a convenient product for the auto. I would recommend this product for smokers who don't have ashtrays in the car or who just don't want to use their clean new ashtray, like me.
"Return to Waterloo" seems something of an indulgence. The mid-life crisis theme is murky but the feeling is unmistakeable. The Ray Davies magic comes through."Come Dancing" is a compilation of '80s music videos giving ample evidence that Davies is one of the world's great entertainers.If they're not already in your collection on VHS, you'll want to have this one.
I was not really sure how this movie was going to play, but it is a thriller and it did keep me on the edge of my seat --- I would probably even watch it a second time --- that's saying a lot for me.BUT, do yourself a favor and buy it used on amazon marketplace or rent it...
I've only been using this product for about two weeks, but so far, so good. The wart is shrinking, so I'll continue using it for several more weeks until I'm sure that it's gone. I like the stick much better than a liquid. It's also less expensive to use than the pads.
It is all in the title. It is nothing more than applying chapstick to the affected area a few times a day. Yes, it may take a few weeks depending on the stage of your wart; however, the painless procedure is worth the results. Plus look at the price! cheapest stuff on the market. No Pain. No Wart. I'll take it!!!
great stuff, and to think it's so cheap! i'm unfortunately prone to getting warts on my hands and feet. i've tried everything from store bought remedies to the full grade freezing at the doctor's. nothing worked for either the plantar or the common warts. i eventually got them burned away by laser. that was a pain! plus we're talking about maybe four a year and i don't always have a lot of pocket change to do that. a common wart on my finger was visibly gone within a week but i still used it for some time afterward to make sure the root was gone too. as for some plantar warts on my feet, i can't really comment on because i'm still in the process of removal. the plantar warts must be rooted a lot deeper, but i'm confident this stuff will do the trick. bottom line is this stuff is great! not dangerous at all. use as needed.buy it!
Okay, so for the skeptics, I will try to keep this short and to the point. I am in the process of using this product. I did not get it from Amazon, I got it at a local CVS. I was looking for the Freeze stuff (I was totally in the dark about wart remover things) and saw that they cost upwards of 16 or more dollars. I decided to go with the stick instead. I have been using it for a few weeks. I applied it to a wart that has been on my finger for a while now, and after maybe a week it started to peel off. I.was.a.mazed. I would rub the edge of the stick around the wart to try to keep it from getting all over my finger (since the wart is fairly small). This has kept the peeling down to a minimum on my good skin. I have let it dry for a while to allow my skin some heal time, but I will continue treatment this week. It really does work (so far, to an extent).
I highly, highly recommend this product! It removed my wart in two weeks (with less-than-consistent usage). I recommend using the isolation method described in another review as a precaution, but I didn't notice any damage to the skin around my former wart. Also, remember to alternate treatment with airing out (if nothing else, letting the wart dry shows you how the treatment is working).
I have tried the wart bandages, the liquid remover as well as the freeze off kinds(do it yourself and at the doctor's office) without any luck getting rid a couple of warts. In a desperate attempt I even took a razor blade and attempted to cut them out. I will never have to try that again. PediFix Wart Stick is amazing. I have not had any issues of redness in the area it's being applied as some of the other reviewers have stated. After using for about 2 weeks, the warts have been shrunken to roughly 1/4 of what they were. I just wish that I had tried this product sooner.
This product makes MAGIC!!! My daugther had a wart for more than 2 years n her hand. I used everything I could find over the counter. I brought her 4 times to her Pediatrician to freez it. Nothing worked until I bought this. The first time she used, 70% of the wart was gone. I only used 5 times and now it is 100% gone. I can't be happier and greatful w this product...
It's been about a month and my wart is almost gone. It's still visible and I've scratched at it like a scab a couple times, but it definitely works. Great product!
I had a stubborn wart on my finger, and I tried everything to make it go away. I tried Compound W Wart Remover bandages, and though I thought my wart was completely removed, it returned a few weeks later. I found this product upon searching for wart remover, and I was desperate, so I just went ahead and tried it.Because it is a stick solid, it is easy to apply exactly where it is needed, instead of using a bandage with a pre-applied remover compound. It took only a few weeks for my wart to be completely deadened, and now you can't even tell that I used to have a terrible wart on my thumb. This product is great!!!!
Way better than most other over the counter products. 40% rather than the typical 17% salicylic acid. And in a semi-dry form which can be used later if needed unlike the liquid products that become useless after opening the container a few times. Very effective even on the stubborn issues. "I didn't really want to write a review on this, but we all have problems from time to time, so I hope this helps."
My son had two plantar warts on his foot. Went to the dermatologist. She froze one, but the other was not a candidate for freezing (since it was right where he puts pressure when he walks, she doesn't freeze those types to avoid the chance of a scar, and said it could feel like he was walking on a pebble for the rest of his life if it scarred). She sent us home with a Wart Stick. Name sounded hoakey, but we used it. She said it will work, but the problem people have is not using it each and every day. We made it a routine and didn't miss but maybe 1-2 nights over three months and they are gone now. It's painless and odorless, no mess, quick, no big deal. Set it by your bed and make it a routine. You'll be happy you did. It was an interesting progression watching those gross things die. It was about $7. Saves you the expense of a doctor's visit.
My dermatologist had frozen off the warts on one of my toes before, but they came back multiple times. I had tried the do-it-yourself freeze off products, too. Nothing worked long-term until I tried the wart stick. It's very important to apply the product to the wart and ONLY the wart. Getting the product on skin around the wart will lead to irritated skin...My only other advice is to apply the wart stick as directed. I used it every morning until my warts went away. They're still gone six months later!
I ordered a two-pack of this item since my 13 year old daughter had a wart on her finger. When I first read in the directions that it may take up to 12 weeks of use, I was thinking a trip to the doctor's office might be a quicker solution. We gave it a try anyway applying it twice a day and covering the area with a band-aid; her wart practically disappeared within 5 days. Great little product and does what it promises.
Worked in just a few days on simple warts and is working on plantar warts. Easy to apply. Shipped fast and affordable.
I like the clean applicator of this medication, rather than the gels/liquids which tend to get gunky quickly. The only drawback is that it appears like a lip balm, so you'll want to keep it kept away safely for young ones and make mention to others who don't look closely at labels. I also like that the percentage of the active ingredient is much higher than other brands. We've only been using it a five days and we're quickly seeing the efficacy of this product.
Edit* Sorry I wrote this while I was a little excited the first time so let me reword it.Anyways. I had tried many other products to remove a wart that was growing on my thumb in a place that was very noticeable. I couldn't even caress my fiances skin without bothering her with it's roughness. This worked when others didn't. It was funny since I had tried everything from burning the wart off to cutting it off and then burning the wound, so that the wart wouldn't come back. That was after I tried too many over the counter meds that didn't work. This worked for me an it might for you. It's awesome that the wart fell off with this product, after it had regrown back so many times in that same year!PS. I mostly used it 3-4 times a day and covered the spot with duct tape, every time.Be careful though, it looks just like chapstik. Your kids might put this in their mouth thinking it is!
I've been using it for about 3 weeks and haven't been very good at remembering to apply it every day but it seems to be working. I'm sure it would work better if I were more consistent.
Very well done. I've been hoping for years that someone would work on documenting motion for artists, and this begins to fit the need. It's short, and it could have offered much more, but it is worth the money.
This is a really fun dvd for beginning dancers. Sarah teaches two very cute dances and her instruction is easy to follow. The section on costuming alone makes this dvd worth the price!
The Turkish Belly dancing is creative and warm. It is like the Arabic belly dancing but has more charm. Sarah Skinner gives you a good idea about the choregraphy and magic of this great art and style.
I really enjoyed this DVD! Sarah does a lovely job teaching two different choreographies and performing them beforehand. I met her in Dayton, OH last year and was very impressed with her dancing and personality.
Think of this as a playlist for an ipod, not a remix album. This is an effort by the band to turn people on to songs that wouldn't necessarily be on your list of dance party tunes; but trust me, at 4 a.m. you'll be singing along at the top of your lungs.
This book is great. The author makes you feel as if you are the heroine of this book. You live and breathe what she goes through. I love when an author sticks to the actually history of the era and does not make things up. Anyway this book was a great read if you like history and love real romance.
I did enjoy this book, but it was very slow moving. It reminded me of a Regency Novel set in America.I didn't feel the description was very accurate, but it was well written and interesting.Personally, I thought Gordon was sort of a jerk.
I have 3 books with PHP and MySql in the cover.Topic by topic I prefer this book's explanations because they are more in depth and more logically developed.
The author covers a great deal on commands and syntax, but the true strength of this title lies in its ability impart an understanding of the logic and numerous concepts behind PHP/MySQL development. I would most recommend this book to those individuals who are comfortable with HTML and CSS, and have at least minimal programming experience. Sharp and dedicated "no-experience" beginners could probably figure things out as they go along, but it would require some effort. I personally think that's a fair trade for a book that will prove itself invaluable to anyone seriously interested in learning PHP/MySQL development.
This book is perfect in every way. I won many singing and instrumental competition because of this book. It's chords are accurate in all of the notes. Thanks The Corrs for the book. You guys always rule!!!!!!
This record is a great example of what roots rock is supposed to be. There is a variety of music on this record from lap steel guitar to electric fiddle - all pleasing to the soul. This is the best of the seven records this group has produced yet. The variety, good rhythm, and sensational lyrics are what make this record great. This includes members of the Bruce Hornsby Band on vocals, organ, and saxophone. This record is excellent and is worth every penny.
I like this watch. It's brightly colored so easy to keep track of when you take it off. I like the strap design as it helps keep it on with accidental bumping while taking on and off dive equipment. The strap can then be changed to a different set up to accommodate non-diving wear. Very versatile. It is also reasonably easy to set it.
Nazim Hikmet's great Epic Poetry is written in simple lines that carry more than they seem. So much about a culture and its human side. Nazim Hikmet, regardless of his politic side, is a humanist that always believed in human beings and wished for the best for those who suffer. Human Landscapes is a masterpiece of his humanist side.
This is a great series, but like most anime, builds to climax near the end of the series. In this DVD there is some action but as usual, not all of the characters have shown themselves yet. So the final battle is not till much later in the series. this dvd still has fighting in it, but you might want to watch the later ones to see the better battles. its a great series and u should watch all the way through in order to get the full effect.
Yes, this is a confusing film in many ways. I'll admit straight off that I am not a Godard film; he lost me completely in his 60's "Socialist" period, but his films were never much on plot or continuity. What makes A Bout de Souffle/Breathless worth seeing is two-fold: Jean-Paul Belmondo and Jean Seberg. They are excellent in working with sometimes-confusing material and I do not believe that many other actors could have pulled this off.
I have a soft spot for any criterion collection DVDs and Breathless surely delivers. The feature film alone would be worth the price, in my opinion. But the special features and the small book with how Goddard viewed his film after its release are what made this purchase so special for me. Although the film was revolutionary for its time, the modern movie goer might be a little bored. Any student of film or the average francophile will fall in love with this piece of cinema history.
This is a great movie,and it was one of the movies which heralded the arrival of "NOUVELLE VAGUE" which used "jump cuts"(Godard used the skill in "A bout de souffle"),"location shooting", "improvised dialogue". Moreover,he used "long shots",so the movie was experimental,and it is still enjoyable now. The story of the movie is still interesting,and see the final scene. I hope DVD edition which will be released on Oct 9 by a notorious studio "Fox Lorber" will be a great edition.
Even though this movie is pivotal, and reflects a time long gone, even though the acting is great, I'm somewhat disappointed...it has aged!
Reprinted by a British firm that specializes in such things, this is a well-written, well-researched book on the Strauss family and other contemporary musician-conductors. Without being pedantic, it provides pertinent [sometimes little-known] facts in a reader-friendly fashion. I hadn't known until recently, for example, that performances of the Waltz King's waltzes and polkas are based on orchestral arrangements of 1- or 2-piano reductions--all the original orchestrations having been lost for years. The only clue that one is reading a high-quality photocopy-based reprint are the very rare check marks and other marginalia that someone forgot to expunge before the copying was done. Well worth the price.
Meet The Authors and Illustrators IIThe book Meet The Authors and Illustrators is a book about writer's and illustrator's lives. This book tells you if they had any trouble writing their books, or drawing the pictures for the books. A good feature of this book is that it shows a picture of the author or illustrator. Adults and children will enjoy reading these authors' stories. I have no dislikes about it. I recommend this book to all readers. A good way to learn fun and interesting facts about your favorite authors and illustrators is to get a copy of this book and indulge in its text.
This Bible is great! Great translation and good size. It's not a pocket Bible, but it's not a giant book, either. It's more like a regular-sized softcover book. And the new chapter introductions are really nice, very informative and useful.
This came exactly the way it was displayed and described online. Convenient for everyday study use as well as taking it out with me. Pretty on the outside and even prettier on the inside because it shows me the Word. The minimal footnotes at the bottom of each page are sufficient.
This play presents an amazing debate on personal autonomy -- our right to do what we will with our own lives. A woman who has felt abandoned, ignored, physically ill and of no particular use to herself or her family spends one last night with her elderly mother as she prepares to kill herself. Her mother tries every method from begging to logic to humor in order to to try to get her to change her mind.The play, presented in real-time, is gripping. Norman is a powerful writer. She creates great, flawed characters and places them in a fishbowl for us to watch as they swim in circles around an issue no one really wants to talk about -- suicide. This play is sure to spark some great discussions, which is what powerful literature ought to do.
I have used this book on helping 1st time hunters on elk, and bison make the shot that will cleanly take the animal. It shows both external and internal views so that you can understand why and where to place your shot. A must have for new and old hunters that want that one shot one kill record.
For anybody who is presently hunting big game and all those who are thinking about it should make this book a must read. It really helps you to understand the anatomy of the animals you are hunting and prepares you to make more of your shots Kill Shots. Excellent reading.
Sharing thoughts, dances, and dining together was only the four-play. They shared something that only very close friends should ever share...and that night brought them closer together. Very sensual, very sexy...and a lot of fun. If you like RSD's, this is a good one for your colleciton. Terry is calling me to the bedroom...she just put in another RSD for a fun-filled Friday night...lucky me.Terry...I'll be coming shortly
Our play hut arrived recently and we haven't been able to get my toddler out of it! For $50 (plus shipping) this set is a BARGAIN! It is super easy to set up and break down and is versatile given the many options for setting it up (some or all of the pieces). I didn't realize the balls were included with the tent and tunnels but my daughter enjoys them most of all! Can't recoommend this item any higher- lots of bang for the buck!
This is easy to set up and surprisingly a large once it is. We bought it for our 2 year old and he loves it. Our 5 year old fits just fine too. I would suggest that you pick up extra 'Fun Balls' the ones that come with it are small diameter and don't really add up to much fun. I purchased 150 3" balls and that fills the floor of the main chamber nicely. Double that and it would be more like a ball pit that your kids can really sink into.
My son loves this playhouse. He was only 12 months when we got this for him and loves going in and out of the house. the only thing i dont like about this item is that its easily knocked down by son. he leans on item and its always tipping over. i have to put heavy blankets to keep it up.its a great playhouse. spends lots of time in it! It also needs more balls. 50 balls is not enough it looks empty!!! if you get this make sure to buy the 150 count of balls to go along with it!
I purchased this as a gift for my grandson's 2nd birthday, knowing that his 4year old brother would be playing with it just as much, so needed something that was big enough to share without causing conflict. The main reason for this particular type of pop-up tent was just that, it pops up. We've had the ones with the poles before and they are such a nuisance to assemble and take apart. These 5 pieces went up in about 8 minutes and were taken down in about 5, you cannot ask more than that. We'll have to see how long they all last, but so far, both boys are having a great time sinking basketballs and pretending whatever it is they pretend. If it lasts just the one season, I'll be happy, everything else is gravy.
I was not so excited about the price but the good reviews on Amazon convinced me to purchase it for my boys. They are 1 and 2. They love it! This set is HUGE. Make sure you have space in your home for something like this. We put it between our two sofas in the living room for now. We plan to move it to their playroom as soon as we do some rearranging in there. The boys have knocked it down playing rough inside the hut. It just pops right back. The setup was super easy. If you don't have a room big enough for the entire play hut then it can easily be setup into two smaller units that are still fun. Great buy. I wished I would have discovered this sooner. This would have really helped out during our snow days and just really cold days when we just didn't leave the house. Also, I plan to take some parts of this unit when we travel this summer.
This house is bigger than i thought it was going to be. it keeps my child entertained for long periods of time. this product came with a few plastic balls but not nearly enough to fill the main hut. i suggest you purchase an extra bag here or at your local wal mart. Overall i love it (not nearly as my daughter does)and i do not regret my decision in buying this product since it keeps the little one busy.
Bought this for my son's 1st birthday; he and his cat love to play in it and knock it over while crawling up the sides. More than once the cat and my son have gotten "stuck" in the ball toss holes but it was too serious to cause me worries. I didn't hook the entire structure together as it is too big for my office but if you are using it outside you should be fine. In the ball pit part, I can't imagine more than two children being able to play at once. The balls don't stay in the ball pit due to the shallow "walls". For us the number that came with was just right since they end up every but in the ball pit.I don't expect it to last more than a year (if I'm lucky two) with how rough they are on it. I'm already seeing fraying and string and it's bent out of shape from being knocked over and jumped on from all directions.Overall, for fun 5 stars but quality only 2.5 stars. (Please keep in it was up everyday and they had access to playing in it all day long).
I believe that I bought this one nearly two years ago and my now 3 year-old son still makes me pull it out of the closet for him to play with. It's not a bad buy even if you have limited room because kids love enclosed areas for some reason and it'll keep them occupied for hours-especially if they have friends over. I have trouble quantiying the educational value of this toy, but I will say that it helped him to trust me even more when I would convince him to go in one end and then I would be at the other end to greet him. It's a solid investment that I wished I had the pleasure of enjoying when I was his age....
very nice tent, that my twin sons always want to play hide and seek with me. they really like to go in and come out of the tent through tunnels. definitely, the ball, that come with this tent are not at all sufficient. and also, we need to be careful, with the kids who are very rash. they can easily drag it. only for the large tent, the bottom has a base. other has empty space on the base. so its not suitable for out doors. but we can use it on the grass or indoors. its suitable for both boys and girls. kids will enjoy when their friends come to play with them. but the price is definitely not resonable.. its very costly compared to other malls
We gave the Megaland Playhut to our one year old on his birthday, he is a little young for it, but we beleive it is the type of thing he can grow into and play with for a long time. We are very impressed with the quality, craftsmanship, and ingenuity of the design. The tunnel system does not feel claustrophobic because they have included cutouts with screens so you can see thru a space and other cutouts that are open. This also allows parents to check up on the child's activities. The only thing we have noticed,it has only been two weeks,if it is windy outside, the Playhut can blow over on it's side.
The Megaland by Playhut is excellent for little folks. It is durable and can take the wear and tear of cowboy and indians, space adventures to the princess in the castle. It has been turned over, stepped on, kicked, pushed around the floor and sat on by my year old son. My five year old and 3 year old have taken it a step further than the baby by making this playland their make-believe area. The balls are awesome because I get to keep them clean and they are very safe. It has been great for rainy days or when we can't get to the park. I have different pieces in different rooms. Since you can add on pieces I am going to invest in more tunnels. But you definately need a big play area when the entire megaland is set up.
My kids age 2 & 4 absolutely love this! It's not bottom heavy so they can easily tip it over while jumping around the inside but so far we haven't had any serious accidents. The balls that come with it really aren't enough to fill enough the ball pit area but that is perfectly OK with me! I really don't like picking up all the balls that get thrown out of it anyways! So in my opinion it's the perfect amount. I have a feeling this is gonna be a favorite for many many months!
My daughter loves this toy! I only pull it out on rainy days... and it keeps her occupied. I did purchase 100 extra balls.
Bought it for our 2-year-old, and our 6-year-old could hardly wait to get his hands on it. Both kids play for hours, and make up all kinds of imaginary scenarios for their tent set-ups. Very compact for putting away... especially considering how big the tents are when they are open. We expect to get many years of play out of these. Durability is still unknown, but we've had another Play-Hut toy for years, and it looks as good as new.
We got this out for our 11-month-old yesterday, and he LOVES IT! He's at the age where he loves exploring and crawling everywhere, so he's fascinated with it. He also is at an age where he likes leaning on and grabbing everything, so the fact that this is so flexible and springs back so easily is a huge plus.My husband keeps saying that he's jealous that he didn't have a toy this cool when he was little. : We both highly recommend this!
I have a 9 month old boy who loves crawling around and walking around. He loves it, and crawling through the tunnels gives him a challenge. Bought seperate balls for the ball pit because the balls that came with it sucked big time they were dinky and awful. The 200 ball pack I bought for like 38 bucks was sooooo worth it! They were big and sturdy! Bottom line this playland is awesome for young babies, but it wouldn't be sturdy enough for a toddler who's tear it down. I can easily get knocked over with how toddlers play. But for a 9-12month old it's perfect.
I bought this playland for my eighteen month old grandson. He loves the ball pit but the tunnel parts do not stay attached very well. He tries to get to the main ball pit with out going through the tunnel pieces. We ended up only attaching one tunnel to the ball pit and he still loves it! Also the small balls that gave with the playland were not enough. We had to purchase another 200 balls to make it a real ball pit!!
We got this for our 18 month old son for Christmas.(Santa had to come early this year).He LOVES it!! It was hard to find a good gift for his age range(or something he does not have). He really likes the ball pit. His 10 year old sister likes to chase him thru the tunnels and play with the hoop. My husband and I are so pleased with how much fun he is having. A very good buy in my opinion!
My two year old son loves this. I bought an extra 100 balls to go in the center/main room. The entire kit is a bit large for my living area, but my son only wants to play in the main compartment where the balls are. He is content to crawl around and throw himself into it for almost an hour straight every day. great toy!
Very cool toy to play with! Love the fact that you can re-connect and re-arrange things easily. My 10 month old was scared to crawl in when it was assembled in one big long piece, but when I broke it up he went nuts! I can see this getting lots of use.Be sure to check the dimensions... this is BIG!
I bought this for my daughter's first birthday and she loves it! She plays with it every day and sometimes brings other toys inside so she can use it as her own little house. While I would give this toy 5 stars because of how much she enjoys it, I have 3 caveats:1. Her older cousins played with it very roughly and were able to rip the fabric above the flaps.2. The balls DO come out of the play hut fairly easily so you will spend a lot of time picking them off the floor.3. The balls included are not sufficient so you do need to buy at least 100 more or plan not to use the balls at all. (That's what I did since I got tired of picking them up)With all that said though, I would purchase this toy again.
My 15 month old enjoys playing in her play tent a little, mostly just crawling through it right now. I think when she gets a little older, she'll enjoy it more. My only complaint about the tents are the velcro tabs that connect the tents to the tunnels and to each other. When you get kids tugging on this very light tent, the tabls can tear. It would be very nice if they made them to connect with zippers.
I bought this for my son's 2nd birthday. He likes it a lot, especially the balls that came with it. The colors are not what is pictured. His playroom is primary colors, red, blue, green & yellow. I was thrilled when I saw the picture that it would work well in his playroom. What I recvd was purple, orange, aqua green and yellow. I was disappointed. The customer/consumer pictures are what you actually receive not those posted on the Toys R Us site. The product overall is easy to put up and seems durable and my 2 year old loves the tunnels and tent. It large so make sure you have plenty of room or only put up a portion of it.
We received the Megaland playset as a gift for our child. It was easy to set up and connect all the parts and has been enjoyed quite a bit. Our concern was with the 50 included balls. After about 10 min of playtime, our childs hands and face were all sorts of colors--FROM THE BALLS! It appears that the color for each ball rubs off with normal use! To make matters worse, the set is made in China and with all the concern about LEAD in the paints with other products, we can't help but be concerned about ink that rubs off on our childs hands and face. The balls were promptly thrown away.
This product is a ton of fun for the kids, HOWEVER, the balls that are included with the product have a dye on them that has rubbed off onto our carpet....I now have blue circle stains on my family room carpet that I am still trying to remove.
This set is great for indoor play. My 20th month old son loves to lay on top of the balls and roll around. It is especially fun when he has friends come over the same age to play in it too. I did purchase the extra balls and believe you could get by with what comes with the set - as I find now they are all over my living room. But either way for the price it will provide countless hours of indoor entertainment.
Came in a (relatively) small package. On opening it found separate collapsible pieces that joined together to make a quite large playarea. As another reviewer had pointed out there are too few balls. Still it is a good buy. My son loves it.
The seams start to pull away and create holes after use since it's made out of simple nylon. Ripstop might have helped. No fixing it though because it's in stretched areas which is the whole thing on this pop up. Also will need to buy more balls doesn't come with enough. Kids love it but don't see it lasting long just isn't durable enough. Owned for 6 months so far one toddler and friends using it.
I own a vintage clothing and costume rental shop. We have created tabs on some of the different era's shown in this book and now it's a perfect reference book for when a customer comes in and needs to dress for a 1903 car show, or a Titanic themed myster dinner party, etc. The drawings were nicely detailed and are even inspiring me to make my own pieces. We didn't need descriptions, just pictures and dates, and that's what you have here. The one draw back was throughout the entire book only fashion from the higher class is depicted. No peasants, middle class or lower status depictions at all. As a costume shop, those would have been helpful to have as well. I still thought this book was well worth the price!
Martha knows whereof she speaks, she is always on the cutting edge of business and people issues. To maximize your human resources capital, buy and devour and digest this book. It puts a perspective back into the management equation that got lost somehow along the way. The adjective in the title of this book says it all: indispenable!
I didn't expect to be overwhelmed by this book, thinking it would be the typical albeit entertaining murder-mystery novel. Instead I encountered an exceedingly well written story with a warm, likeable protagonist and a plot that truly keeps you wondering until the last chapter. After reading this novel, I have since sought out and read all of Lindsey's novels. If you like a good, gory thriller, you have to read this book.
David Lindsey is one of the most underrated authors in the field today. His novels are always intelligent and interesting and most emerge from authentic FBI case histories. MERCY is not so much a routine who-dun-it mystery as an exploration of the psychology of fetishes and sex, particularly kinky sex - that is assuming one doesn't consider masochism, sadism, cross-dressing, and dominatrix luncheons slightly off.There is another story beneath the obvious one and that is the practice of such behavior within the confines of polite society. The "victimes" are upper-class women of a certain type - the country club, suburban, once-a-week therapist type. Lindsey has a real knack for looking at events through the eyes of the disturbed individual, again calling on his real-life experience (FBI profiling).The prose is rich and sweeping, the organization superb, the entire story always a little on edge. This is deeply disturbing novel but an important one.
Nice book, not quite as good as I expected but had some really awesome photos! AC
I bought this book as a gift for a friend, but ended up sharing it with various family before wrapping it up. It was also the hit of the party when it WAS opened. Very entertaining and a book easy to pick up and look at more than once. A hit for golfers or those who enjoy a photo with a message.
Son who is slowed by snow, is enjoying laughter over the pictures. Great for anyone who loves golf or loves someone who does.
Thought this would be a great coffee table book at my place in Myrtle Beach. Was in good shape as described.
This has to be my favorite Christmas story to show children at this very special time of the year. It kept all of my stuidents engaged and at the same time reinforce the true meaning of Christmas.
If you are looking for excercises on how to convey information visually, this is the book for you. The author is of course one of the best at this specific task so you are learning from the best. Don't expect to learn straight "answers" on how to make your graphics, this book is all about thinking about how to make them, but implementing the concepts can definitely vary in your actual work products.
Of all the late 1960s and early 1970s vocal groups, Free Design are the most condusive to remixing.'Not that there are any like this brilliant band. Those funky hooks and jazzy candies the band made, on all their albums, placed them about ten cuts above any other group they may have been racing with.That pays off on this remix album. Free Design are the only band of this kind from the era embraced by modern bands like Stereolab. The popping, grooving basslines and clean voice sheens that made this music work so well also lend themselves extremely well to modern remixes.This music just bursted on its own, and when put in the hands of modern bands and mixers who truely love the Free Design, you get an enhanced take on that explosion of tone color the Design used to stay at the top of their game.There are two volumes of these remixes and both are worth seeking out.
I bought this product as an extra gift for my 6 year old granddaughter. It encourages her to read the questions, which helps improve reading skills. Not only did she enjoy playing with 20Q, but all the adults wanted to play with it too. They were amazed at how good the ball was at guessing the answer.Because of all the fun we shared with 20Q, one of the adults in our party bought one for his grandchildren.
pro's :great fun, portable.con's: hard to read LED except in darkness ,no off button.As soon as I got this toy I started playing it.but then ,I found out that in bright light I could not see the LED so I went in some shade.Now thats just fine except theres no shade indoors!so I found a dull light and used it.But then I brushed the yesbutton and no button would turn it off so I had to play it though.But overall if you have a dull reading light and you are patient, buy this product.
In my opinion, the best toys are those that educate as well as entertain, don't come with a lot of detachable parts that will just get lost or chewed up by the dog, and are small enough and durable enough to travel with. This meets all the criteria, and it's entertaining for adults as well as kids.
When I first saw this toy I didn't think I would like it until I tried it. It is fun!! It's a good fun game for adults. It's funny the things you can come up with and most of the time this game is right!! [...]
This is a very good version of 20 Q with a vast data bank. The only problem I can find is that it can't guess itself as the thing you're thinking of! You can set sound on/off (just beeps); answer yes, no, sometimes, or unknown; and the set speed of the scrolling. When it asks you what type of thing it is, things that are normally vegetable (like "chair" if it's made from wood, "paper", "maple syrup") fall under the "other" category. "Vegetable" only holds vegetables (parsley, spinach...).
Not just for the kids...this thing is smarter than you think. I keep it in my purse to play with while waiting for a table at a restaurant, or waiting anywhere, in the car, RV or at home. The only problem that we encountered was when the sun or light is shining right on it, it is hard to read the screen and sometimes the dots go out, but for the price, it can be easily ignored or replaced. We thought that we could trick it by answering "NO" to everything and seeing what it came up with...and it answered "Nothing!" That was the truth! We did not think of anything. We then tried answering "Yes" to every question and it answered "Everything". This thing is very surprisingly smart. It occasionally does not guess it correctly, but usually it is how the people are answering the questions that determine the outcome.
My brother bought 20Q for my daughter for her 11th birthday. I love the fact that you actually have to read it, it's not just a brainless game. I couldn't believe it guess the things it guessed! (Not just 'bird' but 'turkey' and 'cardinal'!)It got a little creepy after it guessed all the things I was thinking of....! I actually thought it had ears! It has been stumped a couple of times though... Over all a really cool toy for $10 - I'm going to get one for my sister-in-law and her husband for Christmas - they'll love it!
I went to a granddaughter's birthday party today with my wife. The other grandparents were there, other people as well, kids and grownups both. Someone started playing with the Q20 and it passed from one person to another. One of my grandkids thought "toilet" and it guessed right away correctly. This is a great little novelty item. I see that it's out of stock now at Amazon. Backorder it or snatch it up wherever you see it as a stockting stuffer.
Some of the questions are rather lame. "Does it weigh more than a pound of butter?" It is a good timewaster though. Especially for kids on long car trips :).
My whole family is fighting over this gem! Granted, 20Q misses some easy ones, and gets some really hard ones, but it is one of the funnest things I have played in a while. A must have for long trips. My only problem is that it is flimsy.
My friend from school gave me this game because I was really interested in it. This game is so much fun! It knows everything you're thinking of even when you try your hardest to stump it. Sometimes, you do stump it, but if it is an obvious word like "computer," "lamp," or "chair," it automatically knows! I love this game and it never gets old! Some adults like it more than kids do.
If you are sitting at home and watching a television show you have seen 5 times before, pick up the 20Q for hours of fun instead. Whatever is on your mind this little computer guesser can figgure it out. From Lizzard to Poop it is all in here. Give in a try and you will be hooked!
This is a great stocking stuffer. Once you start playing you won't be able to put it down until you stump 20Q!
This game is a lot of fun. I love the smart aleck way it talks to me. Sometimes I stump it. Often the challenge is, "how well did I answer the questions?" Sometimes I replay the game answering questions differently and the "toy" finally gets it right. Fun on many levels. AND...a great gift. I've given 3 so far.
i love this toy. i want it for Christmas.it is so fun and it has an amazing talent. i am hooked on mine now. Were is yours???
I must say this is the funnest toy I have played with in a long time. My son, who is 8 got this toy and he played with it for hours. His Dad and I played with it for hours! We ended up buying the larger version for everyone on our Christmas list, both kids and adults! It takes a very simple game and turns it into hours of amusement. It is amazing! Order one now!!
As long as your child can read, this toy is terrific. It may be a battery drainer, though. The set it came with ran out very fast and we're waiting to see what happens with the new ones. I would expect that if we bought it in a retail store, but not online where, I assume, kids aren't toying with it beforehand.
Afolabi Epega did a great job in his explanation of the 256 Odus. The "western" observation and the introduction written by Philip Neimark could have been left out and the book would have been better off. It is a shame that Oluwo Afolabi Epega is even remotely affiliated with Philip Neimark in this book
Paul Kelly has produced a brilliant album in Under The Sun. It really describes life in Australia from humorous - "Dumb Things" to Joyous "40 Miles To Saturday Night" to sad "To Her Door". The best track on the album for my money is Bradman. Those in the States may not appreciate how much this man is revered in this country. I guess he could be compared to someone like Babe Ruth in baseball. Through his amazing feats on the cricket field, Bradman lifted the spirits of ordinary Australians during the dark days of the depression and the war years. Kelly tells a masterful story in this song. It really does justice to this monumental figure in Australian cricket. Great album - have a listen! You won't be disappointed.
This is a must have CD. Pure, generic, pop-rock at its best.It is a shame that Paul Kelly is not really appreciated in this country. I have been a fan for last ten years and have most of the stuff on good old vinyl.This is strongly recommended for anyone who is willing to understand what Australia and Aussies are really about.
Disney did a good job of incorporating Sterling North's story of "Rascal" into a film. The film version remains close to the book's story. While Rascal is mainly a children's film, it also good for viewers who love animals. The raccoon does a lot of cute things the film has a relatively happy ending.
I actually have the book on which this film is based, and given the constraints of time, the film script follows the book pretty well.Billy Mumy was a well-chosen cast member for the principal role.The film must have been pretty difficult to execute given that an animalis involved with most of the scenes.The film is typical of many of the Disney films which can generate empathyand emotion in the viewer, but do not have any unpleasant scenes disturbing enough to make young viewers cry. It is a very pleasant andsometimes humorous story of youth growing up in a time gone by.
We got this bed for our 2.5 year old. he loves it, sleeps well in it. putting it together was pretty easy, in some places the picture doesn't line up perfectly , but it's not too big of a deal, esp. for the price. It's a pretty sturdy bed, but I wouldn't let my son jump on it.
When I purchased this bed in early January it was only $74.00 + $28.00 in shipping. The bed seems to be good quality. The picture doesn't show that the bed comes with the number 95 that you are supposed to screw into the side of the bed for a 3-d effect. For some reason both sides for our bed had the screw go through the number. It wasn't really a big deal, but something to watch out for. Bed was very close to the size of a crib mattress-which was what I was looking for because I don't have a lot of space. My child loves it though! I got him some cars sheets and he was more than happy to give up his crib for the new baby.
This wooden "car" bed has been a hit with our toddler son. He hasn't had any trouble adjusting to it from a crib, and he hasn't had problems with rolling out of bed. A previous review that I read mentioned that the sides of the bed were hard and/or hurt, but this hasn't been a problem for our son up to this point. We have had the bed for about a month and have had no trouble with it.
My son really enjoys having this bed instead of his convertible crib. It is a very simple product...just 4 pieces of wood connected at their corners. The only gripe I have is that the top edges are very sharp. I wish they're were rounded. Any contact while getting in & out of this bed without being careful may produce skin abrasions.
Enochs books are not quite the depth of character as a Stephanie Lauren or Gaelen Foley - more light hearted and fun. Still this was a good read and kept my interest throughout with lots of great dialog and enough romance to keep a romantic like myself interested. Rafe was the perfect hero, a rake with a heart. And maybe not so much a rake as a man who truly needed a home and a purpose in life. Felicity gave him both - a reason to reform and a wonderful woman to love. You will not be disappointed in this book.
He is a sexy sexy hero. She is the damsel in distress. Of course he intends to sell her ancestral home after winning it in a card game. But in the end loves rules and his wanderlust turns around. It is a witty Regency novel. You'll love it.
I really loved the characters in this book. Rafe is the ultimate rake in this story. He is a wandering second son who doesn't do anything to make anyone happy, but himself of course. So Rafe is sitting in a gaming hall and wins Forton Hall. His big plan is to go sell the estate as soon as he can can get out of England, maybe China? When he gets to Forton Hall he find the estate sadly lacking (totally run to the ground) and what he believes to be thieves. Enter Lis (Felicity) and May who clobbers him over the head with a tea kettle. From there the fireworks start of fly between Lis and Rafe. All you need now is the villian, enter James stage right. This was my only problem with the book ..... we know why James wants Forton Hall, which unfortunately makes the story kind of boring (hence the four stars instead of five).....but all in all this book was great and the passion between Rafe and Lis is incredible.
Doris Day is well featured here in this exellent 3 cd set! What a great budget price. The msuic is exeelnt and the sound quality fine. every Doris Day fan needs to own thsi, you won't find many of these songs elsewhere without having to pay over one hundred dollars for one of the bear box sets. A great Doris Days cd set!!! Full of lot's of rarities and surprises!!!
So you want to start somewhere? Make this your first stop. Paul Kelly is the one artist all Australians will come back to. No matter where you are, or how you feel, the music is timeless. Forget the charts-with more accomplishments than any other he is up there, standing next to 'TheDon'.
For all y'all Americans, PAul Kelly is probably an unknown. That's a pity - he's something very rare and special.It's hard to put a finger on what makes Kelly so good. His voice is distinctive sure, but its not very pretty - or strong for that matter. He play's guitar, even harmonica, but again don't expect anyhtng much other than a few open chords in his songs.It's as a songwriter that Kelly makes his mark. His songs are catchy, often instantly appealing and resonant. They sound familiar. Many remind me of my childhood through the 80's - like old friends.Tracks like "From St Kilda to Kings Cross', 'Before too long', 'Dumb things', 'Too her door' and 'Lover never runs on time' are very special to me for this reason.Kelly dabbles in Rock, Pop, and Folk in this collection. He is convincing and honest. I saw that Kevin Bloody Wilson is outselling him at Amazon.com - that's a crime; this CD deserves so much more.
I read Mad Pursuit in two sitting, thoroughly enjoying Maggie Featherstone who did not let herself sink into the position of agrieved wife. Her own strong characteristics saved her from being the victim and made the story into a easy-to-digest life lesson. We should all have such a magical cast of characters in our lives to help us see our own strengths.
I have really enjoyed reading this book. It is packed full of information. For example there are sections on personality types and problem solving approaches, as well as sections on creating teams from disparate personalities and the challenges of building teams.I found this book thought provoking and a good introduction to a wealth of information on sociology issues in software development. People issues are important in team development of software, and most of us will have to work in teams for a large part of our careers. The bibiography is large, good for following up on topics of particular interest.I don't expect to use everything in the book, but will pick and choose what is appropriate in each particular situation.
this foot pump works fine for low pressure fills. It is a short fill cylinder so it takes a lot of pumps to fill your item, but it is effective. You need to make sure its on a level surface since the 4 feet need to be stable. it is a little wobbly, but if you use it with care it will do the job just fine.
On Amazon user recommendation I bought two WINEGARD SS-3000 from another retailer. They arrived in three days. Very pleased. The unit is larger than I expected, so check the dimensions, but has a streamlined style. The instructions are a bit brief and I had to do some guessing and studying the photo, but it turned out to be easy, provided I was patient. Assembly took only about 20 minutes. My house has aluminum siding and I live in a heavily wooded area, but I get great reception on all possible stations for my area. I have the unit sitting on a windowsill facing out, as this seems to be the best place, but I get as good reception with the unit on top of the TV with the unit facing the window. I unplugged the amplifier as it didn't seem to do anything, but will try using it again occasionally to see if I more stations have become available. The unit is more expensive than some, but I feel the price is worth it.
It did a great job of receiving HD channels, we are 25 miles away from the towers.
Having used a Terk TV antenna in a motor home, for about 12 years, I was very familiar with the product. When I needed an antenna, to replace the "rabbit ears" for the TV, in the kitchen, I saw the possibility of upgrading to a product that would be receptive to the "all digital" broadcasts, when they are introduced. Despite the "ground floor" location, I have not been disappointed in this product and look forward to many years of its use.
I initially purchased the Terk HDTVa antenna, and couldn't pick up a darn thing (see my review under that product). However, with this HDTVLP antenna, it's night and day. I now receive 20 stations from both Baltimore and DC broadcasts (over 50 miles away!) It did take me a number of trials to position the antenna so that I could receive all 20 stations at the same time, but I think I'm finally successful. For me, the Terk HDTVLP worked much better than the Terk HDTVa, like night and day!
I had a Terk indoor/outdoor antenna installed previously. It pulled in most of the available HD channels, but not all of them. I put it in my attic and got the same performance. I set this one up in my living room and it pulls in all of them. And the closer it is to a window the better it works. It's an eye soar sitting here though. I want to see how it works in the attic, but haven't gotten around to getting up there in the summer heat. Since it pulls in signals through windows I don't know if it will work well behind a roof. It's too unsightly in the living room, so if it doesn't work in a hidden spot, I won't continue to use it.
The book is well written and the author has done a great job to keep everything simple to understand even though he's talking about OOP! You'll get a good overview of things you can do with VB.NET, illustrated with good examples.Unfortunately, there is also many little technical mistakes in this book. Most of them might have been caused by the changes between the beta and release version of VB.NET but I have been disapointed to find so many of them! I thought that a book with the name Microsoft on it would be more accurate... It's not the case!
Ever try to make those recipes from home and had to start over. This is a wonderful guide to help you make those meals from St. James and others. Cannot go wrong.
Almost fifty years ago, two rock climbers entered a 'nice little cave' to survey it. They had never gone caving before, and wanted to try it out. Because of their efforts, that cave, Jewel Cave, is today the second longest cave in the US. This book tells the tale in a fluent, easy style that is sure to delight and enjoy. Next to 'The Longest Cave' it is possibly the most enjoyable exploration story about caving around. you will be amazed at the amount of work a small group of people was able to do, from the sometimes tortuous mapping of the cave, to the hard backbreaking labor involved in making a portion of their discovery open for public viewing, as part of Jewel Cave Natl. Monument. A large map comes with the book so you can follow them as they explore the ever expanding labyrynth. The 'Jewel Cave Adventure' is a great book for everyone, whether you are seriously interested in the undergorund or just looking for a darn good read.
What an adventure Jan and Herb Conn experienced! I have had the great experience of actually meeting the Conns in person and they are as delightful to visit with as they are in the book. Anyone who is into speleology should buy this book and relish the fun and science occuring through-out it.
It's quite sad that someone with limited spelling and vocabulary felt the need to write three separate reviews against this book, merely changing the order of the complaint. Clearly, s/he didn't understand it. This book does not merely discuss the fact that Francie had a rough life that she managed to overcome; remember, as she and Neeley discussed the future after their mother remarried, they reminded each other how much fun it had all been along the way. Francie's struggles, analogous to the tree of the title, are what stimulated her young mind. Smith's writing so crisply describes tenement life, but she also gives Francie the credit for making crucial decisions along the way (changing schools, for example), rather than depending on others to think for her. My mother tried to get me to read this book for years, but it is not a book for young children--it took adulthood for me to truly appreciate this wonderful, heartfelt book.
I have to admit that it took a long time for me to get into the story. If I hadn't enjoyed the film and didn't know the story as well as I did from my grandmother, I probably would have stopped around page 100 or so. The first third of the story is centered around the struggles and the shame of being poor. The second third allows the characters some time to blossom and shows the sacrifices families are willing to make to give the children a better chance. The final third shows the first tenous results of those years of sacrifice and at last the characters come into their own. Of course there are also the themes of life lessons learned, family tragedies, and family joy.
AFTER REVIEWING ALL THE GREAT COMMENTS ABOUT THE"TREE" I FIND THAT EVERYTHING I FELT WAS ALREADY EXPRESSED A THOUSAND DIFFERENT WAYS. THE LOVE I FEEL FOR THIS BOOK IS IMEASURABLE. I DISCOVERED IT WHEN I WAS 10 YRS. OLD. I WAS READING A FICTION STORY IN A MAGAZINE, AND THEY MADE REFERENCE TO THAT BK. I AM A VORACIOUS READER AND AT THAT TIME I DID NOT KNOW WHAT BOOKS I WOULD LIKE SO I WAS ALWAYS ON THE LOOKOUT FOR TITLES OF BKS. I HADN'T HEARD BEFORE, AND RUSH TO THE LIBRARY TO CHECK IT OUT. FROM THAT MOMENT ON MY LIFE WAS NEVER THE SAME. FRANCIE TOUCHED MY HEART LIKE NO OTHER CHARACTER HAS. SADLY, THE WOMAN WHO GAVE ME THIS WONDERFUL GIFT HAS LONG BEEN DEAD. GOD BLESS YOU BETTY SMITH FOREVER AND EVER.
A Tree Grows in Brooklyn was a pretty good book. It was about a girl named Francie and she grew up in Brooklyn with her parents and her little brother, Neeley. It was a pretty good book because it showed you steps of growing up; it started out when she was around six or seven years old and all the way up to college. I would probably recommend this book to someone else to read because it was pretty interesting.
I first read this book in the 6th grade. Even then I loved it. I am now in the 10th grade and I have read it 6 times since then. This is my most favorite book in the world. The entire plot is gut wrenching. It's a real page turner. Every time I read it I cry harder then the previous time. It is a long book, but its definatley worth the time.
Well, I started another book on my ninth grade reading list after my dad picked up the book at a store in Halifax, NS. When I saw that the book was 80 years old, I was ready to go searching for the cliff notes. But I decided to go for it thinking it might not be that bad. In the beginnining the story was a bit confusing, but later it began to take shape. So I read it, it was done, went to Brooklyn and realized they had many trees.
I absolutly loved this book. It was so realistic and had me crying so hard by the end. Sarah
I bought this book in the 5th grade and was absolutely mesmerized by it. Over the past 15 years I have read it over and over again and have appreciated it on a different level each time as I, too, have grown-up with the lead character of "Francie". If you have ever wanted to travel in time with your best childhood friend, this novel is one way to experience bustling Brooklyn, New York from the turn of the century through the first World War. I cannot recommend it enough and the movie truly does not do it any justice. A must-read for all ages!
This book is really touching. But for those of you who would rather rent the movie, your missing the point of reading and the plot. Read this book, you'll be sorry if you don't!
I liked the story about an poor, Irish family living in New York in the early part of this century. They had and inspiring sense of survival. It is true that alcoholism was a blight to society even then.
This book was really worth the time spent reading it. I had seen the movie years ago and I knew the book is always better. So I decided to buy it. It was a little too descriptive but the essence of the story makes up for that.Once I started I couldn't stop. Wow!A Tree Grows in Brooklyn (P.S.)If you like to reminisce read it.
I've finally gotten the chance to read this book after many recommendations. It was rather hard to put down, with its compelling plot line, memorable characters, and poignant moments. What I found most interesting was its historic portrayal of Brooklyn as a growing neighborhood and home to European immigrants during the early 20th century -- where the beginning of a developing "American" political and cultural identity affected the lives of those such as our main character, Francie Nolan.
I haven't read a book in 10 years. My New Year's resolution was to read more books and this definitely didn't let me down. The story is well written and provides great insight into the early 1900's Brooklyn.
I hated to have it end. It was a genuine story of American life in the early 20th century, people rising out of poverty.
It's certainly easy to see why this book is a classic. The haunting story of Francie Nolan, a young girl living in poverty in Brooklyn, strikes a chord deep within all of us. Beautifully told, this story draws us into Francie's early-20th century life-her father's drunkenness, her mother's disillusionment with life, her deep love of books- and makes us respond with empathy. This is certainly one of those books that trascends descriptions-it is simply a book about life that has become a classic because of its enduring truths. Betty Smith's strong main character, keen and startlingly truthful observations about life, and stark descriptions make this an unforgettable read-deserving many more than five "stars."
I first read this book when I was around 13 years old, and I have read it over and over again for almost 30 more years. The story is timeless, the writing lucid, the characters unforgettable. It also takes me to a time and a life I never experienced. An absolute must-have for every bookshelf!
A Tree Grows in Brooklyn, which is similar to Angela's Ashes, is a great book. Not only is it very personal and emotional, but it also is a reflection on a society. At times it can be so horribley honest; the descriptions are very blunt. Through the experiences of Francie and many other characters, we get a picture of what life was at that time and place. Francie is surrounded by ignorance and poverty. Some of the scenes she witnesses are not very pleasent (for example, the women who gang up on the girl who has a baby and throw rocks at her). But through it all, Francie manages to have a good time. On the last page of the book, i wanted to cry, which says a lot because i NEVER cry in books.
Wow, this is an excellent example of american historical fiction. I feel as though I am seeing turn of the century Brooklyn through Francie's eyes. If you enjoy fiction with strong characters, details, and bits of history this one is for you. Love it.
As I read this book, I find myself wishing that we valued education as much as the characters in the story. It's a great book, a classic, and one on "the list" of books that I want my kids to read when they are old enough.
I read this book while home from school and ill in 1960. I was 12 and very certainly male. I still remember this vivid, moving, enthalling story while I have forgotten most any details from the usual 'thrillers' that I read in those days.I am not surprised to find that most of the reviewers are female. The central character is a young woman, but her coming of age and coping with the realities of the human condition are pertinent to anyone, anytime.
This book was really moving for me. I read it in 8th grade and still remember it. I especially loved the symbolism of the tree, that was very moving. The characters are very memorable and the language very easy to understand. Some parts get a little tedious but still a great read!
I juts finished reading this book for the first time, and I can tell it is going to be re-read and re-read again and again! The development of the characters and the nuances of the plot make for a brilliant novel, and because this book was originally written in memoir form, the story and characters are completely real and believable. The book unfolds slowly, but never at a boring pace. Everything that happens is fascinating, because it is just the way life really is. This is a MUST-READ for everyone! Possibly the best book I have ever read!
When I was eleven years old I first began reading this wonderful novel. It tells the story of a poor young girl named Francie Nolan who lives in Brooklyn in the earliest years of the Twentieth Century. No work of fiction before or since has to me so captured the wondering observations of a child who lives his life in emotional isolation. The shabby, mean, and colorless streets and tenements of Williamsburg are to Francie a playground of colors, mysteries, and adventures. Francie bears a passionate love for her hopeless, drunken, dreaming father. In contrast, she struggles to love her practical, hardened, and unsentimental mother. This conflict leads to a climax that forces Francie to achieve a balance between the dreams of her father and the practicality of her mother. If you enjoy fiction that allows you to see the world through a child's eyes, this one's for you.
I read this book three years ago, when I was in fifth grade. It seemed to be the world's best book then. Now a little wiser and wider in my knowledge of literature, I see this book as an earnest, honorable book. One thing I loved about this book was how the perspective of the book grew more mature as Francie grew up. It makes this book a 'happening book', and draws its readers well into the book while reading. Another excellent technique that Smith used in the book is the way she made littel events seem so important and glorious, the way it would seem to a little girl. It is a touching, rich book, full of emotion and feelings.
"A Tree Grows in Brooklyn" is my favorite book. All my friends to whom I have described the story are interested in it! I would recommend this book to anyone looking for good reading around the age of 13 or older.
This book is a foundation for all others. The author is a master - she has captured a life and preserved it forever for us with her words -- the life is not that of a stranger or just a randome little girl -- there is a piece of every American whose roots stretch back to poor immigrants. Many, many timeless quotes are seeded throughout the novel. I highly recommend this book to all readers!
This book is so well written that you feel like you are living next door to the Nolans and sharing their life.You hope success finds this family, and smile when it does.I really enjoyed this wonderful classic, and will read it again someday.
I had to read this book for my summer reading before I went to the 9th grade. I thought that it would be a drag reading it because it was so long, but I didn't really take a long finishing the book. I liked this book because it was very realistic. I could fit right in with Francie. Even though the story took place in the early 1900's, I felt that it could've took place today. I felt an instant connection with Francie once I picked up the book
I used this for a book club and it was an excellent choice. I wasn't sure it was going to be a success but the members enjoyed it. There are so many controversial topics and differences in lifestyle from that era to today that it really facilitates great discussions. The questions in the back of the book that are provided for use in book clubs were great.
Knowing only that this book was written a long time ago and has been in print for many decades was all the information that I had. I knew it featured an urban family in 1900 NYC, and my understanding stopped there. One day Audible.com had a "classics" sale and I picked this up and stashed it away on my MP3 player. Eventually I listened. In short orded I double-bought this magnificent novel for my Kindle and read along as I listen. Then I shared my Kindle edition with all my friends and family, who were equally impressed. There is no stopping this book. I delivers history like no textbook ever will, and human insight, depth and drama, that no film ever could.
Although this book was intriguing and interesting, there were a few things I didn't like about it. For me, it didn't get that interesting until half way through the book. Also, there seemed to be many irrelevant details and characters. I still enjoyed reading it as it had a unique plot and kept me interested.
I enjoyed re-reading this book with my book group and discussing the life of that time in a place we all know well.
Written in the third person, this certainly is Francie's story. The reader gets drawn into the poverty culture of the immigrants of Brooklyn during the years prior to WWI. The characteristics of the tree matches the strengths of the women especially Francie, her mother, Aunts and grandmother. It is a well written story, although perhaps a bit sterotypical. A story of courage and determination. A good read.
This is an incredibly amazing novel...which i believe is actually an autobiography of the author. In "A Tree Grows In Brooklyn," the reader is taken through an incredible path of the main character, Francie Nolan's life. From the death of her father, to her assult in a dark hallway, to this amazing girl supporting herself into college, this book finely illustrates the transition from girl to woman. This story takes the reader back to a childs perspective, and also helps one to remember to take time to appreciate the smaller things in life.
As a lifetime voracious reader, I'm not sure how all this time has passed without me having read this wonderful book. Any novel that can captivate me for 500 pages has got to be something extra special, and this one did. It has everything you want in a novel, great writing, superb characters, humor, sadness, joy and pain. I loved every word. There is really nothing more to be said, if you have not read this book you are truly missing out on something magical.
The book arrived in a timely fashion. It is in very good condition with only minor stains on the edges of the pages.
I read this book for history and curiosity, I discovered our lost pride as a society in self reliance and perserverance without government or charity handouts no matter how poor. It's a lesson for all of us today, told in wonderful prose and unvarnished detail.
This is a beautiful book. I have loved it for 20+ years and read it more than 20 times. Every time, it is as if I become a part of Francie. She is a daughter, a niece, a younger sister, the neighbor, the friend....she is so real to me. Look beyond the poverty to the wealth, beyond the filth to the clean heart, beyond the wrongness to all that turns out right, all because of Francie's strength of character. This is a story that may be over 50 years old, but is just as new as if it were written yesterday.
I did enjoy this book, but at some parts I felt the author could have done without. Some places have too many details and over explain; I got it the first time....the book is about a family, focusing on Francie as she grows up in Brooklyn, beginning in 1912. pre WWI. It's about loss of innocence in many ways, the harsh cruelty of life and the sacrifices that must be made, and the downfall of Francie's mind after a tragedy, dealing with her emotions, not being favoured by her mother and finding herself through the experiences of her life, her job and war. Francie triumphs in the end,and how she gets there is incredible and will leave you feeling like you've a diary of someone who had it harder than you and you will feel better and more confident about yourself and finding the strength to accomplish your goals no matter the hardships that come your way.
This book changed my life. Betty Smith has become my favorite author and inspired me to read regularly again. The characters will help young women to learn to accept themselves and understand their feelings. I highly recommend this book along with all of her other books, especially Joy in the Morning.
Although I have not finished this novel yet, I believe that it is an excellent novel for young readers. The novel describes the life of a young girl names Francie very well. I believe the novel is very hard to put down. It makes me want to keep going on. This is a great novel for anyone.
I think that this book is very good, and the descrptions are very elaborate. Very interesting book. I enjoyed reading it.
A Tree Grows In Brooklyn is a classic. It's a story about a strong, brave, loving, girl growing up in the rough city of Brookly. If you're looking for a book to read, or even a summer reading book, this is a definite choice. Everyone you has read this book has liked it. The author wrote this book in a way that you can understand everything clearly. This is one book you must read!
I was assigned this book for a college English class. After reading the first chapter I was hooked. I couldn't put it down. I recommended it to all of my friends. Betty Smith brought Francis and the whole family to life for me. They tugged at my heart and showed me what my greatgrandparetns may have gone through. Thus helped me to connect with relatives I never knew and better understand what their children had to endure. The srtugle and the determination is strengthening. You beleive that what ever hardship you are going through it isn't as bad and you can make it.
When I read "A Tree Grows in Brooklyn" I found that you experience all emotions in it. One time you could be sad, or one time you could be happy. One time you could be so mad that you wanted to put down the book and one time you could be proud of the characters. No matter what, "A Tree Grows in Brooklyn" is a very good book for all ages.
The book came in on time it is in really good shape and is so cool. I got it as a gift for my mother and she is going to love it.
This book is very nice, I do not have the "Can't put it down" syndrome but I often find myself thinking about the Characters and where I think the story is going so I like it because it is not making me stay up ridiculously late to finish it but I do keep thinking about it so I'm happy!
I keep my favorite 100 books on a shelf next to my computer. After reading this touching, bold, honest biography, I had to bump another book to find a place on my shelf for Smith's gem. It is one of my all-time favorites. R.K. Tipton
This was a surprising selection for my book club. I had seen the movie years ago and thought it okay. The book describes a period of growing up in difficult times with wonderful use of words and descriptive phrases not dated at all. This is, yet again, a case of the original book being much better than the movie! It is well worth a visit.
I read "Joy In The Morning" as a teen, but this one just didn't make my reading list until now, in my 40s. What a great book. I had just finished reading Angela's Ashes and I'd thought, that even though the books are 60 years apart, and one was written by a man about a boy, and the other by a woman about a girl, they were quite similar.They both drew me in and held me. It's incredible to me when an author can touch on something as unpleasant as poverty but not weigh you down and depress you with it. You aren't horrified by it and unable to finish it, and you aren't gobbling it up for morbid thrills as if staring as you pass by the scene of an accident. You come to admire the characters, and dread the last page.This is one that will always be on my shelf.
The Square Pegs sound great in this absolutely wonderful selection of songs, many from the 1920's (my favorite era). The group blends well together and the harmonies are not forced.I especially appreciate their version of Paul Whiteman's hit, "Whispering." Tea for Two and "A Cuppa Coffee" are superb, as is the well-loved classic, "Lida Rose."I do not sing barbershop, so my expertise is limited (though I attend the annual concert in my town), but as a listener I am well satisfied with this CD.
Review Clarification: This review is based on my viewing of this movie in the theater, and on Laser Disc. I have not viewed the DVD (any version).This is my favorite Clint Eastwood movie of all time, better than all the Dirty Harry, Spaghetti Western, and Sci-Fi/Space movies.I first viewed this movie in the theater, and I was completely blown away. I am disappointed that John Malkovich has chosen not to be in more mainstream movies, because I immediately wanted to see everything he was in, after watching this movie. (I immediately rented "Being John Malkovich" when it became available, and was quite disappointed when he was not the protagonist.) John plays a brilliant Psycho in this movie, and plays it very well. In fact, I actually changed my image of him after this movie. If I were to see him on the street, this is the only memory I would have of him.I recommend this movie highly. One of my favorites.MC White said: Check it out!!!
This is one of my favorite albums from my childhood. A real classic.
My two year old son loves the climber we can not get him off it he would play there all day if he could. It is easy to put together it only take around two hours.
I kept this shirt for three years. It was extremely soft and comfortable and I used it as a night shirt. I did not use it for work or events at all.
I am using this shirt for over a year now and its still running good. For the price, this shirt is too good. The quality is comparable to some of the branded ones present in the market.
I bought this CD having previously purchased Nick Kemp's spoken word CDs. The music on this CD takes you on a deeply relaxing journey and is ideal for anyone who wants to destress or simply likes ambient trance style music!
This book is a complete study guide that fits the needs of engineers as well as those of newcomers to the field. Its most important feature is the way the author allows students with a little background in mathematics to go through all the topics presented without getting lost or discouraged. The purpose is achieved with a simple but efficient strategy: an easy to follow level is the main body of the book and a lot of examples provide the reader with all the tools necesary to grasp the basics. The higher level material (advanced mathematics) is therefore not indispensable to actually understand Image Enhancement, Image Restoration, Preparation for Automatic Vision, and a little bit of Image Compression.
All Torey Hayden`s books are fascinating. Easy reading for the layman, no fancy psychological terms. Excellent reading. What an incredible psychologist and writer. I have read every book she has written and would read any new ones.
im an adult now but i act like a kid because of my mental illness. i can relate to ladbrooke (not acohal mind u but the illness in my brain. torey helps the children and ladbrooke. she had an inicent about her. i disagree about leslie. I think she was really austic and couldnt help the way she acted. because people cant see the disability they wonder why we act the way we do. its not leslie and geraldines faught. geraldine grew up in a war torn country for gods sake so what can u expect?! she was only a child. so dont put them down. the book was good i want to know what happened to these children, especally geraldene. chin up girl!!
I've been a fan of this show for so many years and when I found out it was on box set I know I had to have it. I only like the seasons with Rob Estes and Mitzi Kapture and all I need now is season five but I can seem to find out when it is going to be released. I guess I will just have to wait and see!!!
This is the best silk season ever!! Except for them killing off the greatest guy ever! It has lots of passion and chemistry.
The t-shirt was perfect for when my nephew went to the hospital to see his little sister for the first time! It was soft, comfy, and adorable! The shirt was shipped and recieved very fast!!
I picked this because I like the colors to match the baby sister outfit I had bought. My son is a small 8 yr old and fits in small-medium size 7-8 shirts. I picked the medium because I read other reviews saying it runs small. Well the medium says 10-12 on the tag. I really wish they would of put that in for sizes instead of me guessing. I'm going to let him grow into it. That's the only reason I give it a 4. The quality of the shirt is good although he hasn't worn it yet.
Just got the book and couldn't put it down! The combination of writing personality, practical tips and Stephanie's personal story of tragedy and triumph make this a must-have book.
Stephanie's personal story is a great read and full of tools to produce the results you want in your life and business. Stephanie tells it like it is and writes just like she speaks and, if you have met Stephanie, you know this is delightful. You really shouldn't miss this if you are searching to improve your business results. Most of all, enjoy!
I can't believe some of the ratings I've read on this book that were Negative! This is an abosolute fantastic book, the photographs are superb, the rooms are fantastic! This is one of the best design books I have seen before. I wish that more were this colorful and diverse in its presentations! Thanks for allowing me to review this wonderful publication.
Interrogation TechniquesOreste Pinto's "Spy Catcher" is about the art of catching and interrogating spies and special forces operators as practiced by a Dutch expert who worked for the British during World War II. In the first chapter, the author lists the qualities of the ideal counter-spy. Chapter two, deals with the extraction of information from suspects without using physical force to retrieve the information. The next eight chapters deal with actual cases and the author's role in them. In the eleventh and final chapter the author stresses the importance of perfecting our counter-intelligence procedures. This work is a highly interesting and readable book on a complicated art and science of interrogation.
Totally loved this movie. It was funny, sad and crazy too. Parker Poesy, Demi Moore, and Rip Torn are fabulous!
[NOTE: The product listing is in error. The label should be listed as Columbia/Sony.]I have several Doris Day CD's, all of them spectacular. This one is quickly overtaking Day By Day/Day By Night (on Collectables) as my favorite. Doris cannot disappoint; there is not a dud in her entire song catalog. This CD is a "2 on 1" Sony import (from the UK, I think). These hi-fidelity stereophonic recordings both sound great - no gripes - they sound like they could have even been recorded yesterday! Doris sings flawlessly, as always. Even the most casual listener will enjoy these albums; for Doris fans they are required equipment.This is now out of print and hard to find. If you come across it in the used CD store, BUY IT AT ALL COSTS!!!! I came across it in a second hand CD store in Madison, WI recently for 1/5 of the current used price here at Amazon.
I have tried every halter on the market and this is probably the best. It is not the easiest to use, but once you get the hang of it, it is pretty easy. The cons: The sherpa sleeves ride up and down so I stitched them in place. The cord has become twisted and it is hard to move the slider thing up and down. Overall, it is pretty good. It help one of my dogs a lot; the other, unfortunately, only a prong collar will work on her.
I love this group, saw them in England in 2005, going to see them summer of 2007! Outstanding live performance, both are gifted musicians. Miranda that sings with them now is talented as well. Their songs are about real issues and towns and villages in the West Country, but you can relate to them even if you aren't from their. I play their music in the car and house and my kids can sing along to just about every song. - sorry, but most radio station songs are all about sex and conquests, enough of that garbage. Give me 3 folk singers in a pub near Wells any day!!!
This book offers a delicious blend of isolation, survivalism and the undead. A satisfying selection of character personalities that paint a perfectly hopeless situation.Not for those who like fast paced, shoot em up zombie thrillers. Some are upset with dialogue, whereas I feel it keeps with the bleak tone of the book.A very satisfying beginning to a series that looks extremely promising.
This is the first zombie book I've read. A fan of the Walking Dead, I wanted a story with some substance about the catastrophe and its after effects. I wanted a story about the people and how they figure out how to survive. I did not necessarily want a macho, violent story about ripping apart the zombies. I got it in Autumn. It's a good book, not a great one. The story is intense and leads to a great climactic ending. I was ready for book 2, which I'm working on now. It seems even better than the first. So it appears this first book is a warm up to an ever improving story and improving writing.
This was my first taste of Mr. Moody's writting. I am now a devout fan of his books. This is a book that should not be passed up by people who like zombie/apocolyptic books.
Moody's book takes place in the UK and has a different set of the typical Romeo zombie. The characters are built up very well, and the reader can feel the tension, not only with the zombie, but between the survivalists as well. I think that Moody did a lot of research to make this book as realistic as possible. The only reason it did not get five stars was because I thought the book was a little slow in the middle section.
Unlike his American counterparts, Mr. Moody doesn't go for the cranial shotgun blast style of zombie horror. His protagonists aren't heroes. They are socially awkward, chronically depressed and in a state of deep shock following the biblical disaster that has befallen the planet. This is the most realistic plague tale that I have read to date. A great book and I look forward to reading the rest of the series.
So far, this is my favorite post-apocalyptic series. It is truly POST the apocalypse. Ths is what I enjoy: finding out what comes next. This series is inventive and well-written. if you stick through to the end of the series you will feel great satisfaction if the post-apocalypse is something you enjoy reading about. This series has just the right balance of zombie, zombie explanation, zombie science and survival. Some authors waste too much time explaining how we got here. This book offers us just enough explanation to enjoy the story of what comes next.
The shoe rack is good. It looks nice and easy to assemble. It is also easy to adjust according to the shoe sizes.I have couple of concerns. One - As other people have mentioned, it is not very easy to put on the big shoes. It is very comfortable to put in my kids and my wife shoes. However, when I hang my shoes, I have literally squeeze them in. Second - When you put all the shoes, you will see the back of the shoes for the ones hanging on the front. The pictures never show the tree with all the shoes filled in, so I never realized that it does not look as beautiful as shown in the pictures.
The rotating shoe rack is easy to assemble and very sturdy. While it easily holds 18 pairs of women's shoes, it cannot hold that many d/t the size of men's shoes. Got the clutter off the floor, though. I highly recommend it.
Does well unless you have huge feet (unfortunatly thats me) then a little care in which shoes go where is needed. It is a pain to put together.
The shoe tree is a gift. All I know is that it came in a box with a picture of a shoe tree on it.
The assembly is very easy to adjust. It's not too heavy to carry to one place or another. I like how it has a rotating action to it.I actually have a plastic shopping bag hung around the handlers to put trash in; so I can say it's pretty sturdy. Just don't be too rough with it, it's fragile. Overall, it's a good product.
I have tried many different ways to store my very large array of shoes and this product is the best. It holds many shoes and takes up very little space in my closet. This is actually the second time I have purchased the shoe tree as I decided I needed another one for my other closet. It is very easy to find the shoes I need as the rack revolves and displays all of the shoes nicely. One can adjust the different tiers to accommodate different styles of shoes - pumps, flats, flip flops and varying heights of heels. Easy to keep clean and the base is solid. I have tried other brands [ from Bed, Bath & Beyond] but they were flimsy and the entire tree kept falling over as the base was not solid enough, so buyers beware of these cheap imitations! I definitely recommend this product- get a few!
I was a bit skeptical at first. I have had the item for about a month now. It is very sturdy. No problems at all whatsoever. I wish I would have bought two of them. My boyfriend uses it for his shoes too...and he has gigantic feet size 10.5 or 11. Perfect for little kids shoes. Only thing that wouldnt work with it would be boots. Love this product. Highly recommend it. Easy to assemble as well.
Overall, I am pleased with this product. It was easy to assemble and I like that I can spin it to find the right pair of shoes.Cons:1. I think that it is a bit too big, I wold probably get the 3 tier if I re-order again. But that is my fault for not taking this into consideration when I purchased it.2. The prongs/spikes that hold the shoes are just a little bit too close. I wear size 7 (Women's) shoes, and I can comfortably place 4 pair (not 6 pair) per rack. This is because they are a little too close and the shoes become crowded if all the prongs are used. So I actually can only effectively use this for 12 pairs of shoes.But overall, I am happy with this product.
This shoe tree is amazing. It is really built well and even with 24 pairs of shoes on it - no tipping over!!! I love shoes and this shoe tree makes them all available and in sight. You will be very happy with the selection of this shoe tree!
This is a great solution for storing a lot of shoes in a small space. Good sturdy construction and easy to put together. It cleaned my shoe closet up big time.
Works well and organized great - may have to buy another one since I have tons of shoes
It is nice to have found a 4 tier tree to stack the shoes vertically - I have lots of ladies heels and the spacing seems to be sufficient between the tiers. I don't revolve the rack that much, but when I do, it seems to be very fluid. I have it standing on carpet and it does have enough stability that I am comfortable with - no problem. I think this is a great tree that allows me to keep way too many shoes!
I have a pretty small room and this shoe tree helps me maximise space.Its weight is a good advantage because I stack more than 24 shoes on it.Great product,cant wait to move into a bigger house so I can buy a bigger one
I bought this to replace my over the door shoe organizer. I hated those plastic pockets holding dust and dirt, and they were causing some shoes to lose their shape. I put this shoe tree together myself in about 20 minutes. It saves floor space by organizing the shoes vertically, each tier spins, the shoes hang great without being squished inside a pocket, and the whole thing can be moved out of the way if needed. Great shoe storage option!
Not much to say, does exactly what it's supposed to and does it perfectly. Would definitely recommend this!
The unhappy reviewer has a point; this ramen is in no way spicy or Szechuan-like. However, it makes a great meal base, or eaten alone provided you spice it up yourself. Plus I can finally eat my favorite food without studiously avoiding the nutritional content label. Way more expensive than typical ramen, but then you pay more to avoid a coronary.
I own both the SRF-M70 and this new SRF-M75PM. This updated version offers an auto scanning tuner that automatically seeks out the next available station. This is especially useful when your traveling and have no idea what's on the dial. The only problem I've had with this unit is the hatch cover for the batteries, keeps falling off. I ended up taping it in place with some electrical tape. Except for this minor inconvenience, the new radio would have gotten 5 Stars in my rating.
I enjoyed completely all the chapters of this miniseries, it was thrilling. I didn't expect what happens at the end. The performances from all the actors are great. I wasn't desapointed at all. I wanted to watch it before I'll go to the movies to watch the version of this story in Rusell's Crow new movie with the same title. I am very satisfied with the adquisition of this DVD.
Although we struggled with the Manchester accent, this didn't deter us from really, really enjoying the miniseries. The acting was great and the plot moved quickly. We spent a lot of time discussing the events and trying to unravel the whys and wherefores. That's what a good movie is all about. The character Dominic was a bit overdone because he started out as a sort of comical feature of the story but as it moved on he became a pathetic victim. The writers could have improved this aspect of the story. Bill Nighy, however, was fantastic.This is another keeper but to be lent out to friends.
Let's face it, the BBC puts American TV to absolute shame. While US TV continues to crank out a potpourri of lowest common denominator claptrap, the BBC produces quality, exciting, very well written and acted productions, such as State of Play. It's worth every penny! And while you're at it, check out The State Within too. Another fantastic effort from the BBC.
I bought this from Amazon in July. Unfortunately, I only opened it last week to find out it was a defective on the first disk. It played the first and third episodes perfectly but the second episode had 20 minutes of skipping. Amazon has absolutely no way of reporting this after your window of return has expired. So buyer beware. If you are slow to view your DVD's you can be screwed. I have always had good luck with Amazon until now.The series is excellent and quite intriguing until the end. I enjoyed it despite the skipping in the middle.
Very intriguing British mystery. Thoroughly enjoyed it but I must admit I had to use English subtitles since some of the accents were pretty heavy. I recommend it.
Item was as described or better, arrived very quickly, professionally packed. Recommended. Great UK Mini-series!
Action, suspense, politics, social commentary, great writing, great characters, great acting- there's nothing to dislike here.Any recounting of the plot would spoil the pleasures of watching it all unfold for the first time. And the pleasures hold up on repeated viweings- I've watched this 4 times in the last year.I highly recommend this DVD- and though I've not seen the truncated and Americanized remake, I know it can't compare to the original. So watch this one!
This is simply one of the best shows I have seen, and I have seen quite a few. It is long but I wanted it to be even longer. Top notch stuff here!
I purchased this astronaut to use on my son's 1st birthday cake. It turned out to be the perfect addition to the cake. The figure is very small, measuring about 2.75 inches but he actually appears a little smaller. My boys love playing with the figure. Very cute and very sturdy!
Rimsky Korsakov is one of the greatest composers of Western music, but to many, just his orchestration knowledge is enough to study for a lifetime. That is the case with me. Dover scores are simply the best asset to anyone learning composition/orchestration. They may have printing errors or articulation inconsistencies, but that is ok, because you probably won't be using these scores to conduct a real concert program, I would hope. The three pieces provided in this book are masterpieces of comp and orchestration, and have endless learning potential. You have the Bach, Brahms, and Beethoven, now its time to get into the wonderful world of Rimsky Korsakov. Anyone can get something out of this score, and for the affordable price, its the best deal of them all.
Live the smell of this perfume, I always get lots of complements when I where it. It's hard to find in the stores and this is a great price and fast shipping.
Its exactly written the way the Mr.. Ryder has i his very smal tarot book that came with my tarot cards. Large print and easy to interprit
I bought it for my husband and he loves it. I love it more than him though cause I like beef ball park hotdogs. I used to make my hot dogs grilled over charcole, or if I was lazy, boiled..but not anymore. This thing cooks my hot dogs plump and warms my buns in less that 5-10mins..no pun intended LOL. I recommend buying this if you like hot dogs as much as I do.Oh, not to mention the fact that you can clean this thing in as little as 3-5 mins. The turning grill comes off with a small tug to pull it up and nothing sticks to it. Also there is a tray where the fat falls which comes off much like the buttom of a toaster where the crums fall...you just pull it out and wash it with soup and hot water, dry it up and put it up...easy easy easy, I can't tell you enough how easy this thing really is :)
I love this product. This is my 2nd one because the gears stripped on the first one. I like it so much I hunted around until I found one I could afford. I'm hoping this one will last longer.
My wife and I were very surprised on how quickly we received this product. We love this hot dog grill and us it all the time. It is also very easy to clean. We would highly recomment this seller and this product.
The Voice Alert System 6 works great until you have to change the battery. For some reason the system does not realize that the battery has been changed, os it still gives you a warning. But this is a great product.
Soldered circuit boards? In 2011?Per instructions I mounted it high on a garage at 7.5 feet. We have wind right now and no false alerts.So, although I was taken aback by the 20+ year old technology, if it works, it works.So far, it does.The base unit does look like something you found in your mom's basement, though.Expensive, but the cheap ones never worked. I like the voice record, less jarring than an electronic alert.
I have had dogs for over 20 years, and after having to have my last one euthanized, I wanted to have some type of alert to warn me of visitors or intruders as my drive-way is pretty long and obscured from the street. After tweeking the wireless sensor transmitter (ie. false alarms, deer, birds, etc.)I have found that this wireless annunciator is very useful and practical. The instructions are very clear and easy set-up.
I've used the Voice Alert System for about a month now. It works good but does false trigger some. I've tried moving the sensor and adjusting the sensivitity and it has helped. I may just need to tweak it a little more. It has never failed to trigger when someone has entered the area, which is the important part. I don't know that I would hook it to a siren but I'm very happy with the system. Instructions that come with the unit are very good but where a little unclear about how to hook up the external devices to be trigged. I plan to add a light to be activialed in the warehouse for night. I did buy an extra sensor for the driveway and some of the false alerts there are casued by birds flying in front of the sensor. It's a good 120' away and the base unit is inside a brick building in an interior room (2 walls). It picks up all traffic in the drive. Good system for the money.
My 3 year old autistic son learned to say "I love you" because these words are repeated on every page with a different noun; for example "I love you, sun" then "I love you, sheep". It's MY favorite children's book (and now his, too), so he heard me read these words a hundred times. BRAVO! to Ms. Pandell for having the foresight to write such a simple, fascinating, and educational book!
This is Gordon Lightfoot and folk music at its best.If I could only have one of Lighfoot's albums, this would be it.
We bought this and the farm one like it for a long road trip (because we didn't want to have to pick up or lose missing pieces along the way), and my three-year-old loved it. Even better, 12 month old loved it too, and I had expected it to be a little too advanced for him. Now, four months later, it barely looks used and it still gets lots o' loving!
Excellent value for abrading and stripping nonskid fiberglass deck surfaces to prep for painting. Bristles held together for years of abuse and left no rust stains. However, there was a dark gray residue that we cleaned off with solvents or soap and water to ensure good paint adhseion.
In the continuing saga of ex-SEAL Mike Harmon, he gets mixed up in the mid-European sex trade. Serious damage ensues, to the bad guys of course. The places where the action occurs are unusual, and the basic premise is attractive. Who can hate a man who can out-fight and out-bedroom James Bond? Mature readers only.
I bought an Advance Reader Copy from the publisher. I actually liked this one better than the first one (Ghost) which had a few hackneyed cliches. (co-eds interested in BDSM? Gasp! How shocking! NOT!) This one focused on moving the private, sheltered militia group out and about in the 'modern' world, which was fun. Plus, it addressed human trafficking, which is a good issue (and one in which Might Makes Right ... Just Makes Sense) ;) Remember, This Is Not Science Fiction, exactly. Just a teensy bit of alternative history (in the same vein as the Belisarius series, but not the same time period) along with some men's Action Adventure and perhaps the funniest part, sex scenes written by a man. (Or, at least, from the male's perspective.) All in all, a good read if you're looking for something different from average sci-fi, and you like to vicariously kick butt.
Choosers of the Slain is a decent book and a slightly new departure for the Paladin of Shadows series, as Mike takes to tracking a stolen womam through the western European white slave trade with the aid of a squad of his Keldara retrainers. The core store is sound and like the second book, it is a single story rather then three short stories the way the first book was. As with the other two books in the series, there are some fairly graphic sex scenes - a bit too much for my personal tastes as it happens - and lots of guns, violence, and women. Overall I enjoyed the book a great deal, but I do have to say that it wasn't as good as either the first or second book of the series.
I'm an avid embroiderer, always looking for the perfect design to embellish a cardigan or pillowtop. McCallum's collection offers plenty of ideas and serves as a springboard for some of my own. I imagine this would be an equally essential tool for many other types of hobbyists. This one is nice just to leaf through, too -- it's very well arranged. I'm tempted to order his other books right away, but there's plenty to work with right here.
I really love this release. Short, yes, but it is very VERY good, the one CD of theirs which I play the most.VERY recommended.
I am amazed how the brain functions are configured to work the way they do. Also, the DVD gives us a clear view of this powerful organ which coordinates the entire body interactions. Moreover, I cannot understand how the big-bang theory, or evolution could attribute the complex design of the brain to random selection, evolution, adaptation or similar views.
Interesting look at the brain and some of the unusual disorders which can occur in it. You can't help but to be drawn in by some of the first-hand stories of reinforced non-recognition of the familiar ("everything here has been replaced by an exact duplicate"), phantom pain from amputated limbs and blind eyes that see. The discussion by Dr. Ramachandran of these cases is absorbing and the computer animation showing what is going on in the brain is very helpful. Well worth watching!
A very interesting look at the human brain. Gives you some interesting theories on how the brain re-routes itself to make good on missing limbs and brain damage due to car accidents. Insightful, but semi-repetitive. Worth seeing though!
I use this DVD as an intro to brain disorders in my high school anatomy and physiology course. It really drives home the idea that we learn more and more about the brain every day from patients who have suffered brain injuries. Interesting and the perfect length for viewing and discussion. Highly recommended.
The Hollywood dinner club scene of the 1940's is well-represented with these recordings (probably done for radio), with seven songs from the Desi Arnaz Orchestra and seven from the Chico Marx Orchestra. A delight to hear! Chico even does one of his famous piano routines on "Beer Barrel Polka"! Desi was the first to bring the Latin beat (congas) to Hollywood Big Bands -- ahead of his time with "World Music"! This is a time capsule of the era, the sound, the fun.
I actually came across this disc because I enjoy the sound of vibes, and was asking friends for the name of an artist who is known for playing the instrument. I found out that in the jazz world, where vibes are most frequently used, Bobby Hutcherson was the preeminent name. Well recorded vibes are a sinfully rich aural treat, especially on a good sound system, unfortunately the music played on them, which is often modern "smooth jazz" is enough to lull you to sleep. That may be OK for background music, but if you want to hear creative and energetic interplay- not to mention Bobby's virtuosity with the instrument, I highly recommend this disc. It was made with I believe cuban musiscians, and is rich with sexy Latin rythmns. The various percussion instruments add a great variety to the sound. This is a disc I would recommend not only for it's musical content, but also for the pure pleasure of the rich sound of the recording. Treat yourself- you won't be disappointed!
I have been fighting dry cracked heels for years.Mine have gotten so bad that they crack open and feel like I'm walking on a nail with every step. I have tried tons of different creams to try to alleviate the painful cracking and this stuff works by far the best of any I have tried in the past. I use it with the Visco-GEL Heel-So-Smooth Heel Sleeves which I got on Amazon too. Together they are awesome!! Don't know if the cream works as well by itself because it works so well with the Visco-Gel sleeves I haven't tried it any other way.
I have cracked,dry skin on the heels of my feet..This cream was soothing,but I have to use it morning and night in order to feel results.If I skip a day ,the skin is dry again.I must use it on a regular basis..
Well written, and realistic. Thomas is a well-meaning but rather tactless environmentalist. His brother Peter is more concerned about Thomas making a fool out of himself than trying to fix the situation. Just like in real life, there are no easy solutions but there are plenty of alibis and irrational negotiations from politicians ("If you'll just take back what you said..."). The only friend Thomas really has is the reader.
Still being many years since this book was written by Henrik Ibsen, the subject covered is very relevant. I loved reading it again after a couple of decades since previous time.
This book is definitely not the most exciting book in the world. Enemy of the People has a specific point, a message it is trying to reveal. Dr. Stockmann loses the support of his entire town after finding out that the local baths are contaminated. Just to make things worse, his brother, Peter, is mayor and actually manipulates the situation to turn the press against him. This play shows how the majority is often wrong and, more importantly, that the strongest man is the one who can stand alone. What made this book lose a star is that, in fact, the first act takes a lot to finish because it appears to be so boring. I may have put this book away if I didn't have to read it. However the book quickly improves and, although it is never exciting, it is interesting.
I bought this album last fall and loved it, but wanted to wait a while before posting a review. Hsving listened to it countless times since then...I truly believe this is a masterpiece. The previous reviews are right on the money about how imaginatively eclectic the mix of styles is, and Tom Maxwell does a superb job of fitting the various pieces together into a unified musical statement. It's hard to conceive of an album where, for instance, the deep baritone voices of the Remember When soul singers and the playful high cabaret-style female voices sound at home together, but he makes it work here. Taken as a whole, the CD has a richness reminiscent of an extremely good soundtrack album, like a soundtrack to the best David Lynch or Coen Brothers movie never made. I wholeheartedly look forward to Tom's next release.
I normally hate horror spoofs, but this movie made me laugh. The suspence is great and the plot does not get off the subject like most spoofs. This movie can be viewed by the whole family (YES, EVEN THE KIDS CAN SEE IT), because there is no nudity or bad language. Buy it today!
What child has never gone into her parent's candy cupboard and snitched a few bites of a special treat before it was time?This is the story of just such a "mouse." For several weeks before Pessach, Sarah managed to ignore the labels on the boxes of special Passover goodies that her mother had labeled just for her benefit--"For Passover. Do Not Touch."But at last, the sign and the boxes were too much for her, and she took the long skinny box of after-dinner mints, and next broke off a piece of chocolate covered matzoh. She had eaten all but one piece.The seder was very fine that year, but when the time came to open the door to welcome Elijah the prophet, Sarah's father asked the children to search for their Afikomen, they found it, and were rewarded with books. Finally it was time for treats.The last eight pages of this fine 29-page story reveal a secret about Sarah and her family that every Matzoh Mouse needs to hear.--- Alyssa A. Lappen
I liked it. I'm trying to get all of the collection. These books keep me entertained when im passing time.
I enjoy all of the books I've listened to by Kathy Reichs. I've even accidentally bought 2 of them twic by mistake. If I find any more new ones, they will be on my shopping list.
This is the second novel in the Temperance Brennan series. Supposedly, because it's winter, work should be slow. Unfortunately for Temperance, it is not. She has a nun to identify and a house of burned bodies in Canada, and mysterious deaths in Charlotte. Not to mention that she has classes to teach, and a somewhat difficult sister to deal with. Still highly entertaining, and I really enjoyed the addition of some sociology elements to the story. A lot of similarities to the first one though and it all seemed to tie up a little too easily for me. All in all however very entertaining and I will definitely continue to read this series.
I got hooked on the storyline despite the repellant descriptions of decaying bodies and maggots. Kept wondering what the main character, Tempe Brennan, looked like. No description ever given. All the loose ends were tied up at the end, except how Ryan knew about Brennan's mugging. A recommended alternative to Patricia Cromwell's Kay Scarpetta, whose plots and charaterizations are getting weaker and weaker.
As riveting as "The Triumph and the Glory" or "Cryptonomicon", Kathleen Reichs' "Death du Jour" takes up where Patricia Cornwell left off several books ago. The heiress to Cornwall's abandoned readers, Reichs pulls out all the stops in Death du Jour, weaving an intriguing yarn impossible not to enjoy. I loved it.
just finished "Death du jour and all i can stay is move over Cornwall, Reichs is here. what a read. read her first book "Deja Dead, it was great but she is getting better. this is the kind of book to read on a hot day to cool down. can't wait to find out more aboutTempe and her cat, Birdie.
This book is not bad, but it needs a little more work. She has a good start on her characters, but they need a little more work so that they have more depth or something as they seem a little superficial. Maybe it is because I have read and enjoyed so many of Patricia Cornwell's books and, as they are both about a woman who is in forensics or pathology, I unconsciously compare them and I shouldn't because they are very different heroines.The book is about a woman who splits her time between Canada and North Carolina who examines dead bodies. A lot of the story has been told by the other reviewers so I won't go into too much detail except to say that she looks into the death of a century old woman that nuns want to make into a saint and many mysterious deaths that are extremely gory. It keeps you on your toes and is packed full of murder and hayhem.
I really like Reich's style. The fact that she's a real life forensic anthropoligist gives great credence to her work. I've read all 3 of her books and each is just as interesting as the previous.I hope to read more about her undercover friend in future publications. Just like Kay Scarpetta, she needs a social life!
This book went more in depth with the character of Tempe Brennan. It allowed the reader to see and feel the murders through Tempe's eyes and to understand that she is not a cold, unfeeling character, rather she intensely feels for each of the victims in the crimes she is working on.
This is the first mystery novel I've read, an I really enjoyed it. I already got the next book to read.
I am a forensic mystery junkie. Love Scarpetta and Lincoln Rhymes, never miss CSI, and am fast becoming a fan of forensic anthropologist Tempe Brennan. Death du Jour is the second book in this series. The characterization of Tempe is fleshed out a bit more in this book, as we learn more of her personal life. We meet her sister Harry, her daughter Katy is a bit more visible and Tempe looks to have a love interest. But the main draw is the forensics, and we get a lot of it in this book. Flies, pupua, beetles, bones, entrance and exit wounds, etc., etc., it is laid on in almost every chapter. Although the cult storyline is a little far fetched, I read this book in one sitting, longing to have all the connections tied up. Looking forward to the next case, Deadly Decisions.
This story started off as all of Kathy Reichs do and as I got further into it the more intriguing it be came and I still could not work out who the Leader was until near the end.Again an excellent novel that I could not put down.
I really liked this book and I love the main character of Tempe Brennan. The characters are well drawn and multi-dimensional and I loved all of the tidbits about forensics and anthropology. The locations were rich in detail and I felt like I was there. My only complaint about this book was that I had every single plot point figured out a good 30-50 pages before Tempe did. There wasn't a single thing in this book that surprised me. But it was still an enjoyable read and even if I knew that going in, I would still read it.
The product was actually in better condition than described, arrived before the promised delivery date. I will use this bookseller again.
This book will keep you on the edge ok your seat right up until the very last page!!!!
I was very excited to finally get to read Death Du Jour, and while I wasn't disappointed, I was expecting more. The setting and the crimes were great, wonderfully thought out with great descriptions, but I felt the story lacked the emotional depth that Deja Dead had. But I did read Death du Jour all in one sitting, so that says something about the quality!
The book was in good condition even though it was used. It is out of publication, which is the only reason I had to purchase a used library book. The only disappointing thing is that it took so long to come to me. I ordered it on June 9 and it arrived around the first of July, much too long for shipment.
I truly believe that this is the only book you need to read. It has all the concepts, theories about the story. Densly written and every sentence has concept, theory in it. Starts with the history of cosmology and continues with Cosmological Models, Origin of Galaxies, theory of Galaxy formations and star formations and future of the Universe. Inflation and other theories are all covered to the extend that space allows. What I liked most in this book is that it covers everything and you do not need to read ten books to get the idea complete. For more technical oriented person, book has Mathematical section at the end describing the concepts with formulas. Author always gives brief description of concepts and usually he explains any conclusion with reasons so that if you can not derive the conclusion by yourself there is the reason.This book together with Kip Throne's beautiful book on Black Holes will make it complete.
I have loved this album ever since I was 12 years old (37 now). It has a very solid classic Gordon Lightfoot style and yet I feel it is showcases some of the best lyrics that Gordon ever put to paper. The album is a bit less rocky than it's predecessor "Salute".... It carries a bit more of a folky tone, with a dash of Steel Guitar, played awesomely by Pee Wee Charles...very laid back and smooth. It is a great CD to just sit back and watch the leaves fall from the trees on an autumn day. Gordon fans from Michigan, Ontario, or Quebec will feel right at home with this CD, I recommend track 4 "On the High Seas". Salut Mes Amis
This album was released in 1980 and was available on vinyl and cassette until CD's took over about ten years later. Since then you simply couldn't get this album! How frustrating! Because it is quite simply a fine Gordon Lightfoot album. I, in fact, had to buy a record player a few years ago just to be able to hear my LP again. I don't understand why Gordon's albums of the early 1980's, this one included, are often written off as somehow inferior. I don't like every song on "Dream Street Rose", but the first six songs I like very, very much. "On The High Seas", for example, is a song nobody knows, but I am very much moved by the sadness in both the lyrics and musical arrangement. You can probably tell that I am no professional music critic, but I know what I like. Gordon's rich voice and beautiful melodies make this purchase an essential one. Now, if they can only get to work on releasing "Shadows" on CD.......
I 've always liked this release for the following tracks: Ghosts of Cape Horn and Make Way for The Lady. The others are fine too with the sole clunker being the wretched The Auctioneer which is so out of place here. If I want to hear that nonsense, I'll go to a cattle auction. Originally a digital recording, it suffered from tape hiss which is odd for digital(the early days of)recording. The hiss is gone but the recording still doesn't sound right to my ears particularly the vocals. Suprisingly, this is a very short disc clocking in at a paltry 33.50. Another entire release could have easiliy fit on the remainder of the disc. I hate when labels cheat the consumer in that fashion. So be it, still worthwhile for some very good tracks. 10 tracks/full lyrics/33.50.
Previous reviews state false advertising because of the 360 degree movement, and the fact that you cant move into and out of the background. That is a truly ignorant comment because if you would notice that on a flat 2d plane there are 360 degrees. moving in all dimensions would actually be about 129600 degrees (360degrees * 360degrees). Also, while there may not be as many moves as other games, and the combo system is limited, you have to realize the strategy involved in the fighting system. You have to take advantage of other characters' flaws and time your projectiles. You have to lead characters with your projectiles and manage your psi. Limited moves are made up for with the strategic elements. However, some characters are overly cheap (Setsuna) which somewhat detract from the experience. All in all, this is a great game if you take the time to learn more about it.
I love this, it is the only battery I use with my camcorder. This has helped me out a lot. If you have a canon camcorder and use it a lot, get this battery. It works great.
Love the way the English language was made readable without destroying the historical content. You really get the idea of what really happened.
The book binding is in the opposite direction of the pages!! I'm trying not to let it detract from the content of the book.
It is one of my all time favourites. A definate keeper if you love stories about soldiers, Navy Seals etc. An interesting approach to combine the fantasy in written letters with the reality of the characters.
The first episode has Akito beeing rescued on the moon (shades of episode 8) but thats not the coolest part on the tape. The best part is when we actually get to see what the Jovians look like in the second episode. And they are........HUMAN! What the heck is going on? What will he reveal? Is he different from us? AHHHHHHH! I'm confused! ADV HURRY UP AND RELEASE VOL. 8 OF NADESICO!
Asimov fan for over 30yrs., and never been able to find this book! Not only got it at a GREAT price, but was also in near-new condition! Idle thought to check for it on Amazon turned into a long-time wish fulfillment! THANX!!!
This must be one of the most imaginary and brilliant books ever written. Not only exciting to read, but also an excellent plot, especially for all the fans of the complete works of Asimov.
This book fulfilled my expectations of a grand finale for the Foundation series. I was captivated by Trevize's journey back to Earth; exploring planets that Asimov had written about in previous novels. The parallels of R. Daneel, Gaia, and God were very imaginative and intriquing. This was one of the more enjoyable Asimov novels to read.
My introduction to Isaac Asimov was to read the first 5 Foundation novels. This one seemed to tie up all loose ends (unlike to culmination of Arthur C. Clarke's Rama series). All through the book I was anxious for the return to Earth, to see what really had transpired. Various characters throughout the series had said things like "why would you want to go there, everyone knows it's radioactive?" Well I for one refused to believe it. I loved the way that the one behind everything to do with the Foundation was not Hari Seldon as we thought but none other than Daneel. The reasons for all that he did were fascinating.My only regret is that Mr. Asimov decided to work on unnecessary pre-quels to the Foundation story rather than start a new series that takes place after this book. Perhaps some of the brilliant scifi writers that have been successful capturing Mar. Asimov's style in other Foundation and Robot spin-offs, may be able to complete the task.
Two of Frankie Laine's great albums with Johnny Williams are reissued on one disc- to excellent effect! Although the arrangements and style of these 60s albums resemble Laine's and William's work on "Hell Bent for Leather," in this case the songs are not cowboy songs, but, in the case of "Dueces Wild," gambling songs, and, in the case of "The Call of the Wild," klondike-adventure songs. No popular singer has ever explored this rough and ready terrain with Frankie Laine's success, and it's a thrill to hear him charge through such masculine songs as "Call of the Wild" and "Roving Gambler." Even songs that had proved major hits for other artists are remade in Laine's image: Johnny Horton's "North to Alaska" comes to mind. Some may find these selections and arrangements trite and old-fashioned- and they are- but the sheer strength and passion exhibited here is hard to dislike.
Phantasmagoria is a fun game for anyone who wants to wander a big mansion, find secret tunnels, and figure out why your husband is going insane. You learn some good life lessions in this game, the first being ALWAYS look at the giant house your going to buy BEFORE you buy it. [Trents daughter]
This book is great for those of us who may have spent many years bent over a desk, & are looking for practical, easy to follow tips on how to straighten ourselves up, & to alleviate that mild lower back pain from being just a touch out of allignment.The writing style is easy to read & understand, & so are the exercise descriptions. The exercises are also very easy to do (as opposed to some posture books, where the descriptions are hard to follow, & just not practical).My lower back is feeling a lot better thanks to the tips for stretching & standing up straight in this book.
I teach Key Stage 3 (Grades 6-8), Key Stage 4 (Grade 9) and IGSCE science. I use this book regularly. Most of my students are ESL students and the book is an effective supplement to class texts for its concise topic presentation and its easy to follow graphics.
I prefer to read the work with all of its crossovers contained, but Infinity Gauntlet completely stands the test of time. Starlin created a masterpiece. he handles all of these characters with aplomb, and you can feel your heart racing as the climax is reached. The only drawback is that George Perez did not draw the entire series.
I enjoyed this piece as I'm a Thanos fan. The ending was great, with good reasoning...not one of those "you're forced to believe it" endings. I enjoyed the cast of characters, although there wasn't much devlopement shown except within the core characters. If you enjoy anything on the cover, you should really like this book. All in all I loved it.
The Good: The artwork and paneling is beautiful - George Perez and Ron Lim have done a top job! I esp. liked the sequence where Captain America, Silver Surfer and Warlock attempt to steal the infinity gems from Thanos. The story and dialogs are also nicely done.The Bad: I found the ending a little confusing and anti-climactic but that may be because I am not familiar with characters such as Warlock and Thanos. Also the artwork on some of the fullpage drawings appears very faint - I don't know if this is true for all copies or my bad luck.Overall a good buy.
I've been wanting to read this for some time and I've to say I wasn't dissapointed. I sat down and read this in one shot; to give you an idea how engrossed I was. The story moves really well, they did a great job of juggling huge list of characters and using them appropriately.That being said, it does have it problems. If you are reading this as a standalone, then some of the characters may/may not be familiar. There was a few that I knew by name, but really knew nothing about (Cloak and Adam Warlock are good examples of this). The art is also not my cup of tea either. I grew up reading comics of this era and wasn't a fan of it then - color in what's important and leave the rest b/w. Be as that may, the book itself is as well put together and as well printed as anything coming out now.
As something of a comic book aficionado, I have to say this has always been and continues to be my favorite comic mini-series of all time. Well written, compelling and engrossing this is a must read. `nuff said!
For many readers of the Honorverse expecting lots of swashbuckling combat, the Ram Rebellion will NOT be their cup of tea. But if you enjoy getting into the nitty-gritty of an alternative history and finding out what is REALLY happening behind the scenes and in odd, but crucial places, then the Ram Rebellion will keep you turning the pages. As Eric Flint himself has said, real history is messy. And 17th century Germany has tons of complications to make the 163x universe very messy indeed.
I don't really like wearing my wedding/engagement rings on a daily basis. I'm always doing something with my hands, at the gym etc that the rings make me feel uncomfortable and I needlessly worry about whether the diamonds would drop off or I'd lose them.I bought this ring off Amazon.com as it was a cheap version of what my wedding band looked like. I have used this for the past 1 year and trust me, it's been through a lot. It still looks great! It's comfortable, no maintenance, low stress, negligible investment and it looks great. No one knows it's not my real wedding band!It really does serve my purpose. I would recommend this ring to anyone who would like something affordable for everyday use but doesn't come off like it came out of a 3rd grader's jewelry box. Quality product.
This is a really pretty ring for a nice price.It shines a lot and seems to be very well made.The only think I don't like on it is that it says MADE IN CHINA in the inside.I would be a little ashamed if I would buy this ring for a gift.
I am very happy with this purchase. It is just as described - maybe better. It is a very comfortable ring, has just the right amount of sparkle, looks just like the picture, and saves me having to get my real wedding band sized for now as this one looks almost as good! Thanks!
This little ring is worn regularly and has fared well. No stones have fallen out, it's kept it's sparkle with little cleaning and my mom's friend, who is a jeweler, commented on how well made this ring is when taking a quick look at it. I write this review about a year (or more) after having bought this item, so highly recommend it.The only thing that prevented me buying another one and from giving it 5 stars is that I am very put off by the stamp inside the ring that reads ... Made In China! ...
I loved this ring when I first got it. It gives off a great look, but now it seems a bit faded away/washed out.
I have a gemological certification and have spent a number of years in the high end jewelry industry. I was looking for an eternity band to wear while traveling, afraid to wear my own diamond eternity band abroad. This affordable sterling and cubic zirconia eternity band is far more realistic and beautiful, than I had anticipated. If you're looking for an affordable eternity band, whether it is to replace your own for travel/security reasons, or if you are looking for an eternity band unable to afford real diamonds set in white gold or platinum, for yourself or the one you love, then this ring is perfect.In addition, the ring arrived with a beautiful ring box, as nice as any ring box I've ever seen working in the high end jewlery industry, making it perfect for gift giving.
After having a lot of trouble finding a wedding band for my small ring finger, I decided on this one. This is the 4th ring I've tried. It fits nicely and looks fine with my small diamond solitaire. Has a good amount of sparkle but definitely doesn't look expensive. Don't let anyone look too closely!
I like this ring. Inexpensive, but doesn't look it. Delivery was prompt. I probably should've gotten a slightly smaller size, but that's okay. Fits in with all my other shinies.
We like movies about moonshinning and bad guys and then there's comedy like the dog and romance. then this all happens with all the water.
Feet smell goes away fast after wearing tennis shoes or hiking boots for long days. Gets rid of itching and sensitive spots from shoe rubbing are not bothered by the soap. Strong smell- not really good or bad to me.
I purchased this product because I was going camping and spending time at the beach. Knowing that things live in the woods and sand that are very fungal and like human skin I figured I would be on the proactive side of the attack this time. It has been wonderful. I knew it had tee tree oil in it but was pleasantly surprised with the Coconut, Olive and Peppermint oils. This product attacked a fungus I did not even know I had but can guess I got it from the local pool too. I now use it after every time I am in public spaces, especially the watery kind.
This product was not as "tingly" as some others, but did provide solid anti-fungal protection while I was traveling. I think that the product does what it says, but it's hard to truly quantify it since I was using it in conjunction with other products.
Worked well on itch. Its certainly no miracle cure. Like other reviews say you have to use it everyday. I will probably buy this again.
I recommend this product to whomever like to feel the cleanness and freshness on your feet. I am a very active person and I tried many products but nothing like this one. 100% recommended
This stuff is great! Not only does it smell good, it feels great and lathers up nicely.Oh and it is doing wonders for my feet, which have a history of being dry n flaky and not super awesome to look at.With any luck, and the continued use of this, my feetsies shall once again see the public light of day!
My boyfriend had suffered from terrible athlete's foot for years when I met him. I've made it a mission to help cure it. He said he's been to doctors numerous times and it never improves. His feet are red, cracked, peeling and insanely itchy. The shower always hurts his feet and makes them itch more.After buying a few products from the store (lotions, etc) and not showing any improvement I started looking online which led me to this stuff. The product smells a little funky (the whole bathroom will smell like it after he uses it) but it has really helped. He's nowhere near cured but the cracking has stopped (his skin hasn't split in awhile), the redness has gone down and they don't itch near as much. We're pleased with the results.More recently we've also started bleaching his feet which sounds crazy but does help!
I think it's working, my skin feels way better when I shower with this. It seems to help with athletes foot.
Feet feel refreshed and moisturized. Cleaner feeling than soap. Toe fungus has dramatically improved. I would highly recommend this product to anyone for extremely clean feet.
I bought this product for my granddaughter to try on her eczema. It helped with her itching. I also tried as a body wash. As a women going through menopause, there are places you tend to sweat wear you never sweated before. I was noticing an unpleasant odor and tried different things to help get rid of that. This product smells funny, but it rinses off. I no longer have the odor.
Didn't cure my athlete's foot like others claimed but it does seem to clean deeper than regular soap. A worthwhile investment.
It's a good product and I don't regret buying it. I think it had a beneficial result on my son's skin. It indeed smells with specific odor, but this is not a problem for us.Thanks!
its a nice product. leaves you feeling clean and fresh , but the price is a bit outrages for the amount you get. (over a dollar an oz). i might pay 7 or 8 bucks for 13 ounces but 15 ? no thanks. 30 dollars every month or so for soap doesn't fit my budget. i gave it 4 stars for the product alone , but it certainly isn't a good deal.
I use this on my feet every time I shower. This really does work. If you are skeptical at first I suggest you buy the 6oz bottle. Once you see that it works, buy the 13.5oz bottle. This is a good purchase if you are embarrassed of showing your feet to people.
I bought it but my daughter loved it so much it disappeared. She said it made her acne much better!We also loved the scent.
If you get past the smell, this is a great shampoo to get rid of fungal skin problems in your hair. The smell is quite strong, but it seems to really help, so that is what is important.
My husband has developed a case of Tinea Versicolor in the last couple of years. Last fall, it got really bad, it was all over his chest and shoulders and was spreading up his neck. I found this product on Amazon and read a ton of reviews. I thought this would help him, or at the very least not make it worse. Unfortunately, it didn't have any affect on my husband, but... in one of the reviews someone commented that their daughter took their bottle because it worked on their acne. I have adult onset cystic acne and it had exploded on my face recently, so I thought, "Why not" so I tried a little on my face and thank goodness. It helped calm my face way back down. It didn't happen overnight, but consistent use with my regular regiment really got it under control. So at least this product worked for one of us.
I like this product, it works pretty well for Tinea Versicolor, just give it time. After a week of treatment, my skin was already returning to normal, which is good, cause I don't have the time or money to see a doctor.
About 15 years ago, I found an article in a comic book advertising Star Blazers on video. I was excited at the prospect of watching my favorite animated series all over again. However, when I got the tapes I found the picture was very dark. I had to adjust the bright and contrast on the tv and even then it was not a perfect picture(my videos were made by Kidmark, INC.). While this occured on the entire "Quest for Iscandar" series, the next two series, "The Comet Empire" and "The Bolar Wars" were normal. I did acquire a tape of the original movie "Space Cruiser Yamato"-which the Quest for Iscandar series is based on for American audiences- so I at least had a good picture, but it had a drawback too since I don't understand Japanese. Now that I got the first dvd of "Quest for Iscandar", I am happy that I have a very clear picture. To all who read this-and to those who may have experienced my problems with the videos-I recommend this dvd.
I ordered this DVD with the expectation that it'd be an amusing return to childhood diversions of getting up early to watch Star Blazers before school. I was pleasantly surprised how well it translated to DVD and how well the story held up. No, it's not a work of genius, and I had hoped for some "DVD special features", but it was everything I expected and then some.
I loved this series as a child and still find the plot interesting. However, the science is a bad, snow on Mars etc. If you can overlook this the story is great. No DVD extras other than chapter search. They make up for this in the second DVD with a scene cut from the original Japanese series, character bios and better navagation. Not the best DVD production, but at least someone is putting this classic series on DVD. A must it you loved the series as a child or for your own children.
I just bought album a few hours ago, and have listened to it and have to say that it is great. I've been a fan of Gj for a while, and this album is beyond what I expected. I went into this album with an open mind, not looking for another "Siberian Kiss" or the next "Piano", I was listening to this as if I had never heard GlassJAw before, and I loved it. The songs on this album are wonderful, all as melodic as the can be angry, and beautifully written. I recommend this album to many people, but especially GlassJAw fans, because it's new material with a bit of EYEWTKAS blended with new emotion and matured writting skills. Go buy it, you won't be disappointed.
This is a very good album. It took me a few listens to get into it, but now I find myself listening to the album in its entirety 15 to 20 a day.
I liked EYEWTKAS not for the lyrics (which I actually thought were sub-par), but for the interesting musical soundscapes the rest of the band created. This CD is even better in that sense. From the first five seconds, in which a guitar riff moves from one speaker to another, you know that you are in for a musical odyssey of heavy riffs, frantic drumming, and frequent change within songs, a journey that increasingly few bands can take you on nowadays. Probably the best description of this work would be "Dillinger Escape Plan goes emo." If you like complex, intense rock with frequent tempo changes, get this CD right now. The only songs I don't like are "Cosmopolitan Bloodloss" and "Ape Dos Mil," the first two singles. Oh well, maybe they'll get some emo kids to stop listening to their other music... and get some taste.
After hearing this album for the first time, I was both stunned and blown away, not just by the music but how much glassjaw has evolved. They went from angst filled screaming desires to a more positive anger and more flow with the music. Right when this album starts, you will automatically get pulled into the music and whether you like it or not, you will be shown all the capabilites that glassjaw has. From Daryl's vocals to Larry's drumming, everything has changed but for the better. It's amazing just to hear how much Daryl's voice has changed. This album is definitely not a disappointment and I have had it in my stereo everyday since I've got it. It's impossible to put down and hopefully their next album will be the same way. Great job guys.
I read the Transall Saga by Gary Paulsen. I have read many other books by him , and so far this is my favorite. I gave it a four star rating because it is really interesting, has realistic characters, but lacks good description. The plot is really exciting and I loved the ending. The characters had realistic personalities that were easy to identify. it lacked good description, though, for the other senses besides sight. It is a good blend of a sci-fi and a survival story. I would recommend it to anyone older than 13 that likes these genres of writing.
I rated this book four stars because I think that they should have made a second one or they should have made this one longer. It is a very adventurous book. So if you like adventurous books read this one.
I have not enjoyed a book in a long time as much as I have with this one. The story is great, how the author describes everything with great detail that makes you feel as though you are there with the kid. It does start a little slow, but it gets so deep and amazing the more it you read it. The end, was a great ending to a book. I highly recommend this book to any age, but I do feel its for the younger audiance, but it'll prove a great read for anyone that likes adventure books.
My opinion on this book is that it is one of the best books that is have ever read out of this series. Yes, Brians Winter is a good book in all but Transall Saga blows it out of the water. With the time traveling and how he has to learn a hole different way of life and speak a hole differnt language it really cool. Beacause of all the changes and every thing that goes on between Mark and the other tribes it is really differnt type of book that i have read. This book i would recommend for people from the 5th grade to all the way to my grade(8th). All and all this is one of the best book I have ever read, and hopefully you will ever read.
This book is really good. Oce you get past the begining you won't want to put it down. It was a survival-science fiction. I had never read anything like it before.
This book is not the usual Gary Paulsen book. But it is the best one of his I have ever read. It is about a boy who loves the nature, and hits the jackpot when his parents let him go backpacking across the Magruder Missile Range.He finds a mysterious blue light. When he aproaches it it transports him to another world. He struggles to get back to his parents. At first he does not think he will survive and get back to his parents. But his journeys show that he is more than skillfull to survive this world. At times he forgets what is importantand struggles to get back on track. It is a very good book about a boy and his struggle to get back to his family.
I thought this book was a very good book. It had elements of fantasy, but it also delt with survival. I liked many of the characters and their personalities. The events were interesting, but the book was sort of slow between them. The ending was ok, but I think that the author needed to elaborate more on what happened when he first returned. There was nothing about his parent's reaction. Overall, I think I'd recommend this book to anyone who likes adventure.
My boyfriend gave me this book with the words, "I read this when I was in like, 8th grade, and loved it. But don't think it's a kids book...just read it, okay?" I was skeptical but so glad he finally coaxed me into starting. This book is GREAT. The characterization is excellent, there's a perfect amount of side characters, description of the world, action, to keep everything flowing but you're still engaged in the thing. Really, a great book; I'd recommend it especially if you have a tween boy who you want to coax into reading. The only complaint I have is the ending--the last fifty pages, at least--felt really rushed and I was conflicted over the ending. That's not to say it isn't suitable for the book, because it's a perfect ending, but it's because you're so invested... well, you'll see, because you just HAVE to read it.
This book is about a boy that's on a solo camping trip. When he sees a blue light, he walks to it. Then a rattlesnake bites him,and he falls back into the light. Then he finds himself in what seems to be another time on another planet. Now he must survive and find the blue light again in a world that he has no clue about. On his quest, he lerns some shocking things about earth.When I read the Transall Saga by Gary Paulsen , I just could not put it down. I thought it was so cool. I read it in one day--that's 248 pages! If you like books that have adventure, I think you will like this book. I think this was the coolest book I ever read.
Wow!This book was excellent,I don't think there's one part I disliked.I would rate this book with 5 stars because it was outstanding how Gary Paulsen matched the characters with what they feel.I liked how Mark was able to survive in another culture ,after being transported from the desert in a blue light to another planet in another time.I really liked how Mark became a very important member(a warrior) of the Tsook.I thought it was a little weird though, how Mark fell in love with the cheif's daughter,Megaan, from the Tsook, rather then the slave that he had known from when he first got there.I was suprised at how many people turned against Mark and wanted to be the one to stop the outlander.If you like science ficton and mystery, this is the book for you.
First, if you have not read this book you have to read it, you are hooked from chapter 1. It would be great if Gary Paulsen wrote a sequel like brian's winter. What if the blue light never came and he had to make a life living on the new planet earth. I think a sequel to this book would be as great as the Hatchet sequels. Please send responses to this.
Charles Reasoner has designed a whole series of these interactive sliding books. All of them will probably have to be read with your child since the sliding feature is simply too hard to them to work. Each pages describes the action of a particular bug and then asks which bug does such and such. In all of his books, the animals are hidden between the page (which you are supposed to pull apart to reveal the animal). If your child was to look at it alone, he would simply be viewing pages of scenery. The bugs also look very cartoonish and don't entirely resemble what they are supposed to be. Having said this, I don't regret the purchase and recommend this book - with some reservations.
Burke is one of my favorite authors, I have read everything he writes, I am now rereading some of my old favorites on Kindle and I would highly recommend this to readers who appreciate great "visual" writers who put you "on the scene", Burkes books are dark, violent, moody with great indepth character studies, unexpected plot twists, eccentric but believable personalities, and dialogue that is brilliant.
James Lee Burke is my favorite author and once again he didn't disappoint. I have read all of his work and recently traveled to New Orleans and found it like it had been described in his novels. Its like I had been there before. I consider him the best writer in his field. His character development is uncanny. He can't publish them fast enough for me.
This book is great. This is a fantasy novel that does not involve a quest, is self-contained, and the CHARACTERS are the most important element--not the quest. The only probelem is that the story takes awhile to move forward. However, you don't really notice because the characters are so interesting and fun to read.
I read this book in 4 hours only getting up to use the bathroom. I recommend this book to all high action fantasy lovers who like to be pushed over the edge as subtle as a hammer blow to the cranium. It is amazing is all. The plot is original as well and will keep you turning those pages.
It would be easy for anyone embarking on a exploration into new religious movements to be swayed by the sensationalist media reporting that many of these groups have been subjected to. This book, however, deals with a host of faiths and belief systems in a subjective and unbiased way, however bizarre they appear to be. Even Jim Jones gets a fair hearing!A great source of information for anyone interested in NRM's which wets the appetite for further study.
i would just like to mention ,for any body who may be comtemplating this CD that it totally kicks *** .It has all the classic Black Dog atmospheere of BYTES and especially THE TEMPLE OF TRANSPARANT BALLS, in my opinion this cd is an essential part of any BLACK DOG collection.The first track is SUUUUPERB!P.S dont buy MUSIC FOR ADVERTS ....
I agree with others here that this is probably Pat Traver's best effort. Just wanted to mention that on my copy of this disc the songs are in a completely different order than they are coded on the disc. The disc is coded in the order the songs appear on the cover, but this is not the actual song order on the disc. Be aware that if you rip this disc to your computer you will have to manually rename the files to..ahem..."Put them straight".Actual song order on the disc = How the disc is coded:01 Life in London = Life in London02 It Ain't What It Seems = Gettin' Betta03 Speakeasy = Runnin' from the Future04 Runnin' from the Future = It Ain't what it Seems05 Lovin' You = Off Beat Ride06 Off Beat Ride = Lovin' You07 Gettin' Betta = Dedication08 Dedication = SpeakeasyKind of sloppy execution, if you ask me. Oh well, still a great disc. Buy it!
Bought it many years ago on vinyl and still have it! Had to buy it it again in a more modern format.Simply one of my all time favorite albums. Pat is one of the most under rated guitar players out there. If you purchase this, you won't be sorry.
I recently bought this CD after listening to cassette copies that I made off the original LP for many years. After wearing out both the record and the Cassette(s) I was thrilled to see it re-released on CD. I have seen PT several times live and have always thought this was his best stuff. I played guitar in a rock band during the late seventies and Pat's tunes were a refreshing addition to our set lists. We just loved jamming on "Gettin' Betta", "Life in London", and other Pat Travers songs. He is truly one of the great all-time rockers and IMHO this is his best. Every track is great!As an aside, I have great seats to see him at our local venue here in Annapolis, MD (Ram's Head Tavern) on November 28, 2005. I will be about 20 feet from the stage and can't wait!
This is a GREAT CD, wished I had ordered two! One for home and one for the car.
These are the romantic songs I grew up with and that is why I bought this CD. If you need a "shot" in the romance department, one or more of these songs should do it.
This cleaner is great at removing dirt and keeping my face smooth. Highly recommended.
I love Basis Face Wash. It has a clean, fresh smell and gently cleans my face of all make-up, etc. I used to be able to find this at regular stores, but have not been able to find it for the last year or so. I was thrilled to be able to order it on-line.
I received a tube of this in a goody bag at a marathon, and the first time I used it I was hooked. I love the scent and how great my skin feels after I use it. - The 4 pack is a great bargain, especially since it is not the easiest product to find in stores where I live.
I really liked the way the story unfolded, its voice, and how real it all seemed. Its like a very well written window opening into a different time and allowing you to see things from a different perspective. Defoe allows you to become Moll and feel what she's feeling- something you really can't get from movies.I'm surprised this book isn't more widely read. I mean with nice writing, plenty of sex, and daring characters you'd think this book would have more reviews. :)I recommend this book not only for those of you who enjoy fine writing for its own sake, but also to those who like an intriguing tale about adulteresses. A+ Defoe.
I enjoyed all of Gail Carriger's Parasol Protectorate books. They are not predictable and she has a great sense of humor. If you like something a little different I would recommend this series.
I have been trying to read this book for several months now and I can't become interested enough to get into it for more than one or two evenings a month. The story itself is intriguing but seems to go on forever, though the novel itself is quite short. Keeping all the men in Moll's life straight gets confusing. Renting the movie would be much less cumbersome.
Very interesting. Kaku is entertaining and very readable. Not too much math :( but it is a good book book for an intro to multi-dimensional physics.
I loved how this book brought out multiple aspects of the atomic world and explained them in terms of our physical world. The book is somewhat technical, yet still not difficult for an amateur to understand. It gets into some uncertain terrain, much like STILL PITYING THE FOOL, which can be a lot fun if you're up for it.
Very good read - for the acolyte who's background is not in physics but interested in the topic, this books was great for me. Some of the supporting proof seemed a little weak, but heck, I'm not sure I'm qualified to dispute it.I'll read it again - that's the best recommendation that I can give.
Kaku does a good job of explaining the basics of the different mechanics of modern day thoughts about quantum theroy... While this book does contain a great deal of speculation, its more like Kaku invites us all into a group of scientists and fills us in on all the "gossip", the speculations that are out there being proven or disproved right now. If you want a book to introduce you to quantum theroy, hyperspace, and space-time, Kaku's may just be the best one out there. And from this book it is much easier to move on to Hawking and the other big brains of therotical physics...
I bought this book when I was just starting to get interested in learning about the craziness of physics and quantum mechanics. I found it to be a very enjoyable and accessible introduction/overview of some of the key concepts without going overboard by drawing questionable conclusions or making iffy speculations as to what it could all implicate like many "new physics" books are wont to do.Overall engaging, interesting, and recommended.
This book was particularly good because of its simplicity and elegant style of writing. The concepts are explained fluently, and they are in a layman's terms. Sometimes the author repeats his views again and agian and it becomes boring. However, I have to admit that your view about the universe can be influenced by this book. You are forced to challenge some simple and basic concepts. Is space a void? is it flat? It is hard to beleive that "space itself can curl due to gravity". But it was even hard to beleive that earth was not flat.You can appreciate Einstein's work in this context. However, I do not agree that time is 4th dimension as stressed repeatedly in this book.This book is good for you if you have learnt basic high school physics. Enjoy!
The major problem that those who have opinions or theories on physics but no doctorates degree is that no one will listen to them. We need to stop making physics follow the equations and start making it follow the evidence. The equations can wait if you can prove that something works. This book opens the minds of all of us non-proffessors and allows us to start to think that maybe our ideas aren't so strange after all
It has a great start and a great end. The middle is taken up by much complicated physics that is difficult to follow. However, once Kaku begins to describe ways in which we might begin to probe the 10th dimension and civilizations that may have done so alredy, it becomes engrossing. It is certainly too much for the casual reader, but for lovers of science fiction or science in general, it is a fascinating book.
There are lots and lots of books out there about science, but very few that actually inspire with science, and even fewer that truly teach it tothe general audience. Kaku is usually pretty good, but I think he sometimes turn into tinsel. My two favorite books on modern science right now are Brian Greene's Elegant Universe, and a new one by Leon Lederman and Christopher Hill called "Symmetry and the Beautiful Universe." I'd say either start with Greene to wet the appetite, then do Lederman and Hill, or start with Lederman and Hill so you are ready for Greene. I'll be teaching poets with these books. These books set the standard that you will see most other books fall far short of. With these books as my "5 stars grade" I rank this one accordingly.
For those with basic knowledge in physic, this is really what you need to start.Trust me, I've read tons of books from Paul Davies, John Gribben, Martin Rees, others ... but it's too difficult to comprehend. It covers most if not all the basic stuffs that you need to know. Not only that it was very well written, it was also structured just like any other good novel. A must have for physic lover !
In my University years, I must confess there was any other issue in the Engineering career capable to match (in what difficult concerns) than Dynamics. I consider that this isolated discipline is the seventy per cent of the whole difficultness in the Five Years.Harry Nara was my beacon in the darkness, his polished concepts, kind presentation, fundamental exercises and that easy going conciseness and accuracy at the moment of solving "heavy problems" , constituted to me the friendly hand that saved me from the waters.Go for this, I still use it in my Consulting Timing "to help" the new students generations.
There are several CDs out that have collections of the Chiffon songs. All of the CDs have their big hits like "He's So Fine" and "One Fine Day" and most of their medium hits like "Up on the Bridge". Each of the CDs also has some "not so big hits", which vary with the collection. I like this collection the best. All of the CDs have been digitally remastered, so the sound on all of them is better than the original records.
Many years ago Entertainment Tonight closed their show with a performance by Tiny Tim. It was a country song about lost love and regret but the one line I remember, and has me searching endlessly is, "...but if you're going to leave me, leave me satisfied."A little help will be appreciated.
I have this record and was glad to see if on CD. Big Iron etc. It's Great!
My 4 sisters and I constantly listened to this album (yes, vinyl!) as children, and Marty Robbins was our pretend boyfriend/handsome prince whenever we played. (We almost re-enacted "El Paso" fighting over who got to be Felina.) I had forgotten about it until I heard "El Paso" played at a local fair. My children (son age 7 and daughter age 5) were mesmerized by the song. I still remembered every word, and I ordered the CD for a road trip. My kids listened to it over and over, and I so enjoyed singing along again. Marty is truly the best country music singer/composer of all time. I bet my kids grow up and pass this along to their children.
Marty Robbins is the original when it comes to gunfighter ballads. I listened to this on LP at my grandfather's 40 years ago; when he passed on, he left it to me. But I play the CD now.Simply outstanding.
my dad used to always play this album when I was a little kid in the seventies. I still really enjoy hearing these old song's.
My husband has always liked to listen to Marty Robbins, and this CD fits the bill. He doesn't usually listen to CDs, but he listens to this one.
the cd was good as new no scrathes just good clean sound.Gunfighter Ballads & Trail Songs
Us old farts need music too. I had it on a record and wanted a new one, because I enjoy this old real music.
Marty Robbins / Gunfighter Ballads and Trail Songs (bonus tracks CD): In 1959, the U.S. was crazy for Westerns (Movies, Television, Toys, Clothes and Music). In that year, Marty Robbins recorded this album which not only turned out to be the greatest County-Western album of all time, it is an album that stands besides the other contenders (in Rock, Country, Folk, etc) as one of the Greatest Albums of All Time. Some of these songs Robbins wrote, while others are covers and still more are traditional. The total effect is a moving Western fantasy unequalled in its brilliance. This album is Highly Recommended.This is a Masterpiece album and it deserves a Sixth Star.
I had heard El Paso on the radio, and, just had to have the whole album!! Great sound and quality...
WE who love the old west and Marty Robbins find it all in this album. The song are of a period long gone but you feel like you are there as this album unfolds. The extra songs are like a gift for fans who have followed Marty since his first appearance on The Grand Old Opery. I thought i knes all 0f his songs but was suprised as I listened to "The Rose" and other new songs on this album. It was like getting to visit with a friend who has passed away.
and use it on the talentless, commercialized, white trash trolls who call themselves "country" singers today: that idiot Trace Adkins and his hip-hop country rap crap, and Kenny Chesney et al- you guys aren't fit to shine Marty Robbins's boots. Marty is the real deal- great voice, talented guitarist, master lyricist. This disc has a great Western feel- my personal favorites here are "Running Gun" and "The Master's Call." Put this in your CD player and hit "play through"- there isn't a bad song on here. If you're a fan of the "Honky Tonk Badon-kadonk" and other CMT video crap, you best look elsewhere. I hear Wal Mart has some good CD's by a talentless asshat named Garth Brooks.
"Leeway Cottage" is so good that I tried to SLOW DOWN so I wouldn't finish it too fast...but I couldn't! All the characters are so vivid and interesting and Gutcheon does a fabulous job showing us their growth and change. There was a wonderful wealth of historical information about the Danish experience in WWII that I had never read about before in such rich, if disturbing, detail.To call this novel "great beach reading" is to trivialize its impact and depth...but it certainly is the book to select if you want to be transported this summer.
Well it doesn't do anything, but it's not supposed to! It's heavy, seems to be metal or solid heavy plastic, but it's covered in a hard rubber-like material that is durable and softer than I thought it would be. The pointy top is rubber-like too. The detail is very good and is quite realistic, but the paint could be a bit better.
A Spy Among the Girls is fun on its own, but is even more so with the added background of the five earlier books. Naylor's newest book in this series is again centered around the three Malloy girls and their neighbors, the four Hatford boys. Readers will enjoy the fast paced events. They will identify with the children, who in some ways have lives like their own. They will see that problems can be resolved. They will laugh as they discover the answers to questions: Is Josh a spy among the girls, or is he falling for Beth? What is an abaguchie? Will Eddie have a good science fair project with Josh and Jake's assistance? Can Wally escape from Caroline? Does he want to? Is Caroline already an actress? Can the Malloys and Hatfords live peacefully as neighbors? Check out this book and enjoy!
This book succeeds in taking me away from the everyday stresses of life and helping me appreciate the West's natural beauty, as well as its inherent danger. It offers a compelling story, interesting history of our country's struggles between preservation and population expansion, and thrilling prose contrasting the peacefulness and dangerous natural wonders of the West. I may actually have to read it again!
One of the greatest books written about the environment - still I do not understand why we would kill trees to print this and not have a kindle version available...
I originally read the book in the early 1980's and continually reread it to refresh my memories of the most compelling, stark, unforgiving, beautiful, lonely, introspective, sensative, sensational and sensual landscape in the world. The author and his book are monuments, and unfortunately perhaps lone sentinels, to the passion that the red rock desert of the American Southwest inspires in the people who love it.
Wonderful and classic work by Abbey. His descriptions of his desert surroundings take my breath away. Less engaging are his diatribes against the forces bringing in "progress" to the wilderness.
The first time I went to Moab, UT, I fell in love with the desert. I read this book afterwards and was captivated by every word Abbey wrote. That being said, I have spoken with other people who have never been to the Moab area who just couldn't get into the book. I guess maybe it takes a deep love of the environment and appreciation of the beauty of the desert to really understand this book. Abbey adds in so many interesting stories as well that keep the book flowing. I would defintely recommend this to anyone who loves the desert.
"I would rather kill a man than a snake," wrote Edward Abbey, and I suspect he even meant it. That sentence summed up, for me, this book: it is filled with Abbey's love of the wild desert and its inhabitants and his contempt for modernity and its inhabitants. I think Abbey was one of the early voices in modern environmentalism, and this is a classic book in that field. I appreciate his desert and his writing; even if you are not an environmentalist nor a lover of the desert, you may see why people are if you read this. At any rate, his deep naturalist reflections deserve consideration in our fast-food, internet, climate-controlled, sanitized and artificial age.
I read this book while traveling and hiking solo through Zion, Bryce, Grand Staircase-Escalante, and Capitol Reef. Several of the stories are startling and heartbreaking--the moon-eyed horse, the deadman in grand gulch come to mind. This book is from the late 60s and as a woman reader I thought Abbey came across as pretty sexist, but no matter, the writing is still brilliant in unexpected places.
The American experience has given to the world two priceless things above all: the fullest development of the idea of the worth and dignity of the individual life, and love and value of wilderness for its own sake. Desert Solitaire is a monument to, and a celebration of, both. It is one of the most important books of all time, for in it is the evolution of human conciousness. I'm grateful to Ed Abbey for his book, and for his encompassing, inspiring vision of the American West.
I've been there, the vast, silent desert. I thought no book could transport me back there, such an unworldly experience as it was. But I underestimated the power of Abbey's language. His muscular style, vivid descriptions, left me with pictures in my head, smells under my nose, sounds ringing in my ears. While some books make you feel like you're tackling a mountain, or headed towards a destination, Desert Solitaire successfully echoes the meditative, yet ruthless quality of the desert. His views about the protection of natural beauty are passionate and infectious. It can make you think twice or thrice about the fruitlessness of our petty, material lives. I plan to enjoy this one over and over, as I would a favorite song
In this fascinating ecological memoir/rant, Abbey takes us along during his time as a park ranger in the heart of Utah's harsh red rock landscape to expose its beauty and contradictions. While some things have changed since the book's publication in 1968, the majority of Abbey's thoughts and experiences remain timeless. A true classic of environmental nonfiction.
Mouritz,London, has brought out a new edition of the Universal Constant in Living, F.M. Alexander's last book.Edited and annotated by Jean Fischer, whose editions of 'Man's Supreme Inheritance' and the 'Articles and Lectures' collection have raised the standard for the serious study of Alexander, this promises to be a MUST for teachers and students of the Alexander Technique.The book is a sort of footnote to the earlier books, there is some problem with sprawl. But Alexander never wrote more clearly and succinctly.
Jamie O'Reilly's voice gives a heartfelt earnestness to this re-interpretation of the well known Spanish Civil War repertory. The ensemble is tight and introduces interesting rhythms to the songs. Many people have asked me how to purchase this CD but i think it is no longer available.
This CD is really amazing. The songs are so powerful and are sung just beautifully. In response to "A Music Fan from Israel," I'd just like to say that the CD's subtitle is "Songs of the Spanish Civil War," not "Songs from..." and I'm sure that the title was not meant to be "decieving." "Pasiones" is a wonderful mix of languages and I enjoy the contrast between songs about the War and songs that were sung by the soldiers. This is a really wonderful CD.
The book was very interesting from a woman's point of view. There were things that I never knew. For example, I always assumed that women were the meek and unrespected sex of the colonial period, when in fact they were well respected. I did think that there were too many diary entries.
A nice set of box and open end wrenches - excellent price good quality.Allows for a proper size wrench to use on any project encountered around the home.
A bit raw, but great for Lynch fans. First story is typical Lynch weirdness, with vague implications, and typical funny, wacky characters. The second story is surprisingly very 'normal', quite funny... and very 'Sex in the City'... in the 1990's. Can't say it was my favorite. Maybe that's because it wasn't directed by Lynch. The third and final set was a great, simple story about loss and forgiveness, depicted in typical Lynchian style. Crispin Glover and Alicia Witt deliver very simple but excellent performances. All in all, if you're a Lynch fan, Hotel Room is definitely worth seeing. If not, then you probably don't need to bother...
This is an arrangement of scenes between men and women that displays a complex mess of cynicism and childish vulnerability. John Irving might appreciate how it wrings a twisted amusement out of you. Laughing at insanity, knowing possibly it's seed is squirrelled away inside you, is an interesting sensation. Which is why some people laugh at 'South Park' and 'The Simpsons' too. A great date movie. <end sarcasm>
THIS BOOK KEPT ME READING RIGHT THROUGH AT ONE SITING TO THE END. I CONSIDER IT A BEST BOOK! HOPEFULLY MS KRUESI WILL DO IT AGAIN!
This text refreshingly covered a wider array of topics than I expected. As a Nonprofit Management major in college, this greatly helped me prepare for relevant course work.
My grandson(3 years old)loves this rug. He is big into farming and it is a wonderful place for him to set up his tractors, animals, fences etc. We have hardwood floors and this rug stays in place and does not slide around on the floor. He can roll the rug up (sort of) and put it away at the end of playtime. Farm equipment is easy to gather up because it is on the rug and not zoomed under the furniture. Colors are bright and cheerful does not show dirt and with a very active 3 year old boy that is an important feature! Would totally recommend this play rug.
I agree with j arce (puertorocreppin) the ladies of oaktown's 357 never truly got the respect they deserved. I was and still am a huge fan of this group and was very excited when i found out they finally released all their hit videos (along with their remastered hit cds) They come from an era when hip hop wasn't all about violence/hate. (which few people under 30 will understand) you see back then it was all about the party. True they didn't have the tightest lyrics but at the same time they still held their own and definetely put on a show. There are a more than a few club bangers on this dics and this cd is a must buy to add to any old school hip hop head's list.
Chad one of the other reviewers is half wrong about the DVD.The Turn It Up video is not on it.That's why I'm giving it 4 stars.
I previously had seen Oaktown's 3.5.7 "3-5-7 straight at you" on Vh1 soul and it was a great video.The dances, The girl's and the rhymes were great!. As a young black old-school hip hop fan I LOVED THESE GIRLS and their song was a hit.If anyone out there has any info on these girl's ...please keep me posted.Until Then...peace!
Wow! This mesmerizing tale of South Carolina - flashing between 1966 and now is taut and disturbing and compelled me to make a new List: SLEEP? Who Needs SLEEP? Page turners - all night long.It's a "Who Dunnit" and a "Why Dunnit" and yet a well-crafted cousin to both "One Flew Over the Cuckoo's Nest" and "A Time to Kill." Don't waste any more time reading these reviews. Rush your little cursor right up there to that "Add to ShoppingCart" button and get it now, ya hear?! Reviewed by TundraVision
It took me two days to read this book, only because I was working and busy with my 8-year-old. The plot twists were unexpected; everytime I thought I knew what would happen next I found myself sent in another direction. The only disappointments were Brittany and Yvette: Brittany is way too young to be that articulate, and even though she was afraid of Jack she probably would not have been old enough to know to try to hide in the fireplace. It also would have been nice to see what happens to Yvette once her meds were weaned. Overall I loved the book and would definitely read more from this author.
I bought two of these. One for the bow and one for the stern. The one for the bow I had to drill new holes in the mounting bracket in order for it to fit. The stern will take some major work to adapt it and I haven't installed it yet. The one I do have installed works fine though.
I read this book as part of my research for a paper on the history of copyright policy. I found Vaidhyanathan to be both well-informed and a good writer. Unlike many resources on this topic, Copyrights and Copywrongs was quite interesting to read. Vaidhyanathan's book is both insightful and entertaining. If you've ever wondered how in the world something like Copyright policy could be interesting or relevant, you should pick up this book. Once you do, you'll almost certainly keep reading until you've reached the end. If you want to learn about the history of Copyright policy and how it affects you, you should definitely read this book. ...
A rare look inside Belgium movie making in the early 1970's. The movie is a mixture of Fairytale & Horror, with Orson Welles primarily in the first 30 minutes of the film. Susan Hampshire is a fantastic actress playing four different roles in the same movie (you will not recognize her in her different characters). The DVD box contained a glossy sixteen page booklet, and Bonus Features on two DVDs. I would recommend this DVD movie to anyone who is a fan of Orson Welles.
Defanitly one of the best books That I have ever had the pleasure of inturpretting.Filled with Images of visual mastery, yet, langauge as vibrant as the origanal Unicorn Manuscript itself. Personaly, I beleve that the Prophecy states the horn is hidden some where in the rocky mountains. If at any point in time, you have any possibility of receving Unicornis: on the History and Truth of the Unicorn, I suggest you take the Oppertunity.Chris Snead
This book brings together short stories by largely canonical American authors--people we all read in school such as Hawthorne, Poe, and Melville. What Franklin has done brilliantly is shown, by the way he has collected the stories, how much they share a developing science fiction sensibility. Franklin also offers introductions to the stories and authors that are well written and intelligent, but here is also the source of my only complaint: I wish the introductions were slightly shorter, leaving room to include a few more stories. Still, this is an excellent anthology, one that will interest both converted science fiction fans and those who restrict themselves to reading that counts as "virtuous."
This album presents an impeccable recording and beautiful instrumentation and some very pleasant vocals. Like the country itself, the music represents a mix of the hispanic, asian and malayo-polynesian sensibilities. For those who have a deeper interest in Philippine culture, this is a must-get. But also for those who love authentic musics of the world, check this out. You won't be disappointed.
Brazilian movies can be real good, this one is not an exemption. Walter Salles and Daniela Thomas made an intelligent and exeptional movie. Just don't know why it was produced in black and white. Watch "Central Station" as well, you won't be disappointed. By the way: the song in the end of the movie is called "Vapor Barato" (cheap vapor) by Gal Costa.
Jamie O'Reilly's new cd is a complete listening pleasure for any Sunday afternoon. I found myself humming "The Riddle Song" and singing along to the standard ballad "Annie Laurie". Michael Smith's "The Snow Queen" excerpts and the token "Waving to Picasso" from their show "Hello: Dali" left me wanting to hear more. I could listen to Jamie sing all day. Although she bills herself as an alto on this recording, it is her crystal clear, warm high notes that tug at my heart strings everytime.
I had bought all the DVDs up to season 4 and was dissapointed that they stopped issuing the seasons. All in al, the features are the same as the other seasons and the dvd's are a must have for any fresh prince fan!
I love the Fresh Prince of Bel-Air and was happy to add to my collection season 5. I will look to add season 6 soon.
I have always had a curiosity about nuns which would include their habits and this book was the only one I was able to find that helped break it down.Thanks!
This a wonderful classic that is worth watching during the holidays! A child and her grandfather develope a wonderful loving bond. A refreshing family movie!
After being totally dissapointed by the Emma Bolger version of Heidi, I purchased this one. It was beautiful. Sweet, innocent, funny, even a little sad. All the characters did an excellant job. Children don't need high paced drama to be impressed. They giggled and wiggled over parts such as Heidi milking the goat, the monkeying around, and the sleigh chase near the end. And don't forget Andrew trying to milk "Bearly" either! I am a mother with six children. We all loved this movie. I would recomend it to anyone who wants a bit of innocent entertainment.
It had been many years since I had last seen this classic. It is a wonderful movie for any age. I thought I had remembered it a certain way and then when I saw it again, it was like I was watching it for the first time. What a difference watching it as a senior than when I was a child. I thoroughly enjoyed it.
Heidi is an excellent film, of course starring Shirley Temple as the witty Heidi, about a young orphaned girl who is sent away by her mean aunt to live with her strict and stern, but loveable, grandfather in the Alps. The film consists of many hilarious moments, like when Heidi is learning to milk a goat and when she tries to yodel in the village. My favorite scene is when Heidi asks her Grandfather to tell her a story. He reads her a story about a little Dutch girl with a pair of wooden shoes. The story comes alive and Shirley plays the little Dutch girl. The movie is excellent for young children and for people who loved the novel, to me, the picture is much better. The scenery is spectacular for being a 1937 film and the costume designs bring you into the time of Heidi. No Shirley Temple collection is complete without Heidi!
I think all young people should see this movie as it is a classic. Shirley Temple played Heidi as no other actress has been able to.
Shirley Temple is great in this movie and it is a wonderful family movie about how love can warm a heart. This movie is in black and white which is good but would have been better in color.
What a beautiful little story! My girls LOVED it, and I really appreciated the G rating. Definitely a must-see for the whole family!
Best movie ever always loved it i recommend it to others a true classic upgrade to dvd for best view
This movie use to be shown at Christmas every year thats were i remember it from....its a pity they don't show it any more,I think the kids would really enjoy it.
This informative book about Kern County is filled with beautiful photographs of the four seasons. They are identified by season in a colorful map featured in the front of the book. This central California book should be viewed by anyone interested in the scenic beauty of California.
A captivating tale of war and love in an eighteenth century setting during the war between England and France. A charming swashbucklimg hero that continually survives impossible odds such as those Hollywood film-makers love. Have fun!
It's an old Snoopy book from my childhood. My 4 year old son loves it. We only wish that Charles Schulz would have written more like it. We keep wondering when and if Snoopy ever will get that Red Baron.
gritty realistic and severe. I wish this was the only show on T V because there is notihg lie it and it is well acted and great story line. very real.
Ive watched this show from the beginning. This show is laugh out loud funny. You can really relate to the characters and if not you just enjoy the story.
This is is most messed up family I have ever encountered. Entertainment to the Max. Shameless is a must see.
I can't wait until season two comes out on DVD. Shameless is totally different and fantastically written, directed and the actors superbly cast. If it continues with this great ensemble, it will last season after season for years.
This series has some really funny skits and some parts of it are really hard to take if your at all sensitive to the human condition.My wife is a social worker and had a hard time with some of the dialog, but we still recommend the show to our friends. The writing is probably some of the best on TV and the acting is truly wonderful, the whole cast makes the series real.
I love love love this show! The characters are so well written play out great. Nothing clean about this humor though folks, so if you are looking for a show to watch with the family, try something else.
I am sometimes horrified that I enjoy this series so much. I think the writers/producers would enjoy hearing that, as they love to go for the shock value. Sometimes, it goes over the top. I have seen things I did not want to see, but I can't stop watching.Seriously, this series will never be for everyone. I'm never gonna say, "Hey grandma, come over and lets watch Shameless." I worry that in showing the gritty truth of these people, they will somehow glorify them. No one wants their kid to grow up and be a Gallagher (except maybe Emmy Rossum's Fiona, has there ever been a better film depiction of youth being derailed by responsibility?) Yet despite it all, I like these people, and I wish for them (in the last, final episode someday) a redemption that God or scriptwriters seldom give.
This is one of the best shows ever. It's irreverent, funny, outrageous and makes me laugh more than any show that I can remember.
Watching this insanely disfunctional family makes one feel good about their own life. The show quickly grew onme and became addictive.
An unusual but excellent text. The author conducts a point by point review of grammar rules while also introducing a news and media-oriented selection of related vocabulary items in each chapter. The grammar overview is very concise, written in as non-technical a manner as possible and can be described as pithy. John Mace has a wonderful way of distilling rules simply and clearly. He also narrows the grammar down to the most useful subset possible. Although short exercises punctuate the text, the book is more a review than a workbook.
This movie is completely useless to any normal person! I lost whatever brain cells I have left watching it then couldn't find my way home from the movie theater! This is a masterpiece that would have Siskel holding 2 thumbs up from below. A must for the whole family.
"Dude, Where's My Car?" opens with "stoners" Jesse and Chester (played by Ashton Kutcher and Seann William Scott) waking up to find Jesse's car missing (hence the film's title). But the boys have no memory of the night before, and thus must solve the mystery of the missing vehicle. Their first clue involves. . . pudding."Dude," directed by Danny Leiner, is a whimsical blend of mystery, comedy, and science fiction. It's full of absurd characters and ridiculous situations, and is shot with real visual flair. The comedy is very much enhanced by the easygoing likeability of and solid "buddy" chemistry between Kutcher and Scott. They are well backed by a good supporting cast; along the way are some quirky and very enjoyable cameo spots.The DVD offers a feature length commentary by director Leiner and costars Kutcher and Scott. Their three-way verbal interplay is hilarious and very informative; if you already enjoy this film I highly recommend watching it with this commentary.
I'm a huge, HUGE fan of Dumb adn Dumber and I thought this comedy was the same thing... which it is. BUT, and this is a very big BUT... it goes off onto a weird plot about fantasy things. It kind of gets ridiculous around the 40 minute mark, but the first half is pretty funny. It's one of those movies that you really have to suspend disbelief, because it's not real what-so-ever. Although if it would have had more realism to it, it could have been a great flic.The bonus stuff is pretty good and I love the commentary that Ashton, Scott and Danny give. Great stories from the set!
Dude, Where's My Car? rocketed straight to the top of my 'favorite movies' list after the first time I saw it. A great fan of bad puns, one-liners, and just overall tacky, I found myself laughing my head off. What really struck me about this movie, though, was how well-written it was. There was not a single part of the movie that was not integral to the plot in one way or another, which is made all the more dumbfounding after seeing jokes like "Dude, Llamas!" "Dude, those are ostriches." <a while later> "Stupid Llamas!!!!" *l* If you love whimsical, cheesy, and just a little tacky, this is definitely the movie for you!
dude, Where's my car is a comedy about two young adults who cant remember anything from the night before. They Have to Find there car so they can bring there girlfriends their anniversary presents, give a suitcase of money to a man who looks like a women and all in all they fnd there car, give the presents, and the money, and save the universe. It is A smoking dog, Stupididy, Killer ostriches, and kinda of (well not really) a love story, all mixed up into one big laugh.
I really enjoyed this one. It does get a little bit long and slow, esp at the part when the Sci Fi kids kidnap our heros, and hold them for some kind of ransom. But it holds its own, and has several parts where its just halarious.I give it four stars. Great extra features. I loved the commentary.
Dude, Where's My Car first struck me as a cheap... movie that a couple of teenagers made in their spare time; that was, of course, before I watched it! Not only do Jesse and Chester make you laugh your toes off, but they also have a sweet, semi-innocent look about them. Dude, Where's My Car is like a stoner version of Dumb and Dumber and is one movie that I'm going to have to add to my collection!
On a Friday night b4 I turned 21 a few years when I just felt like staying at home I rented this DVD and found out it's actually a funny flick. The plot revoles around two dudes trying to find their car and some other stuff. Seann William Scott steals the movie as always and he should have had top billing. Anyway just rent this flick and watch with the fellas and have some fun but be warned it's very very stuipd.
This film made me laugh. At times I laughed so hard I spit the beer I was [drinking] out...:-) It's that kinda flick. It's funny, then something even funnier happens that just busts you up....hard. A story of two - not too bright - dudes that party way too hard the night before, go outside the morning after and can't find the car. They trace the clues to follow their steps back to the places they were at the previous evening (that they have no recollection of) and discover they must have had a pretty wild time - But still can't find the car. If you enjoyed the comedy Romy and Michele's High School Reunion, then you will probably really enjoy this. Not for the high brow artsy types. This flick is for the kick back, turn off your brain and giggle and laugh goodtime crowd.
Alright, this isnt the funniest movie to come out. And all the 1 star reviews, I dont bother to read. This movie was funny when I first seen it. I have the DVD. Its just REALLY stupid, and it makes it hilarious. Like when the dog was high, tell me that wasnt funny? I was rollin. This movie is funny from beggining to end trust me. Just give it a try, rent it at first to try it out. If it dont make you laugh, then you need to lighten up. Both the main actors in this movie, are known by everyone, and they can be funny. In this movie they are really stupid/funny. When they get captured by the nerds, wow, I was literally rolling, it was hilarious at how they acted. It has good stuff in this movie, just check it out. Its really worth the watch!!
Like the previous reviewer I have seen Angela Brown and the Mighty 45s live. This is the first time I've found reference to Angela Brown on a US web site. She may perform sometimes without the Mighty 45s but maybe not in the US at all. If she does a live performance, why is there no web coverage?
It is a good product to travel with or for an emergency, small enough to put in any bag. But it's not for heavy rains or more than 1 person.
This set is a wonderful collection of Terence Hill's and Bud Spencer's classics.Some are them together and others their soloe films.The collection includes Nobody's the Greatest (a.k.a. A Genius two partners and a dupe.),Little Rita of the west,Renegade,All the way boy's and much more.It is the greatest set ever,filled with slapstick.
The book is a readable account of the beginnings of American newspapers, which were at times more biased and full of lies than today's worst news outlets. Looking at the beginnings of the United States from the publishing perspective also adds some interesting tidbits to our knowledge of Sam Adams, Hamilton, Jefferson, and others not so well-known to history. I found it an interesting--if not compelling--book to read a chapter at a time.
Infamous Scribblers: The Founding Fathers and the Rowdy Beginnings of American Journalism is the eye-popping true story of how raucous and undisciplined American journalism once was. Feuds, partisanship, and outright lies often colored journalism of the era. Some founding fathers, such as Ben Franklin, Alexander Hamilton, and Sam Adams, were leading journalists, others, such as George Washington and John Adams, passionately disdained journalists; and Thomas Jefferson was a skillful manipulator of journalists. Infamous Scribblers is divided into three sections: "The Role of Authority", "The Approach of War", and "The Tumult of Peace", all tracing the contentious relationship between the founding fathers and journalism throughout the birth of America. Highly recommended for American history shelves, and an absolute "must-have" for public and college libraries.
"Infamous Scribblers" was a fantastic read. Newspapers haven't changed much since colonial times. the best part of the book was the historical facts brought up, and the infighting of politicians and printers, among themselves and with each other. It brought out things about our founding fathers that aren't in your regular history books. There is a very great likeness of events and people then and now, The one big difference today is newspapers don't attack like they did then. They didn't hold back much at all and would keep it up and not backdown. Give it a try I think you will enjoy it....Ken
Not the most technically sound writing in publication but very far from the worst. For zombie fans, there really is no such thing as a bad zombie story, but David Moody's work really is something special. Its not your run of the mill flesh eating frenzy type of story and that's refreshing. The Autumn novel's power resides not in their ability to disgust or in the description of violence, but in the psychological despair and utter hopelessness that would be felt by the survivors of a zombie apocalypse. Very emotional, very disturbing, utterly wonderful.
Have read both books. Love them. I really respect the way these zombies are different. They re-animate differently and don't seem like a huge pack of rabid dogs from the beginning. The writer gives them a more human quality, and has more to talk about the morality of killing them because of it. This is not just a gash and slash blood fest. It is a zombie book, but it develops the characters very well. Will there be a 3? I hope so.
Little Walter Jacobs doesn't seem to get the respect he deserves. Let's fix that right now: it says here that "Hate to See You Go" is one of the top five blues studio recordings...ever! First off, there's the huge, steely sound of Little Walter's harmonica, amplified (he was the first in Chicago to do so) and drenched in lonely reverb. Then comes the biting lead/rhythm guitar of Walter's pal Muddy Waters, along with primitive, powerful drumming. This is a fine set of songs, very diverse by blues standards, mostly written by Jacobs or Willie Dixon. But best of all is Walter's vocal approach: raw, primal, but controlled, full of personality. He emotes the pain of a Robert Johnson or Billie Holiday, and the aggression and power of Muddy. This is a must for anyone with even a passing interest in Chicago Blues.
These work great on my curtains...they are big enough for the larger curtain rods. Look very professional.
these are the best for hanging curtains, just open the clamp put in the curtain material, slide on the rod and the window treatments are finished,I use these rings for all my windows.quality metal, smoothly finished and well made.
These clips allowed me to hang a curtain across a doorway without hampering access. They slide easily on the rod and look great!
I read this book through twice. I found it to be easily read and kept my attention. I am glad that I found and read this book, because it gave me a perspective about military aviation that I knew about, but did not have the information about how effective it really was. All the fighter and bomber pilots wrote about their exploits, and little was ever said about light aircraft used in WWII. I am glad that was written to document this type of military aviation to preserve it's history and give it the respect it deserves.
My favorites are May I Serve Thee and Wrap You In Love
I had only heard of Moby before this from his song "Oil 1" from The Saint soundtrack. One of my friends is responsible for turning me onto one of the ten best CD's of my 900+ collection. I cannot even begin to tell you how great this CD is. Usually "GREAT" CD's have 8 or 9 great tracks out of 12. Every single track on this album is great. Of course some stand out in my mind like the beautiful "Porcelain" and "Natural Blues", and the tropical island reminiscence of "My Weakness." The combination of Old Jazz samples, modern techno beats, and hauting vocals; works to perfection in creating one the the best albums of all time, OF ANY GENRE! Moby's faith seems to play a large part in creating an ethereal ambience of heaven! You don't have to be an arrogant sophisocate to like this, just a lover of music. Buy it, and if you don't like it, I will personally refund your money.
Words can hardly express what Moby has done to music coming into a new decade. Moby has inspired thousands of people to look beyond there normal window of musical vision. Play has turned mothers, fathers, children and other cultures into eclectic music lovers. Music is suppose to move you or reflect a mood and I can tell you Moby has created a masterpeice that has touched many people, myself included. It's simplistic nature is the true genius and I can not imagine ever getting sick of it.
I got hooked on Moby through hearing his songs on TV commercials. Maybe a sad commentary on our times, but I are grateful to be introduced to his music, and I'm sure he's grateful to have his record sales rocket. Consistently moving but also eminently danceable, Play is one of my favorite discs. I have it nearby at all times.
This has to be Moby's best work. I especially enjoy Run On it's different than Moby's usual songs but it's grrrrrrrreat. I highly reccomend this CD I know you will enjoy it.
I got this CD because my friend has been raving about him ever since "I Like To Score". So I thought since this was #1 at the Virgin Megastore, I'd check it out. I ended up like the first track, so I bought it to further listen to it. I listened to it, and it was kind of boring, until Run On came on. Run On is simply a masterpiece. One of the best songs this year. This whole album is worth it just for Run On. But Honey and Bodyrock are also very good tracks. But almost the rest of it is kind of boring, but it is still a great CD.
For some strange reason, I haven't seen any bad reviews. It's nice to know people like the same kind of music as me. Moby's "Play" is the first album I've ever bought by the artist. If I had never seen him on MTV or Space Ghost I probably never would have bought the album. This is the second best electronnica album I've bought in a long time, right next to Norman Cook's "Better Living Trough Chemistry".
i dont know moby s music but i have kistened only natural blues and why does my heart feels so bad?and they are the best songs to relax! so long dudes moby 4 ever
Moby music is awesome. I pity the fool who does not like it. If you don't have it, buy it!
The best thing about this disc is the great "rants" (or essays-whatever) that Moby writes in the liner notes. Being neither a Vegan nor a Christian I still enjoyed reading what he had to say; the man is coherent!This was my 1st introduction to Moby. (Actually that one song on the Gone in 60 sec. sndtk was...I digress). I Think its a terrifically solid CD and a good intro into what Moby is all about. If you think you might like Moby, also check out 18 and I like to Score.
The first song I ever heard of Moby was his techno remix of James Bond. Since then I've been hooked on his music, and he certainly doesn't disapoint on this great album. One thing that Moby has, is a unique sound. He will never sound old, or his style of music will never be used by others, because no one could copy Moby. It isn't Rock, nor techno. it's something in between On this album, all the songs are strong, but in particular I think the song "why does my heart feel so bad" is the best. It pours out the most emotion without a doubt. It was used in the trailers of Black Hawk Down, and was used perfectly. Overall, if you are a fan of Moby, Buy this album!!
I enjoy Moby's unique music. Very soothing and takes you to another place . I'm ready for the next one!
An amazing recording. Congratulations Moby; thank you for the moving music and for the enlightening essays.
Sadly neglected at the Grammy's, this collection of gospel-techno-ambient-soul food was the best CD of 1999. Each track is different, but all favor the unique, almost subliminal beat and subtle sampling that is Moby's trademark. Ideal for creating Spinning(R) mixes, or play the first 7 tracks straight through. This album is the benchmark from which all future "DJ/Dance" releases will be judged. favorite cuts "Southside" and "Natural Blues"
I found that I purchased "Play" for Moby's cut "Porcelain". The more I listened to this CD, the more I found alternative favorites. This is my first Moby purchase, and I'm thrilled I stumbled on it. (Diehard Moby fans excuse me - I'm just learning) I find many tracks to be calming and peaceful (ie: "My Weakness") and a few that I could live without that seem to interrupt the overall feel of this CD. Another reviewer noted that you need to turn this one up to hear the intricate details...I highly recommend this latest from Moby - the integration of a funky club beat with piano solos is very intriguing. I'm not one to usually contribute to an internet review, but this one had me hooked from the start.
If I would have to name top 10 songs list, about 5 of them would be in this CD. I like techno-like music which happens to be almost all the time very annoying when listened too much. Moby is something else because of his original style putting peaceful samples in tracks. Like Porcelain isn't actually quite usual for any genre of music. Overall: Best album ever and it's long, too! Not any 40 minute 10 track album but 18 tracks and length over an hour. It's unfair to hope better album from him, but I still hope that his next would be even better (if possible)
Moby sure knows how to play a fine melody. A lot of songs on 'Play' sound great and do have immediate appeal. It is very nice to listen to 'Play'. Highlights are: 'Porcelain', 'Southside', 'Why does my heart ...', 'If things were perfect', 'Everloving', 'Guitar, flute and string'. Well, what more could you ask ? After all: it is the music what it is all about ...If you listen closely to 'Play' I have to admit that Moby is not original in his approach. He is [borrowing] ideas from other artists. Ok. Who cares ? It sure sounds great.It is very simple: Moby is not a great musician technically spoken, neither groundbraking in his style(s). He simply knows how to touch your heart and soul. After a while I am sure I will find 'Play' a bit cheesy and 'cheapish' and maybe I will stop playing it then. I suspect that these songs will not make an everlasting impression to me. Ok. Who cares ? Radiohead's 'Ok Computer' in the end proved to have a lifecycle also.
I bought this the day it came out (almost 1 year now i beleive) i bought it because i was a fan of his, and this was a beautiful album.Moby is an electronic musician with rock influences. He is not known as a singer, and his singing on this album is hardly a high point or something to praise. He makes music and hew is very good at it (vocally as well.)Now he is very popular because of a movie soundtrack. WOW! Now people everywhere will praise his singing. Hes been around for quite a few years, and this album is hardly new.
I like what this guy's doing. He really knows how to put inspiration on its feet!
When I moved up to university I was listening to the singles charts on the radio, and "Why Does My Heart Feel So Bad?" charted at number 16 (in the UK) and I thought "wow!"! It really captured the mood I was in during that period.Few months later, I heard "Natural Blues", followed by "Porcelain".Whilst shopping, I thought I should take a chance and buy this album and it was a chance well taken.There is an interesting mixture of songs, (When I heard "Honey" for the first time I laughed, as I didn't know what to expect!), with the atmospheric, relaxing songs near the end of the 18 track album.
Just got the CD today and can't stop listening to it. The music is really soulful and yet at the same time has great techno beats. This CD makes for great upbeat ambiant background music while on the computer or cleaning your room. OR great to listen to, sing to or get up and dance to. The music on this CD is really easy to listen to, it doesn't get on your nerves like some CDs do! Buy it, you won't be disappointed!Also recommended: Santana - supernatural, Nirvana - nevermind, REM - Green, REM - Murmur, Best of House Music, Vol. 3 - various artists
It was all good. It was all good. It was all good. It was all good. It was all good. It was all good. It was all good. It was all good. It was all good. It was all good. It was all good. It was all good. It was all good. It was all good. It was all good. It was all good. It was all good. It was all good. It was all good. It was all good. It was all good. It was all good. It was all good. It was all good. It was all good. Oh yeah, it was all good.
Play is one of those records that you can take any where. The number of good tracks on it is quite phenomenal; out of the twenty songs, there is only really one or two that aren't truly wondeful. There is something for whatever mood you're in, whether you want to party HONEY/BODYROCK/SOUTH SIDE) or you really just need to chill (WHY DOES MY HEART.../INSIDE/NATURAL BLUES) This is definitely one of the best Records i have ever bought - wonderful!
This is one of the years best and certainly the best that Moby has put out. Those that accuse Moby of ripping off blues/gospel are in one word..jealous! Sorry you nay-sayers didn't think of it first. From the opening track Moby handles each sample with reverance, surrounding each with either deeply penetrating grooves or transcendent arrangements. A deeply moving much needed reprive from electronicas same 'ol stuff. This record can make the most uptight white boy want to get funky!
i bought this cd used, just a few weeks after it came out (i guess someone didn't like it, their loss). i hadn't heard much of moby's stuff other than his dance-y material but this was a welcome surprise. it's musical beauty permeates your soul and fills one with goodness (i know that sounds cheesy). moby does a wonderful job with the voice samples he uses and his mellow, slow instrumentals are his best yet (i favor track 14, everloving).
Moby has always been a man to push the envelope wide open, and surprisingly the music industry for once caught a genious in action. This is the first Moby disc that has recieved world-wide fame, but it IS for good reason. This is a classic both in dance and good old rock-and-roll. It's Moby at his finest.So good, in fact, that many like myself are forced to purchase the "B-Sides" album and some of the man's earlier stuff, starting probably with "Mobysongs" the greatest hits released right before he made the extrication of "Play." Sheer genious in every respect, with a handful of singles, a growing fanbase, and praise from critics, Moby is now right where he belongs; on the forefront of rock-and-roll. Enjoy his masterpiece....
Moby is pretty cool and I think teh best song on Play is Bodyrock. I also like Honey and 7. I rated it 4 out of 5 because there are some bad songs, but I recomend listening to it and buying it.
I hadn't heard of Moby until recently, and I must say, this is excellent work here. I really enjoy the more serious, if not depressing side of this brave artist. The cut titled "Why does my heart feel so bad" is a beautiful and forgiving tune. It's this darker more serious side of Moby, that has caught me. "My Weakness" is another that tells us something more is under the surface of this man.You will hear and feel a different world through him. No wonder it's a Grammy nominee! I highly recommmend you buy this right away if not sooner. Sit back and listen to Moby's world as it comes to you.
One moment Moby seems to distill the wisdom of the ages, the next moment the music exists for the sheer joy of being. Elegantly balanced, superbly crafted. Want a soundtrack for your life? You could do no better than this work.
I have to admit, I did not want to like Moby at first. Some girl begged me to pop it into my cd player one day when this album was still kinda fresh. I heard Moby was dorky, but I actually liked some songs from here like Porcelain, Machete, GuitarFluteString, and the last one. I thought a couple songs from Everything is Wrong were decent too. Now I heard a live rave album that I downloaded by Moby from Audio Galaxy from a few years back... NOW THAT WAS GOOD. Moby should stick to that type of stuff because otherwise his stuff all sounds the same.
I won't bore you with the same ecstatic praise as all the other fans of this album. One recommendation, though. Listen to track 14 with headphones. Loud, of course.
This is one of my favorite electronic albums. I rate it up there with Basement Jaxx "Remedy", Daft Punk, Prodigy's first 2 albums, Orb's Adventures Beyond the Ultraworld, DJ Shadow, ect. Its a good album with alot of variety. Songs like "Porcelien", "My Weakness", are the best, but every song is great! I love this album, and I'm looking forward to furture Moby releases.
Just good music with something for everyone... be prepared to sing along though
The lamp was suggested to me by the Colorado Vision specialist here as I am having more and more trouble reading which I do at least five hours a day. The light makes it much easier to see. The only problem is that I have to sit very close to it. I like that you have to just lift the bulb holder to turn it on. You can carry it around easily although I haven't done that yet. The swivel base is handy so that it can be adjusted to whatever I am reading.
Purchased this lamp as a replacement for one that died after 8+ years of daily use. Even though the old one died (had to do with the lighting up when opening mechanism breaking) few lights compare for bright light on a compact footprint. And with the new swivel base in this model, it is even better!
I design jewelry and we set up at craft shows and psychic fairs, so we purchased 2 of the lamps. They are especially great when I'm working on a design. At the craft shows we put them on a shelf & the light spreads out on the jewelry below which works very well also. They are great when it comes to packing, sleek and lightweight. Since we purchased these a person had a LED light that you could twist around and use as a spot light, so I might have checked that out before I purchased these. Overall we at [...] are pleased with the OttLite.
This light is in use as I type...I love it's compact design, great light and easy on and off with closing it down. Would definitely recommend this one!!
SIMPLY PUT, AMUST HAVE FOR ALL FLOYD FANS, WHO WANT TO GET THE EARLY FLOYD HISTORY FROM THE MEMBERS OF THE GROUP THEMSELVES.
Syd Barrett will be greatly missed. His whimsical songwriting style was unique and greatly influenced many famous musicians like David Bowie. This dvd is an essential purchase for those wishing to know about a genuis.
AWOS was the first fiction novel that I read that I fell in love with the character. Emma Harte is a terrific heroine. One for the ages. I read it over 20 years ago and I have never found a novel to compare. It's not the easiest book to read and I often had to pick up a dictionary to search for a word. Nevertheless it is a wonderful rags to riches tale. I will never forget this book.
I watch more TV than I read, but Barbara Taylor Bradford has changed my thinking. I specifically am searching for her books now, because "A Woman of Substance" really grabbed me.I laughed and I cried and I was really shocked. When I got near the end of the book, I did not want the story to end.I could really feel the friendships with Emma and Blackie. They were always there for eachother through everything. They're relationship moved me.And the book was very inspiring for me as a woman. She didn't wimp out and kept fighting for what she wanted and what she earned.
A great read. The author describes emotions and events well but sometimes the descriptions are crude and not those of a mature writer. Though I believe this was her first novel. I'm looking forward to reading her last one, for comparison of writing style.
Prompt Delivery. Correct parts. You can't do business with a better company. Hats off! I will definitely buy more products from this company.
The prop was exactly what I asked for and was delivered when they said it would be.
This unit works as advertised. It was easy to install. I had to buy a 4 pin molex to SATA adapter because the 3 SATA connectors supplied would not reach all my drives. It runs very quite.It is worth the money.
THIS RIGHT AS RAIN ALBUM IS ALL GOOD. CASTRO'S GUITAR PLAYING IS TOP SHELF. LIKE HIS OTHER ALBUM THIS MUSIC WILL OPEN ALOT OF YOUNG MUSIC LISTENERS EYES AND EARS TO THE BLUES. THIS ALBUM SHOWS WHERE BLUES WILL BE GOING IN 2K.
Tommy Castro takes a pinch of R&B, adds a jigger of motown, stirs in some soul and cools things off with some icy guitar riffs. He gets the foot tapping and lifts the spirits with his ever-improving ability to get into the right groove.
This charger is great for times when you don't have access to your computer. I would highly recommend it for those who travel frequently.
Great product; does the job. Inexpensive. Great shipping. Would order from this vendor again.
I have been using Pampers wipes pretty much from the beginning and I really love the pop-up tub and the different fragrances they come in. These sensitive ones are especially good for newborns. My only complaint is they are thin. I usually use 2 at a time, more if my son has a messy diaper. I recently tried Huggies wipes and they are thicker, but they don't pop up. I don't like reaching in the tub as much as a the pop up, so I guess I'll stay with these.
"The Elements of Reasoning" offers a good introduction to using logic as a basis for making arguments. If you want to improve your skills of debate, or familiarize yourself with Aristotlian rules of rhetoric, this is the book for you. I read it and enjoyed it, although much of it was familiar and a bit obvious. I think even an observant viewer of Sunday morning political shows will be familar with the techniques covered -- inventions, conjectures, definitions, as well as the age old structures of syllogisms and enthymemes. If you are already familiar with such things, no need to read this book.
The music on this CD is really quite innovative and a load of fun to listen to. Track number 2 is especially nice, and has a storytelling feel to it. Overall the music is an excellent blend of acousitc folky sounds augmented with synthesizers that fill out the pieces and complement the vocals. The production values, however, really bother me. Some of the cuts are really "in your face" and could have been recorded at a lower dB setting. Others on the same CD are very quiet. If you set the sound for the quiet tunes you are in for a rude shock every now and again....
I have not yet bought this CD, but I did see her play live in Maui last week.... She has an amazing voice, you will not be disappointed!
Love this movie...there are so many scenes of which I can relate to at my job. Funny Funny, you are guaranteed to laugh.
Office Space has quickly become one of those cult classics. I cannot remember this movie even hitting theaters and I saw it after it was recommended by a friend. I immediately went out and bought it after watching it once. It is one of those movies that has classic lines and characters that you'll be quoting and referring too often. Personally, I would rank this as one of the 10 funniest comedies I've ever seen.
I haven't seen this movie since I was young. I think high school years. I watched it yesterday for the first time in year's and I remembered it being a little bit more funny and fun to watch. Still was a good movie though. I like the guy who is always being moved around and just wants his red stapler.
Office space is a classic movie for your typical cubical worker. I have the DVD version and it looks kind of pix-elated on some screens in certain scenes. I haven't noticed it on my LCD screen with his blue ray version so I am a happy camper.
The movie is absolutely essential for anyone who has ever had a crappy job. This is one of the most brilliantly constructed films I've ever seen, and will make you laugh out loud.The DVD is a bit disappointing though, as there is like nothing else on it. A special edition with commentary, outtakes etc. would be really nice.
This low-budget sleeper from the mind of Mike Judge is a quirky, funny film that cuts to the quick of corporate America. It skewers the hierarchy of the typical soul-stealing, cookie-cutter/cubby-hole workplace. You'll never look at a stapler in quite the same way again.
When this movie came out to rent I new I had to rent it because I had not been able to see it at the theater.The poblem was it was checked out and video store usally has like 10 videos of a new release,so I knew it Had to be good.When I finally got to see it I thought it was so funny that Ikept rewinding it just see the parts I missed! I'm going to get this DVD today.If your looking for a great laugh,Rent this,See this,Buy this
The movie is absolutley hilarious and anyone who has ever had an office job will love this movie. It expresses the views of the average american who hates thier job and will do almost anything to ad excitement to thier life. The main characters in this movie did an excellent job acting there part and were absolutley hilarious.
I have seen this movie and think it is halarious. This is a movie that almost anyone can easily relate to. Holding a job isn't usually people's problem...it's enjoying it that they usually find hard. These guys hated everything about their job...especially their boss(Lumberg). Unless you can find something about your job that you enjoy doing, it is very hard to make it through the day. So unless you can find something about the job you have that you enjoy, you are probably better off looking for a new one because one of these days you just may break down and do something stupid...
This movie is a classic. Mike Judge, the man who brought the world "Beavis and Butthead," surprizingly brings us an increadibly clever, fun, and a "God I wish I could do that" movie. Every one who has ever worked in an office will see this movie as the gospell. People can associate with every character in the film. Ron Livingston, also a bit part in "Swingers" was a wonderful lead. He plays the "stand up and fight the man" role to perfection. Well done, fun, and a must have in any DVD collection. Well worth the money, and something you'll watch over and over and laugh each time.
Exactly why i quit my office job, I laughed so hard, all while an intense anger grew inside me towards my old bosses. Damn printer !#@@#@, i hate you.The movie stays funny and on track at first, well at least through 3/4 of the movie and starts to get a little to serious at the end. However i own, love it, seen it too damn many times now.
I believe this movie started off as a 2 minute cartoon skit on Saturday Night Live, but that can't compare to the laughs that this movie will bring you. You'll want to get this movie, believe me... But instead of getting this movie, you may want to consider getting the limited edition collecters disc as it's loaded with extras!!
This is an absolute must own dvd. Some of the reviewers here have made it very clear why you should have this dvd in your collection. A top 10 comedy of all time!
I love this movie. It was on Comedy Central a few times a week one summer and I watched it every time it was on.Like Dilbert, it has something any office worker can relate to but will still be funny regardless of where you work
watch this movie! It was recommended to me for a long time before I broke down and rented it. It is very funny. It encapsulates every piece of crap job or pain in the a** boss you've ever had. There is something in here for every working stiff. Wouldn't it be amazing if we just stopped caring about work? The irony that the lack of care brings good fortune. Don't be too doubtful. It just might work for you!
Outstanding. And I don't enjoy other works of Mike Judge like Beavis and Butthead. This movie provides a much more subtle context for its humor. The facial expressions and interaction between co-workers are unconventioal and hilarious. See this with friends and the quotes will flow for weeks.
If you have ever worked for a corporation and had to be in a cubicle, this movie will make you laugh and laugh. I found it incredibly funny, and some of the moments were priceless. Recommended to anyone working at a large corporation, you will just get it and it will be funny.
A very light, funny satire on the life of the computer programmer and the world as they see it. This story covers everything from matrix management, jaming fax machines, business improvement, to the cuicle with a window view. Anyone that works in an office full of cubicles will relate to at least some part of this movie. I particularly like the aspect of the "quality" slogans and consultants that come in to "improve" the company. Many of us have already lived through this several times.Very entertaining with a pretty good cast of people you will recognize.
There are two types of people who will fail to understand the brilliance of this movie: 1. The clueless 2. Those who are not experienced with American pop culture and all of its inane qualities.That said, you don't have to have experience working in an office to enjoy this movie. For me, it has a universal message in that most of what we do is not at all pleasant. To survive, you have to find stuff that amuses you (such as this movie). A must own DVD.
This movie was great. All the characters were soooo funny. Between the guy with a nervous stutter to the nerd who jams to rap music, I couldn't stop laughing. With a story line the everyone can relate to, and a scheme everyone would do. This movie is a great movie to rent if you need a good laugh.
This movie take place in a office .The company is a Silcon Valley type operation.For some of the worker , it means possible lay offs,more work for others and some even get promoted.We see this movie though the workers as they toil for the boss(played the Brady Bunch's Gary Cole).The workers conspire on a way to get rich off their employer's accounts. The movie shows us what also happens at a restuarant when Jennifer Aniston works.One of the employees falls in love with her.Eventually the workers must find a way to return the money back to their boss.The ending was kinda what I expected with the employee who off in some dark corner finding something he was after the whole time! paychecks! Office Space is rated R for swearing(in speaking and soundtrack)nudity and violence towards office machines (especially printers! )See this movie even if you do not work in an office! any one who works (and who does not) can relate to this movie!
This movie is hilarious. I recently gave it as a gift to a colleague and it was a huge hit. If you're looking for a gift for a co-worker who has any sense of humor at all, you cannot go wrong with this movie. Pairing it with the red Swingline stapler would be a great gift! :)
An awesomely absurd movie on the trials and trivialization of being a programmer in a large corporation. I highly recommend it. Just don't touch my red stapler.
This film is a classic comedy. It has a lot of subtle funny moments that make you laugh really hard. Peter's calm demeanor make for a great character that is just fed up with his life and doesnt really care anymore. Anyone who works or has worked in an office knows exactly what its like to be in his shoes along with the rest of the cast of characters. It's a classic comedy because it's so real and true to everyday life that people can relate to the movie and find solace in the film. It's all the things people in his situation wish they could do but never really could sacrifice there career for.
The ability of almost anybody to relate to this movie help elevate this movie to a cult classic. Upon the release of this movie, Twentieth Century Fox spent almost no money for promotion. In spite of this through word of mouth it has become an unbelievable success. Dealing with issues that almost anyone to relate to, relationships, dim-witted bosses, unruly electronics, frustration with the redundancy of bureaucracy, etc. has helped elevate this film to a cult classic. This is one of the few movies that can be watched and enjoyed over and over again. Save yourself the money of repeatedly renting it and the aggravation of waiting for it to appear on network or cable television and add it to your dvd collection.
I had the DVD edition of this and I can say the Blu-ray looks amazing compared to the DVD copy. The menus are not quite up to par with newer Blu-ray menus but the bonus features and commentary are great.
I haven't been in the work force for too long, but there's so much in this movie that i relate to. The sick thing is that so many of the gags are so dead-on to reality; you don't know if you should laugh or cry. If you work in an office (unfortunately) you will know all the characters in this movie. My last boss definitely had a good dose of Lumberg in him. All of the main characters are solidly funny, and it doesn't hurt to have Jennifer Aniston as the love interest. There's a moderate amount of harsh language and a naked girl on a TV for about 2 seconds, but nothing gross or in exceptional bad taste. Final Note: It might help to see "Superman III" before you watch.
As the title says, I can watch this one again and again (there is hardly a movie I'll watch repeats save for few exceptions like Office Space).
The Bottom Line:Perhaps not the call-to-arms that office drones think it is, Office Space is a funny and warm comedy about the drudgery of modern life that captures the stiflingness of white collar toil better than Fight Club ever could.
In case you didn't know, this movie is based on a recurring Mike Judge cartoon in the depressing 1993-94 season of Saturday Night Live. But the main character isn't the guy with the stapler; it's instead Ron Livington's character, who, after being hypnotized by a counselor into being more at peace, doesn't come in to work, yet gets promoted when new management comes in. Okay, so that premise is dubious, but everything else that happens in the movie (i.e., being in a traffic jam where a walking elderly man passes you up, numerous bosses coming up to you for making a mistake, new bosses come and almost everyone is fired) should hit home with you, and if it doesn't, then can I have your job??I got the DVD of this and I'm glad that they didn't stick any special features on here because they're always wack anyway. P.S. This movie is fictional, so don't do what the main character does in this movie. I won't give the plot away; just see it and see what I mean.
This is one that EVERY potential office manager should be forced to watch. You will find yourself saying "I know that guy" with every scene. Really great, hillarious, definate Calssic right off the bat!
The other being "Better Off Dead". It's witty, it's hilarious, and appeals to the GEN-X group.
this film gets funnier and funnier vey time you see it if you hated it and only saw it once see it again if you liked it and only saw it once see it again it's an okay movie for kids over 12
One of those films that gets better with each viewing. The first three-quarters of the film are excellent and worth 5 stars, though for me the last part of the film is not nearly as good. If you like this movie then I strongly recommend you check out a British TV series called 'The Office' which is fantastic. Only available in the UK so you'll need a muti-system DVD player and TV but well worth watching.
Yeaaaaaa, I'm gonna need you to use the TPS report from now on....I really wasn't interested in watching this movie when my husband brought it home, but it is now one of my favorites! It's a cult gathering, and the minute you say those two little words "ummmm, yeaaaa" if you've seen this movie, you know EXACTLY what the person is talking about! I love Jennifer Aniston in Friends, but this is one of her better parts. It's small, but it just fits her. GREAT movie and recommend it to ANYONE who loves comedy.
This DVD is a must for anyone who has ever worked a technical job or in any company that subjected its employees to the now ubiquitous "cubicle farm."!
My friend hated his job. I got him to skip work one Friday afternoon. A couple of beers and "Office Space" and he quit on Monday. This is quite a nice little piece of work.
Anybody who has ever worked at a dead end job in a cube farm will love this movie. A perfect, deadpan mockery of the unfulfilling lives of late-nineties white collar yuppies. If only they'd left out the whole Ron Livingston-Jennifer Aniston love interest subplot, I would have given it a five.
Excellent movie! I've rented it 2 weekends in a row now, buying it today...absolutely hilarious. The cast is perfect. Anyone who has worked in this enviorment can relate completely...you'll think it's your life on camera. With my company downsizing at the moment, this movie couldn't have come at a better time...life truly is to short to put up with the BS of the corporate world...This movie is just what I needed to finally make the decision to leave! WOOHOO!
I recomend this movie to anyone with a good sense of humor at first I laughed so hard I was crying. It might be a little unacceptable for young children but I give this one 2 thumbs up.!
This film had me chuckling the first time I saw it. However I changed jobs and the movie made sense. If you have not worked in a place that has inane managers, not to metion if you have more than 1 that you report to, psychotic co-workers (Milton is my favorite)then you won't get this movie. I lived as Peter at my last job.
It really is amazing how Mike Judge captures all the intricacies of working in a cubicle atmosphere. The annoying boss. The characters that work around you. Hawaiian shirt day. If you have ever worked in a cube, you must rent this movie. It is hysterical.
This movie is hilarious.... I thought it was amazing as I watched it in college; however now that I have a full-time job, the funny parts of this movie are things I encounter on a day-to-day basis.
This is a funny movie...It will keep you laughing, however...watch out for the dirty language...especially in the opening sound track. This is not for young children.
Great humor always has elements of the truth. This movie is a cult classic. Watch it and you'll identify some of the characters from your own office experience. Let's face it, for the most part work [stinks] and Office Space does a great job of poking fun at all the reasons why. I especilly identitified with the themes surrounding the printer. I hate printers and copy machines with a passion. I loved the part where they take a baseball bat to the evil machine. And then there's the boss, Lundbergh - we've all worked for someone that smug and sleazy at one point or another. They you've got the crazy co-workers whom you're sure are certifiably insane. This movie hits the nail on the head in so many places! Buy it and laugh!
I was sitting home bored one day when I happened to catch this movie on cable. I couldn't believe this gem was overlooked in theatrical release. Talk about hilarious. After watching this movie I went out and bought it. It's that funny. Being a person who worked in a situation similar to the one our main character, Peter Gibbons, worked in I could totally relate to this movie. Made me laugh and laugh. All the characters are funny. Great comedy.
I was on the floor I was laughing so hard. You can relate it to your work as well with the jams with paper to dorky co workers and annoying boses
Don't spend time reading all the critics. If you're here, its because you have some interest in this particular movie. So, here's the deal: I'm from Mexico (and our humor it's a little different from yours), I'm not a fan of Beavis & Butthead neither King of the Hill, I dont know the Milton reference, I'm not in love with Jennifer Aniston and I only watch the movie once so many years before, but I have to own this movie now. Why? Cause I still cant' forget how great it is! pure and simple.Everything in there (story, characters, funny situations from beggining to end) is a hit. This is the kind of movie worth seeing 5 times a year (at least). Too bad the DVD has zero cool extras (an insult for the fans and the great movie that contains). Five stars for the movie, 3 for the DVD.Trust me: buy it, see it and enjoy it.
This movie is so funny, you have this guy working for a computer company and he's really sick of his life.... Until he visits a psychiater who gives him this special thought. So he simply stops doing everything he doenst like. It's great movie and has a nice plot. On dvd you first get a message to scan for a virus and he detects a hole bunch of them, so dont screek :) it's simply a joke. It looks great on dvd, no complains
Office Space is a ruthless, no holds-barred comedy. Anyone who has ever spent even a day working in a cubicle will definitely appreciate this and relate to the characters. It's a different kind of Hollywood comedy; funny and clever. Ron Livingston is terrific and this is the kind of unique film Jennifer Aniston should do more often (no more Along Came Polly's). I enjoyed Office Space and recommend it to anyone with their own office space that they want to knock down and burn. This is a highly enjoyable and cute film.
My favorite comedy of all time. I went to get my DVD out of my original DVD case and the DVD was missing, my roomate probably stole it among other things.So I decided I had to have it again. Today anytime I purchase new DVDs they are usually Blue Ray, yes even comedies.
Office Space could very well be the funniest movie ever made. Yes, that's a bold statement, but watch this movie, and you'll most likely agree! Is this movie only for those who have worked in an office environment? No, but those who have will get the most out of it.It's really hard to find many faults with this movie. The characters are developed well, Mike Judge (Beavis and Butthead, King of the Hill) did a great job in directing his first live action film, and the story is amusing and easy to relate to.By the time you see this movie 5 or 6 times (beleive me, you will) you'll be reciting all of the funniest lines Monday morning at work. (There are more than enough to last for weeks) And that brings me to my next point. If you really dislike your job, watch this movie after an exceptionally bad day. You'll feel so much better afterwards! Just don't try any of the things that go on in this movie at work. You'll be fired for sure!
This is a surprisingly pleasing movie, whether you work or are too young to get a job. The film makes fun of work, all sorts. From Cubicles, to peppy waiters, to the wonderful "ehs" of construction workers.Ron Livingston plays a man who is tired of his job. After getting hypnotized, he quits caring about his job, and gets his friends to go in on a scheme with him to get rich by stealing bit by bit from the company. But, when one of his accomplices screws up and too much money is taken out, they have to worry about what they'll do to cover up to keep from getting put into a federal prison.The only problem I have with this movie is that its content got a little too needlessly mature for me. This film could have been just as good without all the cussing. But that's just one problem with an otherwise REALLY funny film.
Office Space is a great movie. It's one of the many DVD's I own. It's from the creators of Beavus and Butthead so you know it's going to be great. It comes on Comedy Central just about every weekend so if you want to buy it that's fine but if you want to record it and get it for free, that's even better.
This is a pretty funny film. There are some really good scenes.The story is about a high tech company that has become top heavy with employees over the years. The head of the company hires a consulting firm to come in and review/fire the dead wood.Our hero become accidentally hypnotized into thinking that he needs to start doing things that are important to him, not the company.Anyway, he starts going (or not going) to work when ever he feels like it. He dresses anyway he likes. He does whatever he wants. The rest of the employees think he is crazy. The consultants think he is under motivated. They reccommend that he be promated.The things he and his friends get into are hilarious. The office is non stop cubicles....Jennifer is an added bonus to this film. Not a big part, but she in it often enough to be considered on of the four main characters.Good flick.
So funny; and it gets funnier each time you view it. Goofy plot, but has lots of ties to the reality of the workplace.
Emzone develops state of art mobile applications for Sales Force Automation (SFA) . The Book iscomprehensive and helps for GPRS application develoment. It isvery helpful in Emzone current development.
An excellent book for anyone interested in using solar power. It's especially useful for anyone planning to build a new house. But anyone wanting the basics of solar (passive) heating and solar electricity will benefit.Paul gives an honest step-by-step account of his own building experiences, including the mistakes and what it took to correct them. I found the entire story very worthwhile and useful.If you want a solid overview of how to prep any house for alternative electrical power, you should read this book. If you're looking for practical info in the best use of passive solar heating, you can't beat this book.Jim, Montana[...]
Solid Vonnegut.The description that the cover gives doesn't really do the story justice.This is a twisted and dark love story, involving an empty man and his memories.Dark satire is woven throughout, as only Mr. Vonnegut can do.Not quite 5 stars, but only because I've read SH5 and Cat's Cradle.If I was new to this author, it'd be a different story.However, I know what he's capable of, and this isn't QUITE his best.CLOSE though!Highly recommended.
All I can say is, this book changed my life. I read it in the mid 70's, and have never forgotten it's message: You are who you pretend to be. So, you had better be very careful who you pretend to be.
When I first read this novel, directly after readingCat's Cradle, I was disappointed. There was something there that I felt that it lacked. The normal Vonnegut wit and humor only surfaced momentarily. But after much recollection about this, I feel that it is indeed a truly tremendous and well thought out story about a man discovering his own inhumanity. I highly recommend this novel to the experienced Vonnegut reader, others should be weary. (Also see the movie! A great adaptation.
Vonnegut is tied as my favorite author along with Philip k Dick, however that doesn't mean I have loved all his books. But I must place this one under the "love" column. It has Vonnegut's trademark sarcasm and satiric voice going in full force along with his mastery of subtle humor. I would strongly recommend reading this book along with others of his; more specifically Breakfast of Champions, Cat's Cradle, and Slaughterhouse Five.
Mother Night is Slaughterhouse Five without time travel nor aliens. It's hysterical and puzzling. A great book for any fan of Kurt Vonnegut.
In Mother Night, Kurt Vonnegut gives perhaps the most humerous(but still respectful) view of the Holocaust and Nazism ever thought up. As he always does, Vonnegut pushes the envelope of what is acceptable and while doing that makes us ponder if we're acceptable. WOW! I haven't yet seen the movie, but I can't wait. Even Hollywood couldn't screw up this astounding peace of literature.
A brilliant book that examines the evil that humans are so easily capable of doing to their fellow humans. This book is a very fast read but it is worth it. Highly recommended.
Vonnegut's intriguing writing style continues in Mother Night. Very fat and interesting characters coupled with a precise probing of issues of conventional morality lead to a short, easy, and worthwhile read.
Howard W. Campbell, secret agent for the US and a Nazi propaganda artist faces execution by a War crimes trial in Israel circa 1960. Will he be recognized for his service with the Allies or will he be executed for his crimes while 'playing a Nazi'? Vonnegut leaves us with a story of a man plagued by his on ambiguity and the consequences of associating one's self with the wrong cause. Very good story, very insightful writing; Vonnegut shows mastery.
This is not a classic KV book in the sense that there is no science fiction element, but everything else one has come to expect from KV can be found. Even in such a serious book Vonnegut finds a way to add his dark humor without disrespecting his message. And as usual Vonnegut offers an original perspective on a topic that is commonly used. Any Vonnegut lover should make sure that this book gets entered into their library. This may not be Vonnegut's best (my opinion it is Cats Cradle) but it is still an incredible read. My only problem is the same problem with most of his books; they are too short. It always feels like he has so much else to say, but I guess we cannot get greedy. This is a book for everybody.
I bought 2 of these for my daughter and her husband to use on their nightstands. I like the soft light that it gives off. I hope they enjoy them.
This book was terrfic! It's about a guy named Jackson who sees this monster killing someone on the way to his aunts. Then the aunt starts to search for this monster. Then the aunt gets bitten and its all up to Jackson to risk his life to find this monster. But the bite on the aunt gets worse and the monster starts to control the aunts mind and she's going crazy! Read this book its great!!!!!!!!!
AN Incredible book! Doom Stone keps you wondering what will happen on the next page. Not reccomended for younger childern, It even kept me listneing for that eerie ticking sound.
I give this excting book a 5 star rating.The book starts out as a normal trip to visit our Aunt, but then picks up as Jackson sees something at Stone Hinge. His aunt fills him in on the beast and why the army wanted her to look for this beast. They get a call that the beast is on the move. They take off in a helocopter and they are atacked. His aunt goes crazy in the hospital. Jackson finds out something that might help kill the beast but does not know where to find the Doom Stone. Will Jackson Find the the the Domm Stone? Read this amazing book and you will find out.
I thought that this book¡s fantasy was very interesting. I liked how the author described the Skull Face like if it really existed and had been seen. I liked the descriptions of Skull Face. That he is a human in the evolving stage and has a very deformed face. Even though the book was fantasy, I thought that the characters were realistic and that indeed characters like Alma and Jackson might exist in the real life. What I really enjoyed of the book was that it was fantasy and connected to the real world mystery of Stonehenge. I really thought that, that would be a perfect place for this kind of fantasy. I think that Stonehenge would be a perfect place because; in the real life it is a real mystery who put those stones there and why. Overall this was a book a thoroughly enjoyed.
Steinbeck's book are often quite earthy and rough. I think he had a macho image he wanted to maintain in part. He was a good writer (Noble prize, Pulitzer) and "Travels With Charley" is a wonderful book. It is not in this collection however. I find it difficult to swallow his profanity and it is never necessary (read Dickens for instance). In comparison, E.B. White had a gracious side to his writing, a wonderful subtle sense of humor and a beauty of economy with the English language. I like them both but prefer White. I mention the two together because they were both writing at the same time. They were both perfectionists and both hated to be in the public spotlight.
The Short Novels of John Steinbeck includes some noteworthy books, like the Red Pony and Of Mice and Men. Steinbeck wanders around a lot when he weaves his descriptive tales. After awhile, reading Canary Row, which is included in this digital collection, I've come to the conclusion that he really likes to wander a LOT and develop his characters, and sometimes seems to lack direction in his story as a whole, but perhaps that's the point. Anyway, a great collection of classics by one of the more famous of American writers.
it is a great game which in many ways feels like a metal gear solid meets resident evil 4 arcade stealth shooter and is very fun and hard to put down once you start playing
If you're a fan of Metal Gear Solid, Syphon Filter, GoldenEye 007, or Mission Impossible you'll love this game. This game has an excellent multiplayer, an even better story with one of the best plots ever and is plain out fun. If you buy one shooter this year by WinBack.
This game is the best spy game in a long time. In Goldeneye, the enemies just stand there and shoot at you hoping to hit you. Not in Winback. The Terrorists will wait for you to show your head and then blow you away. And, Goldeneye's dudes will shoot at you if they see you or not. Winback's will wait until they see you. Winback: Covert Operations offers an exellent training program to teach you all you need to know how to do in the game. The "Crying Lyons"(the terrorists) show some artificial intellegence. Winback's multiplayer mode isn't as great, but offers more ways to challenge one another. Overall, if you were to buy Winback or Goldeneye, go for Winback. Goldeneye is horrible compared to Winback.
This game has mild vilonce but no blood it is about a retired swat guy destroying a terorist ware house. Its Wonderful!
This game has a great multiplayer, a pretty good story line, and an awesome singleplayer. The tutorial mode is kind of lame especially when he tells me he won't be easy and I don't even get hurt. Thats one of the few draw backs of the game, but all in all it's a really good game whether your rolling around a corner or blowing a boss away with a shotgun or a bazooka it's fun game.
This is a extremely fun game it is hard though on your first time playing it. It took me and my friend a couple of days to beat the first level.it has a lot of sercrets to unlock such as sudden death mode,trial,max power however you do not need cheats! to access these modes I beat the game on hard and got all of them.The multiplayer aspect needs some serious work(larger levels,with more detail),but after just beating the game you can use all of the bosses in multiplayer mostly its a good game and could probalbly hold its own at a arcade its well worth the money!
This is a game worth buying. there isn't blood so your mom wont be upset. It has a good idea to it but there are several cons. There arent the huge arsenal like in most games. Also the controls can be annoying. But I am not going to just talk about the bad stuff. There are lotsa cool things to do like C4, Its so much fun to detonate on an enemy. The multi player is pretty bad though it is pretty pointless. If you dont like 3rd person shooters and woult prefer 1st order Perfect dark it will be a 1st person Winback with tons of guns, Charecters, Missions and best of all bots(CPU charecters) in the multi-mode
This novel further develops the story and characters of the first two books. There are no surprises and the novel is comfortable, easy to get back into. I'm looking forward to the next novel.
"Darksong Rising" is a worthy successor to the two earlier books in the series. Anna is a believable (and enjoyable) character, and her attempts to wrestle with a new world are good entertainment. The transformation of Defalk continues, and her efforts make a really enjoyable read. Yes, she does whine a bit much about her exile from her children (although in this one at least a hint that she might be recognising that her new life is better). Yes, her sexual frustration over Jecks is also a bit much, too often. But she is entitled to some complaints, given the calls made upon her for selfless sacrifice to help others. I agree too that we could do with a bit less of the "men are dreadful" line. But her magical conflicts are excellent, and I would recommend the series to any fan of fantasy.
This is an old book, but the information in it is timeless. A boy about 10 relates short common situations and events that happen to him and how he felt. Then on the next page is a brief paragraph on how he dealt with the situation and how that impacted his feelings. Great for teaching children about thoughts and feelings that go with problems and how to handle them.
The premiere work from the War Between the States' best author. I've read nearly all of Bruce Catton's Civil War work and this one is the best--buy it and read it again and again.
I was half way through the first volume of Foote's epic 3 volume "The Civil War: a narrative" when I paused for a breather and read Catton's Hallowed Ground.So, compared to Foote's 3 volume The Civil War, Catton's Hallowed Ground provides a good overview of all the major battles in the Civil War. He had also included quotes from letters soldiers had written to family which I thought was a nice touch as it provided a different view of the civil war and illustrated how tough things were for them. What I also liked about Catton is that he had referenced the quotes and pointed to other books if you were interested in that particular regiment or battle.For someone new to the civil war, I would definitely recommend reading Catton's Hallowed Ground first then refer to Foote for more detailed description of the more interesting battles. However, as another reviewer here points out, there is a hint of bias in favour of the confederacy in Foote.
This film is AMAZING. Its now on my top ten list of the best films ever made.Great character development, and full of irony.It makes viewers realize how trivial and unimportant "things" are. It also makes me sick of American culture, because simplicity is not an acceptable part of life here. I gained a greater appreciation of what I have and that I don't need more. I love movies that make me think!
It's a special form of torture to watch DVDs that feature Africa's natural beauty when you live in China. The typical movie about what the Nazis did to the Jews doesn't make me feel a damn thing. They're so heavy-handed that all I come away with is blunt force trauma. This one's different. A family ran like hell to Kenya or Nairobi or some damn place in Africa so isolated that it doesn't even matter what we call it. Think of all the obvious themes you can. Then stretch your imagination and come up with a few more. All are covered here, with a subtle hand, and you feel it. Powerfully. You're moved. You cringe over here and laugh over there, and in this other place you just get kinda disgusted with some people. Autobiographical, and it deserves its Oscar and its other awards.
I wasn't able to enjoy the movie as much as I would have if only the subtitles were adequate to support the power of the movie. As a result, I wasn't able to fully appreciate the deepness and complexity of this cultural diversified movie. Anyhow, I still would like to recommend this to everyone especially those who can understand German. Definitely an Academy Award material!
This is a self-published book, and if you want to know why--read a few paragraphs! Those 5 star reviews must have been written by Ms. Haddon's family and friends--or perhaps, by herself! I can't imagine anyone reading the whole thing--I spent an evening with the book and a friend and we were in hysterics reading bits and pieces of it to one another. It is most definitely bad enough to be entered into some kind of a "worst book" contest. I can't believe Amazon even sells this kind of thing. Maybe I can offer them my 8th grade term paper on "To Kill a Mockingbird"--a book I am quite sure Ms. Haddon never heard of. Anyway, unless you are in a mood to send a book to someone as a joke---stay far, far away from this one!
A complete waste of time. Typographical errors, poor grammar, and a totally pathetic plot add up to absolutely nothing. I'm embarrassed for this author and very disappointed I actually paid for this book.
I guess you have to be a romance novel lover for this one, and not a very discerning one. All others beware! It is absolute drivel. I figured I was in trouble when a typo is prominently featured on the back cover, but the first page of the book removed all doubt. Wait - maybe I'm missing the point. A quick re-read of the beginning now makes it clear. This has to be an intentional churning of over-heated prose for satiric purposes. Phew, so glad I didn't waste $10.95 after all.
I feel I have to write to keep others from wasting their money. This book seems to have been written by a 7th grader with poor grammatical skills for her age! As another reviewer points out, there is a misspelling on the cover, and I believe there is at least one per chapter. For example, it was mentioned twice that she had a "lean" on her house. I was so distracted by the poor writing and weak plot, that I decided to read with a pencil in hand to mark all of the horrible grammar and spelling. Please don't waste your money. I too, believe that the good reviews must have been written by the author's relatives. I will not put much faith in the reviews from now on!
sizes are much smaller than what is recomended in the chart. I tried to put it and sheer it!. I guess you should not buy this item in the internet..it is better to go to the store and check it
Rather than scratches and insect droppings, this one has random pixelations combined with muddy light and vague image resolution. Probably the cue should have been the packaging is straight out of your street corner bootleg dealer.If you've ever seen a reasonably good condition film copy, you know the defining visuals of his film are the crystal clear lighting contrasts in black and white. The surrounding countryside and 'old home' scenes are set with early morning ground mists or the haze of memory while the events on the bridge and in the water are bright, clear, and immediate.Here everything is dull, dark, and clouded. Or, if you remember the timbre and enunciation of Captain's commands, so are the visuals.After that, it is hard to believe this award winning, critically acclaimed film's best presentation is on YOUTUBE. Somewhere "out there" is a DVD that comes up to the standard of a 16mm public library reel.Just none of them appear to be on Amazon.
I have had the charger for more than two years. It charges AA batteries just fine, but has a huge problem securing smaller AAA batteries. To charge the smaller batteries you need to flip down the little button at the positive end. In the beginning one of the four AAA batteries would pop up, and now three out of the four won't hold. The problem is the flip mechanism became loose, and any horizontal pressure would push the buttons back up. What I have to do now is using duct tape and a segment of crayon, apply the crayon on the buttons, and wrap the tape around. You know how painful that is.
I bought this charger in Jul 2003 and it worked OK for a while. The design is nice and convenient. However, after about a year, the batteries would not hold a charge. Might as well just get alkaline disposables, or look elsewhere for a charger that comes with batteries that have better staying power.
I also began having the incorrect disc problems that I've read about on here. The VCR still works, but hte DVD side is useless. I understand that DVD players sometimes just quit on you, but after not even one year? To me that's a sign on bad quality. I'm giving up JVC after this as well. I'm sticking to Sony or giving another brand a shot.
The plot is so ridiculous, I have to wonder if they even read the script before making this film. The mountain lion breaks out of his trailer - and the cars behind don't notice? The mountain lion is captured - and put in a jail cell? Get real! Utterly, completely stupid.
Firstly,I enjoyed the format and tone of the book (how the author addressed the reader). However, I did not feel that she imparted any insider secrets that the book promised to reveal. If you are just starting to research law school, and do not know all the requirements of admission, then this book may be a tremendous help. If you have done your homework and are looking for an edge when it comes to admissions, I recommend some more topic-specific books. For example, books on how to write your personal statment, books geared specifically towards LSAT preparation (Powerscore books were the most helpful for me), and there are some websites with great advice geared towards aiding the individuals whom you are asking to write letters of recommendation. Yet, for those new to the entire affair, this book can definitely clarify the requirements for you.
If you have even casually looked into applying to law school, have already read everything there is in this book, do not waste your money, seriously!!
It clearly says on line this will work on a Mac OS system. The disk comes and it does not, only Windows . Do Not order this if you have a Mac!!!!!!!
My experience: I got this from FM, not Amazon. The DVD player rattled pretty loudly sometimes (but not always) when I put in a DVD. I tried several. The picture quality wasn't all that great and the screen got a horizontal line thru the middle after a short time that would not go away. Plus one of the other reviewers was dead on about the remote - the layout makes no sense at all! Very poor human engineering, IMO. I brought it back to the store for a refund. I saw the same model under the Emerson name for <$400 at WM but was hesitant to buy it.
I bought this for my wife for her birthday,and had toreturn it because the DVD palyer would not work. I returned it and got a repalcement, which once again the DVD player failed to work! It is a piece of junk.
This TV is set so that it is not capable of a "recall" function. If you want to flash back between channels, this TV is not going to give it to you. The remote control that comes with the TV has no recall function, so I bought a Sony universal, which is a much better remote, that had the recall button on it. However, I soon learned that the TV is set at the factory to not have the capability to flash-back. It may not be a big deal to some, but this user found it very annoying.
I bought both this and lonely planet and have used lonely planet more because this book is full of pictures but doesn't give you all the info you need. Also, I ended up buying each indiv city guide as well because this one only scratches the surface!
If you want to listen to El Duke , then it is better if you have access to his shower,this is not him, it is a gimmick,very well orchestrated.
The text is the same as ever (I think), but the plates are markedly inferior to all previous editions. Had I known this ahead of time, I would not have purchased this volume.
The screen arrived in a cardboard box that was pretty beat up. The screen itself is very lightweight, very cheesy looking. The "finish" was worn across the entire top of the screen. I knew this wasn't solid brass, but I expected something that at least looked decent from a distance for the price I paid.
Purchased this screen last week and it came with noticeable scrapes across the top. The box it came in was gigantic with plenty of packaging material, but the screen was packaged loosely at the bottom. However, since it was in another smaller box, I'm thinking that the scraping was there to begin with, and not from shipping. Still deciding whether to go through the trouble of exchanging it since another reviewer said they had the same damage. I wouldn't want to risk getting another with the same damage and I really need a screen right now. Other than the damage, it's a very nice screen.
I ordered these shoes to replace the previous pair that had ripped apart at the sole. Clark said they did not make this shoe anymore, so I had to order them through Amazon. Sadly, the second pair ripped in the same place within 3 months. My son has since bought a similar pair from Sperry and they seem to be holding up much better.
I ordered this DVD and received a substitute I never received the DVD I ordered from Importcds (the Vendor). I contacted them and did not recieve any feedback. I can't rate a DVD I have never seen. I didn't bother to send it back because it would have cost me more that I orginally paid for it. In the future I will watch for the name of the person and/or persons I am buying from. I thought they were a good company. I understand a simple mistake but, to not get a response at all is not good businees sense. I spend hundreds of dollars a month on Amazon.com building my DVD collection. I guess I will be more careful in the future.
While the movie in itself was better than i expected what i didnt expect was the "non existent" Thai soundtrack. While the option was on the disc menu (as well as stated on the package) the Thai soundtrack does not exist. No matter what you choose, Thai or English, English is what you get and while there are some exceptions most dubbing is ridiculous at best and the dubbing on this title is sub par. While this review covers only the first movie of the two the other may remain in plastic never to see the inside of my dvd player. Its a shame and a sham when you purchase what claims to be original and is not. Very disapointed in this offering from Tokyo Shock.
This book drew air pretty bad. I have no idea why someone would waste their time writing it. Boy did it draw air. Do not read this book.
I ordered the cake topper June 27, 2010. I was given an estimated shipping date of July 1-7, 2010. Those dates came & went with no cake topper. I contacted the seller twice with no response. I filed a claim with Amazon. I did end up receiving a cake topper on July 16, 2010; however, it's not even the one I ordered! The seller did refund my money, but has never contacted me or apologized for the mishap. I will never buy anything from the seller again. I looked at the seller's feedback & I'm not the only person they have done wrong, so buyer beware!!
2 stars of 5 for this slow dull "classical" 1980's style movie. This movie has a young Jason Bateman in the lead. Very very very slow and dull with a few moments of bad 1980's style music. To our relief the background music (which is very annoying) is kept to a minimum. Though it attempts to be an action/suspense movie, it achieves neither. I'd suggest skipping this movie.
I am disappointed in its performance. It seems underpowered and is constantly trying to read CDs, half the time unsuccessfully. I am going to try to return it to Amazon.
I agree, the CDs are a much needed help, since it would be impossible to pronnounce the Yoruba tones without the help of a native speaker. However, the design of the book is really poor and confusing. I have found several spealling mistakes in English and Yoruba. And the grammar explanations are very hard to understand.Unfortunately there are not many Teach Yourself Yoruba books that are worth it. This one at least provides basic vocabulary and pronounciation skills.
I did not know this was the audio cd of the game, I thought it could be used on the playstation. Maybe the other guys are from the US or somewhere where it is actually easy to get the game,and play it,but this was all in japanese and was not compatible with my machine. I am deeply disappointed as i love the arcade game, but the Dance stage euromix (Dance Dance Revolution equivalent) is lacking in decent tracks, many are jungle-y and are difficult to dance to them. Also, most of these tracks are unheard of here and are therefore not very enjoyable. However, my favourite are Keep on moving, make a Jam, and Video Killed the Radio star. But it gets a bit pedantic if you keep playing on these tracks. If anyone is in the same situation as I am, or those of you who are lucky enough the play on the newest version, can you please let me know where I can order one? I am in dance deprivation/boredom!
I did not know this was the audio cd of the game, I thought it could be used on the playstation. Maybe the other guys are from the US or somewhere where it is actually easy to get the game,and play it,but this was all in japanese and was not compatible with my machine. I am deeply disappointed as i love the arcade game, but the Dance stage euromix (Dance Dance Revolution equivalent) is lacking in decent tracks, many are jungle-y and are difficult to dance to them. Also, most of these tracks are unheard of here and are therefore not very enjoyable. If anyone is in the same situation as I am, or those of you who are lucky enough the play on the newest version, can you please let me know where I can order one? I am in dance deprivation/boredom!
i like letters from home cuz it tells a story that if you really listen you can acctually hear john michael montgomery tell his story of soldiers and all that stuffi liked it and i like punk rock and rock so it must be good if i like it
this book is a great over view of the joints used in building but has no information on beam spans or loads to actually build a building
This book vaguely breezed across history and went into various types of timber structures. The mortise and tenon joints that were illustrated were fascinating but not practical for a home builder.
These wraps were not doing anything when we placed them in "hot" water. We searched the internet and found others having the same problem. The instructions are very poor. First off, you need to dip in boiling water (or at least some temperature level above what I would call hot). Second, the instructions don't describe what should happen, should the image shrink around the egg, transfer to it -- what?Needless to say, it was frustrating for a minute or two, but my wife - who is very intelligent and great in the kitchen - immediately thought, "well... hot water wouldn't do much to change the properties of the plastic, so let's try boiling water - nothing to lose."Should be more explicit in the instructions. (We were using the star wars version of this product).
Although I was excited to purchase this book, my excitement didn't last when I looked at the sketches / pictures in the book. I call them pictures because that is what they truly are, not actual patterns. Norma Gregory's talent shows up well in her designs but due to their complicated rendering they are very difficult to transfer.This book is not for beginners - but more seasoned artisans.If you are looking for patterns, like I was, you will be disappointed in this book.
This product smells when you open the package and it appears one of the gel cushions leaks so I spent $10 and havent worn then. I wouldnt buy this product again. Dont waste your money on something you may not be able to use.
I first tried buying this tape from a Marketplace seller. I sent it back because the tape quality was poor and the packaging looked unprofessional. After returning it I bought one from Amazon proper and . . . it was the same quality tape and the same packaging. Since I'm now sure this is not a bootleg tape, all I can say is . . . some videos are better than others.
Classic drawing room comedy, period piece. Cleverly written in a time when the audience needed a bit of a nudge to figure out each character. Each person's name describes how you should feel about each! Charming idea from the 1700's. If you've never had a chance to see one of these comedies, take a look. This is a famous play and well done. Must see for theatre students.
This CD compilation set was purchased for me. I love the 80s, and they chose great songs. The songs are not performed by the original artists. Instead, they're poorly covered by "the Starlite Singers".
I should have read the prior reviews of this record before buying it. Although it appears to be a collection of new wave singles from the 80s, these are just cover versions sung by the "Starlite Singers". The description of the record says that it is by "various artists" implying that they are by the original artists, but this is not true. Total garbage. The one bright spot is that I got a prompt refund when I returned it.
This is one of those cheesy compilations where they find session bands and similar sounding artists to sing the songs. These are NOT ORIGINAL SONGS BY THE ARTISTS. If you loved K-TEL CD's and don't care about hearing the artists originals, and don't care about cheap sounding synthesizers playing the music or that fact that some of the vocalists are pretty bad, then you might like this cd. But if you are a fan of the 80's and the amazing music it produced, then buy other collections and don't waste your money on this schlock!!!!
Bought this camera for Christmas. Had her open it first so she could film the nights party & NO TAPES ARE INCLUDED! Of course all stores are closed Christmas day so the thing is USELESS until the day after. Shame on Sony. How much would a tape included in the packace cost them ? Not included Battery chargers are ....
If you purchase this data cable, you need to know that you will receive no real directions or information regarding what to check if nothing works. As directed, I downloaded all of the files from the SE site (70MB on dial up!), and then downloaded all of the user guides. Everything seemed to install ok, but nothing would make my phone be recognized. After that I scoured the SE site for troubleshooting info on their branded cable-in the hope that something would help me figure out the problem. After 2 full days of beating my head against the wall, I finally threw the cable and the useless CD that came with it in the trash.If I had used my brain I would have paid the extra $$ for a SE branded cable and software (and the support that comes along with that). I now have the real deal (SE data cable and software), and guess what? Yep, installation was a breeze and it works beautifully. You really do get what you pay for.
An embarassment. Steer clear of this one folks. Just when you thought these guys were the last real "fusion" types about...Since when did the last great secret of the fusion world start taking pointers from Joe Satriani and listening to old Al DiMeola pratice sessions? Where the hell is Phil when you need him, oh yes, Tarzan. The star is for the Bruford and Wilding/Bonus tracks, and well does one really want those?
I purchased the Alphabet blocks for my twin daughters. They are just over 8 months old and they love them. This product is a great learning tool for them for years to come but for now it a great teething toy!!! I would recommend this to anyone, plus I love Fisher Price.
I bought these for two reasons- blocks and educational letters. However, the letters are rubbing off. For the price I paid that was dissapointing. Other than that I love the concept and the objects inside are fun.
Molly Myers, in her review of "My Name is Rachel Corrie," describes the ISM as "an organization dedicated to non-violence." This is radical left-wing propaganda: ISM offices have regularly been used to hide terrorists and their weapons, ISM "pacifists" regularly throw rocks at IDF soldiers, and they're perfectly willing to use violence in order to sabotage the wall intended to keep "innocent Palestinians" from murdering Israelis.So please disregard Molly's reviews; they are biased in the extreme.
The official Chrono Trigger OST has 3 discs. This version has some of the major tracks on it, the audio quality is good, but Caveat Emptor (buyer beware) this is a Chinese knock-off.Oh and if you buy the 3 disc version, make sure the cover does not have a green and red logo reading "FX", for this is also a counterfeit. The serial numbers on the real soundtrack CDs are PSCN-5021, PSCN-5022, and PSCN-5023.
These are the handful of tracks we hear over and over again. It's far from complete though.Missing such memorable tracks as "sealed Door", "wings across time" or "At the Bottom of the Night".It doesn't have a single battle theme accept the final boss.Hell this doesn't even have Lucca's theme and she's on the cover!Had I seen a track-list beforehand I wouldn't have bought this.I blame my self for not being more curious of the number of CD's.I'm sorry I paid $35 dollars American for this travesty, may Lavos have mercy on my soul.Save your selves(and your money) while you still can!
I watched this last night. And I don't remember enough of it to give it a indepth review. But it wasn't as bad as people are letting on nor was it as great as people are letting on. If you don't like your killer to be supernatural then don't bother with this. Its about a guy that comes back from the dead. His whole storyline is kinda silly and there are plot holes all over the place. The acting wasn't bad at all, and neither were the deaths. In fact it was kinda gory. But that doesn't make a great movie. The flashbacks were a little confusing as well. I wouldn't watch it again. But its far from the worst movie I've seen.
MASK MAKER takes us down a cinematic path often traveled and does it in a typically predictable fashion. A story of revenge with an unstoppable killer who murders his victims and uses their skinned faces to achieve some kind of beauty. Flashbacks reveal his motivation in an attempt to elicit some level of sympathy.MASK MAKER isn't the worst entry in this familiar territory but it doesn't tread new waters either. The cast performs on various levels of competence. WEEKEND AT BERNIE's Terry Kiser is an effective guilt-ridden buffoon. Treat Williams is ill-used in a cameo role. Horror vet Michael Berryman is unusually restrained in a small role. Nikki Deloach is no Jamie Lee Curtis in her leading role, giving a weak performance in a typical survivor role as the resilient resourceful female. Doomed fiance Stephen Colletti (sic) is equally flaccid.An open-ended finale paves the way for MASK MAKER II---something we definitely don't need.
You get what you pay for. This pillow is stiff and smelled like drying paint for 4 days. I thought I was getting a non name brand version of the Temperpedic pillow. I bought the real pillow for my mother years ago and paid many times the price. This thing doesn't even come close.
The pillow is tiny and poor quality foam, my pillow I was replacing was at least a year and a half old and it preforms better than this one did new.
It worked fine in the beginning. 2 months or so into using it its performance was up in the air. I would find myself sleeping with one hand under the pillow to give it some leverage; otherwise my neck would end up in an awkward position. At times it felt like I needed to have 2 pillows because it was lacking in width and was too soft. I had to also rotate what end and what side I would lay my head/neck on. It, therefore, did not provide the support I needed.
The pillow I received is nothing like the one in the picture. The pillow that I received is approx half the size (in thickness) as the one I received. I am not happy with the seller (Moshelle's). I will never purchase from this company ever again. I am currently deployed Military and I feel that this company is very disrespectful and does not show it's Military members the proper courtesy when dealing with such issues. Do not buy this pillow, you will not be satisfied.
The formulation of this product has been changed since Artec was bought by L'Oreal. The new formula doesn't hold hair like the old Artec original formula did, and it doesn't smell as nice. Don't be fooled by this picture (12/29/07)--it is a pic of the old Artec bottle, but I ordered and received the new L'Oreal Professionel version, which is terrible. The original Artec version was similar to, but not as sticky as, Potion 9. I wish L'Oreal would go back to the old formula :( I emailed them to this effect and they never even replied. If anyone can recommend a similar product, please comment to this review.
I have been used this product for many years. But somehow the product I received this time is like fake one. It's very thin. I have to used double amount.
I have been using this product for 5+ years. It was wonderful. About 1 year ago the company changed packaging and the product changed slightly. The bottle is taller now and something is missing from the serum. Doesn't work as well as it used to work. I will not be purchasing this item because of the change.
I bought this for my 4 year old's birthday. While I think the graphics are really great, the concept stinks. My daughter told me she thinks it is boring (and she LOVES Barbie) and last night she even said she hates it! At least my 15 month old screams with delight at the graphics when her older sister plays with it.
The fire truck puzzle arrived in the time that was stated. It is very colorful and well worth the price. The puzzle is a Christmas gift for a 2 year old, so at this time I can't state how he liked it. But I am very pleased with the quality.
I suppose if you were going to sit in the same room and have line-of-sight with the device, lamp, etc. plugged into this control, it might work. Maybe. But I had it completely within the stated range and one basic house wall separating me and the unit, and it was completely unreliable.I'd recommend spending a touch more money and getting a higher quality product.
What am I reviewing here... this gizmo or the supplier, Eforcity? I never received this product after my order! After waiting and waiting I contacted Eforcity several times -- no reply. After a nasty letter from me Eforcity'r reply feigned lacking information about my mailing address!What a cop-out.I told them I would not pay for it, so Eforcity said they'd give me a refund, which has not come to me yet. I bought another product to replace this from Amazon which arrived quickly from Amazon.
It worked about 40% of the time when I was standing less than two feet from the outlet. When I moved eight to ten feet away it worked about 5% of the. I would not recommend it.
I bought this book because I am a nonogram (also called Paint By Number) addict, and can't get enough of this type of puzzle. My disappointment is not so much with the quality of the puzzles within it but with the quality of the publishing. The paper is poor quality; it won't hold up under much erasing if you use pencil, and if you use gel pens, the ink bleeds through to the other side. The squares to color in are too large, making the finished image very pixillated and hard to make out. Also, the guide numbers are located at the right and bottom edges of the puzzle, instead of left and top, making it more difficult for a right-handed person to see while solving.Save your money, and buy the Games Magazine publication instead.
Unless you are under obligation to read this for some sort of class, I would not recomend wasting yout time trying to wade through the quagmire of redundantly long, boring text. If I could pay attention to it for more than two sentences at a time, most likely I would find it to have a wealth of information; but it's dry, overly-intellecual style makes it impossible to stay interested. If you're looking for a challenge to read, you face two; deciphering the nealry 300 pages of rediculously long sentences, and staying awake. I even go so far as to say reading it is a complete waste of time, because the energy you must invest to understand this work' coupled witht the frustration of an endlessly boring stlye does not even compared to the information you will actually get out of it.
To read this book you need to be fully awake and have full concentration. This is not the type of book to bring to the beach. Though Richard Hofstadter makes a convincing case of what colonial times were like and he obviously was a scholar, he writes very monotonously. if not thouroughly interested in american history at 1750 i would not recommend this book. otherwise, if you are a history-fanatic, this book gives a wide range of perspectives and fully covers the history of the time.
I never write reviews but I just felt compelled after I saw this video. It's 70% listening to parents and kids think about Thomas and maybe 30% Thomas related. What is worse is that you have to fast forward through a bunch of the rambling in order to see what amounts to a 5 minute story. And, there is only one song in the "Sing A Long". I really liked Thomas stories after watching them on PBS with my daughter. Next time, I will try to find those stories on video. They actually last about 15 minutes and do not involve mindless prattle from people I don't know.
My children get easily bored with this video. I thought it was several episodes of Thomas but it has A LOT of just children and parents talking about Thomas and all. It doesn't keep the kids attention because what kid wants to sit and listen to a bunch of talking. This was my first Thomas video purchase...hopefully the next will have more shows and less talking!
This is a DVD with footage of a "Come Out and Meet Thomas" day mixed in between the episodes. Sort fo a promotional piece to be honest. Still decent enough to rent. The DVD extras are limited and not very good. My son seems to like it o kay but it gets pushed aside for more interactive stuff to be found on Sodor Celebration. There is also a ton of toys shown during the "party/interview" footage which can be a good or bad thing depending on how much you need to control that sort of thing with your child. Also I for one get annoyed at the interviewes not sure why they just annoy me. This production has the feel of an old VHS video copied to DVD without much added to it. I wouldn't throw it out but I wouldn't buy it either.
I bought this thinking it would be packed with Thomas stories. Turns out there are only ten, which is a typical Thomas DVD. However, between each story, it also has interviews with parents and their kids about what they like about Thomas. As I parent, I'm not interested in this, and I know that my 3 year old would rather watch Thomas than a bunch of strangers any day. Plus, the sing-along section has one song. One. We have other Thomas videos that has at least 4, and they aren't special DVD's, just normal Thomas collections. I wouldn't recommend this to anyone, if you are looking for solely Thomas stories and can find other collections.
Unless I missed something, there are only one or two actual episodes on this DVD. The rest is a long commercial for the Thomas the Train centers and an ode to Ms. Allcroft. Waste of money.
Has too many interviews with people at the Live THomas day in Penn. My kids were annoyed and hated this DVD.
My 2 year old son is huge Thomas fan. This DVD has long introductions to each story in which children and adults are interviewed - my son couldn't care less. He just wants to see trains! We have a portable DVD player, and it is a big pain to try to fast forward past these introductions, and he (and I) just ends up frustrated. My advice - pick another DVD.
All the interspersed kid and parent interviews where they talk about all the trains they have just feels like a thinly disguised effort to sell more product.It's also AWFULLY frustrating that you can't jut buy the DVD Series here as you can in the UK, but have to make do with compilations where there are invariably episode duplications.*sigh*
I got the shippment quickly. But wrong items was sent. I have to return it to the seller. I got the refund pretty quick, but only for the value of product. I spent about &10 for two way shipping without geting anything.
Did not like the pants at all, and threw them in the trash rather than pay return postage. Flimsy, smelled of dye, cheap fabric, etc. Too bad.
Merchant was out of stock on the second pair of pants, so when it was shipped I was charged $9 again when the second pair was in stock weeks later.Will not buy from Amazon vendors again.
Dockers are Dockers, so that's not the problem. Just be sure you don't trust the images if you choose to buy these via Amazon. "Cafe," for example, should be "Coffee." Despite the fact that the image for "Cafe" shows a stone or very light gray color, "Cafe" is actually dark brown. So the product isn't defective, but IS misleading: I didn't want brown pants, but that's what I got.
I have worn these pants for years; my size is the same as always. I couldn't get them on; they were so tight I couldn't get the button buttoned around the waist. What is going on? These pants seemed to be cut for a skinny 25 year old, not someone who is a little on the hefty side. Further, the shipping and handling charges are just out of sight...$16.95 above and beyond the already rather pricy product. I would not recommend doing business with this seller at all. You can go to other outlets and get the same thing without the shipping and handling, and there are "deals" out there from major store chains. I was really disappointed in this product and the seller. Go to WalMart and get their khakis; they are very inexpensive and wear like iron.
This is one of the worst written books I have ever read.I wish I had saved my money and my time.The book is full of superlatives. Everything is "the best ever experienced" again and again.The characters NEVER become embraceable. One male character is pathetic while the other is a jerk. The female lead is portrayed as perhaps innocently unaware, but is really just stupid. Her friend is promiscuous, which is all we ever really get to know of her.The writing is at a level well below that of an adult reader. But, the content could not possibly be meant for a younger reader. Very inappropriate.Not sure who would really like this book.Maybe someone who really likes descriptions of food and does not care about plot, story development, characterization or any other facets of literature.Find yourself something with a little more substance, and I think you'll be much happier.
Generally speaking a great book if you are not familiar with management accounting and turning heaps of information into valuable reports for your top management group. No doubt about it: This book will provide the basic tools for keeping your boss happy, especially if you need a brush-up on moving averages, etc. Having vast experience with both advanced financial and non-financial analysis on various aspects of business (shipping and construction), this book was somewhat a let down in terms of ability to inspire and provide ways to improve personal skills to structure and present complex topics in an ordered and clear fashion. A nice bedtable-reader for the pre-MBA. MBAs should look elsewhere.
THERE BEATS ARE DIFFERENT THAN NO LIMITS BUT THERE FROM THA SAME PLACE AND THERE GHETTO HOOD IS VERY CLOSE.THEY RAP JUST LIKE NO LIMIT.BUT NO LIMIT WAS FIRST AND IT WILL BE THA LAST.NO LIMIT IS STILL NUMBER1 IN EVERY WAY.
cash money records is going to have to up with something a lil better than this if they plan on making it in this game.the beats where alright but the rappers a terrible.none of the have a goog flow to accomidate the beats.try again cmr.maybe next time.
I can't believe how much this cd sucks, save yourself 17 bucks & just download the "we on fire" mp3 its the only decent track on the album. And if u r looking for more "bounce" party tracks like "back that ass up" too bad; u won't find any here. What a rip.
ALL I WILL SAY IS THIS WAS A GREAT RELEASE WHEN I FIRST BOUGHT IT AND I WOULD HAVE GIVEN IT A FOUR, BUT AFTER HAVING HEARD JUVENILE'S 400 DEGREEZ TODAY (SEPT. 30, 1999) FOR THE FIRST TIME (NOTE: YES, I KNOW I'M LATE LISTENING TO JUVENILE'S 400 DEGREEZ) I WAS VERY DISAPPOINTED WITH MANIE FRESH AND JUVENILE. JUVENILE'S 400 DEGREEZ IS THE BEST CD SINCE SNOOPS'S DOGGYSTYLE AND DRE'S CHRONIC. BUT THIS CD IS NOTHING COMPARED TO JUVENILE'S 400 DEGREEZ! IF YOU DON'T HAVE 400 DEGREEZ, GO BUY THAT ONE INSTEAD OF THIS!
This is what is in the dictionary under wack. I can't belive that this many people bought this (...) The hot boys are just a fad like bellbottoms. (...) If you think this is what rap is about u just plain stupid and I'm glad this hot boy stuff is almost over wit. When some of my friends play this crap in the car I just rather get out and walk.
just like No-Limit Cash Money has no shame at putting out garbage music.wack beats and no lyric ryhmes.who is buying this crab? all the stuff sounds the same and it's not that average.it's all bad.
i like the Hot Boys and really like Juvenile, but this is not good. the only thing good is "we on fire" and "I need a hot girl". just download those 2 songs onto your Ipod and skip this album.
Guerriula Warfare is an album I fell is something, and that something is everything. The lyrics are most of the time meanless and pointless. Also the beat and backround music of the songs sometimes don't even fit could for the lyrics or how the rapper is rapping. Overall please go out and get another Hotboy album or something. Or just another album in the lines of Cash Money, just please not this one...
FIRST OF ALL HOW COME ALL YA'LL BE DISSIN' NO LIMIT (for all ya'll that did not diss em' dis ain't for you) WHAT YA'LL TALKLIN ABOUT CASH MONEY CAN NEVER GET WITH NO LIMIT AND THAT IS A FACT..... AND YOU ALL BE TALKIN ABOUT THEY BE SATIN THE SAY SHIT WHAT ABOUT THTA SORRY LIL' WAYNE BE SAYIN THE SAME SHIT FROM JUVENILE'S ALBUM AND B.G.'S BLING BLING(HA HA) WHAT KIND OF SONG IS THAT AND THEY BE SAYIN THEY FROM THE 3RD NO LIMIT HAS BEEN SAYIN THAT FOR THE LONGEST AND THEN THEY HAVE TO COME AND SAY THAT SHIT AMD THEN THEY START MAKIN' THEIR ALBUM COVER LIKE THEM WHAT KIND OF SHIT IS THAT THE ONLY PEOPLE THAT ARE TRU FORM CASH MONEY IS THE BIG TYMERS AND THAT IZ ALL I HAVE TO SAY AND NO ONE I MEAN NO ONE CAN GET WITH MY BOY 50$ FROM NO LIMIT IF YOU A REAL NO LIMIT YOU KNOW WHO HE IS..... AND I LIKE TO GIVE A SHOT OUT TO MY SOLDIERS.. HOODY HOOO....
I got this throat spray in a hurry hoping to relieve my 3.5 yo daughter from a bad sore throat. It tastes awful, and it's just not meant for a young child. I got it after a recommendation from another mom, and it was a bad decision. I'll keep it to numb a scratched-up knee or elbow.
The bench is very nice. I had a few pieces that looked like they were painted over scratches and some of the metal were scratched. I was unsure of some of the screws as you can not tighten it too much or is strips the plastic. wasnt sure on the indents on the metal bars which way they were suppose to go on. the bench broke after sitting on it three times. The glider bar broke. the weld is not very good or sturdy.
Chair is the product ordered, however it came with gauges in the arms. The chair was well packed and the damage appeared to have happened at the factory before wrapping for shipment. Poor quality control. Not worth returning the product. Other than that, the bench is substantial and as promised. I have pictures taken while I was unwrapping, but couldn't figure out how to include them.
I am a huge fan of Seal's first 3 albums, so I rushed out to buy this one the minute it came out. What a disappointment!! Most of the songs sound like old remixes of Curtis Mayfield tunes. The only 2 with that eerie signature 'Seal' sound are 'heavenly' and 'tinsel town'. I'd say go to Itunes....listen to the songs...buy the tunes you like (if there are any) and call it a day.
The idea behind God was in this Place and I, i did not know it is excellent. Take the famous line from Jacob at Beth-el, and see how it has been interpreted throughout the ages by various Jewish worthies. In the process, have them talk to Jacob in a kind of free form midrash, unshackled by time. And since the writer is Rabbi Lawrence Kushner, add a bit a personal reflection and home grown stories.All the elements are here, but the book never gets off the ground. In juggling so many elements in so short a space, Kushner gets lost, and the book lacks a real sense of forward momentum or thrust. This would have been a good idea for two, maybe even three books. Kushner would have then allowed himself the luxury of exploring some of the very good themes he has laid down here and not fully explored.
If you want to watch a movie where a couple meets, falls in love, gets married, almost breaks up, have cat fights, get angry, make up, has new problems, lie to each other, hurt each other again, almost break up, really do break up, cry, yell at each other, cry again, then finally make up because there's not really anything else to do - then this is the movie for you.If you do, for some reason, decide to watch this, watch it to the point where they get married -THEN TURN IT OFF (being bollywood, thats about the length of a regular movie anyway).
My children and I love the little Critter books. This is a great book, but it was not bound well. The book fell out of the cover within a few days of recieving it.
Before I begin, let me just say that I absolutely love her Dark series. Those books are great. This one had potential, but it just fell flat. Her characters simply weren't developed enough this time for me to relate to them. This effort was decent but not at all up to her usual standards.
This book was a major disappointment. It was missing that special spark that made Ms Feehan's other novels (especially Dark Desire) something special. I found the book had very little action, little romance, and a "mystery" plot that was never very mysterious or suspenseful. This is definitely not a book that I will pass on to my friends and family to read.
This book had great potential that it did not live up to. I hope she goes back to writing more "Dark Series" books. This book needed more action and more editing - it was way too long for the amount of plot it had. :-(
i was really disappointed with this book. The other ones that she has wrote were very good but this one was dull. it was as if she rushed to put a new book out and didn't take the time to make it interesting. i would still read other books that she writes but i wouldn't read this one again.
I first found Christine Feehan's work through 'Dark Prince'. It was an excellent read and has had me hooked on the whole series! I thought this book would be the same - not even close. The Scarlatti Curse is humdrum. Before I reached halfway I really didn't care about the characters. The secondary characters were underdeveloped and the main characters were two dimensional. I also did not get a feeling for the period or the place. In short it seemed like a short story plot that was enlarged to take advantage of her success with the Carpathian series. Please Christine don't write any more like this.
First, let me say, I'd heard that I might find the Dark Series of Christine Feehan's my cup of tea and for some unknown reason, thought this was one in the series - no need to tell you, I was severely disappointed (and confused).This book really reminded me of the romances my Mother used to read back in the 70's - blech! Lots of dark male broodiness, all written from the heroines point of view, and of course she's a young innocent virgin._____________edited to add: I really wish I had only given this one star, but it appears I can't change that now.
I really like Christine Feehan. This book was very dissapointing. The plot had promise. Nicoletta was a sweet heroine. The prose were good, and the medival Italy setting was an interesting change of pace. However, the plot flows like molasses in January. I managed to get half way through before I through the book down and went back to the 'Dark' series.
I've had the camcorder for a while now, and was hoping to be able to use the USB streaming feature to make small computer movies and send them to my friends and family overseas. Although the camcorder is good the included software is weak and the USB streaming makes a very choppy poor quality AVI file. I recently got a new computer and could not find the device driver disk that came with the camcorder. Sony technical support was a joke and they ended up trying to sell me a driver for my camcorder. So now I have a camcorder that I can plug into my TV or record onto a VHS (Do people still use VHS?) but any dreams I have of putting something on my computer are fading fast. I'm going to have to find a new way to send my parents the video I took of my new house.Frankly in this day and age an analogue camcorder is a waste of money.
I bought it new in 2002 for $400. The color is pretty good. The resolution is very poor, only close shot get you satified. Other than that you get blur edge and barrel distortion sometimes. I didn't use it a lot for the first 3 years, only the last 2 years I used it regularly to tape my daughter's piano class homework every 2 weeks for 5-8 minutes each time. Recently I have to knock this camera extremly hard several times to make the recording start (It's common issue as the piano teacher told me.). So I have to find a new camcorder now. I don't know what can I do if it refuses to work one day in my daughter's piano class.
We purchased this bag for a vacation we were taking a cruise and we wanted to use it when we left the ship. The bag was convenient to carry, however the faux leather began peeling. At first it wasn't so bad but then it became annoying because it then began flaking all over your skin and clothes. I would have rather the bag been a cloth bag with no flaking than the faux leather that I had to keep wisking away from my skin and clothes.
I listened to the audio version of "Cruel & Unusual" on a recent trip to New Jersey and back. The first 2/3 of the book kept me on the edge of my seat, then... the whole thing collapsed in a heap at the end. Would have been much better if the author had stuck to writing a taut thriller instead of trying to drag in everything from evil Republican office holders to Nazi war criminals, all dumped into the mix at the last possible moment. After all the buildup, the "who" of the whodunnit ends up being... nobody in particular. And the fate of the evildoer? Nothin' much. Disappointing. Won't bother with Dr. Scarpetta or Ms. Cornwall again.I'm a little baffled by all the reviews that say, "great book, bad ending..." and still give it 3 stars or more. Isn't a mystery DEFINED by the ending, by how the author ties up all the loose ends and red herrings?
My first foray into this writer was her latest book, Scarpetta. I enjoyed it....so I purchased this effort and several others she had written. I was a bit disheartened to find that all of her books have basically the same formula and character studies. After a while reading her work becomes less than stimulating. It becomes trite.
In a word, Lacking. Her style of writing left me unable to appreciate the underlying story which, as a result, I found rather vacuous and inauthentic. So much so that I felt compelled to come write a review of this book so others might avoid making the same mistake I did. No offence Patricia.
The good: The basic plot line is interesting- a man who has just been killed by the electric chair has his finger print turn up at a murder scene. The writing itself is good. The main character Kay Scarpetta and an old professor of hers are well `fleshed out'.The bad: Other characters are not well `fleshed out'. The plot never fully explains itself. Is the book about figuring out how a dead criminal could commit crimes - or is it about Scarpetta - redeeming herself in the eyes of everyone around her - after developing an anti-social workaholic tendency after the death of a loved one? The latter seems to be the path the author choose - leaving some of the twist in the plot unresolved. Though others in the story have made Scarpetta out to be the villain (on many different levels - as a family member, as a friend and as a professional) in the end her `goodness' is redeemed. How the bad guys in the story turn out seems to be unimportant - which I found to be a major flaw.
This movie was not only NOT funny, but it was excruciatingly boring. I think Adam was channeling the Aristocrats. Whilst Aristocrats was not as funny as it thought itself to be, it was still better than this garbage.
Entertaining in places but spoilt by lots of crudeness and dirty talk that degrades woman. In the end I found nothing memorable or funny about this film. Sad for Adam to seem him in such a trashy film.
This movie was perhaps Adam Sandler's worst effort. He seemed tasked with the burden of playing a man who was apathetic, but he came across as being apathetic about the role. The result was that his performance never engaged viewers to want to pull for him, which made the climax of the film lackluster. It was occasionally funny, considering the title and cast of comedians, who played comedians. The last 45 minutes, the film changes pace entirely, as if it wasn't floundering enough, and drops its attempts at weak comedy to push even weaker drama. Despite all the big names and cameo appearances, the only real stand out was Leslie Mann, who plays Sandler's ex. She was the only lively force in the cast, but sadly, alone she wasn't enough to bring it back into focus. You're not missing a thing.
I used to enjoy Sandler's movies but this one is just....jeez, how to put it? Well, UNFUNNY.All characters are if not stupid, shallow and egotistical...Don't care how 'dramatic' was this supposed to be, his misogynistic prick persona is the worst ever. Just, don't watch it, really...You'll want those minutes from your life back.
I should have known going into this movie having Judd Apatow a part of it would mean I would hate it. However, having Adam Sandler in it and seeing the previews in the theater we gave it a (very hopeful) chance. The movie loses it's true premise of having depth in amongst the terrible & crude "jokes". I have to say we didn't make it more than 30 minutes into the movie before turning it off. It is a constant barrage of pathetic behavior. I just don't believe that there are this many people out here that are like this and can relate to this behavior. Very Disappointing.
This is not a typical Adam Sandler movie, which is not necessarily a bad thing, but it kind of is here. First of all it's not funny. It's about "comedy" but I wouldn't consider the movie itself to be a comedy, although there are a few funny things in it I suppose. This movie seems like it's all over the place. It has a long runtime but it doesnt really accomplish much. Some people might like the story, but it was pretty dull to me.
Adam Sadler plays an unlikable comedian, George Simmons, who finds out he may be terminal with AML and tries an experimental drug. He decides to do stand up again when he meets comedian wanna-be Ira Wright (Seth Rogen) attempting stand-up. Sadler is impressed by Ira and hires him to write jokes and to be his personal go-fer. Ira finds out about the illness and convinces George to tell his family and friends about it. George plays the death card to patch up relationships, then suddenly he isn't going to die anymore. George re-examines his life, but even at mid-life he is still an immature a-hole. Everyone has sex but Ira, which seems to be a sad joke.I found the jokes and humor to be at best, lame. The language was crude and sexual. Brief nudity. Perhaps what is best about the movie is that it makes sit-coms look really lame. If you think a guy saying "tweet" over and over again, spinning around in a circle is funny, then this movie is for you.
Too bad Adam Sandler could not have been given a better script. Funny People starts with promise as a Jim Carrey Man on the Moon type film and then drifts oddly into some sort of romantic comedy with repetitive c**k jokes. There are two movies here made from what seems like two first drafts. Maybe it is a marketing problem. Or, maybe just lazy writing. Sandler does a great job showing off the dark side of a comedian. Maybe Funny People would have been better as a straight drama.
Wow, I usually like Adam Sandler & Judd Apatow/Seth Rogen films but this one came and left the theaters before I could get a chance to see it. I don't think I laughed once during the entire movie. Not even a chuckle. It seems as if no one was having any fun making this film. The unnecessary over the top crudeness of Apatow's ensemble doesn't seem to work with Sandler's schtick. I loved "Knocked Up" and "40 Year Old Virgin" but there doesn't seem to bee much chemistry with this group. I was waiting for "Bruno" to show up and throw in some more unnecessary genital conversation. I almost bought this, I'm so glad I only rented it.
I seriously did not expect a dramatic look into the mind of a comedian when I rented this movie. They marketed this movie like the Forty Year Old Virigin and Knocked Up! When I rented the movie I expected a lot of humour and with so many funny actors I put way too much faith in it. My wife and I was so disappointed that we stopped watching it. I don't watch a lot of TV, but when I do watch something I want it to be worth while.If you're into these artsy films about the serious life of people in the spotlight, then you're going to like this film. However, if you're looking for humour like Adam Sandler's previous films (i.e. Happy Gilmore, etc) then you can forget about it.I give this film 1 star because this is not my kind of movie and it was advertised like a great comedy film not drama film. :/
This is one of the worst movies I have seen. The dialogue is awful. There is ZERO humor. All the characters are boring and completely humorless.What a loser movie!!!!!!!!!!!!!
Anything with Adam Sandler in it is supposed to be funny. This however, just, well, wasn't. I really do believe that this movie had potential, but there was so much going on, so many stories within the story, that they could have made 3 movies out of it.It's 2 and a half hours long. That's about an hour and a half too long for the main story plot. This movie honestly seemed longer than Titanic, or Gone With The Wind because it is so long and drawn out.There is very little humor in Funny People. The only good thing about it is all the major stars that pop up here and there, which is probably why, in my opinion at least, that this movie even made it to the big screen and didn't go straight to DVD.
A truly great example - of how terrible some movies have become!! Vulgar!! Offensive. Unnessisary nudity!! I usually love Adam Sandler - and can't believe he'd stoop so low in this role. Seth is highly likeable in this - but still swears and lowers himself as well. The woman who plays Adams 'romantic interest' is mostly great - but also stoops to swearing - blantant sexuality. The writing is the worst in this movie. This awful movie is 2 hours and 22 minutes long - but only feels like 5 hours. - And I could have spent my life doing something more interesting and exciting like watching paint dry or grass grow. I suggest skipping this movie altogether!! Tragic where movies have gone to. Much has been lost!!Scott MacNeil - comedian.
Honestly if you don want to hear a lot of swearing you wont like this. Let alone the story line was ridiculous. Wouldn't recommend!
I normally love Sandler's movies but this was just horrible. None of it flowed right, jokes were horrible vand stupid and just all around made no sense. Don't waste your time and money on this.
I must say I never liked Adam Sandler. There were so many more talented people who just never got a chance to be on the screen. I still don't get what's with Adam Sandler.Besides that I decided to give it a shot. It took half hour when I stopped watching.
How can anybody even smile with the kind of garbage Adam Sandler ALWAYS performs?This guy is just a moronic retard.DO NOT WASTE YOUR MONEY ON HIM.
This movie was not an original concept. The jokes were lame, as were the performances. The writer and director disappointed the audience by using Adam Sandler, Seth Rogen and Jonah Hill as a box office draw. When in fact, it wasn't worth the money to see this film in a theatre.
Save your money. Your time can be MUCH better spent. This was one of the worse movies I ever sat through. Actually, I drifted away close to the end and was thankful I didn't waste that time. Its AWFUL.
Not worth the time.Pros: there were several good one-liners; introduced me to new comediansCons: excess foul language; adultry;
This is a nasty, mean-spirited book that exhibits contempt for the Torah and Torah values. When I picked up this book at the local library, I assumed that I would just love it and want to buy a copy for my college-age daughter (who is also a cat-owning Rabbi's daughter). But this isn't just some loveable cat regaling us with home-spun, and potentially Torah-based wisdom. No, this cat uses bad language, is obsessed with masturbation and, on occasion, likes to grab the nearest lady cat and "show" her (and us, unfortunately) a thing or two. (Anyone for cat pornography?) Oh, and the lovable rabbi ends up desecrating Shabbos (the Sabbath) and eating trefe (non-kosher) food in a crisis of faith brought on by finding out that his daughter's new husband is not strictly observant and his family is not at all observant. Warning: this book is not suitable for children!
This is the tale of a kindly Rabbi, his sweet daughter and the cat who loves her. The tale seems promising at first, until it delves into bitterness over God and those who love Him and follow His laws. The cat represents the glorification of sin itself, and delights whenever the book's characters fall into ungodly habits, judging them forever as hypocrites (taking no account into repentance and future avoidance of said sin). As is the case with most humanist literature the story down spirals from that point until it ends with the Rabbi losing faith in God. At this point the cat is truly happy with the Rabbi, thus giving the tale a 'happy ending'. In short, 'The Rabbi's Cat' is a tale structured to appeal to secular humanists, atheists and pagans who want to feel better about their self-serving, do as you feel, lifestyles.One more note: This book, despite the beautiful artwork and appealing cover, is definitely not appropriate for children.
As someone who is interested in different cultures, I thought the book would be an interesting window into other people's thoughts. Instead, I open it to find a swearing cat (he uses the F word) denigrating religion and showing religious people as hypocrites, in a lame stereotypical way. Might be interesting to others, but its not interesting to me. Not only is it not suitable to children, but there are a lot of adults who would not want to be bothered with this kind of disrespect and vulgarity either. I wish I had been warned before I tried to read this book.
Since writing my review of JFK: THE LAST DISSENTING WITNESS in 1998, I have been able to have my 35-page article - "Jean Hill -The Lady in Red" - included in Clint Bradford's JFK Assassination website. The address is: http://www.jfk-info.com/sitemap1.htm (scroll down for title).
Jean Hill's story changed with the wind. She saw next to nothing during the assassination, but used her unique location (and her active imagination)to keep herself in the limelight for years. It got so bad that even the conspiracy writers were shying away from her toward the end. It was laughable.Someone needed to ask her about the "little dog" she said was sitting in the car with JFK and Jackie. (Look at the original interviews- she actually said it.)This book is BS from stem to stern. Go read a fairy tale, at least there's a moral at the end. The only thing you find at the end of this book is your wallet a little lighter!
This DVD was entiled "Seventh Cliburn Competion, 1985" It was not the competion program, and did not even contain the winning performance. I consider it to be a total fraud and misrepresentation.
The plot develops nicely then ends abruptly with an unsatisfying ending. It seems to the reader as if the author had reached her contractual page limit and slapped an ending onto the book. A superhuman villian was terminated too easily. The method of capture was not adequately developed. Several promising themes were not followed up by the author, especially the entriquing possibility that through genetic testing Gault's uncle may have been his father or the reason for the military being interested in the investigation. The author took one of the least interesting possibilites and handled it in a below average formulaic manner
Here is a character I have enjoyed develop. But Kay is losing it. She should dump her niece Lucie, clean up her personal life (it's not nice to have an affair with a friends husband) and treat Det. Marino with some respect.As for Gault, if I pick up another Scarpetti book with his name in it... right back on the shelf
Well, that's no fun. Honesty is the best policy, right? This was the first of Patricia's books I had the displeasure to become acquainted with. I've tried reading another of her works, but I can't get over the simplistic writing with unnecessary adjectives thrown in for no apparent reason except, perhaps, to make the sentences longer and make the reader suffer from the protracted tripe. More than that, this book failed to make me care about the characters or about the outcome of the story
This could be the worst novel I have ever read. It is also the first and last Patricia Cornwell novel I will ever read. There are so many problems with this book that they cannot be listed here, so here are but three points: 1) The main character, Kay Scarpetta, is an insufferable, humorless snob. I'd never before read a novel where I hated the main character. Great job, Pat! 2) About 90% of the novel is dialogue. Very bad dialogue. But this is understandable since Cornwell cannot write prose. 3) The story is predictable and boring, and the ending is utterly ridiculous. I'm astonished that this book was ever published, let alone made the bestseller lists.
I had never read this author, but knew of many who did. When I read that this book was being made into a movie, it seemed a good opportunity to read her, before seeing the screen mess up her work. Now, I pray that the screen does so.I was extremely disappointed with this work. It is unrealistic, fails to capture the reader, and at points when I should have been completely engrossed, left me struggling with whether I wanted to pick it up. I hope she has written better than this, or else, there are a lot of people who have not bothered reading some of the strong authors available.Her characters are not sympathetic, they do not draw the reader's attention, and they are dull in overall scope. I have too many other good books to read before I pick up another book from this author.
I loved Patricia Cornwell's first five novels; sadly, her sixth loses its edge.. I wanted to enjoy it.. but the plot labors on.. and I had a hard time finishing a book I couldn't wait to read. We lose Scarpetta's forensic "grit" and instead focus on a bizarre, rather boring computer plot.. I hope the next books in the series are better!
Having read all of Patricia Cornwell's books, I was very disappointed about her latest achievment. Draging the villain through 3 separate books probably wasn't her best idea. Even more disturbing: The characters of her main heros (Scarpetta, Marino, Lucie) were described inconsistent with her previous books
I expected better than this poorly contrived story of murder and mystery from a well-seasoned author. The plot line lacked substance and the ending was poorly executed. The only reason I continued reading the story was in hopes that it would improve as I read. Boy, was I disappointed.
This book is so unrealistic that it spoils all the fun, super killers like Temple Gault (a clone for the Satan Incarnate known as Hannibal Lecter) are more silly than super. I found all the other character two dimensional and all the "intrigue" regarding super computers insulting to my intelligence. Has Cornwell done better? I don't know and, after reading this, am in no big hurry to find out.
This was the first Patricia Cornwell book I have read. She is a compelling storyteller, and she obviously possesses great knowledge of the subject matter. I do admit to finishing the book in a two-day period, but it was more to get to the inevitable final showdown between Scarpetta and the killer. Scarpetta and some of her cronies are characterized well, but the killer seemed a bit stereotypical. I don't believe in reading ahead and spoiling the surprise, but in this case I skipped some detailed sections to find out how the killer would be stopped in his tracks.Since reading this book, I have read Cause of Death by Cornwell and would rate that book slightly higher than this one. This book is not her best that I've read so far, but it wouldn't prevent me from reading another one.This is a good, focused, and knowledgable writer who does not need to fall back on unbelievable killers and sensantional plot devices to tell an imaginative story.
At least, that's how I felt about this book, which seems only to have been published because the author has written some truly interesting previous novels. I recommend the first three books in the series. I cannot recommend this book for anything except kindling. However, not having a fireplace, I filed this under G.
I found this plot to be to contrived in that many of the scenes were just to clearly made up for me to become vicariously involved. The twists and turns in the plot were simply to convenient for me to appreciate a sense of natural flow that good novels must have. For example: The scene in which Gault (the killer) has been seen using the same restaurant that the main character spontaneously finds herself in. Imagine, in New York no less! Not only that, but the killer is using the main characters visa in the same restaurant. And then the genius software engineer niece who just happens to be working on a huge computer program in the law enforcement field. I'm sorry, but this tale is just to unbelievable. It might make a passable B grade film, but I wouldn't want to see it.
Noisy, crude five point vibration pad.NOT! a massager, a vibration pad!We purchased three of these and we sent back three of these!Worthless, no, worse than worthless!
The authors seem unaware of the fact that theory guides our understanding. There are no "objective" facts, yet the authors present all their findings as such with almost no reasoning attached. This is both arrogant and ignorant. The authors display no grasp of theoretical advances in Accounting and I recommend getting a book that has a better exposition of principles as more than practice
I was going to get a book with a ISN number of 0072316373...But today, I got one with 0070412901...So I need you send my money beac to my account, and give me a well reason why you let the seller mail me a totally different book again, It is the second time I get an item with wrong number
If you are new to Economics, this is one book that you can skip. It is not useful nor "mandatory reading" if you are looking to understand the subject better. There is not even one chart or graph included in this book!!! Stick with Naked Economics: Undressing the Dismal Science or Economics for Dummies as these two titles will serve you better.
When I read something I like the whole story with some facts to back them up, but what I got out of this book was a guy with one side of politics while giving his opinion. Although many of his policies I tend to agree with, I just have a really hard time reading something when the entire book (well, I only got around a third way through it) is swung in one way direction. If you like reading about someone's opinion then you'll love this book, but if you're like me and just like cold hard facts leaving it up to yourself at making your own opinion, then don't buy this book.
I read this in the 1980's, and it was a non-event back then. Like most books that claim to have "the answer," this book gives an enormously over-simplified view of economics that does not reflect the real world. Moreover, it presents as settled many open questions, claiming the authors opinions as facts. There are many better books on free-market economics, and far, far better books on economics in general.
I was expecting a book on economics 101, so maybe I might understand market forces, PE ratios, stuff like that.It's just a big argument for a libertarian government. Not even particularly good arguments either - they're all based on metaphors, like the broken window (paraphrased from memory):'Even though they may get paid, a community does not get rich fixing broken windows. That holds the community still, it does not push it forward.'That's a fine argument and all, but that's not teaching. Metaphors are mental manipulation... give me all the pros and cons and let me decide. Or better: give me the damn facts.And it's outdated too. The book is 50 years old. We are so NOT in Post WWII economics.
I am in my 60's and thought it would be a good time to remedy what I perceived as a gap in my education, economics. I never had a course in economics and the only book I had read was Heilbroner's Worldly Philosophers, a satisfying but very general overview as I recall. I probably read Heilbroner in the late 70's.I'm an audible subscriber and got Economics in One Lesson from them. I can only say that the book was dated, full of economic events that were referenced from WWII, and excessively polemical and rigid.I read it some time ago but it made enough of a bad impression on me that when I saw it in my suggestion list around number 250, I just had to get onto this page and say what a terrible disappointment the book was.I think the book should be retitled, Economics in One Polemic: The Shortest and Surest Way to Understand the Economics of the Late 1940's and the 1950's.
If you want your faith in market forces and low taxation reinforced, this is a straightforward, but blinkered attempt to make you forget all about government regulation. Funny that west-European countries with bigger taxation and more government influence have less crime, better education, better health care, better TV programmes than the US. They also organise their politics better, so that the tax money is better spent. It did set me right on one or two points, and parts are written in a spuriously funny way, but it is too biased to be really informing . Clearly the writer has never listened to people he doesn't agree with.If you have an open mind compare this dangerous nonsense with the writings of Naomi Klein to see how unfettered capitalism works out in practice.
Wow, this one is really out there. Only Any Rand and Ron Paul, who know nothing about economics, could recommend this book. For example, consider these laughable claims, that I paraphrase -The primary problem with economics as practiced is that no thought is given to the long term consequences of policies to all groups.There is no difference between supply and demand.The vast majority of economists are ignoramuses.It is all very simple; listen to me.If you can believe this stuff, read the book. You can get it online for free.
Started laughing in the second chapter....enjoyed the book after I realized that I wasn't going to learn anything new. It's obviously a miracle that we survived for the 65 years since it was first published.And seeing that the pending insolvency of the US was as loudly shouted in the 40's as it is now was worth the price. This book had quotes that would shame both modern day political extremes in the US.Kudos to whoever owns the copyright --- now there's economics in action.
I wish I had read more of the reviews to learn that this book is less about economics and more about pushing a particular political point of view. The point of view is hard right and the current recession disproves most of the economic patter. After skimming a few pages I threw it away; I didn't even want it in the house.
This is propaganda, not an economics lesson. The book is full of faulty logic apparently spewed to promote a libertarian agenda. I couldn't be less happy with this purchase.
Threw this book right in the trash not even a chapter into it, because I realized it is nothing but the same old recycled and obsolete right-wing drivel that we've been peppered with over and over, and that took our country to the edge of a second Great Depression. If you are a concerned American you should stay away from this book!
I don't like the fact that there was so much kiddie-pop music on the soundtrack,where as the first, second, and third movies had a blend of rock, techno, hip-hop, andrap... but this one had too much kid music for a movie that was (for the most part)dark!The only song on this album that fit the mood of the movies was 'Lights Out' by P.O.D.!That re-mix of the song is the only reason why I bought this album!Not recommended for the whole album, just that one song...
This book was an anthology of 19 stories. I didn't like it because it was hard for me to make a mental picture in my head. I had to read almost every paragraph over. I could not comprehend at all!
This book was about witches and possession. I do not believe in those things. I am a Christian! I did not like this book very much at all! I don't think this is a good book for kids to be reading, because they might have nightmares. Some of the stories are hard to comprehend. But if you do like those kind of things you will enjoy this book! Thank you for reading my review.
I just ordered this fudge. It looked so good and seemed to be priced well I thought I would give it a try. I have looked at just about every store where we live and can not find any maple fudge. I am hoping this will taste as good as it looks. I will send another feedback after I have had my first bite. Can't wait.
I ordered the item according to the chart that was associated with the size and it ended up being to big. The item is also like it is made from rubber, but because I needed it for this weekend I don't know what I am going to do at this point.
I wore this for my wedding since I hadn't lost all of my pregnancy weight. It was great for a little bit. But then started getting a crease around my waist. I can't wear it anymore. Plus it made me feel very sick if I wore it for more than a couple hours. They suggest wearing it 8 hours? I couldn't do it. As soon as I take it off I am instantly better.
I think the concept is great but with this particular product, they have these sections that are thicker rubber (or whatever the material is) and it literally pushed into my ribs every time I sit down. I commute a lot and have a desk job so its not a very pleasant experience to have that pushing and bruising your rubs every day. It would've been nice except for those thicker lines of rubber that aren't very flexible.
After trying three different sizes,I still couldn't find one that fit. I first ordered a medium and it wouldn't even come close to hooking so I went up to size to xlarge which was waaay to big, my last possible option would be a large and it was still huge, wish I would have sent it back but was just tired of the whole process and kept it. The hooks are a pain as well and it is way over priced.....there is a zippered option on amazon that is much cheaper.
The product did what it was "supposed to" which was to give me a waist, but it kind of just redistributed my fat. My waist was super tiny, but above and below (mostly below) I bulged like crazy, so I ended up just looking really oddly proportioned. My husband thought that I looked a little like an arthropod, so definitely not the sexy curvy lady that I wanted to be... I guess this product worked for other ladies, but for me, it just looked really unnatural and odd.
I've been wearing the waist clincher for the last two years. I purchased a new one recently and it's not the same type of material of the previous ones i've brought. I thought maybe because i had lost weight, so i brought a smaller sizer, but that one didn't fit the same either. I thought i found a miracle when i first purchased the girldle through Amazon, but i have found my recent purchase has surely let me down...
When I first received this product I was plenty happy, I thought I had finally (after 8 years of switching from cincher to cincher) found the right one. It squeezed my belly enough that it actually got me to "right-sized" eating (whereas a lot of times I would get seconds, I found when I wore this cincher I could only eat one serving), which of course is wonderful. I didn't mind that sometimes it bunched up, I didn't mind that sometimes it left welts (that went away shortly after I removed the cincher), however, after about two weeks, on of the metal prongs came out, making the cincher essentially useless because it doesn't hold it's form. Even the cheap cinchers at Walmart held up better than this and cost only a fraction of what this cost.
With the type of closures and the amount of compression it is meant to give it's really difficult to put on. You need a hand to pull it closed in order to actually be able to close each of the 20 some odd hooks.
I ordered according to the size chart for my measurements and it was way to small!! Very uncomfortable.I returned it,
The sizing is perfect and a medium fits just right. I am 5'2 size 4 137 lbs before baby and i gained about 35 lbs during pregnancy, just an idea for sizing but keepin mind that everyone has different fat distributions on their bodies. I don't like how my post baby fat was getting pushed up the top and makes me look like I have back boobs. The shape wear crunched up after you sit or bent over and so it doesn't feel smooth all over. Squeem makes a vest version too so maybe that one will be a better choice for better coverage. If you do decide to purchase this product it's easier to squeeze in if you lay on your bed and suck in your guts.
I have ordered the Squeem on three different occasions, trying a large, medium and small as my size changed after having twins. Unfortunately, I was disapointed every time and I returned it after trying it on. I don't know why I kept trying aside from desperation. It just gave me a very weird shape. Sure, it cinched in my waist at the sides but what I needed was to flatten my muffin top. I basically felt as if it squeezed my waist in and pushed all my "excess" down into the lower half of my torso making my muffin top even worse. I'm giving the product the benefit of the doubt with two stars thinking maybe it's just my body type that is the problem. I have a long torso at 5'10 and 140lbs. Great product in concept but didn't work at all for me.
This product does suck you in Great !! But the bones in here tore back back up, I had all kinds of bruising when I took this off after wearing it all day, they need to make one smooth with out the bones.
I ordered a 3X, because that's the size that the website said to order, it came and lacked about 8 inches closing....so I looked at the package and it says I should have ordered a 5x...seemed extreme, but I exchanged it.I was very impressed with the speed of the exchange, I'll say that....However, when the 5X arrived, it's so big it just gaps and falls off? So, was the 3X mislabeled, or is this 5x mislabeled? I'm needing something with some firm support for post surgery care....so I really don't know what to do at this point?
Perhaps I got a bad one? A factory second? For the first 3-4 days I wore mine, it was great, just as advertised, helped me fit into those pants that are just a tiny bit too snug around the waist. I was very happy and it helped me concentrate on my posture, too, although it was very difficult to turn in the car seat when backing out of a parking space! However, I put it on today, and while my left side is all smooth and nicely held in, the support thing (bone or whatever) under my right breast seems to have lost all its firmness. My entire right front is pushing outwards on that, making a vertical bulge; whereas my left side is still firm and compressed. I don't know what could be happening.
It holds things together but the boning gets uncomfortable, would have been better without it. It also folds in with the fold of my stomach, which I didn't want, so it doesn't get that pooch area as well as I would've liked. I guess if you just want to tuck things in to wear a dress this would be good, thats about it.
The Sizes run really small, It flips up even though, they said it would not and the hooks don't hold. I am very dissapointed.
I purchased this item to wear postpartum. I love how it fits and how well it smooths things out post baby. The major downside to this is the poor quality. The eye portion of about five of the hook/eye closures has come out entirely. I know that this is not a sizing issue because I followed the sizing for the product and it's only select ones that appear to not have been sewn as well as the rest. Very disappointing for what would have otherwise been an awesome product that I could recommend to others, to instead be a waste of my money!
This would be great if it had boning in it. I am not sure if this os because i have a very pronounced hour glass figure, but when I put it on, the fabric slides the the waist and it has the same effect as if I had a rubber band aroun my waist, forming a bulge above and below my waist. Too bad- I had hoped this would work based on reviews.
The product overall was comfortable and did shape nicely. The problem is that after only 1 day of wearing the product was bunched at the waist and the interior supports were bent without repair. I contacted the company and they did say I had the correct size and to wear a tank under the Squeem to help with bunching. This didn't help the bent supports and I returned the product.
I own the vest squeem and I absolutely love it!!!!! But this waist cincher is not for me. I'm not gonna say don't buy it because alot of women are shaped different.I just got it yesterday and I'm sending it back. It fit well until my back fat overlapsed over the top of the cincher and thats not attractive at all. So if you know you have more than enough back fat, this is not for you. I tried to adjust it by pulling it up or down and that didnt even help. I wear a size medium, so its my correct size. But it doesnt give me the full coverage support that the vest gives me. The vest covers all the back fat and everything. But I still give Squeem thumbs up though!!! :-)
I think this product provided a great fit. I was able to hook on the first row by myself within about 5 mins max. It wasn't quite as difficult to get on as I thought it might be, although it isn't particularly easy either. I tried it on and wore for about 2 hours, and then the 2nd time I wore it had it on for about the same period of time. I took it off and one of the metal boning pieces had popped through and was hanging out at the bottom. This product is far too expensive to have something like that happen. The fit on me was snug, but I am sure I had the correct size. Now I have to figure out how to get this resolved.
Held my tummy in when I tried it on but was way too stiff...the boning and the hooks showed through, so could not even wear it inside a tshirt. Was tough to wear and I was scared of pinching myself while wearing it
Product is as shown but they didnt have it in stock and it took them almost a month to ship. And then instead of sending next day to compensate they sent it regular mail so it took another week to receive. Not too happy with their customer service.
Too tight,wanted to help me get back in shape after my baby, couldn't even close the whole thing!Returned it ASAP
The product states that inches will be removed after 30 days of use and I have worn this item everyday for at least 12 hrs per day and I have not seen any kind of difference.For the price of the item, it is disappointing when it advertises and does not comply.
The shape wear is difficult to put on and you can see the seams through your clothes. It is hard to bend over, especially as a school teacher! I would definitely like to try Brooke Burke's Belly Taut instead of this old school shapewear!
It was really easy to put the Squeem on, but once it was on I couldn't wait to get it off!! It wasn't too tight or anything. The problem was that once I stood up straight it bunched up in the hip/mid back area and pinched my skin! It was so painful! No matter how I positioned it, it would bunch up! Really disappointed since it was a waste of $50..
This shape-wear is the best I've had until now regarding easiness to wear and put-on. It does a great job at keeping the post-pregnancy flabby belly under control. However, after about 2 months of daily use, the metal that gives the support is coming out from the fabric. It seems that the metal is rubbing out the fabric and thins it enough to come out. I wish there was a better designed support for this binder. Otherwise, it is awesome - good looking for such lingerie. So, if you buy it, expect 2 months of wearing it without problems...
I really wanted this item to work because everybody seemed to love it. It didn't hold anything in on me and it gave me back boobs. Waste of money for me.
Squeem Shapewear definitely does the job of sucking you in. However, I found that the rods painfully poked me on the side and ultimately resulted in a wound. Not worth the pain.
I think this is a case of my expectations being too high. I was so encouraged by the great reviews of this product, I really was expecting a miracle. After only wearing this twice, it is stretched out. At first, I thought perhaps it would regain it's shape after a few hours but nope! It's no better than a cheap, fashion corset. It will smooth things out so there's less bulging under the clothes but I was looking for a real "waist trainer", something that would go on tight and STAY tight. Considering I found this product when I searched specifically for "waist trainer", I would say the claims of this product are misleading. It is shapewear, it is NOT a "cincher" or a "trainer".
I washed it before used it for the first time. The next day I wore it, I found my skin were itchy all over place on my stomach. And I feel that the heat on my body trapped on that.
I ordered this product to slim down my stomach. I was looking for something I could wear all day with my jeans as well as underneath my dresses. I wore the squeem to work occasionally and then I would take it off when I got home. When I would take it off, I felt sore around my sides and my back, I washed the squeem several times and even wore it on the other side thinking this would help but it didn't. One night after work me and some of my coworkers went out for drinks so I ended up keeping the squeem on for about 14hours instead of my normal 9 hours. That night when I took the squeem off I had blisters and bruising on my side and back which have now left black marks (I'm black)on my body. I read other review before I purchased the squeem and I didn't see anything that alerted me not to buy it. Not sure why this happened but if you read this and it happens to you don't say I didn't warn you!
The Squeem is a great idea, but their quality is second rate, and their customer service is worse than useless. I'd owned mine for about 4 weeks and worn it only a few hours a day when I noticed that a seam was coming unstitched. The threads aren't frayed; they're unstitching from the seam.Contacting customer service has been an exercise in futility. They've asked for pictures of the damage, and then failed to respond to the pictures, or any further attempts to contact them.For what this costs, it needs to last longer than 4 weeks.
I was really unhappy with this. I followed what others said and ordered based on my prepregnancy size. It was WAY too small at 7 weeks post-pardum. I'm ten weeks post-pardum and may try it again but it was a real self-esteem crusher initially. I'm a size 0 pre-pregnancy and so I thought it was fair to order the XS but I guess not.
I liked how it pulled everything in! I felt fantastic for about 2 hours. it really flattens the tummy area, which is all I really want, but you can see the hooks threw clothes :( I felt like that ruined it for me, also I had to keep pulling it up. It bunches in the back, and really smells like rubber. After about 5 or 6 days one of the "bones" on the inside broke and was stabbing me in the side! it really hurt. I would not recommend this product.
It didn't do much to slim the midsection and all it does is pretty much push everything up to the top, making your breasts and back look MUCH wider. If I do continue to wear it, it will be around the house or under loose clothes/jackets.
So according to the size chart on the box size small is for waistline 28-31my waist is 28 so i got the smallit does not even come close to being able to close and clasp!maybe it's just me but i am terribly disappointed
Usually a size XS to S but this girdle's small did not fit true to size. Had to return back to Amazon.
It's pretty awesome for such a price! It definitely gives you great posture, I was sitting up straight like no other! although i wish they could improve on the rubber smell otherwise it's wonderful!^^^^^ was my review when i had it for 15-20 days, now-- after ordering it on Jan, 21, 2012-- it's SO useless. I've washed it with care, it smells like rubber, and it's pretty nasty. I'd rather pay $$$ and buy something that works the way it should.
I received this action figure as a gift and was extremely excited to use it. I was so disappointed when I found that the head will NOT pop off. Sadly, I have to hold Her Royal Highness upside down and shake off her head while pressing the button. This was very disheartening and I would only recommend it to people who aren't planning to try to eject the head.
We have owed these plates in white for quite some years. maybe six or more. I just replaced all of them with a set from Crate and Barrell. They are heavy and seemingly well made but they have been faulty in a a number of ways. First my biggest complaint is on the white plates everytime you happen to scrape them with silverware it leaves a permanent mark. Never wash anything stainless near them in the diawasher since it will mark it up there as well if it rubs up against them. After years of use they looked horrible with marks all over them. They also seemed to chip very easily. So between the chips and marks all over them I couldn't take looking at them anymore. They also are not good in the microwave. They get very hot and the food not so much. I would not recommend for everyday use. Maybe the dark colors would show less marks but if they chip it will be very noticable. My advice is to purchase bone china or porcelain. I will never buy these again.
I couldn't wait to get this CD,being a guitarist myself. Just give me straight Jimmy Ponder, not horns and other "jazz types". I am disappointed. Cuts two and four are the best. They are Jimmy. Too bad I couldn't have listened to cuts first, I would not have bought this CD. Sorry! The cuts of just Jimmy are great though, but too few .... :(
"Lets jiggel the camera to show that the ground is shakeing!"Special effects; haloween leftovers.Acting; Well, the cast managed to repeat memorized lines.Casting apears to have been done in a trailer park.Script; I know nine year olds who write better stories.Cinimatography; Someones home cam.Conclusion: Anoyingly boreing and essentially unwatchable waist of time and money.
The author is very likely a Kurdish nationalist, not implausibly a quite supporter of the PKK. As a Communist, he has no room for religion. His analysis is misleading, basically he runs after Muslims under the banner of Islamism, he seeks to undermine the Islamic religion to satisfy his own psychological needs. The author has suppervised the work of others who also claimed to have proved that Islam does not work. The author does not use objective scientific methods, he basically writes in a way that confirms his own priori conclusions. Read the book, if you wish, but with such qualifications in mind. You may read it to understand how the bigot's mind actually works.
As most people readers know, Jack Higgins has written many fine action-packed books. However, this book reads like a twelve-year-old wrote it. The characters are so transparent they could be ghosts.The author and his publishing house must really need the money to rip of the public in this manner. This is the last book I read by this author. One can only rest on his laurels for so long. I'm glad this book was handed down to me or I would have written a really nasty review.
This minimalism style of writing exposes too much reliance on characters and events from previous books with little descriptive detail of some promising locations. The action is thin as well, characters die frequently and quickly with little build up or detail. Character motivation is weak at times and contributes to an arid experience with a predictable climax.
Where did the real Jack Higgins go? This is not only Higgin's worst effort to date, it is probably the worst book I've read in the past 5 years. (Can you say 'lazy', Jack?)I can't believe I actually finished it, and one star is a generous rating. Unbelievable chapter after unbelievable chapter, no character or plot development, written like a 5th grader.The end of the book foretells a sequel...a book that I will immediately pass on. Probably my last Higgins book without reading the reviews first.Don't buy it -- don't borrow it -- don't read it.
Having read only one other Higgins book before (Cold Harbor), I hesitate, somewhat, to comment on the author's general talent. However, this book has to be one of the worst I've read in some time. I think the thing that got me the most was the dialog; unbelievably simplistic and totally formulaic. "Damn, he said to Kate, "It's the Hazar Scouts, " Puhleeze! Not even an exclamation mark. Many other examples could be given. Now, assuming for the moment that the dialog was, say, written at greater than a 7th grade level, the plot is almost as bad. The protagonists' reactions to their fellows getting knocked off one-by-one is almost comic. There's no depth here; just one simple vignette after another. I wouldn't even want to compare this to Ludlum or Clancy (although Clancy's gotten a bit rough of late).A terrific waste of a good
This book is not well written and leaves nothing to the imagination. If I hadn't bought it in hard cover and spent the money I would not even have finished reading it.
Very simplistic writing style- he said, she said, then he said, then she said. This reads like a first attempt, not like a book written by a seasoned author of over 30 books.
I'm so glad that this was not my first Jack Higgins novel. If it were, it would also be my last.Normally, I can forgive Higgins his cliche's and his obsessive attention to his characters' drinking habits, because his characters are fun and interesting. He puts them in great plots and pulls the reader happily through them, and you can't wait to find the next book especially if it's got Sean Dillon.But not this one. All the characters are wooden. The action is colorless and completely unbelievable. A president guarded only by one secret service agent and a dog? A professional assassin who whacks his target on the head and then shoots someone else?There is no sense of timing or place, only the thinnest of motivations for most characters, and no justification for many of the decisions made by characters.This book is amateur hour. Don't bother. Read some of Higgins's earlier works instead.
Jack Higgins may not be running out of his fascination with modern weapons, fine dining, glamorous women or the IRA but he appears to be slipping on plot and character development. Sean Dillon makes Doc Savage and Dirk Pitt look like pikers. And this curious extension of gentlemanly methods for attempting to kill one another -- sending a crazed assassin and then both sides meeting later at the Savoy to exchange notes -- strains credulity.Higgins has done some first-rate work. Had this been published twenty-five years ago, this might have made a difference. It wasn't and it doesn't.
This is by far his worst effort that I've read. He's not my favorite spy author,anyway. This book feels like it had been written to fulfill a publisher's contract or obligation that Mr. Higgins had assumed and needed to finish in a hurry. The characters are not at all fleshed out, and the story line is too contrived. I would advise not wasting time by reading this book.
I had the rare experience of giving up on a novel after only a couple of chapters when trying to read Edge of Danger recently, but Higgins managed to pen a book so lame that I refused to go any further. His bad guy is supposedly a Scottish-Arabian aristocrat but comes off as just another cartoon Arab terrorist with an implausible, pointless heritage. But, what do you expect from a middle-aged author who poses in bomber jacket and aviator glasses on the dust jacket.... depth?
Given the lack of character development, or rather, simplistic and at times contradictory character development; the lack of any plot whatsoever; and poor visualizations; I can't believe I read the whole book. I guess I kept waiting for the action to start. It never did.
Very few books contain their own review. This one does:"Stone said, 'It really is like a bad movie, Harry.'"'You can bleeding well say that again. . . .'"This book reads like a 7th grade reading-level condensation of an outline of a screenplay: The paragraphs are no more than a few lines long; very few words greater than two syllables are used. No complex thoughts, no character development, no suspense, and little description. Pure formulaic twaddle.
The plot is not believable, there is not a shred of character development, and there isn't even any descriptive atmosphere. It shocks me that Jack Higgins and the publishers actually make money off of this puerile drivel. I shall not buy any more of his efforts.
The style of writing leads me to believe that Higgins was under pressure to churn out a book to meet some editor's deadline. There was no character development. Critical turns in the plot and action were blown through without the slightest bit of suspense. I've never read Higgins before and likely will never read him again.
A terrible, childishly written book with absolutely NO redeeming value as literature. Higgins loves to "speak Irish" but even that gambit fails in this trite, poorly plotted, worthless endeavour by a writer who should remain retired if he can't do any better than such trashy writing.
I purchased this book expecting very good things. I found the plot very thin and predictable. There was very little suspense. It almost seemed like an abridged version of a book where all the detail leading up was left out. Also there didn't seem to be any character building or background to explain why these individuals would have such singleminded, and on the surface stupid, behaviour.
I don't know who is worse- Higgins or Macnee. The plot is so tranparent you can guess what is coming next. Completely implausible. Macnee's narration is so overdone it is laughable. Most of the time the characters do little more than quaff enormous amounts of Bushmills Irish Whisky. A real stinker. Wayne Schwartz, Los Angeles, CA
When you read a book you know that what are you reading is not 100% true, but when you start to read things that are completely wrong is another thing. For an example I have these questions:Q. How many times could a man pay another man to kill somebody, the killer fails and the boss gives him another chance?A. I don't know if the mob knows it but at least four times.Q. Why the target man, who knows who is trying to kill him and he saw him in a restaurant after he was in danger and just say hello to him?A. Because the target man likes to be in danger.Q. When the target man has the opportunity to kill the one whom wanted to kill him why doesn't he?A. Because something in his head didn't let him even if he had killed many men before.And as the energizer rabbit, I can keep going and going and going, my advise is to skip this book.
I bought this CD for one song only, "Steal Away". I knew it was going to be "live", but this isn't even close to the radio version. Try more like a "muzik, lounge" sound. It was recorded in a ballroom. Then, the only other song I recognized was "Hot Rod Hearts", again, done the Vegas lounge style. I wish I could get my $$ back. Why didn't he just put out the CD using the regular recordings? He was never a big star to begin with. I wrote this review just to warn people that it isn't like most "live" recordings. I was very dissapointed, and I still don't have a decent recording of "Steal Away"!
This book was well reviewed and I was very disappointed. Even if it's written for poor readers, does it have to read like Dick and Jane? Children are young, not simple-minded. Give kids real literature or they won't keep reading, they'll plug in to the media.
Hawthorne's use of symbolism throughout the book is undeniable, yet his obvious alcoholism takes over as the underlying factor present at all points. He relies on ambiguity far too often without the build up to a climax. The climax(es) happened before the book started and only happened to a select few who read this book. Read Atlas Shrugged, Anthem, or virtually anything by Aldous Huxley if you want some entertainment.
This product requires a stereo player in which the balance is turned totally to the left. Most auto systems have that capability. However if you have Dolby or SurroundSound, it can be difficult (and maybe impossible) to play the cassette without hearing two recordings at the same time. Unfortunately neither the packaging nor the website will warn you of the problem. You therefore should think before buying. Once you have opened the packaging you may be unable to return the product.
My 11th grade English teacher tortured me with this morbid book and I can't say if I'll ever forgive her. Not only was this this book boring but Hawthorne unnecesary uses all sorts of complex language to convey one simple thought. The only reason that I didn't give this book 1 star was because there was some art in the book and symbolism. WAY OVERRATED.
I hate Hawthorne's style of writing. It's over-bloated and self-indulgent. I wish he'd just get to the point and stop blabbering on and on. The plot of the book seems like a modern melodramatic soap opera. All of the characters are one-dimensional. I'm not going to say the book is poorly written, but it's written in a style that makes the book kind of boring and tedious to read. Overall, a disappointment.
I will never understand how "Classics" become Classics. So far for school i Have had to read far to many Classics. Dickens should be glad he is dead and does not have to read his books because they would probably kill him out of sheer boredom...Hawthorne creates an ok tale, but really? It gets dragged out and is suppose to be realistic. Then he throws Pearl in there, she is like some super-human and belongs in fantasy. I never really did believe in the whole 'they completely ostracized her but let her stitch everything.' That is just a bit hypocritical, either she was excepted as prat of the society *which she was not) or she wasn't (which she almost was. See that just doesn't make any sense. The story is suppose to show how unforgiving the society was, but it doesn't. It is better than Dickens, but then again everything is.
The Scarlet Letter, for me was just a little boring. Sometimes the description was just too long and I just started to lose interest in it. Also sometimes it got confusing as to what the relationships the characters had to each other. I would only reccomend this book to other people who liked reading lots of description, a little dialouge, and a repetitive storyline.
I'm a 13 year old kid and I just finished reading this book for an English class I am taking. Although it was a very interesting and provkitive novel. I did not like it very much. I think it maybe that I'm still too young to throughly understand this piece of literature.
Overall ok. Not much going on here. A lot of internal dialogue, nothing like the movie. I prefer the movie to the book.
This review refers to ISBN 978-1613823613. With no explanation or indication that it is doing so, this edition leaves out the author's introductory chapter, "The Custom-House." Admittedly, the chapter is long, tedious, and skipped by many. Still, it leaves the book useless for the classroom and, let's face it, who else is going to read it? This isn't exactly light summer reading.In addition, there is no bolding of SAT words, with definitions in the margins, that some reviewers mention, which was the main reason I chose this edition. In fact, other than the abbreviated text, there is absolutely nothing: no forward, no reader's guide, no author bio -- nothing. So, not the most helpful textbook.On the bright side, it is well-bound and the type is quite easy to read.I am returning the book, and looking for a more suitable edition.
The most irritating part about reading this book is the typos. The book is already difficult to read with Hawthorne's prolix writing. I had to check with a different edition of The Scarlet Letter just to confirm whether or not it was a typo. Also, it would have been nice to have some footnotes like other editions do.
I tred to enjoy this novel. In fact I battled through to about halfway hoping it would get better but it seemed to me a silly pretentious novel. The history of life in that era was mildly enjoyable but I applaud anyone who had enough tenacity to stay the whole journey.
I hate giving classics bad reviews. This book was not for me. Nothing captured my attention and I found that I had to force myself to read it. If it had been any longer I would have stopped. It did catch my interest a little in the end, but not enough to redeem the book in any way.
I've read worse. But it takes a lot of mental energy to wade through all the commas and figure out the point of each paragraph. It seems a lot longer than 240 pages. I wouldn't have read it if I hadn't been forced to by the school. And the introductory thing is torture.
I read this book over the summer because I had no time to go to a library or a bookstore and I had gotten to book for my birthday from my aunt back in May. I usually read ALL the time. If it's a good book, I can read it in less than 1 day. Sometimes it even takes me 1-2 hours. But this book took me 3 weeks. I couldn't believe how long it took me! Then it turns out that I have to read it this year in school. (UGH!) Please don't read this book, only if you love very old books that are very hard to understand.
I teach high school English, and was required to teach thisto my students. I don't know who suffered more, me or them.To be fair, as one of America's first novels, it has interestingelements and Hawthorne does a good job.On the other hand, it is excruciating to read. There is nosuspense, little to sympathize or empathize with, and evenless to enjoy. A better writer could have told the samestory in half the number of pages. Some have labelledthis book a tragedy; they are right only in the sense thatit is tragically bad.
There is absolutely nothing captivating about this novel. Throughout the novel, only 3 major events occur: one in the beginning, one in the middle, and one at the end. The characters are flat and difficult to relate to. Overall the book was decent at best and could have been completed in no more than 50 pages or so. Hawthorne's writing is totally ridiculous. He goes on and on stating irrelevant details and fills page after page with unnecessary imagery. These pages consist of long paragraphs, some which encompass multiple pages. If I didn't have to read this for class I definitely would not have read it on my own. I'm not saying that it is a difficult novel, but it is an unpleasant one. In the end, if you are looking to read great American novels, skip over this one and go read some Steinbeck or Twain.
Please, I beg of you, if you have any respect for your own time whatsoever, DO NOT READ THIS BOOK!!! Maybe if a couple of generations completey ignore it, it will cease to be a so-called classic. First of all, it is written in pretty difficult language. That is all fine and good if the book is worth the effort, but this one definitely is not. The author has no knowledge of subtlety and his message is both wrong, I believe, and poorly conveyed. The second star is given only because his use of language is sometimes impressive, but I would sooner read a taudry romance novel than re-read The Scarlet Letter.
If this book is so great, then why are there so many people who give it only one or two stars? Should a great book not be able to be enjoyed on some level by everyone? To the best of my knowledge, only erudites and scholars enjoy this book. A good book, but one with a limited audience. Don't read it unless you don't mind wading waste deep through overly long sentences, antiquicated words and flowery prose. Personally I like an author who gets to the point.
I don't see how this book gets so much attention as being "one of the best novels ever." It's very short, and very boring. It's written in old english, which adds to the difficulty, and even if you can understand it, you finish the book and say, "Ok, so what's the point?" There is absolutely no point to this novel. Entire chapters of the novel are void of dialogue and appears as a wall of text, and the description is so vague that you can't even tell what a character is doing half the time.
This novel was the most boring book I have ever read. I would never put another person through the torture of reading this long-winded dull attempt at a scandalous and exciting romance. Even though there is much symbolism to be found, when is one supposed to find it, while they are sleeping? Another factor of my displeasure with this book is that I love to read and now hesitate to pick up another Hawthorne piece. How did this book become a "CLASSIC"?
This book may have been one of the best books of the 19th century but its language and themes don't relate to us very much any more. The Scarlet Letter is very boring and never seems to end. I really disliked the book.
My english teacher assigned this book, one I would never read on my own. I am a 16 year old and I enjoy reading. But this book, while it does have a few good points and messages, is incredibly dull. The points are hard to get and I only understood the points after we had discussed them in class. While this book has a rather good story it`s concealed by endless symbols and references, I suggest the cliff notes version!!
This is another classic out in the book world but I find it extremely hard to follow. Hawthorne had a lot of good points in the book but I didn't understand them until they were pointed out to me. If you don't get into that Puritan time period of literature then I suggest you don't read it. There is a lot of symbolism in this book, too.
The Scarlet Letter is a good but long and discriptive book. I wouldn't tell anybody to read it unless they classic books or a Hawthorne fan. This book and also The House of The Seven Gables are based on the one unlying rule of Hawthorne description. His books wouldn't be so long if he would have just gotton to the plot. Now don't get me wrong the plot to this book was good but the movie is even better. If you have to read it just deal with it. All I know is that is didn't hold my attenion very long and I fell asleep a couple of times.
I find the old english wording too hard to understand and too hard to read...haven't got into it too far yet but it is taking me forever to get here
My rating is only for the electronic formatting of this book. I really feel like I don't have any right to complain since the book was free but -you get what you pay for.The book starts with an introduction to the story which goes on for 18% of the book file. The actual text of the book doesn't start until location 604-10. Unfortunately the only way to find this is to page through from the beginning. It would have been nice to have a table of contents or at least a bookmaark for the start of the actual book.
I guess I should have read the last review or even the fact that the description says Landscape. I didn't think it was necessary, it's just a book right?I guess it's supposed to be easier to read in bed. I just thought it would be cool to have the Scarlet Letter be a red book.If you buy this book you will be holding the book like a wall calendar and reading in two columns; first the two columns on the top page and then two columns on the bottom. This just seems really irritating to me.
My daughter needed this book for school and specifically needed an edition with the custom house. We "looked inside this book" on line and it shows that it includes the custom house. When the book arrived, it did not include the custom house. Very disappointed as we took the time to check and she needed this for class.
The Scarlet Letter is overloaded with many superfluous words that requires the reader to sift through them all to get to the actual story. However, the strong characters are revealed through their actions more than through Hawthorne's descriptions. The story takes place in 17th Century Boston and Puritanical Law is heavily enforced. A young woman, Hester, has been imprisoned for getting pregnant while committing adultery. Now that the baby is 3 months old, they have her stand in the center of town with so she can be shamed by the whole town. Her husband just happens to come to town as she stands on the scaffold and thus the story continues in a dark spiral of hidden friendships, revenge, immense guilt, and sin. This story is a historical fiction told 200 years later and is full of symbolism and the ironies of human nature and society. The ending was rather abrupt as if Hawthorne was on a writing deadline and got tired of his own story.
I am an avid reader. I have read many so called "classics". This book is just plain boring! Yawn.... I really tried to get into it. I couldn't finish it. I just kept falling asleep. This book contains some seriously long sentences. Some readers have said to just skip the first chapter or so. I couldn't do that. It just seems wrong. If you are going to read a book you should try and read it all. I am sorry to say "I have not read the Scarlet Letter." Sorry Hawthorne.... I really, really tried.
I read this book for AP English and had to do a blue-book assignment of it. The word "ugh" summarizes my experience.This book was written in the 19th century, and that's where it belongs. It wouldn't be nearly as bad if someone were to modernize the language used in the book, but reading through "dost thou" after "dost thou" isn't any fun.However, I highly recommend reading Richard Armour's take on SL in his book "The Classics Reclassified".
I've bought this book, underlined every hint of symbolism, found all evidence of romanticism, followed every quote involving thematic oppositions, and noted every example of Pearl's rebellious nature and social alienation, but I cannot find one positive aspect of this novel that makes any of my hard work feel rewarding. The only way this novel could give me a warm feeling is if I place it in a furnace.
I ordered a specific ISBN No. and received a different tiny book of the same with different appearence and a different ISBN No.The picture seen online is not the one that I received.
This novel is absolutely awful. Although it has received over 500 reviews I feel it is my duty to help bring the average star level to where it belongs, at zero. Where to begin... perhaps with the run on sentences, the failure to create significant rising action, the flat two dimensional characters... This novel is full of things which not only bore the reader, but frustrate them as well.The fatal flaw in this piece of literature is its inability to stay relevant. Post-modern society does not really care about, "Baby daddies," and the revelation which is made at the end, and beginning, of this novel is reproduced daily on morning television a la Maury. Unfortunately, Nathaniel Hawthorn you are the father of this literary disaster.
So I heard about this from a friend at Comi-Con. He did not know much about it, but heard some people talking about it in the food court. I thought it sounded awesome, like Read or Die meets a cross between The Green Lantern and The Crimson Crusader. So I order what I thought was the graphic novel, turns out it is more "novel" and less "graphic". It was nothing like I expected, and unless shame is a super power (which is unlikely) Hester is just some puritan lady before radioactive spiders even existed!Seriously, I don't think "BANG!" "POW!" or "ZORT!" show up anywhere in the book! I almost gave this one star, but Roger Chillingworth is an awesome super villain name. His physiognomy is dead on as well, like in all comics, it let's us know he is the clear bad guy and we should not relate to him at all. Since the bad guy at least fits what I expect this gets 2 stars.
Too long. Re-read this and remembered how much Hawthorne's style irritates me. There is an interesting story within but he takes WAY too long to tell it.
The story is a very simple one but the action, so to speak, doesn't really happen until the final third of the book. It was a battle to get through the dry middle!Unfortunately the story is also exceptionally easy to guessand the turns of the story are not surprising in the least.On the plus side, the book gives a good glimpse at life in Puritan early American communities and their moral strucutres.
I have yet to actually complete this novel. It is so dog-gone hard to understand. On top of this, I have an essay that is due: TOMORROW! Is there no relief?!
I was assigned this book when I was a sophomore in high school (22 years ago). I couldn't get through it; the Cliff Notes version help me pass the test. I found it turgid and laborious reading.I graduated in the top 10% of my high school class. I have a master's degree. Despite my academic success, I don't understand why this book is a classic. I don't understand why Hester didn't just pack up Pearl and her stuff, move to another town and tell everyone she was a widow. That would have saved everyone alot of grief, especially young readers like me.
This is the worst book I have ever read. The attempts at symbolism are bogged down with unnecessary detail and the language is over the top even for the time period. I hurled it across the room at one point in agitation and disgust.
I usually have nothing to say but good things about book I read! But this book, it does have it's interesting points but I just don't get into it. I rather would burn myself at the stake that read the remaining chapter I have to finish for my English Class. What did I have to do to deserve this? I stood there reading the book with my book in one hand and dictionary in the other, I ended up reading Chapter 9 about 10 times because the information wasn't getting to me. And the way the author addresses the reader, I want to scream. I'm sure in the 1850's this was a wonderful book because of the message it stated back then, but more than 100 years afterwards, people seem to lose interest. And the fact that they make HS students read this book is just plain homicide. STOP THE ASSIGNING OF THIS BOOK! DON'T PUT YOUR STUDENTS THROUGH TORTURE!
This novel is widely regarded as overrated. The plot is not that interesting, the writing style is torturous,the plot twists are predictable. It's a typical example of pre-20th century bad writing. Not to say that any book from that era is crap, but this book certainly is.
Unless you have the correct size font, you will have a difficult time reading this book on the Kindle. It is not set up to have the text wrap correctly and therefore has a full line of text, the next line has a single word, then another full line and so on.
It started with a great plot...until he actually wrote it. It was overwritten (it takes pages before something happens) and the protagonists were hard to like. Boring, sappy novel written as if he trying to imitate Victorian prose. There are a couple twists, but the main characters are such morons, it underscores the little action that does happen.
So sue me ... I just don't like Nathanial Hawthorne. I think the plot is brilliant, but I find his method of telling the story annoying. I'm afraid this isn't an assertion I can back up with a lot of concrete examples, it's just that his writing gives me a vague feeling of malaise. I find this true of his short stories as well, so I never bothered with the other novels. But you'll have to read The Scarlet Letter for school anyway, so borrow it from the library.
I'll admit right up front that I am stupid. I would rather enjoy a book instead of try to find my way through the maze of confusing, endless prose that Hawthorne uses. I found myself empathizing more with Chillingworth than Dimmesdale. A book should NOT have to be dissected and disscussed to be understood!!! It should clearly portray its thematic structure without having to resort to a smokescreen of vague symbols and the word "Classic" stamped all over it to force people to appreciate it. Yes, it was heavily thematic and full of symbolism; and it was "meaty" (whatever that is), "deep", and "powerful"; but it was dry, slow, and boring. Even someone as myself, who generally enjoys the classics, will fall asleep (as I did everytime I tried to read this book). Do NOT try to speed-read this. This book has no place in a high-school English course; it needs a span of several years to muddle and plod thru, and then try to unravle.
I am an English teacher and getting through the book was tough. Only Nathaniel Hawthorne can make sex sound boring.
Hawthornes The Scarlet letter is an okay book. It has an okay plot and okay characters, but the book is not one for teens of the 90's. I had to read this book for my English teacher and to tell the truth if it were not graded I would not have read it. The teens of today do not want to read about the ancient customs of puritan society. If it had been about the scandalous affairs of Hester and Rev. Dimmsdale it would still be a best seller. I think this book should be only read voluntarily. If you are thinking of reading it you may need to reconsider.
I'm sure I would be able to understand the vivid descriptions and symbolism in this book much better, if Hawthorne were not writing in some sort of moon man language. I don't know about the production of narcotics in the 1800's, but I honestly think that Hawthorne wasn't on a natural high if you know what I'm saying.
THIS BOOK SUX! Who cares about Pearl anyways! Someone shoot me in the head before i die of boredom!!!
The book is boring if you try to read it without a good look at the movie first but it gets easier to understand once youre in class failing every single test your teacher gives you on it! Then she decides to explain what's going on to you later. It was boring and I fell asleep everytime I went to read it.
typically, I will force myself to read even the worst books (for class, for "fun", because I think I should), but when I read this book for a [...] English course, I quickly realized it was one of the worst books ever (not to be taken lightly, seriously), certainly not worthy of a classic, boring, endless details that no one cares about... blah blah blah. Terrible. I was bored. It might have been too difficult for a 9th grader, but I wouldn't read it now either.on the other hand, my brother loved it.
This was the worst book I ever read. I was lost and confused and that was only in the first sentence. You would think that classic had to have some level of goodness, but this book was the worst piece of filth I had ever read in my entire life. It's no wonder that Hawthorn locked himself in his mothers attic, he was mentally ill before he ever wrote the book. If you are a high school student,like I am, you know the hell that I had to go through and I am guessing you never want to put yourself through it again. And to you who have no read this book, don't. You have not, or never will commit enough sin to be put in to the type of hell that this book offers the reader. DO NOT READ THIS BOOK. Oh, and by the way who decided that this was a classic romantic book, there is nothing romantic about this novel, nor anything good. If you are in the mood for a good romance shoot for Nora Roberts or Sandra Brown, they can actually write!
The pain brought on by this archaicly verbose peice of literary kindling is so great that, while reading, I was greatly tempted to gouge out my eyes to prevent any future encounters with Mr. Hawthorne's "work". Please, for the love of all things sacred USE CLIFFNOTES!!! It will save you from years of therapy. I am scarred for live. My soul will be tormented after death and i will be forced to walk the earth in search for reconciliation.
Oh man, where do i begin with this one? First of all, I want to say that a 1 star rating is flattering this novel beyond all means. The Scarlett Letter is one of the most boring pieces of junk that I have ever been assigned to read. I realize that there is a ton of symbolism in this novel, but if you can't stay awake to find it, what's the point? Also, it really helps when Hawthorne decides to use 15 letter words in each and every sentence. Only person that I would recommend this novel to is an insomnia patient. This one ranks right up there with A Tale Of Two Cities (another "Classic").
This was one of the most boring books i've ever read. Unfortunately i did not give up on Hawthorne after reading this novel, that was a mistake. I'd pass on this one if i were you, if you must read this for school I highly suggest getting a summary online.
This is probably the most confusing and worst book I have ever read! The author uses incredibly large words and you constantly have to use a dictionary or else you most likely won't know hat you are reading. From my point of view as a high school (with mostly A's and good at English) student I would not recommend this book to any other high school age students. The author needs to get to the point and not drag on for pages about things that are not important at all. Long setences also makes the book drag on. If I didn't have to read this book for a book report I would have put it down after the first page or two and usually I finish every book that I start. This book had me in tears because it was so difficult. I had to ask my English teacher to explain this to me. Read this book at your own risk, but i do not reccommend it to anyone.
Three words to describe my feelings of this book...I HATE IT.Hawthorne's writings are dull, dry, and other words that mean bad that start with D. The character's a boring.
This book literally put me to sleep. I could wake up at 2 in the morning and find the book in my lap, and then have to stress over finishing the assigned reading for my English class. I mean, some of the sentences are about 15 lines long, and the plot, if there is a plot, is incredibly slow. If the author would just tell it like it is, and not drag it out for pages, the book would be only about a third of the length that it is. Boring, boring, BORING!
The Scarlet Letter is an interesting book. While reading the book I was filled with many feelings about it. I enjoyed some chapters, but loathed the ones describing the characters. I felt as if Hawthorne could have told the story more efficiently if he had described each character as they came onto the scene. The book made me feel inferior and uneducated. I made so many trips to get the dictionary that my legs got tired. I enjoyed the general story-line, but I could have left the adjectives behind. Pearl was my favorite character because she had a priceless intuition that helped me read the book. I would have been lost without Pearl's hints. I would not have read this book if not required to by my English teacher. Attack it if you dare!!
Yes, I am a 17 yr old high school kid. But I can tell good books from the bad ones. "The Scarlet Letter" is a "classical" tale of 2 lovers. To be concise, this novel is too wordy to be enjoyable. People can say it's a classic romantic novel, it has good character developments, it has good themes and ironies, blah blah blah. I, like most people, don't judge a book by checking out its trap metaphors; all in all leave this book to a "Doctor of Puritanical Philosophy". If youre looking for a more entertaining classic, read "Huck Finn" by Twain.
Ok, when I first started this book I thought it was the dumbest thing and I could not belive this was a classic! (I still can't) After a few chapters I thought it was a little better and thats why I gave it two stars. Also, it is one of the better books that I had to read for school. I still feel that it was a little boring and hard to follow but with the class discussions I understood it a lot more. I still wouldn't reccommend this book to anyone
I had to read this book for school. I did not like it. I'm not sure what the point is of this story; several people hae told me what they think it is but I dont agree and they dont agree with each other.
I was supposed to read this for English class,and had some interest because I`ve heard people and my teacher say that this was an American classic and was very good.But once I heard some of my friends who started to read it and say it was difficult and boring,I got the book on audio to assist me.I only got to chapter 3 and I was trying to guess how many pages were left to the end.Its uniteresting and difficult because the story wanders with absolutly no direction.I highly recomend getting Cliff Notes(which I got and are very easy to understand compared to the book) and possibly the movie(It might not be the same to the book, but having the visual aid of Demi Moore certainly helps the mind focus better).
This is one of the all-time most boring books. I do not recommend reading it at all. The introduction is incredibly long, and incredibly boring. Also, it doesn't really have the sort of plot that would make it a book you can't put down. I personally fell asleep four different times reading this book. I had much higher expectations for this book. If you are looking for a classic to read, I would recommend The Count Of Monte Cristo, not this book.
First of all: those who found the book to be dull, such as me, listen to it on tape (it's abbreviated yet still dangerous = boring to listen to while driving, as I found out). Indeed, Hawthorne introduces some advanced ideas for the times, such as writing about a single mother, as well as musings about women's rights. His obsession with Victorian themes, such as the deification of children, fixation on bodily sins, as well as overdramatization and simplification of the plot equals predictability and annoyance to the reader. While this book could probably be considered "a classic," such as Tolstoy's "Anna Karenina," both are better classified as carefully crafted literary exercises rather than engaging stories.
Throughout this entire book, one part of my brain was in a state of wonder, trying to imagine how anyone could make a book about scandal, sin, adultery, public shame and cowardice so dull. To finish the book was a test of will, and was accomplished because I hate to leave things undone.There are many fine, engaging, interesting novels, both of our age and of Hawthorne's. I can't imagine why one would want to slog through this one.
I love Arnold and what he has accomplished so it suprised me to suggest that women should start out using 3 lb weights. Sorry, you won't get results like that. This book my be good for seniors or those with limited physical ability.
Warning -- the two songs listed as "Little Steve" were written by him but are not the originals nor performed by him!
The suction on this dish does not really work. The only thing I could get it to suction to was glass. we never really wanted it for the warming part, just for the suction. All in in all, we were not very satisfied with this purchase.
The dish is not easy to take apart for cleaning and I wish I could put in it the microwave.
This product is a good idea however:1. The fill hole, is not large enough to fill the bottom of the dishwith hot tap water without getting water into the serving tray.2. Can't be put in the Micro.3. Extremely hard to open bottom compartment to clean.4. Extremely hard to open and close ( I and my daughter have to use abutter knife to pry open).5. Not good for a grandmother's hands that has joint problems.6. Doesn't keep food warm for very long.Perhaps going back to the drawing board would help this product!
Maybe in time I will figure this plate out, but I cannot get the suction to work and there were no directions with it as to how to take it apart, use the suction, clean it out. It may seem simple, but a harried mother needs these details! I am disappointed as it is utterly useless to me, at least as far as being a stay-put dish, which is why I purchased it.
Nearly impossible to disassemble for cleaning.Hole for water is tiny.Bottom gets very hot to handle, food takes awhile to warm up, then remains warm for only about 20 minutes.MOST importantly, IS THIS DISH BPA-FREE OR NOT? I've seen it listed on BPA-free lists on the web, BUT, there is nothing on the package or product description that deems it so.
Ditto to other complaints - won't separate easily- either by unscrewing or prizing. Cheap, flimsy, leaks water also because no gasket. I'm looking for something else and hoping reviewers will give honest good advice . . . this almost identical to product by Munchkin
The book WAS good in its time but EVERYTHING related to traveling in this area of SE Asia, especially Laos, has changed drastically in the past three years. Frankly, a 1996 edition should be sold as remainders at about $2, then someone who wanted only info about the people or the temples could get ethnographic info only! I was in Laos this past August 1998 and most published info, except the Internet updates by an Australian in Nong Khai,Thailand, who does visas to Laos, was wrong and very outdated--especially the most important things like availability of visas and safety of bus/road travel. Real traveling info from books like this that are so old could be very misleading!
This book is getting mixed reviews. It seems like friends of the author say its great. Those who tried to actually use the book are disappointed that everything is so out of date. This edition was not updated since the first edition and is now really out of date. Things change, but sloppy research is always out of style.
Well, this is one of those "you get what you pay for" kind of reviews. Didn't pay much, didn't expect much, but basically functional would've been nice. The generator came broken (probably a miswire internally). Yep, I checked the outs with a meter... and if I finagled the probe inside and touched the right spot, I got voltage. Just not externally. Too much trouble to return it and convinced my 10-year old to go with a real light powered by batteries.
I still haven't figured out how to put this light together. When I do, the wires appear very delicate and I doubt it will even work. The directions are atrocious. But at least it doesn't require batteries, so you can feel good about not destroying the environment too much.
this thing is nothing but s piece of junk it came broke,didnt,work i wouldnt of rated it but i had to:[DO NOT BUY THIS ITEAM-it is nothing but a piece of junk
I used the generator for a circuits project and it works pretty well with little resistance, however the wire connections seemed cheap and very loose. I would recommend buying a battery powered one with rechargeable batteries if you're worried about the environment.
If you are adamant to watch this movie despite all the negative reviews, please do it after the Holliday season. This is the most depressing, sad, pathetic, sarcastic and cruel movie that I've ever seen in my life.Through all the movie I felt that I am going to cry and was depressed for the rest of the day. Basically it is a movie about a guy that lost his parents during his childhood, twins with serious genetic disorders and a single mom. How somebody could find it funny is beyond me.If you want to kill the Holiday spirit and get into a deep depression than this movie is perfect for you! If not - skip it.
Its sad that a animation that is clearly made to attract children was made with such rude humor and disrespect towards others. How this animation could be recomended for anyone is beyond me. Shame on you Adam Sandler that your ability is not used for more postive purposes.
The Story is appropriate and some parts are really funny but some of it is horrible (sickest humor he's done in any of his movies that I've seen). Definately not for kids. I expected better after Mr. Deeds. Adam Sandler is really talented and there is no reason he has to produce such trash. I love the Chanukah Song! I'm not a Jew but it makes me want to celebrate Chanukah.There are only two real redeeming features of the movie. These are the little old man Whitey, because he loves everyone in his actions even though they treat him like ..., and Stone's repentence (for lack of a better word) at the end.
Someone I know bought this in a discount rack, thinking it was what it pretends to be -- a children's holiday cartoon. Nothing could be further from the truth. I could not believe what a disgusting piece of filth it is, full of perverted sexual innuendo. Movies like this should not be marketed toward children, and no matter what the rating, that is who they were trying to target by making it look like a children's holiday cartoon. It should be kept in the back room of video stores with the restriction that only adults could see it (and then only if they have absolutely no taste nor moral fortitude whatsoever). I can't give this as strongly negative a review as it deserves! I only gave it one star because they wouldn't let me give it none.
Most likely one of the worst movies i have ever seen! I went to see this movie with about 5 or 6 friends, when it was over, we all wanted our money back! The movie is not funny at all. Believe me i love adam sandler but this isnt even a comedy, there are alot of sad parts in it, but they label it as a comedy. All this movie actually is happens to be is a fairy tale for little kids, huge waste of money. If you want to see a real adam sandler comedy wait for anger management or rent happy gilmore.
I used to be a fan of The Simpsons, but now much more of a South Park kinda guy, so it's near impossible to offend me really.. The humor was good in some spots, but overall I fould it to be annoying and pointless. The emotion and general plot was pretty good, and I've always liked Sandler for his singing abilities and SNL work, but this movie was bad (some of the singing was okay, but personally I didn't like half of it). Most of the content is incredibly gross and could make you vomit if eating, but that's Sandler's great gold.
This movie was terrible!"WARNING SPOLIERS MAY BE POSSIBLE!"Well it starts out with Davey, a drunk who is crude and mean. Then when he gets into trouble he's doomed to community service with the town migiet Whitney, (No offence to little people out there, that it not my intention to offend anyone). Whitney sounds like Woody Allen on crack, and his fernal twin sister Elenaor isn't any better.Well Davey does all he can to offend Whitney. That is until his place burns up! So he moves in with Whitney and his sister, and they set some ground rules. Then as the movie goes on, they make a big deal about Davey having little emotion, and when he cries it's all the sudden a big deal! And for some reason the deer in the woods talk, and help Whitney out. What or who is Whitney supposted to be Santa Claus?I hate the music in it, the voices are annoying, and the characters are mostly unlikable! So warning to parents, keep your children locked up from this totally bad movie!
The packaging was coming off the back of the package and the box it was in was distorted. I wanted to give this as a christmas present but it doesn't even look new!
I want to say first that I am an Adam Sandler fan. I loved him on SNL, I have enjoyed him in everything from "Billy Madison" to "Punch-Drunk Love". So with that in mind, I had high hopes for "Eight Crazy Nights". To say it was a let down would be an understatement. This is one of the worst movies I have seen in recent memory.The only thing remotely close funny is the old man named Whitey. He has a few lines that might warrant a slight chuckle. Sandler's Davey Stone character is so annoying, you will probably be tempted to turn off the movie within the first 10 minutes. If you don't, you'll be treated to jokes about hairy butts, a woman with three breasts, a man eating a jock strap and deer licking frozen feces. Sounds appealing, doesn't it?I am sure some diehard Sandler fans think this is funny, but I don't. Hopefully his first animated movie will be his last.
I love Adam Sandler. Well, I used to love him, before he made Eight Crazy Nights. Not only was this cartoon not funny, it was downright trash. I would not recommend this "feature" to anyone. "Eight Crazy Nights" was short on story, long on time, and wearing on patience. I kept watching in hopes that this cartoon would redeem itself; I needed some justification for wasting the 2 hours of my life that I will never get back. Needless to say, I stuck it out until the credits, and now I have to live with the facts that I: 1.) watched the movie; and 2.) I'll never get that time back. So now I sit here, typing away a review I doubt anyone will read, wasting more of my precious life on that ridiculous movie! HUMBUG! Watch "Ishtar," you'll get more out of it. Oh, and I only awarded one star because Amazon insists you give everything at least one star. I did this under protest.
Let me start out by saying that I enjoy Adam Sandler movies. I like Billy Madison and Happy Gilmore. Sure, they're not great films, but they've given me plenty of laughs. So when I tell you that this is one of the most dreadful movies I've ever watched, you'll know it isn't because of some bias against Mr. Sandler.This may be the worst movie ever made. It is cloying, stupid, unfunny, weird, and pathetic--in a bad way. I could go on about the awful story, the grating voices, the cliches and schmaltz, or the bad songs. (Yes, Virginia, this is a musical. The worst musical ever unleashed on film. No, I haven't seen every musical; but you don't need to in order to fully understand the depths to which this film sinks.)Don't see it. Don't buy it. Don't rent it. Don't send any signal that they should make more cr*p like this.
I gave this 1 star because they wouldn't let me have 0 stars. The movie is just plain horrible. The 12 year olds in the audience enjoyed the juvenile, flatulence and other bodily function humor. But, this was the same audience that was passing gas in the theater and laughing at themselves. It will be a long time before I waste money on another Adam Sandler film.
Yeah well this movie was just terrible. Sandler tries paroding the classic cartoon musical but he fails in every way possible. I mean this is a stupid movie, one song is about how great the mall is and then another song has the logos of different stores singing to him. It's almost a marketing ploy to get people to go holiday shopping more. The film also tries to make the audience sympathize with Sandler's character but once again it fails, we have seen the Grinch and A Christmas Carol too many times to actually care about this Jewish Scrooge. This movie sucks all around with cheap gross out humor that may have worked better had it been live action but that would have defeated the purpose of the film. And one last comment, Why the hell is this a double disc DVD? All of Sandlers good and/or funny movies are singular yet this movie is terribe and it gets the extra feature treatment. This movie sucks.
It was an illegible **photocopy**. It appeared as if someone took a picture of every page of an original "Principles of Science", then faxed those pictures to the printer in order to produce this book.I returned it immediately.
Why does this series need to be so much more expensive than most of the other TV shows? Especially considering these don't even have the original soundtrack. The first thing I think of when I think about My Three Sons is the great music that went along with the show, and it's missing from this way over-priced version. As much as I love My Three Sons, I will wait for the original version to be released at a reasonable price before I buy.
The best things about this heavily formula vehicle are (1) Elvis' opening production numbers (including a nicely staged "Adam And Evil"); (2) Deborah Walley's "girl drummer" role; (3) the Deusenberg; and (4) Elvis' closing production number, the medium walking blues "I'll Be Back". Everything else is redundant.
Three lovely young ladies all want Elvis' gearstick in this craptastic musical comedy that's so bad it ROCKS! I just love the title song sequence where Les and the guys 'provide' Elvis with "...lots and lots of girls." And who was that chick, the blonde with the short cropped hair who literally shoves all the other chikadees aside to get up and spinout with the King? She looks like she's out to prove she can really score, and I never saw parts move like that before! Elvis looks embarrassed. Anyway, after you've crossed those double lines and Spinout you will want to do so again and again and again. Simply awful, but I mean that in a great way.
This film has the dubious honor to be included in the book "The 50 worst films of all time". It is definently not one of those, but one can hardly call it a proper film, either. It is rather a loose framework in which 12 new songs could be presented in a more or less natural manner. A great-great-grandfather of music videos, and better than some of those!
SPINOUT is another hard movie to sit through, thanks to the weak dialogue and even weaker storyline.Elvis plays a singing race car driver (for the second time), who is being chased by three women. These include a spoiled brat (Shelley Fabares), an erotic author (Diane McBain), and his own drummer (Deborah Walley).The music is actually listenable in this picture. Highlights include "Stop, Look, and Listen" and "I'll Be Back".Elvis appears to be sleepwalking through this one. His appearance is also disturbing: slightly overweight and his hair looks like a big black ball on his head.Again, not QUITE the worst, but far from the best. Buy something more worthwhile first.
This would be a nifty little contraption if it wasn't for the fact that you can't change the top -- my primary impetus for buying it.I have a Handspring Visor and lost my stylus. I didn't want to pay for shipping on a new stylus 3-pack from Handspring, so I went to Best Buy and purchased this instead. Not only can you not change the top so that it fits in the Visor properly, but now the entire headpiece falls out constantly so that the bottom part of the stylus gets stuck in the stylus-holder. Oh, and did I mention that the light function only works part of the time?Not worth your time or effort.
I bought this grinder because it could be operated with one hand. However I was very disappointed in the volume of pepper it puts out per squeeze. If you are looking for a good wrist strength training exerciser this is your grinder.
I am currently reading the Kindle version of this book. The book itself is very easy to read and full of material to try in the class room. Unfortunately, there are no page numbers that correspond to the paper version of the book. As this is a text book, it is impossible to cite material and the page from which it was taken. This is really unacceptable for a text book. It is one thing if it were a literature book, and even then, it would be better to have the physical page number of the actual book. If I had known that there were no page numbers contained in this Kindle version, I would NOT have purchased it. I would have purchased a used hard copy.
"On average, we breathe through one nostril for about three hours until the tissue becomes slightly engorged; then we switch to the other side. The nostril we breathe through affects which brain hemisphere we use." (p25)"[T]he female brain processes both language and feeling at the same time far more efficiently than the male brain does." (p20)These two quotes should tell you what you need to know about the quality of the "science" contained in this book.Lord, if this is what we teach our teachers...
This book was in one word - boring. It talks about the first academy awards...blah, blah, blah...and then the latest. The book is filled with usless babble that isn't even worth knowing! Listen people - DO NOT waste your money buying this book and/or your time reading this book! What a wasteful piece of crap...
I would like to recommend to anyone who have thought of buying this box set, to stay away. I've been a die-hard Metallica fan since the 80's, and i have never bought a bootleg album w/out hearing something off of it. I'm also in the Official Metallica Club, we are notified weeks before anyone else that a new album is coming out. They never mensioned this one, so then again i'd advise you to stay away from this item. The Garage Inc. CD is great. I've got all the versions of it except this one. I of course don't plan on getting it though. Who in their right mind would pay almost $140 for an item not even licensed by the band. I hope everyone who was thinking about buying this reads this first, so you all don't get ripped off.
This is simply not a bootleg. It was an overseas limited box set release. The band (or label) has done similar box sets. They did one for the Hero Of The Day single, limiting it to 1,000 copies. They also have plans to release a limited vinyl box soon. This is simply a collectable, nothing more than that. There are no music extras in this box.As a limited box it doesn't really offer very much at all. The CD you can purchase anywhere and the packaging of the actual disc(s) is no different than the standard (Vertigo) version. Do we really need a hat and a flag?For die hard collectors only.
This book was recommended by an instructor. I am new to this crazy pursuit of oil painting. My instructor called this her "bible" of color theory, but I honestly didn't understand much of it. Way too detailed, written in language that may be appropriate for someone who has a degree in fine art or art education, but certainly not for a beginner.
The information in this book is interesting, but the color in the color wheels and all color samples are very pale and washed off. Very disappointing.If you need to use the color wheels or scales as references, this book will not be helpful.
It is too bad that this is practically the only one of the kind. The aim is great, the contents are great, but the author does not know how to write a technical book. The author refers to concepts and terms that are yet to be defined or never defined at all. For example, at the very beginning, the author talks about "violet" and "purple". Am I the only one who did not know "violet" means a color of a single frequency, whereas "purple" is a color of combined frequencies? This is a No-No for mathematicians and scientists. For those of who are already familiar with Color Theory, the book must be a great assurance, articulation or enhancement of their existing knowledge, but for those who are new and try to learn as an artist, this is a nightmare. I am the latter kind. The only reason I could finish it was because I am familiar with fundamental physics and optics already.
This book was brand new when I received it. However, it did not arrive for 20 days after I ordered it.
This pepper mill does not work well at all, it takes a lot of hand crunching to get the pepper ground and the refill 'twist off' plastic cap on the bottom on mine does not even open.The lip of the plastic cap hits the side of the pepper mill plastic body not allowing the refill cap to come off ! I used it until it ran out of pepper and that's it. Writing the manufacturer to get a refund. Shoddy construction. Get yourself a good old-fashioned wooden pepper mill.
We had to buy a new lunchbox for our son after 2 months (a different brand, machine-washable) because this one is way too hard to clean. I have turned it completely inside out, scrubbed between all the cracks, and still food is stuck in the seams andthreads. It is very durable, but we can't get rid of the smell or stains with a reasonable amount of effort.
If the word evolving means that you simplify song structures and lyrics and make it more dull and lame then this band is really good at that. How can you say this band is evolving ? Yes it is album that is more easy to listen to when washing the dishes or just hanging around with friends drinking beer, but even so becomes boring. I have a feeling that Dredg has one of the biggest amount of fanboys ever. What they say is totaly irrelevant. I have NEVER wanted this new album to be like El cielo. And i really doubt that other dissapointed reviewers too wanted another El cielo. It is just soulless guys.
I completely agree... the album seems so unlike such a thoughfull and talented band. Not to say i've lost faith in dredg , just i need some time to get over this travesty.
I really can't understand why all the reviewers are going crazy over this record. First off, I bought it without hearing anything by them before, but it had been highly recomended to people who like Tool and Mars Volta by Amazon!! They couln't have been any more wrong. So, why did i personally find this so painfull?Well, the whole thing in general is quite painfull. First off, the musicians. The whole band sound like studio musicians. No obvious indivuality or anything new to offer. Then we get to the vocals. The closest thing I can compare them to are Alison Moyet or Anthony and the johnsons. I don't mind Anthony and the Johnsons, but this guys vocals and the music just don't rock. Which is fine. It's ok not to rock! But why the hell, being a Tool fan and Mars volta fan, was I recomended this? It's bland, it's week, and the dubby bass, boring guitar playing/sound... weak vocals.. Actually, forget it. The whole package. It is just lame.
As a father of a daughter with autism, i was surprised by how little time the author contributed to the family life. More time was spent at work and then writing a book when it sounds like home would have been the place to be at this critical time for his family. He writes often about don't critize until you've walked in my shoes yet he has no problems bashing the GFCF diet which has proved helpful to many families. while written with great love for his son, i am not sure his priorities are in order.
In reading use comments about Yanni's album "If I Could Tell You" I noticed this author advertised his book. Regardless of the book's merits, I think it should be rejected due to the author being a shallow, inappropriate capitalist.PS I'm proud of myself for not swearing at Mr. Mcandrew in this post.
neither artist are together on this cd u get five tracks of stanley anf the rest gloria all badly re issued on cd ...please dont waste your money as i did
I Love Gloria and thought this was an album featuring both artists together instead u get six tracks of staney then six of Gloria not together at all and all very badly re issued on cd please dont waste your money as I did
It's difficult to understand all the 5-star reviews this album has gotten. The production is excellent and the performances immaculate, but the music is cheesy and lacks soul. Honestly, the album screams "sell out", and it was sad to watch the great Wilson sisters come to this. Though it was a commercial success, and I'm glad for their good fortune because of it (being from Seattle, I have a soft spot for this great band), it is among the least of their albums. Only worth picking up for completists. Everyone else should stick to Heart's very strong earlier catalog.
To me this was the beginning of the end for the Wilson sisters. Sure, there are some okay songs on here, or so I thought until I recently replaced my vinyl LP with the CD. These songs sound so dated that I can't believe I used to like them. To put it mildly, this album was Heart's contribution to the 1980s "hair band" movement. Synthesizers and drum machines have taken over for Nancy and Howard's guitar playing. Dreamboat Anne and Little Queen still sound as good today as they did when they were released. This CD does not.
This material represents why the 80's died, the music is bland and poppy, the Wilson sister's garnered their wigs and corsets and the the music became something of an inside joke to those mentioning real bands. Looking back at the cd the music is very dated and is caught in an era best left forgotten.
I REALLY DIDN'T CARE FOR THIS BOOK AT ALL. I FOUND BOTH THE WRITING AND THE STORY LACKING AND UNIMAGINATIVE. I BOUGHT THIS BOOK WITH AN INTEREST IN FANTASY THAT REVOLVES AROUND ELVES OR FEY. I WAS SORELY DISAPPOINTED BY THIS BOOK. THERE WAS VERY LITTLE ABOUT THE MAIN CHARACTER'S FEY HERITAGE. THE STORY ITSELF IS CHOPPY AND THE CHARACTERIZATION WEAK. A WASTE OF BOTH MONEY AND TIME. I WILL NOT BE READING ANY MORE OF THIS AUTHORS BOOKS.
I purchased this product 3 weeks ago. I purchased this because the ball is soft and doesn't hurt the little guys.I have 4 children that LOVE the game however after use the ball started to rip. It is now ripped from the pole and I have been unable to locate a replacement.
As a fan of minimalist electronica, I had to check this album out. I much prefer this end of electronica's spectrum versus sets or albums containing tracks which solely attempt to squeeze in as many beats per minute possible.However it is much more difficult to make an entire set of minimalist electronica work. As planned, 28 tracks, one transitioning into the next so that there seems to be no beginning or end. Just one long 75 minute track. Sounds great, but the result is very unimpressive. Hawtin's track selection is just plain terrible, and is the predominant reason that this album is so poor.2.5/5 stars.
This cell phone holder is one of the poorest in quality I have ever seen. The Velcro or Hook and loop come un-sewn leaving your cell phone free to fall to the ground. I wouldn't recommend McGuire-Nicholas products to anyone. Their products are some of the poorest made products on the market.
Classic TV special, but the promise of a "digital copy" is misleading. On the back of the cardboard slipcover, in tiny print, is listed this limitation: "Windows Media-compatible only." It is implausible that a consumer would come across this disclaimer when making a purchase decision based in part on the overtly advertised inclusion of a "digital copy," a term most consumers associate with the ability to view media on an iPod.
If you already have this on DVD, don't waste your money upgrading to blu. The picture quality is only slightly better, it's not widescreen and the biggest disappointment is that the sound is the same as on the DVD. I gave it 2 stars only because it's Charlie Brown (the show itself is worth more than 5 stars!), it's a shame they didn't take the time or spend a few dollars to make the disc worthy of the title.
Bootleg collection of b-sides, remixes, and singles. Really, why even bother?
As the previous user stated, this is obviously a bootleg album. You can tell by the artwork (most notably the pixelated image on the front cover) as well as the mis-spelled songs on the back cover.I rarely ever purchase these sorts of CDs, but in this case I did only to have something in the car when I don't have my Ipod with me.
This pillow is incredibly helpful for people who have difficulty getting comfortable in bed because it affords a variety of positions to relieve painful areas. But getting in bed can require some simple gymnastic maneuvers because the pillow is so thick and cumbersome. And getting out of bed also requires some special moves, especially if you have a high mattress. Overall, not a simple process for a good nights sleep. The head area also compresses after a few nights of use and rearranging the filling is bothersome. Because it's a considerable investment, I end up using it only occasionally.
In a complaint to Macally regarding intermittent charging, their response was:Macally PS-AC4 AC Power Adapter for Apple G4Thank you for contacting us.Our PS-AC4 has problem with the 12" PowerBook G4. At this moment, we do not have any working one for your computer.
I bought this to replace the supposedly same power adapter that I purchased last year. This is NOT the same adapter as pictured for the item (I see that a customer has added two pictures of the true product). I was not concerned with this difference but would have preferred to have a light indicating the power is on. At first, it seemed to power my powerbook G4 fine, but later it started to cycle as charging and not charging, thus making the screen brighten and darken. When I shut the computer and let it charge, it did charge some, but I'm concerned about ruining my battery (which is also a replacement). It simply does not work when you are using the computer..and I'm ALWAYS using my computer! I will have to find an alternative to this product. I thought it was bad enough that the one I got last year quit working, but this is ridiculous.
Be careful. The box packing for this says it works with a PowerBook G4 or an iBook G3. It will not work for a iBook G4. The Amazon product page does not make that clear.
This product does not work with my ibook G4. As stated by some earlier reviews by other customers, the charger toggles between charging and not charging. Occasionally, if it is left on, it will continuously charge. I thought about keeping it, but it is unreliable and there are other third party options for $10 more.This one is going back to Amazon.
It worked well for a few weeks, but then the battery of my iBook G4 stopped being re-charged.
I read reviews of this product before I bought it that mentioned that it makes a high pitched sound. I figured these reviewers probably had defective adapters. However, mine also makes a high pitched sound. It doesn't do it all the time, but I worry that as it gets older, the sound will get worse. Although it charges my computer fine, if I could do it over again, I might pay the extra money and get a different brand...unless you don't mind high pitched noises.
Nice form factor etc...but bad function. Product appears to charge my Powerbook G4 12" when it is off or asleep, but when working it cycles on and off and emits a faint buzzing sound from the brick. Try another product.
This adaptor does not work with the dual USB iBook. It looks like a good product, but the plug doesn't fit.
I'm sure this product is great for G4 Powebooks and G3 iBooks, but nowhere in this product description does it say that this adapter is NOT for use with iBook G4s. I tried this on my iBook G4, and the computer kept switching back and forth between battery power and the power supply from the adapter. I'm returning this to Amazon tomorrow, but am upset that I wasted $20 overnighting this adapter because I absolutely need to use my computer this weekend. I wish they would update the product description to make it explicit that this is for Powerbook G4s and iBook G3s ONLY.
I'm now on my third charger for my Powerbook (my dad says I'm rough on equipment). Let me tell you, the Macally is NOT it. Like others, it fluctuates between charging and battery every 1-2 seconds and the brick makes weird squeaky noises. After not having a computer for a week and being so relived to finally get this charger, I was almost in tears to find that it is a piece of crap. It charges when the computer is off or in sleep mode, but that's not going to cut it. If you have a Powerbook G4, don't waste your money on this.
this charger does not have enough power to charge my Powerbook G4 while it is running. it will show the charger indicator back and forth from battery power to charging.But when I charge while it is off, it works perfect.I had requested a replacement once and the result was still the same.
I purchased this adapter to replace another PS-AC4 that worked for about 18 months before going belly up. This one lasted two weeks. I called MacAlly and quickly got an RMA number, then I overnighted the defective item to them. That was ten days ago, and I'm still waiting for the replacement to arrive.
I plugged this item into my laptop and nothing happened. No power- nothing.When I unplugged this adapter the negative metal ring from the plug stayed lodged inside of my computer, I had to remove it with needle nose pliers.I had to call the company 5 times before getting a rep on the phone as I was continually placed in automated limbo for about 15 per call. The rep actually admitted to me that this happens alot because the rings are too small and fit to tight in the computers.I was really looking forward to saving some dough. But this adapter was surprisingly worse the the original that came with the computer.They are sending me return authorization.
An AC/DC power converter is a very basic item, so I had little doubt that this sub for the expensive Apple original would be effective, though not stylish. Unfortunately, we have had problems. The Powerbook started delivering electrical shocks and inconsistent charging with this adapter, and they got worse when we moved to a country on 240V. I know that the shock problem comes from the Macally adapter because I have another PB and an original Apple power supply, so can do all combinatorial tests. I like Macally and have several of their other products. I probably just got a bum unit but unfortunately cannot deliver a positive review based on previous experience with the company.
The adapter worked fine for my power book g4 for a few months and then it broke. Nothing physically happened to the adapter for it to break, but suddenly it just wouldn't charge any more. What's interesting is that the blue light on the brick goes on when plugged in to a power source, but if I plug the cable that attaches the computer to the brick in, the light goes out and it doesn't charge.
We ordered the Macally PS-AC4 power adapter and received an entirely different product from a differnt comany. As noted by other Amazon shoppers we received th Inspire M8482. This adapter is differnet in the following ways..instead of the 10'cord with a velcro wrapper, it has a short cord that leavesthe transformer hanging from the input of your computer. This will ultimately break the DC connection from the board..this is not repairable. Their is no led power light as advertised leaving you wondering if it is on. It is clearly a cheap knck off and we are taken for idiots who might not recognize that. I am mad! I just went through a similar thing with Overstock. Months of emails, calls and waiting on hold...for a grain of satisfaction. It is insulting to think that these big companies have so little respect for us!
I bought this adapter almost two years ago and it still works-kind of. The insulation on the area of the cable where it enters the brick has become damaged, exposing the outer wire. I taped it up, but there is always a connection issue, where the AC indicator at the top of the screen will often flash to battery power and then back to AC. I keep the AC adaptor in the front compartment of my backpack, so it sees some but not major abuse. I'm sure this won't be an issue if you aren't traveling with it, but I just thought I would relate my experience.
After using the charger for about 2 weeks I started noticing drops in the power feeding to the iBook. After about 2 months the charger stopped working altogether. On inspection I noticed that the metal part of the plug was separating from the plastic part and I suspect this is causing the disconnect. MacAlly has no warranty information on their web site and I called them several times only to be diverted to a messaging system and I never got a callback.I'd say avoid if you can.
I too have the same problem most recent reviewers have had: when I plug the charger in, it cycles between charging and not charging every two seconds. The computer doesn't end up charging.In addition, the version I have doesn't look like the picture on the Amazon web site, and doesn't have the power LED.Clearly there is an epidemic of defective chargers. And we, the customer, have to go to the hassle of obtaining a return authorization and sending it back.I notified the seller. I am also going to notify Amazon to research this topic, and take the product off the site until they can resolve the issue. Other than this charger, my experience with Amazon has been exemplary.I strongly suggest that if you too have bought one of these chargers and have had trouble with it, please post here.
The Macally PS-AC4 Power Adapter would not charge my PowerBook. I tested it with a multimeter, and found that it had an open lead.I contacted Amazon (even better, through their web site - no waiting on the phone or waiting for an email), and they shipped another.This second one had the same problem as the first.I contacted Amazon again for a refund.The product was junk, but the service was excellent!
Unfortunately I shall not be able to review the Macally Power Adapter. I did not pay due attention to the fact that the AC adaptor works with G3 iBook and G4 PowerBook only.I plugged it in with a G4 iBook , it made some complaining noises and it died. Maybe it would be proper to really WARN that it will NOT work with a G4 iBook in CAPITAL LETTERS.$40.- down the drain!
Its hard to find these types of chargers since Mac switched to the magnetic type. Its hit and miss with the working. My battery indicator switches from charging to not in a blinking fashion.
After 4.5 months, the adapter died. I contacted Macally about the one year warranty and learned :1. the only way they will issue a refund is if the adapter causes a fire!2. I needed to send the adapter to the manufacturer in California for them to evaluate--I would be without a power cord for a week. They said the replacement adapter might be refurbished.Ultimately, I went to the Apple store and purchased a Mac power cord.
This is one of the most poorly designed and implemented chargers around. I own a 15" Powerbook G4 (which this is listed as being compatible with).The problem is that this isn't actually a 65watt power cord... so don't expect to use your computer while it's charging... and don't expect to be able to touch the "brick" as it's plugged in, you'll burn yourself.I've returned this item and got a charger from another company for just a few dollars more that works a TON better.
Macally is a terrible company. NOT worth the money you save. I recently bought a power cord thru them that emits an electrical current thru my computer. They will only send me a replacement but won't give me my money back. Not worth the risk. Buy Mac!Macally PS-AC4 AC Power Adapter for Apple G4
I had this charger for over two years. Last week while it was plugged into my computer, it just died. No blue light no current. I ended up splicing the connector to my old frayed Apple charger. The connector is much better than Apple's.
Everything the other reviews say about this product is largely true: the cord is thicker and more durable than the Apple adapter, the brick doesn't get as unnervingly hot, you can deal with the fact that it's not powerful enough to be used as a power source... but one day it just mysteriously stops working. I bought this to replace my broken Apple adapter and was generally very pleased with it, but about a month later I went to plug it in one day and it just wouldn't work. My laptop showed no connectivity, the little charge light on the brick didn't go on, and after tinkering with the thing at length I couldn't get anything to change. If you want a cheap, temporary replacement charger, I guess this would be fine. But for anything long-term it might just be worth shelling out $80 for something that at least lasts a year or two.
Adapter worked flawlessly for six months, then became intermittent. Seems to be broken or shorted somewhere near the connector to the computer. Even the ridiculously flimsy cord from Apple lasted longer than six months, so I can't say I'm pleased. Macally says they'll sell the connector cable separately for $17.00 which is not much of a bargain.
Don't buy!!! This charger does not work. It broke twice before Amazon told me they would not send me another. The customer service was excellent from Amazon.
I was hoping for a cheaper replacement, but what I got was a charger that was not much more reliable than my previous Apple charger.The problem with this connector is that it doesn't always seem to make a good connection with the computer. When this happens, it sends the computer into a powered-charging-battery loop. I have to fiddle with the connector to get it in just the right spot to keep a good connection. While this is only an annoyance to me, I wonder what it's doing to the internals of my computer.
I bought this product to replace the original battery charger that came with my 12" Powerbook G4. Unfortunately, it seems that it only will add charge when I have the computer closed or off. If I have the computer open while the charger is plugged in, it not only doesn't add charge, it also makes the screen brightness oscillate.I wouldn't recommend this product for anyone who needs to charge their Powerbook while using their Powerbook. Wish I would've just spent the extra money on the Apple charger.
I bought this charger near the end of May of this year and it stopped working about 2 weeks ago. It is not the same charger as in the picture with the gray cord. It looks just like most of the other generic chargers available on Amazon. It charges quite slowly (ibook g4 14"). I have a brand new APPLE brand battery, so I don't think it has anything to do with that or the computer. From now on I will stick with the cheaper generic chargers until my computer is totally dead.
This product is advertised to work with the iBook G4, but it does NOT.This plug looks fine, but despite what the product description stats, it isn't compatible with the 3- to 5-year-old version of the 12-inch iBook G4, which I own and now must buy yet another plug for after this one didn't work.Consider yourself warned.
Out of the difficult to open package, this adapter worked for a couple of days.I missed the light on the end of the standard Apple adapter (yellow for charging, green for charged).But the price was right, until, it started cycling on and off. The Mac screen would dim and brighten dim and brighten. Boy, was I glad to notice that the on screen battery light was cycling between a/c and battery. Unplugged the Macally, computer ran fine on just battery. Runs fine on the Apple charger I had left at home.The good news is the return to Amazon was extremely easy, presuming the lack of destroyed packaging doesn't void my refund.I've ordered a different brand (with light!). This one may have just been a bad example. I've had good luck with other Macally gear.
We plugged this on only to have it spark and not power our ibook G4. It went back the next day.
This product would intermittently charge my computer, charging about half of the time and not charging the other half. It has 3 1/2 stars as an average from so many reviews because you get exactly what you pay for with this one - a cheap alternative.I was happy with the first one I bought. It lasted about a year and a half with heavy use. I thought I'd try another one but odds are you'll end up with a defective one of you buy a few of them.
Like every other Mac user, I think the replacement power cord with the bulky, cumbersome block is overpriced and less than durable, so I decided to outsource. What I got was never quite up to speed, but since my laptop mostly stays plugged in, the quick charge wasn't a must. Unfortunately, after a scant 8 months, with very little movement or unplugging (I've packed up my laptop for travel exactly twice in that time), the power cord has given out. There seems to be a short between the wires, with the hazardous side effect of causing random sparking at the connection between the computer plug-in and the wire. Needless to say, I'm not going back to this product!
Maeve's forte is character development, dialogue, and interaction, and Silver Wedding was far below her usual standard.
This performance is pure garbage. Unfortunately I was at this pathetic show. The audience was mostly old geezers who were there to watch a group of other geriatric has-beens. The sound was awful, their performance of West Side Story was ridiculous, and their hatred for America was sad. Halfway through the show, the singer was having serious trouble hauling his fat *ss around the stage. He sounded like an exhausted pig, gorging himself at the trough. It was bad enough that they would embarrass themselves by performing in front of people, but they actually recorded their disaster. Now they think they can sell this crap??
It's awful. I bought it because I wanted a red corkscrew. However, the description does not state how cheaply it is made. Each time I use it I'm afraid it's going to break when I turn it. It's plastic. DO NOT BUY!
I purchased this product and the DVD's don't even work. I can't even use them. I get nothing,no picture,nothing.
it surprisingly contained very little substance. just 1 half hour workout per disk. got boring fast too. i found better stuff free on the internet.
I ordered this new knife from Amazon based on the Laguiole name, prior Sabatier experience and the one review (5 stars). What a disappointment! One side of the blade had very visible tarnish and reddish blue spots (not sure whether rust or previously used). It also has a very light and extremely cheap look with poor manufacture. It is made in France, but it goes to show that junk comes out from there just as easy as from China, Pakistan or anywhere else. True you get what you pay for, but this one wouldn't be worth even 2 bucks at a yard sale. Maybe it was a defective unit, but I didn't want to take a chance with a replacement. I never even tried to use it, and simply returned it. To Amazon's credit, their return process was great. Just follow the online "return" process, print the (free/prepaid) return label, and take it to any USPS station. Amazon's service earned the second extra star.
I bought this boombox for a kitchen that I knew needed to be loud. While the Hummer MusiXstation looks amazing and has pretty good functionality, the sound quality and volume is very low. To be honest, I wish it sounded like it looked. The radio is not very good at picking up FM stations, either. It does have a Audio in jack, which was very helpful and not available on a lot of other models.I was not impressed overall, and we switched back to our 1998 boombox in the kitchen.Pros: Looks amazing, seems durable, cool features (including audio in)Cons: Not very loud, sound quality is decent at best, subwoofer is a joke, digital FM radio not very receptive
The band was far too thin and would roll down my leg continuously. I returned all pairs I bought for a refund. Very disappointing for a Jobst product.
The band was far too thin and would roll down my leg continuously. I returned all pairs I bought for a refund. Very disappointing for a Jobst product.
This book is about colonel Knox a leader of a freshly starting revolution in America. His mission is to carry around 200 cannons from Ticonderoga back to a city where British forces are docked. The main characters of this book are will Knox 19 year old brother of the colonel, colonel Knox in charge of expedition, J.P. a farmers son .I disliked this book. It drags on and never seems to end. Just when you think your going to get a fight there isn't one .the biggest problem they had on the trip was a river with too thin ice. What's so interesting about that? If I were you I would not buy this book. It is extremely boring.From a reader of this book
I purchased this for my 2004 Kia Optima LX. When I went to install it, everything seemed good. But the car was about an inch wider than the hitch and the hitch was not centered in the car. So either the hitch was off center or the car's mounts were. Otherwise seemed like a great hitch.
I used this product a couple of times and was not really impressed. To get good results I guess you would have to use it in a specific area for a good length of time, otherwise not much good.
Amazon responded immediately but forwarded to the supplier. Don't waste your money. It's a hand held wand that may or may not be infrared. Doesn't heat up to any degree that will be helpful. Still waiting to hear back from the supplier (two weeks now) to return this item. Know someone who has the EXACT same item and paid $10.... Enough said
...is the full and misleading name of this album, one that is as run of the mill as a fan of electronic metamusic could desire. This album has seven tracks, ranging in time from 3-11 minutes, but don't let that fool you into thinking there's much variety. All of them meld together after the first, "Fish", which is the highlight among few others that are moderately well-crafted and distinct. There is a definite feeling of sonic recycling ("didn't I just hear that whir on the previous track?") and a limited sound spectrum within their grasp. One can't expect too terribly much from indie techno, so its unfair to condemn this album for lack of equipment. It's usually competent, even musical, but when an occasional vocal bit is all that differentiates one track from another, one tends to seek greener electropastures.
I bought this book from Amazon in used condition but 'like new'. Little did I realize or even think about that it didn't come with the jacks and ball. Now I have to try to find the right size jacks (not jumbo ones) and a ball. I guess you get what you pay for!
THE STIFFS WERE A GOOD SOFT BAND.THIS CD IS SUPPOSED TO BE A COLLECTION OF THEIR BEST WORK. BUT MISSING IS HERE ARE THE SONGS 'D.C.RIP' AND ANOTHER GREAT TRACK FROM THAT 7". FOR CAPTAIN OI!TO LEAVE OUT SUCH AWESOME WORK IS DISTURBING. I WAS VERY DISAPPOINTED WITH THIS RELEASE. IT SHOULD HAVE BEEN TITLED"THE STIFFS_LOVE SONGS COLLECTION". THE BAND ITSELF RATES BETTER THAN 2 STARS, BUT NOT HAVING THE SONGS IT SHOULD OF HAD,GREATLY DEPRECIATES THIS CD.
I just used this product for the first time and will be returning it.The cheap cologne smell is inescapable. Wash your face with this stuff and you'll be smelling it all day.I popped the top and smelled it at the store, but after using it the smell is much stronger.
How can anyone like this book??? its got to be the worst horror book I have ever read and I normaly like a good horror book now and then. I mean most Horror books or movies give me the creeps this one I could resd in the scaryest place in the world yaw and go to sleep. got to be the worst book ever writen by the way I am 13 just dont wana give out my account name on here later
The hard cover reprint edition offered by Amazon and others is incomplete. It contains Part 1 only. Note the page count (208) and compare it to the trade paperback versions (310-324 page count).Avoid this edition.
Audio is technically flawed. The instumental sounds are Not crisp and clear. The musical selections and the Ellington orchestration are excellent. But the unclear Audio makes listening to this album like viewing a blurred, out of focus photograph. Definitely NOT a worthwhile selection for serious Duke Ellington afficionados.
Nice pictures, but no descriptions and the map on the book doesn't even mention Merritt IslandBuy a proper birdbook rather than this overpriced pamphlet
It is absolutely unbelievable this woman IS a therapist, by reading her book, she NEEDS one. She relates to clay more than to children or people. Whatever she was looking for in an Amish community, she never found it and translates that to the reader. Don't waste your time with this very poor read.
I wanted to read this book because the simple life of the Amish people intrigued me.I wish this lady would have talked more about the Amish.Instead,all you read about is "Me,me,me"."What am I doing in my life?"Why do I do this/that?" blah blah blah.By the end of the book the reader really doesn't care anymore!It was scarey for me to find out that this woman is a therapist-YIKES!The reason I gave it 2 stars is that (1) When she does talk about the Amish it is interesting (2) It is a short book and a quick read.
This book is a self-centered piece of random musings. It is not about the Amish. It is about the author, and frankly, she's not someone I would really care to meet and discuss important issues with. She spends SO much time on HER thoughts, HER ideas, that one forgets this is supposed to be a book about the Amish way of life. This is not a journey TO the Amish. It is a boring, breathtakingly conceited journey into the author's confused mind. I suggest counseling for her. Her book just plain stinks.
I thought this book was a sad commentary on the lostness of the author. Though she sought to understand the Amish way of life, she totally missed what it is all about. Maybe it was because the church service was in German or maybe she was so focused on herself that she could not see beyond to the fact that peace comes from a relationship with God. Her final line in the book stated that miracles take a lot of work. I would beg to disagree and say that God is the one who does miracles and therefore they take no work, just faith. This is what Sue Bender missed and is still missing I am afraid. We use Amish textbooks in our home education program, so the insights she shared were not really new to me. I think her description of the Amish is valid, but her understanding is lacking. I would not particularly recommend this book.
2 stars is pretty generous, in my opinion. This book seemed more like a book about the process she went through writing a book about visiting Amish families. I found myself wondering where I might be able to find the book she spent so much time "pouring her soul into". The book is largely spent talking about how incredible she is for having completed such a daunting task and is filled with many backhanded remarks regarding Amish communities. She comes off pompous and self-indulgent, not at all like the humbled, pious woman she paints herself out to be. Would recommend skipping this book.
This is a very disapointing book. The author makes the complexe Amish community that forgave the muders of their young daughters at Nickle Mine school into one diminsional Disney characters. There is no tension, conflict or any of the human conditions that make people real, just a oh so sweet group of simple people.Of course that does not allow us to learn anything from the Amish and I am sure there is a lot to be learn from them.The author is very self absorbed when she tries to draw any lessons from her time with the Amish. There were spots where I though "O please get over yourself". I didn't finish the book, it was a waste of time.
You sure must have missed a lot on your JOURNEY.The Amish are the most backwards group of misfits I have ever encountered.Where kids beat on when you were they? Were wives talked down to and belitted? Were animals beat and starved? I thought not. Maybe you should take another trip...and tell it like it really is. I do not think much of your book. It is NOT TRUE
The book presents a historical and political account of the middle east from 1922-1984. The book was originally written in 1968, then revised in 1976 and 1985. During the process of revision, Khouri, appearantly, did not make many changes in the original text, a fact that leaves much of the book outdated. Khouri's account takes a strong anti Israeli and pro Arab stance. For example, he chooses to downplay the Palestinian terrorist attacks during the 1970s and mentions such attacks as the attack on the Israeli athletes in Munich and the attack of the Marine base in Beirut with no detail. His study is based very closely on UN records and ignores the reality of the Middle East.
I bought this item 2 months ago because it was small and cheap. I use it daily. The grinding mechanism is already tired. Now it takes a lot of patience to actually get the desired amount of pepper/salt and it's getting on my nerves. So I'm browsing amazon for a real and efficient mill set.To be fair there is one thing I like in this product: the magnets that let you stick them to the cooker hood.
Don't waste your money on these. They don't grind well at all. I just bought celtic sea salts and got rid of my table salt and was very disappointed as these just don't grind the salt or pepper. I have to go buy another set and hope they work.
horrible set of grinders. these handles broke before i had the chance to refill them! waste of money.
Never satisfied with traditional mills, I bought these because they had a unique design. I liked that they stick to the fridge but have found that means I occasionally have to wipe off pepper flakes. The small, rectangular holes make funneling refills difficult and messy. About a month into light use, the pepper mill gummed up and cleaning was a real chore. After about a year of moderate use, the pepper mill just wasn't grinding properly anymore. Cute but not very durable.
hard to squeeze, hard to fill, hard to get more than a pinch of spice. there is a miniature hole to get salt and peppercorns in the units, they spill everywhere and don't hold much so you're always filling them. The handles are small and hard to hold. You have to squeeze them at least 30 times to get a decent amount of spice out.
The description says you can adjust for coarseness of the salt/pepper, but there is no such knob on the mini grinders. We replaced the store bought salt with sea salt and now the grinder doesn't work. Disappointing.
Perhaps the larger model works well. This smaller magnetic set is tragic. The only upside is that if you're working on your grip strength, these will probably help. To get a useable amount of pepper, you'll have to squeeze 15-20 times. They feel cheap and destined for a quick trip to the trash can. Stick with a tried and true twist grinder.
I purchased this pepper grinder at a kitchen outlet store. One of the "rabbit ear" handles snapped at the base after less than 1 month of use. I don't reccomend this product.
Looks like cute little bunnies on my fridge, but they're just eye candy. Shakers don't store a lot of salt or pepper. Handles are too small to comfortably hold, and it's hard to detect any salt and pepper coming out.
Neither the salt mill or pepper grinder work well. It takes forever to get salt and pepper from the squeezing of the handles together and still not an adequate amount. Perhaps the blades that crunch the S&P are not sharp enough? Very disappointed in product.
Is cheap and does its jobBut the handle feel cheap and seems like is about to break.Sometime the peper chop a big chunk off
I was quite disappointed with this collection. After the first three stories, I basically gave up. Interesting concepts that could have benefited a great deal from a really good editor. This stuff really belongs in 12th grade creative writing class.
Although books about particular cats/pets are rare and appreciated, I'm afraid this book gave me no further insight into my Burmese cat. Perhaps I am asking too much but I expected to find a plethora of special insights into this special breed. I didn't.Especially in modern cat care I felt this book lacking. My breeders says: Fresh meat three times a week; chicken wings (raw) at least twice for dental hygiene, vary the diet, enjoy the peculiarly dog like characteristics of the Burmese. But mabe that's all asking too much - gotta go, Nero is bringing his beloved yellow wash cloth for retrieval...It is hard to criticise a book that describes the best breed of cat on earth. Let's all write one!
I must agree with the other reviewer that this book offers no additional eye-opening facts in respect to owning a Burmese cat... The history section is specific to the breed (but as a new or existing Burmese owner, you'd probably already know this prior to getting one!) & there is one blurb regarding the Burmese characteristic to yowl when they require attention. Beyond that this book could really be for any other cat out there (feed your cat, give it water, groom it,...). It didn't even specify normal size/weight ranges for the breed and what quantities of food to give them as a guideline. So, in my opinion, useless to a new Burmese owner. Also, I was a bit disappointed that all of the photos are only of Sable & Chocolate Burmese (they are all gorgeous, but a few photos of Blues or Lilacs would be appreciated). All in all this book was disappointing.
No doubt the worst of the many attempts to cop the ideas and success of Bill James, Pete Palmer, etc. over the past decade. Cute names and sophomoric humor aside, there isn't a great deal of meaningful analysis here, and if you take the time to go back and look at the previous year's addition, you will see that these guys are wrong a lot more often than they are correct. Their arcane formulas and measurements totally miss the point of something as simple and palatable as Runs Created, and the result is a dull and confusing mass of EqA's.
Nothing here that you can't glean for yourself if you have a PC and know how to use Excel. Anyone can run numbers and models, and really that's all you get.The "writing" (purposeful quotes) is painful.Buying this book is no different than putting a match to your money.
This may be a good book on military history. I am not a military historian, so I cannot attest to how sound Markham's research into that subject is. Just know what you are buying. There is almost nothing here about Napoleon as a person, not compared to most other biographies. And the social context which gave rise to Napoleon is not really explored here. I find the first two chapters of the book that deal with Napoleon's genealogy and his early years interesting and well-written. After that the book got too dense and the writing style rather pedestrian. Everything beyond the first chapter of the book is written for a specialist (a scholar who focuses on the 19th century or on military history). At the time of the publication the book received such glowing reviews that I cannot help but wonder what I missed here.
Napoleon is probably one of the most widely written about historical figures. There are many differing views about his intentions and ambitions. Markham takes a somewhat 'unclear' point of view when writting about the French Emperor. At times it seems like he is praising Napoleon for one thing or the other and at other times he is criticizing the ' Corsican Orge'. He laudes Napoleon's form of government as being advanced beyond its years yet he draws on unreliable memoirs which denounced Napoleon with impunity. 'Unreliable' memoirs are those which were written by those, between 1815 and 1830, who wished to regain Bourbon favour and be allowed back into prestigious positions. I feel that Markham doesn't give a very lucid explaination for the intervention in Spain or for that matter in Russia. Towards the end the picture drawn in this book becomes more nebulous, and we are given the choice between two uncompromising pictures of Napoleon.
The book was badly observed and shallow, with predictable and cliched plots. It made me want to throw up mostofthe time, and offered very little insight into the characters feelings. Do not read it unless you have to.
This book did not move me at all. The plot is unrealistic and the characters are shallow; they do not seem like real people at all.
I was not even able to use this item because it tore upon putting it together. DO NOT BUY THIS ITEM!
Maybe my husband is bigger than normal but we had the hardest time getting this on. Once it was on we wanted it off pretty quick. The vibrations weren't very strong and one of the vibes was stuck in the on position so we had to remove batteries to turn it off. I didn't get any benefit from it and I don't think he got much.
I bought this book 'cause I loved the movie when I was a kid. The book is really dry and a little hard to relate to. It's very English with lots of Moor descriptions.Couldn't finish it. Want it?
Capitol's 1990 reissue of The Beach Boys' 1960s LPs gave us 2 of these albums on 1 CD at normal price. They're back for who knows how long - so get them while they're hot. On the 2-fer version of "Little Deuce Coupe," which is in STEREO by the way and not MONO as it is here, you also get "All Summer Long" plus you get a nice stack of bonus tracks. Don't pass up this warning - and get the 2-fer instead - quick!
Thought it was a picture book of the Fiords.... That's what happens sometimes when you cannot actually touch a book...
Purchased these socks looking for the right balance of light construction and cushioning. I found only the light construction part. While they seem durable enough, the socks are way too light to provide an adequate barrier between my shoes and my feet. It's easy to earn a blister on anything more than a short run.These may be just right for someone who does not punish their feet with marathons and triathlons, but just not substantial enough for me.
I have no background in history and do not pretend to know what I'm talking about in that regard. However, when it comes to grammar, I know what I'm doing - and Howard Zinn, apparently, does not. The chapter of this book that I was given (Chapter 8: On Presidential Liars) was the most horrendously written piece of work I've ever read. Please make note of the fact that I read high school essays frequently; I thought I'd seen it all. Apparently, I was mistaken. According to Mr. Zinn, the American people have been "deceived about" much more than we thought, and should all "deep anguish" over it.
When trying to install the products attachment brackets to the boat railing three of the eight screws supplied sheared off. When attempting to attach the cover over the frame, I discovered one of the velcro pieces sewn into the cover was coming unraveled. The center support pole that installs across the top and runs from front to back is supposed to have a pocket for the pole to fit into sewn into the cover at each end; mine only had one pocket making the center support useless. Got in touch with Taylor Made customer service to resolve the issue. They arranged for pick up of the defective product and said a new one would be sent right out to replace it....... over three weeks later and I still haven't received it. I think it will serve its purpose once I ever get the darn thing and it's not defective !
Max must have had a dictionary by his side while writing this bunch of hog wash. I read to be drawn into a story and it did not happen.
I Just did not like the story line.Ii was not able to get into the story. Didn't even finish the book.
The Cake dome set was beautiful. I needed a 14 inch diameter plate because I was making a 12 inch cake. The lid had an 11 inch diameter so would not fit the cake. I was disappointed because when I search Amazon for the 14 inch cake plate; there were many unrelated products choices. It was very frustrating. Amazon, please only give unasked for alternatives. I know I am going to google search my product choices to find websites that only give me what I want!
Ironside themes do not a great album make. Even worse are the puerile child singers - the themes are ghastly and the singing OMG!If you are high on crack this might be cool. Me, I love Archie's music from 62 to 70, this music is CRAP. Strangely, Things Have Go to Change was amazing - Archie you had it in you to be greatImpulse wanted a hit LP this was never going to be it!!!! Archie was misled or not up to say NO!!!!!!
I hate to disagree with so many people who love this CD, but I find very little to like about it. I found the ballads weepy, the upbeat songs cliched, and the singing/musicianship professional but uninspiring. To give you an idea of my tastes, my favorites are Nashville Bluegrass Band "American Beauty", Steve Earl/Del McCrory Band "The Mountain", Ricky Skaggs/Kentucky Thunder "Bluegrass Rules". In my opinion, "The Grass is Blue" does not approach the artistic standards of these and many other current CD's. Once again, no offense is intended to the many people who are so fond of this CD. The bottom line: I plan on making the day of somebody who wants to own this CD by selling my copy to a used CD store.
As usual, Dolly continues trying to sing but has no voice. The musicians are the only good thing about this recording. She's attempting to sing country songs Bluegrass style and it doesn't work.
I love ya Dolly, but this music is the WHACK, or it is to this city boy! This is a Cd only the Waltons could love!
Reading the numerous exalting critiques of this new CD by Lhasa, I finally gave in and bought it... I have to admit, that the exoticism of the "haunting" style of interpretation can be captivating to the ones not familiar with the Mexican or Latin-American musical traditions. However, the various musical styles appropriated in this CD merit greater diversity in interpretation.
After all these reviews, it is difficult to not feel like I would be doing an injustice ... yet, I think that those who claim to like Lhasa would much prefer the originality and talent of Chavela Vargas. Indeed, Lhasa's raspy voice is deeply influenced by the cigarrette-smoking Vargas. What is called haunting voice, or passion, by other reviewers, is a mode of interpretation that Lhasa administers indiscriminately to every song in her repertoire, especially when the CD includes merry Chrismas songs.
Utterly amazing and unique sound. Her voice is so powerful.
One truly great song (the first on the disc) followed by 11 weird takes on Mexican folk music and depressing moans. The brilliant arrangement and accompaniment of the first song "Mi Cara de Pared," a sexy, mournfully loping tango, led me to expect greatness within, but alas, Lhasa is a one-trick pony, one with a potentially great voice, which is reduced to strained yodelling on the subsequent uninteresting numbers. It's almost as if she were undecided what category she wanted to present herself in - is it world music? Latin? Pop? Rock? Unfortunately it seems to be none of the above. If I want Mexican folk songs, I'll call Linda Ronstadt. The arranger and producer (name forgotten) should have waited to present the CD when he had more tricks up his sleeve and the singer had better songs. A great disappointment - but that first number is a killer.
As a teacher, I've enjoyed using this book over the years in my reading program. Imagine my excitement when I learned that the book is on audio. Please understand, the book is worth ten stars, and I really love the story. It is very well written, the characters are fleshed out and believable. BUT... the audiobook is a great disappointment. It is read by the author with a full cast. Somebody forgot to tell Mrs. Phillips that she is from England, and, therefore, has a british accent. The woman reading her part sounded like she is from Iowa. Almost from the beginning I'm listening to audio and I'm going HUH!? This is what happens when you don't pay attention to your own production. I'm amazed that Winthrop allowed this lemon to get out, especially since she is reading on it. Go Figure!
i read the castle in the attic and i thoght it wasn't very entrtaning. but that's just my opinion. i thought on some of the chapters it dragged on and lost me alot. like it would talk about one thing and then another without alot of detail. for my opinion, it was an ok book. it had it's moments like whats going to happen next then it was really boring.
This was the worst book I have ever read in my entire life! I was forced to read it for school. It was complicated and very boring. I would not recommend this book to anyone!! Please don't waste your time and money to read this book!! Read something else!!
The Castle in the Attic was about a 10 year old boy named William who lives with his mom and dad in Pennsylvannia. And he has a baby sitter that stays with him for 13 years and desides to go back to her home in England. William doesnt want her to go so he takes her picture of her husband who died in the world war 2. She finds out and is said for him and gives William a go away gift which was a huge toy castle with a led knight.
The shoes would have been awesome but..... the sizes run extremely small.I even ordered a size larger than normal thinking maybe this would happen.The shoes are still too small..
this product is good for child I guess..cause it is a little thin...but it is better than the one I saw on sports authority which is thiner
This was sent to me by mistake. So free it was but not a bargain.I dislike this imported 2 disc, 40 tract album very much. The is from the 30's I would think. With high quality headphones this stuff is to hard to listen too.The sound is very thin and hissy. Fidelity is low and overall listen-ability is very weak. This big band stuff without the big band sound. Song after song, it all sound the same, very boring material with sound to match. Just a throw-away.
I was so looking forward to Tomb Raider: AOD coming out in November 15th 2002. Then it got delayed, then delayed again, and again, and again, and again. When it finally came out (8 MONTHS LATER) I was really excited. I put the game in my PS2. And was really shocked at how bad this game was. I was expecting something incredible. But no. Lara moves like a robot, it is very difficult to control her, loads of bugs and its boring. No fun. I am a huge Tomb Raider fan and have played them all. But I think this one might be making a trip back to the shop for a refund. However, the graphics are incredible (best i've seen in any game), lara looks amazing and the music is great. But overall I am very dissapointed. EIDOS, get it right next time.
I, like a lot of people writing reviews, play a lot of first person shooters. If you liked Splinter Cell, buy TRAOD USED!!! I agree with everyone here...story is good, controls are less than mediocre. Even Enter the Matrix blew this game away. Customizing the keyboard helps some, but less than what I expected. I tried to leave feedback for EIDOS, but to no avail. Hopefully, if there is another one it will be in beta for a lot longer. And for those of you out there who think that it might be my pc, I can assure you that is NOT the case.
Oh man, this is horrible! I'm a Lara junkie, and I'm completely embarassed by this horrid game. The PC controls are a joke, you just seem to spin in circles when you're just trying to make a simple turn. I feel completely ripped off by the folks at Eidos for releasing such a bug filled game. Game locks up at the worst possible moments, cut screnes are too long and dull, just let us play the game without the need to watch a movie every level...put all that energy into fixing the movement controls and lock up issues. Please, don't waste your hard earned cash on this!!! Maybe Eidos will get the message.
This is, by far, the most bug filled game I have ever played. The new control system is extremely clumsy and will leave Lara die-hards wondering what the developers were thinking when they decided to revamp the old one. I hate to say it, but I think EIDOS was more concerned about not missing another promised release date and sent out an unfinished product; the obvious quality issues are apparent in the first chapter and get progressively worse. I would not be surprised if the company has to issue a recall for this defective product. On a positve note, the improved graphics are beautiful, but are hard to appreciate because of the frustrating gameplay.
I am a huge fan of the Tomb Raider series, and have played all five other games on my PC. I love them. I was so excited to get this one, and sooooo disappointed with the quality. Glitchy glitchy glitchy. Do not buy this game. The controls are terrible. While all other 5 games play out smoothly, this one is slow, stalls, goes blank some times, and takes minutes to load to new chapters. Now I don't have a fancy schmancy computer, but I have been able to play all the other games on it just fine without any hitch. This is just crap. It makes me feel like I have to go buy a $2000 computer just to be able to play this $30 game! It probably runs better on a PS 2, so if you have one of those don't bother with the PC version. Thanks a lot Eidos, I totally wasted time and money and am warning future buyers to BEWARE!
I was expecting Tomb Raider Angel of Darkness since last year, with a similar performance as Indiana Jones and the Emperor's Tomb, but now when I receive the game, I saw this little girl that walks like with an umbrella inside of her pants.The graphics and sound are great, but Lara rotates like a robot and when I try to make her run, she doesn't agree with me and moves extremely slowly.I have a 2MHz PC with 500Megas RAM and GeForce4 Graphic Card, and there is no possibility that only this game needs to practice Ctrl-Alt-Del each 15 minutes in order to play it.I'll find the way to sell my game and suggest Eidos to make a research in order to define how many of the customers are really satisfied with this game and determine if a refund to the customers is the better way to maintain the good image of Eidos until today.It's a shame.
Inspite of the two patches offered by Eidos the game crashed very often. Lara's movements are hard to control and choppy in stairwells. You will be nothing but disappointed if you spend your hard earned money on this game.
I bought this game at a reduced price and still feel like I got ripped off. The controls in the PC version are an absolute nightmare and make what could have otherwise been a decent game horrible. Sometimes you feel like you have no control whatsoever. Good thing two successful movies have been made about this game otherwise EIDOS would've been out of business with this horrendous offering. In fact I'll think twice before purchasing anything with the EIDOS name or CORE DESIGN name attached to it.
I will have to assume this game is going [to stink] Why would it's release be pushed back a third time? I am tired of waiting. This game must be so bad that Eidos/Core must feel it needs some severe refinement before release.On top of the release date changes, neither Eidos or Core have bothered to put the news up on thier sites. ...
Oh. My. God. I remember when Tomb Raider first came out, and my husband and I got it on the original PlayStation. It was great, for 1995. We got Angel of Darkness for our computer, and WHOA! It looked like Eidos had REGRESSED! The animation is choppy, jumps (basically all moves, in general) are hard to control and judge, and I read on a review for the PS2 version that you'd better come to love the phrases "save successful" and "load successful" because that's what you'll do, over and over and over! It's completely ridiculous how bad the game looks and plays. Holy cow, and the Glitches! At one point in the church, if you move Lara to JUST the wrong spot then the game gets stuck on the two boxers in the ring fighting, and you have to reboot the computer to get out of it! This game wasn't even worth the discounted price I picked it up for. Don't buy it, it's a trick...
This game is the angel of darkness - THe control system is impossible - The menu screens are ridiculous and bulky to manage - I have played all the tomb raider games - This one is near to unplayable - This thing went straight to EBAY - save your money for something good - THE TR people need to do something fresh with this character like send her to space or something - jeez - the franchise is getting old and stale due to lack of innovation and change.
Hmmmm, as a veteran of Tomb raider and an someone who plays most of the 1st person shooters that appear I was quite disappointed in the game controls. The story is great, the graphics are much better then previous Tomb Raider releases but the controls ruined the game for me. One would think with all the 1st person shooters with very precise and smooth controls Tomb Raider would have them too, not so. It is very frustrating to try and play a very well done story only to continually die for lack of the ability to accurately control Lara's movement. I hope Edios learns from this experience.
This control sceme made Tomb Raider 1 unplayable. This control scheme kept me from passing the TRAINING levels of TR: Last Revelations. This control scheme was horrible but barely useable when I played Resident Evil. This control scheme caused me to die like a thousand times on the first level when I played Fear Effect. This control scheme is still compleyely horrible in this game.Would someone please tell Eidos to change the controls in any future Tomb Raider games. I really want to like this series but every one of these games has been unplayable due to the control scheme.
I was originally pleased with the make of the washer but the connector between the washer and hose broke, when i ordered the replacement parts it took them over 1 "YEAR" to get the replacement parts to me. That is not a typo and i find it ignorant that it took that long to replace a plastic part that they should have had mass produced with plenty of spares. Do not buy, the customer service is horrible and the machine breaks easily, not to mention to get it fixed takes a year.
This machine does a decent job of cleaning when it works, but it breaks way to easily for the price, and its not built well enough to justify fixing. Too many cheap plastic parts. Consider it to be disposable if you buy it.
When we got this product it worked great. After a year though, the pressure is next to non-existent and I cannot find a troubleshoot guide to find out what the problem is, or how to fix it. I consider myself very handy and can usually figure these things out, but this one has me stumped. It acts like there is air getting into the system and the result has been damage to the motor or something.The company is absolutely no help at all in advice for fixing this machine.Sorry, but I cannot recommend it as highly as those who are doing so.
i never got this to work, it shorted out and is made out of cheap plastic. didn't come with all the attachments would not recommend this product
This review is intended as a review of the book, not of the work of Edgar Allan Poe. As a Poe fan, I purchased this book just for the pure fun of reading Poe on my Kindle. However, the book is so poorly organized that finding a particular tale or poem is a real pain and takes a lot of the fun out of it. While there is a table of contents, the individual works are not list there; rather there are groupings of the works so you have to know (or guess) to which group the work you may be looking for belongs. Alas, there is also no index. This is an electronic book: I should be able to toggle down a table of contents to a particular work, select it, and be taken there, but it doesn't happen that way. Not recommended for Kindle readers!
This is not one of Daignault's better books, it reads like some poorly written nostalgic ego trip, with way too many paragraphs about beating out the regulations on beach buggy laws and surf casting that were put in place in the Cape in the 1970s. The title does certainly does not belie its contents: you indeed feel like it's been 20 years of Daignault on the Cape by the time you're finished reading it.
I bought this thinking that it was going to be one of those major life-changing experience moments in horror or something. As i said in my title... I guess i missed what was cool. It was ok for a low budget, but even then i guess i just didn't like the story, concept or style of the movie at all. People running down an alley flailing their arms does not invoke terror to me... sorry. So i suppose this movie ranks as a: Either you hate it or Love it kinda thing. Watch a trailer, if you like what you see go for it.
********* W A R N I N G ! ************* STAY AWAY FROM THIS ONE! ****This movie is pretty bad! Ultra low budget movie with terrible acting and a boring plot, which combined with a huge stuggle to stay and watch should have given this one a NEGATIVE FIVE STAR RATING!!!MONEY DOWN THE TUBES WITH THIS ONE!!!
I tried these Jobst 15-20 mmHg pantyhose in my search for high quality therapeutic support pantyhose for a severe circulation problem in one of my legs. I did find them a little difficult to put on, but once they were on they stayed in place nicely and provided great support.The only problem I had was, like the other review stated...they ran the second time I wore them. For as expensive as these pantyhose are, they should last longer than 2 wearings.They are not too sheer, if that is something you are looking for in support hose. They look more like tights when they are on your legs. I did find the beige shade to be a little more like a pale nude shade.
I put them on at the doctor's office and the first time I had to take them off, sure enough, ran them. Otherwise, liked them very much.
Watch out for this turkey! Definitely a disk for the true believers only. Sound quality as bad as any bootleg I have ever listened to, some songs fade (on a live album!?) and skimpy liner notes add up to a pretty bad package. And the addition of a keyboard player seems to hurt rather than add to WA's sound. If you are dying for a live disk from WA's "Locked In" tour, this will have to do. Otherwise, save your money.
This is one of those books that copies all of the information from other books and tries to call it their own (an does not give all the information needed to do the few examples). If need information on bookbinding, the best I have found is Hand Bookbinding: A Manual Of Instruction by Aldren Watson (also available here).
I was eager to read this book because it's set in a part of the world (upstate NY) where I spend a lot of time and it exactly the kind of neo-Gothic tale I usually love. She has talent, it's undeniable, but Scott is far too enchanted with her own writing to tell a decent story. Every time I found myself beginning to be captivated by the narrative or the chatacters, I'd stumble across a highly polished, self-conscious set-piece of prose that screamed "HEY! Look at me...don't I write well?!" After a second attempt to finish this book I am giving up on it and moving on.
This is a wonderful Victorian-style novel about a manor house, its mistress, and her domestics. Wonderful that is, until the middle of the story. The author makes choices that effectively shut down the flow and pacing of the story. It's spooky and interesting, but the sudden turn and the unexpected switch in the narrator's point of view, time, and setting make the rest of a great read a downer.
To call this a collection of Victorian erotica is inaccurate as this implies that all the stories are from that era. I felt rather cheated to realise that a few were obviously twentieth century additions. It might have been more accurate to have titled this a Collection of 18th -20th Century Erotica
It would have been nice if the editor included a bibliography, so people could read an entire novel. For example, The "Romance of Lust" selection doesn't do its author justice. The original is a big book, wherein the author couldn't possibly have held a job anywhere since he devoted his entire day to erotic diversions. No one was safe, not even his aunt and sisters. Well, maybe the family dog. Other selections were uninteresting too. Is the editor really a Major? Why do we need his military rank in such a book? Is he still in active duty???
This looked like it would be lots of fun but it's very hard and uncomfortable and doesnt vibrate very well at all. Dont waste your money
This may be the best product out there ... I wouldn't know because I had no idea what I was ordering. It didn't dawn on me when it said pneumatic that I had to have an "air supply" ... plus it doesn't have any grinding points. I just wanted something to etch my name on the metal prints of my artwork. So back it goes and I'll look for something that's simple enough for me to understand what it is and how to use it.
I bought this bag holder to use in my yard to collect leaves anddog droppings. The construction is very flimsy and the little tabs that hold the bag in place are VERY VERY hard to get off!. After several months, it now can barely stand up by itself and I have to constantly tighten the wheels and other screws. It would be nice if it was better made and sturdier and if it had a cover to keep out the flies...It seemed like a great idea, but the products is not well made.
I often struggle when trying to empty the clippings from my lawnmower into a garbage bag and I had hoped that this product would make that task easier. I was disappointed, I must say. The frame is very thin and unstable. The assembly instructions were hard to understand and the product was hard to assemble with only one set of hands. I am not pleased with this product at all. It seems as though it would collapse if I were to use it for my intended purpose. I do not recommend this product at all.
The product seemed like a good idea but wish I had read all of the reviews before ordering. The product is not sturdy at all. It didn't come with the number of screws noted on the instructions so I had to go out and purchase more in order to finish putting it together. That was after I spent way to much time trying to decipher the instructions. Also, the clips that hold the bag to the frame are very tight and very difficult to put on and remove. I've torn every bag I've used. I hate wasting my money; but, I'll have to buy a better one.
poor instructions, had to modify by creating new holes in the metal. The rubber bag clamps were too difucult to remove so replaced with wood clothespins. Don't bother with this thing.
The item as pictured was not sent. Instead a holder was sent that had no provision to hold the leaf bag nor did it have wheels. Not worth the ;money
This is the biggest waste of money I have spent in a long time. It didn't even make it through one bag of leaves. I would demand my money back but it would cost too much to send back. Can't believe Amazon still has this piece of trash in their online shopping department. Take my advice and save your money!!!!!I would have given it no stars but didn't have that option. In my opinion it rates 00000 stars....
The worst item I have ever purchased it is so flimsy you can only fill it to half full putting it together nut and screws stripped out and had to go to ace hardware to buy new bolts and nuts save your money
I decided to read "Island" because i enjoyed "Brave New World" so much. Well the former is really horrible compared to the latter. It's pretty boring, the plot doesn't make much sense and the main character's ideas are often all over the place.While certain parts of this story are interesting, in it's entirety, i would have to give it two thumbs down :(
Please let me begin by agreeing with most reviewers that Aldous Huxley was a brilliant man, one of the most forward-thinking men in modern history and (on the whole) a wonderfully gifted writer. That being said, this book is absolutely, unequivocably horrible. It is 354 pages of plotless, repetitive socio-preach. Mr. Huxley's "A Brave New World" is, in my opinion, one of the best novels ever written. "Island" does not rise to that same level, though, and I would not wish it upon anyone.
It was a decent book, but not a lot of new information for me. For the most part, it simply confirmed some basics I have long believed in - not living out your dreams through your children, encouraging exploration without forcing achievement, the need to provide for additional means of learning, etc. A lot of time spent on selecting schools for gifted kids, which really doesn't apply in small towns like we live in. Some good chapters on different kinds of gifted children and some scattered teaching methods. A lot of "real life" examples stretched across several chapters that in my opinion became a scattered approach.Probably the most novel idea that came across was that it's better to be a "good enough" parent than a perfect one. By Klein's opinion, if you manage to be the perfect parent, you set a standard so high that your child will have anxieties trying to live up to your example. Not sure I'm 100% with that, but it is an interesting take on parenting.
This software is not user friendly. The samples don't help. I would imagine that if I sat down for a few hundred hours I could figure out were the dots go. The whole interface just doesn't make any sense. It's very time consuming. Total waste of 30 dollars at the Apple store.
Borred, Borred and very borred!! to much bla bla! I spected that this book would say something about ancient phylosopy, something to think about, but never get it, it is very borred.
Easy reading book which I would recommend for those who want a sort of "executive summary" of the story behind Wright and his works. Having said this, I found the depth and detail lacking for those who have read extensively about this architect whose noteriety is growing with time. Not for collectors unless you (like myself) want the book to help fill a spectrum of the vast number of publications which continue to come into popular view.
There are two mistakes about this DVD. The English title for this Italian movie should be either Bread, Love and Dreams (original: Pane, amore e fantasia) or Bread, Love and Jealousy (original: Pane, amore e gelosia). The actors Vittorio de Sica, Gina Lollobrigida and Marisa Merlini played in both movies and the product description could easily be related to any of them. Both movies were directed by Luigi Comencini and not by Vittorio de Sica. Boudu Saved From Drowning is a very famous Jean Renoir movie from 1932. Both Italian movies are very good, but the one star is because of these mistakes.
The playing is merely competent, and the singing sounds like jump rope chanting much of the time. But there are flashes of inspiration. It's unlikely any of these songs will stay with you after the CD is over, nor will you feel much of a draw to put it on again.
The book contains 280 pages of text, 25 pages of refenreces, 7 pages of INDEX, and many figures and cartoon to explain the concept of author's hypothesis. Barbieri was a development biologist at MRC in Cambridge, NIH, and Max Planck.This is a typical anti-Darwinism semi-pseudoscience book. I picked up the book because the book cover had a Chomsky's accolade. It's not as obvious and outrageous as Intelligent Desing-sort of book, but the author cites his own book to explain his main points. Many biological facts in the book are real and correct, but there is no scientific logical structure to support the author's "semantic" theory. I was struck by the fact that this book was published from Cambridge University Press.
Hello again, here we are. This is what I think after listening to the new album of Germanys' Thrash-Metal godfathers.Nothing new but still they rock like hell. Unfortunately they made a step backwards and not like Slayer or Mayhem a step forward. Well, I believe that some old school fanatics will enjoy this feature, but Sodoms'great days are gone. Their last good record was and will be "Tapping the Vein". I was a great fan of them for over 12 years but they just repeat themselves. I am not happy about giving such a cruel review about this record but I just had to say that. Sorry guys, better luck next time, ok?
I bought this game because my friend said it was excellent, however he's never been a very good gamer, I thought the no resource management idea was ok, but it ruins half the point of an RTS, and strategy is all about careful management of resources to fund your army, because, if you dont have any resources, you dont have an army ;-) I'd say ok for someone who doesn't really know how to play a REAL RTS, but if your an expert, I'd save up for Warcraft 3:The Frozen Throne, and if you haven't got the normal Warcraft 3, go buy it!
Everyone knows that a good strategy game involves somewhat of a steep learning curve and an advanced difficulty level. This game is simply a click and attack real time strategy that does not involve any heavy thinking. In fewer words it's the bunnie slope for youngsters that are just discovering the thrill of these games. In conclusion I feel the word strategy is innapropriate altogether! True strategy players will want to return the product, rookies will like it because they'll feel moderately challenged by it.
[..]Let me warn all potential customers that this book is all about quantity of material instead of quality. While the book does cover such advanced topics as Fourier Analysis and intro to Partial Differential Equations, the book lacks sufficient examples about what is being said (a number of sections have no examples at all).I did find the most well-written sections to be the application of second-order differential equations (applied to spring oscillations etc.) However, as far as getting a bang for your buck, I HIGHLY RECOMMEND Morris Tennenbaum and Harry Polland's Ordinary Differential Equations Dover edition (cheaper, and MUCH MORE effective. Trust me).
I'm a student and am taking a class using this book. I've found it very difficult to follow and short on explanations. Without additional resources, I would not be able to learn the material in this book.
While the shipping was AMAZING, the book itself is not much use other than as a list of problems. The text explaining the theory behind is written like sandpaper and often jumps around leaving important processes out. It would be a very hard book to use as a solo resource w/o an instructor leading.
I decided to self study AP environmental science, which I eventually received a 5 for. This was a textbook I was considering to use, but I found it to be difficult to read (not to mention a bit politically-oriented). I would recommend Raven and Berg for APES, which is more concise and comprehensive for the test.
Voice too "breathy" to suit my taste. I wouldn't say it is bad; just not the kind of music that I like.
i like everything aphex twin has ever made (with the exception of "elephant song"), but this album is a piece of poo covered crust (thats right "crust"!). i think mr. smiley here is just releasing the stupidest stuff he's ever made as some sort of artsy fartsy nut chunk because these songs stink flamboyantly. the first song features a reggae "artist" who has too much self esteem (if your gonna get excited about something dont make it reggae lyrics). anyway i hate lyrics, so i'm a little biased. the other parts in the song consist of drums...and some other insignificant effects. the other songs consist of only the latter; no music just stuff (which i know is arguably music also, but jeez 9 minutes then the next song is the exact same stuff). now i've gone and soiled myself i hope smiley mcgee is happy.
Two years, and this is all we get? The first song is decent. It has some rap/reggae guy doing his vocal thang, with RDJ's music behind the background. Except for the first 10 seconds, the music itself exceptional. Nice crazy d'n'b stuff with vocals. This song is worth getting, but not for $$$ ! The other two tracks... they are just noise. It's as if he hooked up electrodes to his recording equipment and twiddled with the knobs or something. Or maybe he had real songs and then encrypted them. Who knows! They are not music. They're most likely a sick joke by RDJ.
but man yeah yeah yeah its good and all that, but man, 9 dollars for three songs?! isn't that like an oxymoron?
I was hoping that this band would have evolved in some or any degree over the past decade, but sadly they have not. Having the courtney love message on this cd is further testament that this band is tapped out. Now that Kim is in her 40s, you'd think there would be more emphasis to release a breakthrough cd rather than these out-takes from the past.
Bought this CD thinking it would be similar to their cover tune, Kids in America.Was I wrong, this is worst cd I've has the displeasure to listen to.Old chic, lead singer does nothing but scream throughout all the tracks. The tunes are simplistic, lack depth and show no inkling of creativity.If you like endless screaming to nonsensical lyrics then this rubbish is for you.
I didn't find this book at all interesting.. all though there was occasional humor.. in general, i didn't enjoy this piece of literature.
Sorry, i just didnt get it. We all know the lessons provided in this book. Seems too repetitive. There are plenty of other self help books that are more useful than this one.
This book really wasn't for me. It's the same tripe as 101 other books of the genre. Although, it might be useful to the right person. I'd happily recommend it as a gift for a teenager, or anyone who doesn't usually read books. The book reads a lot like the "Chicken Soup for the Soul" series, with quirky quotes and anecdotes, but very little substance. On the bright side, after reading Chomsky or Neitzche, McWilliams is a comic relief.
I was totally disappointed with the book for two reasons. One, it had a different author than the one I ordered. Two, it was tremendously boring. A waste of the little money I did spend to get it.
The quotes are wonderful, but the rest is an atrocity and an offense to the intellect of the reader with all the simplifications and self-pity. Please read some literature instead.
Half the book (literally) is quotes. The rest, a bunch of touchy-feely, quite unmitigated flapdoodle. In my opinion, anyways. Considering how easily and cheaply quotation dictionaries can be had these days, I'd say, go to the source <g>, and just get one.
I know bad music when I hear it. Here 'tis. The lead singer is the main problem, the band are not too bad, just apparently under the leadership of this mo. Go back to mommy and daddy in TX.
I ordered two in Cowboy Slim Cut 33x34. I already had some Wranglers. The waist was way too small, the fly was off to my left in a really weird and very ugly and uncomfortable way. These were made in Mexico, just like the ones I bought at Target, but the badging was different, a rubber badge on the back right pocket, not the thin leather Wrangler badge at the rear right waist. Were these knock-offs? Not sure. Returned them and went to Target where I got two pair for $15.99 each (they were Original and Legendary Gold, not Cowboy, but still, half the price, pard)!
I got the black stockings in size A/B. They are way off too short. Almost 1" above my knees. I am 5'3" and 125 lbs. Make sure you order at least one size up.I am also disappointed with the customer service. Shipping took exactly 2 weeks. I do not think I would like to order another thing from Essential Apparel.
I just got these stockings but the seller sent me a way smaller size (A-B) than I ordered, I e-mailed them telling them about the problem and will keep you dear buyer posted. I cannot tell you about anything about the quality or color because I have not opened the ones I received.
I've owned this CD for a few years, yet thought something was slightly off, so I compared "Keep A Knockin" to another copy I have.Results:Original is 168 beats per minutes, while this version is 172 beats per minute.Original's time is 2 min. 23 seconds; this version is 2:16 min.
I am a big Belva Plain fan and have always enjoyed her books. After the Fire is a disappointing read. What bothered me the most is the character of Hyacinth-what a weak and stupid woman! She is not believable at all. Any mother will fight to the end for her children. I kept hoping she would snap out of it, but she never did. She just kept trusting stupid men and believing them. I will think twice before spending money on another Belva Plain novel in the future.
I'll have to reserve a higher rating until I finish this saga. I think I will have to agree with the previous reviewer that gave a low rating. The dialog is so stilted I can't believe what I am reading. I AM a Belva Plain admirer, but her writing here leaves much to be desired.Back to this unbelievable couple and their disolving marriage.
This is the first novel by Belva Plain I have read and I can say without hesitation it will be my last. I found the entire premise to be nothing short of silly (how many mothers would give up their children based on their supposed involvement in an accidental fire?) The plot was laughable and the main character pathetic. Sorry I wasted my time on this one.
I always read Belva Plain's new books since I have enjoyed her previous books very much. I found this book to be predictable from the onset. I looked at the front of the book twice to be sure I hadn't inadvertently grabbed a Danielle Steele book from the library shelves. The story line is a standard and I found nothing redeeming or unique in any of the characters. I didn't feel any empathy for Hyacinth's situation since it seemed totally unrealistic that she would have relinquished her children without resorting to every possible alternative. I am certain that Belva Plain will return to her previous writing style with her next book(s)...please.
When I attempted to install the mirror onto my pickup, the three screws came unthreaded from the housing, which means that I cannot tighten the mirror to my pickup.
Bought this set based on low price and good reviews. Works fine for poking logs occasionally and cleaning up when stove is cold, but while using the shovel in the fire, the black coating started bubbling, then caught fire.
This product does its job, but not very well. All the end pieces, except the shovel, and the handles have to be attached to the rods. The poker, the main tool used, does not fit on the rod very well, and will spin loose when trying to move a log. My husband said he will weld it on so it won't move. Would recommend a different product, probably something that is constructed of one piece.
It does the job, yet most certainly strictly utilitarian. No frills. Not sure it will last long. Not in any manner decorative.
I purchased these fireplace tools with great anticipation of beautiful, warming fires. The tools are cheaply made and if you don't put them into the holder the right way they get stuck and it's difficult to remove the handle. Do not recommend.
It was a bit confusing to assemble. Had to redo a few times before I got the right rods with the right utensils. In the end you get what you paid for - bottom of the line product for cheap.
This set is very small. Not happy at all. Bought it because other people gave good reviews. We have a wood burning stove. The poker is not long enough to safely move logs around.
When the tool set arrived it was okay..smaller than I thought but mostly one of the tools was broken so it made the set not acceptable.
I was expecting a bigger set so was surprised at how small it was. I should have spent more for a better set, but it will have to do for now.
I was disappointed in the CD because I am a fan of the trio and this one had too much input from other musicians. I guess I was looking for unadulterated Steve Newcomb (sp). My error.
Had to call the MFGR'er to be informaed that the model I was sent does not fit on any GOLF with US Specs,it was manufactured for the UK version of the Golf, which has less "plumbing" and emmission gadgetery.For my model, the only option is the replacement filter (square) that fits in the filter box.
I was unable to get this game to work in Windows Vista. I inquired about a patch but did not receive a response.
My favorite game was roller coaster tycoon, until this one came along. I downloaded the demo and bought the full game on the same day. Spring break is great fun.
Pros and cons of the game...Pros:*Great plot,U have to become the best chef and beat the evil omni food empire.*Quite fun since u are able to join cooking competitions*U feel a sense of sastification when u watch people dine in ur restaurant.CONS:*GRaphics are a boo-boo,the graphics was blur*There aren't there many furniture to choose from unlike the sims.*VEry limited control-all u do is watch ur customers eat.At first,u will feell very sastified....but after a while u become very bored.U just wait for people to enter the restaurant and buy recipes from them.I really wouldn't recommend this game beacuse i had very limited control over the restaurant.....All i did was sit and watch the customers dine.....Now how much of a game is that?!I got sick and tired of it after two days of playing.
Mathematically speaking, this book is all nonsense. For instance, the author argues that owning a home is more expensive than not owning. This is true if you compare a person living under a tree versus one owning a home. He argues that the person owning a home has a negative cash flow of 8k per year all due to the interest he pays on mortage. But the details he left out (just to make his useless point) is, the person who owns a home has a home to live for a few hundred more bucks a month, whereas the person who doesn't own a home has to pay may be 10-15k per year for rent. That wipes out the savings that the author is claiming. Not only that, that money is down the drain since it goes to the landlord, whereas the owner of the home builds equity.My recommendation is to stay away from this nonsensical book, else you will be screwed if you follow his advice.
This entire book could be summed up in 10 pages. It is terribly repetitive. The basic premise is that one can use a HELOC instead of a Checking Account so that your money doesn't sit around idle while mortgage interest is accruing. This may have some merit, but it is not clear how much of the savings is due to putting all of your disposable income towards your mortgage. The big trade off is a loss of liquidity. I have been aware of this strategy for a while, and I hoped that this book would help to prove its effectivness, and explain exactly how to do it. It falls short. After reading numerous message boards on the subject, this book tought me nothing new. It really feels like an informercial that I paid for.
I bought the book because I read the review and it look interesting and funny. But after the first pages, I knew that this was a mistake. Is very repetitive and some of the content really ridiculous for this age and time.
I didn't really like the book. If the author didn't write the sex portion of the book, there would not have been much to write about. What happened with Nick and the law suit. It was barely mentioned. She could have written more about that and less the descriptive sex.
Pretty much just a business woman's Harlequin Romance.Sex scenes in a book cover you're not 100% embarrassed to be seen reading in public.
All I can really say is I didn't even finish the book. I love romances but this one wasn't for me. I found it too much to read about sexual desire and how the body responds to it, that was too much for me. I would say this book should say blush or some kind of note to let people know its not clean romance.
This was a free kindle purchase. I guess you get what you pay for with the Kindle.This was absolute drivel! This writer neither knows southerners nor humour. The story was so unbelievable, it was laughable. Could not finish this pile of ...
I got this book free for my Kindle. I have read a lot of free Kindle books and most of them are not that great, but they are at least a little entertaining. This is the first book I have deleted before finishing it. I read to 35% and just could not take any more! It was not funny at all, it was super annoying and predictable.
Maybe my expectations are too high but after reading the reviews I expected more. I thought the plot was too unrealistic for me to even be interested in. I liked the characters but I found myself flipping through pages just to get through the book.
I love books that make me laugh, and a friend told me about this book. I paid full price, and I feel somewhat had. Ms. Jensen has a gift for humor, but the plotting involved in this book is horrible. Good humor has to have some element of believability in it, and this book has none whatsoever. With a believable story line, Ms. Jensen could be among the top humor writers out there.
This book really should be removed from circulation. While basic MIDI information is in there, it is so out of date it just makes it hard to read. Examples are of obsolete or vintage gear and has no real relation to todays musician.Illustrations are all cheesy and look like bad microsoft clipart. Photographs are all poor and dated. The section on MIDI and a personal computers lists atari and commodore as possible good choices - get the picture!If you are looking for charts of Control codes etc, - they are in here, but you can find those anywhere. If you are trying to get information on MIDI in the last decade or so, buy a different book.
This book was published in 1987 and reprinted in 1994. The book does recognize that it is really when the MIDI-instruments are connected to a computer that MIDI takes on its real power, but only 10% of the book talks about MIDI and computers. The chapter on computer tells you about the choice between PC, MAC, Atrari and Commodore, and explains in length what a CD-rom is, and why we need it (not all programs fit on a floppy disk...) Sequencer program are mentioned, but barely so.The book does a fair job in explaining the MIDI standard and how it works, but it does not help me at all when I want to get started in connecting the components to my PC. I do think this was an excellent book in 1987, but digital music has moved on a long way since then.
Well, I guess if you've never heard this kind of stuff before then it's fine, but it certainly is not the future of music. Listen to Papalotl instead.
I just received this today and while I knew to expect nothing hand crafted, I was shocked at how amazingly flimsy this thing really is. The bottom wood actually came with a huge crack; big enough to leak out all the sand. The feet were glued on with cheap glue and 3 of the 4 came off in transit. Based on the construction, I'm amazed it was even in one piece.The reason this gets 2 stars is that the accessories are pretty decent. And the sand looks fine. If this wasn't cracked in the center, I'd most likely have kept it and it would have "worked" for its purpose. Having said that, if you are looking for a desktop zen garden, look elsewhere.
I bought this on a whim, as it was the first Zen garden that I could find. I did not look at the reviews, and immediately regret it upon receiving my Zen garden. The other reviews summed it up nicely. The product is exactly what you pay for.Image:[...] - You can see the gap between the border/frame and the bottom piece. The tacks were put in, but did not hold the board to the border/frame. You should probably buy some wood glue, push lightly to separate the border, then press it back together with a small vice.
The product looks really nice when you open it. But when I took the zen garden out of the box, I discovered that two of the four feet had come off, and that the bottom was only attached to the sides in four places, at the corners. Along all four sides, it was bowed out with loads of space.I pushed it all together and glued the feet back on, but I'm keeping this in the bottom of the box it shipped in, lest I end up with fine white sand all over my desk. (I have this item at work.) When I leave the job or change work areas, I think I'll toss this rather than trying to bring it with me.Otherwise, it works as advertised. Really, it's hard not to, as it's sand and rocks in a tray. It's just hard to believe that a tray you put sand in could have been screwed up this way.
Creates a big mess. It's also pretty small so it gets very boring after a while. I've had it for like 6 months and used it twice. and that was the first week i got it.
For the price this very simple apparatus should function flawlessly. Its one job is to hold sand. I wish I noticed out of the box that one of the edges of the bottom where it meets the frame was bowed out enough to leak sand (salty looking sand) all over my desk. Annoying. I scooted as much sand out of the way as I could to duct tape this edge on the inside. When I have the time, I'll probably dump out the sand and tape all the edges because I don't trust it.The hassle this has caused is definitely not zen.
The base and frame were not completely attached. Fixed with a little glue. My friend loved it after that.
Disappointed in this item. The tray bottom was not attached well to the sides - doesn't hold the sand. Also, the rocks are dull and all one color. Rakes seem to be OK.
When i got my package i openned it and everything was great, but the sand holder is so cheaply made, it was broken before i even touched it. Now i have to go through the hassle of finding the right one maybe at a home goods store.. and there is no way you can have a refund which i wanted, because they take off the sticker you use to send it back. I basically paid for sand rocks, and a cheap rake. Not worth the money! Made in china, the table is not stable at all. I hope nobody buys this, because they certainly dont deserve the money. Quality over quantity. -Rant over-
The tray was thin and cheap looking and although it was supposed to have rocks included, there were none in the box. The only part of it that was half-way decent was the rakes. Because I was on a time constraint I kept it, but I did have to go buy rocks and I also bought more sand because what came with it looked like salt.
These two short tapes consist of a brief description of 50 years of white-red relations, treaties and conflicts. Because of its brevity, there is little detail presented. The text is interesting and appears to be factually correct. The presentation is relatively unbiased, and is quite interesting. It would make a good audio tape. The extra loud background music and simulated battlefield noise sometimes drowns out the text. The visual portion consists of old photographs, presumably authentic in detail and clips from old grade B movies which are quite far from authentic. These are rerun from 6 to 10 times throughout the presentation and, of course, have no bearing on the text. Except for the extreme brevity and the overwhelming background noise, one can ignore the visual effects and derive a worthwhile understanding of many aspects of the period of the Indian Wars.
do not buy The Great Indian Wars. the same hollywood movie stock played over and over, sometimes without even turning down the borrowed movie's audio. i couldn't concentrate on the narration, and that was a shame because the narration was very well written. the narrator also had a fine voice and read his stuff superbly. i felt sorry for him, being assocaited with something that went so bad through no fault of his own. someone ruined this "documentary" with the choice and use of the visual footage.i even tried turning off the picture and listening only to the narration but the silly dialogue and old-western music score made trying to listen only to the narrator sheer torture. i only wish i could have given this film a rating it really deserves. MINUS FIVE! the fact that they used 2 tapes when the entire length is only 96 minutes proves to me that the intent of the producers was only to flim-flam the public into thinking they were getting a lot for their money.
This is without a doubt the worst video I have ever watched.The videos picture could not tracted without jumping lines and wiggling screen it was painful for me to watch.The movie itself was out of focus.They used old black and white movies" indians meet the cavalry " to illustrate the action and pencil drawings of the indian chiefs while they spoke of them. There was one man speaking with a monotone voice.After five minutes it became very boring to watch.The movie was put together very poorly and hard to watch the pictures had very little contrast, and hard listen to.It was so bad I could'nt retain any of infomation,my mind kept wandering off. If you enjoy being bored,and having your ears and eyes assulted by this low grade quality picture this movie is for you. Reviewed by Paul Phillips
This radiator seems to be very cheaply built. Its aluminum and plastic! It did not even come with a radiator cap. How cheap can you get?
I purchased this a month ago and found out this was not working correctly.I had it pugged in and it went on by itself, then another time I could not control it with the remote....Not happy in Lynn, Mass
Bought this for the Christmas lights 1 for outside and one for the tree,works great EVEN WITH EVERY OTHER REMOTE YOU HAVE WILL TURN IT ON OR OFF,AND DRIVE YOU CRAZY!!!!THE CAR REMOTE/ GARAGE/ HANDY SWITCHES ALL TURNED THE LIGHTS ON
I ordered and paid for an 8 ounce product and received a 4 ounce product. Now the seller wants me to take a picture of the product and the bar code and send it to them before they will make good on it. I've ordered from them before and there have been issues. Never again....What a pain.
This book says it is a "look" and that what it is. By no means is it the Bible or even a beginner's guide to the 1911. Half the book is just gun reviews, which you can get anywhere. Another 1/4 or more has to do with competitions and things like that. If you want to learn about the "use, care, and maintenance" of the 1911, look elsewhere. The internet is better than this book.
Somehow, if I had spent the time reading the book a little before purchasing, I wouldn't have bought it. He talks extensively about competition rigs, rules, etc. which I had no interest in. I have yet to see a gun rag writer talk honestly about guns. Ever see a bad review in ANY of the gun magazines?
Even though this is rated to hold up to 2000 lbs. I would not trust it to last very long. The nylon and ropes that this comes with are clearly very low quality. Some of the ropes even showed signs of fraying straight out of box. Cannot recommend this item.
This trilley has been opersted only a few hours and the drive system seems to be slipping already. Not durable and not recommended.
The kindest description of this book would be that it is well-written and quite pointless. The plot is paper thin and all the characters (with the possible exception of Mr Hilditch) are either two dimensional or borrowed from other, more superior, works. The much-touted plot twist, when it finally arrives, lacks any irony and seems contrived. William Trevor is best known as a short story writer and this book is essentially a short story padded into a novel. As a well-written, mildly diverting, piece of light entertainment it would have been acceptable, as a prize-winning piece of high literary pretensions, it is not. Dickens, Poe, even Highsmith have succeeded much better in what Trevor seeks to achieve.
I found the basic idea of the book to be excellent and very true to life, however, I cannot say the same for the characters, Felicia in particular. Beyond her frustration, we are never privy to any of her emotions. What did she think of her plight? Why did she never worry that Johnny, her lover, might reject her? I feel that the author made a mistake by never writing in Felicia's viewpoint during her scenes with Mr. Hilditch. We certainly know many of his feeling and thoughts concerning Felicia, but never, never any of her thoughts about her sinister friend. ...The character of Mr. Hilditch is very well developed, unfortunately more so than the main character. I felt that too much of the book (one quarter) was devoted to Mr. Hilditch's downward spiral. It almost becomes a completely different story.As a previous reviewer mentioned, the author's practice on going back and the forth between past and present was confusing.
was very upset that this DVD did not specify that you could not play it in the United States. Why was it on Amazon, USA. False Will not deal with this vendor ever again and will make sure my friends and colleagues are aware of it..
I bought the Soyo 24 inch monitor based on a $100 reduction in price at Office Max and what appeared to be a review on the internet. Previously I had a Viewsonic 17" LCD monitor which was pretty bad too. The Soyo has a bad stand that is supposed to be adjustable, but I could not do it and had to prop it at an angle with a book. The User's manual is nearly incomprehensible. The speakers have to be the worst sounding ones I've ever heard. I am going to repack and try to return it and buy something better ever if I have to pay more.
this all sounds crappy. fauna flash's drum n bass tune sounds so generic and boring that it makes everything else look bad. the tunes here are not of the same quality of other cds in the series like vol.5. i say skip this one, its really boring and with the exception of like one song by tosca everything else is $hit.
We bought this Emer Galilieo vacuum cleaner for about $400 more than one year ago. The retractable cord broke after a short time. We had to send the vacuum to NJ to get it repaired by using the warranty. After a month they sent it back with the same problem and the on-off button was broken as well! I called the customer service and asked for refund or replacement and they were kind enough to replace the vacuum with a new one. This vacuum is very powerful, however the handle (hose) is kind of heavy and the hose twists frequently and makes it difficult to use. By considering its high price, I guess there should be much better choices than this one if you are looking for a powerful canister vacuum cleaner.
being a wolverine fan ; this is nothing like i expected. really don't like the drawing or storyline. looks fake.
I have seen an episode of this show and all I could say is WOW, what a travesty. This show is completely not Wolverine. First Logan is Canadian not Japanese, short not tall, older looks middle aged even though much older not like a teenager. Voice acting is poor. This show is the William Shatner of Wolverine, extreme over acting and over dramatized action sequences. This is supposed to be Marvel Comics Wolverine not a Wolverine DragonBall Z. If they want to make a good Wolverine Cartoon keep it on par with the comics both in the character models and story, and use voice actors that have worked in the past, and if you really want to do Wolverine Justice make it a Mature rated cartoon and show Blood in the battles.
I bought this first alert CO alarm for my home in Wisconsin.When I started to read the instructions I found that this product is not UL list! How can a safety item like this not be UL listed.I did some research and found out first alert changed testing labs to save a few bucks and do not use the most well known UL. What's up with that...So I returned this CO and purchased the Kidde KN-COB-DP-H Plug-In Carbon Monoxide Alarm. The Kidde unit cost less too, so I saved a few dollars! Always pays to READ THE FINE PRINT.
We bought this item twice. The first time, it was defective and wouldn't work (it made a dull sound all the time, and no additional sound at all when put in contact with water, as per the test described on the instructions sheet), so we returned it to Amazon (thanks for your excellent returns policy!) for an exchange. When the 2nd item proved just as defective, we got our money back. Don't waste your money on this junk -- buy something more expensive and substantial.
This went off in the middle of the night after my husband and I had had it for several years. We had to look up online the directions because it didn't have a clear beep for a warning and for a battery replacement. It was ridiculous. I would not recommend it. I want one that clearly tells me when to vacate the house and call the fire department.
It did not even occur to me that a plug-in CO detector would not have battery back-up, which is my fault for missing that. However, what the?? I mean, they ALL should have batter back-up. This one has to go back.
I bought this video from Lullabot as soon as it was released. I've managed several Drupal projects and am now diving in to development myself. I was very disappointed, this video has no instructional content whatsoever. It is a very (very) high level view of what Drupal is. I give it two stars for good production value, only.I am hoping this is the first in a series of videos that will dive deeper into Drupal.
This tripod is out of production, although I bougth it because the price and the need of lanc connection for my camcorder Sony DSR PD170, was the only model with a reasonable price. The desadvantage is that it can not hold stablity for the camcorder, too light, not enough hight, and the locks for the vertical and horizontal moves are not good enough, you loose in trying to loose or tight the buterfly nuts. The only advantage is the remote controller and the price. I hope Sony can improve it like the next level but with more confortable price.
I have read alot of Krishnamurti,Probably the greatest teacher I have came across,But this book is no better than Humpdy dumpty or the Bible, If it is K which I very much doubt he must have been very immature to write this hollow meaningless stuff.His other works are consistant and valuable, among the most valuable words ever written,This book has less wisdom than the average person on the street
I think it deserves the one star. maybe even 2 if I was drunk.... but I was'nt! Oh God, how I wish I had been. I can't tell you why I kept watching after the first half hour. I guess I expected it to become something .. ummm good..! quite an unusual film. if you watch it please tell me what you thought of it and what you think I missed. I don't watch Mexican movies ever..! & now I think I know why.... they make my brain all mushy and then it pours out of my ears and I fall over dead and brainless! OMG.. and the last 15 minutes... I could have slit my wrists, it was that bad! Sorry, Have I said too much.?
While the journals in here were really beautiful, it doesn't look like the author put a lot of effort into explaining them. It only took me about an hour to read this book and, even with a few creative ideas(mostly from the pictures), the general content was sparse. Some of the shaded sections on the side looked like space filler (for example, one on "themes" describes a travel journal's purpose as "chronicling your travels"...no way!). It bothers me when writers use pretty pictures to try and pull off the appearance of a quality book. Flip through this book in the library to get some good ideas, but don't expect thoughtful written advice.
While this book has a wonderful visual collection of stunningly beautiful books and journals, it offers virtually no guidance on how to "make" them. The advice on putting together a complicated book with non-linear pages is limited to 3 steps, with no list of supplies and vague instructions. Poorly edited, there are many grammatical mistakes or typos. Buy this book for inspiration, but not for instruction.
I bought this book wanting to learn how to make a journal. This book did not show the basics. It was a waste of money, the author seemed more interested in presenting cute ideas and making pretty pictures than teaching basics.
Purchased this radiator 5 months ago. It fit perfectly and performed well for 5 months. The side tank seam started weeping last week. This week it is leaking a lot. I expected this to last much longer. I will purchase another brand next time or go to a junk yard and get one from there.
This CD only contains 2 songs, both of which are available on Madonna's first album. Definately only for those who can't stand not having any given Madonna cd for their expansive collection.
I just couldn't get into this book. Right from the start, it seemed like the author was trying to hide something from the reader and that annoyed me. Also, it contained too many long descriptions. Not my type of book.
Was hoping that this would be an upgrade to the many versions I have bought over the years. Sadly it is not. It is taken from the same horrible print. Decent movie, but baaaaad quality. Let the buyer beware! This is the item I bought. http://www.amazon.com/gp/product/B00005YVX9/ref=cm_cr_rev_prod_title
What Dean & Jerry fan does not know of this movie?My intention is to save those of us collectors time and money.The Good Times Video version appears to have been recorded from a vhs - that was itself recorded from another vhs without Time Base Correction - about 10 times.It's presented as Academy Standard 1.37:1 (original film aspect)Yep - that bad. Perhaps it was better than nothing, but now that something has hit the market, do yourself a favor, skip this version.
The slow-paced "At War with the Army" (1950) was Dean Martin and Jerry Lewis' first starring feature - a bargain-basement military farce that separates the team for much of its footage. Some nice moments (the "Going My Way" parody remains priceless), but not enough to justify the endless 93-minute length. One of the comedy duo's weakest efforts.
I guess I didn't find this CD memorable, as I couldn't even remember what it sounded like. There were no particular pieces that jumped out at me and cried "Dance to me." Overall I was not that impressed.
When will people stop digging for the lowest possible price? I would have paid three times this price to have a quality product. After three pumps the check valve that holds the air in the rocket failed. You would push the pump in and all the air would get sucked out of the rocket when you pulled the pump back out. Then the mounting nipple snapped off when releasing the rocket from the clamp. Never worked once! Would like to find one that works, but they all look the same.
I used to love these rockets back in the day when I was a kid, so I got one for my 11-year old son. When it arrived, it looked like the ones I had as a kid, but was obviously of cheaper quality. Then again, it cost only a few bucks. Problem is, when I put the water in and then snap close the end of the pump, all the water leaks out! This happens whether the rocket is pointed up or down. The rocket is totally useless and we had to throw it away. Too bad, those rockets sure were fun a long time ago...
I bought 2 of these hoping to show my kids one of the toys I had growing up. Wow, these are straight CRAP. Why would someone produce a product that SUCKS this much?!! The clip that holds the rocket to the pump doesn't hold the rocket on. The O-ring is a dried, hard, brittle piece that doesn't seal. Then, when you get past ALL that crappy-ness, the pump shaft will either pull completely out, bend like a pretzel while pumping, or leak water into the pump itself! I got three launches out of 2 of these. I was more disappointed than the kids were. Boooooo!
Not as pictured. Doesn't seal well for the launch and so it is pretty much worthless. I had the one pictured when I was a kid and was pretty excited to order and now left with disappointment. Order what you see and you may get something else and cheaply made. Maybe should have bought this back in 2006 when it got better reviews. Amazon, please take this off your site!! It indeed is less than a quality product and your company is deceiving those who buy.
Launcher broke after a couple of flights. Not surprising for the cost. These were popular when I was a kid and this model WAS enjoyable while it lasted.
Wanting to share my water rocket memories with my kids, I decided to try this rocket out in spite of all the bad reviews. I agree, it is junk. While the whole thing is cheaply constructed, the biggest problem I see is with the pump. The valving is so defective it simply will not pressurize the rocket. Even though I was very gentle with the pump, it came apart after only a couple pumps and the rocket never flew. I'd love to find a good one of these but this one is not.
Boring. What was I expecting? Something that would give me insight into my own abilities to heal self and others. This didn't do it. Especially since it wasn't in English.
I guess these would be good if you had foot surgery and wanted to place something lose and protective over bandaging, but not for under a boot cast. I was under the impression these would be tall enough to almost reach my knee. They only go about 4" above the ankle. Very wimpy, probably wouldn't hold up to too many washes.
This is totally different from the "classic albums" series of DVDs that have come out which I love. This is a "classic album under review" which basically has a bunch of fat old guys talking about how great AC/DC is. The clincher for me was the fact that they had an AC/DC tribute band on to play the guitar riffs from this album. A TRIBUTE BAND?!?!? I'm sure that was great fun for those guys to do, but I think the people watching would rather see the actual band playing the songs. This DVD went on WAY too long and only had little snippets of the band playing live. Way too much filler for me and not what I thought this DVD was going to be. I do not recommend it.
We know Back in Black was one of the best albums in history...do we really need some "experts" to tell us this ??I'm a big AC/DC fan I would not buy this....
So they release a DVD to say how good "Back in Black" is (as if we needed to be remembered of that...) and they put a photo at the front cover with SIMON WRIGHT in the line-up, instead of Phil Rudd! Wright joined the band THREE YEARS after the recording of "Back in Black".This fact alone is a very good omen of the real intentions of this product: to make easy and fast money and offering nothing new about this classic rock album. Useless.
This 1991 Muse Records CD (out of print)is among Earlands weakest B-3 performances recorded. Standard tunes like "Unforgetable" and "Europe" (yes, the Santana hit) is arranged and played like elevator music and goes nowhere...But there are moments where Earland shines and cook's predictable with his combo like on "Sheila" and "Kicker", but thats all. Even Earland's sidemen like Eric Alexander on tenorsax does not lift the overall performance quality. Thia is not capured misic, this manufactured music. For Earland collectors - put this CD in your shelf and start looking for Earlands recordings on Prestige, Milestone and Savant/HighNote
I rented this thinking it would be an interesting subject on American-Chinese tradition here in the U.S. But I was wrong, it was a total disappointment. The story and its sub-plots are too contrived. The script is very formulaic; even adding a twist at the ending was typical and intentional - just so for audiences who likes a twist in their movies. Any viewer wouldn't get involved watching this film. Basically this is about a group Chinese-American siblings who has hang-ups with themselves and among each others. Set in the affluent neighborhood of San Francisco, it portrays an embarrassingly rich family by showing the amenities of the matriarch's sprawling extravagant house. Tennis, a dip in the pool, jacuzzi anyone? Jeez! I wouldn't recommend this movie to anyone.
While I like the looks of this set a lot, with its retro feel, I find the shaker to be in need of a design overhaul. Every time this is used (and it's been used by several people so I don't think it's a user problem) it spills while pouring! This has been very frustrating to lose good top shelf vodka because of poor design. I had to go out and purchase another shaker because of this problem so I would not recommend this set.
The set is cute to look at, but as far as actually using, it is terrible. The glasses are fine, but the shaker is so hard to use, I actually took a chunk out of my finger trying to get it open to refill it! I've never used it again.
At 60 pages,this is over-priced and not a course for adults. As basic instruction for those 10 and under, it is probably okay. For anyone who even doodles while talking on the phone- forget it!
The set was shipped with a carrying case that was covered in an oil-like substance and either the oil or the case itself smelled horrendous. Also, the punches are very dull and not uniformly sharpened (or dulled, however you look at it). I have difficulties cutting through even thin, soft silicone sheets. Sharpening them with a rotary tool helps, but I feel I shouldn't have to do that with a brand "new" product (which I am sure is actually repackaged). I can't imagine using them for metal, let alone most rubbers. Despite the very affordable price, I would NOT have purchased this set for the above reasons.
Received this in great time- I have no problem with the seller:-)BUT! The inside of the case lists all types of materials this can cut including metals, which is what I got it for.One punch through soft 26ga copper sheet and the edges of the punch bent & in some areas, flaked off. The second disk I cut did it in completely. I had to file all of the edges and it probably would have been easier to cut the sheet with shears.So, not for metals.However, I can see it would be great for leather, paper & plastics.To me it was worth the money spent on the chance that it would actually cut metal disks.
I purchases this set for simple craft projects...mainly to cut card stock and cardboard. I tried hammering the punches with my 12 oz. hammer and it didn't go through the card stock. Got my husbands big beefy hammer...it still will not punch through thin card stock. I am very disappointed in this product. Glad I didn't pay a lot...complete waste of $
Well I don't usually write reviews but I feel the need with this product.1rst. They were caked with mud ...what's up with this?2nd. They are dullI guess they can be sharpened ..we'll see
I really dont want to give this product a bad rating as it is just a simple tool that does what its supposed to. But it has a serious safety flaw/problem!!:The kit came with no instructions, so I was figuring out how it worked, and as I was turning the screw on the side of the barrel, the sharp pointed 2 inch pin needle inside the barrel shot out like a projectile dart. It was spring loaded and the screw is what held it in.Luckily it wasnt aimed at myself or anyone, because it could have caused serious injury. After the pin shot out I was left feeling very disturbed that this tool could have taken out my eye out.So, I feel compelled to warn and advise others who might be buying this tool set.
Listen to the sound bite before you buy. I didn't, but I should have. This is way to modern for me, I like cool west coast jazz, but this is sort of Ornette Coleman meets Karlheinz Stockhausen--very modern in tone. If that is your bag, the album is for you, otherwise pass this one by.
Book is over 600 pages and the print is so small it was difficult for me to try to read so I returned it. Perhaps if it ever comes out on Kindle I would try again.
this book should be a text book for those studying soviet history. the author assumes that the reader is very well informed--certainly better informed that i am. he drops names that are mostly meaningless and impossible to put into context! his vocabulary is beyond the college level. do you know the word "ramify"? i didn't.but the positive side is that remnick has done remarkable research. he has put himself into situations that have put him at risk. his descriptions are graphic and frightening. he is courageous.i read the first half, but couldn't continue. it is part of my too hard file.
I bought this binder for my son who started middle school. Withing the first week, one set of rings did not close properly and now my son has to carefully go through his notebook so the papers don't fall out. Everything gets stuck at the point where the rings don't completely close. Poorly made product.
I have a relatively high tolerance level for bad flicks, but this one is beyond tolerable. If you check the credits after the movie it appears as if the producer hired his family and friends as the actors. Summary (no pun intended): Horrific acting (I could have acted those scenes better than the so called actors; Frightful script (who talks like that anyway "The zombies are breaching our stronghold, I would advise that we seek an alternative egress route in order to address the impending conflict"; Brain Blending effects: Nothing like a karate kick to the face that missed by about 6 inches yet knocks the zombie through the window. My review is more interesting than this movie. Give me a camcorder and an Amazon makeup kit (shameless plug) and I could have done this movie. There is nothing redeeming about this... NOTHING!
You figure zombie movies have been out for at least 20 years and to this date we still can't produce a low budget zombie movie with better actors. The dialogue was good the presentation sucked. it was like they were reading the dialogue instead of experiencing it. The plot was good as well. This movie had all the elements of a well made zombie flick but no one was chomped only the token Lesbian Black chick. Good try but I wanted more.
lower then low budget with horrible dialogue and acting. Two six year olds could have done better with a couple of kindergarten actors
In the past, our family has purchased three videos from this series and LOVED THEM! This DVD advertised SIX segments on its cover and on Amazon's advertising, but only three interrupted segments were on the disc we received. In the end, the contexts for the stories are missing and so is one title of each segment pair intended to support the educational message. Has anyone else had this problem or do we have defective discs? We are returning ours to Amazon ASAP. and hope to get corrected discs.
Item sizing was not consistent. Had to make modifications just to wear it and make it fit. Cheap and torn before could even use it.
This costume is very flimsy, but the bright pink color is great. The only problem we had was the elastic on the mask was too short to fit my daughter's head. So I cut it off and used glue dots to glue the mask onto a pair of sunglasses that I pushed the lenses out of. Perfect fit and much easier to wear!
This was great as a Halloween Costume. however, after my daughter tried it on, one of the straps on the leg covers broke and the mask was too tight. Good for a one time use. My daughter enjoyed it.
The material is thin thin thin which I expected from this kind of costume. The mask didn't really hold up for one halloween party and one night of trick or treating. The worst part was that the cape in the picture is big enough for the girl to hold with both hands but in reality it isn't that big at all. Also the velcro that holds the cape on didn't even hold up on Halloween night. Disappointing
The price was cheap and so was a majority of the craftsmanship. Also, the belt was not in the package and we bought it new.
I bought two of these bat girl costumes for my two daughters. The masks started falling apart after the first time wearing them. The material was so cheap it literally fell apart!!! I was SO disappointed! By the time Halloween came I had completely redone the masks and stapled the silver belt back together.I have never rated anything before but I couldn't help myself, I want people to know what they are buying.
The sizing of this costume was fairly accurate but it very cheaply made. After only a few wears, the mask and belt both broke. I wouldn't recommend this costume.
I ordered this for my average sized 8 year old. I purchased the medium (size 8-10) and it is way too small. It's too short, tight around the shoulders, the boot covers don't cover her foot and the mask won't go around her head (not even close and again she's 50%ile in both height & weight for her age). This size would be better for a 5 year old! And if that isn't bad enough, the cape has a dark (non-removable) stain on it! I'm hoping I can return it w/o paying for shipping considering this item is damaged.
The fabric is very common, the finishes are really bad, the mask was broken the first time, the layer has no seams, the fabric also is leadership, not what I expected.
The picture seems to show a somewhat robust rod, but what you get is a very thin (1/2") rod. When exteneded to near its mazimum length it becomes very flimsy and will barely hold my small shower curtain without bowing in the middle. I would have expected a little better for the price and the intended use. But, it works and it's black.
This rod was too flimsy in my stall shower to stay up more than 10 minutes with a curtain. We put it up at least four times and it fell down. I returned it. Color was nice, it was extremely thin.
The pieces that attach to the shower wall are very small. Because of this, the rod never stays in place!!
This rod is way to small for use with a shower curtain. I have no idea why it even comes up in the search. It may work for a simple curtain, but I doubt it.
This curtain rod looks nice, but can barely hold any weight. It will only work with sheers.
Umbra Coretto 24 to 36-Inch Decorative Tension Rod, BlackThe rod is really good looking. However, because it is so thin, the weight of my shower curtain keeps causing the rod to come loose. If I had any idea, I probably would not have bought the rod. However, my shower is at the wider end....so maybe a person would have better luck if their shower is closer to 24".
There are only 8 out of about 24 episodes from the Baking With Julia series on the DVD. Amazon would not guarantee me a full refund if I returned it since I took off the plastic.Even though I had not viewed it. I didn't notice that it was only 8 episodes till after a tore the plastic off and looked at the back of the dvd. Definitely is not work the money.
I received this DVD in a well packed box with another item. The other item was in perfect condition. However, this DVD's case was broken in several (at least 4) places. As I said, the box was well packed and insulated. The DVD had obviously been sent in the damaged state it was received in. Most disturbing is the fact that the damage to the DVD case was so OBVIOUS. Pieces are broken off inside the celephane wrapping that you can see and, when you pick it up, you cannot miss feeling them.The DVD itself skips in several places.Unacceptable and unethical behavior on the part of the sender. They had to have known they were sending me a severely damaged DVD case. It had to have been damaged at the time they packed it in the box.As a result, I was not able to give it as a gift as planned.
I was initially impressed with the company and the product. The company ended up to be local which was a plus. The product didn't last a year and I purchased two of them. Both failed inside of a year.
I have to agree with the previous reviewer. This book is more like the cliff notes to a book about men's fashion, tradition, style, etc. The other half of the book is relatively useless - unless, of course, you're a millionaire & world traveller. The prose is humorous at times becasue it's so pretentious - bordering on the effeminate a la Niles Crane. Still, there are some very imporatnt basice male fashion rules established by history and tradition, discussed in this book, which one wishes were adhered to more regularly. The first half of the book is serviceable, but not authoritative. Flusser comes off somewhat foppish and the picture of him on the dustjacket would lead me to question his taste in, if nothing else, haircuts! I would consider a better book, with far more lavish detail and illustrations to be "Gentlemen : A Timeless Fashion", only recently published.
3/4 of this book is where to shop, with locations noted in Chicago, Houston, Florence, Milan, NYC, Vienna, etc (but not Beijing, Shanghai or Hong Kong). The rest is spoiled by a pompous, overbearing style that makes it unreadable.
I bought this book a year ago, mainly because of its high ratings. But I was disappointed. I read it once and I found the style of writing outdated and the content not so useful: many addresses where you should buy things, but how useful is that? I don't live nearby these places, and I want to learn WHY you should buy certain things so that I can decide for myself what is good to buy and what not. Such info is given only very briefly.
What if you live outside of New York? This book isn't applicable for anyone outside "The City." Buy a book from John Bridges instead.
I just received two of these guns today and they both broke after about two minutes of shooting, don't buy it!!!
Well, as a vegetarian and resident of a country seeing exploding diabetic population ( India) I find this approach to diabetes unconvincing.ONE, the emphasis is on animal foods. This has three difficultiescultural prohibitionsbiological concentration of alien hormones, pesticides and antibioticsand last not least, the cost factor of such a diet.TWO there is compulsive testing of blood sugar levels.THREE it encourages dependency on the clinician.Where's the sense of freedom in all this?In my counselling sessions I use sprouted whole legumes, leafy vegetables, NO ANIMAL PRODUCTS, resistence exercises, meditation, family support. It all works fine.
This book is mostly for those with Diabetes one.This is his second book.His first book was a good one and full of useful info for both types of Diabetes.If you are a Diabetic type I then this book is for you.If you are a Diabetic II then buy his first book.I am a Diabetic II and this book was really a waste of my money.
Blood sugar is only part of the equation. Following this type of diet causes high acidic levels which causes illness. This diet is nothing new. My grandmother followed this kind of plan back in the late 40's because they thought ALL carbs were bad. Today we know that the brain needs glucose to function. Carbs + high fiber leaves lower net carbs. And diabetics need a balance---in fact all people need a balance of healthy whole foods and exercise and fresh air. One more thing; my grandmother died of a massive heart attack on this kind of plan. She was only in her 50's.
The Dissapointed. Why do I need demos of all the songs already on Apple Venus 1. Let's bring on Apple Venus 2, after all, isn't that what we were promised?
I don't actually own this album, but I did buy Apple Venus, and I'll say this: I hope that this album has the charm that that album lacked. I've never been so disappointed with an XTC album. Why would one buy an album of the exact same songs, except in demo form? A shoddy attempt to extract money, it seems. Shame on you, XTC!
Recipes are a bit strange and not easy to follow. I wouldn't recomment this book at this time for anyone serious about cooking.
The price is right and these mugs have a great shape for easy handling. I wish I could say buy these, But...the rims chip very easily. Someone else stated this in their review should of followed their advice.
I've had 6 of them for 1 month and one of them got lips chiped out already. (which one of the reviewer already commented that it happens often with these mug). It was sadly tossed out and now I'm worried they will eventually all dissapear out of my kitchen.Keep them apart from each other when you wash them. The slightest touch will chip it out unexpectedly.BTW: You can buy them individually at Bed and Bath Beyond for less price.
I like the size and style of these mugs, they go with anything and look like they'll last a long time.--- EDITED REVIEW --- Long term? not very durable. All but one have broken.
A complete disappointment and waste of time. The narrator couldn't seem less interested; almost as though bothered by the project. Look somewhere else for a sports hypnosis cd.
Seeking more knowledge of Sufism was my main reason for reading Catching the Thread. The description of Sufism was too scattered over the chapters for me to put the pieces together in a satisfying way. Just one chapter summarizing the basics would have made the difference. The amount of dream material was excessive. Why not just a few extensive case examples. It is impossible for me to judge the quality of the dream interpretation, given the limited information on the dreamers. Most of the applications of Jungian concepts seemed appropriate to me. For those unfamiliar with Jungian psychology, this book serves as a useful introduction.
The title of this video mentions Argentine Tango. Unfortunately, what is being taught on this tape is not authentic Argentine Tango. Not even close. It's ballroom tango. There is a huge difference: in music, style, steps, posture, etc... Don't be fooled by ballroom instructors trying to teach Argentine Tango. The only authentic instruction available on the market comes from authentic Argentine instructors from Buenos Aires.
This version of tango is not argentine. It is ballroom latin american whatever you call it. Very misleading to call it argentine tango. But if you like ballroom dancing, maybe this video is for you.
this video has a lot of dances for learning but each dance has only 3 steps so dont expect so much from this teaching video. if you want more than 3 steps then buy videos exclusively for a particular dance. this video will just wet your appetite but will not fill your hunger. also, the background setting of this video is very dark as if you are inside a dark night club so you cannot see the footsteps of the teachers because both of them were wearing black pants that blend with the dark background, terrible! plus the teachers teach from the side of the camera and sometimes facing the camera. this is not the ideal way to teach dance in a video. the teachers should be back to the camera so you can follow their footwork. for the money they charge for this video is not worth it.
There are a few things I didn't like about the tape. Firstly, the price is too high. Secondly tape is inconvenient for a spoiled by technology user. It's much easier to work with DVDs and their menus. And lastly, I realized that I'd rather spend 70 dollars on 4 monthly group lessons and learn basic steps and routines of one dance then try to master all by myself while watching a tape.
I found this book to be very out of date. I can't count how many times I read "coming in 2000" and then no info on the subject. I didn't expect this from a book written for 2001. I have the 2000 official guide and it is much more up to date. The only thing I liked about the book is the coverage of non disney parks. This book was a huge waste of money.
It's rather amusing that some harmonica band (or whatever the hell it is) decided to give their album the same title as one of the greatest rock albums in history (Styx: Pieces of Eight). And to Mr. "Please push sales" who wrote the other "review": I bet your cover art isn't QUITE as good as the incredible Hypgnosis masterpiece of the Styx album. ;-)
I received this software as "bonus" with Photo Explosion Delux. It's terrible. Was easy to create the slideshow and it looked great on my computer. Tried it on 2 DVDs and it didn't play. Tried to re-record it on a CD-RW and it still didn't work! It did run on my husband's laptop, but out of 6 computers I tried it on at work it only was recognized on 1! Very frustrating software. SAVE YOU MONEY FOR SOMETHING BETTER.
This DVD Trilogy box contains the two-disc editions of SM 1&2 and the single-disc edition of Spidey 3. However, 1 and 3 are available separately in 3-disc sets, and I'd be surprised if 2 wasn't given the 3-disc treatment right before Christmas. So, when the 3-disc editions of all 3 movies are available in one box (think Ultimate Matrix Collection), then that will be the one to buy. This box can be skipped.
Personally I would NOT buy the trilogy because spiderman 3 was horrible, 1 & 2 where great though. 3 not so good!
Great picture quality, cool, and Blu-Ray is the premier format for all of its seamless feature interaction, and high storage capacity for more bonus material.... except Spider-man 1 and 2 have no special features (aside from the 2.1 stuff). Great use of space, thanks for all those perks, BR.So, I have to wonder, is it really worth the $70 to pick this up again?
Spider-Man 1 & 2 Does not include any of the amazing behind the scenes content originally released on the DVDs. Why would a studio release two extraordinary FX films of this magnitude and incredible production values on a format that can hold so much information, and fail to include the extras? If you're a fan of behind the scenes content, hold onto your DVDs.Movie - A+. Blu-Ray value for Spider-Man 1&2 - FAIL.
I received my "new" product a few days ago but it wasn't in brand new conditions. The box had been worn around the edges and you can tell it had been rewrapped in a different plastic cover. When I pay extra money for a brand new item I expect it to be exactly that.
I agree the comment from reviewer GWIRTH "ginnyww". Somehow these Sipderman blu-rays are not norm. They can only play on PS3. No luck with Samsung blu-ray players, not work with Sony blu-ray players either. Manufacturer needs to check what's going on. I also checked two sets of Sipderman blu-rays, one set from Fry's electronics, another set from Amazon, same problem, so that is not random disc defects.
The movies do not play in my xbox 360 console, which is my only source of a DVD player. i would appreciate a full refund considering i had to wait over 3 weeks just to get the DVDs that don't work.
I bought this set for my husband and brother for Christmas last year then we ended up buying a different set for the movie cash for the new movie. I went to sell this set at used movie retailer and they informed me it was from overseas and possibly a bootleg. WATCH OUT!!!!!!!!
Lets state the obvious - Andrew Garfield in The Amazing Spider-Man is light years ahead of Toby McGuyre. Toby is nerdy and homely to the point of neurosis. Andrew's Spidey is bookish, but also skateboards in his high school's halls. Agressive, bold and self-assured. Taller, leaner, way better looking; Andrew's reboot of the franchise makes these 3 earlier McGuyre Spider-Man films suffer by comparison
I like the movies and I want to add this trilogy to my DVD collection. However, this set is not a collection boxset that I am looking for. They are 3 separate spiderman movies in their own packages, and bundled together in a newly design cardboard box and called them "Trilogy".The worst is that they are the unsold inventory which they applied white stickers to cover the barcode in the back of each box. I felt cheated by Sony Pictures. They should have done a better job by creating a real boxset in a nice package with some additional materials.If you are looking for a nice collection boxset, please skip this set.
Received DVD's with no issue. The problem was that they were formatted for a region other than the United States. This is strange to be due to the fact that they were shipped from an American address to an American address. Amazon refunded my money with no issue.
Felt like a cheap knockoff. Definitely works well for people that just want the movies but no money or effort was spent on the container.
idotic to credit Robert Graves with inventing the Goddess. false authority. beware. sounds impressive but shoots self in foot repeatedly.
Small print, difficult to read. But wait - I might learn something here. So I use a magnifier and plug away. Nope - boring. There is absolutely no reason this research cannot be presented more simply. Well, maybe the author just wanted to impress other academics by being obscure. I hope he succeeded. But this isn't for ordinary people who want to understand the history and development of neo-paganism. There are lots of other, better written, more accessible, books out there that do a better job!
Works as described. I am just so annoyed that Sony would lure me into buying their video camera for a competitive price without including this cable, making the overall cost of the camera no longer competitive. It's smart for Sony to conduct business this way, but only in order to earn profit in the short term. You can bet I won't be suckered in to buying any more Sony products in the future, now knowing that this is how they run their business.
Cable is sold as having the ability to transfer video from a camcorder to a PC.It doesn't do it. I spoke to the company and they told me that there is no cable that does that. I asked them why thet advertised this cable as being able to do it and he told me I should have known better. They then charged me 15% to take the cable back. You would be smart to shop elsewhere. They don't know what their products do and they charge you for their lack of knowledge.
It worked for about a month. Even when it did work it was a hit or miss thing. I had to fool with it for a while. Maybe it was because I bought the cheapest one available. Maybe it was a knock-off, who knows? I have yet to try it on another computer to rule out it not being the cord. Fair warning.
If you have a new computer or maybe newer that 2003 this cable will work if you are working with one older than that like me it doesn't work. So now I have this wonderful cable and waiting to get an upgraded computer to match.
I spent a couple hours, trying to get transfer DV from my camcorder to my mac powerbook. After hours and hours I had to realize that the USB cable delivered with the sony camcorder was absolutely worthless. If you don't own a sony VAIO (which in my opinion just a overdesigned peace of fancy 007 gear with an i.Link connection, which no other PC/MAC has)your getting frustrated pretty quick. I would have given the cable a 5 star rating, but the way I had to get the cable, by having to buy it seperately, is a big rip off. However I found the exact same cable in an apple store called "Thin Fire Wire". The exact same cable (1.8 Meter 4 to 6 pin to be exact) for only $29 and it works just fine. So check out an apple store near you and save some money.Shame on you Sony.
Ordered on September 24, 2005 -- delivery now estimated by Amazon "sometime" after December 24, 2005. Three months (or more) for delivery seems excessive. Amazon should be ashamed for treating customers this way.
This game has some good qualities, but the pure racing person will have issues, as you gain $ for running into objects and cars, which blows. You are in a race and losing, so blast your car and everyone around you to get $$ for the next race. Realistic? Not. They don't even have a view from inside the car, it is a bumper view with no part of the car visible. The interface with arrow buttons is bad, and you can't even race online, just by LAN. In short, stick with Leadfoot or DTRSC and you will be at least $40 better off.jc
My step-daughter got a set of glasses, and 3 family members cut themselves because they broke as they were washing them. I thought I'd replace her [poorly made] and dangerous ones with these, due to what I thought of as the quality name brand Anchor Hocking. She already got a different set of glasses, so I kept them for myself. One was broken in the box when I opened them up. I thought no big deal. I started using them, and within a month, of the 16 total, I am down to only one large one and four small ones. I also have 2 less butterfly stitches and 6 less bandaids in my cabinet. My daughter informed me that these were the EXACT glasses she experienced the same problems with. I am sorry to discover that Anchor Hocking is no longer going to be associated with quality, as it used to be in the past.
The musical performances here are quite dull. There is nothing wrong about them except that the musicians seem to be simply doing their job and nothing else. If I had paid good money for this concert in person, I would have been highly disappointed. The video quality is even worse. The DVD is cheap but not cheap enough to justify its purchase.
I bought this DVD for the Mozart Symphony #35. However, it is very difficult to access the work. I finally figured out that the only way to do it is to fast forward through the final movement of the Lebrun Concerto. This problem was in evidence on several different DVD players one of which can track DVDs with any region code. There are some wonderful performances on this series. Too bad the engineering is so poor.
When i first heard about deviant, i thought it would be something great (judging by previous records and the way Ps developed in their musical style). But after finally listening thru it i suddenly realised PS was trying to go mainstream. Their new CD is so much alike with Korn or limp bizkit music it was terryifing. I couldn't understand why Ps chose to opt out of the electronics towards more punk/rock style. In general this CD has some good tracks (2 to be exact), but it not deliver the goods like the previous CD's did. I AM SORELY DISSAPOINTED!
The Pitchshifter sound that has been forged over their last 5 or so releases, culminating wonderfully with "www.pitchshifter.com" has here been stripped to a watered-down sound that could have come from any of 1,000 other bands who are wasting our time (and money) these days. The Pitchshifter formula of brutal guitars mixed with programed drums and other industrial and electronic affects was unlike anything else on the musical scene. That sound is completely gone on this CD--reducing their punishing onslaught to something that MTV would have little problem broadcasting. A very disappointing CD.
When I ordered this product, I didn't see a size chart and I was sent a size that is not suitable for the purpose intended.
When I first heard Ra's "From Zero" I was in awe. A band that used cool effects, Egyptian scales, and was moderately heavy--the perfect mix for me. Then, Duality came out.Duality demonstrates a lack of creativity that was once there in Ra. I wouldn't say they evolved, I'd say they devoled. They still use effects, but rarely and they don't have as big of an impact. On top of that they hardly sound Egyption on the album. As for this album, Ra sounds more like other bands, but they are still distinct. I just wish they went in a different direction.I do want to say that their are some really awesome songs like Fallen Angels, Undertaken, and Taken. The other tracks are bad either, it's just that I expected a whole lot more.
Well, I might have agreed with the other reviewers if I hadn't ordered "Strength Ball Training" by Goldenberg and Twist at the same time. This book seems very amateurish by today's standards. It's a thin paperback with hand-drawn sketches. Maybe this was considered okay back in 1991, but this is 2008. SBT gives you all of the exercises in this book plus many more, updated with recent training science background, illustrated with photographs of actual people, plus a DVD with videos illustrating many of the exercises! And it's the same price! Come on, get into this century. Amateur productions like this one just don't cut it anymore.
The book was written by progressives as an attempt to rewrite history about the Christian heritage of the Americans who signed the Declaration of Independence and Constitution. This is not a scholarly work. It has no footnotes for reference. It was debunked by scholars the next year after it was written. It is an interesting reading to understand the effort that the authors and the people they represent would go to to advance their political agenda. It is a very unfactual book that distorts truth. With this understanding, people should read scholarly books to understand the Christian legacy of these people.
I would like note that if you look at the footnotes for this book as to where they got there information, they do not have a shred of evidence to back them up. They simply state they they have forgone the traditional footnotes and that we should believe them just because they have a PHD. I know that if I were writing any type of paper for these gentlemen in college they would fail me if I didn't show where I got my information. Furthermore, There is a man in Texas who has the world's largest collection of artifacts from our founding fathers and he has loads of evidence which point to the extreme opposite. In fact he has a copy of bibles that were printed and distributed to every family in America through funding from Congress. I would encourage anyone who sees this to watch the documentary called "MONUMENTAL" by Kirk Cameron, exposes the truth about our constitution writers and points out the damage that books like these have caused to our society.
This is a book that is used in colleges across America, but contains almost no primary source quotes, no footnotes, no endnotes, and thus no scholarly support for any of it's assertions. Did the author even bother to read the founders' letters, speeches, published works, etc? Probably not, bc actual quotes from those who founded this country would really get in the way of their made up speculation, hearsay, and biased opinions masquerading as historical fact. Pathetic.
the movie was so blurry you could hardly see it,it wasnt verygood thank you carol meeks
Okay, this was the first Night World book that I read, and it seemed pretty good. But compared to LJS's other books, this is pathetic. I don't know, most of her books are great, but really! Gillian is a weak character who is shallow enough to think that popularity is all that matters. David is boring and predictable, and I think Angel (or Gary) would have been much better for her. I wouldn't go for David because he acts all protective and stupid. Also, it makes the whole soulmate thing boring and not dangerous because the lost witch (Gillian) doesn't even know she is a witch at first. I think that LJS's other books are a lot better. ~Ondine
This book was not the best. It was boring and the characters were underdeveloped. I liked the idea that Gillian WASN'T gorgeous, rich, and plain perfect, but in a snap she became the typical LJ Smith character. I love the idea of soulmates and everything, but I think these kids find their soulmates too easily, and how come everyone in LJ Smith books have to be SO perfect? Maybe if they were not so gorgeous--really how many gorgeous people are there in the world who are "perfect" on top of that? If you want to read LJ Smith, read the trilogies or even the other Night World books because this book reads like LJ Smith was getting desperate for a "new" idea.
I am a huge LJS fan, I have read almost all of her books well over 10 times except this one. It was so boring I really disliked to book. It didn't have anything to do with the NW until the book was almost done, and Gillian was so pathetic and whimpy. David.... I really didn't like his character at all.
Gillian came off as a wimp. Angel was ok. They should have made Gillian seem more like a real girl and not someone from a soap opera.
In this book, not only is there no real "love" scenes, but to top it off, the girl's cousin tries to convince her that he is her soulmate. Granted, Angel is dead, but he's still related to her and definately should NOT be trying to catch his own cousin. Ewww. To top off the wrongness that is this book, there is barely any mention of vamps and stuff. Also, this is a 'coming of age' story about how being popluar isn't the most important. I love every other Night World book, but this is retarded.
LJS's other books are great, but this one was so boring! There was absolutely nothing dangerous about Gillian and David being in love, and that's the whole point of this series! Also, it's kind of unlikely that someone could just cut her hair and wear makeup and then suddenly be popular. I didn't like Gillian at all. She's superficial, not to mention being Little Miss Weakling. David was an idiot because he fell for her as soon as he saw her with short hair and makeup. Let's get realistic! He cheated on the SATs and Gillian still wants to support him. Plus, he's BORING! LJS's other books are all 5 stars in my opinion, but I hated this one.
This old chestnut of a book should be put out of its misery. It's written with style and a tone of authority, but careful reading shows that it is hopelessly slanted. On every significant point which involves historical uncertainty or controversy, the authors unquestioningly accept the left-wing/labor point of view and cynically disparage or totally ignore any other interpretation. This is Labor's "untold" story because no other reputable historians have ever had the nerve to write such an openly propagandistic book. Academic labor historians who think this book is so wonderful are merely showing their left-wing ideological colors. There are much better and more objective accounts out there.
You can be a rock star and not have a clue as to what haiku is. This book has been around. It has been the brunt of jokes in the haiku community. I can't say I know how to write a decent haiku but if you google, you WILL find some great haiku poets. PLEASE - if you don't have this book, keep it that way. It may have been a year but not a haiku one.
This is indeed a book of 3-line poems passing itself off as haiku. This is not harmful certainly UNLESS an unwary reader picks it up and assumes that it is, basing all future opinions of this delightful poetic form on The Haiku Year."There are those who regard haiku as a kind of 'do your own thing' poem, and never consider its foundations. But the haiku, as soon as it goes beyond the beginner's efforts, becomes a matter incorporating traditions and established values, aesthetic and otherwise, and can not be written well outside them." - Robert Spiess
You make it in rock and you think you can do it all. This book proves you can't. It is a truly poor excuse for a collection of haiku and it is particularly offensive because there are those who will buy it thinking it the real thing. Do yourself a favor and buy Higginson. You can look at this in a few minutes in the bookstore. It might be good for advanced classes in "don't let this happen to you!"
This is what has become of haiku in English- and it is all bad. Haiku in America in general is vastly misunderstood and each of the verses in this volume show it. Some have three lines, some do not, some have kigo, some do not. By the looks of this, one can deduce that these "poets" gleamed their knowledge of haiku from Kerouac (another haiku fraud) rather than Basho. This is just an experiment really, conducted by a circle of friends who jotted down their thoughts and sent them to one another. Please, please avoid this title if you really care about or want to learn about haiku. Amazon should allow "0" stars when rating items such as this!
The author apparently has some theory relating to unexplained phenomena, but you'll never figure out what it is from reading this book. He strings together repetitive descriptions of "unexplained" events, without coherent narrative or structure.The book is filled with ludicrous claims about what "scientists know" or "studies have shown." Of course there's no support for the claims.Don't waste your time on this book.
Garbage. The author is no different from the other 50,000 lunatics running around the country chasing lights. The only difference is this guy wrote a book. Watch the X Files instead..
Two hundred pages into the book, and I'm still waiting for a cogent theme to emerge. Poorly written, poorly documented, and thin...in other words, perfect fodder for a commercial movie.
I enjoy reading about "unexplained phenomena". I really do. I love "real" ghost stories and the like. However, I prefer an author to take a very scientific stance, exhausting all possibilities. Keel does not. He's a "true believer" and that's the problem.Somewhere in the book he supposes that this mysterious Mothman could have been a man on a hang-glider. "Wow," I thought. "That could almost be construed as logical." However, he IMMEDIATELY debunks that theory with a statement to this affect: "But hang-gliders were not very well known at that time."*shaking my head*Whatever...the man needed to become familiar with Occam's Razor.
The Mothman story is indeed a fascinating one. Unfortunately, the same adjective cannot be applied to "The Mothman Prophecies." John Keel's theories regarding the nature and origin of UFOs in general and Mothman in particular are more bizarre than the phenomena themselves. I was also put off by Mr. Keel's tedious obsession with men (in black) behaving badly.I've given this singularly overrated book two stars, rather than only one, because it does supply some (albeit nowhere near enough) information on the extraordinary occurrences of more than 30 years ago.
I wanted to read this before seeing the film. Wow, what a bore. Keel's book reads like some scatter-shot diary with himself as the narrator. Maybe this stuff was revelatory back when it was originally published, but now with the X-Files cultural phenomena and all the other media about UFOs and the paranormal floating around, this seems pedestrian in comparison. The descriptions are always the same. Only the names change each chapter/sighting/contacting.Also, DO NOT READ THIS BOOK before seeing the movie. It will sap some of your enjoyment from Mark Pellington's excellent film (in fact, I was amazed at how well screenwriter Richard Hatem took this dross and put a narrative structure around it, but that's another review that belongs elsewhere....)
I found the movie leading in many directions....Why was John's wife appearing in Point Pleasent? Was this the mothman? Why did John appear for Gordon 3 nights at 2:30 a.m? These questions were never answered in the movie.... or did I miss something? The movie ran long for me, maybe because of the loose ends. I could be wrong, you decide. Go see the movie......
I usually like the books better than the movie. It is an interesting book although it touches on everything and seems to repeat itself time after time. The movie focused more on the actual "mothman" and I felt the book just mentioned it among many other things. This book should have been named "Mothman, Men In Black, UFOS, and the Kitchen Sink." I was glad to be done with this book. Don't waste your money on this book, check it out from the library.
There is a lot about the 60s' that for obvious reasons, I have forgotten but I do remember that there were a lot of Instamatic cameras and 8 mm movie cameras around so I guess my question is: Why are there no pictures of this thing? I believe the good people of Point Pleasant saw something as there were at least 100 reported sightings of "Mothman" and I simply cannot accept the author's statement that all those camera's that the newspeople took along failed to work for one reason or the other.The movie was excellent but then it was not based entirely on this wacky book which is written in kind of a random fashion and is not all that good in the first place. "Show me the pictures."
I had expected, or at least hoped for, a more or less straightforward account of the Mothman phenomenon of some 30 years ago. Instead, this meandering book comprises "hick" UFO sightings that are only infrequently connected with Mothman, and Keel's trust-me-I- know-what-I'm-talking-about theories and explanations. I was particularly dismayed by seemingly endless accounts of men (in black) behaving badly. With little to recommend it (and aside from providing some details on the Mothman sightings, there's no other recommendation), "The Mothman Prophecies" is a considerable disappointment.
Let me just start by saying that the " MOTHMAN PROPHECIES" is not a novel, nor is it a coherent story. It starts strong, just enough to draw you in, then it goes down the spectral energy crap hole. Were led to believe that Mr. Keel is a sensiable, unbiased investigator, when really he's a parinoid delusional whack. I'm only 15, and I don't buy a word of it!!! see the movie instead.
Excellent and suspenseful information. All over the place as far as the material. We travel back and forth from West Virgina to London to Ohio... and back again. Would have enjoyed it if the first part of the book was supporting information as to the phenomena itself and how it has indeed appeared elsewhere in history, how the phenomena ties to UFO sightings etc. but Keel's hypothesis that all paranormal activity comes from a parallel universe it difficult to believe, even for paranormal studies. I'm sure that is a first.Although the book was suspenseful and written well, it was just organized poorly. Revise, John. You can do it.
257 pages covering Men in Black, lights in the sky, and phone troubles. 10 pages about the Mothman. If you want to read the same old 70's UFO stories, this is your book. If you want to read about the Mothman, buy something else.
Normally, I prefer books to movies, but Mothman Prophecies was not only boring, but unbelievable. Non-fiction! The story was a product of the author's imagination. Perhaps in 1975, when the novel was first copywritten, it was spectacular. To those who are thinking of purchasing this book, (especially after viewing the movie) I'd say pass it up, and purchase the VHS or DVD.
Have I quit reading a book.I made it to page 123 before I had to stop. I've waited years to read this, oh man was I disappointed.I thought it would be an intelligent well written peice on the mothman mystery. I don't know what this was. Holy mackeral. i've never seen such bad writing. Someone else mentioned incoherent, tell me about it! This was all over the place. I had absolutely no clue was was going on in this book. Just crazy!Just a few of my favourites:" so horrified she dropped the small baby in her arms. The child began to cry, more insulted than hurt." what!? I'm thinking the kids was more hurt than insulted. This Keel dude is too much....Talking about this "mysterious" guy Tiny who a witness said saw a wire running up his pant leg. and i quote" was tiny wearing electric socks? or was he a wired android operated by remote control."what???! pretty much where I stopped before my mind turned to mush
I just don't get it? I thought this book was a story about the paranormal and all the town needed to do was buy some Raid.Also anybody can tell you moths just son't grow that big... now June Bugs well now that's a story.
The subject matter is fascinating and has the potential to make an exciting, fast moving read. Unfortunately the presentation is disorganized, repetetive and BORING. I had to force myself to finish the thing and ended up wondering what the heck the point was meant to be. I certainly didn't feel that I had acquired any clear understanding of what happened in Point Pleasant; I didn't even get enough out of it to decide whether I believe any of the stories or not. If you want the book, borrow it from someone and save your money.
John Keel's "Mothman Prophecies" could be a great book if it actually concentrated on the "Mothman" sightings in and around Point Pleasant, West Virginia in the mid-to-late 1960's. Unfortunately, this book isn't really about the Mothman, but it should instead be entitled "John Keel explains how the universe really works". For every "Mothman" story that Keel relates in this book, he offers at least three other stories of his personal life, his adventures in researching the paranormal, and his decidedly offbeat theories about paranormal events and what causes them. This book isn't really about the "Mothman" sightings in West Virginia as much as it is a goofy memoir of John Keel's "research" into the world of UFOs, demons, ghosts, and other bizarre events. As someone who bought this book to read about the "Mothman" and not about Keel's disjointed ramblings and ravings, I was sorely disappointed. Not recommended.
This book is NOT like the movie. In fact, I prefer the movie. The book is composed of bits and pieces of John Keel's and others' phenomenal experiences. It is difficult to read, not only because of the bad press printing, but also because it is very clipped and disjointed. I bought this book to delve further after seeing the movie, and ended up more confused. Go to the movie--forget the book!
Ok, we have seen the movie, some of us have read Keel's book (this being a reprint). What no one seems to mention is the fine print located on the copyright page, which reads: "This is a work of fiction. All the characters and events portrayed in this book are either products of the author's imagination or are used fictitiously." If you don't believe me, glance at the copyright page. Obviously, this paperback edition was prepared as a movie tie-in. Touted as a "true event" the publisher then informs us it is all a work of the "author's imagination." And therein must lie a lot of truth. Yes, the book is mildly entertaining, if a bit choppy in parts. My advice is, read THE MOTHMAN PROPHECIES with a large dose of salt (and the movie is much better).
the item that is stated does not look like the stock graphics , the picture that is show is not what the item looks like . dont count on a good quality product
Come On, People !!!! I checked this out because Amazon emailed me saying it was top rated.... ??? Could it be because one of the "songs" is entitled "Amazon" ? Sex appeal !? Not !!!! - unless you want to have sex with a monkey.... And for those who think this is the best album they've heard in a long time - my condolences ! Seriously, this recording is nothing more than a possibly somewhat cute girl chanting gibberish over some low-fi computer generated noise loops. True artists should be outraged, and they would if they could stop laughing. I recommend steering way way clear of this sorry excuse for music. Please, people - don't let big music money tell you what is good - we all suffer for it in the end.
I have to agree some songs sound very catchy.But isn't she singing about some Terrorist Group in some Asian Island? I heard even MTV ban some of her songs because of that.
she's sri lankan but it's like she's trying to be west indian or something. Ok it kind of works and she's really pretty but I think she would become even bigger if she marketed herself to bollywood and gave the music the dancehall sound. It would give her some nice exposure.
You can tell the difference between this and the next. A couple of good songs, nothing spectacular. One song on this CD appears on the movie "War" with Jet-Li. Although I rate this with an OK, Im very tough. There's no sappy love ballads, no whiney boy songs. It's in your face, and strong.
Can someone please tell me how she managed to be signed by A!!!!record label, let alone one capable of putting her music (if that's what you call it) into the airwaves as much as it is.
I find the terrorist links in her songs offensive.Taken from Fire Fire-"Growin up, Brewin UpGuerilla gettin trained uplook out look outFrom over the Rooftop" [reffering to LTTE snipers]"Competition coming up nowLoad up,Aim,Fire Fire,Pop"She has a lot of LTTE propaganda in her music website, and even promotes this terrorist organisation in her music. She needs to get a grip, and the people buying her music need to get a grip and actually look at what they're buying here.
The first time through I really enjoyed the quick quirky beats, and the skits were sorta interesting as well. The novelty wore off after the first play through and it soon went from quick, quirky, and interesting to obnoxious, and boring. Perhaps this just isn't my style of music but I heard a lot of good things about this album and figured I'd give it a try. I found myself enjoying her biography a lot more than her album.
The only thing interesting about this album is mia's accent. Seriously, the beats her singing is layered over are tired and clichéd. If the vocals on this album were by anyone else it would not be in the top 500. Final Verdict: Bad music.
Wow, what kind of credentials do you need to be a amazon critic or editor? Certainly not good taste in music! The selection of this album at #2 on the editor's picks of the top 100 of 2005 leaves me grasping for reality and laughing til I can't breathe. You've got to be musically challenged, deaf, and under 12 to like one track on this album. The 5 star ratings?a sure sign the apocalypse is upon us.
This sounds like karaoke. I wish it didn't - but it does. I'm a white man married to an Indian girl - I love Indian music, Chutney is cool, reggae, etc. - and the lead singer is attractive - but it really, really sounds like karaoke....I can't escape that fact. And...yes....it is very repetitive, mundane, same sounding music throughout the whole CD. But, it doesn't matter because todays ear for music is pretty much on the deaf side. Simple and repetitive is the cornerstone of todays musical taste. Oh well - I'll watch the video though - she's cute. But, it is still a talentless serving up of supposed 'world music'. What a bunch of crap that is! Listen to 'The Mysterious Voices of Bulgaria' or 'Kuch Kuch Hota Hai' if you want REAL world music. What? It's boring? Then you don't really like 'World Music' - lol.
This is good music, but I really have a problem with some of the lyrics.For instance, Sunshowers:"You wanna win a war? Like PLO I don't surrender""It's a bomb yo, so run yo, put away your stupid gun yo... that's why we blow it up before we go""they showed him a picture then, ain't that you with the muslims?"Now I'm not one for censorship, but I can't back someone glorifying PLO and terrorism in dance music. That's just ridiculous. I know reggae has roots of being somewhat violent and rebellious back at its early roots, but I absolutely can't sponsor these messages. It's just wrong.
I ordered a 16 piece place setting , service for 4 but only recieved a 4 piece place setting, service for 1. I contacted Amazon and they arranged to have the order corrected and arrange for return for the incorrect order. Once to corrected shipment arrived again it was a service for only 1. I was charged for a service for 4. This was eventually credited back to me however since I only had 2 place settings, I purchased 2 others locally at Younker's department store. The dishes that came with from Amazon are different than the ones from Younker's. It is like the molds were different or something...the plates are deeper from Amazon and as a result the set does not stack properly. I am not certain if this inventory issue has been resolved with Amazon so buyer beware.
The story , of course , is fabulous but this is the worst binding I have ever seen in 30+ years of reading paperbacks. I can't believe this isnt a joke. Hopefully I can get a refund and order the book from a reputable publisher later. If you buy a paperback from anyone make dang sure it isnt an "Instabook"
This album is 2 stars because some of the songs are listenable. I hardly enjoy listening to this album.I hardly recommend this album. Addy.
THis band from Scandinavia reminds me of Stratovarius. They sound so clean, so perfect, that you almost forget they are playing rock. It's boring and flat sound, and the female singer is annoying with his boring voice. It's a totally forgetable experience.
Very disappointed with this one .Try their CDs Dark Passion Play and Once .They get five stars from me .
it's an interesting idea to have a operatic female vox in a metal band; however, her voice is mediocre (you'd know it's true if you know some names from the opera genre), and the music is not original at all. Does anyone know any similar bands (with operatic female vox) that are better than this? Let me know. Thanks!
I bought this tent on 6/6/2005 for my 10 month old boy and used it once at the pool the rest of the time it sat in my dining room. I went to bed one night and it was up, but the next morning it was halfway down. When I went to see what was wrong I saw that one of the rods had snapped off in the metal holder and cannot be fixed. This could actually suffocate a baby if noone was in the room or the baby could hurt themselves if they found the broken rod. I was very disappointed because the size is great. I also agree with the other reviews it is hard to put together because the rods are so tight you have to have alot of strenth to get it set up. Please don't buy this we are going to return but it's such a hassle to spend 39.99 plus tax on something and it breaks in less then a month.
The information was worthwhile, but I found this video to be blah and boring. If you are going to bother to make a documentary at least make it somewhat entertaining! Add some interesting visuals and use a narrator that catches your attention. Read a book on this subject and by-pass this DVD.
This CD looks to be a 9 track version of the Howlin' Wolf Live Gold CD (Fine Tune 2212-2) which has 14 tracks and appears to be available through Amazon Marketplace (the first nine tracks are in identical order on both CD's). From listening to the samples on Amazon the sound quality of the 9 track CD appears to be the same since as the Fine Tune version. The Fine Tune audio quality is not all that good, may not really be live, but it is the Wolf, after all. Thought fair warning was in order.
Technically this was an exercise in tautology, and albeit the author admits that they are events not presented chronologically/linerally, the whole thing came off as a repetitive scrapbook of free associative ramblings. Cultural allusions were off and revealed just a shallow dip into areas of interest; just deep enough to create a character for a sexual fantasy.Every D/s relationship defines it's own perimeters, but this is the most silly top from the bottom (with a side of kink) i've ever read. Any girl who needs to prover her worth and devotion by degrading any and all around her isn't creating a deeper bond of submission, but pathetically wallowing in a misplaced sense of value (with a heaping side of self-image issues).
I picked up Beauty & Submission on a whim, after reading the back cover. I have recently begun to read a few BDSM and thought this book would help broaden my knowledge of the submissive aspect. I was disappointed with the outcome.I thought the book held more issues with jealousy and swinging than the day-to-day life of a lifestyle submissive. I also thought that the slave seemed to switch between a dominant/submissive role. There were quite a few references to watersports which were personally not my cup o' tea, as you might say.I did not enjoy all the pages where she "quoted" from her other novels. I believe the book would have been half the size if these would have been cut from the copy. It felt like an attempt to sell her other books.
Sorry I know this is supposed to be a review of the item, but I want my complaint heard by anyone that might buy it. The hat itself is great, if you buy it at the store. New Era hats have large bills and a tall crown, but as long as you don't have a tiny head it will look fine. My complaint was that they shipped me this hat in a dvd box. Seriously. The hat was completely flattened, leaving two huge creases on either side of the logo. Ruined hat if you ask me, and will be returning immediately. You're probably better off buy this item in a hat store and spend the extra few dollars, at least they will have treated it right up to that point.
Quien no va a ser sensilla con la poca fama, talento, y bellesa que esta mujer tiene? No tiene voz suave, ni fuerte. Deveria dedicarse a otra cosa. Lo que sea.. menos cantar, y actuar porque seria igual de ridicula que Patty Navidad!! Este es uno de los peores Discos que he escuchado en toda mi vida!!
Why is she not famous? I agree with the other smart reviewer, because she STINKS! Wow does she stink! I had no choice but to throw her CD in the trash. I wasn't going to torture anyone by giving them this CD as a present! No way! I just THREW IT AWAY!
I just coulAfter getting more than 50% through the book, I had to stop ... I just couldn't get into it and didn't like the writting style.
This book really disappointed me. It seems like a narrative. No real plot just a rambling repetitive narration of a poor island child. I wish I could say I loved it....but felt really let down.
I really wanted to like this book based on the title and the cover art. Instead, I found myself not caring about the narrator whatsoever. She repeats the same few thoughts throughout the entire book. She reminds the reader that her mother is dead and that nobody loves her so many times that I stopped caring about her situation. Her repetition and monotone voice stops the narrator from being truly developed as a character that we can connect with. Some parts of her story seem unnecessary and pointless as they don't really lead to anything of interest later on. Her characterization was too direct and left nothing for the reader to consider for themselves. The title is extremely misleading as we learn absolutely nothing about her mother- aside from her death during childbirth. I am unable to find anything positive to describe about this book, sadly.
I had hoped to read a colorful story about life in the Caribbean, and was not expecting the story to be happy and uplifting. However, I was disappointed to discover that the most prevalent topics in the book were the character's bodily smells, excretions, and sex life. I was left wondering what these aspects of the book had to do with the character's mother.
This is the story of an unhappy woman who refuses to see or seek out any joy in her life. The overall feeling of the story is negative and depressing.
This has got to be one of the most depressing books I have ever read. Not depressing in the sense that the tone of the book was depressing (which it was), but depressing in the sense that it was such poor quality. This was the first book I "attempted" to read by the author, since I couldn't waste my time trying to finish it. I am pretty sure I won't be reading any other books by Jamaica Kincade.
After all the hype, and comparison to Camus' "The Stranger", I suppose my expectations were high for this book. I found "Autobiography of my Mother" completely benign. In some parts, pointless. Unlike Camus' protagonist in "The Stranger", Xuela's world-view is too fully revealed to be cleverly wrought and too self-perpetuating to cause empathy with the reader. A self-pitying character, Xuela is hard to empathize with because she decries her father and the white "conquerers" for exploiting people and destroying the aboriginal population's culture; yet, Xuela also takes advantage of many -- emotionally and psychologically. Therefore, Xuela just comes across as bitter and codependent and the reader is not compelled to sympathize with her situation. I also found nothing sensual about the book -- the author's placement of masturbation description seemed to come out of nowhere and appears simply awkward. Overally, the book does not deliver compared to the hype
Did not really get lost in there book....found it boring....and I really wanted to stop reading it! But chose to painstakingly finish it..
It's not a book I'll ever read again. It was very boring. Glad I didn't pay that much. I give it a star.
This book has flowery language and the story line seems to have potential but the book never goes any where. I skimmed much of it, hoping it would develop plot and character, but it really never did. The plot and language were repetitive and didn't hold my attention. It seemed as though the author had a point she was trying hard to get to but it just never happened.
What's the point here? It was never fully explicated, and the narrator does not inspire enough interest to carry this woefully inadequate plot - and I use that word loosely. Jamaica Kincaid needs to go back to domestic work
Even that single star is more than this book is worth. My Engligh professor assigned this book to me during my sophomore year of college (along with Nectar in a Sieve, a far better, though not terrific book), and what little I remember of it was that it was just awful (and offal). Her writing is repetitive and choppy, perhaps descriptive but disgustingly so. Do we really need to know the "wetness between [her] legs", or that she cooked her menstrual fluid into some poor soul's dinner? I couldn't stand the book. If you want quality, read something by Neil Gaiman, or Stephen King (his descriptions of a girl coming of age in Carrie are much better than this book). Drop the book, throw it, burn it, whatever. It's just not worth reading. How many trees did we lose to its production (and, more importantly, how many talented young writers were rejected because this woman was published). It's just a book not worth reading about a story not worth telling.
Jean Giorno assigned rights to this story to the public domain. Unscrupulous, evil American publishers are acting contrary to the author's intent and prostituting this work by cracking down on English language versions (including online versions), even new translations from the French. Don't give your money to greed heads who are 180 degrees in conflict with the principles of this book.
This was not a good first book to learn SNMP, the basic definitions are poor, leading to confusion. As an example, the definition of a subtype I found in another text (a subset of the value set for a type) was quite clear, then I checked the Simple definition of subtype and found its was useful to "refine the semantics" of a "data object" and that "it may be useful to create a new data type for strings using other repertoires, such as ASCII". The author also notes that the "ASN.1 rules for subtyping are long and complex". (p 34-35). Hello? This book may be useful as a reference after reading other, better written introductions, but avoid it if you are new to SNMP. Also, I recommend that the novice learn ASN.1 first, rather than alsong with SNMP in a combined text. Also, SNMPv2 has yet to catch on, the Simple book focuses primarily on this version, not of much interest if you are working with version 1.
The editor and publisher of this book should be ashamed. It is an extended rant by the author that has no business being bound in hard cover. The Pine Mountain Group recommends excerps from this book to get up to speed with SNMP. I wonder who at PMG is friends with the author. This book will teach only members of the "network management community" anything. Anyone seeking entry into the network management community will need to find another door. By reading no more than 20 to 40 pages a day I managed to go through the entire book but I am afraid that I did not add anything to my understanding of SNMP that was not already there from studying for my MCSE. This book was a profound disappointment. It is at once dense, superficial, earnest, and sarcastic. The shame of it is that this author could educate profoundly if a good editor enforced some discipline or a co-author came in to help with communicating with those who are not the author's peers.
It's hard to believe that this book was released by a major publisher. It is rife with misspellings and grammatical errors. The thin index is almost useless, as a close examination reveals it to be mostly a list of the author's friends and their nicknames.
I am a developer with 8 years experience but novice to Network programming. A friend suggested this book as a first and default one to start with. I am completely disappointed. It's not a practical, jump-into it, internet-age book. Let me see if it serves any purpose as a reference. BTW, the CD is totally useless. It has only a few files which you can anyway download for free.
Book has some interesting insight but does little to develop technical understanding. Is cheaper at B&N locally
I have not read any of Charlie Smith's other work, so I can't compare this to previous efforts. His writing is poetic, and truly impressive in short bursts. But over the long haul, the poetry interferes with the prose. Words and phrases seem to be chosen more for their sounds and rhythms than for their contributions to plot, and dialogue can be stilted. Imagery is vivid but occasionally self-indulgent. The storyline is interesting at first but eventually grows gaudy and distasteful. The power of Smith's language is his greatest strength, but it is a strength better suited to poetry than novels.
I'm thinking of cancelling my subscription. Ever since Time Warner Publishing acquired Essence, it seems to be cantering to dark-skinned white women and NOT Black women.
Cant rate something that I have yet to get a copy of. I feel like I calomst could have done better by going to the store and buying it. I have yet to get my first copy of the magazine
i was hoping to gain some entertainment while reading things that will keep my interest but like most magazines, this was full of ads and the articles either seemed generic or just didnt keep my attention.
So disappointed with this product. Bought it online because I thought it would taste high end homemade. It is going out to the troops in Afghanistan and I wanted them to have a taste of home for the holidays . Unfortunately, I found I could've saved money and just bought Crunch N' Munch. This product has a bunch of un-popped kernels per bag; not randomly (which would also be bad) but at least 3 to 4 kernels per bag. I thought they would put their product through more rigorous standards of quality, but i see that is not a concern with this vendor.
I'm sure I am one of a select few that do not appreciate a story that develops great characters and great sub-plots and then ends abruptly. It's almost as though the author got bored and quit - Zero resolution on anything. It doesn't leave me wanting more because I know the same feeling of "What the Hell?" will be waiting for me in the next book.
Its not a bad book but I expected more. I didnt find myself locked into it waiting for the next thing to happen and unable to put it down. One thing I didnt like is the chapters are tiny. It doesnt really let you get into one part of the story before its switched to another. I think they did this to imply fast action and keep you always expecting the next thing but it didnt work for me. I wont buy the next book in the series.
A decent story that gets you to turn the pages. The problem is, there aren't enough pages. The story just ends leaving you in the middle of an action sequence. I don't like paying $8 for a book that leaves you forced to buy the next one in a series. I don't mind series (thought I'm not that much into them), but each book in a series should stand alone.
The repetition of information and slow pace gave this book the feel of elementary school reading material. This series could have been condensed into one book and it would have been the better for it. I gave it two stars for the infrequent plot twists that got me through the book rather than throwing it away.
Koontz can write. But he sucks as a story teller. Books are supposed to have a COMPLETE story in them, no? Well this one has no ending. No end at all. These 2 detectives are clued in to the fact that Dr Frankenstein exists, and is creating his "perfect race" to some day kill off all humans. That's it. You meet the original, now educated and "at one with the universe" Frankenstein's monster, you meet the main characters, and they have some conflict. That's the whole "story" in this book, which it really isn't because the basic elements of a story are a beginning, middle, and end.
This Frankenstein series started off with 3 1/2 stars and deteriorated downward with every new volume. Not up to Mr. Koontz's standard of edge of your seat, nail biting suspense I've come to love.
Definition of a bad book: a book that doesn't make you want to get to the next chapter. I kept trying to see if this would eventually grab me, but after maybe 10 chapters or so of plodding prose, I gave up. Thank goodness it was a library book.
I love Dean Koontz. This was not my favorite. In fact I was rather unhappy with the whole book. Now don't get me wrong he is a great writer but this book bored me. I don't read to get bored.
Like many of the other reviewers, my ZR40 is now giving me the infamous "Remove cassette" message and is mangling tapes. I have used it to record maybe 7 hours worth of video over the last two years. Search the web for "canon zr users group" and "eating tapes" to hear similar horror stories. Stay away from Canon camcorders.
Things I like...- price- sizeThing I didn't like and made me return- performance under regular indoor house lighting very grainy and considerably worse than my 8mm analog. Doing further research it appears this is likely not unique to Canon but common to DV camcorders. I am going to stick with my 8mm for a couple of years until DV tech improves since much of my use is indoors filming kids, etc.
world.....do noti repeatdo not get this camcorderthere is nothing worse than thisi wasted [money]buying it from amazon.comi could have gotten the same thing [for less]including firewire, 4 dv's, and a carrying caseIt is honestly the worst, disgusting, and despicable electronic out thereif you get this you will have literallyliterally threw [your money]into the atlantic oceanDO NOT GET THIS EVEN IF SOMEONE PAYS FOR IT. RETURN IT. GET YOUR MONEY BACK!!!!!!!
Unfortunately I had a very bad consumer experience buying this camera. I had borrowed a ZR20 from a friend the year before and liked it, so when the ZR40 came out I wanted to buy it. I read online that some people were complaining about motor noise with this camera, but I figured I try it anyways. I bought it at Best Buy (should be called Worst Buy), and when trying it out found that it does have super bad motor noise. You can't hear it while recording - it's when you are watching a tape you recorded playback on your TV etc that you hear it. The motor noise is recorded in with your audio, so you hear a loud hummmm in the background. It was too loud for me to live with. If I was recording something with no background noise (like my baby playing), then it was as loud as his voice! ... I have now ordered the Panasonic PVDC152 which is supposed to have good sound. We'll see...
I bought this model 18 months ago. Now it has big problem. I can't rewind the tape well. "remove the tape" mesasge always pop up. I sent it back to Canon for repair. They asked me $169 for repair. What can I say now? Too bad camcorder.
Well where do I begin? After a month of use, the battery stopped working. Contacted Canon via email. They replied battery is not under warranty. Would you like to buy another one? Please.6 months later. I started transferring video to my computer only to find out this stupid camera eats tapes. I have lost two tapes so far. One of them was my son's birth!!!!The eating tapes issue is a major problem with this unit. They have known about it and continue to ignore it. Do a search on "zr40 tape problems" to see what I am talking about. There are even more results on sister product, zr10. I will never buy a product from Canon again. They are idiots for doing this to their customers.
As many others have reported, this Zr40 began eating tapes with only a few hours of use on it. I have lost many precious moments recorded on tape because of the tape loading problem.The only good thing I can say about this camera is the bag was large enough to hold my Nikon P100. The Canon is going in the trash.
I checked this book out of the public library in hopes of gaining some insight into the many kinds of difficulties an adult faces upon learning of his/her giftedness. Instead, this book was full of Oprah-like perky advice, sprinkled liberally with sleep-inducing anecdotes about "Heather" and "James" et cetera.The author does not have the gifted reader in mind with this book. It is overstuffed with fluff and not enough substance. I have yet to find a book on gifted adults that speaks to us at our own level of intellect and cogently outlines issues and strategies that we face with our unique brains.
This is a mediocre book at best. The tests give you an illusion that you are a genius too. It is full of self fullfiling falacies. If you think you are a genius, you are... maybe not. Just review your scores on the SAT, GMAT, GRE, or whatever test you have taken. If you did not score in the top percentile, don't call yourself a genius because the tests within these books said so. That is if you don't want to embarass yourself in public, or even in private company.There are far better books out there on how to train and develop your multiple intelligences. This is not the one.Check authors like Michael Gelb, Tony Buzan, Thomas Armstrong, Howard Gardner, and David Coleman. They have developed a ton of serious well researched materials and methods on this subject. They all provide far better stuff than this book.
well, they promised me "NEW" but this book is far from being new. Marking all over the book means it's not new, the cover torn at some parts means that this isn't new!!
As other reviewers have stated, these curtain rods will not sustain much weight at all. They really aren't spring rods - you just twist it into place.I ordered 3 and they were so poorly packed that two of them were bent and completely unusable.I wouldn't bother with these, or buy them from Country Curtains because you can get an anchor so that they can hold more weight and be more stable. Of course, their $30 each instead of $19!!!!
I ordered three rods (all black) of various sizes and received free shipping. When the order was received, one of the rods was in pewter. They agreed to send a return shipping label for the incorrect item, but I would have to pay shipping on one rod.
Had a hard time following the story. Typos in dates really had me confused Malcolm was introduced in 1864 not 1964.
The music has been out. What is the purpose of it? Forget it
As any fan of Nirvana is well aware, Kurt Cobain had a fear that was close to outright paranoia about Nirvana's music being milked and exploited to make a buck. All of a sudden, that fear seems totally legitimate.This is (basically) the 3rd "Greatest Hits" cd that's been released under the band's banner. Nirvana only had three studio released cds. Well ... four if you count 'Incesticide.'If you're a younger fan and you want a terrific introduction to the band's work save your money from cd and save up for the 'With the Lights Out' box-set. It doesn't cost too much and is a great way to break into the band.A true Nirvana fan understands that the only meaning behind this piece is dollar signs.
All it is the summary of the boxset i guess for the budget nirvana fan? the reason i am giving it 2 stars all it had to offer was a track not included in the box set which is the come as you are demo.. the box set is alot more expensive but has alot more to offer than this and you get a decent dvd to watch all in all a buy for the hardcore nirvana fan... also the art work was originally picked out by Frances Bean Cobain and thats a good thing! other than that buy the box set
I agree with most people that this is an un-necessary release. It is an obvious attempt to cash in by the holders of the rights. But on the other hand it is also a cheaper alternative to the 'With the lights out box'. I own the box and can honestly say it is definitely worth the extra money to buy that. This doesn't even offer the best of the box anyway, which it clear states in the title. I only bought this because I like to own anything and everything with the Nirvana name on it. I believe Nirvana are the most influencial band since the Beatles and any unheard recording of the bands I must have.Only hardcore fans will want to buy this, it only offers 3 previously unreleased recording of which only two are any good. 'Sappy' and a 1985 recorded version of 'Spank Thru' which surely must be the first ever recording by Nirvana.As far as value for money goes, this doesn't have anything to offer, sadly.
Have you ever heard the song 'Milk It'? It was written for this exact reason. Or 'Rape Me'? "Its so relieving to know that your leaving as soon as you get paid" Francis farmer? You know when you buy this, some record exec is making a buck on a dead persons name. But hey we all know that suicide sells.
The disc is intact but the case is in terrible ocndition. It is broken in half and chipped off of the top portion of the case.
It is more of the same, it is more of the one of the worst band that existed. Nirvana was never good, it was music for depressive people. Skip on this one that it is being release to fill the pockets of her stupid daughter and his stupid ex wife. Nirvana and Kurt Cobain were the most worst band of all times.
I'll tell you what's REALLY in the spirit of the band: that FBI seal and warning on the back cover that states that any and all duplications of the cd are "illegal". Not that anybody would enjoy a duplication anyway. If this is "true" Nirvana, then "true" Nirvana sucks.
Complete garbage, the sound quality is horrible, if your going to release a best of cd, record it with something other than a preschool microphone covered with a wet rag.
Although it does not mention it that the songs on the CD are demos in track listing, almost single song on this CD is cheap home made demos with terrible sound quality, with the exception of a few acoustic and live performances. If you want to buy Nirvana's greatest hits and enjoy the studio quality sounds and recordings of the ones of the best bands in alt rock history, this is not your album and do not be tricked like I was.
I don't quite understand why Courtney is allowed to put these things out, and even more surprised that the other members agreed to it (since they have to). Everyone who already put out the 50 bucks for the box gets a whole three song bonus, songs which don't even sound like anything special. Nirvana was an awesome band who made some of the greatest music of all time, and this CD does reflect that. It's a good CD, but it's useless. It's nothing we don't already have. If they're going to put more Nirvana stuff out, it should at least be stuff we haven't heard. Just buy the three songs off of iTunes or something and save yourself the money from buying this CD.
If I could give this half of a star I would. I am a big fan of Nirvana, but this was a total disappointment to me. The tracks sounded awful. I felt like I was ripped off in every sense of the way. I took it to a buy-trade-sell place and not even they would offer me anything for it, which shows you the poor quality of this album. A word of advice; DO NOT BUY THIS!!!!!
The songs on Sliver are easily some of the best of the box but the completely ignored some of the best, also. Its said for me to watch the "Nirvana Corp." aka Courtney Love to do something like this. Ultimately, if you don't realize that this is a shtik for $ then you must be confused. Nirvana released a best of cd and then a best of the box? Im just guessing but i think this is what the record company was saying:"We'll throw a couple new songs on it and we'll get some true fans to buy it just to have it."It's been released for the cash. And this is something I know Kurt wouldnt have approved of. Hopefully someone takes this into consideration before buying it. yea,its good for the collection but its sad to see this is happening. I bought it for the cover art and stuff just to have for the collection nothing more. If your looking for some music get the actual box set.
This is the worst recording of Nirvana I have ever heard! The entire thing sounds horrible. DON'BUY IT!!
I don't own the box set but, if this is the best of the box then I'm not missing much. I really like Nirvana but there really just aren't many winners here especially since this is suppose to be the pick of the litter from "With the lights out".There are a few solid tracks here but I just expected more...
This puzzle is very easy to solve, I would not recommend it for anyone. Buy the "original" "Don't Break the Bottle", it will keep you entertained much longer.
This is by far the worst movie in black cinema. Take everything you liked about "Friday", "Booty Call" and "CB4", leave them out of this movie and this is what you get. 90 minutes of [stuff]. It is low budget beyond low budget, and you get a headache from listing to fake, incoherent characters who look like they were picked off the street of some ghetto. And those who like to see booty-there is basically none, just one scene which lasts about 15 seconds and features a silent, unattractive "dancer".. If you are a fan of these movies, rent it first, you'll see. If you buy it, you will find a movie devoid of beautifull black women and good looking guys, but which is filled with stupid humor and a story which will put you to sleep.
I bought this book for my book club and I have had a very hard time reading it. The characters are too life-like in my opinion for me to have any sympathy towards them. I have read other novels from the Victorian Period that I have liked, but this one seems overly wordy and dull in my opinion. I gave two stars instead of one for the mini novel Indian Summer of a Forsyte, the best part of the series, which saved this from a one star reveiw. It was touching and beautiful to read. If only the rest of the books followed such a formula.
If you love, care, like, or even have the smallest amount of respect for yourself or another person don't expose them to this garbage! I did not expect a movie with taste, and I enjoy B-movies, tacky gross outs, and off color humor. BUT THIS MOVIE GOES WAY OVERBOARD! The filmakers trying so hard to be shocking they forget to give this flick anything that a decent human being could find enjoyable.
I've read them all, many times over and am a big fan. This one held so much promise for me, describing the culture and life of the Californios. And then he had to inject that mystic story of another world in there.....
About four weeks ago, I purchased at a Home Depot in Florida the Plasplugs "Master Tiler", model number: DWW180US-BX.I am using it for a porcelain tile installation. The original blade worked ok for the initial cuts, but I need to replace it for the proper blade type for the tile. I had bought a porcelain tile replacement blade from a blade mfr when I bought the saw. When I got around to replacing the blade, I found out that the Plasplugs machine uses a different "arbor" than everybody else. The replacement blade was worthless to me.I then called the Plasplugs US office to order the "high glaze" blade. Much to my chagrin, I was told the "all blades except the standard have been discontinued".I just bought this saw four weeks ago! I think it is very irresponsible for a manufacturer to behave in this matter.You can be assured that I will avoid any Plasplug product in the future.
I cannot recommend this tool. When I first used it, I couldn't cut the tile. I then noticed the blade was spinning backwards! When I turned the saw off, and then on again, the blade didn't spin at all. Finally, I realized that I had to "spin" the blade manually as I switched on the saw to get it to turn correctly. Not what I expected from a $[$$$] tool. Once I finally got it working, I was still disappointed with the performance. Cutting was very slow, and not very accurate. ...
You could do a lot better for the price of this tool. Comparing it to comprable models costing half as much? I recommend spending for the cheaper models or springing for something better. The blade wouldn't align with the blade guard until I modified the table with a file. The tightening bolt that runs through the fence stripped in less than two weeks of light use. (Trust me, I'm not THAT strong.) Spend less or spend more, just don't bother to spend for this tool. One additional note: I contacted the manufacturer about the stripped rip fence and they promptly sent me a replacement without questions. I suppose that's worth an upgrade to 2 1/2 stars. I still think one could do better for the money. Oh, and my saw leaks water continuously when the unit is operating. Better leave it at two stars afterall.
This is a very good concept, but poorly executed. On my particular saw, the tilt section of the table didn't fit flush, so it made the right side of the table useless. Once raised to the 45 degree position, the tilt section was wobbly, as one of the flimsy plastic props did not even touch its rest. The blade ran neither true nor parallel to the fence. The blade retaining nut had to be tightened about every 10 cuts. The blade actually flew off the shaft a couple of times. The tile caught on the plastic end caps of the fence, which stick out. I could easily stall the motor with ordinary 1/4 inch ceramic tile. Can't remember all the other thigs wrong with it, I was in too much of a hurry to return it.
The first tile I cut... I knew I had purchased the wrong saw. Maybe to use the rip fence it would work ok, but to cut tile freehand, it was useless. The blade comes up through the table, like a table saw, with the blade spinning through 1 inch of water in the bottom of the tank. The blade picks up the water and sprays it all over the inside of the clear guard over the blade. This makes it impossible to see any lines marked on the tile. It is impossible to make an accurate cut if you can't see your cut lines. Using the saw without the guard is not an option, unless you are working outside, and don't mind getting drenched. Bad design. I'm returning it and spending the extra money to get something good.
Bought at Home Depot for $199. It is a toy, not suitable for serious work. Flimsy contruction, difficult or impossible to adjust. Recommend getting a brand name.
My main complaint is the fence, getting both sides square to the blade and locked down will take you about five minute's and even then don't put to much pressure on the fence as it will ether bow or one side will move. An MK is much faster put the tile on the carriage push the tile to the blade make sure the kurf is going to be on the correct side of your mark slide the carriage back set the fence (if you'd like) turn the saw on and cut. I renovate older home and many times the walls are out of square so your cut tiles are going to be getting bigger or smaller as you go God help you if you get into this position with the Plasplugs tile saw....
The rail keeps popping up, so the plastic endcaps are no longer flush with the table. I had to file them down so the tile won't get caught. The tilting table will move apart at the hinge when I start pushing the tile through the blade, it is just useless. Straight cuts seemed to work OK. This may be suitable for small around the house jobs. I think the design is from England. Bad British engineering !!
this made me really dizzy so I had to stop using it after only one use. I ended up tossing it out.
I found research that said this possibly may help get your cycles back and so after finishing the bottle the cycle never came. I guess if you keep it up after a few months is what might help, but I decided instead of buying more and hoping it would help to talk to my doctor first.
I noticed I was very tired and headachy after taking Vitex, but I read that is a common side effect and that it was temporary. After the first week, I only noticed the tiredness increasing. I would feel almost confused at times and just plain strange. When taking it during the day, one time, I completely drove past the shopping center I was going to. I'd go through these spells where I felt very heady, like I was going to pass out. I was only taking 250mg per day. I had high hopes for this as a treatment for PCOS, but I couldn't continue with it. This doesn't seem like a common result, but malaise and confusion are listed among vitex's side effects. Maybe I should have tried vitex fruit which is less potent than vitex extract, but this is something I'm not messing around with any more! Back to progesterone cream!
I was hoping for an acid that was convenient to use. Well, this is pretty convenient, just swipe. But it did nothing for me. I wanted to try and get rid of the little bumps clogging my pores and frequent breakouts. However, my skin remained the same. And while it doesn't really have a scent, there seems to be some chemicals wafting off the pads that affected my sinuses because I have quite a sensitive nose. I switched to using them on my back and got the same result, which was nothing. So it was an expensive experiment that didn't work. It may work for someone else but it did nothing for me. Most disappointing. I have since switched to the salicylic gel peel, which hurts a whole lot more, but gets the job done.
This is just a horrible product. If you want to waste $72 on a product that will ruin your skin, look no further. If you want to breakout horribly even if you don't normally and to have an awful rash on your face for days, this is the product for you. If you want to have to deal with a company that just doesn't care about anything except for making a quick buck, buy from MD Skincare.
The movie version of this song is much better. The Mariah/Whitney version is simply just a screaming contest to see who can sing better. I admit the song is beautiful and touching, but it would have been better if one of them sung it instead of it being a competition. Buy the soundtrack and listen to the movie version. It showcases the song in a much better light.
The song is sung beautifully, but is it promoting New Age? Should we believe in ourselves or in God? I think the focus should be more on believing in God and not just in ourselves.
I would suggest before sitting down to read this book that you brew a large pot of coffee. Or better yet, don't sit down to read it at all. This is dry stuff!
As a student of jiujitsu i understood alot of the moves but i found that without previous knowledge these pictures and instructions were difficult to understand. I feel there is alot of good information but not worth buying.
I bought it before I knew anything. Now that I have been training a bit more and reading more I realized that this book is lacking a whole lot. I do not really recomend this book unless you can get it for free.
I ordered this and realized I didn't specify the size so went back 20 min. later to cancel the order and then order another one.the shipping is 3/4 the priced of the item! Then after what I thought was a canceled order didn't even work at all. I have been sending emails all day and tried to call them to no avail. Horrible communication. they took my money and haven't even responded to my email or phone call.Caveat Emptor
This is our book group selection this month and I was looking forward to a good read, especially judging by the appealing cover. Ms. Benita is indeed a great story teller and visual with her discriptions,however,the character developmentis sorely lacking. Perhaps this is the point, but why? All sorts of trying events, happy occassions and other significant life experiences occur but they had little impact as I did not really know nor care about many of the chacacters, although I wanted to. Jacinta in particular needed some enchancement. It will be interesting too hear what my fellow book club members think.
I am amazed at the high ratings this book received. It was, undoubtedly, the worst book I have ever read. It might have been better with good editing. There were many unimportant characters and many horrible descriptions that could have been omitted. Who really cares about the dogs, many of whom have no relevance to the story. Who really cares about the detailed description of the decor of a room. Yes, I did finish the book that, by the way, had no ending. Toward the middle of the book I actually started editing it. What a mess!
This is about the trials and tribulations of a multigenerational family.We found it disengaging and rather tedious. It went on and on without getting far at the beginning and we started skipping scenes to see if it picked up. In the end we abandoned it.I'd hoped for more from a movie with Saif Ali Khan, Salman Khan & Karisma Kapoor but this was 1999 and I guess it wasn't among their better stuff. The music and dance was ho-hum and unmemorable too.Elsewhere on the Net it scores average. However it was below average for us and not a keeper.
I got this book expecting a bunch of puzzles from the cover and title. There are many other items to be found, but everything looks very out-dated. Definitely keep looking if you want puzzles or other up-to-date patterns.Wayne
I love the ESV translation and rate it five stars. I am upset that the publisher of this translation so poorly packages its product. This edition is a "shirt pocket" edition that seems well bound but has impossibly small print.What is needed is a "coat pocket" size edition of the New Testament that is bound in such a way that it will lie open of its own accord. The print size should be 10 or higher. This present edition will not lie open, and, what the more, the print is so small that only an ant could read it.Crossway publishes only two editions of the New Testament alone, and both are inferior. The print is too small to be read with enjoyment. Something has to change!
My review centers on only one thing - the type size. This edition is disappointingly and, in my humble opinion, unnecessarily small. Increasing the type size a point or two would move the edition from unreadable to readable and, at most, increase the book length by about a hundred pages. Since it is currently at almost 500 pages, I feel quite certain the binding could accommodate another 100 pages with no problem.What makes it all the more frustrating is that the type itself is a nice clean face that wouldn't require a magnifying glass if it was just a little larger.I really don't believe Our Lord meant for us to suffer eye strain to read His word; nor do I think He wants us to carry around large books when small books with readable type would serve the (His) purpose.
Really, really awful. The sheer paucity of Alan Dean Foster's imagination is staggering. "Midworld" was recommended to me by a friend; at first I thought I was the victim of a bad joke. Could be used as a blueprint on how not to write a novel. Witless, humorless, and lacking in even the slightest glimmer of originality. Don't waste your time.
A few years back I was forced to read "Tess" for my English class. Nobody in my class could ever finish reading the book... only a few of us could ever even finish the Cliff Notes for it. Our Professor tried solving the situation by renting us the video, but all of us were fast asleep half an hour into it.Tess is a bimbo with no brain and an insult to women, yes, even at that time! This book is over-rated and should not be called a classic. If you really want to read good literature, read D.H.Lawrence, read Tolstoy, read evn modern classical writers like Achebe, but for crying out loud, do NOT waste your time and money on "Tess.."
Tess was a very boring book. From an analytical point, the book's major theme was FATE. However, you must be interested in the victorian era, in order to enjoy the book. It is the same thing with the Scarlet Letter, to enjoy the book you must know about the time era. The problems that the characters are faced with in the book are laughable by todays standards.
The back cover of my book described Tess as a heroine for her time. I was thrilled to begin reading this book to discover what it was that made her a heroine. I was very disappointed by the end of the book. She was no heroine, more like a self-pitying brat! Hardy did a fantastic job of describing life during that periold of time, but that talent was not enough to change my opinion of the book. Very aggrevating!!!
TESS is one of the more boring works of literature. Yes, Hardy was rather a revolutionary for the period as far as his choice of heroine and the subjects with which he dealt, but that doesn't necessarily add up to a good book. The story itself isn't bad -- if you're willing to wade through all the unnecessary muck to piece it together. However, I have trouble stomaching the fact that Tess is lauded as a brave and virtuous heroine when she is actually completely spineless and at times rather annoying. I won't spoil the story by giving examples, since you may very well be intending to read it anyway, or being forced to read it for a class. If the latter is so...good luck.
This book has it's place--and that place is in an American Literature course at a university. It was entirely too technical to be enjoyable. I was assigned this book as a ninth grader and now that I am a teacher and understand lexile levels, I must advise other teachers not to assign this book until the later grades--and only to the highest students.
This is part of my attempt to read classics and non-fiction as well as my usual speculative fiction this year. A few people noted that Hardy is a bit of a hard read, and that turned out to be true. His style is jagged and choppy, bouncing around quite a bit, and never giving you a true glimpse of some scenes important to know how to interpret (such as the question of Tess' seduction or rape by Alec d'Urberville). However, overall, it is an interesting story at least and I enjoyed the book. But considering the ending seemed to be rather ill-fitting to the rest of the tale, I'll have to pass on giving it a high rating. It was rather disappointing to slog through his odd phrasings and quirks, only to be let down at the end by the characters just magically changing personality traits. I think Tess was a weakling without a mind of her own for the most part, Angel was worthless, and the character with the most potential in the story is the so-called villain, Alec d'Urberville.
I didn't like this book very much. It was silly. I'm sorry that I've wasted time reading this book. There are better books to read.
I didn't like the book. The language was difficult to read and in the end the topic was one i don't agree with. The ultra right values where women were always at fault for tempting a man and she was the one dealt final cruel punishment. I am relieved to be of this century. Makes us appreciate what we have and what those before us had to suffer for us to be where we are now.
This book in the beginning was so slow that I finished a book twice it's length before I finished the first chapter of Tess of the D'Urdubervilles.
I was really disappointed in this book and surprised that so many people think it is a wonderful story. It was such a depressing story and reflects all of the worst things about the way women were treated in that time. I don't think this story had any redeeming qualities and very few likeable characters (even Tess was quite irritating at times with her pride getting in the way of asking for help to make her life a little easier).
This was a VERY used paperback of Tess sold as new with library stickers on the binding as well as the front cover. Amazon is definitely not trustworthy anymore.
I don't know how can this book be a classic. I haven't thought that I could find such absurd stuff in a book. Don't waste your time with it.
WHY are poor, innocent school kids forced to read this intensly dull text? It is enough to put anyone off English Lit for LIFE. If anyone in authority is reading this, PLEASE take this piece of junk OFF the sylabus...PLEASE!!!!!!!!!!!
I haven't been able to get into it ...read only a bit and it hasn't held my attention...maybe I'll try again sometime... I know it is supposed to be like a classic so try it ....
Thia is the saddest story I have ever read! Poor girl---she doesn't have a chance with finding a happy life! The cards are all stacked against her from the git-go!
I thought the story line sounded interesting so i bought it...twice! Trying to get a version of the book that wasnt so diffucult to read, its ok off and on, half the time i dont know what the author is referring to cause it was written so long ago that the author uses that language and it just got in my way of the story, which is why i bought it again thinking the 2nd book looked easier to read but it wasnt...sadly i will be reduced to trying to find the movie to find out what happens and it bothers me because i hate to not finish a book!
My 1 star rating is due to the fact that Oxford University Press gives away the plot twists and even the shocker ending in the second paragraph of their Introduction. Most of the fun of reading any novel is trying to find out what will happen next. Oxford spoils this by giving it away at the start (what were they thinking?!!!). If you pick up this edition, just skip the Intro, or read it AFTER the book. Otherwise, Hardy's novel is a great story with insight into noble character. Hardy gets 5 stars, Oxford U Press gets 1.
the story itself is original(using a common character instead of some nobility), but the story just keeps drugging on forever or something. It is a novel, not a prose!! I wonder why the author had to waste bunch of pages expressing the emotions of the heroin? And I think Tess is terribly idiodic. Why should she continue to love her unforgiving and cruel husband? Isn't that such a degradation of female saying that they will always be loyal to the man no matter how the men desert them? So,do not even try to read this book if you have no time.
...and hate it now. My only revenge for being forced to read Tess as a kid is to write a negative review as an adult. So there, that's done.
See subject line. I would never recommend this book, depth and nuance aside. It was at no point pleasant to read. I struggled to finish it.
I am a Senior at Linville High School. I recently read Hardy's Tess of the d'Urbervilles for my term paper. I chose it because a teacher told me it was very good. I was quite disappointed with the book in general. After reading the description on the back of the book, I inferred that Tess would be confronted with a problem, but being the "heroine" she was described as, she would overcome it victoriously. Unfortunately, I was completely wrong. Tess depressed and frustrated me extremely throughout the book. She cowarded down and let people run over her. The only thing that was good was the little surprises inserted every now and then. The whole book depressed me and I would rather not read another book of Hardy's again.
This poor character never catches a break, and the writer makes you care for her, deeply. Emotionally draining and depressing
There are so many T shirt quilt books out now and my friend happened to choose one that has incorrect sewing instructions. Her quilt would have been easier to make with another book. I have several T shirt quilt books that are very good with instructions.
THE FISKARS SOFTOUCH SCISSORS THAT WERE SHOWN ON THE WEBSITE WERE NOT THE ITEMS THAT WERE SHIPPED. I WAS SHIPPED THE 'NEWER' VERSION OF THE SAME ITEM. I WANTED THE VERSION THAT WAS SHOWN AND EXPECTED IT. I DO NOT LIKE THE HANDLES OF THE 'NEWER' VERSION AND WANTED THE OLDER ONES, AS I WAS LOOKING AT ON THE SITE. UPDATING YOUR SITES WOULD SAVE EVERYONE MORE TIME AND EFFORT!
I have been using this for several months now and I am not particularly impressed by it. The liquid itself is smooth and silky and it goes on and washes off quite easily but it seems to not have done anything to/for my skin. Jury's sill out for me...
This book is one of many written during the "Bubble Era" by "gaijin" (primarily Americans) who really knew next to nothing about Japan, yet somehow found a publisher, usually Japanese. Another of this quickie genre published about the same time was a book for teaching profanity to Japanese studying English."Learning to Bow" may by an accurate account of the author's experience living in Japan and teaching in the JET program. However, that's all it is. It's full of cliches, sweeping generalizations, and offers no insight into living in Japan or understanding the culture. What could the writer possibly know after only two years?
I may not a good reviewer because I stopped reading at page 50 but I believe this is not at all a good book to read if you want to learn about Japanese culture. As a Japanese born and raised in Japan I find this book extremely humiliating.
There is no one experience that could somehow describe them all. I didn't find the book very interesting, nor would I recommend it as reading for those who are going to go on the JET Programme sometime in the future. In fact, I recommend you read very little of the 'foreigner does Japan' genre and stick with facts, figures and Japanese language. And basics of English language teaching. Believe me, you will enjoy your 1-3 years in isolation and miscommunication without your head full of pop-anthropological nonsense and you will come to know your full self.
I was very disappointed in this book. I have lived in Japan for 6 years (and still do), married and taught on the JET Programme. As a former JET I was disheartened as this book does not paint an accurate picture of life in Japan as a JET. Granted people's experiences differ from prefecture to prefecture and from school to school, but Learning to Bow's anecdotes and observations about Japan are far too extreme and at times border on lies. Also the frequent use of sarcasm and satire is not in anyway humorous and portrays the author as "god's gift to English teaching". For anyone curious about life on the JET Programme, teaching English in Japan or life in Japan in general, I do not recommend this book.
It is extremely meandering and never seems to end. It's all about atmosphere and erotic cool and Prague, etc., but at some point a car chase would really liven things up. How about some more nipples? Throw a pie in Juliet Binoche's face? Anything! Just stop wandering around, muttering to yourself like a half-wit.Perhaps I don't get it, but I don't get syphillis either and I'm the better for it. Where's your witty rejoinder to that?!A real test of patience, this film.
This movie is the lamest peice of pseudo-intellectual crap I have ever seen. It is painfully self-serious and a major bore. This is porn for those who would never confess that they watch porn. If you want to see a good movie about human relations, go get "Besieged" by Bertolucci.
This movie is about nothing but nudity and sex scenes! In the first hour or so there is hardly any dialogue... just a nude scene after another. The only main dailogue is "Take off your cloth." And personally I don't consider this as a dialogue either.I didn't see the love story in this movie... no honest expressions. Just a man who lives a play boy life. I found this movie very boring and I even had to forward many of the sex scenes that I couldn't stand any further!Maybe if this movie had a dialogue, it would have made sense! Maybe if it was shorter! Maybe if there was less sex scenese! Maybe if there was a better (senseful) ending..!
I didn't too sure about this. It was on special movie channel so I gave it a listen. All that happened were people in not many clothes (was the movie at the Beach??) looking sad most times. Also there was a hat. While I watched all I kept thinking was about other things like drinking water that were more exciting. I notice near the ending that the man in the movie was the angry man from the gangrene movie - I almost lost him because he was so different! In the other movie he was mean; here he was just bored or looked like he was looking at something very far aways. He didn't talk much but was a doctor so I guess he is smart. There is a car crash in the snow near the end, but I don't think that was a learning part. The movie is like watching the home films from vacations when you are at boring cousin house, or shows on the public channels. Drink water for more fun - or watch with pillows!!! One sleepy star this time! (wait: there are pretty girls in here, so be careful watching!)
Kundera's novel The Unbearable Lightness of Being is absolutely amazing, and this film falls so far short of it. Despite my almost-immediate dislike of the film, I actually stuck it out and watched the entire thing (hoping that Daniel Day-Lewis could somehow salvage it or that the film might actually express some idea from Kundera's book). But I was sorely disappointed.But please read Kundera's novel, because it is wonderful. I can't help but think that Kundera was referring to this film when he wrote in his later novel Immortality: "The present era grabs everything that was ever written in order to transform it into films, TV programs, or cartoons. What is essential in a novel is precisely what can only be expressed in a novel, and so every adaptation contains nothing but the nonessential."
I am sorry, but I just can't agree with the reviewers who praise this piece of work. It was so boring that I had it running while I did other things around the house (that was after I actually watched the first 80 minutes). I guess I just don't relate to guys who are constantly "bedding" every girl that walks past them. Where is the art? The depth? The complexity? Sorry, it was lost on me. I totally agree with the reviewer who said it was about two sad-looking people. I mean the guys is a heel. What happened to being faithfull. Ok, I know its Prague and 1968 and the whole Russian-thing, but come on - the historical backdrop was handled way too superficially. Where is the depth? Lewis is a fine actor, but the material is not the most exciting or throught-provoking. There, I've shot my wad and now I am gonna list the movie for sale for someone who can appreciate it more than me. Bye.
This is written by a 43 year old male who is a true film fanatic. I love all the great directors- Spielberg, Hitchcock, Wilder, Kubrick, Landis, Scorsese, etc. etc."The Unbearable Lightness of Being" was one, if not the most tedious films, I have ever had to endure. Why is it so talked about is beyond me unless, there is nothing definable to discuss. The scenery was bland, dialogue uninteresting and unengaging, even the shots were dull.It's the first film I ever returned to Amazon...ever.When I took Cinema History in College, the Professors I had kept talking about this film as a "must see/ will change your life" sort of thing. Curious, as we never saw it in class (must have been the explicit erotic nature it has at times). Now I think they wanted the girls in the class to see it on their own, because they may have wanted to discuss it with them personally after the class was dismissed, if you catch my drift.I would pass on this one-big time.
The movie was fine to watch but it was so different from the book. I told my father all about the book so he decided to rent the movie from the library and watch it with me. Big mistake. In the film the sex scenes came off as standard sex scenes. In the book there is a strong focus on the involved parties thoughts and motivations. Void of philosophy and psychology.
The movie doesn't at all reflect the original book story in its core concept. If I didn't read the book before I wouldn't be able to guess what is the movie trying to explain. I doubt anybody, based on the movie only, would be able to understand what happend in 1968 in the Czech republic and what was the consequence for the entire society.
Making my comparison to Milan Kundera's book, I have to rate this movie fairly low. I don't believe Kaufman was able to capture the essence of Kundera's writing with this film representation. So much of Kundera's writing is internal to the characters, which is difficult (at best) to communicate on screen. Unfortunately, this is the richest part of the experience; I recommend the book, but found the movie decidedly unsatisfying.
This is well acted, beautifully filmed...and pretentious exitentialist tripe. There's a difference between TRYING to be deep and serious, and being deep and serious. This movie doesn't know the difference. Long and slow.
Okay, folks. Let's get real. This movie/book is essentially about the insipid sexuality of three spoiled brats with soulful eyes, zero body fat, and no moral compasses. Worst of all, there's no search for the compasses. Why is this exhibition of unbridled existential selfishness so popular? Because the protagonists are European-and "misunderstood" quasi-intellectuals to boot. Translation: culturally paranoid Yanks just eat this kind of lean cuisine right up. If you're the type who likes being hungry 15 minutes after eating, don't miss this movie or "The Sheltering Sky," mind-numbing fare featuring filthy rich American "seekers" ransacking the blistering desert (or desert tray) for spiritual bargains that won't make them too heavy with self knowledge.
Basically, it goes like this, Eastern European intellects survive by being in constant angst and having lots of sex. At the end, of what seems frigging hours and hours of self-loathing, when they finally find happiness, they all die in a truck accident.
While a big Hendrix fan, as well as a fan of bluegrass - I was NOT impressed with this album. While the "bluegrass" was acceptable, it was a big stretch to extract the "hendrix" from what I was hearing. If you want a good Hendrix tribute album, try "Stone Free: A Tribute to Jimi Hendrix" (1993). You want a good bluegrass album? Try Seldom Scene.Overall, a nice concept gone terribly awry.
I used this cutting board in my sewing class and loved it. No odor at all from the one in class.I got my mat and it smelled as though I had hit a skunk. My husband made me put it on the back porch. Then I learned that a friend of mine had one for 8 months and hers still stinks. Her husband won't let her use it inside. I went online and read that others had found the same odor problem from these Olfa mats. Some said that the smell diminished after a few weeks but others said it has never stopped stinking.I e-mailed the Olfa distributor to ask if the company has other suggestions. I may just have to send it back.Great cutting mat if you don't mind a strong toxic smell.
Man Kzin Wars IX has four stories. The lead story by Poul Anderson is OLD, a repeat from another in the series. However, neither the Amazon entry nor the book itself make note of this; the publisher's dishonesty here is a real shame. The other three stories vary in quality, but at least two are good enough for this to be worthwhile in paperback next year.The one star rating reflects my poor opinion of repeated material with no warning. It probably would rate 3 stars otherwise. BTW, I am an old Niven fan, have read all his SF multiple times, and have read all of the Man-Kzin series.Amazon's automated machinery, or a hurried employee, has mixed in a bunch of reviews here that apply to other books in the series. It's too bad, but I've seem them mix up numbered series before. (See World Radio TV Handbook which is an annual series; they were selling the 2000 edition at a small discount to those who bought the 2002 edition!)
After a long hiatus from the Man-Kzin wars, I purchased the Man-Kzin Wars IX. The stories in M-K Wars IX were average at best. Of the 4 stories, the murder mystery was my favorite. The story about the crippled Kzin's last stand started well but deteriorated into a long-winded mutual admiration fest between the antagonists during the battle for Wunderland's liberation. It made as much sense as the Russians negotiating with and praising the positive qualities of the bunkered Germans during the battle for Berlin. The last story needed a good editor to clean it up, especially the beginning, and make it more coherent. IMO, this book is not worth buying and inferior to its predecessors.
I bought this book because of the reviews and am shocked at how one can become an author by simply stealing life experiences and stories from other peoples lives. I felt the book was shallow and was perfect for people who couldn't think for themselves. Any human being with half a brain can see through the empty content of this book.
This is the only official history of the giant utility that serves most of northern and central California. Written in 1950, when the company (and its official biographer) were heedless of the changes that the future held in store for the energy industry overall (and utilities in particular) as well as for the end of unbridled growth and development in the state of California. Coleman is a real booster for PG&E. If you want the PR line, from the generation that build the company between 1930 and the 1950, this is the reference book you want.
I was installing these chips in a G4 Sawtooth macintosh computer and the chips did not work. I had kernel panics that eventually left the operating system unusable. The hard drive had to be reformatted and the OS re-installed. A great headache and PITA. I need to return these memory modules, how would I do that.best regards,vilppu
Music from the 30's and very nostalgic. My father played with this band when he was still in college in 1934.
This book is a continuation of Shore Lights, and follows the same characters as they now prepare for the wedding of Maddy DiFalco and Aiden O'Malley. I'm not sure why this book was necessary, because it didn't further the relationship, didn't end with the wedding, and was filled with family squabbles and bickering. I 'think' Bretton is setting us up for a story about Claire and her own love life, but I don't think it'd be very interesting based upon her character in this book. The story contained a lot of in-fighting between family members, lots of bad blood between relations and future relations, and turned a great character (Kelly O'Malley) into a bad one for the sake of the storyline. Actually, the story was quite dependant upon Kelly and her life to propel the action. I wouldn't recommend this book - it's a family drama with no romance. No romance, no sincere story, and a lot of drivel.
I ordered the samples of this product because I was interested in trying the sulphate free shampoo, which is expensive. The samples are REALLY random, so you may not get ones you actually wanted to try. Most of the ones I got were things I wasn't interested in. And I didn't get the shampoo sample. They say you can return it for a refund, less shipping and handling, but the shipping and handling were double the cost of the product itself.
I read this book and concluded that I am angry at myself for having read it. Pilots like to read about accidents hoping to study a case and avoid the same mistakes. After wasting your time with worthless and mediocre family stories and the well known government incompetence, you end up with the empty conclusion that a good pilot, in good health, all current and confident ditched in the stormy ocean at night and disappeared. None of the worthless stories or ILS text in this book provides any conclusion or lesson to be learned. A line from Billy Madison comes to mind: "you are now all dumber after hearing this story". In fact the only intelligent thought comes from an opinion of a reader that raises the theory that Ron S. used a GPS approach rather than ILS and that proved fatal.
I bought this book thinking that I would learn something or at least be given food for thought. What I got is a bad travelogue full of inane information about restaurants where the author ate, people he met, what he wore. There is nothing there for a serious or even amateur scholar. Just junk.
I've read "On The Road" three times over the last six years. It is, in my opinion, a masterpiece. Having said that I decided to get "Dharma Bums" and I did not care for most of the book as I am not into Buddha and zen. Only once in a while a glimmer of the fun of "On The Road" seeped in, but not enough.I also did not like the supporting characters as I did in "On The Road."This book was pushed by many people as Kerouac's second best. I found it to be uninteresting and probably should not pursue any other of his books if this was considered "his second best."
Ok. Let's talk like ordinary people. If you are someone who has to buy a new TV unless you have one, only because the TV is more modern this is your book. If you've read "ON THE ROAD", maybe you'll want read something diferent. This is the same book, the same drama, the same wasted money. Can this book change your life?? Yes, but also a stone at high speed could do it also and in less time. Ally McBeal or a Backstreet boys song have more message than this book.
I tried to give Kerouac a chance to revive himself after reading his most notable mess 'On the Road.' Now I'm thoroughly confused as to why he's so popular.
Maybe I am not as enlightened as all of you, but I don't think this book is all that great. Kerouac is often completely incoherent. Much of what is said is nonsense. Further more I don't understand why everyone wants to be a Dharma Bum, they are nothing but leaches living off what others earn. It is a decent read, especially the mountain climbing scene, but not as great as some make it out to be, definitely not life changing.
One might expect an interesting, down-to-earth account of one poet's buddhist discoveries and spiritual growth, but this wasn't done right: the characters are one-dimensional, contrived, and act like buddhist wanna-bes. (Is a person a real Buddhist if he is proud of his Buddhism?)What was a powerful and introspective journey for Kerouac, is not for the reader. I can tell that it's there, but Kerouac just doesn't get it all the way across. I found myself rolling my eyes, but still trying to give him the benefit of the doubt.If this will be your first Kerouac read, as it was for me, choose something else or it may forever turn you off to Kerouac, who could be an otherwise fabulous story-teller.If he is, let me know.
I found Dharma Bums suprising. I thought On the Road was one of the most rambling, self-indulgent books that I've ever read, but I realized that Dharma Bums is even more so. The book reminded me how the degeneration of American intellectual life began with the Beats who, at least when they were in the '50's, were self-rightous and shallow, not to mention drunk womanizers, an odd trait for devout Buddhists. This book is a cultural artifact from the Beat era, but not a book to add to one's must-read list. Life is short. Read better.
OK, I know this is a beat classic, and it was written by Jack Kerouac the patron saint of beat literature. But I gotta say this novel was pretty damn boring.Dhama Bums is another semi-fictional novel based on real events that occurred in Kerouac's life after the events described in On the Road. It's about Kerouac's search for a simple life and Zen Buddhism. The premise sounds interesting enough, but for me it just didn't have anything to offer.I once described Kerouac's classic On The Road as being like an episode of Seinfeld, a show about nothing. Despite the rather non complimentary comparison I thought that novel was very good and I highly recommended it.Dharma Bums was another meandering novel where nothing really happens. I guess one meandering trip for me was enough. As far learning anything about Buddhism through the novel, my guess is that you would learn more from a real Buddhist like the Dalai Lama than a wannabee like Kerouac.
Not much dharma going on here. But lots of bum. In fact, I'm totally bummed out finishing this novel because now I feel very uncool to not be enamoured with this bible of the beat generation but I, just, don't, get, it. So much rambling! Excruciatingly long sentences perfunctorily reporting things as they happen in the style of `then he said this and then I picked that up and then she went outside...' [Insert yawn here]. There are glimpses of good authorship in some parts of the novel but for the most part it is unbelievably boring with a monotonic narrator's voice that had me re-discovering my speed-reading skills just to finish the thing. Disappointing because I love a good story and I love Eastern philosophy but this is neither. Unless you're an impressionable teenager who thinks bumming around is cool and everything your friends think is cool, and anything indie is cool, forget it.
At first this printer worked well, but after a year it is nothing but trouble.To begin with, you can't print more than 4-5 pages before the "page grabber" will start to grab more than one sheet of paper at a time, and the text ends up going across both of them.Then there is the printer driver, which is also not up to par -- where is the manual two sided printing that has been in the classic Mac OS for all of these years?In short, this was my last HP printer. The jamming paper feed is too much for me to handle.
There's no question on the importance of Hodge's book. But this $3 Kindle edition is simply scanned with OCR and is almost worthless. It would have been far easier to read it in simple image form.
My negative comments have nothing to do with the content as Hodge wrote it, which is excellent. But the quality of the Kindle edition is very poor. The OCR scan has resulted in unintelligible words in almost every paragraph, and the lack of links in the table of contents severely limits the usefulness as a reference source. It's not completely useless; in general I can find what I'm looking for and make sense out of the text. So for 99 cents I suppose I'm getting my money's worth. But an edition of better quality would be most welcome.
This kindle version is not worth the money, even if very cheap. It is a poor uncorrected ocr scan. It is unreadable and unusable. Find a cleaner edition. This is a rip-off.
The usual action scenes, but ridiculous plot holes. The vast majority of the plot points made no sense whatsoever, I think Michael Bay is trying to make the worst possible movie that still makes millions of dollars.
mediocre at best Story line was bad; dry and predictable only action scenes drew interest. they used one liners from previous movies.
I wish I hadn't spent the money . . .It follows in the same style as the other two Transformers movies, but it turns the formula up a bit. There's more action and more bickering between characters, but plot, story and character development, drama, and any semblance of intelligence are sacrificed for it.Yes, the special effects are cool, but the dialog and interaction between characters is downright painful, which kept suspension of disbelief from kicking in.If I had it to do over again, I'd rent this one.
As you have read, wait for the deluxe version later in the year. So for now, just rent it for now!!!
I made the mistake of buying this version. But luckily I didn't open it once I got home, so I was able to return it today. I'm not going to fall for the same money trap again(Avatar). I'll just wait a few months and get the Special Edition one with all the extra features.Now me just ranting here for a bit. But what the hell Paramount, I know times are tough for everyone but do you have to do this to us. Trying to rip off the loyal customers is not good business.
UPON leaving my 9 year old insised to know EXCATLY what was happening in the bathroom stall?SPOUSE was blank .... I hummed and hawwed .....IS THAT SEQUENCE ABSOLUTELY REQUIRED?
Its just thye movie with no special features.I made the mistake of buying it. Had i known i would have never bought it. Avoid wait till the special features come out.
These transformer movies are horrible. The special effects are the only good thing about these movies. The actors, especially the main actor have drab storylines, stupid dialogue, and the transformer voices are poor. Unless you're a kid, this movie is not for you.
i was really looking forward to the new movie i was so mad when i found out that megan fox got booted i knew that it would be hard to replace her not cuz shes beautiful but storyline wiseman they really messed things up in this one its sooo diff story wise than other towfirst off i hate the girl in it yeah shes hot but she doesnt fit in megan was a poor hot girl didnt mind getting dirty or fighting this girl is spoiled rich girl afraid to break a nail type and theres no background really to there love so were suppose to believe hes so head over heals he wants to marry her?also her acting really sucked and so did sha laboufs i thought he was on speed the whole movie talked way to fast and way overly drmaticthe beginging to middle of the movie was lame they tried way to hard to make it funny when what made transformers so great the first two times was that it was almost like unentional jokeshowvere the middle to end of the movie was excellent
This is a good movie. Just stay away from this version. I was excited and bought it on release day only to find out that it is just the feature film. I was really disappointed. I would never have purchased this movie if I had known that it was the feature only. Yes, I know, in my excitement to get the movie, it was my own fault for not looking carefully at the back of the box, although, nowhere could I find that it says feature film only. I used to download movies illegally. I stopped and started buying them legit again because the special features are really enjoyable. When the companies charge full price for the feature only (which i can get from netflix anyway), I feel cheated. Maybe everyone should start downloading illegally and really send hollywood or whoever a message that if they want our hard earned money they need to work a little harder for it. This is just my rant.
(SORRY...THIS IS FOR BLU-RAY, NOT AMAZON INSTANT VIDEO) Would have given 4 stars for the movie/blu-ray, but I was very disappointed there were no special features at all - not even notes. That's the main reason I like DVDs and blu-rays so much...for the special features that may contain commentary, interviews, behind the scenes and show how some of the FX were done - explosions and such. I'm sure they will release another version in the near future with the special features movie buffs enjoy and spend more cash$ Who the hell comes out with a new release Blu-ray in this day & age with ZERO special features??? DO NOT BUY - RENT FROM RED BOX.
Dont give money to these filmakers that later on down the road release a better version of the same movie..If you want extra features this version WILL NOT have it on the disc!! Wait for the deluxe version!
Ok so I heard that this was better than the last Transformers (didn't see that one), so I thought it must be ok. It's got to be one of the worst movies I've ever seen. Horrible acting, not sure why Shia LaBeouf is an actor...think Matthew McConaughey and Ben Affleck, but without the charisma. If you are into cartoons,explosions and superficial story telling then it might be palatable for you....otherwise you'd be better off watching the grass grow.
who is on crack that they think any movie is worth 42 dollars 3D or not. This is just another scam like with cell companies and internet providers charging for data like there is some limited amount that isnt self imposed. The technology is not so overwhelming in RD to cost 4 times that of dvd and twice that of blu ray.Dont get me wrong love 3D and this was one of the best 3D movies I have seen but honestly 42 dollars just is taking advantage of consumers in a market that has no where else to go. If this disk was 30 bucks Id by it hesitantly but thats the problem with blu ray they charge way to much for the theatre experience. Sad too cause this movie and captain america are ones i would have bought but i refuse to let them think this is a good going price for the gimmick.
i just got one word this movie blows one of the worst movies i have seen in a long time the first part of the movie put my wife to sleep. any body who reads this it is not even take the time our the money to by this movie
This film is like a teenager with short attention span. Storytelling is like facebooking.Too many plots to cover, horrible pacing, no depth.
I guess i should have done more research before i bought this. I enjoy the transformers franchise and even though i feel like the 2nd and 3rd movie will never live up to the quality of the 1st I enjoyed this one enough to decide to buy this bluray/dvd hoping that the blu ray format and additional special features would keep me entertained. Well when you put the movie in you are treated to; the movie, different audio languages, and nothing no commentary, behind the scenes, deleted scenes,etc.......If you want nothing but a movie buy it off itunes or something, I'd recommend getting the other special edition version that i learned about after I already bought this one
Let's start out with the film. I would say that this Transformers film rivals the first one in quality. It's really that good. I would give it a solid four out of five. This was the first film that I had seen in IMAX 3-D after returning to the states from being stationed overseas. I was completely blown away with the 3-D effects and sound. However, I feel as if I have been duped by Paramount in that when I opened my blu-ray combo pack there was a 5 or 10 dollar off coupon for the Transformers: Dark of the Moon 3-D, Blu-ray/DVD+ Digital Copy! I know that the studio is trying to squeeze every dollar they can out of us, but come on! They probably had the 3-D version ready but wanted to milk us some more. I would not recommend buying this version and waiting on the newer one scheduled to release soon.So to summarize:Film- 4Shady Blu-ray release business practices- 1 (negative if I could)
I really liked the first one, and the second one was okay too. But Dark of the Moon was difficult to sit through for me. Endless dialogue with minimal action sequences, I found myself looking at the time far too often. They dropped Meghan Fox, who despite her controversial reputation, definitely added to the cast. The special effects are still amazing, but there just wasn't enough action. BORING!!! If they are going to continue with this franchise they had better turn it up a few notches.
If you like any special features at all do not buy this version. They are doing the same thing as Avatar. This release gets a full price but absolutely zero special features. Not so much as a trailer. They will be putting out deluxe versions toward the end of the year including a 3D combo pack, blu ray combo pack & dvd. ALL will be packed & you will kick yourself for having to buy this a second time. Many people don't care about features but if you do consider yourself forewarned. And it's not like they're giving you a cut on the price for a "movie only" release.
Digital copy expired 2 months ago so unable to put it on ipad. Would not have bought if i knew the digital copy wasnt included
Ugh! What a steaming pile of predictability this movie was. At least I didn't pay to see it and was able to read a software tech manual while "watching" this. The plot is thinner than the paper it was written on and the acting, well its typical Michael Bay which means you can see more believable productions at you local high school. It was easily an hour too long and the special effect have been used hundreds before. I think the saddest part was hearing Lenard Nimoy as Optimus Sentimental, I mean Sentinel. Gratuitous sci-fi pandering at it's lowest.
I used the search window using "3-d movies" as the criteria and this movie popped up along with dozens of other 3-d movies, but when I received it, I realized I had not read the description close enough to see that this movie was NOT 3-d. Amazon-please don't place 2-d movies selections in with the 3-d ones! I had to pay $2.98 to return an item that shouldn't have been offered in a search of 3-d movie selections. Ouch. All in all I love Amazon, but I'll be more careful in the future. My bad.
Standard Michael Bay garbage. Totally removed from the original idea, especially concerning Optimus Prime's character. The ideals the character originally stood for are completely ignored in favor of kill shots and 'Murican tough guy crap.
continuity was not there, story line was unknown. so unrealistic, non continuous, special effect show that even that was no good.
Two of these movies was plenty. The hot girl was so ridiculously hot as to be unbelievable and not in a good way.
I don't even remember the plot, the resolution, or much else about this. However, I also don't remember it being painfully bad as the previous installment was. You should not go out of your way to watch this, but there are worse movies.
I got dizzy watching the machines transform. I only watched the movie to see Chicago, because I live there. Needless to say, I did not like this movie.
It takes more than special effects to make a movie. The first film was good, the 2nd one mostly decent, but this was unadulterated, predictable, garbage, full of bad acting eye candy. The heroine of this tale couldn't find a coherent sentence with a conjunctive map. Should have stuck with Megan Fox. At least she had some real attitude.
When I saw a review giving this movie 0 out of 5 (the 3rd time this respected source has ever done so), I should have listened. If 2 had plot holes, 3 has plot chasms. There is no story. A few special effects can not redeem such gaping wounds that make up the rest of the film (plot, charisma, fan service). Michael Bay really needs to stop raping people's childhoods (a la South Park George Lucas style).Go watch the '86 animated film instead and save yourself the excruciating pain that is The Dark Side of the Moon (and I'm not talking Pink Floyd).
and a complete waste of electricity. Michael Bay has not been hungry for years, therein lies the problem. Let's see what happens in the inevitable sequel.
Crap, crap, crap. Bad acting, big explosions, and video game CGI a good movie does not make. Like a 2 hour Hasbro toy commercial. This film made Star Wars Episode 1 with Jar Jar Binks seem like an Academy Award worthy film. And I'm a Superhero/Godzilla/Monster geek...this is just awful...terrible. At least the first one was semi-watchable--and where's Megan Fox? That would have been the only redeeming quality in this junk-fest...I mean alien robots who change into cars and trucks??? It's a movie based on a TOY for God's sake! A bad toy made into an even worse film. Avoid like The Plague.
Bad acting and a cheap love story make this one of the worst Transformers movie to date. I wish the Transformers movies would focus more on the actual transformers of the movie instead of a bad love story. I remember Transformers the animated movie was all about the transformers and didn't try to focus too much on the humans and their problems. The fight with Megatron was epic and Unicron was an amazing villain. And the rivalry between Skyscream and Megatron made for an interesting plots on the decepticon side. The exploration and fights on the distant planets was fun and exciting. My suggestion to make this movie great instead of bad or mediocre is to fire all the bad actors and do a movie strictly about the transformers and their backgrounds. Or simply remake the animated movie into an actual motion picture.
very disappointing. The plot for sam was really lame, the woman they got for his fiance was the worst actress ive ever seen. pretty sure its because she is a model and doesnt know the first thing about acting. the movie was ok as an action movie but if you buy this expecting something on par with the first two movies you will be sadly disappointed.
Very disappointed with this purchase. I bought this based on product details on Amazon which listed special features and extras - a major reason for my choice. There is only the movie on bluray and DVD. Please correct item details Amazon.
I love to see the Transformers in movies but I will never get the time back that I spent watching this movie. Good actors in a crap movie do not make a good movie. Fantastic special effects do not make a good movie. A well written story and characters that you care about make a good movie.
I had low expectations and they still weren't met. My only satisfaction is that I didn't have to pay to see it on Amazon Instant Video but I'll never get my time back. Seriously, this movie has redefined LAME; bad acting, bad editing, bad script. If it weren't for the two little fuzzbots, it would have been a total loss. The "stars" who did this film must have had a bad round of luck in Vegas and desparately needed the money. Don't waste 2.5 hours of your life on this, especially when there is so much other less crappy stuff to watch!
The special effects (and the fact that I am from Chicago) were the only things about this movie that I liked. The story was dumb and the acting SUCKED!! I can only recommend this for someone who has absolutely nothing else to do and doesn't mind sacrificing a couple of hours.
This rated as one of the worst movies that I have ever see. I found it to be a total waste of my time. Unless you are a devoted Transformers Fan that must see or have all things Transformers stay away from this movie.
I did a search for 3d movies on Amazon instant video and this movie came up, but when I purchased it I was disapointed to see that it wasn't 3d. I am writing this review without watching more than 5 minutes of the movie so it's not that the movie is bad. Amazon needs to re-label their 3d movie selection.
Less of a plot than the first movies. Fell asleep twice watching it, despite all the explosions....Seems like the writers may be running out of ideas
It only took me about 15 minutes. These Transformers movies keep getting more expensive and equally more ridiculous. The first one was charming and really funny, especially the first half. The humor reminded me of Armageddon. I actually liked Shia LaBeouf back then. This one tries way too hard in every aspect and fails in almost all of them. I understand these movies are not to be taken too seriously (I mean this is one step up from Power Rangers), but this movie could've been presented much better.The only reason I'm not giving one star is because the special effects and action sequences were exciting at times.
This is a disappointing film. The first two films managed to include a story with the special effects. This one didn't really bother. Mind numbing, and in a bad way.
Lots of loud noise and quick movements. Just the kinds of things that monkeys and idiots enjoy. Please...for the love of God, do not make another sequel. This movie really sucked!
20 dollars and 2 1/2 hours I can never get back. I was disappointed by this movie I am actually embarrassed I bought it last Friday when it came out. My kids were so excited but after 2 hours even they had enough. During the scene where the building is crashing down My 9 year old asked What did Optimus Prime go on a lunch break? Once he did show up he made short work of the bad guys. The action scenes were amazing at first but became boring and tedious real fast. Shia LeBeouf is awful, his stupid jokes always seemed to come at the most inappropriate times. John Turturro's character may be the most stupid, intelligent character in a movie ever. No character development, no real emotion and Transformers that in many scenes never even fought back. If you have to rent it skip the first 45 minutes, but don't buy it it's just not worth it.
Just got this Blu Ray and just found out there is no DTS sound unlike what the description says on Amazon. Wait for the better version!
THis company advertised this as a 3D movie. When I received it it was only a Blu-ray. They told me I would have to ship it back to them to prove it. I was very upset and they are horribel to work with.
There's so much to say about what's dumb about this movie, but it has one thing going for it: pretty colors flickering fast. A great movie when you want to give your brain a rest. Best viewed on mute.
I know it sounds hard to believe, this movie being so loud and "spectacular," but I was just so bored by the giant gizmos shooting at each other again, I fell asleep.
The nicest thing I can say about this movie is it is really bad. There's talent to burn in the cast but they should have burned the script instead. The script is so terrible it makes "Never Too Young To Die" look Oscar-worthy. Rosie Huntington is like a blonded Megan Fox but without the charm or gravitas (which Ms. Fox isn't exactly awash in either so you can tell how wooden her replacement is). The movie is actually painful to watch for teh first 2/3 but at least some of the action scenes in the final third are cool enough to make it not a total loss.
Someone needs to stop Michael Bay. Seriously. This pile of festering rot is the latest in his neverending assault on one of the most popular and well-loved series from the 80s. I honestly don't think I could have hated this movie more if Bay himself had personally kicked me in the crotch while peeing on my face as I watched it. The man is arguably a worse director than Uwe Boll, the only noticeable difference being that Bay's films have budgets to speak of. Avoid like the plague.
In a word- horrible. I am a HUGE fan of the first two. Watched the cartoons as a kid, and i really couldn't wait to see this movie. It was horrible. Rambling, incoherent, and unfocused. I missed Megan Fox every minute that pouty, big-lipped female was talking, and fell asleep after 20 minutes.
Like that lame Avatar release, no extras on this either. I saw it in a movie theater and this one is by far, the worst one of the three. And they want to milk it for what it's worth? How can you milk it, when it is a pretty bad movie? Stay away, unless you are a true die hard fan.
This DVD does not play well at all. I wish I would have purchased this elsewhere. The price for this should have been much less to equal the quality.
Why did I buy this thing? Well, I saw a preview and it was great. Make no mistakes, is a good movie if you like machines beating up humans without the humans being make into jelly.The opening was the best in the world. If they had only kept it that way... But no. It desintegrated into pieces. The FXs were fabulous, but you can't make a whole movie out of that.Sorry fans. I was disappointed, but then I'm not a kid anymore, so that's probably the reason.
No surprises left, and a highly predictable plot. But great action scenes and spectacular special effects. Tires hard to reinvigorate the first episode, but lacks the suspense and drama. My 8 years olds got a kick out of it. I got bored.
Absolutely rubbish. Would not feed this film to a dog. Simply not good by any measure. You really ought to find something else to do with your time. Sure wish I did.
This review does not reflect anything about the movie. I pre-ordered this item Sept 22,2011 thinking I was going to get it as soon as it was released. Guess what? It's Oct 3rd and and I'm still waiting. Will update review as soon as get the movie. Update: Finally arrived 4:30pm Oct, 3rd.
I really don't think I would buy the blu ray dvd movie, but when I saw it at an IMAC theater in 3-D, it was increadable. That's the only way to see this movie. Without the 3-D effects, it's not that great.
Well the critics got this one right; Michael Bay was a good director until he got big and lost his perspective. Dirty old man syndrome? Yes, what a joke. I was looking forward to intelligent Sci-Fi and got crap. The reference to Obama in an unreal world was stupid (I came to get away from real world politics). The treatment of the woman in the movie was degrading (glad the other actress bowed out...what a tear down}. It was a shame that the very good actors that came back to do this film had to deal with a totally self-involved director. The animation was excellent but the story was trash. I am soo sorry I spent any money on this film.
Wait for Black Friday or the 3D version to be released,it gonna be like LOTR Bluray all over again.First version Theatrical version(normal length)Second Version Extended Cut
Booooo!Don't buy it because no special features are available but there will by by years end, so another clever studio scheme capitolizing on consumers! Yes, they probably factored per 1 million copies sold - 10 - 60 % will double dip generating a flow revenue for the impatient and believe me 90% of americans are IMPATIENT, so they know they have the rabbit by it's tail! Don't take the blue or red pill on this one!!! No rabbit holes running deep here, just peoples pockets that are succorred into buying the bare-boned Optimus...I hope this truly helps you out, seriously..
I can't believe Hasbro alowed Micheal Bay to butcher this franchise on the big screen! Okay the first one was okay, the second one was pure imature garbage, and Dark of the Moon was meh.... I will say though there are some G1 nods, but not enough, for crying out loud they did a horrible job on Soundwave, and Shockwave, and why did they make Bumblebee such a crazy warrior, for goodness sakes in the G1 series he was a Recon Transformer, not a fighter, because he would always get he's butt kicked! And Starscream getting killed by Sam, really Bay? And of course the human are flat out stupid, crude, cartoonie, and just add to stupidity of the trilogy! And Megatron is crap in this, they make him look like a sad lost puppy in ROTF, and DOTM, and Alpha Trion (excuse me SENTINEL PRIME) was never on the Ark! And Alpha Trion was never a Prime! They should rename this trilogy, BayFormers!
Some really nice animation and some segments that held my interest for minutes at a time, but mostly disjointed and tiresome. The talented cast improves the quality of the film, but not a lot.
I recorded this movie from freebie I got from dishNetwork and wow what a let down, Acting has really takening a nose drive on this one. Way to many actors in it many of them were flat out goofy and love interest has way to much collagen in her lips makes her look like she has a hockey puck in them and she came across as blond bimbo. Dialogs,talking was to fast and hard to follow way to much mumbling and confusion going on. Makes me glad I did not shell out some cash for see this dog. Hasbro should be ashamed to have their name link to it. Lastly hang on to your money you will find it at here or at some other Online store for less than price of a movie ticket.
The special effects are what you expect from the Transformers series, but the story line also is unfortunately what you expect. It's just more of the same disjumbled events getting thrown together. Some parts of the movie flow well, and others are just plain ridiculous. It's past time the writers & director for this series either move on or grow up and quit turning every scene into some kind of teenage behavioral prank. They've done the bumbling parents, the stuttering idiot Witwicky kid, the jive talking robots, and the goofball super secret ex-agent to death already. How about having grown adults who are fighting for the planet's survival actually act like it?
I am glad I watched someone else's movie before I spent money on this lousy thing. I will always be on my do not buy list. Rose what's her name is not worth seeing in the movie. It would have been better without her all together. And she didn't hold a candle to Megan Fox. I did like the FIRST TWO movies but this one is a total waste. Boring from the word go other than some things about Kennedy and the early space program. It would have been better as a cartoon. If they come out with another one, I will not be spending any money on it. This one was so boring during the middle of it I about fell asleep.I would not waste the money on it, just borrow someone else's movie and save your money for a good movie.Oh and I might give it a 2.5/10 but since this is on a 5 scale it only gets a 1 and I would have given the other 2 movies a 4/5.
The movie wouldn't play steadily. I had to watch this on Netflix later.An error kept popping up saying my internet connection wasn't fast enough to play the movie.My internet connection was fine. I had watched movies before and after, and when I checked online with Amazon's customer service page, I more than all the minimum requirements.This is the first time I've had problems streaming with Amazon, but it was awful. Every 10-15, the movie would stop and pop up the error message. I tried restarting the app, restarting my PS3, and no luck.
Not recommended for children and not even teenagers.Poor story.Nothing new or interesting.I was expecting something better.Dissapointed.
Man, I wanted to like this movie. I'm a big sci-fi fan. I do not think revenge of the fallen was as bad as people say it was, I even enjoyed the first transformers, but this. Oh-my-gosh. What a piece of garbage. I rate this down there with Avatar (the movie version of the nickelodeon cartoon, also a fan, huge let down).I am very forgiving of sci fi movies as I do not expect much in the way of plot/story line. I am a big fan of cool special effects, but this was so corny, cliche and chock full of redone and rewritten old jokes and plagarized scenes, that even I could not take this. I am becoming angry even now, while writing this.20$ for this piece of copro-cinematic excrement is $19.50 too much!!!!
First, the movie has incredible special effects, but the script and acting are horrible. However, the real problem with this package is that the disc does not have any special features!
Oh please... this movie doesn't tell a story so much as show off special effects and replay platitudes. Should've left well-enough alnoe instead of making this far-too-long sequel.
The plot was terrible. The acting was terrible. The effects were as good as the other ones. If you want to see pure action without any story, then enjoy. Otherwise...it was a complete waste of time.
Bought this after the Digital Copy expiration date had elapsed. Nothing on the Amazon site indicates the expiration date. The package has this warning on both the outside and inside. Amazon offered a full refund. That's a stand up company in my opinion.
This was suppose to be such a great movie and it fell very short of all the expectations I had. I have been a huge fan of transformers since they came out in the early 80's. It's sad to think this could be the end of them on the big screen. I hope they redeem themselves by doing a 4th installment. Bring in Hot Rod and Ultra Magnus from the original series. I for one hope they don't end on such a poor film. I was very disappointed! As hard as that is to say. It was really bad.
I liked and enjoyed the effects but that's about everything entertaining about this movie. The quality (blue ray on ps3) is pretty bad ass.Story line is very mediocre and no depth at all. The acting was sad at times.And most importantly I missed Megan Fox, someting just wasn't right with the new big upper lip girl. Maybe with Megan it would have been a better movie? Guess we will never know.
They need to get a new director and new script writer.. They just keep getting worse and worse.. Get rid of the Witwicky's.. It was funny the 1st time,now everything is just drawn out.. I never saw it in the theater and just bought it on blu ray.. I'm regretting it.. I don't understand why they don't use the original voice for Megatron.. I won't watch another one.. They should add the Dinobots,and make Devastater like in the cartoons,5 robots merged into a giant one,not a cross between a cement mixer and garbage compactor.. Cmon,what a shame.. It could be so great if someone actually cared about it.
Transformers the Movie (1985) was awesome. But these Transformers look like a pile of garbage throw together. The CGI animation makes everything look like synthetic barf. The Transformers movies need a reboot, where the characters actually look like they are supposed to. And without the worlds worst director Michael Bay. Disgusting. Don't let your kids watch this atrocity.
I went to see this with the hope of getting Revenge of the Fallen's bad taste out of my mouth.Fission MailedWhere to begin? The plot, while being nowhere near as "immature" as ROTF, still suffered from being clogged with too much filler and not making much sense. It's an overlong mess with the CGI eye candy being the only redeeming factor of this film. It's clear that Bay knows how to make a big budget action film with explosions aplenty, but he cannot write a decent script for these movies to save his life. It's not his forté and hasn't been since The Rock. The movie peaks with a huge, final battle in Chicago that is nuts, but you will just be wanting it to be over with by the time it finally takes place. The 3D is well used in spots, but that cannot make up for the fact that almost everything in it is just a letdown. Do not buy unless you really want to complete your collection.
The DVD is not playable since 1 hour 30 minutes, then the picture becomes stopping and going and keeps that way.
Michael Bay movies are meant to be action packed fun cheesy goodness. Which this is. The reason I'm giving this a bad review is because Amazon Instant Prime has edited out parts!! It's a PG13 movie!!!!!! It doesn't need edits! Considering how much we pay a year for Prime, I expect to be able to watch the full movie.
Poorly acted, written and plotted. Sci-fi and action movies are my thing but I couldn't get through this one as it seemed like all involved just "phoned it in". Worst movie I've seen in a long time.
Two dimensional characters, dropped plot-points, flat dialogue, bad acting and an overall story that makes a 1962 comic book look Shakespearean. Michael Bay you ruin everything you touch. And I'm worse for having seen this.
I won't say that this movie doesn't have its moments, just that they are few and far between. And you know those horrible, horrible memories everyone grows up with, the kind that scream "embarrassment" at high volume when, a few years later, you are reminded of the fact that yes, you were stupid enough to say that in front of those people? This movie is chocked full of those moments.
Most of the time you can't tell what you're looking at, everything is so dark and gritty. There are explosions all the time, but I'm not sure why, as nothing seems to get damaged. The Transformers are garbage. Once again, new ones are introduced with no particular reason why I should care, and the movie is quite cavalier about killing fan favorites. The plot is thin (and ridiculous) and has huge plot holes. Bad guys are bad, but the good guys aren't particularly good anymore, as there are a ton of casualties that nobody seems to care about.This movie evoked nothing but a hatred of Michael Bay.
The plot/storyline was not cohesive. The movie is way too long with the characters not really coming to life. Making a movie longer is not making a movie better. In fact, if the movie is weak, making it longer just makes the point even more (painfully) obvious.I kept watching the movie to see if it would improve but unfortunately that was not the case.Maybe DreamWorks will just move on to another project.Save your money if you intend to buy. Better rent and save the rest for a better movie.
I'm a huge Sci-Fi fan I'll watch almost anything once. This is one of those one watch movies. A huge disappointment and not enjoyable at all. The first half of the movie is spent trying to make you lust after Huntington-Whiteley. She is so one dimensional that she's impossible to like, let alone think she's appealing. There was zero chemistry between Huntington-Whiteley and LaBeouf. They wasted half the film trying to show how LaBeouf could be the worst bumbler of all time and how everyone knew it. Somebody in the studio obviously doesn't understand the Sci-Fi audience.
Transformers 3 is seriously a terrible terrible movie. yeah wow cool, special effects that i have seen time and time again, ridiculously long battle scenes that are so incredibly boring they literally make me fall asleep EVERY time i watch them, Terrible story, terrible plot, terrible rendition of classic characters. Why I even gave this movie a third chance is beyond me.
I`ll make it short and come to the point quickly: I think its a shame that Bay is starting milking the cow too by NOT putting the 3D version in this set. Pirates 4, Thor, Tron and so many others included a 3D version. I won`t buy this release and wait (let`s see for how long) for the 3D release. I know many of you hate 3D - I love it on my 65" panasonic and was soooo looking forward for this. just my personal opinion...
A boring Nasa storyline that doesn't make a whole lot of sense to begin with, sam gets a new girlfriend and is trying to find a job, along the way we still have annoying charectors such as the mom, the asian guy, some dumb momments with sam and his boss. movie is too long with no story, no charector development, with no action until the last 40 minutes and this is a 2 and half hour movie. If the robots had fought on the moon I think It would have been more interesting and a different location, instead we get a main villian robot that is not memorable, a repeat of the robots fighting and causing destruction in the city. special effects are amazing but it can't save how poorly written this movie is. its all visual with no substance.
After seeing Revenge of the Fallen,I thought this one would be way better,I thought they would have learned their lesson,but I was wrong.This movie is a 2 1/2 hour snoozefest.I paid 7.50 to see this,what was I thinking.Dont make the same mistake,just wait and rent it.Heres what you do.Rent it,get it home,Fastforward through the first half of the movie,also fastforward through all of the John Malkovich scenes.Then watch the second half,try to determine who the good bots and bad bots are,because theres so many its hard to distinguish.Shias new GF in this movie is super hot but thats not enough to save this movie,It will make hundreds at the box office because of Suckers like me.
The HD streaming always fails...The movie itself was fun to watch and very enjoyable. It would be nice if the streaming quality held up.
Here are the rules: 1) Every time a character says or does something that's supposed to be funny but comes off completely lame instead-take a swig. 2) Every time the movie veers off into some completely random direction that has absolutely nothing what-so-ever to do with anything, take a swig. 3) Every time a transformer does a somersault or twist in the air in slow motion before attacking-take a swig. Follow these simple rules and you'll be bombed 15 minutes in. Seriously. While watching this movie I kept thinking how many millions of dollars were spent to provide us with idiotic jokes about red coffee cups in yellow rooms and effeminate assistants with Russian accents. Every time I see one of these movies, it saddens me. Given the insane visuals-tight, more serious stories could have really made this series into something amazing. Unfortunately that's not the case. At least there's no leg humping in this one. That's something I guess...
if you are like me and like to go through specials features and "making of" documentary, this is not the BD to buy. This is the second time I make the same mistake. The first time I bough Avatar BD when it came out, and it only had the movie nothing else. It is a waste of BD room space to make such releases without having a single special feature. Wait for the Special Edition, full feature, BD release! The movie was fun, but this BD should have been price at $10.00 USD which is the price one pays these day to see just a movie. I will have to wait for the Special Edition, and give my copy to my young daughter who lives with her mom. As I said, the movie is fun, but not the price of this BD, and this will be the last time I make this mistake. I need to be more patient and not fill these mogul movie makers' pocket with our HARD earned MONEY. What do you think? Any opinions?
There are no special features included in this version, which is a big contributing factor why I buy movies in the first place. Very annoying that this bare bones version is being sold at full price. More annoying still is the special features will probably come in the 3D version, which I do not intend on buying.
I have seen four 3D movies on my new 3D TV and this one has been the least exciting as far as its 3D effects. I was disappointed. I am amending this review after watching the movie again. While I did enjoy the 3D version, I felt the 3D effects were subpar. It is still enjoyable to watch and still has the 3D perspective. They don't send things protruding out at you like other 3D movies do. It doesn't have the WOW-factor that other 3D movies have had.
This movie made me naseous. Honestly, not a big Transformer or Bay fan, but this is pretty poor. For the triple digit millions of dollars they threw at this they could have had a more realistic intro- JFK and Nixon computer generated persons throw the shark before the movie even gets the story going. There is no suspension of disbelief built up in this, building off of our hope of talking cars instead of making us believe. Bay's hyperkinetic style makes me feel naseous, even though I like the Bourne movies. There is just no rhyme or reason to anything in these movies. I guess thats ok for some people, but for the rest of us we'll be left wondering why people can spend $600mill on ticket sales for this instead of something with a real heart.
I was very excited to see this movie available on Amazon Prime, but I was disappointed once I started watching. I really couldn't stand Sam's new model girlfriend. She was so annoying and spends most of the film posing and pouting prettily. I was also confused during a lot of the movie and had trouble figuring out who a lot of the Decepticons were because they seemed very similar. Of course, I must admit that maybe it would have been clearer if I had followed more of the Transformers cartoon. Another big flaw was in the long action sequence involving a glass building. There's foreshadowing when the NASA guy announces that they're going to be taking refuge in a glass building. What could possibly go wrong?
Not much of a plot differance from the 2nd one... I saw them film in Chicago in 2010... That was the only cool thing about this movie, the Chicago back drop... Other then that don't buy this unless you saw it and liked it.. If you haven't seen it just rent it!!!!!
30 minutes into it and I'm bored out of my mind. Woe is me "hero", terrible acting, yes it's an action movie, so let's see some action, don't try to wow me with dialog. If you're looking for something to grab your attention, this isn't it. Thankfully I didn't have to pay for the movie.
The Decepticons play the Autobots like a used violin and demostrate Cybertron's AI still has a long way to go. While LaBeouf and Turturro act as if this movie is their character's last episode --- and they really over-act in this movie which is lacks the charm of the original TV cartoon.
i want the 150 minutes of my life back. this is my first probably last movie review. this move was so bad it motivated me to take the time to do my fair share of trashing it a bit
I'm a big fan of Transformers going back to the 1980s cartoons. This movie, like all the other recent ones, do a major disservice to the franchise. But at least it looks good while doing it.
If you've been wondering if our species is ascending or declining watch Transformers. If you haven't been wondering, I would like to take this opportunity to pose an ironic question, "What is it like to be mindless?"
If your 10 years old, then perhaps this is one of your very "bestest" films ever.......but other than that, this is close to being un-watchable for the rest of us. I only viewed it because of Spielberg's direction, but even he couldn't save this pathetic, phony, ridiculous movie. Just not for any person that actually thinks......or even smarter than average cats, dogs or monkeys. Total waste of time.
This movie overall was disappointing. I so liked the first two that I really wanted this one in 3D. This was by far the worst 3D movie I have purchased. The flying paratroopers is the only reason to see this in 3D. This movie as like a very bad opera - it just went on and on and on and on ... so that when it did end you were so thankful it finally got to the inevitable conclusion.
Cheesy, rushed and too much Shia. Bay's twist on this is not liked by me and much better could have been done. But what do I know? The animated movie was excellent compared to this crap and even the games War for Cybertron and the Fall of Cybertron make this movie look bad. Action parts were ok.
I have always had a problem understanding how anything which causes the degree of destruction as does the transformers can be of any merit for the planet. Then there is Shia, he makes me want to hurl every time I see him in these roles. The last thing I liked him in was HOLES.
I've had the P1000 for a couple of years. Worked great with WindowsME. After installing XP on my desktop I had to reinstall the printer software to get it to work. Just got a new laptop and it doesn't work at all.. in fact, the P1000 causes my Dell Inspiron to crash whenever I disconnect the USB cable. When the cable is connected the laptop never recognizes the printer.
I really liked this printer when I first got it about 3 years ago. Sure it was loud and a little slow, but it printed pretty good. Well, after about 1 1/2 years of VERY light duty, I all of a sudden start getting error messages on my PC telling me the printer is not connected to the computer. First I changed the cord to no avail, then I tried different open USB ports on my computer, so it ends up I just have to position the USB cable perfectly to the back of the P1000 to get it to work. At least it would still work, right? Well that got me by for about six months and now it just will not connect at all. Now my HP P1000 has a nice new home in the trashcan and I'm giving Canon a try. If HP puts as much thought into printers as they do computers I definetely don't want to buy another HP product again...
As another reviewer noted these do not pierce cloth well at all so were basically useless for me. I threw them in the trash
It all depends on your purpose for these safety pins. I needed them for holding Velcro in place as the Velcro was pulling apart too easily. These safety pins bent as I tried to stab them into the material. The point is sharp, but the surface is rough. This rough point causes the material to cling to the safety pin rather than allow the pin to pass through easily.I would recommend the Dritz Quilter's Safety Pins. They are Nickel plated which makes them smooth and rust resistant.
For Cena's first movie, it was okay. Lot's of explosives but I really wouldn't recommend the movie. Some okay jokes, and the story line was kind of weak. Typical ransom, give me back my wife type of movie. I recommend that you wait till the movie comes on television, and then decide if you want to buy it or not.
I gave this movie a chance because Robert Patrick was in it. He couldn't give it any justice at all. The action was over the top and unrealistic. The criminals were all cliched especially the African-American criminal. (Don't know why they always have to make African-American characters have a smart mouth, it's too stereotypical) John Cena can't act his way out of a paper bag and he's too damn bulky with his cucumber fingers. The car chase scene with all them bullets hitting the car and Cena is still driving and able to avoid every single bullet. He's hit with multiple objects but still no mark on him. The wife gets knocked the hell out so many times but no bruise on her at all. This movie was ridiculous don't waste your time unless you're a Cena mark.
Oh boy, it seems we have a wannabe Rambo in the house! Seriously this is one of those movies that you gotta watch to laugh at. The movie does have a lot of action scenes,stuff blowing up, people dodging bullets. and none of them are realistic. The good thing this movie boosts is that it doesn't take itself seriously. It has a few of lame one liners, it even breaks the third wall in one sceneThe movie tells the story of a recently discharged marine; he arrives home to begin a new life with his wife. They decide to take a road trip, have a good time together, but his wife gets kidnapped oh noo! Yeah so now Mr. Marine must save her. In the process he beats a lot of bad guys. Anyway it's an okay movie to watch when there's nothing on the teliMY PERSONAL RATING: 2 OUT OF 5
I did not like it very much...bought it because of the fact that my son went to high school with him and thought it would be nice to have. It was not as much action as I thought it would be....a little dull...but not bad for his first...know he will get better as the "Rock" did!!!
first the acting was so so so bad the movie, this is what i have to say ?but they get E for effort.
Lots of action, but totally unbelievable, just like watching wrestling. Amusing enough to watch but not to own.
this movie stinks i hate this movie and this movie has ripped off rambo yes this movie ripped off rambo this movie stinks the director the producers the actors and actresses all stink!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!! this is easily one of the worst movies ever made!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
I gave this movie 1 star for only one reason Kelly Carlson is beautiful,other than that the movie goes as follows,marine gets dishonorably discharged and seems to be ok with it,wife gets kidnaped,he gets beat up,knocked out several times,gets burned,blown up,by the most overdone explosions and walks away without a scratch,this movie is pure hollywood,it was a waste of money and time,you really have to wonder if the producers ever spent any time in the military,I have never met a marine worth his salt that had to go telling everyone (Im a marine), every soldier I have ever known that talks like that was always in some bar fight or some other altercation with someone,It was a laughably stupid movie
Hey Im open to wrestlers acting in movies. The Rock is doing it, Hogan did it for a bit. I did enjoy wwe's other movies but this...this was just plain bad. Cena has to be one of the worst actors to ever get a starring role in a movie released in theaters. Attack of the show's Chris Gore put it at best when he said that they tried to hide the bad acting with a bunch of explosion and action. The storyline itself was bad because well it has already been done a million times before. A guy's girlfriend/wife is kidnapped and he tries to get her back. WWE could have easily found someone better. Skip this movie. In fact do someone a favor, buy the dvd and destroy it so no one would have to witness this horrible movie. I would give it a 0 if I could. Nothing about this movie is good
john cena has to be the worst actor in history, wiht corny quote and stare one after another, it just shows how fargone the world of film has become, i honestly cant belive how people can pay for this. not only is john cena annoying his acting is unbearable, its worse then wacthing george bush's innauguration...dont buy it, your waisting your money, its a joke, i honestly dont get how someone could watch him unless ypu think he attractive, which unless you like people who act what their not, then he's ur type john cena is the worst thing to happen to wrestling
This is a typical action film with lots of fight scenes and gun fights but little logic. It's amazing that hundreds of bullets can be fired at point blank range with no one getting hit and people getting hit in the face with fire extinguishers, pieces of wood and other objects without so much as a scratch. And then there are people surviving incredible explosions, again without getting so much as a hangnail. The directors attempt at moments of humor failed miserably. They were not only not funny but were very wierd to me.I enjoy watching John Cena in action, just as Arnold Schwarzenegger was fun to watch, but this movie just didn't impress me anymore than wrestling does. I think one star out of five was being too generous.
This movie had bad acting and a thin plot. Could have been much better. Lots of action, lots of explosions but didn't seem like a good Blu-ray quality movie. It killed 2 hours but nothing i would recommend to a friend to watch.
If the cover for this low-brow action piece wasn't a hint, then you're probably one of the producers target audience. One of the things I think hurts hollywood is its irrepressible desire to shove the American flag down our throats by making these "patriotic" movies. We have the American flag, Iraq, marines... and wrestling!!! I guess if cow-tipping is a hobby you enjoy as much as practicing a suplex, then this movie is for you.As for a review, it stank. If you see it on the shelf of your local video store, leave it there.If you're a hollywood producer, please stop making movies starring wrestling "stars". If your name is Hulk Hogan, Steve Austin, John Cena (The Rock is OK) please stick to your day jobs.
This movie was not meant to be taken seriously....I think what they tried to do here is re-live the 80's action flick experience. If you watch this movie you are falsly lead to believe that you can be blown up and still survive, take a fire extinguisher to the face and get right back up, and can be shot at 100's of times and not take a hit. The dialouge is silly, however, the acting is pretty good. Sit back and enjoy/laugh.
This by far the worst movie that I have ever paid to see at a theatre. That is not to say that it wouldn't make a good rental; where through multiple viewers you could knock the viewing price down to 15 cents a person, but then that would still be too much to pay for this movie. WWE Entertainment should stick to what it does best - wrestling events where the story line is better inside the squared circle. Outside of a Terminator reference made to Robert Patrick, this is a total waste of 91 minutes of your life.
...really quite staggeringly, breathtakingly bad - unless you're particularly fond of big explosions, that is, in which case you'll absolutely love it. If you don't, prepare for a totally ridiculous tale woodenly acted without much conviction. Not even Robert Patrick's nasty chief villain can save this monumental turkey. It has but one good moment, when a minor baddie, seeing the chasing ex-Marine, says, "He's like a Terminator", and gets an annoyed glance from Patrick, who played the liquid metal Terminator in "Terminator II".
This is the first time that I've ever felt so compelled to write a review for a movie I thought was horrible. But this movie is that bad.I can't believe someone actually enjoyed this.The one liners, and that whole rock candy thing??? What was that all about? Was that supposed to be funny?Who wrote this anyway? He should be tried in a criminal court for waisting my money and my time.The acting was also some of the worst I've seen. I will never be able to watch Terminator 2 again.Oh, the explosions were impressive. Maybe if you took away everything but the explosions it wouldn't be too bad.Thanks. I feel a little "dumber" for having sat through the whole thing.
The music on this album could be incredible.However, there is low-level line noise on every track, the audible range of the tracks seems like it's been "chopped", making all the tracks sound "muddled." One track should flow seamlessly to the next, but the mastering between tracks results in extreme volume level changes.I am by no means an audiophile, but the MP3 quality for this album is just terrible. (I don't know if the same mastering issues exist for the cd version of this album).
There is only a brief introduction to the images and the period this coloring book covers. That was one star off. However, we do need to keep in mind that this is supposed to be a coloring book, target audience probably children though frankly I know many adults who adore these sorts of books. The images however not simple black and white lines drawings but have shading and that interfers with coloring. Also many of the images are "blurry" or so details that I don't think it is much fun to color. But it could be a cool reference for clip art or examples of the gothic style.
Almost useless as a true coloring book due to the heavily inked in gothic designs. Some of the designs are highly detailed and intricate, yet totally useless because most of it is inked in already. The entire book consists of gothic clip art style 1875 ink-plate repros of gothic pillars, gothic crown molding, etc. The images are printed back to back on quality white stock paper, however, markers bleed through. NO limited recopy rights at all, not even for our own use. Not even just to recopy so we can use markers. The price does not justify the product at all.This is not a Dover Publication, it was published by Stemmer House Publishers. Best to stick with Dover, at least with Dover you know you're getting top quality in all aspects.
i brought this gift with high hopes. Sadly, those hopes came crashing down pitifully. I admit that sony had a great idea. In fact, it would have been perfect for me because I'm always wondering who sang THAT song on the radio.It's cute and small, but not for a keychain. In addition, the USB capability is really handy (at least for newer computers). The product is a lot like its website--cute, stylish, but not practical. I disliked having the radio station settings so limited and the song information arriving so slowly.I would recommend holding off for a better product.
The Sony eMarker is an awesome idea, but understand that it is nothing more than a stopwatch that depends on data from a website powered by Sony and Broadcast Data. This information seems to need some help, as the "24 Hour" wait for playlist updates is sometimes taking 5 days. The product is cool, but Sony needs to keep their end of the deal and update the website... I'd wait for a few months before buying another one so that Sony can iron out the bugs.
I was sold this item only to learn, after opening the corresponding Web site necessary for eMarker function, that Sony was terminating the corresponding Web service in 45 days!!A great idea but no support.
Do not buy the emarker. It is being shut down by Sony on 9/30/2001. I received the following email from emarker.com on 9/5/2001:We will be permanently closing down the eMarker.com service on 9/30/01.To keep your eMarks information, just print the screens from your eMarks pages.For eMarker refund information, please click here.(emarker.com)Thanks for your support.The eMarker Team
I live in Phoenix, AZ and we have quite a few radio stations that are listed with E-marker. The main problem is that you have to wait 24 hours before the radio and song information is updated on E-marker's web page. Also, if you listen to more than one station it becomes a problem to remember what station you were listening to at the time you heard the song and pressed the E-marker. Trust me, it is hard to remember which one of your 3 listed radio stations you were listening to, especially if it was more than 24 hours ago - I thought the whole point behind this product was to let you not remember!
The set up is real easy, the site is too flashy (no pun intended) and the play lists are never updated. I have NO idea what the other people who give this good reviews are thinking. I live in NYC, media capital of the world, and if it doesn't work here with hip-hop and Latin stations, it won't work anywhere. If you r into Latin music the site tells you the stations are supported but when you mark a song it gives you the popular songs not necessarily the songs playing. It is very unreliable, I have yet to see it work more than 3 times, and I have owned it for well over a month. If you want to get it, DON'T. At least wait until they start working on getting the play list on point.
Do not believe any of the so-called good reviews! This product is nonsense and simply DOES NOT WORK. I was able to install it rather easily. However, the flashy sophisticated website is NEVER updated! The play list are NEVER available! I am very dissappointed in Sony. Great concept, good looking product as usual fom Sony. Typical lack of performance. My experience is 180 degrees from the good reviews and I don't believe they are real or honest.
This was bought for me as a gift, but it is completely unneccesary. It's simply a case of a company using widely available technology to make some money off of peoples' ignorance... If I hear a song that I wonder "...hmm, what was that?" I simply log on to the StarCD website and choose the radio station I was listening to and the time. It uses the same data that this device does. The only thing this device does is record times. If you think its worth spending the money for a keychain timestamp-thingermajig, go ahead. Ill just jot it on my hand with a pen. (I have no commercial or otherwise affiliation with StarCD, I'm just an impressed user.)
When I first heard about this I was elated, no more guessing what the song I was listen to is called. Then I connected to the website. At the time I had a 28K modem. Trying to access Sony's flash-enabled site was undesirable, if not impossible. I had to wait half an hour just to figure out what a three minute song was called. Also, the fact I still had to write down the station I was listening to. Doesn' that defeat the purpose of this toy?
This was the biggest waste of money ever created. If you want to know the song that much, call the station and ask them, they don't mind, really.
I'm sure you can see by now with everyone else's reviews that this product is garbage. Well, hey, if you pay close to nothing, don't expect anything much in return! Just save yourself the money and DO NOT BUY THIS PRODUCT... instead, put some gas in your car or something!
Don't let the sleek look of the emarker fool you, it's got bugs a-plenty and some serious design flaws. Here's what the other reviews (written by Sony employees?) and the literature don't say:* E-marker doesn't seem to work with AOL; you have to not only use another browser, but also set that browser as the default.* When you plug the emarker into your computer, it "automatically" loads your marks into the site...or at least that's what it's supposed to do. On 3 browsers and 2 different computers, I haven't quite gotten this to happen.* Sony seems to be more concerned about being cool than functional - to top off all the emarkers' inadequacies, they (over)designed a Flash interface to get your songs that doesn't quite work either. Simple HTML would have been fine, guys....Spare yourself the agony and wait for version 2.0....this is the first time I've been irate enough about something to write a review and I assure you everything above is true...
Where is the space for a zero star! Just purchased a emarker and ill tell you one thing, I should have read these reviews first. All the bad you hear about this little thing is true. I am not priveliged enough to live in an area Sony feels compelled to offer service in, so I dont even have one station to mark. The site is terrible and I cant even get the program to "enable" itself. Whats the difference though, cant do anything with it anyway. This is typical Sony. My advice, check out all the ratings here and go to the website and see if they even offer any stations in your area. Believe me, they wont tell you it will not work in your area. It, however, is a neat idea. Needs lots of work.
no place in the ad does it say the use of this depends on the radio stations in your area must belong to their service for this to work none in my area of south west florida seem to least of all my favorite stations and it seems that the music you listen too must be of the lastest out or there is no info on it or where you can buy it so yes i feel like i got ripped off ... thank you sony
Know this the web site for this gaget may tell you that the radio listings information is updated every 10 minutes. That was not the case with the radio stations I tried the emarker on. The only song information I could get was "information unavaiable check back in 24 hours". They dont even promise to have the information in 24 hours. This is not the fault of emarker my understanding is most radio stations only update their play lists every 24 hours. So the problem is the misleading information provided by the emarker site. Caution if you buy this product dont expect timely information from emarker.
E-marker started to lose it's appeal when I had a problem with the driver. Sony provided little assistance with the situation and I basically had to solve it through trial and error. The website was easy to manuever through, but receiving the proper listings wasn't constant. I will give Sony credit for coming up with the idea, and respect it's potential. However, for now it serves as a interesting eye candy piece for my key chain.
I can tell you that I used to have a small smart device called the iTag from Xenote and that worked VERY well. Plus..........it was FREE!! I used to use it in the Bay Area and the selection of the radios was great, the Web site very easy to navigate on. I could even get my info in real time which was great. Unfortunately, this start-up, as many others, had to close doors for the lack of $.... Too bad that those guys at Sony have too much money but do not care enough about their customers to launch a decent product... After the PlayStation 2 fiasco launch, they keep going on...... :-(
Use of the eMarker depends on the eMarker website. However, Sony has just announced that they are discontinuing the website, and so eMarker devices will now be useless. Don't buy one unless you want a museum piece.For those of us that already own an eMarker, Sony has graciously offered to provide a cash refund for every eMarker returned directly to them.
This product works exactly as advertised. Click the button and find out what the song is. The website isn't set up very well, and it's slow because of all the annoying flash stuff, but with broadband it's definitely usable.Unfortunately, it's only usable for the rest of September. Emarker.com is shutting down, and that makes the eMarker useless. Thus, the 1-star review. Current users are being offered a refund, but my guess is if you buy one now you won't get that.I'd write more detail, but I have to go print hardcopies of my eMarks. :(
Check their web site at www.emarker.com. A pity. This looked like a good idea. :-(
Once you get past the hype, you will realize this device is a [$] clock. When you press the button on the e-marker, it only records the time, not the radio station. When you download the information to your computer and connect to the website it looks for the song that was played on the station how many hours/days ago you pressed the button. If you selected the wrong station you will get a different song.If you use the scan button on your radio, this product is not for you
I bought this thing to get the names of songs on the New York spanish stations. I checked it, double checked it, called customer service, and STILL I got incorrect song information. Maybe its the radio stations fault, maybe its E-marker's fault, all I know is that it DOES NOT WORK.
Sony has stopped supporting the e-marker and is offering refunds to anyone who already has one.
This unit is quite difficult to use. The button is very sensitive, which sometimes causes false entries. The website is complicated to use. I think with a little work E-marker will be a good product to have.
Before buying this product I read all the reviews. Unfortunately, I didn't pay enough attention to the warnings that the product doesn't work. I thought I could trust a company like Sony to deliver a reliable product and figured that the poor reviews were the result of consumer error. I was wrong. The complementary reviews on this site just can't be real. The product looks nice but works like a piece of junk.
These eMarker guys are out of business, so not sure if this thing even works any longer.
I adored these books growing up and the publishers should be ashamed of themselves for changing exactly what made them classics. I would have forgotten about them years ago if it weren't for the haunting illustrations. I took them camping, to slumber parties, they were fantastic and terrifying: which was the whole point. To be scared.I have nothing against the new artist and his work in general, but this is not the place for it. To change what made a book a classic for it's 30th anniversary is insane. I can't imagine what they were thinking.If parents are afraid their kids can't handle these books in their original form, they have simply to not buy them books that are meant to be scary or maybe, you know, flip through the book before you hand it to your child. Which is a sad thing anyway, I've seen nothing good come of raising children in a nerfed world, but still.There is no excuse whatsoever to censor such an eerie, memorable, and nostalgic children's book.
Don't waste your time or money. Buck up and spend the extra for an original Stephen Gammell illustrated version. If you're buying it for a kid who may in fact be a total wiener, then by all means get this one. But then, why are you buying the little wiener horror stories?Stephen Gammell's version will help develop a child's hippocampus and exercise their innate terror response. This one is lame.
I was extremely disappointed when I found out about a reprinting of Scary Stories with a new illustrator. Like many adults I grew up reading these books by myself and with friends. The best part of reading these stories was turning the page to see what sick illustration was next. They creeped you out and I know I am not alone when I say that as an adult, they still creep me out. That's what is so fun about them to this day. I lament that this generation of readers will read a version of Scary Stories with watered down illustrations because uptight and squeamish parents have tried to ban these books from libraries. I have the originals and I will keep them for posterity.
I'm sure the editors at HarperCollins thought by changing the powerful (and controversial) imagery of this book, they'd sell more copies. Nothing like compromising art and expression to sell out.1/5 stars for this homogenized shadow of the original book.
Without Stephen Gammell's artwork, these are pretty close to worthless.Why would they EVER replace the original, incredible artwork? The reality is, Harper Collins, that Stephen Gammell's artwork MADE these classics.The artwork now is unoriginal, not the least bit frightening (or artful), and does nothing to complement the stories.Huge mistake. Someone should be fired. At least five people should be fired... and blacklisted.This is an atrocity.Prospective buyers: go buy the other versions! Oh, that's right, they're extremely expensive. I wonder why, Harper Collins? You fools.And again for good measure: you fools.
How dare they censor the original?? The Stephen Gammel illustrations were incredible! The art was what made these books great! The writing is still good, but the new drawings are just nowhere near as good as the old ones! Skip this one and buy the old version(s)!!
Alvin Schwartz's stories always played second fiddle to Stephen Gammell's art. Without it, this book is not worth anyone's time or money. Avoid it and seek the originals.
As another child who was scarred by the terrifying art style in the original books, I was extremely excited to hear about the re-release of these classic stories. The books arrived today; lo and behold the original art has been replaced with bland, uninteresting art that would be better suited in an R.L. Stine novel.A wasted purchase...
Did the National Socialists require censorship here or something? The new artwork isn't even scary... WTF You've ruined a classic. No one buy this BS.
This isn't the original art for these books. They hired a cheap hack to make the illustrations "less scary". The original had a better artist and better illustration. Dont waste your time on this pussified version.
The original books contained haunting, even downright frightening illustrations that still disturb me to this day. They made these stories scary. They were original, artistic, beautiful and downright horrifying, and have been replaced by bland, boring, and shamefully dull. If you want something that will scare you, find a copy of this book with the original artwork by Stephen Gammel.
Many of us remember being on a wait list at school or at our community libraries to borrow these horrifying gems. Yes, the stories themselves were spooky. Seeing some of our local folklore in print just added to the eerieness. The most important contributor to the scare-factor was the incredibly grotesque pieces of art that accompanied each story. This reprint features a new, popular artist; however, the illustrations don't have that same terror-inducing quality as before.For me, I think the reason is that there was a lot of mystery in Gammell's work, while Helquist's just doesn't leave anything to the imagination. In Gammell's work the picture is set up so that it is happening TO YOU. In Helquist's work, the perspective is such that you can see it happening to the characters. Just doesn't do it for me. You can google the images or check blogs to see for yourself.
Please do not buy this new edition of Scary Stories to Tell in the Dark. The publishers have completely replaced the original dark, beautiful and terrifying artwork for pictures that are clean, kid friendly and safe. They have destroyed what made this collection truly special.
I did not like this book because it was not like a complete story. It just had little mini stories in it. I also did not like it because some of the authors who wrote the stories did not finish them. One more reason is there are a lot of pages, but it is not hard so it makes it too easy to read.The book Scary Stories is a book filled with about 10 different stories. It is very scary andit just makes you want to scream! This book will scare its reader half to death.The type of reader that would like this book is maybe someone who watches a lot of horror movies. The reason is because it really scares you. The reader would also have a strong stomach because it is a gross book.
I first found this book when i was little--and yeah, then it scared me more. I found it recently in barns and nobles, and wanted to buy it to re read it. Big mistake.This book is more hysterical than scary to me. I didn't even feel a little scared. Big disappointment for me. my advice? read it when you are younger, it might acutally be scary then.
Any storyteller can tell you that there's little point in telling scary stories without proper atmosphere. Scary stories are told at night around campfires or in darkness lit only by a single flashlight. When reading this book of folktales, you lose the advantage of total darkness and the timing and tone of a storyteller's voice. What made up for the lack were the strange and frightening illustrations of Stephen Gammell. This edition of the book replaces those with far tamer illustrations. Reading it now is akin to telling a scary story while sitting poolside at noon with all your buddies, there's very little impact or involvement for the reader.I hope someday that Harper Collins will bring back the illustrations that truly made these stories scary, but until then I cannot recommend this edition.
Re-releasing this series with a new illustrator was a terrible idea and, frankly, completely missing the point of the originals. The stories themselves are a collection of sleepover tales and urban legends which, when taken alone, aren't particularly frightening. For those of us who enjoy this series, it was the original illustrations from the twisted mind of Stephen Gammell that made these "Scary Stories" truly scary; without them, the book is laughable. Helquist may be a talented enough artist, but he can't hope to duplicate the underlying terror of Gammell's illustrations.
The artwork is the only thing anyone ever remembered from this series. Congratulations on putting out an edition that looks exactly like every other scary stories for kids book, instead of the ONE that literally everyone remembers from their childhood.Great way to commemorate the anniversary.
While the stories in the "Scary Stories to Tell in the Dark" book remain the same, the Stephen Gammell illustrations that haunted my imagination have been scrapped for more candy-coated pictures.How candy-coated? Upon searching for the other tales of horror by Alvin Schwartz, "In A Dark, Dark Room", which was written for Level 2 of the "I Can Read!" children's collection, I found those water-colored images to be scarier than the cartoonish images in the re-release of "Scary Stories to Tell in the Dark."
I remember reading these books as a first grader. First Grade! I loved them at the age of 7, and I love them now at 26. Yes, there were some sleepless nights, but that didn't stop me from picking up the book the next day! As others have said, what really stays with you is the art. To have taken the beautifully terrifying artwork and watered it down because some parents don't want to deal with their child having nightmares is a crime against children's literature. One star for this edition. The original gets five.I'm not sure if it's accurate, but I've read that the new artwork is for the thirty year anniversary of these books. Happy Thirtieth Birthday to Schwartz and Gammell's masterpiece. For your present, you get your teeth removed.
I was very disappointed to discover that the copies, (I ordered the "scary" trilogy)while described as being illustrated by Stephen Gammell, were actually the updated versions with watered-down artwork by another artist. I am not keeping this books as they are worthless to me without the better artwork. This is the first time I've been disappointed with an order from Amazon, but it's a big one. You need to change your description to include the correct illustrator.
This is a review for the ORIGINAL release of the book, not the reprinting...A majority of the writing seemed to be written by a child. Some stories aren't finished - on purpose - but its annoying, others are just down right silly. But then there are a couple "classic" stories, like famous urban legends that make up for some of those bad stories. In the end I'm disappointed in this book. I have such fond memories of it from my childhood, it's a shame I don't feel the same way about it anymore.For a more in depth review please visit my horror movie/book review blog in my profile
[Written by my daughter] At thirteen and a half years old, I read some of these stories laughing at the end because they were so pathetic. I fail to see the gore in here. There are no descriptions at all, and the plots are uncreative. If I were younger perhaps I would enjoy it more. So if you are looking to get this for someone under fourth grade, by all means, they will enjoy it. But for those who prefer real, set up and descriptive horror, get a Steven Kind book or something. Of course, this is coming from a girl who is read stories about women who kill their husbands with lamb chops and then feed it to the detectives, but, you know, that doesn't make the book any scarier.
I was disappointed with this book. I expected "real" ghost stories with substance. The book only has short folklore legends.
Dwellers in the Mirage (1932) by Abraham Grace Merritt - 222 pages - rating: 5.5/10The writing style is good and all the elements of a great story are present. If the author had simply written about two comrades descending into adventures in a hidden valley it would have been quite a fine tale. Unfortunately the plot was confused by having the main character not really know who he was half the time eventually leading him to abandon his friend completely.The reader endures a frustrating sense of unfocused direction, forever waiting for the plot to fit back together in a way that feels right. Perhaps the author felt that a simple adventure needed a twist of some sort. Well it did feel twisted, but not in a good way.Claus Kellermann2006 April 15Sci_Fi_Researcher@yahoo.com
This would have been a very short book if all of the racism and sexuality were to be removed. I read it for an Appalachian Literature class, and I felt this book was so racey that I couldn't enjoy reading it. The vulgarity in it is also not necessary, and I feel that it should not be called literature because of this.
I am a first-timer and it can be rather intimidating to admit for an older woman in her mid-forties! I wanted a video that was decent, and this one surely is. Atea's moves were clear and it helped me to get a good start, but I quickly became bored with it because it lacked FLOW, and I was disappointed that the moves that she so clearly shows do not connect together to form a dance routine. This is what I am looking for. For a beginner to be expected to make a dance out of a bunch of new moves is unrealistic, and I will continue to look for a video that will offer this. If I am to dance like this in front of my husband, (which is mainly why I am learning) I would not be able to show him a routine by learning this video because I am a beginner and don't know how to put the moves together yet. The whole idea is BellyDANCE, and not just Belly EXERCISE, and with the CONFIDENCE I need to dance this way!
I was very dissapointed with the quality of this video. During the entire video, you could see the woman reading the cards behind the camera. The ladies did not teach any moves that you could not just make up on your own.
I take group bellydance classes and have been to seminars and workshops. This is bellydance but only the very simplest form. Atea is ok and this is a good tape to start with if you are not sure how serious you are about learning. It introduces you to things like veil and zills but it does not instruct you on them. If you are sure you want to dance you should shop around spend just a little more money getting a tape from someone/troup that dances a style you are interested in and has a well known face and name. For example Fat Chance Bellydance for American Tribal style or Aisha Ali for African dance or someone well known for Egyptian or Turkish Caberet. If this is a serious investment for you-get a good tape, beginner or otherwise if you search around you will find several.
Beginners who would like a quick view into some dance might take advantage of this video. There is an attempt to cover a lot of ground, but none of it is done well. Altea is too angular, stilted and her dancing is not that interesting. I would strongly recommend looking elsewhere for quality dance instruction videos. I will say that this is the first video that I've seen that touches on rhythm and zill work. The variety in costume is interesting, but is not worth the price. I recently acquired several of the Neena and Veena series of dance tapes. These are excellent beginner tapes, they are fun and interesting and they show a great little dance at the end as a reward for your work-out. This series would be a better choice for beginners.
Reasons not to buy this video:1. She reads from cue cards the entire time.2. She's extremely stiff and boring.I have only watched this video once in the two years that I have owned it.
I have always wanted to bellydance and got this as my first video. It was not at all what I had imagined and quite frankly scared me. Bellydancers were always something mysterious and beautiful and graceful. Atea is awkward to watch and comes off quite bizarre. Not anything to want to imitate and strive to be like.
If you are looking for a tape to dance "with", this isn't it.It's more like a documentary on dance.
While the basic instruction is passable, the technique of most of the dancers, including the instructor, is mediocre to poor. What's truly terrifying is how frail and anorexic most of these women look. There's an unfortunate sort of L.A. starved-skinny bleached-blonde airheadedness to this production. Belly dance can be a powerful, grounded and grounding ethnic dance form; however this tape presents more of a "wrap yourself in sequins and wriggle for your husband" sort of vibe. Culturally divorced and ugly-American scary. Made me want to shave my head and get tattoos.
For basic instruction this tape is OK. Her oral description of the techniques is clear. Atea is not relaxed at all in her instructions or moves. In the instruction part of the video she seems like a puppet controlled by strings. She is too skinny, unattractive and doesn't even have an attractive navel. She fails to hold your attention. Her other dancers are a bit better, but the whole tape seems so contrived and does not move with a natural flair. For verbal instruction, OK, for visual efects you can get much better. And the dance at the end is a real joke. Your money is better spent on Suhaila!
This video was let down. The historical blurb at the beginning is a time waster, and a pain to fast forward thru every time I want to practice dancing. I agree with other reviewers regarding the time devoted to "freestyle" and "improvisation". I am too new at this to recognize the moves when they are put together so quickly- and without any commentary. I find myself struggling during this part, or worse - just standing there feeling frustrated and foolish. Some instruction regarding transitions from one move to another would have been appreciated. On the positive side, the actual breakdown of moves was very helpful, especially the belly roll and undulations. I was really struggling with those, and I'm now confidently on my way. I wish they had covered more moves in that manner. Bottom line- it's been a week, and I'm already seeking out another video to buy.
I found this tape very disappointing, it was fun to watch once, but the amount of information provided was very small and too choppy. There are many belly dance instructional videos available which are more interesting, better taught and more informative about how to dance and which provide you with a workout as well. My recommendation is to keep looking.
Since I have ordered for this product and inspite of the company debiting the total amount for the product from my account, I have not recieved the product till date. The company promises to deliver the product in 12 hrs but its approx more than 3 weeks since the amount was debited but till now, the product hasnt reached me. The company doesnt respond to email queries and its toll free number (the only other point of contact mentioned from their end other than email address) always sounds busy and goes to voicemail.
Bill Nichols is full of words and empty of thought. You need a machete to slash through the tangled sentences in this book, and what you'll find beneath are simplistic, flawed ideas that aren't developed but buried under more verbiage. Nichols stitches suffixes and prefixes to ordinary nouns, creating monsters like "situatedness," "hyperrationality," "reconceptualization," "polyvocality," "relationality," "talismanic"(!), and the pseudo-literate's favorite word of all: "juxtaposition." Each of those words costs as much time to understand as a whole chapter of Erik Barnouw's book (which is succinct, informative and even humorous). Mr. Nichols should be sealed in a cave and his books slung into outer space, for they pollute the body of film knowledge. Don't buy "Representing Reality" unless you want to know how confused Mr. Nichols's reality is.
Whoever mastered this CD had no idea what they were doing (this makes me wonder what other CDs on this label are like). They use about one-quarter of the dynamic range available with 16-bit audio. Five bucks is pretty cheap for the disc, but you get what you pay for in this case. I'd probably opt for the other Eddie Fisher CD that has multiple albums (one of them being a Christmas CD) on it.
i didn't care for this cd. it is a Christian goth group that has disappeared and I can see why. not anything special. if you are a collector of christian goth, a friend of the bands, or a fan then get it otherwise don't waste your time.
The shoe seemed nice. I purchased the 2E version since I read in another review that they can be tight. Unfortunately, the top of the tongue bit into my ankle when I tied the shoe. Didn't matter which sock I wore. I had to return.
Either the upper was stuffed too full or I got a bad pair? I wore these for 10 minutes and my achilles was in agony on both ankles. I tried folding the upper down into the shoe and let it sit that way to stretch it a little but it just didn't work.
Product reviews are very subjective. Based on the reviews of this boot I hoped for a great boot at a fair price. Instead I found the boot to be subpar in terms of comfort. They shoes were stiff and far too 'roomy'. My feet where floating inside them. I returned them immediately. I've had far more comfortable boots right out of the box.
They keep coming untied! If it wasn't for that I would give it 5 stars. The boot is waterproof, it is comfortable, wont give you calluses or corns. But they have hooks for wrapping the laces over at the top that no matter how you try and tie it, they will inevitably become undone! The first time: "umm? maybe I should tie them tighter", The second time: "just a little tighter, Ugh it's cutting my circulation", The third time: "Ok this is ridiculous, let me try tying em different", the unfteenth time: "you m$#%^ stupid $%^ Boot from hell $%^&..." lol I threw the boots into a lake and hiked in my sandals the rest of the way... Never again will I buy boots with hooks for tying...thanks for reading
Had these boots for a while. First thing i noticed the laces started to fall apart.I've never seen a boot sole so sparsely treaded a bit like a tyre on your car less rubber on the road less traction and its going to wear out quicker.Because of the sole when your walking the boot seems to fold on top of your toes very annoying. The inner sole has no arch support and not much spring my feet started to ache after 20 mins walking and lay haven't done that before, had to change them.Seems to run a size to big thats not much of a problem just wore thicker socks.Fine to wear in the middle of winter but in the summer just to hot to wear, even when i put on thinest socks i could fine.They don't seem to breath at all.No tag or loop on the back to help pull them on even my running shoes have them.Buy timberland at least lay are real leather and better soles same price!
These boots are water proof as advertized but they are not comfortable. I had to get some inserts just to wear them for a day. The lace hooks do not grab the shoe lace and hold so it is a pain just to lace them up. I would not recommend these to anyone.
3 months with them and my left boot it open in half i think the glue they use is not good i mean 70 bucks for 3 months is not worth it
Oversize and they pinch my legs. I had to trim the top 1/2 inch off the boots to keep my legs from bleeding they hurt so bad. Cheap Crap but a notch better than Walmart boots.
This pair of boots are too tight and between sizes is big jump,i don't know if there is any other way I can stretch them a bit,they are also only made for soft soil , asphalt concrete will finish them too fast
Don't know what all the people who gave these boots a great review were thinking but these are not great boots. They did arrive on time but they are not worth the saved money. First off the boots had spots around the lower edge(where the boot and the rubber bottom meet) where there were huge holes where there was missing glue. Tried them on anyway and took them off within 2 minutes off walking around my house. They were the most uncomfortable boots I have ever tired on. They were so bad my feet and ankles hurt for an hour afterwards. The "insole" they put in the shoe is a joke at best. It feels like you are walking on a piece of granite. Would not recommend for anyone looking for any boot that they want to actually wear.
I'd ordered these boots based on decent reviews and price. I rarely return purchases to Amazon but I did return these. The boots were fairly heavy, stiff and narrow. I get that new boots will be stiff but both the uppers and lowers were too stiff for me. I returned them and bought Adidas boots with Gore Tex uppers which were much more comfortable, flexible and light with good sole traction.
not nearly as good as her usual work if your hoping to hear her forget it it is a pale comparison with authors who don't have her style
I am sympathetic to the perspective of this author, but not to his arrogance or all of his smug conclusions. He is too much the demagogue for my taste, liking as much to degrade as to disagree with his adversaries. This is well beneath the normal standards of his sponsor, The Cato Institute, which usually holds to an exceptionally high standard.I much prefer the similar but far more intelligent and respectful works of Warren Brookes and Julian Simon. They were so good they didn't require "attitude." In contrast this author is frequently on TV, the perfect medium for the condescending sneer which is his mien. This book doesn't belong on the shelf with Henry Mencken, who wickedly and hilariously debunked quacks. Pass on this and buy "The Vintage Mencken" to read his evisceration of chiropractic.
The author is funded by the big industries which explains the selection of certain topics and the huge bias it reflects. No matter how many good reviews and bibliographic citations appear here, the ideas expressed reflect corporate interests and not scientific knowledge. Always look at the source!! Research very well where this people's funds come from and that will tell you a little bit more about the real issues.
I am a big fan of Kate Bush. I have collected all of her music, including her cameo appearances on other groups; yet I cannot agree with the other reviewers regarding this CD.The only good thing about this album is that most of the artists did indeed attempt to render original, different versions of Kate Bush's wonderful songs. However, I find their talent a little limited.Listening to this album made me a little sad, as it made me wish that a real tribute album to Kate Bush were released, with versions by artists such as Peter Gabriel, The Cure, Depeche Mode, Morrissey, Annie Lennox, Phil Collins, Tori Amos, etc...The fact that this album was highly rated by other reviewers shows how desperate fans are for more recognition of the talent, uniqueness, and influential nature of Kate Bush's music (especially on some rather popular female artists that followed her).
Well at first when I purchased this album I was so full of hope, curiosity and impatience, because I admit I am starving for some new work of Kate Bush--hint, hint)and I know I am not alone on this one. Anyhow, I listened to it again, and again, and I realized that this is unfortunately not it. I really liked the remake of "Suspended in Gaffa" that was my favorite, very original (that's why the record is not 1 star), but then I quickly skipped to listen to the classic "Running up that hill" and...I cried, I am sorry but the remake was well below average. I agree with another reviewer who expressed the wish of having high profile artists performing Kate's awesome art, I am surprised why they haven't done it so far...However no offense to the artists who did take up on the challenge of performing Kate's songs, more power to them, however I wish they came up with something better.
I would not buy this again - it teaches a non-standard supposedly "new" methof of casting
Paxton Quigley's book is a compliation of parts of other books on firearms self protection. It's a bit overdone, and probably would scare the average woman thinking about protecting herself. Women seem to have special problems protecting themselves. They usually do not want to hurt anyone, and they will do all most anything for a baby or a family member before they will do anything to protect themselves. However, women that are able to continue to practice with a hand gun, usually become quite proficent. They know that they don't know, and they listen to instructions. Most men think they know it all already.
I was looking for a piano songbook for childern to play on a piano. I should have realized it was not just the songbook from the price. It comes with an electronic toy piano. The songbook is play by numbers and this did nothing for somebody that is learning to play piano. Very disappointing. Age level is pre-school, before able to read.
A surprisingly bad film, painfully slow paced and convoluted. It really is one hell of a mess. The exploitation of a pitiful malformed character (played by John Mills) is so over the top, insensitive, and with a tasteless comic bent, and so frequently employed, that it demands mention. The story feels minor to begin with, but is so disjointed and inane, that it is best described as no story at all. The music is hard to describe, I'll be kind, it's not helpful. The only reason to see this film is for the absolutely gorgeous, almost hypnotic cinematography. That and perhaps a young and radiant Sarah Miles. That should have been enough to save this film with some tough and aggressive editing, and just a little devotion to good taste. But instead we are forced to endure some kind of a personal or career psychosis by a great director, David Lean.
Beautifully photographed but over-produced historical women's picture on an epic scale. Yes, it has its fans but so do those dime-a-dozen bodice-ripper romance novels on supermarket racks. Still, gorgeous cinematography and a lusher-than-lush musical score can't disguise the fact that this David Lean misfire is an overblown snooze of elephantine proportions. A pallid Sarah Miles manages to suggest what Julie Christie might have done with this part, horribly miscast Robert Mitchum plays a flower-pressing milquetoast and a dazed-looking Christopher Jones is so bad his voice had to be dubbed. However, John Mills received richly-deserved Oscar for his portrayal of village idiot struck dumb by plot inanities he witnesses in mute silence. No wonder he's speechless.
The lead actress does a poor job of acting.Was recently in Ireland and stopped at the location of this film.
When I purchased this product, I thought I was getting a good deal because of the cheaper price. However, once I received it, I knew I had made a mistake. I've been using this product for several years now, and I knew just by looking at this one that it wasn't right. The texture was incredibly thin, and the color was much lighter -- something that could only leave me to believe that maybe water had been added to it.Lesson learned -- spend the extra money -- you're paying for quality!
The on/off switch is stuck. I cannot therefore record or review tapes. I pried the switch and made a temporary contact and confirmed that the camera can record and play-back I would like to be able to return it for full credit or have it repaired.
it sounds great im just wondering y it did not already have 5 stars! di u think it would be great 4 my 12 year old?
Bought this item in July and it stopped working in December. Specficially, the playback function stopped working.
This camera semed ok at first... but less than a month after I bought it, the eyepiece viewfinder broke and only displayed a white screen. In bright light (like outside) the entire screen is unfocused and a light object being filmed ends up looking like you filmed the sun, it does not filter the light very well. The battery lasts for about and hour and fifteen minutes when the viewfinder is open; this is not so great when you are out and about and cannot re-charge.This camcorder is the lower class model for Samsung, overall I thought it to be cheap and a waste of money. For only a few dollars more you could get a reliable Sony.The camera did have a few pros though, the mirror, negative, mosaic and art effects on the DSE button were fun, but not worth the hassle the camera gives overall. My advice: DON'T buy IT!
Like Korean cars, this Korean camcorder does what it says, but it's not something you'll be proud to own. The controls are awkward... even Sony's compact minidv camcorders have better buttons. The video quality is sub par, and my unit, which I received as a factory-sealed gift, broke after about 6 months, a first for all the Asian electronics I have owned. For a little bit more money, you can buy much better camcorders from Japanese manufacturers.
I really like songs for a new world and the last 5 years. was excited to purchase this disc but was kinda disappointed. lacks the edgy variation and creativity of the others. not bad and the cover track is fun--just not up to the success of the other jason robert brown work.
I bought this printer new, when it was HPs top of the line. I have been very disappointed in it from day one.The print quality is fine. The duplexer is a joke. It needs the bottom of the page to grip the paper, so it can not print on that area. The driver software gives you two options to deal with this - print everything at about 90% scale to squeeze the content into the printable space, or re-sort the pages allowing the SW to move the page breaks. Neither is appealing, so I found that I reverted to manual duplex mode - taking the paper out and reversing itself myself.The biggest problem I have with the printer is frequent paper jams. Even when using HP brand multipurpose paper, I find that the printer jams about 25% of the time. In the quest for speed, the paper load mechanism is just too fast, pulling in many sheets of paper instead of just one.
I have a small business and it was important that the envelope feeder work well. From day 1, this has been a nightmare. Components of the printer block the envelopes/labels and they don't feed properly. If you use internet postage, you lose money with the misfed labels/envelopes. I'm very disappointed and am shopping for a new printer now, only a short time after purchasing this one.
Until this product, I was a huge promoter of HP printers, but the HP 1215 apparently was designed with little attention to Apple compatibility. Unpredictably it refused to print first in 0S9 and then in 0SX. I'm frankly sick of downloading and reloading new drivers only to find they don't work and/or freeze up my entire computer. Because of this printer I've cleaned off my entire hard drive, lost valuable files and programs, and still wound up with a non-functional machine. It's been in my closet for 6 months, and I'm considerably happier with a new bottom-of-the-line Canon printer.
I had had two HP printers. Both broke in the same places - where the paper shoots out from the printer; the wings or the "arms" which guide the paper from the printer - both broke easily.Also I get an annoying message on my computer that the "yellow box marked !" is on and therefore I have to exit out of the printer mode and reset the yellow box so that the ! is deleted. Then go back into the printer mode. This is so annoying that I am never getting an HP Printer again.If you look on the instruction book, the annoying message can never to resolved - only by resetting the message yellow ! again, and again!!!!!!!!
I guess I'm not totally up on the meaning of grindhouse. One would assume by the title and the tags that these would be sex filled movies with a little plot thrown in for good measure. They were full of slow moving plot and sex scenes that would make a censor in the 1950s proud.
This is not a book. It is nothing more than the postings from an AOL message board that is actually from way back in 1994. What a joke. I don't know who wrote up the "publisher's review", but talk about a mislead. Each page is like a separate posting from this ongoing thread and is for the most part very boring. The so called author is simply one of the posters who got involved in the postings at some point. That's it. The so called author tries to constantly instigate controversy, especially with one other poster. Probably for the purpose of creating the controvery of being able to get this book published. Though how he found someone to publish it is beyond me.
Talk about junk. Who would publish somethng like this? I see that it was published by some unheard of publishing company in Lakewood, Ohio? What other garbage have they published? I can find nothing about any other books published by this "so-called" publisher. Only some kind of religeous tracts tye stuff. The earlier reviewers have lready hit on the faults of this book. While the book indicates that permission was obtained from AOL to use these postings, how abot all of the individual posters? How many of them simply used a username that was the same as their e-mail address header? And how many of them were embarrassed when friends or family may have stumbled across this and recognized them and their postings. Postings that were assumed to have a certain degree of semi-privacy? Shame on AOL and shame on this so-called author for simply copying months and months of postings and copying them into a manuscript and then somehow getting it published as a "book".
This book contains such advise as writing down personal affirmations which you will repeat to yourself at the beginning of each day:I am calm, prepared, and entertaining.I am fit and beautiful.I am humble, patient, and compassionate.I am enough, just the way I am.If this kind of advise is your cup of tea, then this is your kind of book.
Very much like Alexandra Stoddard's books, too much alike. Stoddard's books are less wordy and still get to the point. I stopped reading this book when the similarities became clear, been there done that. If you are looking for something in the "guidance" area, try Stoddard. She has many better books. I have some and re-read them often for refreshers and finding the "gems" I forgot about.
My rating of one *is not a reflection of the story or the gorgeous illustrations; but, on the unreadable digital version. Shame on the people who will profit from selling something with an unchageable font size that is too small to read. It was obviously scanned in and formatted on landscape view with two hard cover book pages per one narrow digital page. The font and the page size can't be enlarged. I'm really disappointed with Amazon for not only selling something of such inferior quality and even more disappointed with them for highlighting this product as a daily deal. :-(
I purchased this for my granddaughter, we love reading together. The print was WAY to small and no way to make it bigger.
Gorecki, as usual, is striving for profound angst, but for the most part this Quartet just comes across as boring. The second and fifth movements are terrible. The first movement develops some tense themes that Gorecki could have explored further, but he drops them midway to revert back to his usual droning. The third and fourth movements are the only ones with character, with the latter developing a decent amount of bittersweet sadness.
I appreciate what the author was attempting to do, but do not feel the book succeeds. It is too dry to read on its own (as a sort of William Safire-style curmudgeon rant on language), and not comprehensive enough to be a useful desk reference.In addition, the first 30 or so pages are actually a biography of the author (who died a few years ago) by one of his colleagues. Perhaps to someone researching Lasch himself (who was, admittedly, a renown academic) this material would be interesting, but it isn't in the context of language reference.
My title says it all.I am running Windows XP with all service packs. AMD Athlon 64X2,4 GB Ram 2 hard drives, tons of free space.
We have 3 of these Lux systems in our sprawling house. All 3 have in a few short years had the LCD screens become unusable at night with the incorporated light. The programming part works well enough, The LCD is ok in a well-lit area, but we need to use a flashlight every time we want to adjust them. Not surprisingly, we adjust them less often. It is very frustrating and seriously compromises and otherwise good product.
I found this book almost entirely irrelevant and in sore need of update. Nowadays, many states have "no fault" divorce (e.g., Colorado), the men's movement has changed culture, and MANY women are career women who are the main bread-winners of the family. This book takes NONE of that effectively into account. Therefore, the book was a total waste of money and time for me. I do not recommend it for any career woman and dedicated mother who is the bread-winner and in a position to need to pay maintenance, lose significant assets, AND lose parenting time despite being BOTH primary parent and primary breadwinner. This book needs to catch up with the times.
What a pity that a book about a part of India that has received little attention turns out to be so poorly written. A trip that could have been very interesting to read about is instead a tedious catalogue of "then we went there and then we did this." The author comes across as a naive young woman who did not even know to take toilet paper to a remote part of India and patently she (and her travelling companions) had done little (if any) reading about the history and politics of Assam. This is, unfortunately, an unchallenging and uninformative book.
I can't vouch for the quality of the actual DVD, because I received a blank disc. (I sent it back for a refund.) However, based on the packaging - or lack of it - I would be inclined to agree with David A. Medzorian's assessment that this is an unauthorized bootleg. There was no cover insert - just a clear plastic jewel box in which the disc was placed - and the label looked like a "print-at-home" job. If this is a "print-on-demand" DVD, that wasn't disclosed in the product description. For $19.95, I expected a professional package, and (blank DVD notwithstanding) I didn't get one.If the packaging is this skimpy, it's reasonable for me to believe Mr. Medzorian's comments on the picture quality are accurate. This is not worth your time - or your money.
This c.d. is definitly not what you are expecting. Some of the songs have like 3 different words fpr like five minutes. I definitly don't recomend it.
This CD sends the wrong message (anarchy), and some of it is just plain bizarre. Trust me, you'll tire of it. Save your money and go buy Barenaked Ladies.
The only good song is the first track. Unless you can find a single of the first track, save your money. The rest of the CD is trash.
The one star is for the only ONE good song on this cd. Tubthumping...Actually, this song blows after you hear it more than 5 times. This cd has only been in my cd player once...That is the day i bought it. If you like wasting money, buy this cd.
It may have some, but not much. Tubthumping gets boring after listening to it about 5 times. Amnesia is the best, but that song is OK.
I'll be the first one to sadly admit, I bought this album only having heard "Tubthumping". That was a huge mistake. If you're considering buying this album only because of that, please DON'T! "Tubthumping" gets old after a while anyways. The rest of this CD is hardly worth listening to. There are some mediocre songs here and there, but trust me, this is not worth your [money].
Tubthumber was the reason I wanted this cd and I got it. About 1,000,000 times on the radio plus 100 on the cd. Now I can't stand Tubthumper.The lyrics and music keep repeating themselves. All the other songs have bad lyrics that are negative too! This was not the best choice for me.
This CD is pure crap. The songs are pitiful and shaky. Your money would be better spent on ANYTHING else besides this cd.
Minus "Tubthumping", listening to this album is equal to putting your head in the frig. and slamming the door! Avoid the hype. Not even good dance music.
I used to not be a fan of modern music - this Cd almost turned me off modern music completely (it was a gift from a friend.) There is one good song on it: "Tubthumping" (I didn't know that was the name; I thought the name was "I get Knocked Down.") Anyhow, that is the only good song. The rest are bad (except for "good ship lifestyle," which is okay.) The good part about the Cd is if I turn it on, my sisters step out of my room almost instantly. So, if you're looking for a way to disturb the peace, this is it.
Is there anything less than one star? This might be the worst CD I have ever listened to. One of my friends bought it used, shortly after it came out. Note that fact for future reference: if it just came out, and people are already selling it used, it SUCKED. The lyrics are positively nonsensical, and there is nothing creative or interesting in the instrumentation, melodies, etc. There's one song where all they say is "drip drip drip goes the water." What the heck is that supposed to mean? More like, drip, drip, drip melts the plastic, since I left this in the trunk of my car.
We have had this printer about 3 weeks and the cartridge already needs replaced. We do not do an excessive amount of printing, so I think that is a little too soon to run out of ink.Also this printer jams up very easily (one of the reasons I was replacing the last HP printer I had) I feel I have spent as much time fixing paper jams as I have printing. It is easy to fix when it does jam up, but a little frustrating that it happens so often.The print quality is good (just make sure you have the paper settings set correctly to the type of paper you are using!) and it does print quietly and is easy to operate. But overall I would not recommend it.
Lasted six months. Never worked exactly right since I purchased it. I think it had software driver problems. Would work sporadically, then lock up and paper have to be cleared manually. Final straw, no matter what type paper it was fed, it would catch in the feed path underneath the print head for no apparent reason. Of course the paper still keeps trying to feed, so the machine just wads it into a mess. In addition to the software driver problem, I think it has a significant design problem with the paper feed as it often trys to feed up to five or six sheets at once, even the HP desk jet paper designed for such printers. I will say that when it did work, it printed well.
My 940C lasted five years, but ate up its paper drive mechanism yesterday.The prints were very good, although color quality was sometimes off.Hard to complain when it came free with the Mac, but it is a slow printer and with amulti-color ink cartridge, somewhat more expensive than a printer using more individual cartridges.Always had minor paper feeding glitches.
I spent over 2 1/2 hrs. (after 1 hr. myself) on the phone with HP trying to install this printer. It never would work right. The HP tech said there is a problem in the software program of this printer. This HP DESKJET 940C is everyone's worst installation nightmare!
Despite the great rating and rave reviews, I curse the day I brought this one home. I have gone through at least a ream of paper in the three weeks I have had this printer--not because I am so productive, but because the paper jams so often and the printer actually shreds the paper as it tries to eject. Several cries for help and complaints to HP customer service resulted in "that's a common problem. The arm doesn't detract after each page. You will have to manually reset the arm whenever that happens." So far, that means 6-8 times per day. No more HP for me! This is my second bad experience. You would think I would have learned by now.
I decided to get a new printer for picture reproduction and small business projects. The printer shredded 40% of the print jobs I sent. The roller jams the paper in back, forcing you to remove a panel and ripping the sheet from the teeth of this monster. It is like playing toy-tug with my dog. If it does not eat your print jobs, then the sheet is fed in cockeyed and it prints off kilter when a lucky sheet makes it out of this beast. I was very dissapointed after only one week of ownership
I owned this printer for more than a year. It worked fine until I bought a new computer, I unplugged it, moved to a new place, and replugged it. The power supply burnt out. The printer was dead. I wasted 2 packs of unused expensive ink cartridges.
I bought a new laptop and wanted a new printer. This wone came highly recommended from the story. It worked great for three months (of course, the length of the warranty). It now only states "paper jam" and after hours of time on the phone and with the hints on the web, I am going out to buy a new printer - I would certainly not buy this one, again.
This is the 3rd HP printer I have owned and it has broken the fastest. My first one was around for four years of college, then it died. The second, an 820 Cse lasted about 18 months. The 940c lasted me just over a year and died. Add to this the fact that the cartridges are expensive (I'm stuck with 6 of them) and don't last terribly long.I'm thinking laser to replace this one, and a Canon inkjet for color printing.
After using this printer for one year (home use), a plastic bracket to which a spring attaches to maintain belt tension on the print cartridge carriage broke. Rather than try to get a new part, I'm going to throw this printer away and buy a new one.
I have had mine for about two years. I love the color it gives but it has also given me a lot of problems. Something has gone wrong with the memory inside making it impossible to print in "best" quality. An error message will pop up on my screen and then it will start printing out garbled junk. I've down loaded the latest driver--more than once--but with no success. It has been a waste of money to me--especially when ink cartridges are so high for it!!
Do not buy this printer. I have had nothing but trouble with it- it jams every other time I print, and most of the time, it grabs 3-4 papers at once, and prints on all of them. I certainly expected better quality from HP, and this did not deliver. The printing is decent when it works, which is not often. I will be looking for a different company next time.
I replaced an EPSON about 6 months ago that worked for about 9 months before the paperfeed went out. I thought I was "movin' up" by purchasing an HP, well, this one stopped working after 6 months: the printer carriage gets hung up on the right. I went to the website for troubleshooting options, none of which solved the problem....and the warranty is the biggest weakness...90-days! This alone speaks poorly of the expectations HP has of its own products. EPSON's warranty was 1 YEAR, but I had misplaced the receipt. SO, perhaps EPSON is a better deal, as long as you KEEP THE RECEIPT!
Again, a good product, but over priced. I would try to find some gently used ones.
Found this on sale and excitedly tried it this morning in my coffee and a fresh fruit and yogurt smoothie. I wasn't pleased with results in the smoothie because it didn't seem to dissolve properly, probably because of the cold. This resulted in my smoothie having a "sandy grit" texture but the taste was okay. It did dissolve properly in the hot coffee and tasted just fine.Maybe an hour or so later my tummy started gurgling and shortly after was my first of MANY mad dashes to the bathroom today. This started with the smoothie at about 8 AM and has continued throughout the day (it is now 4:15 PM). The info about the product states that it does not cause gastrointestinal distress but other reviews support my experience that it certainly does too AND it continues for long after the product has surely been flushed (pun intended) from your body.
Mild sweeetness - though ultimately tastes like soap - or something reminiscent of soap.
50,000 years in the future and they are still smoking cigarettes, reading newspapers, the main power source is nuclear energy..and they carry nuclear guns??? A kid in the 2nd grade has more imagination!I almost made it to the end. It had gotten so absurd that it finally just drifted off to a shelf....What I didn't like:1) Lack of imagination (see above).2) Cardboard characters. Nobody to really cheer for..either the character is a pencil necked geek or some babbling fool.3) False religion mumbo jumbo: never would of worked IF most/allthe priests new it was a farce.Avoid unless you need something to stoke the fire with next winter.
This has to be one of the worst books i EVER picked up. Within the fist 50 pages, iwas bored out of my mind. I don't know why everyone think this book is SOOOOO good, don't listen to them. If you like BAD books this is the one for you! I hope Asimov has some better books, cause he has to be acclaimed a good writer for something (or book)!
This book is one of the most overrated books I have ever read. There is very little in the way of plot and character development. There is no climax in this book. The book reads like a historical record, similar to Tolkiens Silmarillion, rather than an actual story. If you like reading historical records, you may like this book. If you are looking for an exciting novel.... better luck elsewhere.
Asimov had some interesting concepts in this novel. It's unfortunate that he killed them with his stale characters and unbelievable plot devices. The book (and its successors) read like an episode of Leave It to Beaver set in outer space. The repetitive vault openings became tediously predictable - I felt like I had read the same chapter a dozen times. Read the Cliff Notes, save yourself some time. *****
The first time I tried to read Foundation, I was six years old, and it was simply too complex for my developing mind. Just a few months ago, however, I was cleaning out my attic and came across the same old book. To ascertain it's actual nature as interpreted by the adult mind, I read it again. I was amazed not only by the sheer brillance and ingenuity of the ideas contained within it, not only by the grandiose size of the subject matter, but mostly by the writing, which I regarded as absolutely horrid. The plot is clunky, the conversations roll off the tongue like sandpaper covered in peanut butter, and the descriptions could have been written better by some obscure species of mosquito. As a book, it could be improved by changing the title from "Foundation" to "How Not to Write a Book" or "Please Steal These Ideas and Rewrite Them in English." I highly reccomend it to people for use as a very expensive and ineffective paperweight.
I have heard so much about this book over the years but didn't like Asimov's writing so I never read it. Well, I thought maybe this was different but no, it's the same poor writing. I love the idea of psychohistory but that's where the love ends for this book. And Hari Seldon dies before we get to know and like him. Dull, mostly pointless conversations between people you don't know as the story jumps quickly over time ruin this book. And how lazy of Asimov to not develop his ideas. At one point he gets out of this by having a character watch a movie that we can't see which describes something that would have been interesting and clever had it been developed.I guess I'll finish the series because I've heard the other books are better. Phew, glad I got this out of the way.
I am a huge fan of science fiction and fantasy, and have been reading these books for 20 years. I picked up the Foundation books because Asimov was supposed to be so great, and I really enjoyed his short stories. This book - all of the books in this series - is so amazingly boring it could be used to replace Thorazine. The concept was solid, but the characters made me not care at all. I kept hoping they would die simply so there would be something interesting happening. If you must read it, check it out from the library and save your money. Unless of course you're a chronic insomniac; then, by all means, buy this book.
I couldn't wait to read the first of the Foundation novels, having got such great reviews, and having heard that it's been such an inspiration to so many other sci-fi authors. But I could barely finish it. The book is flat-out boring. There is no action, choosing rather to focus mostly on matters of political intrigue. If you like watching CSPAN, then you'll love this book.There is also no continuity of storyline or characters. The book constantly jumps ahead in time right about the time you've wrapped your head around the current characters and plot.It's like a set of boring short stories, loosely stitched together with an single underlying theme.
This seems like awfully shoddy science fiction to me. The old complaint about thin characterization isn't even the worst of it, nor are the crazy anachronisms [rampant cigar smoking, newspapers and casual misogyny]. But so much of this plot develops in the form of uninteresting local political maneuvers between slightly AynRandized heroes and buffooning villians, with no sense of place or grandeur whatsoever.The timeline of the novel is suddenly too breif after introducing the vast concept of a 40,000 year swing through history, and neither the future society Asimov has envisioned nor the apparant brilliance of the plan at the heart of this series are ever portrayed convincingly. Whatever powerful effect this book may have had in its day, it is bereft of it now.
... but that didn't prevent me from intensely disliking it. The characters are flat, the story is contrived, and why are all people of power in this world men? Very realistic idea of the future.
I read this book as a teenager and was excited to be reminded of it recently. I went to Amazon to purchase the book to find that it is one without text to speech enabled.I make it my policy not to buy any book that doesn't have this feature as I prefer to read when I'm stationary and listen while I'm driving. Since the future isn't here yet and I can't safely read while I'm driving, this is a problem for me.Listen up publishers. I'm not going to buy your audio book. Disabling this feature just ensures that I'll not buy your ebook either. If I really want to read this book, I'll find a used copy because you've annoyed me that much.
Copyright restrictions make it so I cannot get this classic on my kindle... Its a kindle, I should be able to get any book in any language sent to me in any part of the world. I hate you Johnny Copyright!
Count me with the minority who found this book unreadable. It was incredibly dated with imagery very thin and sparse. I got lost in the pointless dialog and was unable to finish.
I enjoy Asmov's science books. They are informative, clever and witty. But his science fiction is another matter. They are poorly written. And worse, I didn't believe a word of Foundation. Such accutate prediction is impossible. It's not only extremely difficult to predict the major trends, but to have his character predict such minor details as well is absurd. Just one example of the difficulties of prediction: Isaac Asimov, a well informed and very intelligent man, missed the computer revolution, though it was already under way when he wrote Foundation.
This has to be one of the most over rated books (and series) of all time.The dialog and character development is horrible. The characters have about as much depth as paper dolls. The language is about as colorful as a newspaper.The ideas behind the novel may have been new and interesting 50 years ago, (although anyone familar with Wells, Huxley, or Verne would debate that), but now they are just tired and beaten like a dead horse.
Just writing this to provide moral support for anyone who reads this book and is thoroughly underwhelmed.Asimov's prose is clean but his tone seems uneven in this installment, as opposed to the tighter first book.The book is essentially two disconnected adventures... not very appealing.There's a female character in the second adventure that's quite problematic; she's dull, and Asimov spends a lot of time and effort on the fact that she's (gasp) not male.Finally, this series feels very dated, in terms of language, attitudes, and even vision of the future. "Nuclear" is the buzzword; everything's like the '50s, but nuclear-powered.I liked Foundation but Foundation & Empire tends to wander away from the idea of the Foundation as the main character, and instead can't seem to decide whether to focus on galactic-level events or protagonists. This would be excusable if the protagonists were interesting.Go read Jack Vance or Gene Wolfe if you want masterful sci-fi!
I ordered this book 2 weeks ago and it just now came today. What's worse, it's in absolutely terrible shape. The front cover is ripped, the spine has old sticker residue on it, and the back looks like it's been chewed on by a small animal. So much for being "Used- Very Good Condition"
This book has all the Asimovian trademarks: intriguing ideas marred by utterly forgettable and indeed interchangeable characters, cringe-inducing dialogue, and a plodding storytelling style and pace. Later in his career Asimov fixed these problems *somewhat*, but at this point he was very young and they are present in full force. The unfortunate truth is that this book simply doesn't deserve the praise heaped upon it; it's some kind of herd mentality that leads to so many people venerating Foundation. If you are seriously into science fiction, then by all means read the entire Foundation series: it has historical importance and there is enjoyment to be had there. But I hate to think that there are people who are introduced to science fiction by this book.
I respect Asimov as a writer of science fiction. However after reading all of the Foundation series I wish it had more humanity in it. The book was overly complex. The characters did nothing for me. The Foundation series is over rated in my humble opinion. It falls in the category that I call dry sci-fi. Asimov's Robot series was better than this.
Prelude to Foundation is excellent. However, you should stop there. Foundation is bad. This book is totally predictable. Read DUNE if you want something intelligent and entertaining. Read FOUNDATION if you want something that you probably won't even finish.
The book was apparently resent after not arriving 5 weeks after ordering and it still hasnt arrived after two months. phshopus customer service has been responsive but there is something going wrong with the shipment process
I got pretty bogged down with the multiple characters and places and time periods. Not a good book to pick up occasionally, takes a focussed reading. And that's just one of the series!
I realize I'm in the minority compared to the other reviews but I don't feel this book is even close to being half as good as the first foundation book. The two stories lacked charters that I cared about and unlike the first foundation book their was very little to contemplate. Also I guessed the big twist in the second story by the third page.
It isn't my kind of book but, I thought, I would give it a try. We read it in our book club. Some of the readers liked it, most of them didn't. I didn't. But, the author did have great insight to the future in the 1950 - 1960's
...To my surprise and disappointment, I found "Foundation" to be an exceptionally terrible "book", totally undeserving of the praise it has received here. As some of the other reviewers have pointed out, the writing style is of a very poor quality indeed. It is not only very dull and dry, but it is also totally lacking in any kind of style or art. The dialogue is simply dreadful, the character development is nonexistent, and the story is pointless and not at all well structured. The fact that this alleged "novel" is really a collection of short stories is readily apparent, as there is no cohesion and very poor correlation between sections. This is not memorable writing in any way and it has no redeeming qualities as a work of literature. In fact, the only time I should ever like to mention it again is as an example of poor writing, atrocious story-telling, and science-fiction that is totally wanting for any kind of inspiration. ...
I only recently read this so called masterpiece. I even went do far as to order the special complete edition from the Science Fiction Book Club. Even though I got through it I cannot believe all of the outstanding reviews and awards this series has received. No characters, no science, no mystery (who couln't figure out the identitiy of the Mule?). In addition the story is basically one of the collapse of the Roman Empire. It probably could have been rewritten replacing historical language instead of spacefare and it would not have mattered in the slightest. The only science fictional element was Psychohistory which is not developed at all due to the nature of the plot. If this is a classic, I shall stick to more obscure and worthwhile reads. Blech.
This ANTONLINE site has falsely advertized this HP Deskjet 960Cse Color printer on Amazon. After paying the advertized price of $61.97 plus $22.82 shipping and handling charge, they sent and delivered you a 6 oz size bubble wrapped pack Innovera Solid ink sticks/cartridge.No invoice or phone number in the package!
I have just spent 5 minutes trying to get this damn printer to print an envelope without mangling it. Wonderful.
I saw his film when it was originally released. Robert Altman maybe have been one of the world's greatest directors,but COLD DAY was a low in his career.Sandy Dennis was brilliant as always but the ultra slow and moody film seems to go on forever.Seeing it on video years later again did nothing for me.Sometimes you like films better the second time around but not so for me in this case.It was no wonder that the film was largly forgotten shortly after its original release.
There are a few decent things here, for example the author's idea of your stock portfolio as inventory in your personal business, but there is too much pretense at telling the reader Wall Street "secrets", and not enough hard analysis. And even the inventory metaphor falls down: Good stock picks should increase in VALUE, not just in price. And if they do increase in value, and the price does not get too far ahead of the value, they should not be too quickly sold.
Oh man. I don't even know what these guys are. Are they dogs, cats, or 5 dollar bills? I have no idea. I wish we could take a look at this movie 80 years in the future and see what futuristic space people have to say about busting boos with a vacuum cleaner. I mean the symbolism is magnificent, the vacuum cleaner represents the struggles of mankind to end racism while the boos represent Strom Thurman. It's a beautiful masterwork that takes a certain Narron/Dorinsky-esque look at how retarded you are for reading this review.
The book is okay, but there are some errors. Chapter 7, page 123, says that "Protein synthesis begins with the transcription process". This becomes a quiz question at the end of Chapter 7, but according to the quiz key in the book, the answer "transcription" is incorrect. Also, quiz question number 1 at the end of Chapter 7 also appears to give an incorrect answer (according to the quiz key). Also, there seem to be more inconsistencies. So I am disappointed. Otherwise, if it weren't for these errors, this could be a great book - a five star instead of a two star.
This book is nearly worthless. Large parts of it are just lists of organisms and there are frequent grammatical errors, typos, misspellings. It's clear it was written in a rush. The blurb on the back says "lavishly illustrated" which is a lie. All the illustrations, of which there are few, are not even B&W photos but line drawings, and not even very good ones at that. For example, The very first two, meant to illustrate two different organisms, are hard to tell apart. Save your money and buy something else.
This could be a great book. A lot of wrong answers in the chapter quiz area. This could lead to a lot of confusion in a subject that is confusing enough on its own (that is why we bought the book in the first place...right?).
What a waste of paper. Nothing useful in here at all. This is more for a third grader than an adult taking a college course. Find a better book or you will be sorrowfully disappointed.
This book was a major disappointment for me. Bette was a very annoying character. She reminded me to much of Chloe's mother in the first book. Also this book did not seem a little bit cheesy to me. The fact that they decided to make Bette a spy just adds to how cheesy that this book is. The beginning and end of the book were wonderful, but the middle was very disappointing.
The movie started out poorly and went down hill from there. I was waiting for it to get better and realized after 30 minutes it was only going to get worse. Stopped after 50 minutes. I just could not waste any more time on this movie. If you read reviews before watching a movie and there are this many bad reviews, don't watch.
this movie was so boring. no wonder i never heard of it. to bad it was a bomb. long and BORING
Bad Acting, Bad Camera Work, Bad Editing, Bad story line. Sigh. Being a native New Orleanian, I had great hope for the movie. But it is just a waist of time to watch this.
I usually like Nicolas Cages' work. He's a fine actor. However, his acting just couldn't save this rather stupid 2009 film in which he is cast as a drug addicted detective in post-Katrina New Orleans. No doubt he has a complicated life. His girlfriend is a prostitute, his father is a recovering alcoholic and his father's wife likes to drink a whole lot of beer. His world is one of drug addiction and corruption and there's not a single character that is in any sense likable. To top this all off, it is so boring that I fell asleep. Definitely not recommended.
Alright, this movie is boring. I watched it hoping that it would get better and it didn't. I had a lot of high hopes for this movie based on the reviews I read before watching it. Yes, Nick Cage did a good job with what he had and Eva as always is beautiful but that is pretty much the highlight of the movie.
I found this movie pathetic at times. The drug use and plot line was, at times, absurd. I wish I hadn't wasted my $ renting this b/c it just wasn't worth it. The director's failed attempts at being "artsy" with the alligator, iguanas and the like was obvious and remedial and any action to be David LynchY was lost on practically anyone except perhaps the director.As you may surmise, this won't be one in my permanent library.
If you want to watch this, the better option is to rent it. It has nothing to do with the original. It stands on its own. Between the coke-takings and the iguanas and the alligators, there's not enough punch to make this film emerges as a great film to be bought and re-watch again in my book. There were a lot of potentials, but the director takes the easy way out with an already thin plot. Nicholas Cage was ok, too bad Fairuza Balk had only 2 scenes. Eva Mendes and Val Kilmer's talents were wasted. Just everage to such a promising start of a might-be-an-awesome film. Just ok, but not memorable at all.
Couldn't watch more than 30 minutes. The acting, the plot, everything... completely just... BAD. Why do people enjoy this movie?
This just plain bad. Boring..... I did not find this the least bit entertaining nor interesting. It was a waste of my time.
I tried giving this movie a chance... watched it all the way thru... even though I was going to shut it off multiple times... this is probably the worst movie I've watched ever...
can not believe I watched the whole movie, I kept hoping it could get better. Never did get any better, only worse
Horrible Movie, worst I have ever seen! Nick Cage's career is definitely over if it wasn't before this piece of garbage!
I have to say, this was the WORST Nic Cage movie I have ever seen! The director is horrible, it looks like a cheap movie and why waste your time? And Val Kilmer, dude, lose some weight, you make me want to start working out more just seeing you! He looked his best in Top Gun, but ever since that movie, and Batman, he has let himself go! I am not trying to judge, but he used to be nice to look at...DON'T WASTE YOUR TIME! I am glad it was free thru the Prime, thank goodness!
Go break open a red light camera and steal the film. Watch that. It will have 10,000 times better acting and a much more coherent plot too!
the service was good on this movie.. came quickly and in timely mode.. but the movie sucked.. it started off good.. but in the middle.. it lost its appeal.. he was a bad lieutenant.. but it just didn't catch and keep my eye.. and towards the end.. it was like.. what is going on.. it changed completely from the beginning..N. Cage is good actor.. but Eva.. she really didn't have a plot...
This was one of the worst movies I have seen in a long time. I usually enjoy Nicholas Cage movies but this is so far beneath him I can't imagine why he would even do it.
What a terrible movie, garbage. It totally sucks. What is Hollywood coming to. It seems they are running out of stories to make movies about. What garbage. Good Lord. Right up there with Boondock Saints 2 and Smokin Aces 2.
There is not ONE redeemable quality about this film. Period. Nicolas Cage is at the bottom of the barrel. He now has absolutely NO range. The acting in this was worse than a low budget B movie. I think he seriously was on something! So here we are New Orleans Post Katrina. Nic is supposed to be a tough guy and gets into all kinds of trouble. I couldn't figure out who was coming or going. I was baffled the entire movie! The lines were HORRIBLE! PLEASE SAVE YOUR MONEY!
I like Nicolas Cage, but this movie was a waste of time-BAD story, CRAPPY acting...Don't waste your time on this GARBAGE!
Begs comparisons to Keitel's original and fails on every level. It never creates sympathy for the gritty immoral world this cardboard cutout inhabits. It's easily Cage's worst performance and the all time worst use of music in a drama ever. Unlike man of steel Keitel, this clown would have overdosed or been shot 10 times over. Any rookie cop could point out a dozen giant plot holes.
So he's a dirty cop and an all around horrible person. Spoiler... Everything worked out in the end? What the heck was the point of that movie? Seriously... everything worked out in the end?I don't know why I continued to watch.
SAVE YOUR MONEY!!! This movie only goes to show that Nicolas Cage and Val Kilmer are definitely washed up as actors. I wish I could get my money and my time back on this movie. I just want to put my eyes out with a cordless drill thinking how much I watched of this trash before turning it off.
there is no words to describe this movie! all i can say this movie sucks and it was awful!
This is one of the worst movies I've seen in a long-long time. The plot is very unimaginative, and is active is plain horrible.There isn't much more to say.
Even Cage, with some genius acting in parts, couldn't save this bad movie.One of the wosre movies I have ever watched.Why do they keep hiring Eva Mendes - she acts like a piece of wood.
How did this collection of letters make it to print...when there are scores of personalities whose letters I'd love to read in a collection that haven't? These letters are very boring and he did not write to many notable people (a few to McCartney, Lennon and Olivier). Before you read about a theater critic, read what William Goldman said in his legendary book about Broadway THE SEASON, in the chapter titled "The Approvers." That tells you all about theater critics you need to know. THEN you can decide whether to read this one of Tynan's letters. I don't think this book would have made it to print if Tynan's wife hadn't been shoving it down publisher's and editor's throats. Dull, dull, dull, except for about five of the letters.
This is an updated publication of a c. 1980 text. It is very informative on the properties of fuel alcohol and the different raw material possibilities. It also explains in some detail how to make ethanol on the farm-scale from improvised DIY equipment.It would benefit from a more up-to-date context and a slightly more commercial orientation, in my opinion.
Too difficult to attach to my shoes...I prefer to tie my laces, even though I may have to do it more than once.
One of my favorite shows ever, the DVD itself was rushed to capitalize on John Ritter's death. This is what I hate about movie studios, it's all about the money and not about quality. Thumbs down to the transfer, thumbs down to the menus, thumbs down to the speed of menu access.Remember, I'm not rating the show because it would get 10 stars. The transfer is garbage.John you are the man. Sorry about this quality!
I thought that because the DVD stated Season One that I was getting the entire season one. Much to my surprise it only included six episodes. I now know that unless it states COMPLETE season it isn't. I was quite disappointed and feel that the advertising is misleading.
I think Three's Company is the WORST sitcom there EVER was on telivision. Bad writing BAD acting and JUST PLAIN BAD all the way around. The horrible thing was it was SO bad you sometimes felt compelled to watch it in spite of your better judgement. PAINFULLY stupid plots.
In description this serie specific dubbed to spanish but is not real only English language. Not subtitules in spanish.Mal mal mal. But Is very funny.
I purchased this as a replacement for an old roll up tatami mat that I purhased at least twenty years ago. These are perfect for taking to the beach but couldn't find them local now. The tatami is woven tightly so that it keeps the sand off. Saw this and looked like a good idea.These are really three separate tatami mats, each about 11" wide by about 6' in length, joined by a blue canvas strip that runs the full length (top to bottom). It is colorful and handy, folding up in to object about the size of a large book with handles.Problem I ran into was that the strip joining two of the panels ripped apart first time I took it to the beach, rendering it useless for its intended purpose. Perhaps mine was just a bad sample but at $10 a throw, I will be asking for a refund.
In the picture it seems bright, cool, So I ordered! I received it few days back.. not good looking, not of good quality!!
the book came highly recommended, but it didnt humor me and I couldnt warm up to the authors style of writing. bored me too...sadly gave up half way into it.
The Ramones meet AC/DC. A live record with the song covered by Pearl Jam. Not a great recording. The songs are good, would rather hear studio versions. If you are looking to buy cause of the Pearl Jam song.. don't waste your money. Otherwise they are a good band but the production is no good!
From a woman who sold out her body ages ago and now attempts to be a partisan hack, and poorly at that. Why anyone would want to wipe their feet on this dirty carpet is beyond me. Not worth the time it took to phone in sex.
I have had this camera for 18 months and about 2 months ago, it started beeping at me to eject the tape almost every time I used it. I went on-line and found that this is common with this camera for some reason. I was able to prevent major problems by removing the tape after each use, but that no longer works. Now I cannot record or watch any tape without it forcing me to remove the cassette. I was very fond of this camera until it stopped working. I am very disappointed that I will now have to buy a new camcorder (a local repairman estimated over $200 to fix it). I have a friend who has the exact same camera and he has yet to have a problem, but it isn't worth the risk.
It was a pretty good camera until it stopped working. One day I turned it on and it started beeping and flasshing an eject tape message. But you couldn't eject the tape and the camera would not respond to anything. I had the camera just over two years when this happened. Luckily I purchased an extended warranty at Best Buy. Best Buy sent the camera to Canon for repair. Canon would not repair it because it would be too expensive so, Best Buy gave me a new camera. And I was allowed to get a different brand, so I went with a Sony Handycam.
I bought the ZR45MC camcorder in Sept '02. I have been using it quite regularly. then all of a sudden I cannot load new or old mini DV cassettes. The moment I load a cassette, a message flashes on the screen 'REMOVE TAPE' and beeping sound is generated together with a flashing 'EJECT' message. Next step, I ship this to the Canon Factory service in NJ. They replied with an estimate of $160(on top of the $654 I pad for this!!).Also most importantly when I shipped from the Fedex office in Boston, the Fedex person made a remark that she has been seeing quite a number of the Canon camcorders going to NJ for repairs.To sum, I think this is a racket Canon has devised to rip off customers.So beware when you buy a Canon camcorder, ask the retailer about the tape loading mechanism, and if they have any maintenance plans that will repair it.
I used this camera for a year untill during a period of a couple weeks of not being turned on, something to do with the light sensor malfunctioned. I think all Canon ZR series cameras are inclined to having buggy hardware and I dont remcomend buying one.
I love the features and optics of this camera. I love everything about it, except that it really doesn't work and their service is terrible. Many people posted about the humming sound -- I didn't have that problem. But the electrical system was intermittent from the time I got the camera. I've sent it to them three times, and each time they repair it, or claim to. Now it is out of warranty and the battery still doesn't work. So I'll have to buy a new camera and hope that you don't make the same mistake I did -- go with a different camera.
This album received a fair amount of critical acclaim, so I thought I'd give it a listen. Well so much for critics! Gainsbourg can't sing a lick. She makes people like Britney Spears, Jessical Simpson & Janet Jackson sound like Beverly Sills or Marilyn Horne. The producers must recognize this too, because her voice is mixed very low on most of the tracks. On top of not being able to sing, she doesn't compose and doesn't play an instrument. So why is there a CD bearing her name? You got me. Maybe cashing in on daddy's renown? The botton line is don't waste your money. If you want to hear some good French CDs, check out "Hors de Toute Doute" or "Le Silence des Roses" by France D'Amour (from Quebec).
I bought this album in the hope of finding some kind of chic, interesting tunes "a la French", to match with her voice that I remembered from the past, but there's absolutelly nothing interesting inside: some elevator's music that won't disturb you in any given context. Utterly prescindible...
Not very useful. Perhaps too high a level for a layman like me. Seems to be written for a serious student of Buddism.
I know the whole point of "dummie" and "KISS" books is that they are supposed to be easy for anyone to understand but this book was too simple--too basic. I read a chapter and could hardly bear to invest anymore time in it since the information was so sparse. If I hadn't gotten this book for a steal I would have been very upset at my waste of money. There was just no real information. What a waste.
I bought this book two months ago... It's outdated.It might include the information you are looking for, but at a very basic level. I went with the "Undestanding Exposure" by Bryan Peterson, and with "The Digital Photography". Both have outstanding reviews... and these will do the trick teaching you what you need to know to take great/almost pro photos...
This compilation contains some of the best jazz guitar ever in songs like Scotland I, the Jam with Albert and Yin. Unfortunately it also digs up silly tripe like Eyes of Love, Planet End, Adam Smasher and Rene's Theme. The shorter compilation, the Essential Larry Coryell is less expensive, more consistent and manifestly superior to this double CD.
Ordered a Belkin, got something unknown. Part number on unit (BI13-120100-AdU) doesn't match the advertised one. What's up with that? $11 is too much for a knock off brand.
I'm not a huge dance/techno/electronica/call-it-what-you-want fan, but I do dabble. And seeing the addition of vocals, bass and guitars to a dance outfit piqued my interest. Unfortunately, it didn't hold it. Nothing really bad here, it just didn't make much impression. "Drop the Break" is OK, and I liked the trance-y feel of "Yallah Habibe". The only other impression I got was the rather silly lyrics on "Abduction". Serviceable for background music, but not really an album I could get into.
To put it bluntly... I hate this CD. I thought I would like it because I fell head over heels in love with Cirrus' Counterfeit CD. I listened to that CD for a week straight I loved it so much... then I got this CD. It's like a tribute to bad... BAD... 80's music. Not to bash on the people who actually like this CD but if you listen to Counterfeit first and then go to this one... you will be very dissapointed. It's one of the few CDs of mine that I would love to just toss in the trash and I rarely get a CD that I hate. It was worth all of the 69 cents I paid for it on Amazon.
The only song that's worth listening to on this album is "Break in" and it can be found on Superstar DJ Keoki's "Transatlantic move". Go for his album instead...
I didn't care for this book at all - in fact, I stopped reading it several times because it droned on and on about the writer's depression - so much so, it made me depressed! I wanted to read about her recovery - and after more than half of the book behind me, I was still looking for that. I wouldn't recommend this book to anyone!
She seemed to be "ill" when it was convenient for her. All I kept thinking about was how she should have thanked her lucky stars that she and her family could afford all that treatment.I really kind of wanted to smack her and say Snap out of it!
This book was really dry... there were a couple interesting moments but most of the book was a lot of unnecessary words. This is one of the very few books that I didn't finish!
When written, this books topic was well known. Individuals and styles of communication were well understood.With time, the people and places Con Price refers to are only familiar to a few local individuals-and only important in regards to this fund of knowledge.I am currently working with Dr. William Thackery of MSU-Northern, Havre, Montana to upgrade and update the book and subscript the text for improved reading, relevance, and accuracy. Once done this text may be a leading contribution to the history of Montana and Southern Alberta.Yours,Ruth M. Burleigh P.O.Box 608 Chinook, Montana 59523 (406)357-4255
I loved this when I first started using it and recommended it to everyone -- but after very limited use, it was totally shot. Either the keys didn't respond at all or if you pressed one key, multiple letters appeared ("a" became "as"; "q" became "qw") and it was impossible to return. One friend who also purchased it had exactly the same problem within a month, so it wasn't just a bad unit.If I coud give it NO stars, I would.
Christopher Lambert and Ice-T are supposed to be the stars here, but what little depth this movie has comes from Michael Halsey, who turns a professional killer into a sympathetic figure (and that ANYONE can earn any sympathy in this bit of video treacle is itself an achievement).If you're not a big fan of bloodless, mindless gunplay, the only reason to buy this movie is for the soundtrack. Mambo fans will actually enoy it, as well as the Andean flute/guitar instrumental.
I've now seen the film Mean Guns twice and I have even purchased the DVD (albeit off of a bargain rack). This isn't a great film, it isn't even really a good film, but it can be entertaining if you like violence and mambo.The story behind the movie is weak at best and the cast (consisting mostly of Ice-T and Christopher Lambert) really doesn't do much to improve the film. There are some interesting action moments, all to the beat of Mambo music.If you can find it for a cheap price I'd suggest it, but I wouldn't pay any more than a couple of bucks for this film. Of course if you're a diehard Christopher Lambert fan or if you really love Mambo and Violence, this might be something you want to invest in.
I was very disappointed in this book. I have found shop set up for effecient layout and dust collection to be the most important aspects of my woodworking. I am always looking for new and innovative ways to be as effecient and effective in these areas. I could find no difference in this book and the earlier version it replaces. Even the photos are same outdated photos that appear to be taken in the late 70's used in the 2001 release. Please, Taunton, don't insult your readers by continuing to regurgitate the same information with a shiny new label in an attempt to sell more books. Please strive to produce new and relevant photos and information. Your books and magazines are already some of the most expensive, it would be nice if the quality matched.
Lots of great ideas for those with unlimited budgets. Many of the suggestions are not within the economic means for those thinking about setting up a shop; although the author includes many photo's for the "Dream" shop. Most references to tools include equipment that costs $1,000's (or more!). Lot's of fluff from the author and plentiful color photos of shop layouts, tools, and equipment that the average "Joe" would spend decades purchasing. Not too much "practical" information about "The Practical Guide to Designing and Building Your Dream Shop". Definately a dream.
The best thing I found in this book is the picture on the cover. Well, actually the uncropped version in chapter 5. Beyond that, I found everything else to be non-practical from a design perspective. A photo of a filthy dust collector area when discussing the advantages of central collection or electrical wiring that would never pass inspection is typical. I'd rather see plan views of real shops that work with reasons for the decisions made.
This record discusted me, mr Sanders ought to think less about money and care more for the quality of the music! I mean, this man has played with Coltrane and obviously he didn't get it. Dont buy this cd, its popular music in its worst sense. Instead you should buy a record with John Coltrane. In his latet period he is in to the same themes as Sanders but shows that this doesnt necessarily lead to kitsch.
There is no doubt that this is a cult classic, and there is plenty of reason for it to stay that way. Overall, it was predictable and somewhat lacking in screen presence. I can't really put my finger on what it is that makes the film worth the purchase, but I will admit that it is an interesting example of Australian movie making in the 70's.The story line is somewhat disturbed and there are significant reasons to not allow children to watch this, and really, there is little reason for me to suggest that anyone not completely bored with other avenues of moviemaking watch it either.
Prospective purchasers should note that this dvd is the dubbed version where American actors replace the Australian actors on the soundtrack. I understand that the decision to overdub the part was done when the movie was first released in the US (an Australian friend recalled his shock at the dubbing when he saw it in a US cinema at the time) but I would have thought that the studio could have dug up the original Australian version and released that instead. Because of this irritating and pointless feature of an otherwise fine movie (the best of the Mad Max series), I can only rate the dvd 2 stars.
Don't buy this Video. With DVD technology it would have been a no-brainer to provide both sound tracks, the original Aussie version and the rotten American dubbed version. These dopes chose to give us the one that nobody wants. Perhaps if nobody buys it they'll get a clue.
This DVD is the U.S. release, in which the original Australian dialog (including Mel Gibson's) was replaced with dubbed dialog in "American English".
I thought this movie was boring and it didn't let you get to know any of the characters. The only good thing in this movie is a young, cute Mel Gibson.
I wouldn't waste a single red cent on anything that this jew hating,racist,woman abuser acts in.This guy is a complete and utter psychopath!
It is unfortunate that this film was ever DUBBED. It is not as though Aussies speak another language and Yanks aren't intelligent enough to work some the careful crafted slang in this classic.Fortunate now there is a new UNDUBBED version due for release this mouth, with more features and CHEAPER.I'm selling my old DUBBED copy and buying the new UNDUBBED version.
I am a huge Mad Max fan, so when I found this copy I was really happy (it's hard to find in store) I waited for it to get delivered and sat down with the partner to watch, only I was so disappointed when it was finished as they have cut out half of the original movie!!!Majority of the major scenes are no where to be seen!!I must admit this is the first time I have been let down by Amazon, but with such a classic movie (with the correct rating) why was there any reason to cut out soooooo much of it, for a person who may not have seen this before, they would have no real idea as to what the movie is!!!
I replaced the amber bulbs of the turn signals with these ones. My car has clear lenses and unfortunately these bulbs are so bright that they look reddish, like washed off, they don't have enough red coating to look RED.I was looking for something to look the same color as the stop lights, these bulbs don't do it.
Sold as red, obviously.But I find them to be more pink than dark red. I'm sure they're still legal (or hope they are), but not the look I was hoping for / expecting.Otherwise, they work fine.
Well iu thin that this book should've had a first book. Its very confusing and boring its so long I did not like it !!!!!!!!!!!
The Childhood of a Legendary KingThe tale of King Arthur's youth is an enthralling one. The Sword in the Stone explains King Arthur's youth throughout the book. His name is Wart in the book> From the adventures he takes with the other legends and queens to the learning experiences he has as animals, you won't want to put it down.What makes this book unique is Warts learning experience. He changes into four animals and he turns invisible by Merlin, Warts tutor. The adventures he goes on are amazing. He goes to a giants castle and goes to Morgan le Fay's castle to rescue Friar Tuck. Coming out they had to fight big bird-lion things. The book had no real conflicts.I don't really like reading, but this book is interesting. If you like fantasies then you would like this book. The reason is that he changes into different animals, turns invisible, and fights monsters. It is for readers 13+.
I am going to have to disagree with most of the other reviews posted here. This is not the best that Stereolab has to offer. The first Stereolab records I heard were Dots & Loops and Cobra and Phase... I was absolutely blown away by those albums. I just couldn't get that excited about this one though. The songs are just kind of lifeless; they have some interested ideas, but never really get anywhere with them. It has the same Stereolab sound without any bounce or interplay between the instruments. I would recommend Dots & Loops over this one 7 days a week and twice on Sunday
Hoover's choice of international financial manipulation as subject matter for this novel is timely and raised my expectations. Instead most of the story is pulpy romance surrounding a contrived conflict between Japanese investors scheming to revive Imperial Japan and American regulators intent on saving the free world. The only thing missing from this "B" grade movie plot are black and white hats to differentiate the bad guys from the good guys. Not at all what I had hoped for.
I did not really care for this film, though, it did have a few funny moments, a lot of the attempts at humor fell flat for me. I really like Martin Short, but didn't think he was very funny in this. It was a little corny. I also thought that it was going to be more of a musical, but there was very little singing, so I was disappointed in that. I also didn't like the moral behind the plot, of the wish itself--getting the little girls dad the role in the play--by using any means to sabbotage the character who had the role. I don't think that's a good message for kids, even if the methods used are done by fairy godmothers. I know a lot of shows do that, like Bruce Almighty, but in even that show, in the end he gave the newscaster's job back to the character that he stole it from. I wouldn't recommend this movie to anyone.
Based on the reviews I saw, I assumed that is would be perfect for keeping my blinds clean. That was not the case at all. It does not clean the dirt off your blinds the way you would think. I am very disappointed in this purchase.
This video shows managers,roadies,and freinds, talking about THE MAN. NO complete songs even in the background (which is the only place the music is). If you want to see Hendrix play, it's not here.
I thought this would have more complete songs--like U2's Rattle and Hum or Styx's Return to Paradise. Instead it is a documentary with short clips of Jimi performing. Disappointing...
I was really looking forward to this one. As a fan of the Classic Album Series, I was very disappointed when I watched this one. The volume level is very inconsistent, especially during the sections where people are talking over the music. You have to turn it way up when they're talking, then be quick with the remote when the music starts or it will blow your speakers! For die-hard fans only, and keep the volume remote handy. You'll need it!
I bought this to be a part of my daughter's train set, and have been nothing but disappointed. For starters, the red circular center piece can easily be removed, and I anticipate the day it comes up missing permanently. The wood is slightly bowed, and though it does not impede play, I was expecting a higher quality of toy (this is Brio after all). The most disappointing thing, though, was how small the turntable is. I knew it would not support the larger engines (e.g. Gordon and Henry), but I was surprised that even mid-sized engines such as Edward and James would not fit. I wish I had kept the box because I would love to return this item.
I've read several Bayer novels and enjoyed them very much. After hearing that this novel won an Edgar award I was eager to read it. Well...that must have been a very thin year for Edgar nominees. This book was a severe letdown. Totally unbelievable and it got sillier and more ridiculous the more pages I read. Honestly, I can't believe Bayer would even want this one still in print. His other novels, and the ones he has written as David Hunt, are very good. But this one reads like the work of an amateur by comparison. Give it a miss.
If you read the Beats and about the Beats, you're eventually going to come to William S. Burroughs. He's very much a voice of the 1950s, post World War II. He was into the drugs, longer and harder and deeper than anyone else. He was into shocking the squares and living off the pathetic working class zombies. And it's all there on the page, man. A strong, unique voice that is still imitated decades later.Unfortunately for those of us living in the twenty-FIRST century, it's about as relevant as fins on cars. It's convoluted, drug paranoia with a created mythology about time and space travel that's all about shocking images of sex and death. It's not a story.
I've never read anything by William S Borroughs, and after finishing "Cities Of The Red Night" I don't believe I ever will again! What a strange befuddling mess, I challenge *anyone* to be able to summarize the plot of this book for me in plain-sense English language and actually make sense. This is just a loosely-explained collection of obtuse imagery, bizarre symbolism, wandering prose, distracted dialog, and puzzling language in here....I actually wonder what brand of illicit substances the author was under the influence of when he farted out this novel. IT JUST DOESN'T MAKE ANY SENSE!!! That and you can hardly go a page or two without reading about either 1) shirtless adolescent boys, 2) opium, or 3) compulsive sodomy. So despite the mass confusion of his prose, I'd say #'s 1 and 3 above are why I gave the book two stars instead of just one. Cheers!
I liked Rashel and Quinn, they really go together. It was cool how she hunted down vampires and killed them. I loved it when they burned down the house.
The author points out that this series of crimes is of little importance and has largely been forgotten. It will remain so.
If you want to impress your friends with your new DVD player then (...) don't show them this film. It's a straight forward copy from a video tape that will have you reaching for the tracking button (if only) and the sound is not in sync with the picture. The acting is wooden and the plot is dire. If you are fool enough to buy this, don't come crying to me when you realise I'm right!
The quality of filming is so poor, the beauty of the music and the singer are lost. I saw the "30's version of this as a child, and I wish I could get that....this was a real disappointment. Munsel sings beautifully, but the film itself is boring, and the quality is poor. Unless you really, really love Munsel and the music, don't buy this film.
Here is the timeline of this product:After first two plays, little wood pieces started chipping off;In about two weeks, the pictures started peeling off;In about one month, layered wood started falling apart.Will I still buy puzzle from this company? Maybe, no one else selling small puzzle set for toddlers. What choice do I have? But I do pray to God that somebody will be making a better product soon and drive Melissa & Doug out of business.
For the cost, this puzzle is not well made. The pieces were locked together so firmly that the puzzle was very difficult to get apart. The edges had visible splinters, and over the course of a few days, the tray warped to the point that it doesn't sit flat on a table. The edges of the image on the pieces began to fray immediately as the puzzle was taken apart. To make the puzzle usable, I had to spend 15 minutes sanding the interlocking edges, placing a slight bevel on the bottom of each piece. I then rubbed a white crayon on each edge surface. This made the puzzle easy to work for my 2 year old grand daughter. On the plus side, the image is bright and colorful, and the puzzle is simple enough for a toddler to work. Considering that the puzzle is made in China and probably cost next to nothing to produce, they could have spent a few minutes finishing the edges of the pieces and lacquering the image so that it is more durable.
The pieces of this puzzle are definitely no for kids..or even adults.Its made of poor quality wood and easily chips off.It chips off into such small pieces that can easily embed in anyone skin or even be eaten out of curiosity.Did not expect it from a M@D toy
After reading the other review I baught this puzzle for my son. I have had this puzzle for about a week now, and prob. going to have to toss it. As if with the tightness mentioned in the other review isnt already frustrationg enough, The puzzle pieces are made with layerd wood and taking the puzzle apart made the peices crack&chip and now have little wood peices all over the floor, and some pictures started to peel off. With all this going on I dont think it is save now with the sharp corners and most likely splinters coming soon and if your child is still randomly putting stuff in his mouth still, then he might choke or cut himself. Short to say dont buy, waste of money and time.
This is high density module. It works only with a fewmainboards. It does not with the two I have.Amazon.com - please correct me if I am wrong.
This Kingston memory isn't recognized by my computer which is only about a year and a half old. I went and used SimpleTech memory instead which works just fine. I would not recommend this product.
Despite being a PC133 slot, this chip didn't work with my computer... when I put it in, the computer wouldn't boot, when removed, it booted fine... Other RAM works fine... I've used many Kingston products and this is the first time I had any problems...
As an incurable Beatle-maniac, I looked forward to hearing some of the cuts on this cd. BIG disappointment!! All of the songs are remakes of the original versions, and bad ones at that! None of the original Peter & Gordon or Billy J Kramer versions here. To make matters worse, the remakes are not even faithful to the originals, in some cases not even sticking to the original melody as written, but going off on interpretive "tangents"!! Example: I hardly recognized "Bad To Me" as done here. Save your money, it's not even worth the curiosity value.
A huge Beatles fan who stumbled across this at the CD gift shop at the Rock and Roll Hall of Fame. I actually think this is (was) a great idea for a CD......but this particular production is horrible. They should have tried to keep the songs in the contemporary period they were written. Instead, they take songs which were simple tracks written in the earlier years and try to combine elements from Beatles albums spanning their entire career. The result can best be described as an atrocious mix of taking songs that you may have found on "Please Please Me", and remixing them to fit the style of "Revolver" or "Sgt Peppers". Oh, and it doesn't help that the band they used sucked too. I can think of about a dozen Beatles tribute bands out there that maybe could have done this properly....these guys are BAD. Don't waste your money.
Wavery-voiced pop icon Madonna and incomprehensible non-singer Banderas absolutely destroy this wonderful score. The orchestrations are hideous. Pass this one by, and get the Broadway version (a masterpiece) with LuPone(BRILLIANT!) and Patinkin.
I borrowed a friend's copy and listened to this version. Madonna has a beautiful voice but it is too light for this role. Antonio Banderas is woefully inadequate in the singing department. Do yourself a favor and don't buy this recording. Buy the original Broadway cast C.D. with Patti LuPone and Mandy Patinkin. It is by far the best version.
There is no argument that the soundtrack that this album is from is a well crafted and artistic film but unfortunately the songs have been so overproduced since the original 1976 much rawer concept album that it loses much of the "edge" and message.I hope it wasn't star ego that led to Madonna (playing Evita) singing "Another Suitcase in Another Hall". The switch in cast (it was originally sung by the mistress Evita was throwing out - who disappears from view in this album) completely loses the pathos and point of the song and does a great dis-service to the whole piece.Buy the 1976 concept album first with Paul Jones (possibly the most under-rated Peron) and Julie Covington (singing a really hard-nosed ladder-climbing Evita) to hear how this should sound on audio.
Who told Antonio Banderas he could sing? He can't. Madonna can but could only sing this score, one of Andrew Lloyd Webber's good ones (and they are becoming rare items), if Hollywood had it lowered for her. This does spoil the balance of the musical, but Hollywood doesn't care about things like that. They also gave her a song belonging to another character which makes no dramatic sense whatsoever. Hollywood doesn't care about things like that, either.There are many recordings of the stage musical available. Buy one of those instead.
The motion picture soundtrack, yet alone the motion picture of EVITA, is terrible. Hollywood, as usual, took a wondeful piece of work (the hit musical EVITA) and butchered it to be their way. Patti LuPone is a far better Eva than Madonna, and at least you can understand Mandy Patinkin, unlike Antonio Banderos. Also, Hollywood turned the orchestrations into modern rock 'n' roll junk, when the 1979 Premiere American Recording is the way EVITA should be. So don't waste your money on the movie sountrack, and buy the Premiere American Recording instead
This cd is horrible Madonnas verson of Eva is terrible she should not have been allowed to screw up such wonderful songs as "Dont Cry" and other...i dont suggest this cd to anyone who wants to hear how the songs are suppose to be sung...if you wanna hear them the right way get Elaine Paige's version or Patti LuPone...(forgive me if i spelled her name wrong)......
My order was placed on August 28, but I have not received the printer in a month.
This thing is awful. Prints magenta only. Drives me crazy. I am going to go find a high building to throw it from.
This printer works great for almost any application, but do not expect to print on special paper. On even the soft gloss paper, the ink blobs and gives poor quality printing. The color photos print better on regular paper than on photo or special finish paper. NOT RECOMMENDED FOR PHOTO PRINTING, you will be disappointed.
My review is not about the book. This is one of my textbooks I needed for my course and I was glad that Amazon had it in stock. However I chose to pay highest shiping amount to express delivery for next day, (which happens to be Saturday) so that I have time to review chapter before school started, it did not arrive that Saturday. What is purpose was next day delivery if you don't receive the product on time? I think I paid about $25 for one book when there was an option to receive Monday delivery for much less ($10, I think). The book arrived on Monday after my school started and I did not have a book to take to school. Amazon owes me money!
I ordered this bed for a visit by my 4 year old granddaughter. We had to add air to the bed every morning. I had this experience with another brand, but hoped this one would be better. Definitely NOT worth the money.
The price is great. The bed looks good. I have ordered several over the last few years. I've only had 2 last 6 months or longer_ The most recent one I ordered had a leak so I returned it for a replacement. The replacement started to leak 32 days after receiving---2 days after the return policy. All I can say is if you need it- order 2; because it's likely 1 will start leaking pretty soon. Unless you only use it occassionally. I use mine every day.
We used this for less than 21 days for a guest. It does everything as advertised except that it began to leak air; by the time you wake up in the morning, it has shrunk to less than half it's inflated height. There is a patch kit included but we could not find where the air was coming out. We had to return it to Amazon. We bought a single folding bed instead with a memory foam mattress, not compact but less risky than an airbed.
I bought this air mattress to use while my new bed was being shipped from back east, the bed lost air every night and I woke up almost on the floor. I tried to send it back but it was impossible to get back into the box.
Dear potential sucker,My first airbed by intex sprung a leak in about a week, so I obtained a refund. I bought this model next, and it lasted almost twice as long!I am now on my third. I should have learned my lesson, but my current intex airbed has been around for about one year, and currently has 9, count 'em, NINE leaks. Everytime I patch one, another springs.Intex also makes inflateable boats. They must get sued for a lot of drownings. No wonder they have no email contact. If you buy ANY intex airbed, you are buying utter garbage.Sincerely,SidWa State
I bought this to sleep on while I moved it to my new place and used it about 6 times before the seams on top came apart. I never realized how important the seams were until that dreary night when at 3am they started to come apart. I turned to my side and another came apart. I turned to my other side and the rest came apart (I weigh 120 lbs if it matters)which turned the bed into one giant ball. Since the seams are gone there is no shape and if you lay on it the air is distributed to the opposite of your weight...I ended up in a hammock type pose. I let some air out in hopes it would bring the top down but nope, instead I sunk further.I called the manufacturer, emailed Amazon for the contact info to be sure, emailed the manufacturer again and finally got a response. Although some models come with a 90 day warranty, this one did not so I was SOL.Never again. Buy yourself a cheap mattress instead, at least it won't break and the comfort will be about the same.
A comfortable bed for the money. But I've had 7 or 8 of these, and they ALWAYS fail in one of two ways:1) An external seam will break, usually near the head area. To fix it, use a good size piece of Gorilla Tape (forget the enclosed repair kit) and press down very hard around the leak so no air can get out. No need to deflate or remove flock from the area, but you have to press down carefully and firmly.2) An internal seam will pop (usually in the middle) and create a huge bubble in the center. No way to fix that, unless you want to use pillows or folded blankets to level out the low areas.That's my advice. I'm still looking for a good, sturdy alternate model.
I've bought several air beds from various manufacturers. I bought one identical to this one 1 1/2 years ago. It was comfortable but lost air after 3 months. I justified this as the user may have not taken care. However, I now believe its the brand. This one would not inflate at all. I will not buy this brand again. I've had great life from a better brands.
Currently, there are no wholes throughout the bed. But, for some reason when I wake up. The bed is already out of air. I only weigh 120lbs. I don't understand why it does that. Please save your money, when you start to have the same problem.
I purchased the first airbed and found it to be exactly what I wanted. I ordered and received a second one which I have not yet used. Meanwhile, the first one has sprung a leak and is not usable. Big disappointment. No reason for leakage as it has been used only for small individuals.
If I could give a 0 star I would.So I bought this airbed while I had a friend visiting so she could use my bed. It seemed to work just fine the first night. However the second time I inflated this bed and slept on it, I got the worst night of sleep ever. During the night, the air slowly came out of the bed (I have checked all over for leaks or holes but could not find anything). I woke up several times to a half inflated bed and then had to re-inflate the bed again only to wake up an hour later to the same condition. Needless to say, I am extremely unhappy with the product. Hope Amazon will let me return this terrible thing.
We purchased this bed for an extra for when the kids come over. Nice looking, but don't let looks deceive you. By the morning, you won't have any air in your bed.
It actually lasted a whole month until it decided to deflate and go flat. I guess I am just hard on blowup beds.I was using it every day as a regular bed, perhaps it would be better if used for visitors only.
This product is very difficult for me to use. The air pump does not connect easily and I would not recommend it.
I received this air mattress and was very impressed at first. It's only been a couple of months with sporadic use by an average size/weight person and it's now unuseable. Two of the seams along the top of the mattress have now "popped" so that the top of the mattress is 1/2 big bulge and 1/2 normal. There's no reason this should've happened. When only 1 seam popped it was still ok, but with 2 gone we have to throw it away.
When it started leaking I couldn't find the leaks. First the top started leaking, later the bottom so now I have totally given up on it.It was comfortable before it started leaking.
it inflated easily and was very firm, by the morning i noticed it was considerably softer, and as i sit here now typing this i find myself gradually getting closer to the floor. easy enough to reinflate, but still, this should not happen the first night.
I bought this for my 8 year old to sleep on in temporary housing during a corporate move. This bed didn't last two days and it came apart in the seam where we couldn't patch it. I would not waste my money on this product again.
i only used this bed about a dozen times. it was never really all that comfortable and the last time i inflated it, a huge lump developed right in the middle making it unusable. there is no way to get rid of the lump and it is rock hard solid. it raised up about 3 inches high and is about 15 inches in diameter. its too late to send it back now so its going in the dumpster. i have since read other reviews of intex doing the same thing. i will NEVER get another intex again...i am going back to aerobeds!
i dont know why these guys are trying to cheat. i paid full amount and i was expected to receive a twin size airbed but when i opened it it is actual size is single sized matress! so this company is baad! will never suggest it to someone.
I have always recived what i ordered, but this one was not ..I ordered the hi rise, but recieved one way to short to the ground..it was to much trouble to send back, Im too old..I was dissapointed as now I can,t use it..husband can , but I can,t..be careful you get the right product...
We used the airbed for one guest (my very careful mother-in-law) over the holidays and it was fine. My son took it on a trip and it began loosing air the first night and he has not been able to use it since. I would not buy this again and in fact will try to return it when he returns home with it.
I bought this Intex bed for my son. He is renting an apartment while waiting for a room assignment in a dorm.The bed, although still inflates, now has a bulge in the middle, so he falls off the bed. Even though we tried deflating and inflating the same, the problem is still there.
I bought this for my daughter to sleep on when she was home from college. She actually liked sleeping on it but 3 weeks later it developed a slow leak which I could not find. Therefore I had to throw it away. A complete waste of money.
It only lasted for less than 3 months then there was 2 holes that I fixed but still there was a leak somewhere and eventually I just threw it away. I don't recommend this air mattress.
Heard a huge boom and I noticed the seam had given out and then this huge bubble formed in middle of the bed and then it ripped a few days later. I purchased the product on or around 10-6-2011 and before 11-1-11 it was deflated!
I bought this air mattress two months ago. I used a couple of days and it worked fine. Now a friend is planning to visit so I decided to use it again but something went wrong, instead of a flat surface, there is a huge bump in the middle that would make sleeping on it uncomfortable if not impossible.Since this is a product you will use only a couple of days before putting it away until you need it again, the amazon returning period will be over by the time you actually try it and find something wrong with it. And the company that makes this mattress says "this product does not have any warranty or service program". I hope I can put this in the recyclables bin!I wish I would've spend a little bit money on a real mattress that won`t fail after a while.
Opened the box, unrolled the mattress, plugged in the motor and then... the motor made a few feeble noises and shut off in less than three seconds. Plugged it into several different outlets with the same results.Intex customer service told me that there are NO WARRANTIES on their air mattresses and the only option was to return it to Amazon for a refund. I will not be ordering any products from Intex in the future.
At 80" iong, this is an extra long twin, not a standard twin. Consequently I had to take back the sheets I bought, as they were 5" too short. I would have ordered a different model had I known that 80" wasn't standard. It's easier just to replace the sheets and I don't have time to send the bed back.
I bought this bed while I decided to purchase a normal bed. I was at first excited but as the week, past the seam popped and the bed now has a bubble and un-usable. for the money you pay for an air-bed I stick with a traditional bed over and air bed. Least to say thanks the quality is poor! I do not recommend.
Airbed doesn't keep air overnight. If you try to return it you will be charged a restocking fee to restock an airbed that doesn't work so you will get no refund.....exchange it for another crappy airbed...My recommendation is....don't buy this crappy airbed!!
This item loses air overnight. Must be inflated daily if not nightly. If you return this item the store won't take it back, you must ship to the maker at your expense. Or you must cut the air pump out because they don't trust you not to keep using it, like we have to trust them on their quality.
I received the bed, and I loved it. But after one night it almost completely deflated. I tried to find the holes but I found none, so it was kind of a waste of money.
I was hopeful this mattress would work out, having read mixed reviews, but as others stated, the mattress held air for only several days before it started losing air during the night. My son would then have to turn the air pump on (during the night) in order to have be able to have a comfortable night of sleep. Generally speaking I think all air mattresses do the same thing, as I then purchased one from the local K-mart, which is also going back tomorrow for the same problem.
Was very comfortable when I inflated it, but had deflated twice before the night was over. Boasts features like beds twice the price -- the internal 120 AC pump is handy (especially since it deflates so fast) but it is noisy,and who wants to interrupt their sleep twice a night to reinflate the bed? Not me, that's for sure. I really wish it hadn't been a leaker, I like this bed, everything about it except that.
My mother bought this bed for my 5 year old to use when we visited on weekends. Worked great the first 4 or so times she used it. But now the valve that lets the air out won't close. It spins, but does not seal shut so you can't inflate the mattress. Very poor quality.
All these airbeds look good on pics. But the common problem for all these even well known brands is deflating. The tightly inflated airbed almost completely deflates by the morning, even if u find the leakage and seal it, by next day other leakage will appear. it is horrible feeling like u are on the boat during the storm when it is flat. Eventually after buying 3 airbeds from well known brands i bought spring mattress for 100$ and feel very good without needing in inflating it every morning!
It works but the next morning it has lost some shape and isn't as comfortable as it could be. For the price and the function is okay, the twin size made it right for our allowable space - but if you will need a longer term solution it is probably better to invest in a more expensive air bed.
This is really a bad product. I bought it in hope that I could have one extra bedding when required. I used it on first night for myself and after 3-4 it deflated, annoyingly i filled the air back in night and went to sleep. In morning i was awake again because it has deflated. I thought i am doing something wrong, read the manual and searched online, found nothing. Next night it was the same story. Returned to amazon.(note: this was not my first product either, earlier I tried their queen bedding and it was similar story too)STAY AWAY FROM THIS PRODUCT will be my advice.
I ordered for use when company came-my niece slept on this once and ended up on the floor after one night. I cannot recommend this to anyone.
We bought these beds in September for our grandchildren to sleep on when they visit. They are 6 and 7 and weigh under 50 pounds. These beds can not make it through one single night inflated. We either have to get up during the night and re-inflate them or the kids will wake us up because the mattresses have lost so much air they are uncomfortable.We've had to repair both beds because they develop pin holes from being folded when we put them away and you can hear air escaping around the area where the beds inflate themselves.I'm very disappointed in this product and will not buy another air mattress from this company since it's clear their quality has gone down hill drastically since we bought their double bed seven years ago.My opinion is "save your money and find another solution for guests to sleep on", that's what we're doing now.
I ordered it because I have a 6ft 8in relative who spends time with me. The description says this airbed is 40in wide and 80 inches in length. The box housing the bed clearly states the bed is 39 in wide and 75 inches long. I am really disappointed because I have been shopping for this for over 3 months and only recently decided this was the right bed. WRONG!The goal is to provide comfort. /his won't, his feet will be hanging off the edge of the bed. Its going back.
This airbed does not stay inflated. It went flat half way through each of the five nights I used it. It is junk. Don't buy it. If I had bought it at a store it would have gone back the next day.
Only used a handful of times and the bed already leaks air. Waste of money. I know it shows a one star rating but the true rating is zero stars.
Was nice while it lasted. After a few nights on the mattress, one of the seams in the middle apparently broke. Now it's nothing but a large bubble in the center. Tried flipping it over but it's like sleeping on a rocking chair. Nothing to do but take it to the dumpster.
I had another airbed that lasted about 2 years before there was a leak and needed to replace it. This one had pretty good reviews and it was taller when inflated and would be easier to get on and off it. I did like the airbed and it was comfortable. We used it less than 5 times over the last 4 months and it deflated slightly last time I used it. I should have investigated further at that time but just deflated it until next use. I used it this weekend and had to pump it up again in the middle of the night and I think my time for warranty is over with.
Product was defective from day on and lasted a whole 32 days and now will inflate but by the middle of the night you sleeping on the carpet.
It doesn't stay firm even overnight. The motor burned out after a while. I bought a Coleman. . . .
This bed was cheap and the quality was consistent with the price. The seams deformed about 6 months after use began and bulges formed that eventually made the product unusable. Don't purchase for long term use. The seam design is flawed, which is probably why most of the other manufacturers offer a quilted pattern. The return shipping and 50% refund potential make recovering any money impossible. I got some use out of the bed, but definitely wouldn't buy anything else from this manufacturer.
Just a great item. However there are approximately 5 length-wise seams on the bottom to create stability. After two months, one seam "disappeared, and now the bed rocks, because there is one large air space.I can probably live with it, just have to put some towels, whatever to stabilize it.
Air mattress: Looks good, works but requires frequent running of pump. Appears to lose air through the built-in pump. Should have returned the mattress but need the bed for visitor. Probable would not buy with built-in pump in future.
I bought this product because I'm living temporarily in a city and will move to another city later, and don't have the extra money to buy a better bed. Since then my shoulders hurt from sleeping on it. I've lost interested in sleeping after that. Before that i never have problems with sleeping.It's ok to sleep for one or two nights only i guess. If you intend to sleep on it for a few months, buy a comfy bed instead of this!
Had the bed two weeks and so far not a problem. I did not inflate it to the maximum pressure-I'm 250lbs the maximum load being 300lbs-but rather 3/4 full of air. I have added air only one time-maybe 10 seconds. I sleep on this airbed every night. There is a tendancy for me to roll to the side of the bed-whether that's just me or the bed is yet to be seen. To add to this review I had the bed for three months-the pump went out after that time. I suppose we take our chances.MalcolmL
I purchase this air mattress in late October and two month later I was laying on the mattress I move my arm and a fist size hole appear over my head. The mattress arrive fast and was easy to set up. If you plan on using this mattress for a guest bed or for your kids when they come home for the Holiday or summer break please get something else. Not worth the money. I had Coleman and small hole appear and the patch does not work but for this mattress the patch does work for a small hole not the fist size hole.
This mattress began leaking after only 3 or 4 nights of use. I found the leakbetween a crease in the top (flocked) side. After proper repair effort it wasunable to stay inflated. I have put the air bed to better use. Thank youKeith Colton
We were among the unlucky buyers who happened to receive a dud. The airbed had a gash at the bottom, which we patched. But it also leaked at the seams and our attempts to patch that did not work. We returned it, unslept-on -- no easy task, since we were required to return the manufacturer's box, and of course we could not get the deflated airbed back into it, so we had to find a box big enough to hold both the deflated airbed and the manufacturer's box.
The air mattress was good only for one day, after one day it started deflating and I have to inflate it every night before sleep. By the time I wake up on it the next day it has become like a water bed since it has deflated. I cannot find the hole from where it deflates.
Took it to France and electric pump only worked for a minute and blew. Bought a hand pump to pump it up. It was a painful job. After it was fully pumped the bed was rather comfortable. Decided not to bring home to return because once it was pumped there was no way to deflate to the extend that it would fit back into the original box.
It was a super deal... But there is something wrong with it. It will not retain the air level that I want.I will be returning this item
I don't really hate it, because my order was cancelled for some unclear reason. The order was cancelled several days after I placed it, so I'm no fan of Intex.
I ordered this bed in an emergency situation for my 95 year old mother to sleep on. The bed was easy to fill and evacuate, but it has a slow leak that necessitates adding air to it every day. I couldn't send it back because I would have had nothing for my mother to sleep on.
every person i communicated with was not only rude but were clearly annoyed by my need for help and completely unwilling to assist me . I returned the product that i was charged $103.10 for and was refunded $40.70 . thanks
I filled it with air when it arrived. It lost air by the morning. Since the bed was cold when filled, I gave it another chance. The first night is was actually used, it had to be refilled in the middle of the night.
I used this product for one month of every night sleeping before it sprouted a leak in one of the seams on top that couldn't be patched due to the fabric. It makes patches virtually impossible to stay stuck.There you have it.
We loved the internal pump which also will pump the air out. It is so fast and the mattress itself gives a good night's sleep.
IT HAD A LEAK FROM DAY ONE. RETURN AND EXCHANGE PROCESS WAS VERY GOOD THOUGH. STILL WAITING ON THE NEW ONE
Would not purchase this item again. Used in spare bedroom for guests. Hardly used, until now. Hoping top have Xmas guests use. First to lay on it, and center ring pooped.Still usable, but uncomfortable. The second night used bed hissing sound and a large leak appeared. They provide plastic to repair leaks, but do not provide any adhesive. I have to eat it now because I had until 11/12/12 to return.I can get partial credit, not including shipping if I just had just kept the box and shipping label for 3 months.
Add these ingredients:Flashy music, beautiful ladies, sexy dance moves, scanty clothes (no nudity), beautiful landscapes, and even some seaside hobbies... and what do you get?Wait a minute...Now add a film editor who thinks his amateurish effects are more important than the above ingredients. All the above scenes of the hobbies, the ladies, the landscapes were all spliced and edited into each other for a "strobe" effect of split second images so that you can't focus on any of it.Now what do you have?Probably a yard sale item in the 10 for a dollar bin. I may buy some of the earlier volumes to see if they're the same... wish me luck.
Although this is a good collection of Poe's short stories, the pages crisp and the typeface clear, THE TYPE ITSELF IS VERY, VERY, VERY SMALL! I am getting older, but do not need glasses yet and I can hardly read a word or two before my eyes begin to cross! I don't understand book manufacturers anymore. Either the typeface is illegible, the paper so poor that all the letters blot together, or the print is teenie tiny. Aren't books supposed to be read? Also, something strange, the chapters arent seperated. One story runs into the next without starting a new page.
Carrying on from the mostly instrumental albums of "The Prison" & "The Garden", we get "Rays".Which is nowhere as strong as these albums, with Nez laying on the Synths, giving a slight Queen from the 80's feel (which nobody wants to hear).He also creates a horn section using the synths, which just sounds cheap & tacky.With "Prison" & "Garden" you hear richly textured & ambitious soundscapes, but "Rays" is to low-fi (which I don't have a problem with), it just doesn't work with such a complete piece of work.This is the only weak Nesmith album, so I suggest you purchase the rest of his back catalogue before arriving at this (low) point.
Although the recording was somewhat ineresting, due to the lack of music in the recording I find very dissapointing. I will probably play it three or four times and then dispose of it.
Good God, was this boring! I couldn't even finish watching it before I tossed it. I usually enjoy reading or hearing how artists create, it fascinates me. And I love The Band that used to be. But this was boring as heck. Sorry, Robbie. Sorry, Levon.
I just screened the dvd of The Band which cost $65.00! If you like 75 minutes of interviews with some musical clips (all far better in The Last Waltz--where each song is 100% seen on camera and mixed great) than send me $55.00 and I'll ship you my copy. I love The Band but this looks like a BBC TV doc.Bill
The reviews were right about it being VERY large in girth. It was a bit uncomfortable, and I didn't love the bumps on the back (that you can't see in the picture or in the description), and the "head" of it has quite an edge.When you take it out of the package, it has an overwhelming smell of plastic, so it probably contains those carcinogens that everyone is talking about.The exterior piece is VERY powerful and would be great if it was on another toy. The tickler is also fairly rigid and difficult to place exactly.I wouldn't recommend it because I think you can do better. And I also think it's worth it to spend more money on a toy without phthaylenes (or however you spell it).
This product is NOT intended for a beginner...i had many toys and this one by far caught me by suprise on how big it is. The shaft is too big and makes it uncomfortable unless used with the right lubrication. Being a smaller/petite woman, it was a little uncomfortable for me b/c of the size...but other than that, it was very pleasurable.
I find it hard to believe there are women really using this product ........turns out it's about the same diameter as the cardboard tube inside paper-towels. Seriously ???~~~
Hello everybody! I ordered this product but the first one that i received didn't work, and now i have the second one and it still doesn't work. It might sound weird, but i put batteries in it and it doesn't start working. What should i do? Thanks!
It's not water proof and it rusts on the inside. The turning head is a nice feature, but I don't think I really needed it.
Not what I thought I was getting. I don't think jell is as enjoyable as the silicone and unfortunately I had to pay to find out.
WASTE OF MONEY. FIRST TIME BUYING SUCH AND IT NEVER WORKED. MOTOR NEVER TURNED WHEN BATTERY WAS PUT IN. SUCH BLATANT ROBBERY!
First off I am currently deployed and my wifes fisrt viberator that we bought, to help with the lonely nights, was supposed to be waterproof got some water damage and no longer works. She asked me to order her another so I looked around and found this one, it had many decent reviews so I decided to order it. When it arrived and my wife opened the package only to find that the item I ordered had a much larger cirmcurference, the one she had before was about 5 inches or so. She decided to try to use it because of the fact that there is not a return policy. When she attempted to use the item it did not work, she tried replacing the batteries and that only made the rabbit portion come on. It would be extremely helpful if there were some sizes and lengths to determine what exactly you were buying. So all in all I am extremely disappointed in this product and would not recommend it to anyone.
i bought this for my wife to replace her rabbit habbit that broke after a few uses. let me first say that it say 1 1/2 inches no it makes the rabit habit look tiny. its hugeat least 1 3/4 inch around. but its much slower than the other dosent vibrate near as fast. other than the size being more real size she liked the rabit habit better but we just got this one maybe it will get better. just goes to show bigger isnt better always. needs more power
First of all, no matter how much I washed it, it still smelled HORRIBLE! The "rabbit ears" are too long. The part it is supposed to hit isn't that high up. The worst part of all...the head of the shaft doesn't turn. It barely moves, so how am I supposed to feel anything? It is loud, and has a machine sound because of the "floating beads" which do absolutely nothing. Look into something else...this Rabbit is a piece of junk. I looked at a lot of reviews to make sure I got the right one, and I was mistaken. I don't know how other people gave this more than 2 stars.The vibrate is descent, though.
Put new batteries in - product wont turn on at all - very disappointed !!! Save your money - many others are better - should have read the other reviews and then i would have been warned
I was so excited to try this item when I ordered it, but when I got it I was so disappointed because it didn't work. It didn't even turn on! I didn't try to return it because I was under the impression it is a nonreturnable item. I won't order this product again but will try ordering from Amazon again.
Had a very toxic smell and probably will be toxic if used. No matter how much it was cleaned it still had a very strong smell. Scared to use it because of its smell. The ears and shaft are very hard and not flexible at all. It will be tossed in the trash. Another waste of money.
I did not like this one. It is a bit large and it has a plastic, rubbery smell that never goes away. It's also slightly loud. I have had similar toys before and I like this one the least.
I BOUGHT THIS ITEM AS A GIFT. I PUT BATTERIES IN IT AND IT WORKED FOR THREE MINS AND QUIT. I HAVE NOT BEEN ABLE TO GET IT TO WORK AGAIN AND ACCORDING TO AMAZON POLICY I CAN'T RETURN IT! DON'T WASTE YOUR MONEY!
I just got this today and have been playing with it for a couple of hours and haven't gotten a decent orgasm. This is my first vibrator/toy ever and I don't think I will be buying any more. Maybe its just me but vibrations do little to nothing for me and the fact that this toys rabbit ears are way too long doesn't help. After playing with it for awhile and just being left frustrated I managed to get a weak orgasm not worth anywhere near the 30 dollars i paid for this! The vibe itself is way too thick and it has a awful chemical smell. I should saved my money! I will continue to try and play around with it but I am not hopeful. The rotating shaft also does NOTHING for me..
It is NOT NOT NOT WATERPROOF! Loved it, till we tried it in the tub. Worked for 4 seconds, then stopped. VERY DISAPPOINTED....
Received as a gift from my wishlist, I added it because of all the positive reviews and because it was waterproof (also the clear design looked cool), but quite honestly this is weaker than my cheapy $8 vibrator from a local shop. I have not tried it in water so I can't comment on that. It is also too stiff (rather than being too big), but mostly my issue is the very weak vibration, especially lacking in the area that should be stimulated most. The rotation also did nothing for me. With a name like Jackrabbit, I was expecting a lot more oomph. Don't bother with this product if your preference is not gentle... I found it annoying.
It is too thick for me and the material is very hard too uncomfortable I would not recommend it because it did not explained how the product really was and even though is brand new in the box never been used you can not return the product . So I just wasted my money...
This product worked for 4-5 times the the rotation stopped working. Batteries run out or lose power after 3-4 uses. I would read reviews before buying another one... I am looking into the Hitachi wand massager now and I believe I will buy it since is a power operated toy and will never run out of power.Not impressed with this product.
Received it broken but when talking to the customer help chat they refunded me ASAP. 110% satisfied with their service..,
I bought this item 6 months ago and was immediately disappointed. Metallic beads are a almost painful on higher rotation speed. And the the metallic rod connecting the top with the bottom broke after 6 months.Do not recommend this item.
I was really excited to receive this product after reading the reviews. A day later I'm quite disappointed. The bunny ears are razor sharp! Oucccchhhhhh!!!Definitely save your money and go for something else
Piece of crap. All functions did not work when opened and stopped working during first use... horrible product. California Exotics should be ashamed of selling this junk. do not waste your money or shipping..
I only used it a couple of times, a tiny bit of water leaked into the battery compartment and now it is rusted and won't turn on.
What a let down. I was so excited to get this because of the reviews, but when I tried it, it did nothing. First, it is very heavy and hard to hold (if you are using it by yourself). Second, it hurts your clitoris. It is very sharp on the ears, that's the part that goes on you clit. I'm almost temped to cut them off. Third and forth, it smells and it is very loud.I've tried it about 4 times, trying to get used to it. My husband has tried to use it on me too. No luck at all. This is not worth the money.
Nothing to to say about it thank u didn't enjoy it so why say something why rate it a waste of money
Once again I wish I'd paid closer attention to the more critical reviews ... This product is far too rigid and thick. With the beads and other material in the center, it does not bend at all, and it's painful to try to use. There are also rigid bumps around the too-large tip (which is 1.5 inches wide, 5 inches around) that make it even more painful to insert. I've used the similar - but far more realistic - Doc Johnson product (beads and rabbit, but none of those bumps, and a more natural tip and girth) and hoped it was the same thing, but it isn't. On the upside, it's as quiet as the Doc Johnson product - and it'll be even more quiet, unused, in my nightstand. Waste of money.
The ears on the rabbit are sharp and the first time I used it I felt like it cut me after wards. If the ears weren't so sharp this toy would be higher on my list of favorites.
I had high hopes for this product after the Rabbit Habit's beads froze the first time I used it. I thought the way the beads were set in this product would be better and it was, BUT...the material is so stiff that the action of the bunny ears actually HURT my clit! None of the softness and thus realistic tongue like action of the Rabbit Habit. That's really the point, isn't it? It just poked me, along with the hard little nose, which also hurt. Cheap, but a waste of money.
The picture shows several items when you select the purple one and has "alternate views" showing these items. And the kicker is that its 10$ more than the other colors, so it seems like its a package deal, but I only got the one purple vibe. I totally would have gotten the clear one for less money if I knew that was the case because who cares what color it is really. I, for one, am about function over fashion. FALSE ADVERTISING!!
I was misguided by the review ratings... in all honesty, this product is awful. It has a toxic smell to it, and the "bunny ears" cause more pain than pleasure. I don't recommend this product.
Add me to the list of folks who received a vibrator-shaped paperweight instead of an actual vibrator. I tried two sets of batteries just to make sure, but it was dead. Also, as others have mentioned, the toxic plastic smell was over-powering, so I was a little bit glad it didn't work or I might have been tempted to try it and I may never have gotten that smell out of me. :o)Amazon, understandably, doesn't allow returns on vibrators, but the paperwork for a refund was done in under an hour and I should get it in a few days, so at least that part was easily done.
LOVE the size--no complaints there. Rabbit ears hit in just the right spot. But, the beads on mine jammed up after a single use.
Not made for the delicate sized person or in smaller areas of exploration. All features are as described and rabbit is fast on slowest setting. Smaller would be better.
I gave this product as a "special" gift to my wife for Christmas, She just loved it for the first 2 times of use, except we had to make sure the kids were asleep because it is loud. Now it just spins away, but no vibrations. She will still use it on occasions, it can still get the job done, but for the money I payed it didn't last near long enough.
I was not pleased with this product, the bunny ears does not reach my "pretty bump".....I haven't used it ever since...I bought another for $25 and it got to the work done way better than this...
Recieved this item and it was broken. Tried to contact the seller but could not. As per amazon's return policy this is a non-returnable item. Which makes sense. Unless it is sold in a non-working condition. Was very displeased I could not speak directly with the seller and that amazon was of no help. Had to go through the manufacture to have the product replaced which is still a work in progress. Will not buy non-returnable items from this site again. Leaves too much room to get a defective product like I did and be stuck with it.
Best Part? Nice Girth (unusual for a rabbit). Worst? Length. I find it too short. And the "off" button has stopped working (maybe it wants to keep going and going and going? *L*) I have to untwist the bottom pannel and loosen the batteries to turn it off.Overall it's OK. It does what its supposed to and has worked out OK for the shower, but I'd like to find something similar (but a little longer) for the shower.I also find the head to be a little too stiff, it should be made of something just a little softer.
I received this product in the mail yesterday, Put in the batteries and the rotating beads do not work. Complete waste of money.
This was my first purchase of a vibrator and was very disappointed. It was shipped very discreetly from Amazon directly, but it didn't work. I put in fresh batteries and it wouldn't turn on. I even tested the batteries, they were good, but this rabbit wasn't. Unfortunately, Amazon doesn't take returns on this type of personal product. I simple won't buy anything made by California Exotics again. I'll try one of the other brands next time.
It was a little big for me, but it worked really well until about two weeks ago. And then it just died. Mind you, this is two months after I bought it. I switched the batteries, made sure the ones I put in were working, but I suppose the motor died. I never even used it in water. I don't know about most people, but for $30, you'd think you'd get more than two months out of a vibrator.
I don't know why this has such good reviews. I purchased it because of the reviews but it's since gone in the trash. It has an awful smell that won't go away. Like a burned plastic smell. It is WAY too big. The rotating beads do nothing for me. Even if you put your hand on the shaft, you have to squeeze to feel the rotation. Don't buy it.
This product worked for 4-5 times and the rotation stopped working. Batteries run out or lose power after 3-4 uses. I would read reviews before buying another one... I am looking into the Hitachi wand massager now and I believe I will buy it since is a power operated toy and will never run out of power.Not impressed with this product.
Clearly, the producers of this DVD meant to mislead. The cover of the DVD shows the original album cover suggesting that it is a visual equivalent of the album. Please read the cover carefully. It is a quickly put together documentary of the times surrounding the making of the album. Too much time is taken up showning closeups of the of photographic stills that are already on the original album cover and liners.Much time is spent describing the breakup of the relationships.Some of the new performances of the classic songs are again, quickly put together and doesn't provide additional insights.Hastily produced DVD with a misleading cover to cash in on unsuspecting fans.
Rumours is one of my all-time favorite albums, so I was dying to see this video. The one on the making of Pink Floyd Dark Side of the Moon was a real treat, so I had high hopes for this one. Unfortunately, it is just them saying over and over again that it was difficult being trapped in a small studio together, while they were breaking up. The only thing I did not already know, that I got from this video, is that Mick Fleetwood seems like a pretty nice guy, but the other three are self-absorbed jerks. Listen to the album again and again, but I recommend not wasting your time on this pointless and thoroughly uninteresting video.
THIS IS A BLATANT CASE OF FALSE ADVERTISING THAT I'VE EVER SEEN! I'M EXPECTING TO SEE FLEETWOOD-MAC PERFORMING ALL THE SONGS FROM THEIR ALBUM 'RUMORS' (WHICH IS A GREAT PIECE OF WORK!). INSTEAD, ALL I SEE ARE THE RECORDING TECHNICIANS EXPLAINING HOW THEY MIXED THE VARIOUS SONGS, WHICH, BRINGS ME TO MY MAIN BEEF...ONLY BITS AND PIECES OF THE SONGS ARE PLAYED. NONE OF THE SONGS WERE PLAYED IN THEIR ENTIRETY. ALSO, THE INTERVIEWS WITH THE BAND MEMBERS SEEMED TO FOCUS ON WHO HAD AN AFFAIR WITH WHOM AND WHY THE AFFAIR ENDED. WHO CARES? I WANTED TO SEE F-M PERFORM AND WAS VERRRRRRY DISAPPOINTED WHEN THEY DIDN'T. AT LEAST I HAVE MEMORIES OF TWO OF THEIR CONCERTS THAT I ATTENDED YEARS AGO.
The dvd is a documentory, alot of talking and very little music. I thought it was them in concert. Too much talking
Well, I am among those who expected the basic performances along with the documentary, based on the packaging and the song titles listed in the text.I'm glad so many people like it because that means I will have no trouble selling my copy.The sound quality didn't impress me, and the "specially recorded" versions of some songs told me only that the members have lost their voices. (offstage: "Sacrilege! Burn him!")Even the navigation was annoying - click,click, click, click to get to any one song.Bah!
If you want to hear music, don't purchase this video. Each song is quickly interrupted with current interviews of band members talking mostly of their failed romantic relationships during the recording of Rumours. This should be labeled a documentary, not a music video. The band members do talk about the music, and there are nice clips shot at Sausalito, California's Record Plant showing how particular tracks were mixed. However, I believe using the Rumours album cover on the video packaging deceptively implies that it is a music video.
Very disappointed with this DVD. Like I said above, if you want to view a rockumentary watch VH1 alot cheaper. Description very misleading.
Having seen "The Dance" before, I was totally disappointed. I was expecting at least the full songs from the CD, but it has only interviews with the band and commentaries. Also the picture quality on my dvd (I bought Region 2) was just bad quality. Not worth buying.
It's disappointing to say the least. I'm not sure what Suzzette Phillips is talking about in her review, but on my version the classic album rumors isn't on my dvd. (And nowhere on the disc or packaging does it say the album is contained on the disc. Possibly, there are two versions? Anyway, 75 minutes of interviews about each song, and vintage footage each lasting about 15 to 30 seconds. Nothing new is on here that you haven't seen on any other documentary. It would be great if they played the vintage live selections in their entirety.
Just bought this at the garden center. Looked solid. However, instructions are completely inadequate. I've programmed these kind of things before. I know it's hard to be able to create all the functions needed with just three buttons, but that's why you need to research what the competition is doing.
Pro: Soft-closing valve mechanism prevents water hammer effect.Cons: Programming is not intuitive. Cannot adjust the manual valve-open time duration; it is fixed at 15 minutes (the manual states it is possible to adjust this, but I did not see how). 9V battery didn't last a week.
I wanted to buy this song but couldn't figure out how to do it from the webpage. I don't have any problem buying Apple products, or ATT products or anyone else's products. But I could not figure out how to buy a song from Amazon.
The spiral binding on this book is it's only positive.I haven't found a single thing in this book I would like to stitch. The graphs are done with colored Xs which make it difficult to distinguish between similar colors, and to imagine what the finished product will look like. The colors are not given in Anchor or DMC format, but in other numbers that you then have to look up the DMC or Anchor numbers in the back. Finally there are very few designs for each category. For example, there are only about four or five small pages of Christmas designs. Christmas is a very large subject to design from. Did they run out of ideas? Rather than this book, buy the Better Homes and Gardens 2000 Cross Stitch Designs. There are so many more designs for many more topics, and stitched pictures are given so you know what you'll be working on.
Product came with no documentation whatsoever, no installation CD. Attempted to install this on 2 computers. "plug and play" install did not work. downloaded the appropriate drivers from Soundblaster and informed me that NO soundblaster card was found on my PC. attempted to contact vendor,no email was available, only a long distance phone number. Threw it in the trash.
I received this as a Christmas gift from a friend who knows I like hot tea. ALL of the tea was some variation on flavors of green tea. I avoid drinking caffein, which green tea contains, so I gave away all of the tea and kept the chest to fill with my own selections. The chest is kind of cheap (paper glued over something, as described by another reviewer). It's pretty, but I don't expect it to hold up.
Others may like this book but I did not.For me, "The Pro: Lessons About Golf and Life from My Father, Claude Harmon, Sr." was a huge disappointment and may be the worst book I have ever read.I kept trying to like this book, but the writing and the message kept getting in the way. Self-promotion is hard to pull off, and for me the author did not successfully pull it off. Reading this book was similar to being on the receiving end of a self-absorbed bore's monologue at a cocktail party, absent the cocktails and the party.The book is less about Claude Harmon, Sr. and more about Butch Harmon, Jr. and how he "got his life together." From cover to cover it rings with false modesty, and rationalization of a self-righteous, bullying bravado.My brand new copy did not find its place on the bookshelf with Bobby Jones, Dave Pelz, Jack Nicklaus, and many others. Rather, it has been donated to the recycle bin because we do not want it in our house for any youngster to read.
Not worth the money at all. None of the music is mixed togeather, like by a DJ. Most of the songs are not by the original artists! I wish I had never purchased this order, and will never again purchase such an items without being able to hear all of the songs. One last thought,,I was an 80's nightcluber,,, some of the songs I never, ever heard of and they are not good what so ever, just fill in songs.
Effects isn't the only Adobe product in the CS3 family that crashes. We are having issues with all of them. Photoshop which doesn't normally import huge files is now crashing our Mac G4. I'm running Sony's Vegas Video at home which has quite a few "effects" add-ons available from other vendors. If Adobe doesn't straighten this out maybe Sony will take up the slack.
Patti Page "The Tennessee Waltz Gal" should never have attemted to record a jazz vocal album, for one she lacks the individuality that it takes to be a jazz singer, number two how can anyone take seriously a singer who sings "How Much Is That Doggie In The Window." And three when she sings, she sounds like she doesn't care about what she's singing about, Page is definately not a lyrical singer. Even though Pete Rugalo(the talented jazz vocalist June Christy's regular arranger), who arranged this album, tried to make Miss Page sound listenable, it just didn't work out. Stay away from this CD or any CD that has the name "patti Page" on it.
I can't resist writing a review, because I rely heavily on what others have to say too.I just bought the 1115 and it's being returned today. I've had an Epson Photostylus 870 for the past couple of years and had a little ink mis-hap (my fault) and thought, what the heck I'll get a new printer figuring the technology has improved, etc. This time I decided to go with an HP because I generally like their products, but I'm going back to an Epson.The quality of photo prints are not even comparable. The Epson prints are clear, crisp and realistic. The HP prints (even at 2400dpi) are grainy and fuzzy.Not to mention that ever since I installed the printer (using USB) my floppy disk drive has been grinding every few minutes. Not sure what's up with that.I will say that the HP is fast and fairly quiet. Printing regular documents on paper of course looks nice, but for "real" photo images try Epson.Good luck!
I Have had trouble with HP and XP since upgrading. Although they say it is xp compatable with driver, it is not. Will cause system to lock up and when I called HP they blamed XP. Bought a Epson and first time install without a hitch. Hope this helps and God bless you!
I purchased this CD for my wife for Mother's Day. After listening to it, it became very clear that Babs is way out of her league when she sings with singers the caliber of Il Divo (whom she refers to as "swell" by the way. Swell???). The continual platitudes such as "children are like sponges" etc. are boring. At 65 years of age she can at least try to come up with something new to say. As for her political persuasion, who cares!
dissapointing in that the duets really do little justice to the songs. The duet5s in particular have beengiven inappropriate arrangements.
Apart from shrinking core of diehard fans, who is going to buy this? Most of the songs appear on other albums, the liner notes are schmaltzy, the sound quality is not that hot, and BS's voice sounds worn and tired.If she really cared, she would tour with all new songs and sing like she was happy to be there and NOT TALK ABOUT POLITICS. :)For those of you unsure as to whether or not to buy the CD, wait a month and it will be in the cutout bin.I give this 2 stars in honor of the late Mr. Peter Matz, thanked by BS in the liner notes in her usual pompous way.
This is one very attractive coffee canister with just one problem. If you're chosing this because you no longer want your food and beverages exposed to plastic, you might want to stay away from this one. The inside area is made entirely of black plastic. However, if plastic isn't an issue for you, this could be your baby.I am disappointed that amazon's normally satisfactory product description process didn't work here. This listing misrepresents the item by failing to mention the non-stainless interior which is a significant fact to many consumers. I returned my canister with my explanation that the quality was not as represented. I don't believe that they should charge their customers for any shipping or restock fees when they don't describe items honestly. Amazon rocks but this listing needs help!
Hard to tell from the picture what size this is. I thought it was much larger. It would not hold much more than a 1/2 pound of coffee. Too much space is wasted for the filter holder section.
Costs much less at Target but I won't buy it because of bad reviews on Amazon. Will buy a bigger canister when I find the right one.
This is not Lighthouse. This is the ST Luke UMC Lighthouse Praise Band. I am returning it to Amazon because it looks like Chrstian filler.
Ok, first of all I was looking for Lighthouse the Classic Pop/Rock Group. There was NOTHING to tell me that this album was a Gospel CD.OK, I can live with that...So I listen to my new Lighthouse (GOSPEL) CD. Let me tell you, I was NOT IMPRESSED! The engineering sucked, The Music was mmmmmmm... ok, I guess, and, the singing really had NO feeling or substance behind it!So if you are into Gospel, steer clean and, if you are looking for Lighthouse (the classic pop/rock group), THIS IS NOT IT!Latter...
Received this as a gift from my husband. He had it gift wrapped and held it for the occasion. When I opned the bracelet, we were both very disappointed. The quality was very poor and bracelet did hand nicely on the wrist. He contacted the seller through Amazon to request a refund. They refused to refund or exchange the item. Unfortunately he had not opened the item when it was received, since it was gift wrapped. He held it beyond their return window, as he was saving it to be gifted. I called the vendor myself to explain and seek a compromise. They were unyeilding, explaining that they could not return the bracelet to their vendor or restock it, so we were out of luck. Beware of the return policy with this vendor especially if it is a gift.
This is a huge disappointment for my family, and has forever left a stain on the memory of my son's recent birthday. This piece of garbage cannot, does not, and will not stand up. And it does not stay together. And the elevator breaks easily. And some of the figures don't fit in the elevator.So there it lies, in pieces, in the corner. And here I lie, curled in a ball in the other corner, wondering if I am an inadequate father because I can't make a $40 piece of crap stand up.I hope whoever designed this goes back to creating torture devices.
This watchtower was never used by the manufacturer because the unit itself comes with 3 legs that could likely hold one pound of weight and this weighs several. The "legs" don't even lock in place, they just sit in groves so the minute you place the weight on it they collapse over and over. If you manage to get it to stand the minute your child touches it it will fall over. Otherwise it would have been a wonderful toy. It looks like the show and the body is sturdy and well put together. Too well put together to be supported by the legs provided. Don't buy it, if your child is younger talk them into the Spiderman playset, much more sturdy.
There was little information about the product other than the photo which showed the Watchtower toys with 3 action figures. We thought that the 3 action figures were included - they were not. Also, do not be fooled by the "too good to be true" price. They charge so much for shipping it costs the same as you would pay in a store.Otherwise, the package arrived in a timely manner, was in good condition and appeared to be from a legitamate supplier.
Do not buy this toy - it has been a source of frustration and disappointment for all 3 of my children. Difficult to put together (and I have assembled my share of kid's toys), it will not stay together at all. It is challenging (at best) to get the figures in the elevator, and none of the figures with capes will fit - they tend to get stuck halfway up. The elevator also requires the child to turn a little wheel to get it to go up - too difficult for little ones. It requires a degree in engineering to get the little plane to fold up inside the watchtower - very poor and frustrating design. The noises are also weak as are the features (i.e. the trip wire, rockets, the plane). Just a complete waste of money - it is only a couple of weeks old, and it is headed to the trash.
This item is not meant for children to play with! Strange, since it has to do with action figures of Super Heroes! But honestly, if your child does more than set this on a shelf, you'll soon be hearing screams of frustration. The elevator won't work! (ours completely stopped working in 2 days); The guns on the top keep falling off!; The whole thing just falls apart. No, this item is for the collector and I think Mattel KNEW that. They figured the few that were opened and did not work offset all the ones that would remain MIB or NRFB for collectors.This item is just like Mattel's HOT WHEELS JUNKIE SETS. Another sore point with parents. Hot Wheels cars are fine, but those sets that Mattel makes NEVER work as promised. And what's with the instructions that have little to no writing on them??! Some of the drawings are impossible to figure out. In Mattel's case, a word is worth a thousand illustrations!
My 5 year old son received this as a birthday present, and it is headed right back to the store. The legs do not stay on, it falls over when touched, with or without the legs, there is a missing door, the elevator gets repeatedly stuck. As much as my son loves the idea of this toy, he has given up and resigned to playing with his other toys because this one is garbage, and a pure waste of money.
I bought this for Xmas 2004 after all the clever marketing hype. The rocketship theme looked very cool and rugged in the pictures. However, when my son got it it - it turned out to be nothing but a frustrating, unplayable toy. It falls down constantly because of poor design: the legs can't support the weight of the whole rocket when touching it), the elevator doesn' work (gets jammed all the way up) and it didn't even come with any character figures -these are sold separately! I may have to glue the parts together just so he could play with it some more time before we dump it.Do not recommend!
This toy was a pain to put together, and even worse to stay together. The elevator won't work, and I had to forcefully put some of the pieces together. Most people who reviewed this toy, had the same complaints, but I bought it anyway, because my nephew really wanted it. I'm glad that I only paid $15.00 for it, because it's not worth any more than that. Some pieces came off, before my nephew even got a chance to play with it.
What a colossal disappointment this turned out to be! The Justice League figures are the best superhero figures to come out since the Super Powers figures of the 1980s. They're colorful, durable, playable, and collectible. The Javlin 7 ship is also a nice piece for the Justice League collection. Imagine my disappointment over the Watchtower. While cool to look at, this toy is for display purposes only! As others have noted, it's shaky and falls apart with the slightest touch. What were the designers thinking when they created such flimsy legs for this heavy toy to be supported on? Also, the doors fly open quite easily. This toy will sit on my shelf with all the figures displayed on it. If you have small children avoid this at all cost and save your $35.
My son does love this toy and plays with it every day since Santa brought it to him. It has fallen apart each time he plays with it and has fallen on him a couple of times, so if you have a small child, I wouldn't recommend it.I will attempt to GLUE the legs on, since they are the biggest problem for this toy. Everything else works just great. Elevator, noises, guns, etc.
Please don't waste your money on this one. My four year old son loves the justice league and thinks this toy is pretty great. The problem is the elevator for one never worked and the tower is supposed to be supported by three crappily made narrow suction looking thingys. The minute my son goes to open one of the towers sides the whole damn thing collapses. This happens everytime. I finally just took the three support things off of it and put them away. The gun launcher thingys on top also continue to fall off. Luckily my sons was purchased on sale for only $14 but it's made so cheap and frustrated my son so much that I still feel completely ripped off.
Avoid this toy at all cost. It falls apart when touched. The elevator stopped working almost immediately. Total rip off.
After an hour of trying to put the tower together we gave up. The legs kept falling off making the tower fall over and the lever did not make the doors open. This was a major disapointment. We returned it the next day in pieces.
I bought this from frys and am returning it today. Maybe it's only me, but mine had really bad quality and distorted images. I had 17" LCD monitor from viewsonic and was replacing it because it has similar problem. Now, 19" has same problem and I am done with viewsonic. I am not going to use viewsonic monitors again. Instead, I am going to try samsung ones.
The thing is I like the display and everything , but the first monitor when I got had a bad pixel in the middle . So I understand it happens , return it and got another one same model . Two days later the same thing happen , and two more days I got one more bad pixel . So I am returning this one as well ,but no exchange this time . Just not worth it . Plus you can not adjust it , it stays only in one position .It may not happen anything with this bad pixels , but I don't want to take a chance . It's a hassle .
I downloaded the sample and could barely get though the first chapter. The authors writing felt very juvenile and kept mixing American with London slang. Honestly, it was the dumbest book I've tried to read in a long time. At least download the sample first.
I love all of Sophie Kinsella's books and her writing style...but this book was awful. The story line was predictable and the writing flat and unoriginal. Makes you wonder if this was truly written by Kinsella or a way for a ghost writer to get started under her 'new' pen name. I don't plan on buying anymore Madeline Wickham books--stick to the original Kinsella, where I haven't been disappointed yet.
I was so disappointed with this book! I'm a huge fan of Sophie Kinsella's books under the name SK and have read all of them many times, but this was the first book I'd read written under her name Madeleine Wickham. I thought the story was incredibly boring. There is no humor and no one is remotely witty! The characters were all one-dimensional and not lovable at all like her other female heroines. Nothing happened and the pace was unbearably slow. I plan to read other books under the name Madeleine Wickham because the woman herself is a fabulous writer, but I didn't see her regular spark in Cocktails for Three at all.
I couldn't get into this one. I felt the story was lacking and dragging on. I didn't get through half of it before I gave up.
I loved all of Sophie Kinsella's books. This book is definitely not as good as the Shopaholic Series. The characters aren't really well-defined, the plot meanders at the end. You can avoid this book and not miss much.
I am a huge fan of Sophie Kinsella and normally love her books under the name of Madeline Wickham, too. This book, however, drove me nuts! I only made it about 1/4 of the way through before I returned it to the store - luckily I hadn't cracked the spine, and they took it back and refunded my money. This book is so terrible that I couldn't even make it past the first 1/4 of it - the characters were horrible, shallow people, and the plot is so see-through. Clearly, this book is one of Sophie's earlier works - the "plot" is terrible. Don't waste your money - don't take a chance in case you crack the spine - you won't be able to return it! Spend your money on one of Sophie Kinsella's novels instead - "Remember Me" is hysterical and a great, easy read. "Cocktails for 3" is painful trash.
Three ladies who make sure to have a meeting of the minds every month. The general theme of the book smells of Sex in the City, but for me that was an okay thing to go into as I loved the show (and plan to read the book). So I had some good hopes going into the book. I also was excited because so far I have enjoyed the Shopaholic series, and this is the same Author, different name.Sadly the book did not live up to my hopes. While I love Sophie Kinsella but under the name Madeline Wickham she just falls flat. The book is not nearly as funny as the shopaholic series, and there just seems to be something else missing as well. The women in this book come off as just plain shallow to me. Where while our lovely Shopaholic has issues, she also shows she can be a good human. I just don't see that in Three Cocktails, so in my humble opinion this is a big pass.
I saw D. Ebby 35 years ago on the 700 Club, wanted this book for all those years. It was brought to my attention by another minister of the gospel just recently. Saw it on Amazon and decided to buy it, it was inexpensive. The pages fell apart as I read the book, it was extremely frustrating but? So enjoyable and encouraging, I was glad I bought it. I am going to look for the same book in better condition, just to reread or give to another to enjoy.
I bought this for the Kindle and there is none of the modern text translation referred to by the other reviews. I am very disappointed because that is the only reason I purchased this book. They should not use printed version reviews for Kindle books.
I can't review this item because it never made it to me. I received an email a few days later saying the money would be credited back to me (which it was). However, I have never had a problem with receiving shipments at my address. The seller claimed that my address was not found. I received something from a different seller just 2 days before though. I am not sure what address they tried to send it to, but it was not the one I gave. Unfortunately I had to find this book somewhere else. The book is a great find, however, and I am very pleased with it.
As we all have one time or another, had to read shakespeare in school for English class. That was my reason for this, my son needed it for school. I'm just glad it was available. He needed to Kill a Mokingbird, it wasn't available for Kindle.
I guess maybe it said they have the right to change the cover, but the one we received was completely different! Looked like an old Harlequin romance novel.... also the book had people reviewing it along with the text and my daughter didnt like that format.
This product was shipped to me in a reasonable time, but the description said it was new when it had been annotated and highlighted throughout the book. I was disappointed with this since I wanted a new version of this book.
There are 2 versions of this book available on Amazon. The other version looks identical in the picture but if you look inside, it isn't. This one does not have the "translation" of Shakespeare on the left page, which is what most high school students need. If you want the notes, get the other book.
I bought this book based on the other reviews saying how useful having the interpretations on the opposite page was. In reality it starts and ends directly with the play. No prologue, introduction or anything else. The reviews don't correspond to the item being sold.
This book does not have line numbers. In addition, the pages don't have the scene or act number on them. So when you open up the book, you have no idea where you are in the play. You have to flip through pages and find the closest scene 1 so you can figure out which act you are in and then go from there. This book makes it difficult to follow with others in class and I would not recommend it to anyone.
If you are a teacher, I would look into buying another audio version of Romeo and Juliet. I have been using it as a tool to get the students to hear professional actors and to then ask them to use the same skills those professional actors use (inflection, emphasis, etc.) The problem is it is VERY difficult to hear...to the point that you have to sit 3 feet away to hear it at times. This simply does not work for a classroom.
Stupid teenagers. A boy who falls out of love as quickly as he falls in. And poor communication. Shakespeare got teenage romance down pat.
Romeo and Juliet is a story about to lovers that meet at first sight. The biggest problem they have together is that both of the families have been fighting and hate each other since they both have been born. It all started when Romeo been depressed ever day moping around and feeling sad all of the time because he loved Rosaline and she did not love him back. So one day Romeos cousin told him about this party and that Rosaline would be there so they left and Romeo saw Juliet there and followed her to her house and both exchanged thoughts about each other and decided that they will get married but secretly. So they had to come up with a plan to pretend that Juliet was died so the can get married and the planned failed and they both ended up killing themselves. Play was very stupid it sucks no one should read it because there is no point of reading this because all this play is taking up your time.
i just read this book. everybody like always talks about how great it is and everything. but i don't think so. like, it's been done before, right?? soooo cliched. omg.
The customer reviews for this edition of Romeo and Juliet indicated that it was dual language, i.e., the original Shakespeare on one side of the pages and a modern "translation" on the other. This edition was original text only -- fine for what it is, but not what we wanted.
I am a high school English teacher looking at the different versions of classics texts available for Kindle (fire), so my review will not be for the play itself, but rather for the eBook--readability, layout, price, and other features.This 99 cent version is very basic. It has the complete text of the play, but that's about it. It does not have any chapter select links to either act or scene, and no line numbers are provided. There are no notations or explanations. The layout does maintain the iambic pentameter poetry, but the text appears crowded on the page as there is no line break or spacing between speakers.At 99 cents, this version is not bad; however, there are better, equally inexpensive versions.
Not that I don't like Shakespeare's works, but his tragedies are terrible, especially this one. I can't understand the language real well, so I have to grab one with the contemporary language so that it'll be easier to understand. I just can't understand this love tragedy at all! Here are some things that confuse me:*How did this feud really begin?*Why can't this story end in happily ever after?*Why does Lady Capulet have to be so stuck up on everybody?*Why couldn't Shakespeare have written in a language we could all understand?*Why does everybody have to jump to conclusions?I simply can't understand why people love this play so much. It's ridiculous! If you want a true love story, try reading "A Midsummer Night's Dream". This one absolutely SUCKS!!!!!!!!!!!!!
This may be one of the great works of humanity, but it just doesn't cut it for me. The gender sterotypes are nauseating, to say the least. Though required in schools, this book is nnot one of the bests to read on your own time. Or maybe I am just disillussioned.
I bought this book hoping it could help me understand shakespeare's words better, but it didnt. Instead I had to look up every other word in a dictionary or sometimes even online. Soon it just got so hectic that i just threw the book out and bought a better more reliable source.
That sums up this collection well. It's put out by Club Med and, perhaps that says something is some people's minds. What it amounts to is a fairly non-offensive collection of big-name artists (Kool and The Gang, Wes Montgomery, Roy Ayers, Sweetback - of Sade fame) doing downtempo. Think of it as muzak that is likely played at Club Med resorts or Sandals resorts to vacationers who find Club Med still suitable (as if it somehow ever was). South Beach, Monaco, Cannes sur Mer or St. Tropez discrimnating tastes this is not.I will say that it does have packaging and style over substance, but beyond that, there are far superior products out there, literally for a fraction of the cost. Avoid this unless you have absolutely everything else in your collection and far nothing better to listen to (which I doubt).
Wiley Investment Classics generally fall into two categories, tough and dreary reads full of information, and lively entertaining accounts which also educate. Unfortunately, Mr. Bagehot and Mr. Bernstein's text is the former. The book does an outstanding job of promoting the importance of a strong central banking system and the importance of strict credit control when combating financial crises. However, it does so amidst extremely repetitive and somewhat painful language. The authors provide outstanding quantitative and anecdotal evidence supporting their case, but they do so in such a way that makes the book a true labor to read.This book would be very beneficial to anyone doing research on, or working for some kind of central banking organization. Otherwise, I would suggest looking to any of the other Wiley Investment Classics for a more interesting and educational read about finance.
This is an excellent book. But this edition is extremely poorly produced. There are far too many typos, and little information about the original publication of the book, for example. The layout is ugly. It's great the book is cheap, but I wish I had paid a little more for a nicer version.
The stars are for the edition, not the book.The April 30, 2011 edition from CreateSpace (which probably actually is a copy shop) does not look like a book. It looks like a leaflet from Jehova's witnesses. It's flimsy, in a weird large format, and with no information about publisher, date of publishing etc. If you have any aesthetic sensibility you should get a different edition of this classic book.This type of product should either come with a warning "not a real book" or not be sold on amazon at all.
Never ordered it, it was sent by mistake and I returned it upon receipt without even opening it so I don't know.
I have seen many many movies in my life and this one takes the cake as being the biggest waste of time, terrible film I have EVER seen. Honestly, to think someone actually made this movie makes me believe anyone can make a movie. Everything about this movie is just so bad it makes me want to vomit.
If you want a low-tech, outdated, poorly produced micro-biography of Ralph Ellison that runs about 15 minutes (that's right--ignore the time posted above because it certainly isn't 30), then this may be what you are looking for.
I purchase a Protect-A-Bed mattress cover at a mattress store, salesman said to wash it twice prior to use. He did not say to dry it with towels and sheets. Its supposed to be waterproof, one of our cats proved its not, contacted company, they asked if dried on medium with towels and other bedding, I said no, no one told me and not anywhere on package does it state needs to be protected in the dryer. Company sent another cover,this time on low setting which is mostly air fluff with towels and other sheets and it was scorched in 3 places. Both were scorched on medium and low heat, dryer is electric which is not as hot as gas. I'm getting my $90 back that I was charged at a mattress company. Not worth the money if you can't dry it because it has cheap plastic backing.
This is a nice costume, but the material is quite cheap. Also, it makes my bust look strange (because the black part is right in the middle of it). But the bottom part is really cute, I LOVE the polka dots on the inner layer of the skirt.I just don't really like it, myself. I think it could be better.
This costume is poorly cut. Areas through the bust/underarms bunch up and won't lay flat. I have an average build -- not flat, and not busty (35 B/C). I ordered an XS. But while the waist fit, the bust area was tight and dug into the underarms.
This was a gift, but the fabric was cheap and didn't look great on or last well. However It was fun, and I got compliments on it all night.
Not as described, the material is cheap looking and does not feel soft on the skin. Was dissapointed of the quality and packaging.
Unable to use. Compartments too tiny and too deep to reach in to get earrings - and I don't have unusually large fingers.
I could really use this Item but I won't order it if I cannot order the color that I want; guess I'll have to look elsewhere.....sorry, this company seems to be losing a lot of sales with the 'let us choose for you' policy.
I too was ready to buy this product, but will not do it if I can't get the color I choose. I guess this company doesn't want to put their customers first!
I want a specific color, not a random one. Thanks to the reviews, I won't be buying this one either !
I want to buy this product, but I want it in Black.....Why should I allow you to choose the color when I'm paying.
Ok...ditto to all the other comments. I have searched all over for days for a blue jewelry earring / ring box for my 87 yr. old mom for Christmas. I am set to order it, then see you can't choose a color. What a big waste of my time and effort. This was just what I was looking for and no color choice. How dumb is that!
Why would someone pay for what they cannot have? Let the customer choose the color of the product they want to purchase!
When I first bought this it was because of the song "oh, Yeah" granted I heard the rest of the album and there were a lot better songs and I loved the eclectic sound. "Love Devine" sung by the women who sang the James Bond theme song "Goldfinger" was ultra cool. So they remaster it with all these bonus tracks but no "Oh Yeah"? That totally sucks. It's not the best song on it but it's not "One Second" without "Oh,Yeah"
I have several fetal development books now, but this one is the only one I couldn't stand to keep. I tore out a few of the best pictures and threw the rest of the book away. I had the 1962 version, so I can't speak for any other editions. It explains in the book that the picture sequences documenting the development of movement were of babies born very early, as early as the 6th week. I don't believe they were aborted on purpose or anything, but I couldn't stand to see how they were being touched with a hair to see how they move... that seems cruel to me. That sort of thing is not what I want to see when I'm expecting! The authors other book, Beginning Life is much, much better. It has better pictures and is more sensitive to the well-being of the pictured fetuses.
I would have like to have seen this book before I bought it. I never would have bought it in the condition I found it.
While there were some nice pictures and helpful information I was abit disappointed with the book in general. It was short (92 pages of large text),with no color pictures and just didn't seem like that helpful of a book for a first time mother. The book was first published in 1962 with an update in 1982 and I'm sure there have been quite a few new discoveries that would be quite informative for a first time mother since then. I felt like I was reading a high school biology book. OK for what it was but I'd not recommend it.
This book lacks the depth it seems to promise. Some of the illustrations are lacking. There is not enough meat to help anyone with special needs learners. I would suggest you look elsewhere. I was greatly disappointed since the majority of work by Jensen is wonderful.
The chapters are set up like a pamplet with bulleted information. It just doesn't seem appropriate for a college class. It is written like a middle school textbook, and it doesn't offer more information than what most laymen already know.
Written in 1970's it's really too old to apply to todays lifestyles and trends on fry cookery but it does have some classics. Glad I bought it used-but shipping was more than the price!
Avoid this book on the basis a dated and harmful passage on page 144 that states that homosexuality is "related to a failure in identification" and that parents of homosexual children should "seek professional help at the earliest possible moment". Their view of the cause of homosexuality is out of mainstream thought, and it implies that something wrong happened. The main reason for need for any counseling would be if homosexuality is causing adjustment or self-acceptance problems. This is not what the author's have in mind. Following the author's advice fails to honor your childs true nature, and certainly would be detrimental to the development of his/her self esteem.
Thrilled at my daughter's pregnancy, I purchased this book for her because I could remember how much I admired it 25 years ago when I read it. Her feedback? "Mom - it's really good until it gets to homosexuality. It fails miserably there!"I just reread the passage on page 144 of the library edition and now I want to throw it out of the public library's collection! (I won't....I'll keep it for the good parts and try to forgive Brigg's out-dated and misinformed attitude!) But I won't give it 5 stars any more!
I was just about to buy this book for my child bearing friend when I saw the outdated view to homosexuality. Pitty. This book is very good in many espects; but in the event of the child or anyone close to the family being homosexual, this will probably result in parent's mishandling of the situation which will perhaps do a good deal of damage to the child's self esteem.
While this book contains many helpful explanations of what to expect as your children grow it also contains WILDLY outdated depictions of men and women. Women are only described as working in the home - cleaning and baking. Men are described as working ceaselessly outside the home and having no time for children. The book was originally written in the 70s and it shows!In today's world where 70% of women work outside the home I found these depictions off-putting. I mean, wow, when I was a kid (and i'm 45) my mom worked outside the home.The greatest ding against the book though, is it's offensive depiction of homosexuality as a condition worthy of 'immediate psychological attention'. I am not gay, am married and have two children but if either of my sons are gay, I will support them and their choices with all my heart - not send them to a psychiatrist!
This book is unlike most of the books written on the topic. While Nuel Emmons seems to have started out with an eye on the ball, to release new information on Manson and the case against him, he fell short of his goal by virtue of adding a lot of things which weren't really Manson "in his own words" but were nothing more than fabrication.
Ok, if your a Manson collector of course you have to have this, but otherwise it is not even a good read, let alone Manson's words.Buy it if you are collecting, but read Helter Skelter or the Family for a better read.
"Charles Manson in Nuell Emmons's Words" anyone who's seen or heard Manson interviewed, knows his lingo and knows those aren't his words.
I've communicated with Charlie on more than one occasion.The man does not write nor talk like this book reads.End of story.However, his written word is legible, unlike what someone wrote in their review, some of it is a little hard to read because he's about 71 years old now and I would imagine his hands tremble a bit...But about this book...Waste of money.The ReVeReNd
Hell, I'm not even going to read this book before I tell you all what I think! No reason to waste my time reading ANYTHING written by an animal like Manson.I'm kind of in to learning more about infamous cases like Manson's...but I'd like to hear THE TRUTH about what happened. And the criminals themselves usually do NOT tell the truth. They usually do have a way of detaching themselves, if you will, from the identity they had when they committed or instigated whatever the heck the crime was. So if I read on one of the reviews, that it doesn't sound like Manson...Gosh, why on earth am I not surprised!Hey...for a good laugh, I guess this would be OK to read...just to see how a beast like Manson operates.But I give this one star...like I said, consider the sanity of the source of information in this book...and do your best to not believe it unless someone in their right mind can confirm it.Otherwise, enjoy!
While this is a fairly well written book anyone that has ever been connected to Manson, Manson's followers, or the Manson case has said there was no way that Charles Manson had ANYTHING to do with this book.First of all, Manson, while speaking makes NO sense whatsoever.Secondly, If anyone has ever seen Manson's written word, not only does it not make any sense, but it's not legible.Third, The "frame" that the wording is in, does not sound like anything I have ever seen, read, or heard from Manson.Fourth, Manson himself has denied having anything to do with this book since it was being written, through publication, through all the years since.Some of the information in this book is factual, based upon trial transcripts, and conversations that are documented elsewhere. However the words that are attributed to Manson, in my opinion were the author's own words. Not a bad read, but not something I would recommend to someone looking for the 'truth'.
People often rave about how great this album is -- I really don't see the appeal. At the risk of sounding simplistic, this CD is full of pretensious songs for pretentious people. Bad melodies, not catchy at all, very little edge. Awful. There is so much good music out there, I can't fathom why one would listen to this.
David Weber uses a trick in this book that I think is cheating at writing, and not in a good way. One chapter ends with the main characters in dire straits, and then the next one starts with them having overcome the problem without any explanation. Did he get tired of writing or is he just inept?Otherwise I'd say that I would recommend the book to readers age 12-16. To an adult the characters seems a trifle "fantastic".
Why would I choose to listen to this when I already own every Black Sabbath album, and every Blue Chear album? I mean-it sounds like a cover band pretty much. But they will fare well in a music industry that does not favor creativity over a fashionable rehash. Such is life.
I bought these Trim Toenail Clippers because of "NJMOM's Review" above. NJMOM stated these clippers are "STRAIGHT" not "CURVED", WRONG, these clippers are CURVED! I emailed Farm & Home Supply Center for a "RGA Number" to return these clippers and never got one. I'll keep them but I'm not happy.If you want a straight cutting blade toenail clipper, these are not the ones. Get the Tweeezerman ones.
I had TWO of these products sent to me and BOTH of them were inoperatable and the packaging on one of them was open...ughhhh...VERY disappointed not to mention frustrated!
Sadly both A Modern Magician & it's sequel A Calculated Magic have not aged well. They both feel very 80's
I believe the pet groomer would be better if it were smaller as it is difficult to hold. The pin brush head bristles are too hard. The large head makes the suction too strong for my dogs comfort. (I have 8 dogs from 10# to 90#)
There isn't anything new to be found in this text that hasn't been covered more thoroughly in other texts. The topics covered seemed glossed over without any meat or substance. Skip this one for more up to date books.
DO you really think that this stuff is going to work? especially the trapping? so many people love trapping but when then try it in sparring it doesnt work.the lin lop sau,the bong lop sau,the same hand tan to lop sau-cmon now none of that works against anyone who doesnt leave their hand out there after they throw a punch! this may have been how people fought hundreds if not a thousand years ago but it certainly isnt practical now! if you want to spend lots of your precious time learning an art that most of it you cant use in sparring or in the street then so be it.but like bruce said "man {or for that matter any person man or woman} is MORE IMPORTANT than any art or system" even applies to jkd and wing chun-not the other way around!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
would not buy it.Not worth the money.Did not tell me all the things that I could see in the cities.Would not recommend to anyone.
While the author does a good job of illustrating the personal "good hair vs. bad hair" trauma of black girls everywhere (myself included), too much of this novel is bogged down in romance novel cliches to make the overall plot resonate.
C'mon. We've all read this stuff before: E.Lynn Harris. Bebe Moore Campbell. Terry McMillan. Ad Nauseum. And most have done it better. I don't know any black people who talk or act like these characters. They were like cardboard cartoon people. For all of her talk about "cutting off" her hair, Venus still was NOT NAPPY!! She had finely textured hair, for goodness sakes! She was even compared to Jada Pinkett by one of her close friends! The title was a ..., and I felt cheated as I read the book. As a matter of fact, I skipped to the end. Don't buy it, rent it from the library if you must.
I struggled through this book. The storyline was a bore! I was also anxious to read this book as it was highly recommended, but too was I disappointed. If you absolutely have to read this book, borrow it from someone or the library!
I purchased the original Klaatu album on vinyl in 1976. I love the album as much now on CD as it did then. However "Hope" is far too theatrical, with virtually no actual songs on it. If I could give it 0 stars I would.
This is the first book by Alastair Reynolds I have read. I must say I was disappointed. The idea behind the book is interesting. But Reynolds' writing is pedestrian at best. The pacing is terrible. The characterizations are thin. The book drags for hundreds of pages, then falls apart in the last 50. It seems like the editor got nervous at the length and told AR to wrap it up quick-smart.I would read other books by AR if they were given to me, but I won't be buying any others.
I usually enjoy the thrill of grand space operas. No suspense in this one though. Everything was totally predictable. The conflict between Svetlana and Bella was tedious; the aliens were somehow uninspired. I enjoyed a couple of his other books, but this one was far too long and uneventful.
Musk Dogs...Fountainheads..and a spaceship that's been on the grill to long..Two crabby women that fight for 50 freakin' years or is 18,000 years! Yes I finished the book..I know why some wanted to leave the "structure".Granted the first part of the book is full of promise, chasing down Janus and the problems that ensue...but then the wheels fall off. Read the first 1/3 of the book then pick up something else.
Even thou I enjoyed the art, the book wasn't in english. I wanted to read and understand about the art, to bad.
Beware of the size of this book!If you are expecting to receive a regular size art book, you will be extremely disappointed. The book measures 7.5 x 9 inch and is thinner than my pinky finger.However, if you are just interested in the content, there is a lot to look at and to read.
ON/OFF button extremely hard to work, maybe broke. Numbers on temp dial very hard to read. Once you get it going, it works OK.
The transfer to digital format from the analog source includes all of the tape hiss on this disc. The content is great, but the background noise is too much on my system. I'd look for another title from OP and pass on this one.
I bought this to keep the inside of my RV from freezing up during the week (we use it on weekends). After a power-outage of about 30 minutes, the unit failed to come back on so everything froze up. Since we are prone to brief outages, this was not acceptable. I replaced the Delonghi with a $20 space-heater and have not had another problem.
I had these bowls on my wedding registry and my sister in law ordered them for me. The first time they came, they were all broken and cracked. We thought it was probably during shipping that it happened so we sent away for a replacement. The second set came, and two were in tact, the other one had a crack down the side. I just let it go and continued to use them...well....4 months later, they were stained, they ALL had cracks in them, down the sides, on the bottom (which means that anytime I put liquid in them they leak). They are practically falling apart after 4 months of use. KitchenAid can do better than this...I was very dissappointed!
I have had these for a little over a year now. The edges are starting to chip off, and they have been stained a little. They are ok, but not wonderful. I feel like for a Kitchen Aid product, they should be much better.
My little brother just got this for his birthday. It's cool, but will probably be broken in a few days. The pieces that stick to the wall fall off alot. No action figures come with it either. And the bottom half is made of cardboard too--not cool.
I bought this for my 6 year old son and it is very unstable. It falls apart way to easily. We have to lean it up against the wall so he can play with it and it still falls down.
My son is a HUGE bat man fan. This was a must last christmas.. well we never could get it to stand up right and then bat man wouldnt slide down with out him pushing him the rest of the way. It came apart no matter how easy he was with it. And he lost interest less than a week of tring to make it work. He still wants a bat cave so we bought the older version (that has great reviews)instead this christmas so hopefully this one will be the one to make him happy and my pocket book.
This toy is a disaster. Who ever heard of a toy that you had to tape to the wall to balance. Every time it moves, it falls over or falls apart. This is the last time I will ever buy this type of toy. The worst part is the look of disappointment on my son's face the first time he tried to play with this. You people should be ashamed, it's like stealing our money at our children's expense!!!
I sure wish I would have read the reviews before I purchased this item! This is really the only toy my 6 yr old son asked for this Christmas! I couldn't believe how flimsy this toy is. There is no way he could even play with it. Everytime we tried to move it, it fell apart! I am very disappointed and do not recommend.
This again is Mattel proving to me that someone is not playing with the toys after they are made. Horrible construction, directions are a nightmare (no words at all and very hard to follow) and they put the flimsy paper piece on the bottom and the "cave" components on the top. This not only makes no sense (don't they know batman went down into the cave to get to the computers and all) but it makes the product very top heavy. They actually recommend you glue it to your walls. No toy should be sold that is 42 inches tall and have to be glued to the walls!! All they have to do at Mattel is hire someone with a young child or let a child play with a set and they would have seen it could have been switched around (heavy stuff on bottom) and it would work better. As my kid would say "DUH"
Our almost 4 year old couldn't wait to get this toy to add to his super hero collection. It looks great on the box. However, this is by far the worst toy we have purchased for any of our kids in almost 8 years. It is so flimsy and cheaply built. Pieces fall off and it tips a lot. Hopefully it will be re-designed with sturdier materials. If you are considering purchasing it...don't...you'll save your self some money and frustration.
The advetising on the box caught my attention so I bought this playset for my son's birthday. It was a complete waste of money! The toy design is terrible! The batcave falls over when played with. The elevator doesn't function properly either. Because of all the malfunctions and collapes, my son lost interest within five minutes of play. If you want your child to have a Happy Birthday or Merry Christmas go with something other than this toy.
Couldn't wait to give this to my 6 yr. old son last year for Christmas since it was all he kept asking for. When he got it, what a disappointment it turned out to be. Putting it together was a real project & it kept falling apart. The heavier part of the item is towards the top so it had no real durability. The background that supposedly holds it up is made out of cardboard so that was a complete flop so forget about screwing it to the wall. He played with it for like 5 minutes & now it just sits in his room collecting dust & falling over. This year, he asked for the Transforming Gotham City. Maybe we'll try that & see what happens.
I think MATTEL needs to fire the team who makes all the Batman toys, & hire a team of people with quality & creativity in mind. This one of many Batman toys my 6 year old son has, every 5 minutes he comes to me to put the toy back together agian. (I glued together last years modle of the car, the 'wings' always fell off!) the cave is very top heavy, with a flimsy support & backing. If you don't have a permanent wall space to stick this toy on to it will fall as soon as you walk away! Plus there are three pices to this toy that would fall off as soon as I put on that we didn't need anyway.
Well - this was my son's #1 request from Santa Claus. Despite the reviews, he brought it to our house. As expected, it is quite flimsy. It is sad to watch my 5 yr old struggle with the elevator while trying to give batman a ride. It is so pathetic how these toy companies take advantage of children, and (their parents!) with such poor quality merchandise.
Do not buy this toy. If you are given this toy as a gift, return it for store credit. This is a flimsly and poorly designed stack of platic and paper. The secret door doesn't work, the elevator doesn't slide and toys get stuck in there. The suggested 10" batman doesn't work with the zip line, bungee or even the elevator. The add says "Using new adhesive technology, you can set up the Batcave on just about any wall" so they want us to glue this thing on to a wall.Please don't buy this toy.
MY SON SAW THE NEW TV SHOW AND WANTED THE NEW BATCAVE. HE HAD THE ORIGINAL ONE BUT BOTH HIM AND I WERE IMPRESSED WITH THE SIZE. DO NOT LET THIS FOOL YOU. IT IS BUILT VERY FLIMSY. THE PARTS FALL APART EASILY. THE ELEVATOR CANNOT BE USED UNLESS YOU HAVE THE PROPER BATMAN DOLLS TO PUT IN THERE . THE CARDBOARD BACKING FALLS OFF. THE STICKERS ARE A PAIN TO PUT ON. I SPENT 2 HRS ON X-MAS EVE PUTTING TOGETHER THIS CAVE. MY SON HAS IT STUCK IN A CORNER. HE HAS MORE FUN LINING UP HIS ACTION FIGURES ON THE COUCH AND USING HIS IMIGINATION THAN THIS TOY. DO NOT GET IT. THE ORIGINAL BATCAVE IS BETTER. SMALLER BUT BETTER.
Bruce BANNER turns into THE HULK, not THE BATMAN, morons! It's BRUCE WAYNE who turns into Batman. Maybe this toy would get better reviews if product specialists spent a LITTLE more time researching the list of who transforms into whom.Hulk SMASH stupid Batcave!
My son really wanted this toy and loves batman, so Grandma splurged on this expensive-for-what-you-get toy. First thing, it's a real bear to set up, and then when you do set it up it is really clumsy and pieces fall off very easily. The boys still had fun playing with it, even when the elevator constantly got jammed. They would have enjoyed it even more if they actually included at LEAST ONE character figure in the darn set. OOOPs, we did not notice until he opened the gift that the action figures used for the set were sold separately. All in all, don't waste your money.
We bought this for my 4 year old son for Christmas and I am very sorry we spent our money on it. Putting it together was not fun, but the real disappointment came when it was done and you see what it is. I think it is unrealistic to think that most people will want to or ever allow this toy to be STUCK to the wall with an adhesive (it says not to leave it stuck there for long periods of time - you must remove it from the wall after playing with it - which means this flimsy piece of plastic is now laying on the floor). After playing with it for 10 minutes, the elevator gets stuck. The top keeps falling off, everytime I turn around my son is whining that this came apart or that came apart. I assume I will be super gluing it before long. I feel ripped off as a consumer. Buyer Beware!
I have been buying toys for my kids as well as my niece and nephew for 14 years and this is the worst quality toy I've purchased! In fact, I had better quality toys when I was a child. My 3 year old son insisted on having this for Christmas and he loves it despite the fact that we have it leaned against the wall to hold it up. It comes with adhesive but I don't want to risk damaging our walls. It is very top-heavy (the 3-level batcave is help up by a couple light-weight plastic tubes)and, though the idea of all the parts snapping in place is nice, I actually had to glue one part in place so it wouldn't fall in the floor. Speaking of pieces, there are a million of them! The directions could be written better also. I read the other reviews here after my son had his heart set on this toy and wish I could have talked him out of this one. Fortunately, he has enjoyed playing with it despite all its flaws but he got better quality $10 toys for Christmas than this one!
My 4 year old son received the Batcave for Christmas. I know it is about $40. It took my hubby 1/2 hour to put together - is EXTREMELY flimsy & my son got batman stuck in the bat elevator within the first 2 minutes of using it. Soooooo not worth it. What a let down.
The Eurorack was purchased as a portable mixer to tie mics into a camera. The inherent noise in my particular mixer is completely unacceptable. At a very reasonable level using balanced connections the mixer unmistakably colors the sound with a clear sounding "HISS". Even when running on batteries and far away from any electronic device the HISS is incredibly loud! Totally unacceptable for my purpose. The unit is now stashed away in a closet, a washed up waste of time!However for those on a budget who desire much greater quality with fewer inputs I HIGHLY recommend a Mackie 402-VLZ3 Four-Channel Compact Audio Mixer. However sometimes fewer inputs are unacceptable. Whatever the case steer clear from behringer!
After a semester using the text i have come to the conclusion that the authors, Brehm, Kassin, and Fein, leave more questions then answers and that their sub-par sense of humor is more then just a waste of money. After reading certain sections i get the feeling that the authors do not clearly understand the issue at hand, but rather throw 15 different research studies at the topic covering their uncertainty and topping it off with a dire attempt at a joke leaving the reader completely ambiguous.
my scanner hasn't worked since the day i took it out of the box, installed the software, and the green light is on but when i hit scan it does nothing! looks like it's a dud. lol.
The price was excellent but the standard shipping was very slow. It doesn't work with Vista, no drivers, so is useless to me. I gave it to my son and it works fine with Windows XP. My son has used it to scan pictures for me and it is of good quality.
I'm pretty tech savy, and This is by far the worst experience ive had with ANY piece of electronica ever. Dont let the low price fool you, theres a reason for that. The drivers are terrible for this, Uninstalling this scanner requires 4 different programs, tech support charges you money for help (even though I bought this 2 weeks ago), and if you actually get the scanner to work it will take a good 25 minutes to get the 1200 dpi resolution scan. Also the software it comes bundled with (Scansoft Paperport) is horrible, i have 2 gbs of Ram and it ran as if i had 128 mb. the TWAIN compatibility is awful, and it isnt compatible with any third party software. I wish there was something good I could write about this scanner, Aftr 2 weeks I got fed up, returned the scanner and bought an HP. People please do not hurt yourself by buying this awful piece of junk.
Do yourselves a favor and DO NOT buy this DVD. I think ever since the UFC switched to a different DVD distributor, the quality of their DVD's has gone through the floor. The picture is almost unwatchable because it is so blurry. I'm amazed that they even release stuff that basically has bootleg quality. I bought this DVD to enjoy watching Silva/Franklin over and over and over again, but I started getting a headache two minutes into it. Stay away from this. The UFC needs to do something about this because it's unacceptable for a company so successful to release such low quality garbage.
Just not my type of book. Very boring but I got through it. Hard to stick with it until the end.
One has to be a young adult to enjoy this book. If you want to read about children in a foreign country without adult supervision, well, there you have it. I'm surprised it wasn't turned into a Disney movie.Definitely a children's book.
Bought this card to use with an iPod, and was greatly disappointed. My new iPod only comes with a cable to connect to USB 2.0 ports, and the USB ports on this card DO NOT WORK with iPods. I had to go buy an additional cable (iPod to Firewire) in order to get my iPod working. The Firewire ports on this card DO work with an iPod, but you'll need a Firewire cable that new iPods may not give you.
Installation and use was easy and good. But the quality of the product was really bad and it was going loose and stopped working in between.
I've had this card installed since Nov. 2006 and just now found out that the 2 Firewire ports only work intermittently. I thought my new camcorder was messed up when I tried to use the Firewire port on the Iogear card. But when I plugged into another non-Iogear available Firewire slot, the camcorder worked. Now I have to go through the hassle of trying to get warranty work for the Iogear card. The USB ports on the card have worked okay.Update: Over 3 weeks and I'm still awaiting my warranty work repair/replacement from Iogear.3-23-07 Update: Finally got the warranty replacement. Everything seems to be working now. I would now rate this about 3 stars.
Although the specifications state compatibility with macs G3 or higher, this card will not fit into the pci slot of a new G5.(...)
I had read this book over 30 years ago as a teenager and thought it would be interesting to see how I reacted to it now. It's a fun and easy read, I'll admit that. But I can see why I liked it more as a 14-year-old; the book seems to have been written by a 14-year-old. And the "moral dilemmas" are of the kind you probably dealt with when you first learned what a "moral dilemma" is.And although the copy I read was a paperback from the early 1980's that was in its umpteenth printing, it had a surprising number of typos and major grammatical errors. I guess even back then no one took the book too seriously.
After Shogun one would expect much better. Compared with Shogun, King Rat is rather 2D. The plot is not as engrossing. I think readers will have a difficult time getting into the story. The ending is somewhat predictable (what do YOU think happens to all the prisoners?)and there are many things that are never explained (who is the informant that knew about the radio? ). On the whole an entertaining book, but it moves slowly and doesnt go anywhere (how exciting can life in a prison be anyway? :P )
the book is ok but I am very dissapointed in the condition of the book as I am reading it it is falling apart from the binding and it was listed as good condition but in my opion it was in poor condition water stains yellowing pages and binding is falling apart for the price I paid I expected better quality I doubt that I will purchase thru this group ever again Sharyl
This is the 4th Clavell book I've read, I was more than a little disappointed. I've read them in order so far, Shogun and Tai-pan for me were breathtaking, long books which I sped through. Gai-jin was more of a chore, with not much of ending. I found King Rat dull, I think the story wasn't too interesting. Other customers have commented on how harsh the prison was - too be honest, I thought it would've been worse. The King had none of the charisma of the heroes in the other books, and I found myself not really caring whether or not either him or Marlowe made it. Although a lot was made of their inner feelings, this made me feel that they were both just shallow people.
This number peg puzzle is not for a 2 year old! You cannot tell the nine from the six and depending on your child's age he/she might be confused with the colors of the pegs to the colors on the background.
1. The 6 and 9 pieces are interchangeable...that led to some confusion.2. I want this same puzzle with no glossy paper glued on. The remains of a drink were spilled onto it and the paper is now peeling off and it also absorbed the stainThe whole reason I buy wooden toys is for durability -- this same toy with just a stained/painted/plain wood would be perfect
Anyone who hears this song and isn't mesmerized, then haunted, is deaf. I heard it in my car and almost wrecked. The most beautiful!
Why does it look as though the same person wrote all seven of the reviews above? Kind of odd, huh?
This book does not present much information about Chopin the man, and stumbles around endlessly about Chopin's music. The prose is laughably dated. Who can not help laughing at sentences like "Chopin distrusted Jews, but that's the way Poles are." The French, English, Germans, and Hungarians: Huneker comes up with some interesting stereotypes for them too. Many of the facts are incorrect, as the editor supplies the corrected facts in the footnotes on nearly every page of the text. And the music discussions have the spirit of "What a powerful melody! However, I believe the third note of the 14th measure of Etude 12 op. 10 should be an F sharp, though it's written differently in some scores." What a snore. I suggest looking elsewhere for real information about Chopin and his music. This book offers no insights though some occasional unintended laughs.
Who gave this guy a music contract? This song is so terrible and overplayed. Plus the guy can't sing he sounds like he is whining. Stay away from this song!!
I love the neptunes and almost everything done by them has struck me as gold, but this song is not that great. Pharrell can sing ok, but the beats is their forte. And this beat is nothing special at all. Just didn't do it for me. Also, they added the radio edit of Hott (cot) damn. The clean version of that track is stupid. Better off just listen to the real version on Lord Willin'. Not the best cd single compilation.
I'll give the Neptunes Props for being Successful in a very tough Business to make a mark in&they have been doing well for some time now.but as far as Pharell thinking He is the 2nd-Coming of Curtis Mayfield? NAW!Double NAW!!!! Pharell has Radny Watson written all over Him Vocally to me.whenever I watch Pharell up there singing I have a "Coming to America" Flashback.but the scary part is that alot of folks are taking His Singing Career as legit.
THESE CLIPPERS FELL APART WITHEN TWO WEEKS.I'VE NEVER SEEN SUCH POORLY MADE CLIPPERS.DO NOT BUY.THE PART HOLDING IT ALL TOGETHER FELL OUT WHILE USEING IT.
As a huge fan of the group, I was disappointed with this item. The interview disc is poor quality and was basically audio from existing early interviews which most fans would have already. The content is dated and is pre reunion.The book has some nice pictures which again, are all pre 'comeback'I would'nt really recommend the item to existing fans, there is'nt really any content of interest. The cover card was scraped on arrival and looked shabby despite having been well packaged.
I have had the displeasure of working with this machine for over 4 years. Its incompetent feeder is only matched by the uselessness of the software it comes with. Save yourself the frustration and buy another scanner.
American Electronics Mart sold me a "refurbished" Xerox documate 510 scanner that did not work from the start. I spent two weeks trying to troubleshoot to find out whether the problem was on my end. Then, because I missed the return deadline, they would not take the scanner back. They would not agree to pay the costs to me to ship the scanner back to them. Now, I have wasted $250 on a worthless piece of junk sold to me by these crooks. Don't ever buy anything from these creeps.
This scanner is absolutely terrible. I have a small home business and I want to go paperless. If you are in the middle of a scan job, say you are on the 30th page already, and something is wrong, there is no recovery feature so you have to start from scratch. In fact, tech support says you will get constant errors if you scan more than 20 pages at a time, yet the document feeder is supposed to hold 50 pages (?). You can scan and then merge multiple scans to become one, but that is not the point. The point is that out of 900 pages of scanning, i got about two dozen errors which requires me to shut off the machine, close the scanning program and start all over again. I returned the product and got another documate 510 because tech support said it must be faulty, but the second is exactly the same. This scanner is nothing but a pain in the rear. I am shipping the second one back in the morning.
My company bought this scanner about a year and a half ago. We have 10 - 15 people who use it intermittently. It does not see heavy use. From the beginning we've had trouble with it jamming and feeding multiple pages. The cover to open it is very hard to snap open, and it won't recover from a jam without us turning off the scanner and rebooting the computer. I discovered that if I change the automatic document feeder pad assembly every 3 months or so, which I should not have to do, it helps the jamming and misfeed issue. Recently I went to order these pads, which were $20.00 apiece, and I couldn't find them on Xerox's website. When I called them they said this item was no longer being sold individually, but in a kit with cleaning solution and 2 pads. So what would have cost $40.00 - bad enough - now costs $100.00 !! As if we haven't spent enough money and frustration on this thing. I am going to do my best to get rid of this thing and buy one that works!
Don't buy this scanner, if you want to use the ADF to scan multiple pages into one document. The "SCANDIRECT" software that ships with this product WILL NOT scan multiple pages into one document. When you feed 5 pages into the ADF (automatic document feeder) thinking you'll get one document with 5 pages ---WRONG.. you get 5 documents with one page each.Just UPGRADE your paperport software for a minimum of $100, and then you can use the scanner as it was designed. When I called to complain to XEROX about this, I was told that they had "mated" this scanner and the software (Version 9) before the ADF was added as part of the base scanner. Seemed pretty crappy to me. IT GOING BACK to the store tomorrow.
I set it up according to the directions, clicked the scan button, and the contraption made a noise but never began the scanning process. Uninstalled it, then re-installed it, and the same thing happened. Complete and utter waste of my time. I gave it one star only because it had all the parts in the box.
Bad Scanner. Only with their software are you able to scan in paperwork. Paperport causes more problems with the computers I have it installed on than any other product I know of. If you have anything greater than Adobe Acrobat 5 installed, you can't use Acrobat to scan in software. Stay away from the Documate line of scanners!
Sure, this thing is definitely more cost-effective than an iPod. But with a low price, comes lower quality. Our special friends at Creative gave this thing good sound quality, great features, long battery life, and an unbeatable price. The catch is it's built like a piece of crap. It lasted about 1 1/2 weeks. I didn't abuse it, I charged it every day, but the headphone jack just sort of fizzled out. I tried re-setting it, I tried just about every pair of headphones in my house (10 pairs), and nothing worked. So I contacted customer service at Creative, but they said, "If the product seems broken, we cannot help," or something to that effect. Wow. Don't get me wrong, the thing was like heaven for about a week. If you want a quality mp3 player, splurge on an ipod. If you really need to save, buy this thing on Amazon, they eventually gave me a full refund. I bought myself an RCA mp3-cd player, and I'm happy with that until a cheap, worthwhile mp3 player coomes out.
After a little over a year my Zen Xtra has stopped playing sound. Everything else works it just appears to be a faulty headphone jack which is a common problem on Creative's players. On a dinky $30 portable I wouldn't expect much but on a $300 device this is just unacceptable.Their warranty period and customer service is a joke. Go have a look at their forums. Stay away from Creative products. There are other alternatives out there.
this player supports ONLY mp3 and wmaunfortunately, my own-made music format is ogg, and downloaded radio recording is asf format, this player don't support bothand lack of digital recording is a major drawback too, unlike iriver, it has digital in and out, this is a necessary for mesorry, zen, this is not for me
Simply not as friendly for functional as an iPod. Even better, iPod integrates perfectly with iTunes so that managing music is a snap.
What's going on Creative Labs? Is it a coincidence that I no longer can get any of your Nomad Zen Xtras (worst name ever) at Best Buy and now the 60GB Nomad Xtra is "sold out" or more likely "discontinued" at the almighty Amazon.com? hmmmmm....
I've had my Zen for over 4 years now (hard to believe I've had it that long). I still haven't filled up the memory on it, I've never had a day's trouble with it, and it's easy to use. I'm starting to find it a bit bulky now in comparison to some of the smaller, sleeker-looking players on the market, but I still have the attitude "if it ain't broke, don't fix it". The zen is superb, it's reliable, it's solid and easy to use, and I just don't see the point in changing to an ipod purely for aesthetics. I love my zen, and I wouldn't be without it.
I loved this thing until 2 1/2 months after purchase... The phone jack is not working properly. Now I am very disappointed. Glad I got a 2 year replacement plan from Best Buy. Recommend you protect yourself if you buy this product. I don't think the phone jack problem is a rare one from what I have read here.
the warrenty on this device is only 3 months and it breaks quite quickly. the cover kept popping off and when it broke creative said the warrenty ran out
What a junk. Every time NOMAD thinks the file is corrupt the OS freezes. The only way to recover is to plug the power cord and go into recovery mode. So if you happen to be out of the house and you have a frozen OS you can't use NOMAD until you get home. After OS froze twice on me in the subway I returned the jukebox.
DO NOT BUY THIS PRODUCT--I took perfect care of this player and still it died in the week after the lousy 90 day warranty ended. Nearly 4000 songs went up in smoke. The software is not good either and the driver has trouble working with other SOUND BLASTER products, which is very dumb.
I can't share the enthusiasm of my preceeding reviewers.In my opinion, this is a book for advanced fishermen, who already know about fisheries ethics, or don't care about it. The book doesn't cover important aspects such as selective harvesting (how to keep damage on fish as low as possible so it can be released again) or treatment of fish, once it's caught (swift killing, keeping, cleaning).Two thirds of the book are about baiting, with major chaptors on how to use life bait such as small fish, salamander, frogs. However, the author completely fails to address ethical concerns about this technique("replace your bait frequently. When a frog tires and stops kicking, it is much less effective"), a technique that is actually forbidden in some countries because of the cruelty involved.
This book's patterns are seriously flawed. My attempt to follow the "outdoor snuggly" for a 0-3 month old baby resulted in a 32 inch waistline snuggly with legs that were too long and arms that were too short. In addition, the photos of the snuggly did not match the pattern's instructions. My cousin used the baby poncho pattern and had a myriad of similar problems. Do NOT buy this book!
I have bought 2 of these items for my 2 cars, but it burns the batteries every time! It even burns the phone, sometimes.Ranieri
Voodoo in New OrleansThis is an old classic which, if you are interested in either "Voodoo" or New Orleans, you probably should read. However, you can ignore the old adage of taking what Robert Tallant had to say with a grain of salt; you will need an entire salt lick to handle this slim volume. It is colorful, exciting, and alas, mostly the product of Robert Tallant's fevered imagination. What facts he didn't get wrong, he completely fabricated.Plenty of scholars have already weighed in on the problems presented and alas, also created by this small piece of creative fiction. It's very entertaining, although occasionally offensive. Mostly, it should not be taken seriously.Eoghan Ballard (Ph.D. Folklore. University of Pennsylvania 2005)
I searched all over to find a book specifically about voodoo in New Orleans, and unfortunately this was all I could find...it's only 240ish pages and I still haven't even made it through it yet. Though there are some interesting facts, I think it's poorly written -- and it's 50 years old! Would like to see a more updated version that is a better read. Maybe will write it myself!
If you are interested in reading a bunch of ignorant, bigoted stereo types, by all means buy this book.Robert Tallant was not a writer to bother with facts when spewing his hatred and racism.His depictions of New Orleans Voodoo and it's practitioners are dead wrong.If you want to read about New Orleans Voodoo, try Voodoo Queen: The Spirited Lives of Marie Laveau by Martha Ward.
The whole book could have been written in half of its size. Not very well written due to being too wordy, hard to follow.
I actually give this ZERO stars. But had to give it a star due to Amazon's rules.The title is slightly misleading as it is not all about Wilson's involvment with Manson. That's just a part of it. And warning, that part contains explicit material if anyone cares to know. I know Brian Wilson is the brains behind the Beach Boys, but this documentary was predominantly about Brian. This should have been titled: "Brian Wilson and the Satan (featuring the rest of them)".I've seen other Beach Boys documentaries (even made for tv movies) that were better than this jumpy compilation. I felt like I was trying to watch a documentary put together by someone who had ADD.
Recently, I went and bought this CD Player, i was going to geta ... Sony one but ended up with this one instead cuz' it was cheap u know? Well, this one I bought didn't even have antiskip protection at all! It skips whenever I go and it eat batteries like crazy! I had wasted over 10 batteries within a month. What a piece of junk! I don't think this product differs either so I recommend not buying it and get a better product. In fact, I just going to get a new CD Player from KOSS which I think will be better. This is not worth your time, and the cd players ugly too!
I purchased this product just a few months ago and it's broken already. It was used at a desk with ear phones so it wasn't moved,bounced or anything you would expect a personal player to withstand.It skipped at the slightest bump and went through batteries like crazy.I now have a different CD player and would not recommend this to anyone.
OK, people, all I have to say is this thing sux. The price may be low, but the thing is just plain crappy. And I though CD players were supposed to play music...
of course you can't expect the ps2 experience to translate to the psp. gameplay is entirely different, even with gamebreakers and such. would make a great way to pass time on long flights or rides if there were mini-games.
When I read these review I thought this game was going to be amazing but no one mentioned that this game has very bad Controling. Here is some on the problems. When you go up for a shot and press the "o" button the player goes up and once you let go it takes about half a second for the player to let go of the ball so you really have no SHOT CONTROL. This game is not like many other basketball games where once your let go of the button it shoots. This game has been with me for about 2 weeks and I stopped playing this game on the first day because it got very lame and boaring because you dont have alot of control over your players.There are a few other problems in this game. The players really dont look like the actuall players and do not play like them eather. I would highely reccomend you not to get this game and would suggest "NBA" or another great sports game like "FIFA".
A sugar and oil mix with an explosive citrus fragrance. Yes, your skin will feel softer, but it's not worth it. I had to wash it off with soap and water, then clean the tub before I got out so I wouldn't fall. Take a shower and spray yourself with oil spray - it's not messy or stinky, and certainly not as slippery!
This fan heater can oscillate, which is controlled by the foot switch (i.e., the foot switch doesn't turn the heater on or off). You can tilt the heater, too, but not by much. Overall, the heater feels cheaply made and soemtimes it doesn't work; I have to unplug and replug it to make it go again.The markings for the two knobs (left for power/fan level, right for thermostat) are *very* hard to see; they are almost non-existent. This is a very stupid design decision.I wouldn't buy this heater again despite its low price and good safety features.
I bought this heater and it didn't even work on arrival. The pilot light came on, but nothing else. What a waste of time and money.
Not only is the heat (btu)rating false, (in my oppinion), but to me it doesnt put out heat at all (relivently speeking) the tip over feature has prevented the unit from opperating several times in the 3 hours since i recieved it.. furthermore.. i will never purchace a heater made of plastic.. think about it.. plastic melts and metal doesnt (at the advertised tempurature) the fan speed i would equate to a gentle breeze if that. the heat output is far, far, below what i would have expected based on the advertisement.. basically in my oppinion this product is worthless to purchase unless you are trying to heat a refrogerator box sized space 5 degrese in a 70 degree enviroment.. look elsewhere for your heating needs.
I have really enjoyed this book! I have been learning a lot for my own healing. The reason I bought it was because a few months back I was able to read a portion of the book and I was hooked! I think this book is a must read for people struggling with ritual abuse!!
Reaching for the Light takes a very simple approach to a complex subject. Emilie Rose certainly researched ritual abuse well for having known about her own abuse for only one year prior to writing this book. In my opinion it takes years of therapy and intensive work to fully understand the damage done and the path to healing for the deep problems within. Any therapist who has worked with a ritual abuse victim for more than a year would not get anything from this book. Neither would anyone who has been in this hellhole beyond the initial discovery stage. My advice is to skip this book.
1)The problems in the book are very outdated. (for grammar section buy Cliff's or Longman)2)The problems in the book are less difficult than those on a real exam.3)The problems in the book were arranged in very boring manner.4)The CD-Rom is only for Listening. (for more computer practice buy Delta's Key for Toefl Test with CD, which has 10 tests or Cambridge Preparation for Toefl Test, which has 7 tests. Both books have CD-Rom simulated CBT.)5) The Essay section is fair. (for the best essay section buy Cambridge Preparation for the Toefl Test)Generally, there is no one book for the preparation for the TOEFL. Most likely you will need some combination of them.For instance,a) Delta for practice and reading. Moreover, you may wish to buy just Delta CD Rom without book and cassets for practice only;b)Cliff's or Longman for grammar;c)Cambridge for essay and for practice.Good luck!
I dont find any CD inside the book. It was really matter of disgrace that CD was missing after shifting. While I was going for the purchase it was mentioned that the CD will be available but it was missing
In general, I have little appreciation for humor based on male parental incompetence. Furthermore, ... I have just as little time for humor based on female mechanical incompetence. The theme of this book is male incompetence when it comes to pregnancy and birth. Many of the cartoons are about men being nincompoops in the delivery room, doing such helpful things as fainting, getting sick when looking at the placenta and so forth. ...Some of the cartoons about the baby in the womb are a bit humorous, but overall I did not find this collection of jokes very funny.
This book, while fairly well written, was quite a dull story, and was very depressing to read. Sherwood seems to have researched her subject well, but the book seemed to be unnecessarily vulgar in a number of places, and this made the book all the more unpleasant to read.
The case I had didn't fit properly - the window obstructed the rightmost side of the display. You could shift it over, but it would always shift back. I don't know if they are all that way (maybe I got a bad one?), but I didn't want to buy another one to find out.
The averall construction is good but the placement of the holes leave a lot to be desired. It changes position very easily and constantly covers the, already way too small, holes you speak into. I would have been very dissapointed if I would have paid the original asking price of $... The belt clip feature is good.
I have had the first DVD since I bought my first dance hoop over a year ago, and figured that I would give the second one a try. This DVD is horrible! The picture and sound quality sucks. The picture is grainy and the sound is off. I could have made a better DVD in my backyard with my small camera. It is over-priced and they could have fit so much more in one DVD. I am so dissapointed that Hoopnotica would put out such a low quality product.
I haven't been able to watch this much because the DVD won't play in my normal (otherwise functioning) DVD player. It will play on my computer's DVD player, but without sound. The DVD will play fine on my laptop, but that's not a screen that's very conducive to practicing in front of. The DVD does play on my friend's DVD player for some reason. Also, I bought volumes 1 and 2 and both are so short, it seems obvious that they could have put all of the lessons on one DVD. I guess they knew they could make more money by making us buy both.
I'm a big fan of Costello, a big fan of Bacharach, and through Deep Dead Blue, became a fan of Frisell. This combination seemed too good to be true, and actually, I was so looking forward to hearing it as one piece that I saved listening to it until I had a long car journey.Sadly, the Sweetest Punch is much less than the sum of the parts.I understand that Bill recorded it without hearing Elvis & Burt's finished album. I wish he'd waited and used it as inspiration, as The Sweetest Punch is neither sweet nor punchy. Instead it is passionless, routine and flat. Moreover it's just dull if you compare it to the rich, elegant, touching soundscapes of Painted From Memory.I am surprised that as someone with so much creative control over his output, Elvis didn't take Bill aside and suggest re-mixing or re-recording or simply not releasing.Sad really.
Is it just me...or is there something strange about the sound of this album, as though the musicians are all slightly out of tune or it's being played on a tape recorder that's going a little bit below the usual speed? This effect is particularly noticeable on "TOLEDO".I loved "Painted From Memory"- I think the songs are fantastic. These versions don't detract from them, but, with a couple of exceptions (e.g "Painted from Memory", sung by Cassandra Wilson) they don't add much to the original album either. I had hoped that this CD would be more jazzy and improvisational. After all Bacharach and Costello have provided some great chords for jazz musos to play around with. Instead the instrumentation is dull and the arrangements unadventurous. Particularly bad is "God Give Me Strength", which on all other recordings is amazing.
>:I assumed that the 3 items in the picture was what I was buying, not 1, what am gonna do with one?
Unfortunatelly the DVD is dissapointing for Tina's fans. The show is fantastic, but both Dolby Digital and DTS version of this DVD have one of the worst sounds I ever heard. My subwoofer didn't move once while the tweeters of the front speakers nearly went on flames. More, the soundtrack was re-edited with sound taken from other concerts (that's incredible - at one moment I swear that I heard the word Munchen despite the fact that the concert is in Amsterdam). And, oh yes, the DVD is overpriced. Forget "Amsterdam" and don't miss "One Last Time in Concert" as it has verry good sound quality and image. Not speaking abut the phantastic show...
I love Tina. Her music is the epitome of energizing soul-rock. We looked forward to this DTS version of her concert. We put it in, sat back, and after 5 minutes into the concert I was becoming agitated at what should be a great show. The music was great, but after 30 minutes I was going nuts. Then it dawned on me: the camera work is absolutely the worst. It's horrible. It detracts from the concert. It never stops moving. It never stops fading in & out. It jumps from one angle to another. It changes every few seconds and it never stops for the whole concert. A bunch of high school kids could have done better. I hope we can find another Tina concert worth buying but the Amsterdam concert was a waste of our money. What a cryin' shame.
The first one I received the SD card slot lock did not work. The second one literally took 5 to 10 minutes to boot up. I returned it again to Discount Jungle (Amazon Seller) and they said they would not charge me the 15% restocking fee which they did anyhow.All in all, I wouldn't own another Sandisk MP3 even if they would give me one for free! I'm out $10.00 for two return shipments and another $10.00 restocking fee. Nothing to restock at Discount Jungle, send the piece of junk back to Sandisk!!!Save some headaches and buy something different! Do a Google search for Sansa View slow start up, boot, or lockup.At least the FM Radio was nice....that's why it has a two star rating. I'd sure hate to see how well the re-manufactured units work.
While advertised as eight hours of play time, the player didn't make a two hour trip once in the three or four weeks we had it.Now just waiting to get the refund we've been notified we will receive so we can try something else, hopefully something that will live up to its advertisement this time.
After about 3 months things started going down hill really fast. After leaving it in the car on a summer day something went wrong with the with the power saver. I'd charge it over night and the next morning it would be dead. I'd listen to it for 5 minutes, turn it off, then turn it back on and it would be at half power. Recently the screen broke. That just gave me a good reason to get rid of it.Trust me, keep looking.
I got this player for Christmas and it immediately had bad screen problems, the LCD screen would freeze or make thick dark lines. The rewind bar doesn't work either! you can rewind it and the seek bar will show it rewinding, but it'll resume right where it left off! I only give this player 2stars just because it's ease.
I bought a sansa view 8gb from Sold by: txxhenk, and i am not at all satisfied with this product. I just got the player, without a charger, how on the world should i charge this player without a charger. I also didn't receive the USB cable or the head phones or the user manual. I know that this is used-good condition but i didn't expect this.
If you have ever had an iPod you will kick yourself for buying this player. Replaced my iPod Nano because the battery life was fading. Unfortunately, there is no way to get the advertised 35 hours of advertised battery life. You should expect 6 to 8 hours.It is crashy. It occationally corrupts the tracks when it crashes. The screen is average. Getting podcsts to show up as podcasts has been frustrating. Forget about video podcasts. You will be spending a significant amount of time formatting them. Of course, you should expect even worse battery life.The reason the iPod Nano is $130; it works!
I purchased this player last August and it worked fine for 4 months, even though I didn't play it much. My intent was to use it primarily on plane flights. Suddenly and for no reason, I was unable to easily insert the earphones into the player. With a little effort, I was finally able to insert the earphone, but could not get any sound.I contacted Sandisk and was very disappointed with their response. The player has a 1-year warranty but it's very apparent that Sandisk is attempting to discourage replacing defective products by making purchasers jump through hoops to test the product and prove it is defective rather than immediately fixing or replacing it. If the player won't work as advertised, why should I be inconvenienced as a result.In addition, a senior service person was supposed to contact me about the problem, but has not done so. I would never purchase a Sandisk product in the future -- too difficult to deal with if there's a warranty problem !
This item is one of the worse I have seen in the Sansa family. I have had all the Sansa E200 series mp3 players and those froze at times when viewing video. Good sound when you use better headphones. The only thing that is good about this mp3 player is the large view screen. The conversion software always freezes after the video file has been converted meaning that you have to Ctrl<Alt<Delete to shut down the program. As a 'techie', I recommend that you don't buy this item. Oh! one more thing! Do not order via the free shipping that Amazon offers. It's just 'standard' meaning you could have you item delivered to you way past the scheduled mailing time or not at all. It's been a month now and I still haven't recieved my original order alhough Amazon was gracious to resend the item, but I had to get it sent to my job which amazingly got there much faster through the same type shipping. Imagine that!
Well, I only write reviews for things I dont like enough. Otherwise dont bother.I previously had a sansa and it worked great. I dropped and broke it. The best thing about sansa is Rhapsody on the go feature and the radio feature. Unlike say an iPod, I can just listen to all kinds of music for $14.99 or something.But this new one keeps giving me the wror message 'Your tracks are not synchronized'. I then have to deauthorize device and computer, re-authorize, re-format, restore factory settings, to get it to work. Mega pain in the behind.Dont know if the fault is with Rhapsody or with Sansa, but I am seriously looking for other options for my music.
Player was defective. After charging battery, I turn it on and while attempting to download an audio-book, the unit "locked up", All functions ceased, and I couldn't turn it off: back of player became very warm. Battery finally lost life and the unit shut down. One unsuccessful attempt was was made to recharge it. It was returned for refund..
This is my second Sansa e series mp3 player. The first was a Rhapsody edition and lasted about 4 months. I blamed the short life on the R series and since I liked the way it looked and worked thought I would try it again with the e280. I loaded up my 8 gig with about 7 gig of music and now all I see is Sandisk - a brief flash of "reading" and then back to the Sandisk logo screen. It will do that for hours and hours on end. My computer doesn't even recognize it anymore. When I first plugged it in this evening the screen did come up to play music, but when I tried to, it said that the player was empty. I haven't tried contacting SanDisk. I think I will just cut my losses and write them off. The only Sansa product I've ever loved was the discontinued M series players -they're few and far between and highly sought after.
Sansaview 8 GB doesnt support 8GB external MicroSd card even with the latest F/W.When plugging an 8Gb external microsd all the media from sd card is displayed twice in Sansaview. Forums have reported this problem in 2008 and this issues is still not fixed by Sansa even in the latest F/W.If you connect a 4Gb micro SD this issue goes away.If we remove the multiple listing of same items, I would love this player.The play button automaticaly aligns for landscape photo/video view. After I upgraded to latest F/W could see most of the videos, the firmware which came alongwith SansaView 1.01 could only play audio without showing the videos.To get the device upgraded need to connect in MSC mode which is not visible from the settings and the trick is to keep the "Previous" button pressed in "hold" mode while connecting the cable to laptop.
This was a pretty good product until the damn thing just stopped working and just froze up when you tried to turn it on. I had it just over a year and after turning it on the device just went into bootup mode, never actually coming on. As long as I had it, it would frequently exhibit the same behavior. The only thing that would help was to take out the battery out and back in. Finally in the end, that did not help at all.The durability of the Sansa's line is poor at best.
I bought a sansa e280 for myself and have not encountered any troubles, so I decided to buy a View for my boyfriend. Right out of the box, the player would not turn on because the power button was stuck. We tried everything but nothing would happen. The customer service people could not turn it on also, so we exchanged that one. The next one we received at least turned on. We went home to charge it and then tried to start loading media on. Thats where trouble came. For video and pictures, you have to convert the file format by using the sansa downloadable converter. I was able to transfer photos with no problem but we never were able to get video on the player. We tried different files, different computers, and different people and nothing. My boyfriend spoke to the customer representatives and had no luck. I have transferred music, video, and photos to my sansa e280 with no problems, but this player has many problems.
The player is awful if you are using it to listen to lectures; it only recognizes 25 minutes of an mp3. Plus, the fast forward function is EXTREMELY slow (to fast forward 10 mins would take about 3-4 minutes of holding down the button).Otherwise, it plays music fine, though the software on the mp3 player is no where near as nice as what you get with ipods (e.g. if you pull the headphones out of the jack it will pause the file, or it will remember the exact location in a file where you last left off instead of restarting a file if you turn the player off), but on the flip side it is also significantly cheaper.Overall, you get what you pay for.
I got the View for Christmas for my daughter after her Sansa Fuze died after several years of heavy use. It would never charge right out the box using both the USB or the electric charger I have for my own Fuse. I went online and tried everything the sandisk site said-nothing worked. Got the online chat who informed me that I had to use e-mail to resolve the issue since the View is a "Legacy" item. Sent an e-mail and never got a response. Their customer service department needs a lot... of help. On the plus side, sent it back to Amazon who gave A+++ refund service. Thanks Amazon!
The Sansa View 8GB I received was faulty. The battery would not hold a charge and/or the player would not turn on. This happened within hours of opening the player packaging and attempting an initial full-charge of the player's battery. The battery is only chargeable via USB and I tried using a PC and an AC to USB adapter to charge it. There is no hard reset button like I have seen on other players (namely Cowon brand players) so it could not simply be reset.I decided to return the product for a refund because it did not seem worth the trouble of waiting for a new (or repaired) player. I was not very impressed with the build quality of the player. It felt and looked very prone to scratching or other damage if not treated with extreme care. Furthermore, I found another player that suited my personal needs and desires better than the Sansa View.
I recently purchased a used 8 GB View. It works well as a 8 GB View but will not support an 32 GB SD card. The literature on the internet said that it would support a 32 GB card.
I was very happy with my Sansa View, until all of a sudden my micro SD chip was missing. I couldn't imagine someone stealing just a chip, but then when I tried to put a new one in, I noticed it would only be installed for a second or two before the spring inside the unit would expel the chip. It would actually launch it up 4-6 inches! So now I know my original chip is somewhere at the gym, certainly vacuumed up by now.It's a great player, but check to make sure your SD card doesn't come out too easily or just send it back!
Nice player except the microSD card fails to be recognized anymore. The problem isn't the card (I've tried several), it IS the Player. The disappointing machine just fails to recognize that it even has a card slot. The expansion card slot is meaningless. And what with an appalling 90-DAY WARRANTY, you can see Sansa has little faith in their own products. It is really to be looked at as disposable. Get it really, REALLY cheap, or get something else. The rest of the machine operates fine and it pretty reasonably intuitive. But....but, the expansion card issue is a massive, strange failure. I wouldn't recommend this (or perhaps any SanDisk product. This just SHOULD NOT happen.
This was my first mp3 player so i didn't neccessarily want anything fancy, just something with a decent sized screen. It worked pretty good for about a year. Then it began to randomly turn off. Usually when this happened i could turn it back on within a few minutes but this too ceased happening. I've now had it close to a year and a half and it cannot hold a charge at all. This would be fine if I only wanted to listen to it while it was charging, however I prefer my mp3 player to be portable. Do not buy this unless you prefer temporary dependability out of your electronics.
I bought at the end of 2009 and have been meaning to leave a review ever since but have not done so on account of not having anything nice to say about this product. This is about the worst mp3 player on the market. Sound quality is so-so. I cannot create or save any playlists. The worst aspect of this player is the battery life. I charged it for one whole day and then when I disconnected it from the power source the battery bar immediately went to RED.Please, please do not waste your money & time on this product. I for one will never buy anythign that has the SanDisk name on it.
if its not tranferring the wrong music... its freezing up.. or not liecening properly.. or the device itself sticks(dail to select with). this is my third sansa and will be my last
NOT at all friendly for a Mac user. The instructions are not at all helpful and tech services are not available on weekends.
J'ai acheté un Sansa View 16gB pour $200 CAD il y a deux ans et demie à peine, et la batterie vient de mourrir. L'estimation pour la réparation et le remplecement de la batteire est de $80 minimum, vous voyez le topo? Malgré son excellente sonorité, je ne recommande pas cet appareil, difficile à comprendre, parfois il gèle... à éviter!
Any problem listed in previous reviews, I encountered with mine. At which point I discovered one more weakness of this mp3 player.It does not fare well against a hammer.
I recently received a refurbished View as a birthday gift, charged it up, set it down a couple of days. When I picked it up I found it was dead. I charged it again, called Sansa about the issue and they agreed it was a bad battery after diagnosing the problem. They also told me the battery is not replaceable and after warranty you throw these units away. Now I need to deal with Buy.com to see if they will give me my money back or replace the unit hopefully with a e200 series. The e200 series has inexpensive replaceable batteries.
We bought this player for my mother, as I have the same one and love it. But, this player had problems from the get go, being a refurbished model. Sansa support was good, but their fix for the problem only lasted a matter of hours. We eventually had to return it, which was a fast and painless process with Amazon.The player, when it works correctly is great. I can't even begin to fill mine up with songs, videos and recordings. The FM recorder is great for lectures, conventions and other occasions. The sound quality is amazing. I also love that, unlike the e200 series you can format and also erase songs directly on the player without using your computer. It also conveniently has a spot for audiobooks and podcasts. Also to note that you can download shows and movies from amazon to play on this player.It was tough giving a star rating as this particular player was broken, but knowing from experience that they can make wonderful mp3 players.
I'm frustrated by things that never get fixed on this product. I use the Sansa View to listen to 1-hour mp3 recordings from a class I'm taking. If I pause the recording in the middle and resume later in the day (after the Sansa has powered down), the recording NEVER starts where I left it!!!!! The most frustrating thing is that I've reported this problem to SanDisk over 6 months ago and it is never addressed, even though my problem was acknowledged by their tech support.To further complicated things, the fast forward does not accelerate, so when I need to get back to the 30th minute of the recording, I have to hold down the fast-forward button for about five minutes. I also reported this problem over 6 months ago with the same result -- acknowledged by tech support but never addressed.With the amount of firmware updates they've made, this is clearly a product being beta tested on the customers.
Despite the many reviews from folks who had to return one or more Sansa Views before getting a functional one, I figured the manufacturer must have cleared up their quality problems to stay in the market. Wrong!!!!My brand new Sansa View 8 totally stopped functioning about 20 minutes into its first use. I'm very disappointed to have waited for my order to be filled and now must wait again for a replacement. I'm more than a month into my purchase and I have nothing to show for it but a paid bill.Amazon has not stepped up at all, either. The order was filled by a vendor whom I've never heard of before. Amazon refers buyers to that vendor's customer service and takes no part in satisfying the purchaser.Lots of room for improvement on the part of all three providers.
I had high expectations for this player. I have the Sandisk m240 and m250 and they have amazing sound quality so I thought, being from Sandisk, it would follow suit. It didn't. Very disappointed with the sound quality. It even breaks up. And forget about organizing you music and videos. You can't create folders on your own. Have to use Windows Media Player. And I still haven't figured out how to make video playlists. WMP won't accept mp4 files in the Video playlist. Plus, when scrolling through your library, the scroll wheel only goes forward so, if you want to play a song that begins with "Y" and don't what to start from "A" and scroll through 8GB WORTH OF SONGS all the way down to "Y" but want to scroll up from "Z" to "Y", you can't.
I bought this earlier this year, thinking I am getting an upgrade from my Sansa M250.Wish I was not soo quick to throw out my old player.Its really fustrating when it syncs with the computer after disconnecting it takes hours ( by then the battery is drained) to power off from the connected mode.I hate thisproduct. Get the real deal save yourself some fustration and money. Not worth it.Beware!
I purchased this MP3 player as a Christmas gift for our daughter only to find out on Christmas Day that is not compatible without our computer despite every update available. While we could see the preloaded video and it is very clear and bright, we were never able to upload any music. My husband (who is computer wizard) spent 12 hours trying to get this thing to work, but without any success. Next time we'll buy an IPod.
Had no luck, even with latest firmware, getting the unit to resume any of my audio books. I tried changing the tags on the mp3 files but it did not work. The unit would go into auto shut off and then force you to start your audio book file from the start every time.
Apart from arriving in nearly 2 pieces ( apart ) it did not work and the software did not work either. Going away in a week, so I cannot use it. Pissed off.
This player freezes constantly. It's possible not everyone has this issue. Also the menus can be a bit sluggish. Don't buy without a good return policy.
I actually didn't finish this book. It had some good pointers within it but I felt it was doing more story telling than teaching me how to calm down and deliver a speech without my breakfest or lunch wanting to errupt. Although it was somewhat interesting it wasn't doing what I needed it to and that was to teach me not to want to disappear before I got up in front of a group of people.
Public speaking in narrative form. Lots of stories and examples from Lincoln to businessmen in 1969. Interesting to read. No index, not user-friendly as a resource.
Dale carnegie wrote very well in his earlier works, this later work (assumedly from later in his life, or judging from the text possibly written postumously) is the worst thing i have ever seen in print.As an english professor it seemed sardonic to me to see someone write so poorly about the topic of speaking well. Perhaps i should have read this garabage aloud instead.
This book is not like he rest of Dale Carnegie's books. The rest of hem are interesting and easy reeds. This'd one is bad
I've read this book as well as Carnegie's 2 other books, How to Win Friends & Influence People as well as How to Stop Worrying & Start Living. This one was a let down after those two, which i highly recommend (even with the old school references).This book stated a lot of common sense but nothing that I found I could use in off-the-cuff talks. In fact it, discourages that. It's also a bit of a dry read.While I admire his other books, I did not like this one.
This POS started giving "English font only" and "download new firmware from "www.creative.com" within 3 hours of using it after it was fully charger. Creative has NO firmware upgrade for this model since it is so new, and support cannot help. Search for "rhomba firmware" at google and visit Creative's European customer support forum page - there are oodles and oodles of Europeans with this same fatal error that they cannot recover from at all. People are throwing around unreleased firmware in that forum for this thing since Creative still has not released it. *sigh* another bug-ridden thing from Creative. Going back for the iPod 10GB - $100 upgrade, but I am sure I will have NO problems making that thing work since it is an Apple.
This is a cute little gadget, but it got broken after only three months of carrying it in my pocket. Seems to be too fragile for being a mobile player.
I bought this player for my nephew(age15) one year ago. After the first month it wouldn't work. called and they refused a new one, only rebuilt. OK. Sent it back and 4 1/2 months later it stopped playing again. They refused him any replacement, partial payment to fix it, no solution to the problem. I am sitting here with this $179.MP3 player that doesn't work, that I can now get for $119 and am not sure what to do with it. Do I throw it away, can it be fixed(again). I would not buy any Creative product again. EVER
I read the reviews on the Internet the same way you are reading now. When I went to the store I have been misled by the salesman. He told me that the creative is a great brand and no one returned the product so far. He told me " if it was a bad product creative would have taken it of the shelf by now". I bought the product and it stop working after TWO DAYS" not responding at all. I talked to the customer support and they ask me to send the product to them. It takes along..... time to get it back believe me I havent got the mine yet.
I bought this piece of crap and found out it's not compatible with tracks which are downloaded in DRM (Digital Rights Management) format which 6 out of 6 songs I downloaded from Napster were in. So, I have basically a $200 radio. Worthless. DO NOT BUY!!!
There is a huge dropoff in quality from Vol 1. of the Whistle Test clips to this package, simply because there is a huge dropoff in the quality of the artists between the two volumes. Sorry, but Loggins and Messina, Average White Band, Jim Croce, Hall & Oates, Thomas Dolby and Simply Red just don't match up to Bill Withers, Captain Beefheart, Talking Heads, XTC, Iggy Pop and the Specials. The commentary from the show's hosts and the various musicians is still enjoyable and enlightening, as on the first collection, and this whole volume is almost made worthwhile simply for the stunning clip of the sublime Judee Sill sitting at the piano and painfully/beautifully singing her majestic ballad. And Jools Holland is a lot of laughs, both when talking about the Squeeze clip that is included and in the clip itself. So there's some nice moments here, but I really don't want to own anything that includes Loggins and Messina on it.
The Old Grey Whistle Test hosted some incredibly groundbreaking FULL CONCERTS, two of which were the original Bob Marley and The Wailers, and Return To Forever (performing most of Romantic Warrior). Bootlegs of many of these shows are available but were recorded from nth generation tapes. Any one of these classic full shows would have been a much better choice for release than this hit and miss (mostly miss) collection of singles. I'm disappointed in this, and I believe they will be too once they see their sales numbers.
After reading all the great reviews on this product on Amazon, I decided to go for this. I don't typically have good results from diet products, but I figured I'd give it a shot. I've been taking these for 3 weeks, as directed, and I might as well have been taking sugar pills for all the more this is doing for me. I felt like my appetite increased, I haven't lost any weight at all - in fact I've been fluctuating up and down 3 pounds for the past couple of weeks. I gave this two stars because I didn't feel the anxiety or sleeplessness that some people complained about, but I'm still disappointed. I was hoping I'd find something that actually worked!
Well, it arrived on time and in OK condition, but after almost a month of taking it, I haven't noticed any change, except now I have stomach cramps.
This book is filled with recipes using brand-name adulterated products that contain large amounts of additives, preservatives, artificial flavors, colors, trans-fats, bland flavors and also cost a lot more then scratch foods.If you believe boiling potatoes, using fresh vegetables or measuring flour unthinkable, by all means this book is right up your alley....
Why, why, why? This woman is a talentless hack. I've seen better recipes on the back of soup cans! Sandra Lee's approach to inspired cooking is to add a can of tomatos to your Hamburger Helper! Woo! Seriously, though, this is a joke. I have nothing against easy cooking, but this is an absolute waste of time and money.
This oversized book does not lie flat unless you are using a recipe from the center pages. I tried cans and a rolling pin to weigh down the pages and nothing worked. The money spent on the endless photographs (do we really need to see a photo of empty cd boxes?)and the pre paid reply postcard ... would have been better spent on a smaller hard covered book that would be easier for home cooks to use....
I do not think I am exagerating when I write that this woman has created an empire in which she is enabling people to become seriously overweight and possible worse health problems. This woman adds fat, additives, and perservatives when there is not need at all. For example, she adds mayonnaise to store bought salad dressing, basically for no reason. But most of all, she is advocating that packaged foods are the way to go. That is simply not good. The human body is meant meant to take in the amounts of chemicals that are contained in her recipes. Check the labels; if you see chemicals, don't eat it! If you care about your health, you will stay clear of Sandra Lee.
It is one brand name after another, don't waste your money.<br />This book has more fluff then recipes that you can use everyday, plus it will not save you money with all the package and can food you have to search out and buy.
I went to two stores trying to find the exact brand name products that Sandra Lee insist we use. Frustrated, I asked the store mananger who told me that the products I was looking for, Campbell's fat-free mushroom soup and Jello refrigerated vanilla pudding cups are no longer available in my area.Why make such a big fuss about using this or that brand when they aren't even available? I won't waste any more time travelling around town looking for the exact brand names needed to make the recipes in this book.I have better things to do! Maybe this book needs a "use-by " date before even more products become obsolete.
Have any of you not read the Manson File? It is obvious that you cannot control people with LSD, and it is obvious in the fact that Manson did not kill anyone.
The fact of the matter is this book is total fiction, the elaborate work of Vincent Bugliosi's imagination due to due his ignorant and superstitious "ideology".He needed to give "evil" a face... and Manson was convenient."Helter Skelter" has made Bugliosi wealthy beyond belief.I guess whatever sells a book, right? Charles Manson, a human being... was simply collateral damage.
Bugliosi's ghost writer for this one crafted a skillful tale of the heroic prosecutor deciphering the real motive of the murders, despite the incompetence of the police department. You should know that practically everyone who studies the Manson case in detail regards this book as a work of fiction, the same way they regard Bugliosi's ridiculous made-up motive of "trying to start a race war". There is some info here that is hard to get elsewhere, but otherwise this is simply an attempt to sensationalize and make money. There are far better books you can read on the Manson case.
Amazon won't tell you, and you will learn only after you pay for this Kindle title: it has no illustrations or photos and has regrouped the footnotes to the point of making them worthless. A very disappointing result for a fine book with great crime history relevance. This title should NOT be purchased for Kindle if you are expecting to receive an honest copy of the complete book! I will not trust other Kindle titles because unless you own a print copy of a Kindle title you will never know what was omitted, removed or edited to fit an obviously limted format.
it is literally a step by step account of the investigation of the whole Manson murders. I have never been more bored with a book in my entire life.
I do not recommend it, I developed a bad break of acne in my body specially by the stomach and back, the second day of using.Still have the scars and they look like I got chicken pox, I totally regret buying this cleanser.After my acne break out, I looked over the internet for reviews and most of them were bad too. (like people developing hives and ezcema break outs.)
The adapter quit working after 3 hours of use. I returned it and got a full refund. The customer service for the return and refund was excellent, and I would not hesitate to deal with this company again. But I won't buy any replacement power adapter for a 4-year-old laptop again. I got a new laptop.
This book is too long and the story too convoluted to be enjoyable. I mean, I appreciate the efforts of the author (thus the 2 stars) to document the historical context and to give details to make it more believable, but this is way too much. I had to force myself and jumped many pages to go on in the reading. The characters were unpleasant too. I don't understand where the romantic shade of Reynaud is, when he forces Elise to take every step in their relationship. He doesn't allow her any choice in a misinterpreted attempt to free her from her restraints against the men (more than justified, I'd say). Elise, on the other hand, resents his savage behavior, but never fails to focus only on the "gentleness and thoughtfulness" of Reynaud. Finally, she realizes, against all the evidences, that he is not an overbearing man, but a kind, lovable person. No, I definitely didn't get it.
I thought the characters in this story had no real depth and the story was a little slow and boring. It seemed like no matter what happened all they wanted was to have sex. That got old really fast. I was looking for a good story line and strong characters.
This kit has a building diagram for only 1 project and that diagram was so poor that my husband who played with these kkits as a kid in the 60s (yes they have been around that long) couldn't easily figure it out - and he rarely has trouble figuring out anything. Otherwise there are 5 other sample structures wwhich have no building instructions and that is it.I put this completely in the category of good idea but bad reality. It is a pity, really, since it would take the manufacturer little work to produce a variety of projects with real instructions. I encourage the manufacturer to do so.
I bought this for my 10 year-old son. He's an experienced builder, having put together many lego creations and k'nex kits with little or no help from a grownup. He couldn't assemble the tanks. The green collars that are used to connect tank sections are very tight (to keep water in, I suppose), and he just didn't have the coordination or strength to push them together. I was able with much, much effort, to get two sections of a tank connected, but I couldn't even get the top on.I called the help number and left a message. So far, no response.The girders are also not very well designed and come apart with a little jostling.I wish I'd never bought it. My son really, really wants to see it work and so far we've spent many hours to no avail.
A book with a promising premise and a very cool cover (which was why I bought it, I must admit). Unfortunately, the picture on the cover has very little to do with the actual story. The storyline is plodding and uninspired. Character development leaves much to be desired. The conclusion is weak and muddled. The first person perspective does not mesh well with the story. The illustrations are somewhat cheesy, and don't really add anything to the story. I really wanted to like this book, but ultimately I came away very disappointed.
I am a complete Sudoku addict and am very disappointed with this book. The only reason I bought it was because I was desperate for more puzzles and it was the only one available at the store I was in. First of all, it costs $4.99 which to me, is way too much money when you can get a Kappa book for $1.99 which has better puzzles. Another thing that bugs me about this book is that some of the answer keys in the back don't match the corresponding puzzles. When I get to the difficult/Very Challenging ones in the back, sometimes I need a little help! But unfortunately, this book has quite a few errors in the answer section so when I've hit a dead end, it's over.I would recommend Kappa books from your local supermarket. This simply costs too much money for not mush quality.
If you can't hold the cards, this will work but I believe they lost sight of their purpose and are trying to address a problem from outside the box. The idea is to make it easier for the individual. It can be difficult to get the cards in place and then change their positions defeating the fundamental purpose. A block of wood will do better. The card holder shouldn't be a game within a game.
What ever you do don't buy this product. It not only came in used but beaten to death. It was scratch, dented and chipped. This is my 4th time writing a review on this product all other attempts have be block like I suspect this one will be to.
I bought this from the same co. before christmas and was stunned that the price had doubled. On the page the price was not clear!
This book reads like a dervative of a badly written derivative of Tolkien, married to the son of "Dark and Stormy Night." The annual contest of Groaner openings needs a new entry, maybe that way, FtM could get recognized! Books should be FUN to read, this one is a chore. I have tried three different times to pick it up, but have failed miserably. My last attempt died after less than a chapter. One of the other reviewers used the word "Execrable," if he hadn't, I would have.I haunt my local Half Price Books and snap up anything by my list of favorite authors that appears on their shelves. Eric Flint is on that list. He has done some very nice collaborative work, so I looked forward to reading FtM. OOPS! WRONG BOOK! I am not ready to give up on Flint, so I will blame his partner for the miserable writing. I don't think I will read any more of Roach's work.
For those of you who enjoyed THE PHILISOPHICAL STRANGLER stand by for some severe disappointment. This sequel/prequel to TPS just doesn't measure up. FORWARD THE MAGE is for the most part dreadfully boring. While some of the story line sparks a little interest, primarily the relationship between Benvenuti and Gwendolyn, the rest is pretty dull stuff. The extremely long ramblings of the wizard Zulkeh are especially trying. The frequent attempts at humor are forced and not particularly funny, kind of like a drunk at a party who thinks he's hilarious but isn't. It makes you almost embarrassed to read it.Well no need to spend a lot of time on this dog. Read THE PHILISOPHICAL STRANGLER, it is funny and worth the effort. You won't miss much except a little of the background which really isn't needed to begin with. If you REALLY feel you must read MAGE then check it out of your local library, but don't turn it in late, it's not worth the fine!This book is NOT RECOMMENDED!
Related to the Philosophical Strangler. Stories overlap, but this book focuses on Gwendolyn, Benvenutti & the Sorcerer. Story of events in these characters' lives before, during, and after, Phil Strangler. Found the language a bit much to wade through a second time, and not as funny. If you loved Philosophical Strangler, you'll probably love this one, but if you were growing weary by the end of the Strangler, you should probably pass this one up.
Though the book had some good plot points, I found the overall tone offensive. Mr. Hogan is apparently an atheist or agnostic, and believes in evolution. In his book he consistently bashes religion, making anyone who is religious appear to be either a fanatic or inclined towards greed and other base emotions. None of the protagonists ever mentions God or His place in the universe.I also found his arguments for Chironian society riddled with flaws. The most glaring - that Chironians place no value on stable family relationships, have no sense of commitment to a spouse, and there is never any jealousy or contention among family members or society in general. Just because the original Chironians came from computer programs and were raised by robots does not eliminate human's genetic leaning toward violence and confrontation.I read another of Mr. Hogan's books recently and found the same anti-God bias. I will not be wasting my money on any more of his books.
The book starts out well, but the author's explanation of social evolution contradicts the biological evolution Hogan likewise promotes in this book. This story could have been good other than the author's scientific and semi-moralistic inserts. At some points I had the feeling that he was trying to rationalize his own beliefs by authoring them in the book almost separate from the story.
This book offers an interesting diagrammatic presentation of thirty-six warships, ranging from a Roman galley to a "Nimitz"-class aircraft carrier. Naval buffs will find this a useful book, with numbered guides accompanying the cut-away color diagrams that offered details about the layouts of the various ships. Yet the selection of what constitutes a "great" warship is rather idiosyncratic. The selection is exclusively Western in its orientation, as Chinese junks, Ottoman galleys or Imperial Japanese Navy vessels completely absent. Moreover, the compilers seemed to have been unable to decide whether a great warship was an innovative one or a historic one and included selections of both, leaving out others more deserving in the process. As a result, while an interesting resource, it is a limited one that lacks a theme that could have made it a truly valuable book.
Save your money. The eargels split in two days. I used regular ear buds on the large size. They did hold the buds in the ear better, but no gain in sound quality. If you want the small and med, I'll send them to you for shipping. I have no use for them.
They don't stay on the bluetooth...when they do stay on they work great! So I feel like I wasted my money :-(
I got these in hope It would give me a good fit to my jawbone 2, but they did not work for me. I think they even made it less of a fit.
I was misled by a user review that indicated the gels would help my new Jawbone stay in my ear without the hook. The gels would stay in my ear but came off my headset, allowing it to fall to the ground. These may be OK but not for my application.
The service was good but the product didn't have enough info for me to make a wise decision. At the end I couldn't use the product on my jabra ear piece. The item description should have information on compatible Ear sets to help make a better purchasing choice.
Complete waste of money. All three sizes pushed my Jawbone ICON out too far from my face to make contact with my jawbone.I know my ears stick out ... I am not dumbo though. This was a waste of money for me, thankfully they were only 10 bucks.I went back to the ear pads that came with the ICON... Is stays in for a while as long as i don't move... Not quite battlefield worthy as JB claims...
These were way to big for my ears. Even the small size was to large. I usually wear the medium size ear gel that comes with the BT device. I am using these on a Jabra Extreme 2 so maybe they were not made for that device. The gel did fit properly over the device however but I had to force it hard into my hear and it became pretty painful after a couple of hours of wear.
I purchased the eargels which was very comfortable and initally stable. Unforunately after a few weeks of infrequent use my ICON would fall out of the eargel and when stored away it invarable fell out and I would have to replace the ICON back into the eargel. So I have returned to using the original ICON rubber piece which although not as comfortable at least stayed in place.
With the rubber ring in place the head set does not seat well in the gels and comes out too easily. With the ring off it will barely stay in the small size. The medium gels fit me best until they are stretched by the rubber ring. One gel even split wen trying to put the earpiece back in. I am trying the small for now until I find a better solution.
I bought these hoping I could make my Bluetooth headset fit better but these things made it impossible to wear. The design might be ergonomic in theory but I could not stand having these in my ear. They seem to be made of a very thick silicone that has a slightly slippery feel to them. I was really disappointed with these. Stay away if you have small ear canals.
I was looking forward to some really comfortable gel inserts for my earphones. I thought these would fit the bill, but they don't by a long shot. To begin with, even the smallest size was far too big to fit my ears. The large looked gigantic. I cannot in good faith recommend these. If they develop ones that are sized appropriately, I might give them a try. I gave these to a couple of friends, and even they said there was no way these word work for them either. What more can I say? Stick with inserts from companies like Shure or Westone.
These probably work great for some people, but they didn't for me. None of the three sizes gave me just the right fit and I ended up going back to the factory gel that came with the device.
None of the gels came close to fitting in my ear - I ended up using the little rubber ring in the kit on my Jabra bluetooth to keep it from slipping out. Highly not recommended...
DO NOT BUY FROM!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!Sent me Jabra EarGels claiming they fit the Jawbone Prime 2. They did not. Because I had them for 28 days, they would not take them back. Their return policy stated that you can return up to 30 days.DO NOT BUY FROM!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
This product ended up being a waste of money for me. They didn't fit too well so I ended up just using the original Jawbone ear piece with the these.
In an odd case of poor quality control, the package of eargels came with two of one of the six sizes and missing one of the others. I bought them to make my Jawbone headset fit. It's better than it was, but still not ergonomic.
these were advertised to fit the habra stone. they did not. i don't know if they changed the advertisement since then but it was aid to be a package with the habra stone so i got it. not even one piece fit. threw them away
These ear gels were supposed to fit easily on the Jabra Bluetooth that I have, but they don't stay on at all once they were placed on it. I was hoping the contoured shape would hold in my ears, but it just proved to be very uncomfortable.
When I first installed one of these on my new Jawbone II, they were fantastic. They fit my ear canal perfectly, negating the need for the ear loop that came with it. Unfotunately after a few days they started rejecting my headset. The ear pieces would not stay on the Jawbone, and they would no longer stay firmly in my ear. I tried washing and drying them thoroughly, but that only helped for an hour or so. I am not sure what the fit problem is, but they turned out to not work for my Jawbone II and me at all.
I bought this based on the reviews that said that these will fit the jawbone 2 bluetooth headset. They did not fit very well and were very loose. I use the small size and they did not fit very well. The medium and large size do not fit my ear canal. Too bad as I need an in-ear bluetooth to hear well. I guess I will have to look for something else.
I ordered the ear gels to go with my Jawbone Bluetooth headset. The problem that I see is that the ear gels are too bulky when combined with the Jawbone.
I own one of the Jawbone torture devices. I had an old Jabra with the mini ear gels and just for giggles swapped out the hard plastic stock Jawbone things with them. It was an amazing difference. The Minis fit very well and direct the sound into your ear channel. Sometimes they do fall off so you have to be very careful with them.Unfortunately these eargels reviewed here are not them. You want these: EarGels (MiniGels) for Jabra BT250, BT250v, BT500, BT2020, C220s, C250, GN6210 are not them. They are only available from Jabra [...]
Jabra directed me to these as a replacement for the lost pieces for my Wave. THESE ARE NOT what I need. Meh. Gonna be two more weeks before I get home to return them.I don't blame the merchant, blame Jabra for directing me to waste weeks buying, waiting for, and returning the wrong stuff. Swedish morons
For some reason the makers of this item thought it would be wise to make each size ear piece fit a different bluetooth. The small fits my Jawbone, but does not fit my ear. The large fits my ear just fine, but does not fit my Jawbone. Save your money and find a different product.
I bought this to see if using the gels would help keep my Jawbone in place. None of the gels fit in my ear.
Ordered the EarGels, but they had been exposed to time and heat. They were yellowed and sticky. I threw them away - wasn't worth it to return it. Won't order from here again.
The special effects of this film were wonderful--no debate there--but Armand Assante seems like he's sleep-walking through this movie. It LOOSELY follows the poem at parts and suffers from a severe lack of passion! Compare this film with the 1950's "Ulysses", which despite poor effects, had MUCH more passionate and inspired portrayals of the characters by Kirk Douglas and Anthony Quinn among others. Even the classic scene involving Argos the dog was ommitted from this modern creation. Ugh!On the flip side, Athena's portrayal by Isabella Rossellini and the actor playing the god Mercury are very fun to watch in "The Odyssesy". Still...not enough to do the story justice.
I watched this movie this year after I read the book. The movie switches the story a lot and the acting is very dissapointing- the actors of Odysseus, Penelope and Telemachus, the main parts are not very talented. I would show this to a child to give them a taste of the Odyssey, but if you have read the book or are planning to, watching this will ruin the flavor of the Odyssey.
originally i would give this horrible dipiction of The Odyssey 1 star, but because of one of the last scenes where ugly t(telemachus) threw two spears at once, i give it two stars. Everything was horrible to my opinion. The accents kept changing everything. If you read the book before you watched the movie, you would thinkt hat this was all a joke. So if anything just read the book by itself. So two stars for two stars thrown by ugly T
I have never been so disgusted (or sickenly entertained) by a movie before. I am one of the few who have ACTUALLY read the ODYSSEY. I did like the poem. After reading it, I decided to watch the movie. There were almost NO accurate allusions at all to the poem. The characters' acting skills were that of an elementary school kids, and the scenes were obviously fake. I feel bad for Homer, he must be spinning in his grave. The fact that got 4 out of 5 stars is most appalling. I feel sorry for humanity as it is, believing such [nonsense] is the work of Homer.
Watching this movie after having read the book is pretty much hell. The fact that they changed the whole plot from the book makes it seem like a joke. Then the "special effects" just made it even worse. Even if you haven't read the book and you don't know the real story, the movie was still horribly directed and filmed. There are no transitions, and the actors don't seem to realize they are all in one movie together. They all have their own accents and the only thing they have in common with the characters they are playing from the book is their names. The only reason anyone should ever watch this movie is out of complete boredom and a need to make fun of something.
This was the biggest piece of drunken hoopla in the WORLD! I can't believe people would actually take time out of their daily schedule to watch this! If you actually read The Odyssey, the movie is NOTHING like the real thing. I STRONGLY suggest that you read the book first. Well, anyways, no one is going to read this review thus rendering this review useless and something to clutter the internet even more than it already is. I AM THE ANTICRHIST!
Yes, yes the movie was bad, really bad, so bad that if Homer was still alive to see it, he would be doing something similar to the TV that Mr. N does when he watches Boston Public. But how bad it was is beside the point. Who really cares if some of the people in our class are writing Mr. N's ideas on here. If I were him, I would be flattered to know that people beleived strongly enough in my ideas to take the time to write about it on amazon.com. To everyone who wrote a review on this horrific movie, and didnt criticize other people's reviews, good for you. I hope in the future we can all express our disgust with this movie without having our competency as an honors student questioned by someone who won't even tell us who they are. But until then, Lizzie Mcguire is on (hehehe) so I must be going. I'll see you all periods 1/2. - Andrew
I don't see why the producers bothered making this movie. It adds nothing to the Kirk Douglas version of Ulysses made in 1955, besides a few limited CGI effects. Even Douglas's beard was preferable to Assante's mullet hairstyle in this version. This has stripped out all of the sex and most of the violence that is in the original Homer.What we have here is a TV movie made in 4x3 format back in 1997, but finally released on DVD in 2004 to cash in on the 'TROY' blockbuster. It was made to be acceptable to the US TV market, but I suspect the production team was European.To my knowledge, there has yet to be a good film/TV adaptation of the Odyssey. The best dramatisation so far is a recent audiobook dramatisation by the BBC starring Tim McInerney.
This comes close to being the worse piece of garbage it has ever been my privilege to view. The acting...HORRENDOUS!!! CGI...poorly done. Do yourself a favor and watch the Roman version of the Odyssey...Ulysses with Kirk Douglas. It may be an oldie, but it's definitely an absolute goodie!!
I totally agree with andrew...and by the way, people who dont know any of us and dont really know whats going on...please dont waste your time with this movie...you're better off watching old reruns of whos the boss...even though im deprived of cable and wouldnt know...most of you probably know who this is
the special effects sucked and we've seen good special effects and the special effects in the odessy were crap and in comparison to a lot of movies we've seen it was pretty crap. it was realy BORING! (...) we've seen and weve seen heaps of them and some of them were realy gory over all COULDA BEEN BETTA!!!!!
This movie was the epitome of, well, everything wrong with movies. It took the premise of adapting Homer's literary classic and completely butchered it into this...osbstrocity. With acting that would pale in comparison to an elementary school play, a script that would make Ed Wood blush, and some of the words special effects ever, it truly makes me sad for humanity.The one good point is that it makes for some great "in" jokes. Telemakhos's double spear throw has become a running gag at my school.
As a Detroit Red Wings fan, I must say that I loved this version of the Odyssey! This special effects were absolutly wonderful, and I must say I love the acting, some of the best i've ever seen in my life, almost better than sergey federov acting to get hit to draw a high sticking call! There was more action than Chelios misses checks! Oh, and there were more holes in this movie than Curtis Joseph leaves in his net. This movie was wodderful
NBC miniseries tells the tale of the Greek hero Odysseus, played flatly by Armand Assante. Boring adventure film features unlikeable characters, routine action scenes, and a lack of spirit and passion. This all builds up to a surprisingly very bloody conclusion (Given its TV roots).* 1/2 out of *****
Everything about this movie was baaadddd....From the everchanging accents, the fake special effects(the cyclops looked so fake that it took away from the movie), the movie was so flawed that it became more entertaining to look for the flawed parts than actually watch the movie. Yeah, this movie sucked.
Like reviewer Jueichi Shen who said it felt like it took him the length of the Odyssey itself to watch it, I thought this movie was agonizingly long at 3 hours and 38 minutes. I will never watch it again, so this one is headed for the public library and a status of tax deduction. Good special effects, though hence my 2-star rating.
It is extremely sad that Hallmark Entertainment has not realized that hard of hearing and deaf people need closed captioning to understand the product they are marketing. If they have realized this, then they obviously could care less about disabled people of any kind.
Armand Assante is one of the worst actors I have ever had the misfortune to watch. He could not act dead if you put a bullet in his brain. The odyssey is a great story and it deserves a great actor. I would rate this movie zero stars if I had the option.
Ok, first of all Mr.Cmndrnineveh from Philadelphia, Pennsylvania USA I find it very hard to believe that you even read the full book version of THE ODYSSEY. God knows if you did you wouldnt be madly in love with this made-for-TV movie THE ODYSSEY. Personally i think the only ppl this movie does good too are druggies and wanna-be drop outs who dont want to read the book or buy the cliff notes so they watch the movie. its absolutley horrible. Mr. Noteboom is a very bright and brillant honors teacher in Washington state. I must say i agree with every honor student's last year review of this book. To the point where Telemachous was whiny and horrible; Athena had blue eyes; and Menelaos' hair is black. All i gotta say is what a waste of film! Ppl out there- spare yourself.
This book is bad (period). It is very incoherent and ill-organized. The examples are vague and serve anything but support the material. Very theoritical with hardly any real life applications. Lacking in modern AI topics/game design.
In a phrase: as nauseating as the "artwork" which besmirches its cover. This book is definitely not worth the price. Donate the money instead to your city's homeless instead! You will learn as much about AI by doing so and will actually contribute something to the world. Of course, the cover makes a great prank at cocktail parties. Place it under someone's drink and it will look like the beverage has been spilled.Winston's book is not only disorganized, but pretentious. He writes about the mind as if he has the authority of a philosopher of mind, when, in fact, he's just a programmer. Winston and his books will go down in history with the works of others, such as Doug Lenat, who made their fame primarily by doing something very easy before anyone else got around to doing it.Real AI is yet to come.
The software is nice to work with, not very simple to use but usable none the less. The only problem I've encountered with this software is the notoriously bad encoder with memory leaks up to wazoo. If you try to encode a large movie file into mpeg2 premiere will more than likely crash on you due to bad memory management. The only solution so far is to simply restart the system and pray it wouldn't happen again. Although from my experience it seems to work the 3rd time you try. I have tried this on two brand new machines one with a new XP 32bit install and both expereienced the same issue.
Google the instrumental Wipeout , and you will read the real story. I love the Surfari's version which got to #2 on the Billboard charts in a matter of weeks.
After contacting the seller about the item never being received a second was shipped. When we got it the mirror itself had fallen out of the housing. We didn't want to wait an additional month to get a replacement so we glued the mirror back on the housing.
I bought this one because its excellent review of another customer. Picture format is only in 4:3 which is ashame. Though the quality of the picture is good. Good encoding, beautifull skin tones. Pitty the lightning director is not that creative and used that awfull backlights with gobo's. The sound is in AC-3 5.1 dolby, but never impressing, and with low dynamics. It's the regular TV-mix we hear, it's not remixed for dolby 5.1 with it's extra dynamics and LFE output.I feel the band is average. The directors cut is not more than an average TV-special. All the way, wouldn't recommend it.
This book is one of Wilbur Smith's early books and it shows.After reading his books set in ancient Egypt, I bought this thinking it would be a good read. He spent too much time on the relationships and too little time on the meat of the story which should have been the search for the elusive diamonds. I was able to finish it but was very disappointed particularly with the ending. It was as if he ran out of steam or got into a hurry. The ending in the book just left you wishing that he would have given you a little more to tie up the loose ends. Not a bad book but, not a great one either.
Terminally boring and predictable but was able to finish it. I would rate his Monsoon and the early Courtney triliogy as 4-5 stars.
This book falls in the bottom five of the 28 books that I have read by Wilbur Smith. There is no review of the African continent that is so prevalent in his other books. No intermingling of the diverse peoples that populate this country that you find in most of these books. Here there is nothing here but greed and sex without purpose and typical family squabbles.To my knowledge diamond mining has never been done in this fashion in Africa.
What a disappointment. I can't believe how cheaply made this book is. I am glad I got in on sell or I would have returned it. The caring case is a zip lock bag. The pages can be easily ripped off. The pages are not plain paper and you put a mental page behind the story page. I could have do this on my own with the cheaper and FULL version of this book. The Magnet letters are VERY tiny. It really wasn't even worth the sell price. I'm a home daycare provider and I really feel ripped off. Shame on the makers of this book. The are some wonderfully made Magnet learning books by Top That! Including Counting with Magnetic Numbers (Magnetic Play and Learn) I wish I got more of these books instead
Having seen both versions, the first with Peck as Ahab, I would have to lean towards the original. The new version with Patrick Stewart had it's moments, but Peck as Father Maple looked like he was in a daze and didn't know where he was (or who he was) Peck's performance was rather disturbing. The actor who played Quee-Queg in this newer version was more like a cartoon. The actor in the 1950's version was far more convincing.Patrick Stewart wasn't a bad choice for Ahab, but to me it was more like Stewart PLAYING AHAB v.s. BEING THE CHARACTER. I kept expecting him to shout "ENGAGE" rather than "THERE SHE BLOWS".For students of the book, the original 1950 version was closer to the text. This new version had far too many added bits for the purist. If you enjoy remakes, (I don't know why) then go for it. If you are a stickler for detail, pass it
If you want to see a movie of Moby Dick, see the John Huston directed version, with screenplay by Ray Bradbury. This pitiful excuse for a movie was made by people who had no knowledge of New England, whaling, whales, or Herman Melville's epic novel. The grand poetry, the vivid imagery, the theological symbolism which fill "Moby Dick" are all missing in this shell of a film. Even Stewart's performance is a disappointment--Khan in Star Trek II does a better job of spouting Ahab's venom than Stewart's anemic portrayal.The additions to the story are meaningless (Chinese harpooners, Queequeg's "BLAH!" noises,Ahab's family)...and the omissions are puzzling (Elijah).And the rubber whale--who is unscarred, unmarked by corkscrew harpoons, ungrizzled, unbarnacled, with no flight of gulls--well, he looks like a rubber whale.
Dont bother with this crap! It is one of the worst if not the worst! Movies that I have ever seen! It has bad acting,story and it is so so boring! I dont understand the point of this movie! TERRIBLE! DONT BOTHER!
What a waste of 2 hours. Nothing gets accomplished at all! You watch some terrible graphics, watch everyone die, and they didn't even kill the freaking WHALE!That made me mad.This film accomplishes nothing.There is no point at all to this movie.Don't waste your time, money, and energy.Leave, quickly!
If your looking for a different version of the classic "Moby Dick" then fine. Personally I thought it fell short of the mark. The only highlight for me was when Gregory Peck made his apperance as the preacher. The original is still the one and only.
I know its very hard to bring a book like Moby-Dick to the screen, but at least John Houston tried in the 1950's. This made-for-TV adaptation makes me wonder if the screenwriters and director even read the original book. Not only is the character of Queegueg depicted incorrectly as a Mauri of New Zealand (in reality Melville based the character on the Nuku-Hivans), but he is treated as a buffoonish and stereotypical "savage" which is completely at odds with the dignified character that Melville created. Additionally, the filmmakers dreamt up a bizarre scene where the Pequod is stranded in the ice of the Antarctic! They must have been reading Mary Shelly's Frankenstien at the time. Patrick Stewart's performance as Ahab however, is wonderful, but that's the only redeeming feature of this overblown mess.
I found this recent remake of the classic very weak. Stewart's potrayal of Ahab didn't have any of the power of Gregory Peck's 1956 character.The camera work was also terrible. Land is clearly seen in several scenes where the men are supposedly many months out to sea.
It seems that there are several different versions of this TV movie available. Rumor has it that the movie that was originally broadcast on USA came in at 3 hours, there is a laser disc version of the movie that is 145 minutes long, and the VHS version is 120 minutes long. Unfortunately, the edits made to the VHS version are so extreme, abrupt, and awkward that it makes the movie virtually unwatchable. You can't help but feel that you're missing something.
Had this for 3 years. It isn't much to look at, doesn't heat as strong as Delonghi TRD0715T i own. But worst of all it started to leek on the second year. ..Not recommended..
The description said usually ships in 1-2 business days, well it's been 1 month and I have another month to go until I recieve this item. Don't believe the descriptions! I ordered this 3 weeks ago now the delivery estimate is the end of November. If you are cold and need this item this year don't buy it from Amazon. It probably won't arrive until February! It's going to take 2 months for delivery! Just a warning!
I've read several other Deborah Smith books. In my opinion Blue Willow was the best. Sweet Hush was by far the corniest book, I've read in a long time. The phrase "Sweet Hush" must have been at used at least 100 times in the book. The main character "Hush" was predictable and one dimentional. If you enjoy Deborah Smith books, I would skip this one.
I thought this was a terriable book by itself, but makes for a nice companion when reading through McQuarrie's book. McQuarrie skimps out on some of the explanations and instead leaves it to the reader to figure it out for themselves by solving his problems at the end of the chapter. One can usually find the answers (or at least some hints) within this book.
Ms. Perry's depiction of post-traumatic head injury is completely irresponsible. She apparently did no research at all. Amnesia of the type she describes here does not exist. Thus, the underlying premise of this book unbelievable, even infuriating, to anyone with the most basic knowledge of brain injury. In addition to this, Monk's investigative skills are virtually nonexistent. His interviews with informants and suspects are fragmentary and incomplete. Suspense is not built, action is nearly absent, and the eventual solution is anticlimactic. Laden with turgid prose, this book is absolutely dreadful.
Having heard the author speak on the radio, her works praised highly by the host, I decided to start with the first of the Monk series. Unfortunately, I found the main character thoroughly unsympathetic and unlikable. The story was slow as molasses with bits and pieces of useless information thrown in to fatten the book. Also, I don't know the clinical features of amnesia, but it seemed that Monk's memory loss was selective and inconsistent. The ending was highly anti-climactic and the fate of the characters in question never revealed. I was very much looking forward to reading her books, but was sorely disappointed.
To start off, this movie lacks any direction, also there is no build up of excitment, no rising interest, and little or no action till the very end. I love Van-Damme movies and especially actioners of all types but I found myself desperately trying to stay awake through this. Watch this movie if you have alot of time to hopelessly squander.
Lets cut to the chase. If u want a better van damm movie. Watch no retreat no surrender. As for this one.save it for a day u got nothing better to do.its a time killer. If your just sitting around.lets get to the point.watch this one only if u need a time killer. If u want a movie with the sickest fights watch guyver2 .yall love it.and this one shelve it.
which does not bode well for the movie. The other actors are just so horrible and the story so flat. Don't get me wrong, I like Jean-Claude, movies like Timecop and Bloodsport were pretty good for what they were. The fighting scenes in Black Eagle just don't make up for a lame movie though.
Totally fake, unrealistic, plotless. I love action movies, but this one just didn't have any action in it. You could see the missed punches and fake reactions--I can't believe that anyone would pay money for this movie
I would say the plot is good, but the action and fighting scenes are not in favour for action-movie goers.
First of all, as a Van Damme fan, this movie is definately one to see (if you must seek joy in seeing van damme die) for die hard van damme fans and that who hate him. For me, the movie feels like a Columbo epidose (the dramatic music) but the film is average, showing few plot, fight scenes or action. The biggest action scene is an explosion of a small wooden boat and a chase scene with cars going as fast as 25 mph! Plus the dvd features are limited and there is NO "Making of..." feature, only a theatrical trailer and some production notes (too short). Could have done with more DVD features for a region code free DVD.
Black Eagle was released a few months after Van Damme became a star with Bloodsport. The film could have made Van Damme a wash up but luckily it didn't. The martial arts chorography in the film is very sloppy and the fight scene between Sho Khogusi and Van Damme is weak. Skip this one
I must admit that I'm not a big Van Damme fan. Still, I try to keep an open mind. Not only was the sound terrible, but it was so obvious that the punches were checked, that it would have made a comedy if the plot weren't so boring. I think that Woody Allen could make a better action picture than this attempt.
My (indoor) cat contracted fleas about a month ago and I used the Zodiac spray on the carpet, upholstery, curtains, and mattresses as I went about treating the apartment. I also used the Zodiac sponge bath (2 treatments/bottle, used both) and one course of the Frontline topical medicine. Today I was brushing my cat and found more fleas. My vet informed me that they have heard nothing but complaints from pet owners who've used the Zodiac products.The label claims that: "One treatment gives continuous protection against pre-adult fleas for 7 months." I used the spray generously but here I am 1 month later right back where I started.Just treating my 2-bedroom apartment for fleas is a costly and tedious task. If you're going to go through this, make sure you use the BEST products available. Talk to your vet and explore ALL your options. GOOD LUCK!
This work is an enthusiastic encouragement and guidebook for charismatic renewal among Lutherans. However, it offers some dangerous theology. For example, it suggests that it's okay to make mistakes when first trying to prophesy--that everybody needs practice. However, this is contrary to Scripture. God takes false prophecy very seriously, but unfortunately Mr. Christenson does not.
The cover of this book makes the masks look intricate and impressive. On the inside, they look cartoonish. For a Halloween costume, I had more success by blowing up photos of Noh masks on a photocopier and then cutting out the eyes.
Two stars ONLY because it's not a bad book, as long as you're not a Merovingen Nights fan.If you are, too bad. SOL's basic plot and characters, as well as incidents major and minor, are lifted straight out of the previous series. A few minor adjustments to adapt it to a setting in an "alternate Italian Renaissance" instead of the wonderful complex world of MN didn't improve the story at all.It's the same thing, a little more predictable and considerably dumbed down.If you enjoyed the first version, this one will just annoy you with pitiful attempts to change enough details to pretend it's not just hashing over the book you've already read.If you haven't read the original, this book will just spoil it for you.Bad idea-whether it was the author's or the publisher's, it was just a bad idea.Shame on you!
This book was disappointing. It has too many major characters that are inadequately developed and too many plot lines to follow. The magic is an awkward add-in that the book could well have been written without.The first half of the book's plot, several of the characters, and the setting closely resemble one of C. J. Cherryh's Merovingian Nights stories, which was much better.
Mercedes Lackey is one of my favorite Authors. This book was such a let down, so much about nothing. The different plot lines were written by different people and you can tell where one picks up and one leaves off. it was a very irritating style.There are so many characters it's easy to mix them up. Some of the characters you never figure out why they are in the novel at all.It's too bad that I spent money on this book when I could have purchased a Mercedes Lackey Novel without help.
I tried a couple of times to read this book. Each time I stopped half way through. It dragged in places and was OK in others, but it's definately not up to Mercedes' usual standard. The book finally wound up in the "donate to the library" pile.
I've been a longtime fan of Mercedes and own most of her Valdemar series. So, of course, I picked this book up at my local store. After wrestling through 50 pages, I gave up! I plan to sell it back to my local store ASAP- this is nothing better than a paperweight in my bookshelves. The worst part is, my boyfriend picked it up and tried reading it. Now he thinks that this is a good example of her work!
When I read a Mercedes Lackey book I expect to care about what happens to *someone* in the book. There was no one here who was 'real' enough to care about. The people all felt like shadows, without true substance (or reasons) to their actions. I couldn't find reasons to cheer for anyone. One problem is there were too many people to follow easily. Since there were so many none of them were drawn richly enough to draw me into their world.
I didn't make it half way through the book before I gave up on it. It just seemed to go on and on and on.... I usually like Mercedes Lackey, but every once in a while, she makes a bobble, and this was one of them. I think the book whould have been a lot better as either two books or one greatly pared down book.
Mercedes Lackey contributed to a series I'll refer to as the Merovingian Nights Series, set in a universe invented by C.J. Cherryh. Mercedes's ORIGINAL contribution to the Merovingian Nights series is a far better read. The Shadow of the Lion was a major disappointment to me, not to mention I could have spent my money more wisely on another book. There should have been a warning posted on the cover or flap that if the reader has read the Merovingian Nights series, this book will offer very few surprises. Shame on you Ms. Lackey!
I am a devoted fan of Mercedes Lackey, and I have read nearly all her books, and this book is by far, my LEAST favorite. i was tempted to quit half-way through, but i didnt, which helped, because alot of things that seemed completely irrelevant, made sense at the very end. the main problem with the story is that there are WAY too many characters, as in a hundred, its hard to keep track & even care about all of them. It has alot of plot & story, and it can be difficult to keep track of at times. Its not a BAD read, its just... very busy, with many many many characters. It was an OK read, but not what I expected.
. . .but not nearly enough to counter the negatives.First the positives:1) Some brilliant photography. One just can't get around this.2) Some truly likeable characters and character development -- especially several of the minor characters.There! That is two stars worth!Negatives:1) Spotty directing, which offsets the quality of the photography2) No earthly resemblance at all to the (true) book from which the story is supposed to have been taken3) A boring, and over-the-top gay agenda (along with any one of a number of similar "far-left" issues, poorly cobbled together4) A view of the Virgin Mary, which, while not openly portrayed offensively in the film, is bound, nonetheless to offendIn short, the bad outweighs the good. Skip this one.
to be honest I expected a little more from the movie. it was too mellow and somewhat boring.
As a previous reviewer said, it pulled out every single American cliche about Italy in the book, which is pretty much what I had expected. But oh my GAWD was this awful! I was laughing hysterically at this. As bad as a low budget miniseries.
Hey gang, let's pool our resources and get the rights so Mystery Science Theater can talk us through this one!I'm telling you it would surpass even Manos, Hands of Fate for sheer yuks. The cheese, the schmatz, the dishonesty, the cluelessness, the pretention of this flick just begs, begs to be put out of its misery.
Having read Under the Tuscan Sun three times, this movie was very disappointing in the way that a beautiful story became a run of the mill chick flick. As beautiful as the scenery was, the movie made Tuscany lose it's charm and warmth that I received in the book.
I eagerly anticipated watching this movie, as I thoroughly enjoyed the book; however, the movie shares only a passing resemblance to the book. It gets 2 stars because I enjoy Diane Lane and Tuscany is gorgeous, but other than that the movie was dull, Lane's character is nothing short of pathetic, and the ending is trite.
It was just terrible for me, living in Italy for many years now. I hated to see exaggerated stereotyping of Italian men. it seemed to me a real bad Hollywood interpretation of A Room with A View.
I was pretty darn cheesed out by this movie. It's definitely nice to look at, and Diane Lane is a very lovely woman. However, the characters were all sugary sweet cheeseballs, and Diane Lane's character had no spine.Sandra Oh was great, as usual.
Don't waste your money on a DVD unless: 1) You just want to see beautiful Italian scenery (and it is gorgeous!) or 2) You actually enjoy watching a whiny, sniveling, pathetic female character waiting for a man to fulfill her life. Doubt if the author was thrilled with this version of her story. BUY THE BOOK!!! It's a great read.
I really enjoyed this book, but I was very disappointed by the movie. Rather than a story about the Italian countryside and the adventure of remodeling a home in a foreign country, this movie was about a divorced woman looking for love and her gay friend's dramatic life. Blah. I had wanted to see the charming Polish workers and the quaint Italian villages that were an important part of the original story. Oh well, this wasn't the movie for me.
Unfortunately, the screenwriter completely changed the story of Under the Tuscan Sun. True, the main character did buy a villa in Tuscany. However, this story primarily concerns Diane Lane's trauma of divorce and trying to find herself in Italy. The film has very little about the trials of her renovation of the villa. Most importantly, the film says nothing about the book's description of life in a small Tuscan village and the people who live there. I was very disappointed in the film.
I thoroughly enjoyed watching another T.V. while this show was playing out in the family room. The wife got a good night sleep and didn't even bother to replay the part she missed. After complaining, Hollywood Video gave us a comp, so all in all, we felt like we got our money's worth.
I watched the movie before reading the book. The movie was so bad that I felt compelled to read the book to see if it could redeem itself. The characters as depicted in the movie were very one dimensional and I just didn't care about them or what happened to them. The book tells a totally different story than is depicted in the movie and is SO MUCH BETTER.
If it was not for Diane Lane, this movie would have been a total loser. It's a swindle. It's advertised as "romantic comedy", when there is little (if any) comedy. It's boring, it portrays the Italians with all the cliches available. Blegh!
This title was on my Amazon recommended list, and since I never heard of it before I decided to pick it up.In short, I think ANY movie would benefit from being set and shot in Tuscany Italy. This one did. Without the beautiful backdrop - I don't think I would have watched the whole thing. A patchwork story-line, left me with the feeling that it had a lot of interesting bits and pieces BUT it appeared that they were put together for no apparent reason.It just wasn't believable.Maybe rent it
Man, hardly have I watched a movie this long (one hour and 53 minutes) that portrays the leading character in every (I mean, every!!) single scene, every single second of the whole movie!This is a bonus if you are a Diane Lane fan (and who is not? The woman is simply gorgeous, besides being a very good actress!), but otherwise youl will be imersed in a chick flick all along, and a bad one by the way, one that will lead you absolutely nowhere.
I rented this movie with the highest of expectations due to the things I had heard talked about it, like that it was funny and romantic and had wonderful scenery. What a disappointing story!The story had no sense of direction. It seemed badly glued together, as if the scriptwriters were saying, "we'll make her a divorced woman...and then we'll make her go on a gay tour...and oh wait, let's make her have no morals and have sex with a man she hasn't known for even one day...and lets make her flirt with the real estate man." All in all, the story turned out to be pretty stupid with nothing to admire in the main character.
This might be an ok movie to watch on a weekend when you're bored and have absolutely nothing better to do. Of course it's nothing like the book. It's terribly contrived with some very unlikely scenes. For example, there's this one scene where the long-haired Chinese man that shows up for an extended visit after his girlfriend dumps him actually gives birth. That just can't happen in real life!! Guys can't get pregant (yet)!! Anyway, forget about the movie. Read the book.
Was Very Very disappointed!! Movie though brand new, just out of the box it was stopping all the time during the latter part of the movie.
First, this movie has nothing to do whatsoever with the book except for the title. That said, once again Diane Lane plays someone who is supposed to be sympathetic as if she's a sociopath. Really - when she looks serious, you think she's about to kill someone. When she's happy she looks like she just did. Then you have the fact that nothing that happens in the movie is realistic at all -- except, if someone like Cameron Diaz were in the title role, we'd probably not care and even enjoy it. I feel used and cheap after being duped into watching this movie and I'm no longer going to waste my time on DL's films. She doesn't deliver. If she plays a Black Widow, I'll watch. If she plays another sensitive caring woman, I'll hurl first.
The story is probably a wonderful love story; but, to get there you must suffer through the paper-thin character of a woman with no depth, no self, no mind..., or an actor who cannot portray a woman worth watching and not worthy of real love.
This is a fun movie if you like the romantic comedy.Why 1 star?? There is a scene where an old woman calls ayoung German couple "facists". The irony is, the old lady is Italian. Whoever wrote the scene doesn't own I history book Iguess. That's a little on the predjudice side for me and it didn't belong in a comedy. I'm glad the couple weren't African-American, I wonder what she would have called them.Don't support this garbage by buying it, loan it from your library.
I'm such a goof! I automatically assumed that the format of this DVD was for North America Region. I was so excited when it came in, I opend the package and went straight to my player to watch. Opps! I discovered that the PAL format is not readable on my player. Though, I am aware of the many video formats out there, I still assumed that this DVD was just like any other DVD or Blue Ray that I have pruchased.The PAL is for countries like Japan and Europe, I confirmed my findings when I red the back information of the DVD package.Good thing that I have an adopted daughter in France, she will like this DVD. It's just her format! :-)Please be carefule when purchaseing video's on amazon...read carefuly that the format is for your country or else you may end up disapointed.
maybe they are clever enough to figure out why these actresses,directors, producers, etc. are still in circulation.This film is not only BORING BORING BORING but also an INSULT to everyone ... except perhaps the Far Eastern looking "actress" who gets to play the "friend" of the protagonist, and who fairly deliberately ruins what was supposed to be a one night-stand (one-night lay to be more precise) anyway, on the part of the slow, but dark-looking Italian HOD (hunk of the day, my abbreviation, he-he). Don't worry, a bearded, rugged looking American is going to fill the Italian's rubber shoes ... Sorry for italianizing and americanizing but there is more than enough of that going on in the film, at least on the DVD version.The film forgot to elaborate on the potential dangers of adult owls snatching kittens though, as it's a romantic, and not a realistic view of the world, and it was definitely not meant to be a horror flick. Then again, some of the scenes are pure horror.
This was the most boring movie and the most wretched performance I have ever seen from Diane Lane. All she did was sigh through the first 45 minutes.
I may have read the description wong but the DVD won't play. States wrong source. In small letters on the box it says it's the UK version. Can't fiind by receipt so I can't return it. I was really looking forward to sharing it with someone special. :(
I hated this dismal movie. Not completely, of course. Diane Lane, the villa, Italy and the builders are lovely, but the story is dismally surreal. First you have the divorce, then the lesbian couple, then a gay tour bus, then some promiscuous italians, then more breakups, then a nice pormiscuous fellow writer. Yuck. There is no romance in this movie - this is not romantic, it's a biological and twisted tale of some womens pre-menopausal angst and bedroom problems. And as if her bedroom problems weren't enough, we get everbody else's too. What happened to nice normal romantic comedys in the Audrey Hepburn style?
This not a window into Italy, but rather an American contrivance of Italy. Cliches abound. Comedy forced. I have disowned all who claim to even mildly enjoy this movie. Questa film e' merda.
Easily, the worst film of the year.Manipulative, ham-fisted, sloppy, insulting mess of a movie.Imagine some chick-flick parody in "The Simpsons" and you'll get pretty close (add some strange PC garbage for a good measure).Close to a bad soap opera episode.BTW I like both Diane Lane and Tuscany , but nothing can redeem this gross and pathetic caricature.I've learnt my lesson though - Audrey Wells work is to be avoided at all costs.
I should have read the reviews before wasting $10 bucks at BB for this used dvd. I bought it for my wife. She wanted to see it but as I write this review I am watching it with her and we both think this movie is a fairy tale. Please, please...if this movie had any sense of reality I would be the first one to move to Italy. Enough! Read what others have said before me for more specific. I WANT MY MONEY BACK!
From the onset, this movie was stilted and poorly developed. While Diane Lane is wonderful in some other films, she was(or her character was) irritating at best in this one. The plot is trite, Hollywood drivel. Some of the costuming and lightingwere well-done. I'd like my two hours back. This one is definitely going to be donated to the library where people canbe tortured by it for free -- but not me (again)!
I rented this movie while my husband was out of town, looking forward to a good chick flick. By the middle of my movie, I couldn't believe I was still sitting there, and by the end, I wanted my $4.00 back from Blockbuster. The story did not keep my attention and the pregnant friend has got to be the worst actress ever. I do not recommend this at all!
Diane Lane is a gifted actress who had just started to come into her own in recent times. I realise that good scripts aren't plentiful for actors over 35, but Diane should have left this one alone. I also have to agree with another reviewer about Diane's facial expressions during this film - quite annoying!Full of every cliche possible, the film does not allow you to think even for a second. On top of that, every scene seemed to be stolen from another movie.The scenery thankfully is the movie's saving grace. Watch it for that alone.Definitely disappointed with this.
Dated. Doesn't tell "how to beat the Democrats..." Old, worn advice. Save your money and buy something else.
We were surprised and confused when opened up the Amazon shipping box. The battery has been removed from the retail packaging and wrapped in a bubble wrap with a seal labe said "new". When looked closely at the battery, it's obvious that this is not the same one as what we have in the camera. I'm not sure if $29.94 is a deal for a non-original battery. We strongly urge Amazon to faithfully update the product description, or this is considered a deceiving.
After about a year of using this generic battery from China, the battery is quickly fading away. It will not hold charges and seems to make my camera actually reject the battery. When using this replacement battery, my camera will sometimes shut off or will not even turn on. I will not ever buy a cheap replacement battery for my expensive cameras. China is producing some really bad products lately, using cheap materials and cheap labor. Those products seem inferior to factories from other countries, especial USA, Japan, Germany. You have been warned.
Was starting to swell, which was why I was looking for anotherNo more purchases like this from meVery disappointedToo much trouble to follow up and return but glad I can vent
I ordered a Canon camera battery. NB-5L.Some company (not Amazon) sent the wrong battery.I tired to send it back. Too complicated. (Many emails, lots of forms.) I found someone who needed the incorrect battery (NB-4L) and gave it to them.Then I went to a real store and bought the correct battery.Bad taste in my mouth remains.
There is a problem with this battery and the Canon SD700. The battery is too short and the fitting in the camera is very loose. This creates a problem since many times the camera does not work, and I need to shake the camera, or remove the battery and insert it back to get the camera powered.I will recommend to the Canon engineers to go out and buy a flashligth to learn how a battery housing should be designed.Very expensive. Made in China. Does not work. Not recommended.Is there any one interested in a used Canon SD700 with an extra battery?
I saw this movie in theaters with a friend and my brother. I was expecting a exciting movie but it was exactly NOT that! The movie doesn't make sense and there really isn't a plot. Don't waste your time or your money on this movie!
The movie has a vague plot, meaningless items, (like the facial tattoo), and a loud, annoying soundtrack which frequently overwhelms the dialog. The additional injection of non-english conversations, which it only translated occasionally, simply adds to the confusion. No real resemblence to either the novel or the original movie. I'd find 90 minutes of the Shopping Channel more entertaining.
Im begging you now do NOT watch this film at any cost. It is an awful thing (cant bring myself to call it a film) with shoddy acting horrendous set design and one of the most fake, boring scripts ever. If you really want to buy it I suggest purchasing it for the pure pleasure of watching it burn!
I was surprised and delighted to see this "remake". After purchasing I was, well, disappointed. I guess because the framework of the story was the same but nothing else was. The modernisation of the action was poor, the story only Ok and I didn't find it engaging except in one scene. A satisfying ending with all the story nicely wrapped up but I think the cast deserved a better story line and sticking to the original concept and doing a real remake with modern cinema techniques could have made this a four star candidate. Oh well I guess we'll never see a good modern updated version because this certainly is not it!
The temptation to re-make movies is evidence of the fact that there is little creativity in Hollywood. This movie is evidence that there are people in Hollywood who should not be allowed to go to movies let alone make them.The original is not all that great, but it was in fact original and had some very interesting photography and stunts. This version is insipid to the point of stupidity; the photography stinks, and the stunts are mostly cut-and-paste special effects.The people who made this should be banned from any association to movie making for life! So why did I buy it? By mistake! I had a copy of the original and thought a comparison would be interesting. I was wrong. Learn from my error and avoid this like the very plague.
The original was original. This was just the same, event the motorcycles were the same from the original. Come on!
Don't waste your time or money on this remake. Even Rebecca's hotness can't save it. Watch the original with James Caan.
The old saying hollywood never lost money underestimating the intelligence of the american people really hits you in the groin with this head shaker of a release.While the orignal classic rollerball hasn't even gotten an anamorphic dvd release, let alone a blu-ray!
The setting for this movie is not in the future!!!! It is current day, and takes place in a poor European country. The arena they skate in looks like a very cheap prop from American Gladiators. There is VERY LITTLE SPECIAL EFFECTS and no high tech equipment.15 minuets of the movie is done with a night vision camera, so everything you see is either dark green or picth black.Most of the action happens within the rollerball arena. There are only a few action sceens on the streets of the city.
"Rollerball" in theatres was an awesome, bone-crunching, action-packed movie! But once it got on video & DVD...they added in nudity & took out scenes. It was terrible. The camera work was even altered when it came on video. I wouldn't have mind if they at least put the theatrical version on video too... bet they didn't! WHAT HAPPENED WHEN THEY TRANFERED THE FILM?
This film was a major disappointment. I expected so much more from the director of freaking "Die Hard". The direction, acting, and writing were all a joke. This film left you with the feeling that it was all just thrown together, and no one took it that seriously. There were lots of things in this film that just didn't make any sense at all. Someone explain: Why was that desert chase scene filmed in night vision? WHAT IN THE HECK WAS UP WITH THAT?! The editing was choppy and scenes were just thrown together. I gave this film two stars for one reason: The skateboarding scene at the beggining was sorta cool. Thats about it.SKIP IT. "Rollerball" is a loser.
Nothing more to say, this is one of the worst movies ever. Bad script, stupid story, terrible shooting, boring acting. I highly don't recommend this title.
What the heck? This movie is rated R! The theatrical version was rated PG-13! Now I'm not allowed to get or see this movie, which was only mediocre to begin with. Great job!
This is a grotesque despoliation of a classic film. Essential elements of the background storyline are not properly established. There are scenes whose purpose within the overall structure simply defies understanding. The nighttime 'escape attempt' sequence is shot in a bizarre green blur and was extremely unpleasant to watch. Hideous music plays frequently but the nail in the coffin of this film is the poverty of the in-game action sequences. These are generally nothing more than a confusing melange of images. The transitions from one camera shot to another seem very poorly done and it is really impossible to follow the internal dynamics of each game.
This movie was one of the worst films I've seen in years. The script is horrible, the movie had little glitches on it, and a big scene of the movie is shot in night vision (GREEN!) If you are thinking of buying this movie, read this review. I'd give this movie 0 stars, but the minimum is 1 star.
This is by far the worst movie I have ever seen! The plot was impossible to follow, the action confusing and flashy, and the film editing awful. For example, there is one sequence in which a motorcycle crashes through a chain link fence and the sound effect boingongong is heard, like a spring snapping. Ridiculous! Concept - Terrible, Acting - Worse, Execution - Rollerball looks like it was made in 2 weeks using 2 computers that didnt work. I reccommend that you see this movie, just so you can tell your friends you've seen the worst movie ever made!
This is somewhere up there as one of the worst movies I ever saw. Its not hard to find faults in this movie because its full of them.I was horrified by how poorly the first rollerball game scene was shot. It was so uninteresting and almost impossible to follow what was going on that it was PATHETIC. There was no doubt in my mind after the first fifteen minutes that this was the worst intro to a film I had ever seen.It got somewhat better as the weak plot developed and there was less action shots of them playing this ridiculous game.I normally end with something positive, but there was none. NONE at all.I must admit to watching the whole thing... a sucker for punishment. I would never watch it again, and could never recommend this film to anyone.A real letdown
Not many films make me feel stupid for actually watching them, but this movie did. Despite starring LL Cool J (who generally happens to at least make stupid films entertaining) this film falls so far flat that it almost bows under and creates a ditch. Chris Klein is a horrendous actor and he manages to muddle up nearly everything he comes in contact with, and no matter how hot Rebecca Romijn-Stamos is (just Romijn now), she doesn't bring anything to this film outside of her body, and that just can't cut it. The violence is cheap, the script is preposterous and the action sequences feel third rate. This is one of those films that offer us absolutely nothing.I have nothing else to say about this.
This tedious and unnecessary remake of the 1975 James Caan classic has little to recommend it. Director John McTiernan, who did so well with DIE HARD, blasts us with heavy metal rock garbage throughout the entire movie, action scenes that are incomprehensible and lifeless, and a cast that fizzles from the start. Chris Klein's good looks don't help his vapid, uninspired performance; LL Cool J is surprisingly uneffective; Rebecca Stamjin-Stamos does better in blue make-up in the X Men flicks; Jean Reno is laughably miscast as the Russian owner.McTiernan also films one lengthy chase scene in what appears to be night vision goggles; green of all things. It makes no creative sense and adds nothing to the overall movie.Remakes like this add further validity to the fact that if you're going to remake a movie, either make it as good or better, or let us savor the originals.
This movie is just plain sad. In addition to mediocre acting, the special effects were just as bad. In one scene you could plainly see the safety wire connected to the motorcycle. Bad diologue and senseless nudity made the film even worse. The plot drug and the resolution could have been solved a little sooner than it did. They came up with a lame chase scene with an airplane cruising on the ground after a motorcycle. Maybe that was a last ditch effort to make the movie a little bit more exciting. The only slightly interesting character was played by LL Cool J. His on camera presence is always rather captivating to me. It also carried him through a poorly written character. Since most of the movie took place on the track, there was more of the game than I could really put up with. Avoid it.
A complete waste of film start to finish.Don't waste your money.If you must see it for yourself, rent it.This movie didn't need a remake, the original starring James Caan was just fine.One star is generous.
I ordered this border for my new twins nursery! It is truly a cute colorful boarder. I was so excited to find it a a great price! Now i know why!I had one whole roll on the wall and neither of the other 2 rolls would match up to the one i already had on the wall! The borders were different widths! Which throws off all the lines on the border!I even checked the lot numbers on the packaging and they all matched? I had to get very creative to make it work since I already had a whole roll on the wall! very frustrating!
I love the box, and even the pictures on the box that the dragon is supposed to look like, you know like "see-through" clear blue plastic. Unfortunately, it looks like its made from some sort of tubberware material.The electronic sounds (2 and not in any sequence),one sounds okay/good, the other sounds like the flushing sound on my daughters potty book. The eyes look like round paper decals and looks...wierd. I'm sure my 6 yr old son would like it, just because its YU-GI-OH, but I'm a fan too and was excited about getting this for him for XMAS......I'm glad I started early, I can return it for something else.
It is jut an action figure you build and then you let it sit on the floor for months until it is stepped on. What will this do for you. All it does is make noises. Have you looked at the price of the item and do you think it is a good price for something that does nothing, but make a noise and just sits there after one day of being played with? This has no education value. For Yu-Gi-Oh fans, you should try buying Yu-Gi-Oh tins instead of this CRAP!
All the features are nice, TV Guide worked (note that browsing and setting recording preferences is very SLOW), BUT when the TV Guide is downloading (all the time) or you are recording / playing from the hard drive you constantly hear a grinding sound from the hard drive. These guys must have used a cheap hard drive or something. I have the Amazon return slip on my desk......
I bought two of the 633's two years ago and actually fell in love with the machine - despite the TV Guide debacle (blame cable companies on that, not the manufacturers). After a year and a half the first one stopped working. Best I can tell, the Hard Drive just failed. The cost for fixing makes it smarter to buy a new one - so I trashed it. A few months later the second one stopped working altogether also. I absolutely love the machine but there is obviously some problme with the hard drives. I am waiting until pioneer replaces this line (533/633) to buy a better one. Don't know why there is so little to choose from in the industry for this type of product.
We bought this last December (2005). It worked well enough for the first few months (some resetting of the TV Guide and blanking for days at a time, but OK). Was great to backup our Digital 8 video tapes to DVD.THEN...two weeks ago the TV Guide went dark (could not use it at all). I left it alone thinking it would reset and be fine.Machine then went into an endless loop the other day when I tried to turn it on. Would not come on. Gave a "LOADING" message when powered on - then went off to EPG function - then fired up again to "LOADING" then to EPG - etc. It seems to be frying.Read elsewhere on the web that the TV Guide function has been a disaster for almost all users. New version does not include it!Pioneer asked us to ship it to them and they will repair it under the 1 year warranty. Frankly, I feel it is a lemon and should be replaced with the new version under a lemon law for bad electronics!Buyer beware!
It is curious that one one the more significant achievements of "Pastor" Charles Taze Russell is omitted above. That fact is that he was the primary founder of the Watchtower Bible and Tract Society, and the religion now known as "Jehovah's Witnesses." No small amount of his theology is controversial in the body of the Church as a whole, as it would be (for different reasons, perhaps) amongst Jehovah's Witnesses.
diseased yellow pile of tortured meat, that's what it is. I used to eat it... but than I found out how it's made, that's just gross. people are disgusting and will eat raccoon's a* on a stick if it's called a delicacy.
So, Amazon, you're back to selling whale meat, fois gras, and other gross foods? What gives? Is it because few American's eat it, or even know what it is? And, it's expensive which helps your bottom line. So, why not take stuff American's don't or are forbidden to eat (remember the ban on whale slaughter is now world wide and it makes your selling of it illlegal). People are becoming more informed on a daily basis, and finding this kind of stuff on Amazon is little less than appalling, much less, law disregarding.
Poor quality fabric, not soft like flannel should be. But was only $9 and it's for my guest bed, so I guess it's OK.
I was extremely disappointed with the fabric and color when it came. It is obvious that it is of poor quality but I guess you get what you paid for 10 bucks.The zipper of the plastic cover of one set was broken.I bought 2 queen sheets and I wanted to return both purchases if only I did not have to pay for shipping.Do not buy this!!!! You will regret it.
I did not like the product, but i got it really cheap . This is not a quality product , avoid at higher prices
I had high hopes for these sheets even though I got them at a bargain price. They don't have elastic all around, which is a problem with flannels resulting in sheets riding up on the sides. They are also inexpensively made with MANY loose threads and potential for unraveling. They are thin as flannels go. All in all, try to find a better quality sheet.... it's well worth it!!
I bought 3 sheet sets, I have noticed on the two queen size sheets that the stitching that holds the elastic in has come apart in several places and the elastic is now falling out. I have only washed these sets two times. I am very disappointed in this purchase.
I ordered these sheets hoping for that comfy flannel sheet I remembered from the old days. Snuggling under the covers in the Fall and Winter, cosseted by soft sheets. Perhaps, I was too optimistic, given the price.These sheets seem to be fairly good quality, but they don't have that fuzzy softness of flannel. There's really not much nap. They are made of a low thread count sort of jersey fabric. The patterns are good, and they come packaged nicely, but in an era where high thread count sheets are available affordably, these sheets are a disappointment.If you like jersey-type sheets, and you aren't too concerned about the softness right out of the package or the thread count, these could be just right for you. And you can't beat the price.
The pillow case seam tore wide open after initial washing (before I even used the set!). I stitched back up and the rest of the set seems fine. Could just be an anomoly, but beware. But then again, they were only $20.
Dollar store quality. Lovely dark pattern, but it is printed on thin white flannel, not over-printed on blue yarn-dyed fabric, and the stitching on these fairly dark sheets is white.
The hems on the flat sheet became unraveled after the very first wash, not just in a few places, but the full length on both sides! However the fabric is soft to the touch and the price was insanely low, so I gave it a courtesy second star.
Even at the incredible Friday sale price of $4.99, I would not recommend these flannel sheets for purchase because of the very poor sewing workmanship. The stitches were very large, and also some of the edges were simply turned over once and sewn with a raw (easy to unravel) edge. The sheet would not hold up well after the first washing. I resewed all the edges of both sheets.
As with They Only Kill Their Masters, another recent purchase, this DVD is from the Warners Archive Collection. Here is the statement from this website concerning this title:Important Note: This film has been manufactured from the best-quality video master currently available and has not been remastered or restored specifically for this DVD and Digital Download release. Click here to preview this film's video quality.Had I realized this fact, I would not have purchased this DVD from Amazon.
This toy is the worst! You can't even get past the Password screen to play anything. I got tricked that it was a good toy, but it's not. And I don't want you to get tricked, either. I thought it was a good toy by looking at it in the wrapper, but it wasn't.
I bought a couple of these for my sons. They love to play with them, but after only a few hours of use, the batteries are dead! This could get really expensive considering the batteries are about $3 each. Also, one thing that gets very irritating is the shaking of the PET that has to be done when you get a "virus". Very annoying!
You have to buy most of the battle chips seperatly which leeches your cash in no time, don't bother. Get a Game Boy or a Nintendo DS if you want handheld fun.
it has terrible graphics i mean it is just black and white.also it moves very slow on the screen.that is what little of a screen it has.(...)i say get av gameboygame instead.at least that has decent graphics and isn,t a cheap piece of plastic.overall it is a piece of junk.
Okay this game was pretty fun when I first bought it but after that it just wasnt fun anymore. the thing has no plot but fight viruses and enter tournaments which are VERY hard. Plus there is quite a bit of shaking for an electronic game.
It doesn't cooperate and isn't very user friendly. It feels like it takes forever of shaking until it finally finds a virus for you to fight. Very annoying...especially when mom is fussing at me to stop shaking it.
This toy isn't well made or designed with kids in mind. You have to shake it forever before it will even do anything. I thought it was broken at first but then I found out that you can shake it for 10 min and nothing will happen but that's normal. If you like Megaman then I'd get the GBA game instead of the PET toy.
My very athletic 9 yr old absolutely could not use this - much too hard - returned it.
I purchased this Trikke thinking that it would be a great surprise for my son on his birthday. When I received the Trikke it was missing two pieces. This Trikke came in a box that didnt match the product. It does not fold down at all which makes it hard to pack for trips etc... I am very dissappointed in this product and Razor company should get a great big slap for false advertising. The advertisment also does not state the weight capacity, its say both kids and adults can enjoy this product. The weight capacity is only 175lbs. It does not come with an owners manual, and there is no tool case. The allen wrenches come in a plastic baggie taped with scotch tape. Very Very disappointed.
I can't believe this rates higher than 2 Stars. Don't be fooled, this only good for down hill. While it is well built, you can't propel this trike as advertized. Save your money, don't buy this!
From pictures, etc., we thought this trike somehow had a means of locomotion - swaying back and forth? My determined child never figured it out, and instructions never hinted to a technique. So, it ends up being a scooter that is not very functional because it's hard to balance on one side and scoot with the other foot.
Terry Pratchett's other books are a lot like well painted homes. There are several layers. "Small Gods" is like inviting over your friends to paint. There is one uneven coat of paint and they left masking tape on all of the edging in an unsuccessful attempt to miss it with their paintbrushes. The ending of the book (and middle and beginning too if truth be known) left me with the same vague feeling of dissatisfaction as when I realized that to get the place properly painted I would have to have another seperate group of friends and throw another 'paint party'.
Okay, I had to read this book for a Fantasy Lit. class I am taking. My teacher and all of my fellow classmates, it seems, find it hilarious. I, however, am left wondering: why?I understand what he's getting at with religion and what not, I've just seen it done in a much better way by much better authors. The characters are boring and flat. His humor is downright stupid. This book is not clever in the least. If you don't know the things he's pointing out in a way which suggests he thinks they are quite witty, you really need to think for yourself.I guess it might appeal to the great masses who can find nothing better to do with their time than go to the next big blockbuster movie and buy the latest crap novel. But then, the back of the book does say he is a popular author, and like most things that are popular, it must be accessible to the public or else they won't understand.
I liked what it was about, the characters and alot of the ideas. What I didn't like was the plot, it just bored me. The only reason I kept reading was to see if it had anymore ideas in it, I love his ideas, especially in books like Mort, Colour of Magic, and Light Fantastic.
I have read most of this series with great delight. However, Pratchett finally let me down.It plods along, in no particular hurry to let the reader move on to better things.The humor -- what little there is of it -- is forced. It has the feel of sophomore philosophy majors sitting 'round the Quad on a Saturday night, dateless and full of mockery. It is kind of sad.Far from one of his best. PYRAMIDS, any of the series having to do with the Watch or the wondrous three witches -- you will enjoy those far more.This one droops as limply as an Ayn Rand novel.
While the ideas that lay the framework for this book are solid, everything else is lacking.The humor is forced, awkward, and on occasion plagarized. A nearly verbatim quote from a Monty Python sketch stands out in my mind.The plot is slow and seldom rivetting. The only thing that kept me turning the pages at some points was my search for the origin of the "REMIND ME AGAIN HOW THE HORSE-SHAPED ONES MOVE" quote.The character development is poor. The main character, Brutha, makes a sudden transition from a bumbling idiot to a sagely leader-of-men and bargainer-with-gods. I wasn't convinced.The ideas, however, are the salvation of this book. Read it if you have a good imagination...you'll need it to make up a new story around the concept Pratchett so poorly utilizes.
The last line of my review comes first:If you do not find church humor and church-esque situations (including a lot of parodying of church ideology and customs) funny, either due to inexposure (like me) or too much exposure (fundamentalism), this book is NOT for you.And now the review:I love Terry Pratchett - he is my favorite author of all time. And I picked up this book hoping it would become one of my favorites.The fact is, I didn't find much in this book that was funny.This novel moves along at a snail's pace, in terms of the plot and the humor. The chief reason for my disillusionment is that Pratchett includes a LOT of church analogies into the novel. The characters are all church characters. And the god is not so godly. Over half of this book came across as a particularly long and pointless conversation between a dullard and his favorite stuffed animal.Overall, I wish I'd had a review that had warned me thusly:(last line of the review)
although this book was an intentional attack on organized religion of the past, i thought that it went to far in trying to humor the audience. In light of this book being fiction, Pratchett still wanders a little far into even joking about something that is as important to millions of people as a supreme power.even so, the comedy good throughout. the characters were a little shallow at times, and my own obsession with imagery in fantasy novels (see Guy Gavriel Kay), made me feeling a bit disappointed in such a huge phenomenon as Terry Pratchett.
DO NOT ORDER THIS PRODUCT!!! This was delivered in three boxes and was bound by plastic wrap. Once out of the box, the three layers were cut with what looked like pinking shears and were horribly uneven. This was NEVER a mattress that sold for 999.00 ... When I tried to return it All Sleep was helpful at first but I could not package the layers to send. While trying to come up with a solution to the shipping problem, the UPS labels they sent to me expired and now they will not return any emails or calls. WORST SERVICE AND PRODUCT EVER!
This book is a total waste of money; it is only useful for lighting up the BBQ. The only one to make (plenty?)of money out of this book is the writer. Do not be discouraged by the title!. This is not a serious book.
thought this was a cd by the group pieces of a dream. you put it with their cds. not what i wanted.
My sister was recently diagnosed with Celiac Disease and there is a strong chance that I may have it as well. I wanted to read about it to learn more and was told that this book was a great place to start. Unfortunately, I found the book to be poorly written and with the most bizarre suggestions; how to write your family a Christmas letter, informing them of the diagnosis. Come on! There are other instances that I felt it was just a little over the top and was not realistic to everyday life.Since finishing this book, I began reading Elizabeth Hasselbeck's book, The G-Free diet and have found it to be much more informative and much better written. Ms. Hasselbeck's book gets right to the point giving you the information that you really need to understand this disease.
I found areas of this book that contained information that would make individuals needing to lead a gluten free life style ill. There were several poor suggestions in this book and also poor information regarding some of the products mentioned as NOT being gluten free that are!There are great books out there to help Celiacs! This is certainly *not* one of them.
This is beautifully written but this does not make up for the total absence of a story. Three characters in war and how their lives, interact. Reads like a series of notes rather than a completed work. If it is trying to convey the horror of war it fails. Deeply deeply disappointing - I feel I have wasted my time and been cheated.
I needed this for a small repair job , but thought it would be useful to have around for years to come. I ended up returning it because parts were missing and the company never responded when i contacted them on their website.A note in the box requested that issues be resolved by contacting the company rather than returning the item, which I tried to follow, but when they don't respond to contact through their website, what is one to do but send the tool back?you can use this tool to repair your broken canondale road shifter bosses (on the downtube). just replace the easily broken bar with a slightly larger hole and a couple of m5 rivnuts and you're good to go. you can also easily install water bottle cages to any sheet of metal you can drill a pair of holes in.
I like everything about these shoes except the velco stap is enormous and overpowers the entire front of the shoe. My son looks like he is wearing orthopedic shoes, I had to return them he just looked way to goofy
I left a review criticizing GrapeVine for not putting the fact that this is a DVD-R. On second thought and second viewing I believe that though the DVD-R format SHOULD be mentioned in the product description, this is probably the only way that rare films that can never hope to see commercial release can be made available. The print is not great, but I've seen worse and been able to enjoy the film. So sorry GrapeVine.
Was a little tricky without instructions but I figured it out....however, will not work on the bike as the brackets are too thick to slide over the wheel bolts and leave enough room for the frame to be reattached. Returning it
All the songs give you that "uh, yep,,,right,,,ok". If ya face facts,,,,Amy is due out for a "Best of" to make up for the really BAD songs lately she has produced that were not hits. Remember Journey's off songs,,,,,simuliar here with Amy Grants,,,,,,I have owned her entire collection to date and "Heart of Motion" CD is SO vastly superior to the rest of her CD's. I have loved the "Angels" song on the "Straight Ahead" Album for instance but not much else. You will not find this spirited type song on this album. She lost it
Who does she think she is? Amy Grant has been singing for years and years and still no one sees what she's doing? First she gets everyone thinking she's a Christian singer so she doesn't get as much opposition and more positive attention. Then she gets secular and fools those who are too blind to see. If you think ANY of her music will draw you closer to God it won't, and NO MATTER WHAT don't get this CD!
If you paid for this product, you overpaid. Granted, the original, out-of-print dvd of The Bikini Carwash Company sells for exorbitant prices, so my suggestion is to just download it for free through torrents and cut the video pirates and video scalpers down to size. If anything, buy the European PAL version, which is also uncut and uncensored, and available on the North American Amazon as well.
this is by far one of the worst step 2 prep materials ever! the questions on this CD ROM were random, poorly written, and testing very obscure material, certainly material inappropriate for the step 2 level. as an example, drug X effects which part of the electron transport chain? oh my, that's going way back into first year med, which in not what step 2 is about. we all know step 2 is for clinical applications of what we've learned as third year meds, and i can honestly say that this CD does not test these types of things. it was extremely frustrating trying to go thru the CD and "give it a chance" but i just couldn't take it anymore! try the NMS series or the A&L ERT if you want some computer practice, this exam master stuff doesn't cut it.
I hate this CD , it was waste of money and I wish I could refund my money ( 89 USD + S&H, I bough it directly from the publisher) I am absolutly agree with the rest of the reviewers. questions are not even close to USMLE step 2 format. whoever wrote those questions I am sure that had no idea about USMLE at all since the questions are about any thing but USMLE step 2. DONT WASTE YOUR MONEY AND TIME ON THIS CD 7 insted try to read NMS REVIEW multiple Q ( it is bible of USMLE step 2 ).
second hand quality. i have ordered this before from sleep warehouse. now their memory foam seems to be second hand quality. i recommend trying another site that has true grade quality. don't let the low price fool you, like i did. when i press my hand in the foam, it comes back to shape in 2 seconds. the foam i got 2 years ago, same brand, it would take 5 seconds to come back to shape. that was great foam. try someone else
The only type of person to whom I could possibly recommend this book is someone with no experience with children and who wants a "forest" level view of them from one source. There is nothing in this book for a parent in the thick of childrearing. Although they are completely out of date with respect to political correctness and product availability, the series from the Gesell Institute (Your One Year Old, Your Two Year Old, etc. etc.) provides immensely better insight into what is going on with children at particular ages and stages. "Raising Your Spirited Child" is a much better place to start looking for advice getting along with a difficult child or even an average difficulty child. I am saddened and more than a bit annoyed (I purchased the book on the basis of the organization's recommendation) that the American Academy of Child & Adolescent Psychiatry would put its imprimatur on a book containing such little insight.
I picked up this book at B&N; because I had just read two Jane Austin novels and I thought this would be a light read. I was wrong. The beggining and the end had a purpose in the story but the middle could have been much, much shorter and the ending made a little longer.I liked the character of Mr. Bounderby. He was very well developed. I would even say over-developed, but he was the only one. How did Sissy influence the youngest Gradgrind? Why didn't we know of Mrs. Bounderbys inner turmoil till she ran to her father? Every character had something missing. What happened to Mr. Bounderby once he was found out? Why is Sissy so special and what did she really do for the family?It was a long book where nothing much happened until the last quarter and when it finally ended I felt cheated because it lacked a complete story line and full characters. The story line could have been forgiven if I was more satisfied with the characters.
I picked up Hard Times preparing to enjoy it since Charles Dickens is my favorite author. While not going so far to say that I was disappointed,I will say that it was the first Charles Dickens novel that I almost felt like not finishing. Not only is the plot rather humorless, but the characters are charmless and almost uninteresting. If it hadnt been written by Dickens then I may have liked it better but as it was it did not have any of Dickens usual charm and humor.
This book was terrible! Half the characters did not have an ending and no main character is apparent. Then again, I'm a freshman in high school and may be a little inexperienced to judge so harshly. I personally dislike Dicken's wordy style of writing because it's easy to get lost. If you like Dickens, and you don't mind his writing style I'm sure you would probably disagree with me. I'll give it a two.
Charles Dickens did for the art of literature what the 80's did for music: Made it intolerable and robbed it of any beauty. The Dicken's aesthetic of excessive description drives the reader to tedium and makes him wish that Dicken's was payed for every word he saved instead of every one he wrote. His knack for wrapping up loose ends in a nice neat conclusion is overshadowed by the time and effort it takes to reach that point
This is not Dickens at his best. No offence to the narrator, who does a good job but I think the story itself is rather boring. Especially when compared with his classics "Great Expectations", "A Christms Carol" and "A Tale of Two Cities".
Didn't like this book at all. For several reasons: 1. the hero Ben seemed weak especially when he allowed his mother to slap him, come on he is like 37-39 years old!!! Unbelievable! 2. the heroine was way too dependent upon daddy; did she not have any type of backbone? 3. The biggest, Ben knew the truth and yet he had to create all this angst on both their parts!!! YUCK!!
It's *another* King of Fighters game. Don't we already have enough of these already? It's not like this one is drastically different from the other ones.It's basically the same game as all the other King of Fighters but with a 2006 date attached to the title name, which means people will notice it, realize it's brand new, and buy it immediately. Why do we continue to be tormented like this? In a world already loaded with more than enough tournament fighters, I have just this to say- FIND SOMETHING ELSE.
Im not feelin this album. I always liked Bad Azz along with all the other LBC and DPG rappers,,, I thought his "word on the streetz" album was good,,,, but I just dont feel this album. In my opinion the best song is "wrong idea" which as you know is also on the last meal album from snoop dogg, and it isnt a real great track..... so that doesnt say a lot for this album
This is a 6 x 4.5 x 0.5 inch book that is basically the federal rules with SOME objections. So far the description doesnt sound so bad right? But then throw in that this tiny little booklet is $35.00 bucks. If you buy this, and some of you will, you will be shocked at how tiny this book is with large print running you 35 bucks. I got a required book on the federal rules and a book on objections that total $70.00 and both on their own are worth more than this. Get something else if you can. The books I purchased instead of this are below.[...]
I got this for my 8 year old son because he loves hand held games. He played it the 1st day he got it, but it was difficult, involved alot of shaking. I also had to take it apart because he pressed the reset button & it stopped working at all. We put it away for awhile & the next time he tried to use it, no battles, no matter how much we shake, it is useless now. How can they make such junk?
I purchased the Red and Blue PETs for my son who loves the show. These toys don't work properly. My son carries it around as a prop but it too difficult for a child between 6-10 to understand. If your child wants a PET, but the GBA game Red Sun / Blue Moon. There is a build it PET that works. Kids can battle each other.
Oscar winner Timothy Hutton stars in this spanish made film.He plays Science Fiction Author David Norton. He is invited to an island conference. He takes his girl friend, asks her to marry himA DVD appears in his room and she commits suicide..and then more people start dying. He is usually in control, suddenly life takes a nasty spin.Hutton takes the lead with this weak script. The plot wears thin after the first 30 minutes and then it starts to drag. There is no sub plots. The suspense of this film feels disjointed and starts to bore. There are no thrills to capture an audience. Towards the end, Hutton looks bored as lead and the film falls apartTry to miss this one in your video store, until all the other good films are rentedBennet Pomerantz AUDIOWORLD
The 2 stars goes to Timothy Hutton for his great performance, truly an outstanding actor! But... the movie... well not so great. I was left somewhat disappointed. It starts well and gives you the impression of a good movie but then it evolves into a bizarre scenario that completely fails to keep up the suspenseful tone of the start, and is in fact rather wearisome and inconclusive at times. It's as if they are trying really hard to achieve a goal with a poor script... I expected more that's all...
THIS WASTE OF TIME COST ME TWENTY BUCKS FOR A VIDEO THAT WAS NOT EVEN THIRTY MINUTES!! YOU CAN NOT EXPLORE ANYTHING IN THAT SHORT OF TIME!!!! YOU CAN FIND OUT MORE ON YOUTUBE FOR FREE!!! DON'T FALL FOR THE SAME TRICK I DID! SAVE YOUR MONEY!!!
Sp65 is difficult to program. Detailed instructions are not included with purchased item, and send you to a web page that is unavailable (www.sonicblue.com/support). I think this is a piece of junk!
i ordered this item for support being that i have a rather large chest. the item had MUCH more coverage than the picture lets on and came in the size i ordered according to the tag but once i had it on i realised it was 3 sizes too SMALL. when i returned it to the sender the refunded only HALF my money. this item was ordered with one more bra like it and out of my $40 order i got just over $20 back. i plan on disputing this with amazon and the seller.
I love the style of the bra, however I ordered a 46D in Black and the cup size of what I received was almost double in size. The label read 46D (which I know I wear), but had to send it back because the cup was just too LARGE.
I remember Armored Saint from their tour opening for WASP and Metallica. L'Amour in Brooklyn. These guys ROCKED. Unfortunately this album, lacking second guitarist Phil Sandoval, does not rock. Poor production values, even explained on the liner, makes it even less acceptable. I gave it the second star only because it was great to hear "Can U Deliver?" again and I can't find the now out of print "March of the Saint" first album. Buy it if you're a die-hard Saint fan like myself, but if you're looking for a good Saint album currently available get "Symbol Of Salvation" instead. It's pretty rockin'.
Maybe I shouldn't review this album since I'm not very familiar w/jazz or jazzy styles so what I have to say is coming from a more or less mainstream perspective regarding this genre. With that said, I'm also a sucker for live shows so I'll have to second the reviews that maintain Regina Carter is best experienced live, a fact which prompted me to buy this album after seeing a performance in '01. With this release, I sometimes feel like I'm listening to elevator music but the sultry "Forever February" redeems it somewhat; her cover of Marvin Gaye's "Don't Mess With Mr. T" is also interesting. Besides that, I should mention that Carter is an enchanting violinist. Go see her live performances.
I did not really care for this book. I found the plot messy and muddled, with many clumsy devices and scenes that felt forced (the climax, in particular, seemed very rushed, cinematically speaking). The characters, for the most part, were thin - and perhaps the author reached too far in casting the reference-net. I wanted to like it (I very much enjoyed Alan Moore's tales of the Extraordinary Gentlemen's League)... A very intriguing idea though (I give the acorn a golden prize but the oak grew sickly)... Maybe it is your thing; it was not mine.
Gee, I wasn't as impressed as you guys. I found it quite tedious. Bram Stoker's original is one of a kind. This is not even remotely in the same league. Sorry.
Too many characters that appear for a sentence or two and then just vanish into the London fog of the late 19th century.
Unfortunately, it's two left feet on this occasion. I bought the book as I am a big fan of both Holmes and Dracula stories, but despite the sometimes colorful characters, it was a tedious read.
This book needed to be, in my opinion, at least two hundred pages longer to fully explore all the ideas that were brought up. I liked how it was written and all the cameos by other famous vampires/historical figures, but what I didn't like was the ending. The killer I thought was a real let down, as was how he was eventually caught. And the way Dracula was presented at the very end....ugh. Not good at all.I guess if you're really bored and desperately want to read a vampire novel, this will do. Otherwise, steer clear of this book.
Too much filler. None of the characters was unique, and much of the book was full of boring conversations that went on and on about trite details. Dull book. Skipped large parts of it.
This book needs a grammar check. It is incomprehensible. I am trying to return it. It sucks, to coin a pun.
Lots of diagrams and drawings, pointing arrows, etc. I felt as though I were back in class and was missing the required supplementary workbook.This book seems to address mainly work situations where the reader is the boss and having difficulty with a recalcitrant employee. There just wasn't much for me here to apply to my own life.
Unfortunately, I did not like this book. I found it difficult to read and boring, even though it was recommended by a friend..
I love this record. And I am also a big fan of remastered re-releases (Bowie, Roxie, etc.), but I was disappointed in the sound of this remaster. My Import version sounds MUCH better...a lot more raw, more vital, better definition between instruments. This sounds like a lot of compression, and not much more. Buy this record, but don't re-buy it for a better experience like I did.
This book by Tom Bodett was long and it took awhile to get to the action. It dragged on and on while it was about page 160 when the short action part started. Although it did have a few good parts to it, this book was a novel that seemed to drag on and on.When Ivan and September get left alone at their small remote home on the shores of Alaska, 12 year old Ivan messes up the raidos. The raidos are the kid's only source of communtian, and their only way to interact with the outside world.While then they have to make many trips back and fourth to the outer world, it takes much time to get to the interesting parts.Overall, this book had some good parts to it, but wasn't the best book I have ever read.
This "book" is only a pamphlet that is available online for FREE! I recently bought this for the length of the book (claims 264 pages) but it is not. I have recently had to deal with a close family friend suddenly dealing with schizophrenia and it has had a traumatic effect on his family and his friends. This is a serious illness that not only affects the person diagnosed but everyone surrounding them. The last thing anyone would want at this time is a book that claims to be something it is not!!
I buy/view/listen to a lot of music video's (read, sorry night life) and this one was a disappointment. Sound varies too widely act to act. Couple of goosebump moments (I love the Mega-Guitars on Kansas City) but mostly a smorgas-bored of available talent putting in their charity work. Zero additives for the video freak and no real explanation of charitable intentions ever given. Borrow this from someone instead.
This product has only one thing going for it. It's nice looking. Besides that, it's totally worthless. Cheaply made. Almost impossible to remove without either dropping it or having your fingers slip off of it which usually results in your fingernails scraping across the surface of your lens or lens filter. After 10 drops and 4 fingernail scrapes, I ordered the following product.Mennon Pro Center Pinch 67mm Snap-On Lens Cap with Leash. It's much better. Sturdily made, snaps off and on very easily, same price as the Canon. Only drawback - no nice Canon logo.
This book started out fairly interesting as being an insight to the impact of too much money on children and the relationship with their parents. Then, it goes into what one reviewer thought might be an opium trip (which I agree with) that went on and on and on, boring after the first couple pages. The end was so predictable, the entire book turned into a major disappointment.
Ok i admit. I'm not a brain music expert. I really am not sure whether this CD emits sounds that will make me more creative or open up my alpha brain waves like the cover says. I've tried and I don't really feel any different. And yet I'm admitedly intrigued by the warnings on the label that say "do not use while operating heavy machinery" and such. However, the cd provides only a single song - if you call it that - that lasts for an hour - and its really just a low thumpy staticy rain noise that remains fairly constant and does not ebb and flow. Nothing really mind blowing if you ask me. Also, the packaging looks more backyard than mass production leading me to believe the $23 price is also a bit high. Ok experts, flame away! Tell me I'm simply not smart enough to get it. Perhaps that is the case... either way I guess i expected something different.
I would have liked to know that the cord in the picture was NOT the cord that I was ordering. Not only are the connectors NOT nickel-plated, like in the picture, even the shape of the connector is wrong and looks to be smaller than the one pictured as well.My rating is more for the distrust I'm feeling from this company rather than the product itself, as it does work... For now...My recommendation: Don't buy this product, at least not from this company. You never know what you're going to get.
I had to rate this low because the one I received was broken or had some sort of short in the wire and didn't work. I'm pretty sure a working one would be very useful.
This product does not fit tightly. It tends to fall out of the plugs it is attached to, both at the computer (the male end) and at the cable (female end). Complaint to the provider went unanswered. We will have to buy a replacement.
I had 2 problems with the product. First the sound would cut out of one ear unless I played with the connection and second, using the extension caused the sound in my left and right headset piece to reverse (right sound came out of the left ear and vice versa). I have requested a refund and will not reorder if this is normal.
i bought this so i can watch tv from the other side of the room. great idea. but some headsets dont work with it.. would have returned it but for the price ill keep it. you get what u pay for!
EDIT: I updated this review in response to comments and changes in the product description.When I purchased the cable the product photo showed gold-plated connectors, and existing reviews (Jose Lima 2007, Larkenfield 2007) mentioned separately insulated wires and gold-plated connectors, so that's what I originally thought I was going to get.The cable I received had nickel-plated connectors; it did not have separately insulated wires. It worked, but the sound started cutting out after less than a month and I've long since thrown the cable away.Given at least one other reviewer of this product (Joseph Z. Singer 2012) didn't get what they expected based on the product description, I think it's safe to say that the product photo and the descriptions of the product in all but the most recent reviews is unreliable. If I were you, I'd buy from another shipper.
I bought this in November 2005, used it almost everyday without disconecting it so no wear would be put on the connectors. Last week the sound quit coming through in the right ear. Surprising since the connectors are gold plated, you would expect it to last as long as my headphones which are 7+ years old without gold plating (and still function pefect. Anyway, it was only $2.90 from Part Express when i bought it from here, but the shiping was really high. So if you buy it plan to replace it in a year in a half.
Ok while it lasted. However this cord stopped working after two months. Save your money -- this is junk.
Update...so the workaround described below work for about 33 days...just outside the return window. The tracks that play in just the left headset channel do not come through. I've tried 2 sets of ear buds and one set of over the ear headsets...all have the same issue. Plug the same headsets into the source (PC), all channels play out of both ear.WOULD NOT RECOMMEND PURCHASING THIS ITEM.---Out of the box, if I plug my ear buds from my iPhone into the extension (fully connected in the female end) I only get sound out of the right ear bud. Verified the same condition with a pair of JVC ear buds as well. I have found if you insert the male end of the headphones into the extender to the first "click" (not fully inserted), sound comes from both ear buds. There is tension with it connected in this fashion, so it works but could be better. Others may have better luck with other headphones.
Purchased this for use with my Tracks HD and as others have stated above the sound quality was greatly lowered for me and my left speakers sound is off with this product. Glad I didn't waste more than I did on this.
Loved this from the moment I put it on the bike. Took a little work, just a little, but switched it to my wife's bike and then back to mine. Some where in there we loaded it down too much and one of the slide in plastic brace ears broke and now it is unusable. Searching for a new way to haul groceries now...
This book, was far too long, and was not at all appealing. The length of the book, bored me to tears, and was too hard for people unfamiliar with his work (i am though somewhat familiar but still his theories made no sense to me and lacked relevance in my life). The book went into painstaking great detail describing dreams and interpretations. His theories and interpretations were intriguing, and informative, but lacked any research to back up his theories.
This is a new translation (2006) of Freud's Interpretation of Dreams. I hope someone qualified might soon comment on the merits or significance of this new translation. Meanwhile, the Editorial Review information offered for this book comes from an earlier edition of a different translation of Freud's work, FWIW. And the second paragraph in the editorial review prelim is entirely inappropriate--it's for another book altogether.I give Freud's book (not the translation) a low rating because it is misleading. It's not about the interpretation of dreams in general, but more specifically it's, covertly of course, about Freud's own dreams. More basically, it's about "infantile memories" he claimed dreams concealed. (For more explanation of this point, one could consult "If Freud's Theory Be True..." in Psychological Reports (1992, 70, 611-620), which would explain how Freud himself tells us his book is not about what it appears to be about.
I've studied philosophy to a good degree and therefore and to read some of Freud's work in Philosophy of Psychology. While making some entertaining remarks, Freud has now long been discounted as anything valid and understandably so.
Please be aware before you purchase this Kindle edition that it DOES NOT HAVE A TABLE OF CONTENTS. If you are reading this book for pleasure, starting at the beginning and proceeding directly, this may not be a problem. If, however, like me, you are using it for a course and/or in conjunction with a hard copy edition, this makes it virtually impossible to locate anything in the book or to navigate from chapter to chapter. You have to use successive approximations of the location number every time you want/need to change locations. Consequently, this Kindle edition is useless to me.
Though the content of the text met expectations (it's a fairly canonical text), the binding on this book was terrible. It does not include any print or publishing information, making it nearly impossible to cite. There is neither table of contents nor an index, inexcusable for a text of this length and genre. The section breaks were unpredictable and poorly marked. Some new paragraphs began mid-sentence (clearly errors!) and often the section heading was indistinguishable from the paragraph in which it was imbedded. I highly suggest spending the money on a better quality version of the text.
I have downloaded a sample of the penguin kindle edition, and while all the reviews refer to a new, and it would seem generally well regarded new translation by Joyce Crick, the actual listed translator of the ebook is J.A. Underwood.While this may be OK for the casual reader, this is not OK for someone approaching these texts in any kind of rigorous fashion.Whatever carelessness accounts for this error, it is enough to make me opt for a good old fashioned paperback instead.Fix it!
Such a hard read for a non-psychology student - never to the point, ineptly organised, more 'jargon' type language than really necessary. Not worth it if you're not actually studying the subject or have advanced interest in psycho-analysis.
This edition is really bad. It is really ugly and has a lot of typos. I do not trust the translation either; it does not even specify who the translator is.
My professor was not happy with this rendition of the book.He felt it was interpreted poorly and wanted me to buy another book.
This a terrible story - boring at best. I am sorry I wasted my time watching it.
I would like to say that all of my dealings with Amazon have been wonderful, fast, and not a problem. The only reason I gave this unit a below rating is because the pictures showed a unit that just plugged into the wall, like the one that came with camera. When it arrived, I opened it up and I found a plug-in cable, then a charging box (gray), plus a battery. So I was not happy about the pictures not being the same one as I thought I had ordered, I was expecting the one with the folding prongs. Otherwise, Amazon would get a 5 on this review.
I needed a charger because i misplaced mine. I an stunned they want $36 for this thing that should not cost more than $10.
The description stated that the condition of the charger was like new. I got it in the mail after about 2 weeks (from Japan), and it had scratches all over it. I would not buy from this seller again.
Im going to return mine they said it would work for my Cannon Sd1000 and it didn't I wish they did more research before saying it would work. It was cheaper than buying new though but I have the hassel of sending it back.
I emailed the company 3 times requesting permission to return unused item and they never got back to me. I am stuck with a product I do not want that I bought by mistake. Bad business.
I feel that I was mislead when purchasing this product since when I googled replacement battery chargers for my Canon PowerShot SD1100 IS Digital Elph, this site came up as having a compatible charger. However, when it arrived it WAS NOT COMPATIBLE!!! It cost me the postage both ways and a huge waste of time. This vendor should be more specific in advertising!! I got ripped off on this deal!!
This is the first time I buy a product from this provider and I will never do it again, they sold me a charger without a box and that looks kind of used, when I try to charge my batteries they never did it. After a couple tries I went to a local dealer and got a brand new that made a great job in a couple hours.
This was a Christmas present for my son. I am in complete agreement with the other reviewers. It seemed like a great starter camera for my son and the price was right. But it is completely useless*********** Save your money!!!I followed the instruction on the software CD provided (more than once). It seemed very simple but when I open the Dual Camera software, it will show me the pictures in the camera, but then locks up. The program becomes unresponsive. I have been working with this for hours and am completely frustated. If any one has been able to find a way to get the pictures downloaded please help!!!!!!!!!!!
Now my daughter will not stop aggravating me because we cannot download the pictures off of the dran thing and wants a new camera, so now, I have not only wasted my money, but I have to buy her a more expensive camera that will work that she will break or lose.Thanks so much Vivitar!
I wish I could rate this camera -9999999999999999999999999999999. Actually what I really wish is to mound all of the Vivitar Vivicam 55 cameras up in a pile and BURN THEM. Anyway, I found this camera at Walmart thinking it should be good for the $20 price tag they were asking. When I first opened this wannabe camera I noticed the buttons were very cheap. More than half the pictures taken were either blurry and/or yellowed. Don't bother trying to create a video with this thing unless you like a still frame video. I brought it back after I did some research and found the Logitech C310 Webcam for several dollars more here on Amazon(which has HD!). This is the worst camera i have EVER used. Live and learn, and never buy anything made by Vivitar. Shop around and spend a few extra dollars for a better camera. If not, you get what you pay for.
Amazon.com sent the wrong size engine oil cooler than what I ordered. Rather than sending it back I made due but it didn't work out like I wanted it to because the cooler was wider than what I originally ordered.
This must be the worst rendering of a live concert I have ever seen. I saw The Velvet Rope in concert and absolutely loved it! This DVD however is a disgrace to Miss Janets talents. The sound is awful and the editing even worse. All the dance numbers have been slaughtered in the editing room and there is no way to see the great choreography. If you like 120 minutes of Janet close up then this DVD is for you. Otherwise we can only hope somebody makes a re-edit and remix version so the world can finally see a worthwile version of the concert. What a shame, what a waste.
Camera work and dance numbers were all greatBUTAudio is terrible! Not sure which bonehead was in charge of mixing the DTS but there is no bass, no surround effect, no presence. I've tried it with $5K+ home theater setups and this disc makes the system sound as if they were $3 computer speakers. I had the same issues with the earlier release, with the hopes that the DTS was done properly. No such luck!!Way to go Eagle Rock
This DVD could not be played all the way through. I tried skipping past the "bad part" but no dice...it simply would not play. I was really looking forward to this video and will not buy from this seller again. The only good thing was that my money was returned (less the handling fee!) Feel like I was penalized for using this seller.
This DVD will not load in your player. You will get a message, "this cannot be played, not a compatible format". Hopefully Amazon.com will allow me to return this DVD. This was a bad purchase for me.
I didn't really like it. The best part of the show to me was the intro.She seemed to never change that boring outfit. She was way too thin, and her outfits should've been tailor made as they were drooping off of her. She appeared darker, and her hair was way too long and in the way.I do see some Madonna in here, but I don't know who's copying who because they both came out around the same time. But I guess Madonna beat her to the over the top concert extravaganza's.I also saw some of the same moves that Michael did.Her most recent tour seems better than this.
Ok, call me ignorant!The only reason I bought this book is because I've heard of it before and I'm trying to read some classics.Who knew it was a play? Not me!A little hard to understand, but after I got past the introduction, I quite enjoyed the play itself. It was very funny.Not sure if you like this kind of thing, but it was just ok for me.
I found Man of La Mancha to be quite confussing. The plot is so crazy that it is hard to get a grasp on what is happening until halfway through the book. One you do figure it out, it is rather humerous, but not one of my favorites by any means.
Broke the very first time I pulled the handle. Very dissappointed, was going to give as a Christmas present. Made very cheaply, only good point was that it arrived on time.
Good basic book on modding. The pictures are of good enough quality to make the verbage much clearer. More details on opperating systems with the Xbox would have been helpfull. One still needs the internet and a good knowledge of where to go in order to find the rest of the puzzle.
You may think you are cool because you took the case off of your X-Box and (wow) followed a 6 step process to install your loser chip.But really you're just a cheater.Why are you playing?If you want to win games consider practice.It is a game.Once you start cheating now it's just a joke.Modding for the purpose of unlocking the xbox's media center functionality is one thing - that's fair use in my opinion, but modding to boost your rank is immature and ascinine.Why do you care what your rank is if you have such low regard for the game itself????
The cushions fell apart- split in half and does not stay on your feet. Do not buy- very poor product.
i received a damaged product I can not return because actually I Live abroad in Central America so is too expensive sentd this item for this reason I prefered waste this shoulder harness.
i love this movie, but when i watched this dvd version of it, i thought for a moment that my tv was playing up.the sound and image are dreadfull !!!! adjusting sound and vision on tv doesn't help either, i prefer copying a video tape on dvd myself.that's not all, nowadays we expect a dvd to come with trailers, documentarys etc.. you know some extras to enjoy the whole surrounding that made the movie. here: NOTHING ! nothing at allcompare this with dvd of "mildred pierce" or "straight jacket"they come with FAB extras.this dvd version is done with no effort at all.
The movie is a masterpiece of noir with performances that are superb. However, the grainy gooey VHS-like picture quality can only be attributed to a very poor and shoddy transfer by KINO.
Disappointed in the viewer comment on poor quality transfer from VHS to DVD which has discouraged me from completing my contemplated purchase of the DVD. Will keep looking elsewhere for a quality transfer.Am also stymied in not being able to find a CC version. I show these wonderful old film noirs to my 92 year old Dad who is deaf; without CC, it's impossible...
I'm a white female who is married to a black man. I'm outraged that she does not agree with interracial marriages. She talks about living in AmeriKKA, but it is her as well who promotes racist views. How are we to live as a nation if people can't be friends/lovers just because of their colour. Obviously we haven't progressed as a nation if we can't accomplish that.
I got about halfway through this idiotic (and extremely poorly written) tripe. Whine, whine, whine. Take some responsibility for yourself. Bigoted, empty, hateful nonsense from a vacuous, race-baiting hack suffering a dearth of originality, an abundance of misguided vitriol, and an excess of hand-wringing and pouting disguised as legitimate literature.
More nonsense about the typical knee jerk, finger pointing, resentment that takes all focus off personal responsibility. Grow up.
You talk about bigots! We have adopted 3 black children, 'tho we already have 5 biological. We are so darn happy that we have saved our 3 from the horable, unetical, imoral life that is epicted in this book. If that is how Sister has lived her life, we see absolutely no reason why she would brag about it. Also, while white students are worrying about their student loans, and wondering how in the world they will ever be able to pay them back, little or nothing was said about the African-American students concerns about their pay-back. Oh, yes, I forgot "We Owe You"(?) Great that Sister Souljah is trying to help her "brothers" and "sisters", but maybe she should start with teaching them some morals, and maybe cleaning up her act while she is at it. Sister is a talanted writer. We hope that someday she will find something more uplifting to write about.
I read "No Disrespect after reading "The Coldest Winter Ever", and finding that work of fiction riveting, and well -told. I found "No Disrespect" a non-fiction work that is told with the caveat - I will tell the truth, and the names are changed only to protect the innocent", to be poorly told, hard to believe, and self serving. Yes, I do believe it is possible to have morals and values as SS describes herself to have in this work, but the stories she writes, rather than honest, smack of someone that is holding back, or more to the point someone tailoring the story to conclude in an ending that is suitable to them. I don't mean any disrepect, but I don't buy it was the prevailing thought as I read her story.
Firstly, I find it startling that Vintage would deign to publish something so poorly written. The semi-literacy of this prose (I'm being generous) does, if nothing else, suggest that Miss Souljah didn't use a ghost writer. The words, in all their ghettofied glory, are hers. Booker T. Washington would have wept. While I can appreciate to some extent this woman's pathological disgust of whites, I cannot understand the roots of her homophobia or anti-Semitism. Her easy-way-out philosophy (Everybody's to Blame Except Me) is the very thing that keeps her where she is.
We received our comforter, and it was not the dimensions advertised. We contacted the seller(Egyptian Cotton Factory Outlet Store) and the claimed manufacturer (Warm Things). The manufacturer responded quickly to tell us that this seller does not have access to their products. The seller has copied the language from the manufacturer's website and is selling fraudulent products in their name. If you care about the quality or dimensions of the comforter you're buying, don't buy from them.
It was first FW album I've listened to. And I'm afraid I'll never buy their CDs again. I don't want to waste my money. Well, I've heard FW is one of the prog metal monsters. Perhaps... Dream Theatre, for instance, doesn't have any such a pale album. This album has just some elements of progressive. If I have not heard it's prog rock group I'd never supposed it's progressive. Ok, the CD now is in used CD department and I hope I'll return some money.
Here is a recent example of this author's online reasoning, which he proposes others should be governed by in a free republic:"Let us assume that two planets which have not yet been inhabited by humans are to be colonized by them; on Planet Alpha, heterosexual couples only are assigned; on Planet Beta, only homosexual couples. In one hundred years, will both islands be populated assuming that reproductive technologies are not available to either group? I suggest that Planet Alpha will be; but Planet Beta will not. Why? The basic answer is to be found in the biological complementarity of the heterosexual couple necessary for procreation that is absent in same-sex couple. This is a scientific argument..."As I suspected, Natural Law theorists are about as serious as Trekkies
This video was dull and did not provide any information that I didn't already read in the books that I checked out from the public library for free. I'm fairly disappointed with my purchase and I feel that my money could have been better spent. I find the video rather pricey, but gave it a try because of a very enthusiastic recommendation from a friend. Needless to say, if you are the type of person who must have audio and visual to learn, steer clear of this and find an instructional video that's more concise. If you can learn through just reading, I highly suggest you just check out some books for free and save yourself some money. If you like long winded stories and have too much free time on your hands, this might be the video for you.
Turns out Sheri is the most annoying person ever. And, she really must hate women in labor, judging by the way she makes fun of them and mimics them with a whiney, high-pitched baby voice. Throughout the whole "pushing" section she talks about how much you will whine, and if you don't, just wait because you must not really be in labor yet. She goes on and on about how horrific the pain will be, but them she tries to talk you out of an epidural!! If she was my L&D nurse, I would cross my legs until the next shift change.
Don't waste your money. If she had been my instructor I would have asked for my money back
There's not much learning either. Sheri is incredibly condescending when she mimicks pregnant women. This video could also really use some visual aids besides Sheri holding up a poor illustration, writing lists (that she doesn't finish) on a whiteboard and the worst...her on the ground, legs spread in high-waisted khakis demonstrating childbirth.
This video/DVD does not thoroughly explore all the elements of Lamaze preparation. The cover reminds me of Wilson from Castaway...he didn't know much about childbirth either.If you want to pay for only ~10 or so minutes of good information, spend your money. There are other products out there on the market that have a much greater wealth of knowledge.
I was hoping to have a condensed, to-the-point, informative guide on giving birth. I had missed my window of opportunity to be in a class and decided I preferred to be able to watch a video from home anyway. I feel that a lot of time is wasted in this video with theatrics and cheesy humor. I ended up fast forwarding through a lot of it only to realize she was still desperately trying for laughs 5 minutes in to one point.I am probably going to purchase another video simply for the fact that her style irks me!
I'm sure this woman has lots of valuable info to impart, but we could barely watch this DVD. Sheri Bayles is sooo annoying and unfunny that we fast forwarded through the whole thing, trying to cling on to pieces of important information. Even the people taking the class seem embarassed for her. Avoid this DVD unless you think you can look past a nurse who thinks she's a stand up comedian. I wish I had another to suggest.
Thank goodness I borrowed this from the public library and didn't waste my money. My husband and I did attend live classes, but wanted a refresher before the big event. While the information is consistent with what we've learned from other professionals - the presenter is terribly annoying. Although we wanted the information, the jokes were so unbearable we had to stop watching. If you can deal with the presenter's sense of humor, you'll benefit from the information - good luck!
It seems to attempt to reach out, but overall remains a small personal account of the trials and tribulations of an $8 billion/year industry. Just not professional enough for me to get my undivided attention. It was a worthy attempt, though.
First of all, the information in the DVD is very informative but for $50 buck I figured it would show something more than a lady standing in front of a black curtain holding up the same anatomy pictures that are on my doctors wall. I love how she simulates labor by pushing a doll out of a wool hat....It was so realistic. I sat there thinking,'are you kidding me?' Sheri, the instructor, knows what she is talking about but is extremely annoying and shares a lengthy personal story for every point. For every 10 min of information, you get 20 minutes of insight into her personal life. I would pull my hair out and ask for general anestesia if she was my labor nurse.
Do not buy this dvd! if you are curious check it out at the library.... she spends the 1st half an hour talking about how big babies and small pelvis are to blame for most of the problems in labor...... SO UNTRUE!!! I am a trained Doula and we should never blame babies or women's bodies for unexpected outcomes in labor. Birth is Normal.... Birth is Natural..... Babies and Women's bodies know what to do and CAN GIVE BIRTH. Interventions are sometimes needed, but this woman does not inspire confidence..... but fear! Look elsewhere for your information and make sure to read Ina mAY gASKIN'S GUIDE TO CHILDBIRTH!
Incredibly inefficient information delivery. My wife and I tried desperately to watch it but just could not stomach it despite occasional useful bits. Incessant terrible affected attempts at humor and impersonations. Very old video. Pure torture.
I will give her I did learn something while I wasn't being insulted by her gurgle giberish bad jokes. After weeding through, rolling my eyes and totally annoyed by this person, I did find out something. There was NO LAUGHING though. I found her unsympathetic unattached to the really beautiful thing that will be happening when I give birth. Just when I wasn't scared anymore after reading Ina Mae's guide to Childbirth, this woman made me feel aweful about the impending doom that awaits me. I am saposed to be scared and my husband an unhelpful weenie who can't deal, how can this women do this to the world when we've come so far. Unrelaxing and totally neurotic!! A huge waste of money and time. Don't buy it, I wish I hadn't. Really.
me and my wife are both professionals. We bought this DVD for convenience over attending classes.The information provided in the DVD is helpful. However we found it is very repetitive, lot of time is wasted. The material could be easily covered in an hour at the most 75 mins.I would not recommend this DVD.
i was very excited when I saw the ad. I planned to buy a few of macro lenses, but ...the macro lens works only for the 1/4 inch distance :-(I cannot scan a business card or an article in a newspaper, but only a few charactersI really need a macro lens but for a few inches distance
This blu ray is horrible!!!The quality video is terrible!! is better an old whs!!!
I couldn't get through the first ten minutes because the quality was as if it was a DVD from the dollar store. The quality of this Blu-ray makes VHS look fabulous. I even wrote a letter to the company and got no response. I buy lots of Blu-rays and DVD's and I will NEVER buy one from this company again.
While Troma treated this well regarded latter day Argento film reasonably well with its DVD release, and its initial $14.98 VHS release, anyone who is a fan of this talented director's visual virtuosity and deft use of color, camerawork, and scene composition should be aware that this new, reduced-price VHS version of The Stendhal Syndrome is in the inferior *EP* speed mode. I have yet to ever see an EP release of a film on video that did not have considerable video noise and very poor color quality. Since the original, more expensive SP version of the tape appears to be in the process of being phased out by the less than artistic-oriented Troma, this is very unfortunate.Please, Troma, give us VHS buyers back a decent quality SP version of this film.And please, Amazon, do include a note in the technical information section when you do carry a VHS tape in EP mode.
I wish I had read the negative and accurate reviews of the terrible quality of the blu-ray before I bought a copy. Apart from the Dirty Dozen blu-ray, this is the worst I have seen. I have not seen the DVD, but I can't imagine it is any worse than this blu-ray.
Great idea--strange reactions to art--is tossed aside and scene after scene is set up yet goes nowhere. (Why does she return home? Why does she have to be a cop? She never shows up at the station!) Poorly edited with transitions so bad, title cards were added so you know where you are -- Rome, etc. Interesting conclusion, yet really, it's a mess so skip it.
Previous review is right. Horrible! Nothing else to say about this blu-ray transfert.I cannot even write anything about the movie itself: I have not seen it! Yes after 10 minutes I could not stand such a bad transfert anymore and I stopped watching it!!
The Stendhal Syndrome is an effective, stylish thriller from horror maestro Dario Argento. The film alone would rate at least 4 (out of 5 stars) but the Troma DVD is pretty appalling. The audio is hissy and the volume low and the picture is incorrectly letterboxed and riddled with digital artifacts. If the DVD weren't bad enough it's made even worse by having a horrible, embarrassing introduction and foolish, faux interviews with Troma president Lloyd Kaufman. A good film is severely cheapened by a poor presentation. A big, fat ZERO for the disc. Hopefully, Blue Undergroud or Anchor Bay or Mondo Macabro will be able to obtain the rights soon and do this film justice.
I really wanted to play the bingo game, however, the CD's did not play. I tried to play other games, to no avail.
I bought this book, because I thought I will get some new insights on the big money lotteries, but I do not think there is anything of value there. I have the older book of Gail Howard; used to play Fantasy 5; 2 of 5 and 3 of 5 are the highest prizes I have ever won. Do not get caught by the hype: This book won't tell you how to win the big money lotteries - in fact, all that Gail Howard says is that it's very difficult to predict the Powerball ball, and the Powerball ball cannot be wheeled anyway. Guess I shouldn't have spent my money to learn that... The book is no different from her previous book, Lotto Wheel Five to Win. Well, the new one has some shorter wheels than the previous one (that is why I give two stars), but if you are into wheeling, you will be able to find them elsewhere. The book has a very long section (some 20+ pages) of ads about Howard's other books and software. Hey, you pay for that too! You'd be better off spending your $$ on a couple of extra tickets...
This is nothing new from Gail Howard, or at all. These wheeling systems can be worked out mathematically, without paying for this book. There are also lots of websites that offer number generators and wheeling system explanations for free. If you want it all spelled out for you then buy this book, but if you are willing to do a little mathematical work check out lottery information website like [...].
I found her concept very, VERY good, BUT, unless you're really flush and can afford to spend a great deal of money for a LOT of number combinations per game, it certainly doesn't increase your odds much. Now... there ARE folks who can afford, and DO buy, many ticket combinations per game... so for THEM this may be helpful; however, for the average person who buys only a few number combinations each game, this is a waste of time. Sorry Gail :o( !!
Waste Of Time & Money... I found that if you want to win big, just put the money into a savings account & watch your money grow! Pay YOURSELF not this author.
this book have almost the same information as the lottery master guide if you are a first time player or pro player master guide is the best. every other books out there is just waste of your money.
Winning is pure luck. There is no amount of strategy unless you are already rich. And believe it or not rich people play too. They can buy 100 tickets week. I cannot. But in reality it only takes ONE set of numbers to win anyway.Gail conviently leaves out this one very fact. 71% of winners are quick picks. The rest here and there over the years have been their own numbers. You cannot predict the powerball.The book has good ideas but how many people have won by using some kind of random system? I doubt any. It is all luck, pure and simple.
The actual model of this meter is the i410, I am unsure where the number 617727 is relevant as Fluke doesn't identify it with this number. I suspect this is a component of some kit, which is defunct and therefore the reason for the strange model number. There are a few vendors that list this part number, but I also suspect this is a single-sourced inventory item. A lot of speculations, but what else are we supposed to do?[...]After one review that states the inaccuracy, AMAZON should have this rectified.There is not a valid excuse to keep a listing that is know to be inaccurate.That being said, the i410 is an excellent instrument.AMAZON is usually fair about inaccuracies when it comes to returns. If someone purchased this and did not return it, maybe AMAZON did not look at the listing.I suggest those looking for a current probe visit the link in this review and proceed from there. The review is for the improper listing.
I bought this clamp and it turns out I need digital multimeter to operate it. I do not understand DMMs means before . After i received it and read the intruction then I understood. I wished that the ad could be more clearer. I have not returned it yet because it cost money to send it back.Any suggestion ? Mean a while I already bought another fluke amp meter that does not need another digital meter to operate it.
The Fluke current clamp works properly but the Amazon website listed the device as having 1000amp capacity. Actual specification is only 400 amps. Since I'm monitoring an 800 amp, AC service it's not too helpful. Please fix the website. Product description as of 05/06/12 says 1000amp AC/DC.In the technical details it would be very, very helpful if you would attach pdf's of the manuals and spec sheets.
It's $39.00 on the apple website, there is free shipping as well, so why buy it on amazon? I came here looking for a deal and was disappointed.
Why does everyone rave about this? One of the reviews even says, "If you need this then get it." Yeah, if you're travelling you need this, but more importantly why can't Apple just sell the different adapaters individually? Apple must assume that a lot of people have more than one of their products - perhaps a macbook and an ipod, so wouldn't it make more sense to sell the adapters individually, that way one could buy for example two European adapaters, one for ipod and one for macbook? Another apple rip-off if you ask me.
Almond sings off-key, but that is a longstanding trademark , and, oddly, creates a weird appeal regarding his singing style. The songs however are a combination of irritating and boring, with the notable exception of his duet with Antony Hegarty of Antony and the Johnsons. Their mutual effort is a winner and, if unavailable on other discs, makes this disc worth having.
If you need a grammar reference, this may well serve until you find a better one. It might be of greater utility if the tone wasn't vaguely condescending and pedantic, and it eschews the panoply of actual examples in favor of definitions. To wit: the 2nd person singular present perfect conjugation of "to love" results in "If you have been loved..." gives me one (singular) example but not the rationale of when to use this. The density of the text preceding the example conjugations will require your own self-study to master (if you must) the ability to spin off a subjunctive 3rd person plural present tense conjugation.The best recommendation I can offer for this is as a companion for language learners who need a quick reference for English analogs of other-language conjugations, such as when you try to conjugate "falar" and need to know which one to use.--#
If you REALLY want to write correct, you won't write "correctly." Yes, it's in common use but it is, by the rules of grammar, incorrect. It's an overcorrection, an unnecessary addition. Here's a simple rule of thumb: Substitute the word "fast" where you're thinking of adding an -ly. Would you say "How to Speak and Write Fastly?" No. Same part of speech, but it somehow escaped that stupid -ly trap.
This book should have been written more as a novel than a how to. This book goes into story like dimensions and there are others better written on the subject.
If you know it all already, this is a good book for you to buy. If you are looking for grammar instruction, look elsewhere. This little book was written 75 years ago and it has things worth thinking about, but it is not a grammar book, or a book on speaking, or a book on writing. I just bought it and am delighted to rummage about in it. It's a GEM. It's worth the money by a mile and a half. I gave it two stars only to not be lost in the shuffle. Buyers often don't look at 50 rave shill reviews but they'll look to see who doesn't like and why. So maybe I caught some readers. This is a good buy IF you KNOW IT ALL. It's not instruction, it's food for thought.
Great book if you want to read the self-indulgent ramblings of delusional, holier-than-thou person with an 80 at best IQ. NOT recommended.
If you like early Mark Harmon, then it is worth the time. Otherwise, it is a made for TV style situation comedy. There are some embarrassing moments and a heart-warming ending.
I love this novel and ordered it for my mom. The price was high enough [exorbitant] for a paperbound book that I thought that the novel would be complete. The product description says NOTHING about it being one volume of a complex work. It is one volume, not the complete work, I was embarrassed to discover from my mom. Where is the rest of the work? NOT AVAILABLE? Available for an additional [exorbitant] sum? If it had been an order for myself, I would return, but my mom is 3,000 miles away and I do not want to add insult to injury by asking her to pack and return ship, so injustice has been rewarded.
Ok.. I Love the story.. it is a beautiful romance .. I read it on-line and I wanted my own copy for that cold rainy night get-away. when It arrived I couldn't wait to open it. just to touch the words.. and then Put it in my bookshelf for a perfect night.... WHAT A SHOCK when I opened it to see the POOR PRINTING JOB ... on some of the pages even the lines are askew. black blotches around the words in some cases. and choppy letters not even fully formed on others... WHAT A VAST DISSAPOINTMENT. SHAME ON AMAZON!
Nice in theory, but doesn't really do the trick. We thought the longer shaft and small profile would make it easy to hold it in the right spot during intercourse to give me the extra zing necessary. The problem is, the surface is difficult to press up against the right spot. If the paddle had a nub on it or it was convex would make it a lot better.I was also disappointed in the speed/strength. In order to turn it on, you have to twist the base. The problem is, it goes from zero to full strength. No gradual increase. The strength is a little much to start off, and usually not enough after a short while. It would be nice if the power were adjustable.Positive: Very easy to clean - waterproof - inexpensive - slender design makes it easy to bring with you anywhere.
The most uncomfortable, overpriced piece of foam on the market. Also beware that there is a 10 day return policy on this piece of junk.
I was very unhappy with the number of typographical errors not only in this book but in all of the books in the series. The story continues to be a favorite of mine, but the errors decreased my ability to totally enjoy the digital copy. In some places I am not sure I would have known what the word was if I were not familiar with the books already. It has made me a bit cautious about buying other digital books. I was looking forward to building my digital library and clearing out some space by getting rid of hardcopies. Now I am not sure I will.
I found Sandra Burr choppy and irritating to listen to. Her voice was not what I expected. There is another version of this book narrated by another woman whose voice is smooth, and can put you to bed. Yet she tells the tale with enough excitement and with different tones for each character that you are compelled to listen ALL DAY!The plot is wonderful, though if you want to listen instead of read, I don't reccomend the Sandra Burr narration. I reccomend the one read by Rowena Cooper. AMAZING!
The basic premise for this book seems like a great idea for historical (or pre-historical?) fiction. However, it failed to deliver. The entire storyline was so predictable and hackneyed I had to force myself to finish the book. The characters are all one-dimensional and stiff and Auel never really succeeds in bringing them to life. And come on, who really didn't see the ending or the rape scene coming? Auel was obviously trying to create a novel centered around a strong central female character, but she just succeeded in making Ayla looking like an untouchable annoying kid with all the answers. Also, the Neanderthal "mind meld" is one of the most ridiculous things I've ever read. The only reason I give it two stars is because I like the fact that it has a prehistoric setting.
I read this book 3-4 years ago. It's still makes me highly agitated every time I think about it. You just feel bad for the main character through most of the book and there is no redemption at the end. It has the worst ending ever! It still pisses me off that I spent the time reading it. There isn't really much of a story, just a lot of details and weird issues. There are too many tangents and the protagonist is the only character with ANY sort of common sense. ASIDE: DO NOT READ IF YOU ARE SENSITIVE TO RAPE! That should be on the back cover or in a disclaimer somewhere. Not Recommended.
I'm a reader. I am not a writer, but if I had the writing skills of Jean Auel, my review of Clan of the Cave Bear might look like this:"I eagerly awaited the rare opportunity to read the famous book by Jean Auel. As I anxiously read the exciting words on the white pages, I was constantly distracted by the desparate use of poorly-chosen adjectives. After reading two large paragraphs, I could easily tell that the large book was poorly written by a hopelessly unskilled amature."Jean Auel had some great ideas for a story, but does not have the skills to tell it. The story might be interesting and well researched, but it is difficult to get past her awful prose which does nothing to paint a picture of a prehistoric time, and her amature use of adjectives is forever distracting from the story she's trying to tell.Please read the sample pages before buying this book. This is not a book for anyone who enjoys good writing.
I wouldn't have stuck with this improbably (even for fantasy) tale much beyond the parts where Ayla: 1) invents shampoo and 2)discovers fire, but I was in that proverbial "desert island" situation (it happens!). I guess you have to be into sci fi set in the stone age.
The premise of this story is interesting and the story is good; it's too bad it's so poorly executed. The prose is blocky and reads like a pre-history textbook with characters and plot slapped on as an afterthought. In general there is just too much time spent on detail, like the author needed to make several length-reducing rewrites. For example she spends quite a bit of time describing how the women in the Clan are treated as property, which is so cliched it doesn't need more than a passing mention. She spends a lot of time talking about side characters who are too under-developed as characters to tell apart. The detail about the pre-historical fauna and lifestyle are told in long paragraphs that bring the story to a screeching halt, rather than being woven into the narrative in a way that's still entertaining. However with a lot of skimming the book did keep me reading until the end.
This book was interesting with great promise. The premise was fascinating but the writer fought with herself throughout. She spent a great deal of time on the flora and the fauna. There was always a paragraph on a bush when a sentence would do, a sentence on a tree when a word would suffice. The characters were well developed. Over all it was a good read.
If there were bodices to rip in the stone age they would be ripping furiously in this book and in its successors.Most ridiculous thing about this series is how Ayla makes every earth-shattering discovery of this time, e.g., discovering the wheel, horseback riding, flint knives, etc., etc.
One of the worst novels I have ever read. Well researched - maybe, poorly written - definately. The plot simply goes nowhere, and the characters are so unrealistic and banal that it is impossible to feel sympathetic toward them. Why the author felt she had to abandon any attempt at subtlety, and write as if the readers were as ignorant as her characters seem to be is beyond me.
Don't bother wasting your money. This book is slow and goes nowhere fast. I could not even finish the book.
I'm so sorry to be such a spoilsport, but I found this is a terrible book and a worse series. Leaving aside all the wild inaccuracies - one of the main ones being Auel's portrayal of Neandertals as doltish brutes -the heroine is constantly making one earthshaking discovery after another - shampoo, domestication of animals, law of genetics, sex=pregnancy, and, last but not least, tampax. No one else can figure anything out, but there she is, churning out one Nobel-Laureate discovery after another. I'm sure in one of the later books she will be found making a short-wave radio out of a large rock. It became really maddening.
The kindle editions of these books are chock full of typographical errors that sometimes make it difficult to figure out what should have been written. The typos made me feel like I'd been gyped on the price of the books.
Extremely well-written, good plot, characters and Mrs. Auel has done some research. Now here's the bad part. It is anthropologically inaccurate. Mrs. Auel does a beautifully stereotyped depiction of the Neanderthals as stooped, muzzle-jawed, intellectually inferior creatures as compared to wonderful Cro-Magnon people with their tall erect graceful carriage, blue eyes and blond hair. I mentioned this book to my anthropology professor and he said, very succintly, "Burn it!&quot
lets see, young blue eyed, pretty and in every way superior CroMagnon Ayla manages to transcend her brutish, Neanderthal counterparts and invent fire, discover the cause of pregnancy, invent the wheel, and all with some magical process of thought that the author just bestows upon her.Silly, fatuous and and a literay hash.
This is a feminist parable with the Neaderthals (almost all the Neanderthal characters are men) representing the male oppressors of the intellectually and emotionally more evolved female represented by the Cro-Magnon, Ayla. I giggled every time one of the Neaderthal characters "made the sign" indicating the command for sexual favors, picturing the short rhythmic fist pumping motion sometimes used by modern males to allude to intercourse. Two stars - one for the sometimes interesting anthropological details - one for the laughs.
I really wanted to like this book. After a good friend suggested it I decided to give it a go. Big mistake. This book put me to sleep, literally. The description of the land and plant life goes on forever. Takes way to long to get to the plot and it's just not worth the time.
The blue portion of the mats was a different blue. It looked more like a navy blue which I found very disappointing because that's like having a pair of bootleg mats.
Matt on driver side slides forward and I have not found a way to anchor it. It would be better if the Broncos had gone to the Super Bowl in 2013. The "Prayer in thin Air" did them in or was it "The kneel down in D Town?"
I bought this backpack when I wanted to have a new bag for my laptop. I got a good JanSport Backpack for my niece a few month ago and she liked that one, so I chose JanSport again. It's out of question that JanSport is generally a good brand.But this particular backpack is really poorly made. The texture is made by some cheap materials, and definitely looks not as good as the picture shown on the website. There are not many compartments in the bag with poor paddings, and the space is not as big as that was described at all. Nevertheless, the laptop sleeve is too wide for my 15' widescreen notebook. So I bought another backpack of Swissgear this weekend when I saw it on sale with only one third price of this JanSport. And the quality of my new bag is Much Much Much BETTER than this one.Don't buy this backpack!
I own this album in the original vinyl and a earlier CD release. I am always a sucker for a remaster, so decided what the heck. I chose poorly - the remixes just don't sound right. For all I know, this 2006 version was the original intent, I hope not.
I had to read this book for a Business course. Larsson meanders through the chapters, dropping and picking up points like a stream-of-concience dictation. While his Pro-globalization points are good, he disregards the arguments against globalization as if they are irrelevant. The point of the book could be made in about half the pages, especially if Larsson would leave politial bashing out.If you want to explore the issues of globalization to make your own decision on whether you agree with it or not, choose something else, or supplement this book heavily. It's a little boring, but may be useful once you have the background on globalization.If you have a background in business, don't waste your time with this book. The arguments are based almost soley on Macro and Microeconomics 101 priciples.If you are looking for fuel to support your Free-Trade fire, this book will provide you with many supportive case studies. You have my blessing to read this book.
A series of short vignettes about fencing, none detailed enough to impart and real knowledge. A definite lack of technical instruction on fencing. Not sure who this video would be useful for...certainly not a beginner trying to learn about the technical aspects of the sport.
and what is with the foot?Usually a preview should (as far as I know) show a good example that will motivate people to watch moreof it and this just isn't it...I haven't viewed the video or part you can download as yet but if this picture is an example of what it contains I am not too inclined to view more of it...what are these two fencers doing?is the one on the right attacking with a foot in the air,next arm and point way off target or are they retreating ?and if so what the .. are they doing? Balance?!?and the fencer on the left - are they attacking? bent arm? what is with the front foot?ok so maybe need to download it and view it but I have enough faults in my technique without viewing this....sorry was just looking up fencing on amazon and found this video download...sighand if you are wondering I have over 20 years of fencing - all three weapons and I like to think (some... may disagree...lol) that I am an ok fencer...
I ordered:4 - Revlon Age Defying Makeup - Color 05 - Soft BeigeThey sent:3 - Revlon Age Defying Makeup - Color 05 - Soft Beige -- (Note: See Color inconsistency note below)1 - Almay Liquid Makeup (which I did not order)Each of the 3 Revlon bottles was labeled as "05 Soft Beige" but visually looking at the makeup through the glass bottles, side by side, the actual color was markedly inconsistent.Out of the 4 bottles which I ordered, and paid for, only 1 was usable.Due to their lack of accuracy on the order fulfillment and the lack of quality control of the product, I will not order from them again.
I am a very young looking 61 years old woman. I don't wear foundation on regular basis, but sometimes I like to look extra nice. Revlon's age defiying foundation doesn't fit it's name. It looks good when you put it on, but after wearing it few hours, it magnifies every line on my face..actually I see some I never seen before. Honestly, if this is what make up foundation will do, I'll be much more content without it. Show me one that doesn't do it, and I'll become a believer... But surely, to call it age defying, it is simply not true!
Bought this for my wife on a recommendation from a friend, she read a few pages and quit because it was too sad. I told her it had a good ending but she won't try again, be prepared for tears when you read this one.
I chose this rating because I was supposed to be sent both books (combined into one) and the lost boy, but I was only sent a child called it. The book looked nothing like the picture and it was very cleared written that I was supposed to get both. I got jipped.
Ordered this for Christmas about 3 weeks before it never came before or after, never had any response, very disappointed.
I have been playing video hockey games since my Commodore 64 days and this is one very over-rated game! I thought I had bought the wrong game when I started playing. Even NHL Face-off is better than NHL 2k3. The graphics are only average and the controls are horrible. It feels like the players are skating in sand. The replays are ok but this game doesn't even have a create-a-player option. Sega should stick to football and basketball. Sorry Sega but I miss your Genesis games!
The only way to score on this game is dekes, rebounds and defelections. The gameplay stinks, the commontary stinks, DO NOT...waist your money on this game.
Wow. Fire Emblem is one horribly designed game. 75% of it is listening to the characters talk. And by talk I mean you see pictures of them on your screen with nothing but their mouths moving and eyes blinking and written below are what they have to say. It gets boring very quickly. On top of that the fighting is almost like playing chess, you move your characters around through squares on a board and you never get to actually attack any enemies. All you do is initiate the attack command and they show a little video of your targeted character hitting the enemy and maybe them hitting you back once. It's monotonous, cheap-looking, and not very fun at all. My advice to anyone considering buying this game is to rent it first. Then you can see for yourself how bad it is before wasting your money on, in my opinion, the worst gamecube game ever.
Don't waste your hard earned money on this. Instead buy the REAL thing, "Let There Be Light", by Darius Dinshah. Nothing else to say. Rip Off of Darius Dinshah's father's works!!!!!!!
What do you call the medical school student who graduates at the bottom of the class? Doctor.
I "bought" this book for Kindle. All I got when I tried to read the book was a list of numbers that didn't correspond to anything. I'm glad the book was free so I can delete this without being out anything.
If you are looking for a nonsense limerick, this is the book for you - otherwise, keep looking. I kept looking.
This has to be the dumbest book I've read. It has riddles and rhymes that totally don't make sense. I know I would rather read real poetry and literature, not this. I don't even think that small kids would like this confusing book.
The two stars refer of course not to the book but to its format. I recently acquired my first Kindle and thought I'd download some freebies to try it out. This one was quite disappointing, since the limericks it contains appear as continuous text, so are quite inconvenient to read. It's a wonderfully entertaining book to get in print form though!
There are headings for pictures, but no pictures. So half the content is missing from this edition. And, the remaining limericks are just silly.
there is no enterence video,no storylines,much lesser wrestlers so its not enjoyable playing mode, so please next time just think about this things so it can be enjoyable while playing on GBA.
I thought the dvd was concert footage and it is still shots with music. I do love this album from Motorhead though.
This is one of those books that I like the *idea* of, but not so much the execution. It's gotten to the point where if a book has the word "spooky" (or a variation) on the cover, I'm just going to assume it's not. The idea - offering ideas for six themed parties - would make for an excellent book if they were all actually Halloween-themed. Sadly, even the Halloween-specific party suggestions fall a little flat.
I read the first 3 John Carter books and wanted to see how the story progressed. Edgar Rice B. has made me bored with his style. This story is LONG on description and SHORT on plot. There is so much description that I lost track of what I was reading. I realize he wrote during the last century and people did not realize Mars was what it was. I guess I will be very embarrassed if the Mars Rover proves Edgar Rice was right!!!!!!
This album offers nothing new or exciting to the genre of metal. This is reminiscent of mediocre late 80's trash metal, with all songs sounding the same. Mid-paced tempos and simplistic solos abound, with moronic wayyyyy-out-of-date pretend-satanic lyrics and cartoony cover art. Just dumb, dumb, dumb. Want real thrash metal, aside from the Big Four? Try Coroner, Arch Enemy, Arsis, The Crown, the Haunted, Hypocrisy, and a ton of others that poop all over this album from miles above.
Pretty horrible. Like in WWE women cant wrestle.Expecially harcore wrestling.Sexxxy eddy was the best part of the whole dvd. There is no bonus matches wtf!? It says there are but there isnt its just the tournament. Do not buy! I should have listened to the review but i didnt
at first this seems like the perfect antirvirus program... cheap, uses up very minimal resources, simple to use.. lifetime subscription for free.. what could be wrong?EVERYTHING. see, the problem isn't that this program can't find viruses.. the problem is IT FINDS THEM AND DOESN'T DO ANYTHING WITH THEM. that's right, it leaves the viruses right there!! how is that useful in any way? i looked in options to make sure it cleaned or deleted viruses, but still the log report would announce to me "(this many) viruses could not be deleted or cleaned." well, thanks for nothing. i'm going to return this and get a real antivirus program.
Bought the 2005 program in the spring. I've been using this program for about 4 months, now the program prompts me to renew my subcription. I can't manually run a virus scan because the program requests that I renew my subcription. Other programs give you one year of use before renewing. I'm not certain if this product is working correctly. I'm going to use a different product instead.
If you are security minded and choose to use an e-mail client like Thunderbird or the bundled Opera e-mail client this program will NOT protect you! Not only that, but the fact that CA Anti-virus will ONLY work with MS Outlook or Outlook Express is not revealed in any documentation. I found this out the hard way when a manual scan found a virus in my Opera mail folder and couldn't clean or quarantine it! The CA tech confirmed that the AV program only works with MS e-mail clients. To me this is false advertising!!!
DONT BUY OR EVEN INSTALL A TRIAL OF THIS SOFTWARE UNTIL YOU READ THIS!!!I tried this program on a recommendation from the Microsoft web site, that should have been a warning right there. On install the etrust antivirus software (nothing else just antivirus) broke my Zone Alarm firewall, interrupted internet browsing and caused the system to hang up. I uninstalled it and have tried installing other antivirus programs since then but none of them will install; they keep popping up with guess what error message? That's right, please uninstall Etrust antivirus software, it is incompatible with our software. I've emailed Etrust and tried thier 'live' online chat and get no response. The software is evil, it looks like I will have to format my hard drive to get rid of it. I can find no related keys in the registry to clean by hand. Don't repeat my mistake!!!
I got this product in April and exactly two months later it said my subscription had expired and I needed to renew in order to keep receiving updates for antivirus protection.I wrote to the company and a week later they sent me a reply. The reply was to go to their update center and to renew. I sure wasn't going to pay again for something I only had for two months and its suppose to last for a year.I'll be going back to my trusted Norton Antivirus, it may be slow but at least I only have to buy it once a year.
Once my year-long subscription expired, I have been unable to uninstall CA ETrust. It now pops up a nag window about every 20 minutes, and when you click exit, it pops up a browser window and takes you to CA's web page. I have tried uninstalling many different ways to no avail. This has been going on for months and makes my computer painful to use.My attempts to reach support are futile. Their support page doesn't work in my browser (IE 6.0) and the phone line is pay (which I will probably end up paying).This is much worse than a virus. At least with a virus I can go buy Norton and clean things up.
First of all, don't even bother mentioning Sixty Watt Shaman in the same sentence as Alice and Chains and Soundgarden. Cantrell has more talent in his pinky than Sixty Watt has all together. If you want to check out real Stoner Rock, Kyuss and Queens of The Stone Age are a good start. This album is mediocre at best. Red Colony seems to be the only song I could really get into. Cool album cover though! Maryland must have a really lame Stoner Rock scene, because out here in CA, Sixty Watt Shaman would go unnoticed.
One of my 4 Neoprene seat covers got ripped by a vacuum cleaner after just 1 year, something that should not happen to begin with. But Coverking customer service is not helping and would not sell just the replacement seat cover, has to sell 2 at a time, at full retail. Beware of their durability and quality control, and definitely beware of the customer service, or lack thereof.
After adjusting the leg pieces for several days (wearing socks & boots)and then even replacing these with foam rolls I still cannot prevent the ankle strain when using this product, even at a 45degree incline. I know somebody else who has one and they like it so I guess it depends on the person, I am not heavy for my size and never thought this would be an issue.
Did not work with my Palm T|C right away.I've not used this for any other purpose. I expect either Palm or SD to release proper software to have it work with Palm T|C.
Do not order this item and expect to get what you see. I ordered the Super High Speed card (RPSDH01GU1A) and what I got was a low quality High Speed card (RPSDK01GU1A). Seems to be some kind of a scam that Ritz is running with Amazon's blessing. Buyer beware. This has happened to me before when you order from one of Amazon's partners, and Amazon will do nothing to help you.
I ordered Panasonic 1GB Secure Digital (SD) Card ( RPSDH01GU1A )Which is a 66x speed (10BM/s)I received RP-SDQ01G which is 33X speed (5MB/s). Ritzcamera will cheat you. You can find the part they sent me for $20 less on Amazon with free shipping.
This lunch box was actually too small and too flimsy to be used as such. My grandson puts Disney miniature cars in it, instead. Once he filled it up, the latch would barely stay closed in order to hold the contents. Basically, it's a cheap piece of metal with Disney Cars painted on it to justify its price.
I cannot believe the "discounted" price of $23, when you can buy the identical item from other suppliers on Amazon for just over $3.00 (that's right, $20 less). Search on "key float".
What little plot there is is an old one. Aliens send a rep. here to look us over. Only this one is only interested in our sex lives. Plenty of good looking babes. No acting tallent. The music bites.
A DVD of clear good photography and quite pleasant to watch but a little embarrasing in family company. Really only suitable for watching in private.
For this kind of movie your not supposed to get bord and skip through most of it. But that's what happened.Only 1 person could act. Most of the women where max 5s. The best part of the movie is the front cover.
The R rated DVD of this movie is not worth the price. It's cut to smithereens. Buy the unrated version, instead.
Big disappointment. During the simulated unsexy sex scenes the sound track changes to some awful detached music that kills the mood. The main charactor isn't even that good looking. You want "HOT STUFF"? Then check out (the unedited or Unrated versions of)Emmanuelle, Emmanuelle 2, Dessert Hearts (the hottest lesbian scene ever made), Butterflies Are Free, Tender Cousins (the french language version), Carried Away, Lured Innocence. That's the "A" list of erotica. Warning don't view more than one of these at a time, they'll melt your VCR.
Because this video in unrated and carries no warning in the information area I feel shoppers should be aware that this by all rights a soft core porn film with strong sexual content and little science fiction. I bought the VHS version from another source expecting the sort of movie "Roger Corman Presents" might sponsor, something along the lines of "Species" or Amanda & the Alien. While more in the vein of the latter the sci-fi part, {or any other technology for that matter}, is limited to a few teleportations via telekinesis and some aura/emotion melding. The movie is probably 60% by time made of sexual contact. Technically the movie is suprisingly well made for the genera. It is shot on film {not video tape}. The scenery is professionally done and the acting level reaches that of daytime soap operas. The sound quality is not bad. So the technical qualities are there to be transfered to DVD, just beware of the content.
I had the movie before, but when I saw that the collectors addition had the "Flyboys Game" I thought I would buy it off the market place. Good seller, but the DVD did not come with the game as advertised. It only came with a DEMO version of the game. They should have said that on the box. Thanks a bunch for false advertisement. Thought the other extras might make up for it, WRONG! Don't waste your time or money.
I'm an aviation buff and I'll accept a mediocre screenplay and poor character development if the flying is worthwhile. Sorry to say that this film falls short on all fronts (pun intended). The CGI flying scenes are very contrived, and are sadly inaccurate. The Fokker triplane was not introduced until 1917-not '16 as the plot suggests; the Nieuport 17 had a Gnome rotary engine which revolved around it's own crankshaft, but in closeups, the cylinders are stationary.Now the plot--can there be any more cliches in one movie? I can appreciate campy lines such as "We can't send those green kids up in those flimsy crates" when they're delivered by Errol Flynn or Basil Rathbone (The Dawn Patrol) but here the dialogue is flat and the acting is only passable at best.I was hoping that this film would be better than the reviews suggested, but it wasn't. Don't waste your time with this one.
I do enjoy historical war movies when they're done right. This cliché-ridden story is pain to watch and I fell asleep several times during the second half. The movie is ridiculously predictable, although in a few scenes the writers still managed to surprise me - the private airlift flown by the main character in order to rescue French girlfriend with kids from advancing German troops, or taking out the villainous German ace pilot during the final dogfight with revolver (after machine gun jammed/broke) are few examples of the worst writing taste. To say something positive - most acting wasn't too bad in my opinion (I've seen much worse lately), but couldn't save the flawed project. I wouldn't object the lack of historical accuracy if the story was enjoyable - but it was not. I'm giving one star in order to offset the multitude of 4-5 stars ratings; otherwise I'd give two stars. Do yourself a favor, ignore this movie and watch Blue Max again instead.
When I heard Larry Ellison the world's second richest man was involved, I had to go see this movie. Expecting great things. ORACLE sized greatness. Instead don't be fooled by the 4,5 star ratings people give this movie. What a load of rubbish! I expected an action movie - great fights - true war. Not a romance set in a very serious war. The lead actor is terrible. Sorry they cast too young an actor. It wasn't interesting. The only interesting actor was the guy with the lion. The rest I can't even remember. All I will remember from this movie was the zepplin exploding and the funeral where they mention that the guy with the lion was an atheist and that he didn't care much about religion anyway. So that is it - a true waste of money. And these second rate actors and kiddie script writers are getting rich from hype.
The computer generated flying scenes are so unreal that us real pilots can't watch this thing....You can not fly next to each other and yell back and forth between aircraft... They had hand signals for that... the story line is far from historical... I guess is Ok as a highschool date movie...
This absolutely idiotic excuse for a movie actually got enjoyable after a while, simply because my viewing companions and I began a game of "Guess Which Cliche Is Going To Be Used Next". By the time The Black Baron (whatever... ) got himself shot, a la "Raiders of the Lost Ark", the group was overcome by hysterical - albeit quite rude - comments and laughter.Haven't had that much fun since that stupid movie about the F16 pilot shot down over Bosnia.To think that such bravery, such envelope-pushing, such absolute horror has devolved into a depiction such as this.Jeez-Oh-Man, what'r they gonna do to the Battle of Britain?!?!?!?
Fair representation of what could have been a great " dog fight" movie.The movie should have been edited down to less than 2 hours withoutalot of the frivolities that occur on the ground. You could still buildenough out of the characters to make them interesting without the prolonged love story. The action in the air is decent.
I asked the clerk at the video store how they determine the number of videos to buy for rentals. She told me it is based on the box office record of the film. She had 2 Flyboys. One would have been plenty.The story was sappy. The acting just so so. The aerial sequences were much like a video game. Try "Flight Simulator". WWI biplanes hanging on their props??? Climbing 90 degrees?? Landing a biplane in shell cratered "no man's land" in the heat of battle to save a buddy who has his hand (not his arm, his legs, his torso, but just his hand) trapped under the wing of his crashed plane?? That's realism??There wasn't much believable about this film. A third of the way through the movie I fast forwarded through all scenes except the dogfights. I was hoping for something on the order of "The Blue Max". "Flyboys" stalled on climb out, went into a flat spin, and augured deep into the depths of movie flops!
Here is another example of Hollywood going wrong. The history that is implicated in the events portrayed in this movie is not all that tough to get right. Nevertheless, the film makers got a few details correct, but then added improbable special effects, far too many triplanes, annoying social lesson stereotypes, and a host of ridiculous story twists and time wasting baggage. Conceptually, the movie should have been a winner. In execution, it is a disappointment. They ruined a potentially good story. Instead of buying this movie, I would suggest the Blue Max as the aerial scenes are far better, or just propose that the would-be viewer read a history book.As a parting comment, however, I always have liked Jean Reno. He is the good part of this film.
Aircraft physics [ cgi] are horrible. Planes don't fly that way. And the German guy is of course dressed in black and he's really bad. The hero becomes obsessed with getting even, and of course does. Most video games are superior to this sillyness. Total waste....
Nice actions, but if you looking for a more authentic WWI aerial combat drama try "Der Rote Baron" instead.
Having been excited at the prospect of a gripping, historically accurate, realistic WWI film about the "Lafayette Escadrille," Flyboys is a big letdown. Devoid of historical substance, second-rate acting, predictable storyline - it shouldn't come as a big surprise that this movie was a flop at the theaters.Briefly, the CGI dogfights border on the ridiculous: aircraft in 1916 were hardly capable of the acrobatics and stunts shown throughout the film. More reminiscent of Star Wars than actual flying.Also: the portrayal of the Germans is laughable....all German pilots flying bright red, Red Baron-style, Fokker Dr.I triplanes, and led by the sinister "Black Falcon." (!) Come on!Recommended: "The Blue Max"
The plot of the movie ruins any thing they try to over come with the computer animation, and even that isn't as good as I expected.
For a fan of the old wood and fabric fighters of WWI, this film causes nothing but heartburn. The CGI effects are painfully bad, so obviously fake that it hurts to watch. And the scenes where they use actual airplanes, or recreations, are just as bad. What really bugged me was the fighters with fixed radial engines, rather than the rotaries they should have had. Forget about this film, and just read "Winged Victory" for the story by somebody who lived it. If you want to see the real airplanes fly, go to Rhinebeck, NY.
Considering the richness of the subject matter and the real life stories of those who lived it this was a truly bad movie. The makers tried to tell everything and as a result told nothing. The characters were unbelieveably superficial and too many of the flying scenes were historically inaccurate and unreal. If a few special effects are good too many are not necessarly better. The Blue Max and Battle of Britain are far far superior. For those who are willing to put up with a mess just to look at recreations of old airplanes its probably worth buying but be prepared for alot of dissapointment if you are looking for a good movie.
I usually do not review films, but in this case I feel it neccessary. I have been a World War I aviation buff for many years. When I first heard that someone was making a film about this subject I knew that I had to see it. My disappointment when I finally saw the film can hardly be imagined. It's not just that they drag in every movie cliche thats ever been used in this type of story; there is literally not a single authentic detail or presentation of such detail in this film. The airplanes are wrong, the airplane paint jobs, markings. armaments are wrong. The clothes and uniforms are wrong, even the airfield that these guys are flying out of is wrong. It appears that the film makers, instead of researching information on life as a volunteer in the french air service of that period, opted for looking at old hollywood movies on this subject. Watch this film for whatever entertainment value it may have , but not to get an idea of what World War I aerial combat was like.
This is one of those films where more emphasis was placed on the aerial dogfight sequences -- little or no thought went into the plot or acting.What a lame excuse for a movie. My biggest complaint of this movie is that it's so cliche you could cut it with a knife. The role of Texan Blaine Rawlings, who flits off at a moments notice to be with his new love, is beyond belief or plausability. The rest of the acting ensemble, other than Capt. Thenault (Jean Reno), were window dressing in this piece of movie dribble. And the dreaded German Ace was hardly more than a voyeur who wanted to savor his victory by the sight of his victim's face before they died.Lame plot, poor acting, dubious historical accuracy, wrapped around some nice dogfight sequences. What a shame, as I had hoped for better than this.Don't buy this turkey. Save your money and get "Dogfight" -- more accurate, exciting, and historically true.
I don't own this, which is surprising because I love to "discover" new acts. You want to know why I didn't buy this? I don't think they should even be allowed to sell this garbage! "When I get you all alone, I'm gonna take off all your clothes, ain't nobody gonna interupt my game." I couldn't believe that a song like that could make it onto the airwaves. I know you'll make fun of "Genie In A Bottle," but I don't care, it's innocent and cute when a girl does it. When a guy sings stuff like this, I want to throw a rock at 'em!
While this book is very good on providing scripture quotations, the commentary is dated and extremely biased. If this book were to be shared with people of non-Mormon faiths, they would become very defensive and rightly so. The author's invective toward the Catholic faith is appaling. Many Mission Presidents do not recommend this book. It could be dangerous in the hands of the untrained.
I'm sure these are great socks, but I was slightly disappointed when I thought I was getting 3 pairs for the price listed...my package arrived and there was only one pair for the stated price. I feel like the image with 3 socks was deceptive and "false advertising", as it states nowhere else how many pairs are sold for the stated price. Hope I enjoy the socks, but thought I'd warn everyone else before they buy these and expect more than what you'll receive.
i was also excited about buying this game only to find out that the people at visual concepts had taken a big step back. i was a fan of the series on dreamcast and had easily handed it the best basketball game of 2000 - 2002. well i purchased this game 4 days ago and haven't found a way to play more than 10 minutes total. to me the graphics look no better on gamecube than it did on dreamcast. second of all the gameplay ... the dunks look worse, the post play is horrible and the high lob passes will drive you crazy...the menus are confusing also. i don't think nba live 2003 is the answer but this game doesn't do it for me either. play 2k2 and save your money.
I totally disagree with the reviewer from Hongkong who must have been writing about some other book when she portrayed Infatuation as funny and sexy, with witty dialogues and hot passion. As it happens, most of the book is devoted to a character analysis of Judith. In a nut shell, Judith knows that she is an ugly duckling with incredible brain power. We don't see any real attraction developing between Luke and Judith until the last quarter of the book. And then when it does, the author's analysis of Judith is vindicated for she is accepted by Luke because of her brainy self rather than her looks. The most tragicomedical line of the book must be when Luke agrees with Judith that she is not beautiful. Disappointingly for me, just when I'm getting interested in the story in the last quarter of the book, the plot reaches its climax and comes to an end. The story is dry and tends to drag on. I must say that the writing is good as can be expected from Charlotte Lamb. I gave it two stars.
He has the eye and ear of an advertiser. Quick with the headline but totally lacking in content.A suit devoid of body and soul .
I saw this movie at the UMFF. It was toooo long. It was into 67 mins and still haven't got to the point. The storylines ...well so are all over the place. I would recommend putting on this movie if you have insomia. Trust me it will put you to sleep
The incoherent plot and screenplay are both laughably bad. Pretty costumes, pretty direction, a nifty techno soundtrack, and Robert Carlyle make watching Plunkett & McLeane worthwhile only if you're in the mood for a ninety-minute music video. Brainless fun.
There is real plot in this film, it just follows two bumbling theives. Actually the two actors are the only aspect that make this movie watchable, just barely however.The self-concious humour ends up being incredibly pretentious, it even seems to revel in the fact that it is pretentious, and somehow that makes the movie selfaware and hip.Some people might leap to this films defense and claim that the forgetable plot was part of the grand scheme to keep it fun and exciting. The problem is asides from the an uninvolving plot, this movie is extremely predictable, which further deminishes the already trite affair.
I don't get it. How can anybody give this miscreation of a film more than 1, maybe 2 stars? I expected to see a funny, original film but instead got to see some of the worst screenwriting ever. The plot is just plain awful.The sets and costumes were beautifully done, the acting wasn't bad, but that's not enough to save this #@%$(* of a film.
I thought it was pretty bad. Hostel was better than this crap. I mean it was ok in some parts but I didn't expect much. It's not even scary. I can't wait to watch Hostel 2 when it comes out.
This may not be the films fault, but I did not like it. Not my sort of thing, so I probably never should have bought it in the first place.
Just another one of those movies. A bunch of young kids travelling somewhere and get cut up into pieces because some psycho wants their organs. Neither scary nor educational(Tommy, you are taking Anatomy 101, and believe me, this movie doesn't help you pass that class!). Many scenes are too dark to tell what happened. Hear someone scream and some light streakes across the screen, and the next thing you know, someone has dropped. It is okay to see it for free, but not worth it when you pay for the ticket.
This movie had basically the same storyline as Hostel, except more gore, possibly a tribute to the lines of Cannibal holocaust and such. I'm not a gore fan, but I enjoyed hostel. This movie was a complete ripoff of that one, and with no suspense or scares. This was just anotyher generic exploitation flick. The characters were 2 dimensional, only exisiting to be slaughtered, and let out the occasional yell, the story was trite, and the villain not believable. I'm sorry I wasted my time.
this movie was just plain bad. bad story. bad "gore". bad everything. don't waste your money or your time watching this.
Some good action and scenery, but otherwise pretty low budget movie. Only recommended for die-hard horror fans.
Ok I hate to burst anyone's bubble about this movie...but it says on the cover "A better and scarier movie than Hostel". Um...NO. I actually enjoyed it up to the point where they got into the house and it got dark. From that point on the movie took place in nothing but darkness and you could not tell what was happeneing or who was who. So so annoying. This movie pissed me off. Don't waste your money. Thank god I only paid a few bucks for it. A complete waste of time. Eww.
Buena Vista (the company that releases Disney films on DVD) chose to not release anamorphic DVDs when they first came to DVD, so none of these films are anamorphically enhanced. This means, if you have a widescreen television, you will have black bars on all four sides of the picture. Also, these discs are absolutely barebones, only featuring a Dolby 2.0 soundtrack and a 1.85:1 widescreen presentation. Where are the extras?! I don't know about you guys, but I am a Mighty Duck fan who is disappointed by the DVD release of this film.
I'll tell you how stuped you can get, this movie is how stuped you can get. This is one of the STUPEDEST movie I have ever seen and trust me I've seen alot of movies.The whole movie is dumb exspecailly the actors.I recamend you not see this movie actshoally I more than recamend you I BEG you not to see this movie But if you incest to I recamend you borrow it from a friend your if you can't, rent it at the cheapest place you no before wasting your money on buying it. But if I were you I won't wast my money at all.
Leave it to Disney to captilize on the name of one of their kid's flicks. Well, it was good for what it was. I wouldn't watch it again though, it wasn't as memorable as "The Sandlot" or "Goonies" but it'll do.
I forgotten how much inappropriate language was in this one. I unfortunately started this with my kids...Won't make that mistake again. Next time I'll check pluggedin even if I watched it before.
When i first heard his single "One Wish" i thought this is a good tune, but then he got to the second verse, i thought eh? This guy cant sing! later on his album came along, his vocals destroy his tracks, literally. Comparing him to other artists such as Mario or 112, you'll realize that he can't sing, full stop. Disappointing.
Amazon would allow us to vote using negative stars. While we're on the subject of radiation, maybe chemotherapy would be less painful and traumatic then listening to this garbage.
I'd make this guy go for good. I was listening to the rap/R&B station just to see what crap they would play. Well, some R&B and rap is good, but this is literally the most annoying song/album this year. "If I had one wish...If I had one wish...If I had one wish...". I wanna kill the person who wrote this song.
THIS IS NOT A GREAT ALBUM. RAY-J LACKED A WHOLE LOT. MY SISTER WASTED HER MONEY, WE ALL DON'T LIKE IT, FIRST ALBUM IS MUCH BETTER. SECOND, I DON'T KNOW. "WAIT A MINUTE" WAS HOT. I WOULDN'T TAKE THE LAST COPY OFF THE SHELF. I WOULD NOT RECOMMEND TO AN R & B FAN. THE ONLY SONG ON THERE IS HOT ARE " WHAT I NEED" "BLUE HIGH HEELS" AND "ONE WISH".
Thank God he stopped rapping, but now this album sucks too! Glad it was free. He's reppin' Cali too- oh hell no! The crazy thing is he tried working with some new and other producers like R. Kelly and Timberland and they did him wrong! There are only three tight songs numbers 3, 4 and 5, all were produced by Rodney Jerkins, he can't be his sister though, this album proves Ray J just ain't got it, maybe he could if he had just stuck with using Rodney Jerkins. But the beats are not supposed to make you tight, your supposed to make that beat what it is and more.
Every time I hear that song "One Wish" it makes me want to throw up. I hope he never makes another CD.
And I only paid $23 for it. Thankfully the boys at Alternate Universe in Milford, CT are decent people and let me exchange it for a book of Krazy Kat.I'm a pretty huge fan of Spiegelman's work. I even have "Breakdowns", published in 1977, NOT 1997 like this book seems to believe!Aside from other errors, it was largely padded. He spent nearly a page explaining what the Holocaust was. Furthermore, the information on Spiegelman was mainly gleaned from his comics. That basically means any fan of Spiegelman won't learn anything new. There were some interesting quotes and a few tidbits taken from various interviews with Spiegelman, but it was really nothing new to me.Its redeeming qualities were a few photos I hadn't seen before, but the images were primarily panels from comics of Spiegelman's. It also was a fairly extensive summary of the history of comic art, but that's not exactly why a person would buy this book.Sorry Mr. Forget, but I was unimpressed.
Normally, I would never buy anything from Harman Kardon. But this DVD player was on sell for $100.00 from $300.00. Well, I guess you get what you pay for. I set up the player and placed my first DVD in it. I knew I was in trouble when I hearding a whining, grinding sound. That wasn't too amusing. What was even less amusing was the nice blank TV screen. I tried another DVD just to make sure it wasn't a problem with the DVD. I got the same whining, grinding sound and blank TV screen.It wasn't worth mailing back, in either time or money. I went down to the local Best Buy and bought myself a nice Sony DVD player. It has been working great.I'm waiting to take my HK DVD player outside and re-enact the scene from "Office Space" where the guys beat the crap out of the printer. ;-)
Miss Pickerell is a spinster with a cow, a love of rocks and a very old car. The story opens with her taking her nieces and nephews to the fair and exhibiting her rock collection. There she meets Mr. Haggerty and gives him a ride. It turns out that Mr. Haggerty is to be the navigator on a space flight to Mars and the ship is currently parked in Miss Pickerell's pasture. This upsets Miss Pickerell, but her curiosity overwhelms her and in a major mistake, she replaces Mr. Haggerty on the flight to Mars.This story is generally silly science fiction; the crew demonstrates incompetence to the point where Miss Pickerell has to come to their rescue. I read this book for the first time when I was in elementary school and even then found it laughable. There are many books for the young person far superior in their descriptions of space flight.
If you're looking for a finnish fireplace design book, look on. This is a picture book showing how a finnish fireplace design can fit into home decor, containing not any plans or technical information. Disappointing.
I'm getting very angry at some of these companies that are releasing very poor Quality DVDs."I'd Give My Life" could have been very enjoyable if they spent a little time fixing it up. In some areas the movie goes dark and light and dark and light. It gets very annoying. There's crackle and popping sounds through out the movie.
I've used lots of lip and cheek stains that have had a great result, and unfortunately this is not one of them. I gave it two stars because of the price: you are getting what you pay for. The texture is really waxy and I not as natural looking as other products. It did look okay when I first put it on, but it doesn't blend incredibly well, and rubs off within a couple hours. I'd spend some more money and get something a bit higher quality.
This is a good product, but highly over-priced. $10 for FOUR pieces of track ???????
I have been reading Moorcock's work ever since I encountered his creations while playing RPGs in the early Nineties. Suffice it to say, Moorcock seems to have nothing more to add to his Chaos-spawned mythology other than an obviously mediocre book. Old hands will probably notice the allusions to the Eternal Champion, a concept which in all the circumlocutions ,Alas! almost put him at par with those lame "formula writers". His Blood just fails to churn mine.
The reason i bought this game was beause of all the great reviews from here and game web sites. All i hear was it's the best B-ball sim out there. Well that's a bunch of BS. I don't know how many times playing as kobe, Shaq, Iverson etc.. i've gotten my shot blocked (even on fade aways) by a bench player. As shaq i get a miss match with a 6foot guard so i try backing him down and well i can't. It seems shaq isn't strong enough to plow his way through a 6 footer lol. And when i make him spin to the basket then press shoot 9 times out of 10 he doesn't go for the dunk instead he throws up some off balance,fade away crazy looking shot. The gameplay is challenging but not in a good way. I guess i will try "NBA Live".
This piece of equipment is aweful. It doesnt work period. Just look at the tech support webpage from ADS an be your own judge.
Drivers for XP gave trouble. Had fewer problems with Win ME.However, this baby has problems syncing sound and video. Check all forums on the web, this is a problem everyone has.Doesn't look like ADS is about to fix it any time soon.A definite DON'T BUY.
Not happy with this product lots problems!!!Not work at all for me. Had a person who is computer nam look at it and everything. He not get it either.
This product is a good idea. However, the software is not easy to use. Unless you have a very powerful PC, and get installation right the first time, you'll be in trouble. Included documentation is of little help and Tech support is a dead end (not to mention arrogant).
I would have rated this minus 5, but that was not an option. This is neither instant nor is it DVD. It took 2 weeks of intensive work to try to get it to work--it never did! I even had to reinstall Windows XP! Tech support NEVER got back to me, and by the time you finally give up, its too late to return. This will make you homocidal! Don't waste your time and energy.
I love historical novels, and that's what I thought this book was, with the added bonus of naughtiness. What I got was a book with stories (I read 3 of them before I gave up)that had to be written by horney 13 year olds. This single purchase has me rethinking my loyalty to Amazon.
Maggie Shayne can certainly write, but this one is a loser. It was difficult to warm up to the hero and heroine - Edie, a former lingerie model is cold and colorless, she returns to her home town and buys up the property that Wade has always wanted because he ticked her off. This is neither adult nor endearing. He, on the other hand, is your typical alpha male who, in this case 'jerks' off while looking at her layouts in lingerie. Not an attractive trait either. These two people are just not likeable and Edie is so dumb, it's scarey - while she's being stalked, she buys an isolated piece of property. The scene where her sister is being tortured is far too explicit for a category romance and more appropriate to a mainstream thriller. The rest of Edie's family were far more interesting than the main characters. Overall, disappointing and not nice.
This is the worst hockey game made for this season. This game looks like it was made in the eighties! I rented Hitz and the gave me this by accident. I played it for about twenty minutes and i was so disgusted I didn't touch it again. I wouldn't recommend this game to anyone except as a very last resort. After a bout five minutes of playing I had counted three animation glitches and five sound ones. This game was so horrible my family who doesn't know much about games even thought it was horrible. I have been to three rental stores and four different department stores and the highest and the highest anyone gave it was 4/10.
le jeu est bon mais comporte des bugs sur xbox live , les statistiques ne sont pas compiliees correctement sur xbox live. on perd la connection de temps a autre et une deconnection compte parfois pour une defaite... bon jeu a 1 joueur mais pas fort sur le live...
The book I received was a reprint from the collection of the Univesity of Michigan Library "Prepared by HP". It is "an unreviewed and unedited digital scan which may show library use shuch as stamps, scribbles or margin notes and in addition may have errors which were in the origin or in the digital scans or printing errors including missing, obscured or upside down pages." My copy included 9 blank pages one with library stamps and one with filing code and pages 18 through 59 were improperly cropped.I think a customer should receive a caviat for a book of this quality if you are going to charge $10.99 for it. A friend of mine was able to purchase a good quality copy of this title on e-Bay for $4.99.
I got no traction at all in this book. Was counting on a friend who also bought it and, sadly, his reaction was the same. I'm going to take another run at it.
Discs 6 and 11 won't play. Big damaged spots, you can see through the discs. Humbly request replacement or refund.
This book is the continuation of the story of Tiny Tim but as an adult. The part where we see who Tim really is, as opposed to who Tim's parents wanted him to be, was by far the best part of the book. The "mystery" though was just silly; there is no way that someone in England at that time when confronted with a child rapist wouldn't have murdered him on the spot. And Tim not doing so went completely against who the author had developed as Tim's true nature. There were actions such as this one throughout the book that seemed obviously placed in order to drive the plot forward. Exasperating and annoying.
BORING. this book should have been a short story. i am shocked that people liked it so much.
Mr. Timothy: A Novel was disappointing in its lack of cleverness.I always look for tidbits of humor but found nothing much in this "angry" immage of Tim as an adult.
Slow, Dark, Brooding and those are the nicest things I could say. This is one of the very few books I have truly wished I could return and get my money back. I love historical mysteries - but I didn't care what happened in this one because the characters were so uninteresting.
The concept was good (and it certainly worked in Bayard's Poe novel). But after a half dozen chapters, I still couldn't care less about Tim. The prose tended towards the pedantic and the supporting characters were flat.
The poster I received is okay - it's the one with "Planet Earth" written in italics along the bottom, instead of EARTH - but I really would have preferred the one I chose to spend money on, especially since you can buy the one I mistakenly got for .83 instead of $5ish. However, the shipping was fast and the poster was spotless.
They sent a similar but incorrect poster, that is only about half as cool. It was missing the NASA sign in the upper left corner as well as the Earth Solar System lettering. Instead there was the words planet Earth written in Italics and a number of fake stars added to the background. The picture of Earth was the same, but the rest of this poster just doesn't compare to what is shown here.
You look thru a pin-hole to get the sighting, but you can't see thru the pinhole if you wear glasses. If you take your glasses off then you can see thru, but if you're near-sighted like me then you won't be able to see very far in the distance to tell what you're sighting.
At a wimpy 85 minutes, so much is left out that unless you've read the book, a lot of what is happening probably won't make any sense.Avoid the movie, but definitely read the book by my favorite author Douglas Kennedy
I have never given a movie 1 star before but here it is. "Woman in the Fifth" offers very little in the way of plot or relevancy for that matter. The characters are flat, dull, and the dialog is less than inspiring. This movie is about nothing, literally. There is no back story of any characters, no motivation for their actions or lack there of, nothing. Just nothingness. And then it ends thankfully.
Save your money and time. This is nonsense attempting to be arty and important. I'd also forgotten how dire an actor Hawke is. Save your time? There is no explanation or direction. Honey Boo Boo has better writin.
Very disappointed by this movie. The book was great and so I anticipated the movie would be as well, especially after seeing who was going to star in the movie.Very disappointed. Slow moving movie - lots missing...
I was attracted to this movie by the stars. I have not read the book, but I view movies on the basis of a perceived entertainment value. Unfortunately, this one is not very entertaining, nor is it very believable, even as a so-called psychological drama. It's the first time I've ever been disappointed by Kristen Scott Thomas. Save your money.
I have been using Exuviance products for a couple of years now and have been very satisfied and feel I have found my skin care products that I intend to use for the future. But, unfortunately I had a bad experience when I ordered the products from Amazon.com(through a dealer called Impossible Discounts)- Rejuvenating Treatment Masque, Hydrating Eye Complex and Clarifying Facial Cleanser. All three products were dirty and did not come with any outer box or sealing. Actually, the products looked used! I have sent this complaint to Exuviance, but have not got any reply and now it is two months since I sent the complaint.. I am afraid that I will not buy Exuviance again nor buying at Amazone again after this incident.
lene is probobly a very upbeat and interesting person but the book is choppy and doesn't grip you like some other books.if you have all the other everest books go ahead and get it but you'll enjoy 'high exposure by breashears and climb by anatoli b. much better
After being nearly obsessed with Into Thin Air and The Climb, I eagerly awaited the latest book from Lene (I also lived in and speak Danish -- an added bonus). However, I found Lene's chronicle pretty weak, with little background or insight in the writing. This book was written more like a journal without analysis and should have been billed as such. For gaining insight into the state of mind for Lene, it was interesting. For better writing and deeper analysis about the 96 tragedy, stick to the other 2 books.
This is not a book about climbing - which I found kinda funny for a book about mt. Everest; this book is about ms. Gammelgaard proving to herself "she could be the first nordic woman to set foot" on Chomolungma - big deal ! So maybe you can call this a tale of a driven, achieving lady who singlemindedly pursues a goal, but you will learn nothing about what happened in may, 1996 or about what being on mt. Everest is like; not even close to Krakauer's or Boukreev's books on the same topic: buy those instead.
As another woman who has actually reached the summit of Mt. Everest, I found this book to be nothing more than self-indulgent "New Age" drivel. Gammelgaard offers no insight into why the disaster happened and virtualy ignores the other climbers who were on Everest that day. The book has none of the gripping suspense of Into Thin Air and none of the factual reporting of The Climb. I'm happy Gammelgaard survived but she should turn her attentions to things other than writing. One of the worst books I've yet to read!
This book is a total waste of time to read. I couldn't wait to read it when I saw it on Amazon.com. But lucky for me I happen to see it at the library and hurried home to read it. Gammelgaard is so into herself it makes me sick. To think that she thinks Scott Fischer needed to have her on his team in order for the expedition to make it is unreal. She will never be in the same league as true mountaineers like Fischer or Rob Hall. Save your money on this one. I have read almost everything about Mount Everest, and the 1996 tragedy, and this is by far the worst. It will never compare with "Into Thin Air" or "The Climb". Also she has a style of writing that I have never seen before. She jumps from one thing to another, but I can guarantee you it will always be about herself, and how strong and great she is.
I haven't read this book but I've read Krakauer & Boukreev at least 7 times each. It is public knowledge that Lene G. did not pay Mountain Madness the full fee to be guided up the mountain. Ask Karen Dickenson. Maybe that's why Fischer's expedition had few (and inferior) radios. Hopefully LG paid Mountain Madness (after the fact) with the profits from her book. Otherwise she's just a user who used Fischer's good nature to sleaze her way into his expedition. Even if she paid, it's too late. I have zero respect for her. I would like to read her book but I won't buy it.
The book is poorly written with a lot of name dropping and gossipy insinuations. Into Thin Air, Climb, High Exposure are all better written and far more interesting. I think she figures if she refers to the "mother goddess" enough times she can pass the book off as feminist treatise. Lucky for Gammelgaard, she's a better climber than writer, or she'd be just be another fossil on the mountain. Don't waste your money.
After reading Into Thin Air, I have read everything I could get my hands on regarding the 96 Everest tragedy. I have turned into an "Armchair Everest Junkie". Lene's perspective on her survival was of particular interest to me because I am such a chicken when it comes to taking risks. This book was more about who Lene liked and who she thought little of. There was very little credible information that shed light on what she went through. I found it distasteful that she took shots at those whom she accompanied and collectively staked their lives on the bid for the Everest summit. True, Anatoli was a fine mountaineer and human being but he was the only other person she respected. That pretty much sums up the book!
Like several others who have reviewed this book, I found it a total waste of time. I was able to read the entire book in one day and I kept thinking, "it's got to get better," but it never did. There is no sense of what drives this woman, no personal history in which to "get to know her" and certainly nothing is added to the Everest story, either historically or in the context of the '96 tragedy. I found it shallow and filled with exclamation points that made no point. While I certainly understand and accept the intuitive mind and its differences from a more analytical perspective, this book did little in the way of informing me about the mountain or the author. Instead it seems trite and superficial and filled with pithy statements and insinuations which discredit her perspective. I am, however, thrilled that she made the summit and returned safely and that it fulfilled a personal quest she had. I only wish she hadn't written so poorly about it.
There's not much to this shallow account of the '96 Everest tragedy. The book features double spacing between paragraphs -- apparently to make it long enough to be considered a book. If you like reprints of the 3-page itinerary that Scott Fisher sent to the author, this book is for you! If you want great writing on these events, read Into Thin Air, which is far superior. The author does very little to add new insight into the tragedy, and in fact the moments that should have been gripping -- when her group was lost on the mountain -- amount to little more than "we yelled at each other for hours to stay awake so we could live through the storm." This would have made a decent magazine article, but it doesn't amount to a good book.
I purchased this book looking for a new perspective on the tragic Everest climb of May 1996. I was sorely disappointed. Perhaps in Denmark people were interested in how she, a female Dane, attempted and summitted Mt. Everest. However, the novelty, for any climber and for most everyone else, of a woman climbing Everest on a guided expedition is nonexistent. After hundreds of ascents of Everest, it approaches absurdity to have the author repeatedly mention that she will be the first Danish woman to summit.Those who like to read self-help books may enjoy her spin on the "inner game" of preparing for Everest, but I didn't.
While this video is informative and a good source of information for older children, I do NOT recommend it for kids under 3 or 4. My daughter is 2 and loves Elmo's World (we have several other videos) so I figured this would be okay. WRONG! She is now having nightmares and will not be left alone in the dark because she is afraid of fire. She even shakes with fear the way Elmo does at one point during the film. I think the subject matter is too advanced for her and better suited for older children.
My son's day care showed the Elmo Firehouse Video and he was very scared! He cried so hard they had to remove him from the room. He is 2 1/2 years old. He still is concerned most days as we pull in the driveway that they will show it again.
Tried to watch this using our ROKU (we've watched other amazon content this way), but when you try to watch, it says content not available. Annoying since the easiest way to search is online. Back to the search.
I bought this video thinking that it would be a great tool to teach about fires. Well, what it did was show Elmo scared half to death about a fire in which he was a part. They actually show him shaking and in a lot of fear, something that should not be shown to young toddlers. They don't understand why Elmo, their hero, is so afraid and it really upsets them. Why they had to take such a great idea and ruin it is beyond me. There are ways to teach safety without scaring someone to the point where they cannot hear what you are saying out of fear, which is what happens to Elmo in this video. Save your money - this one doesn't do the job.
The quality of this video is exceptionaly poor. Our 2.5 year old seems to love it but it makes me want to tear my eyes out. The voice of the main character sounds like a robot and is very annoying. I would look else where for a piano DVD.
This book basically gives you the history of words and how they were established. It was not what I was looking for! Not a good read!
Boring, poorly set up, no dynamic or real plan to sit down X number of hours a day and cover Y amount of material so you can become exponentially more glib. Just a poor attempt at a primer.
This game is poor - not realistic for anyone that rides a Harley. The game uses keystroke only - no joystick or wheel, and the sound doesn't resemble any Harley I ever heard, including my own. I can't believe HD let Activision use their name for this game.
Though it started out strongly, Season 3 of CSI quickly falls to the wayside. Episodes like 'The Accused is Entitled' show the strength of this show, but the middle of the season is weak compared to previous seasons. The episodes are tired and formulaic, and the "surprise" season finale is laughable. Continuity is thrown out the window and the storylines are fractured. Buy the first and second seasons to see the best of CSI.
cheap, light weight, quite flexible, doesn't hold a sharp edge very well- but what do you expect from a cheap knife? I bought it because I liked the shape!Use it, abuse it then throw it away or sell at your next "I'll never do it again" garage sale.
Why are they still selling this? Worth a laugh, but the feature is 30 minutes long and I bet your laugh won't last all the way to the end.
This was one of the worst movies I've seen in recent memory. I'll start off by saying that all the sped up and slo-mo effects were unnecessary and honestly annoying. The kill scenes were cheaply done CGI which looked terrible for the most part. It's a spoiler, but in the last attack scene of the movie the 'dream girl' literally bursts through a tree and a burned body to attack Simon/Stanley. My biggest problem with this movie is that I know Cripin Glover can do so much better. I'm sure he did the best with the script he was given, which wasn't much, but I'd have passed on this role. After seeing him in Rivers Edge and Willard it was almost painful to watch him play this character. I'm just glad I got this used for six bucks and not the twenty-five amazon is asking for it
I like Crispin Glover and i am a huge horror and genre fan, but this movie was weak, really weak. I like movies sometimes that are bad, because they are bad in a way that is funny or even enjoyable. This was a movie that was bad and after it was over I say "I just wasted an hour and a half (or however long it was) of my life on this crap!"
A very brief but necessary introduction for those who don't know but would like to know just a little of what's happing with what is called the New Age Occultism. This well know author of many books in this area introduces the fresh reader to people, topics, and a short glossary, and history to the ever present New Age Occultism, along with the latent dangers of this religious movement.
So someone from the biggest CULT of all, Christianity, makes the usual errors about alternative spiritual paths he knows nothing about. Pure ignorance and bigotry!Evangelical Christianity had done far more damage than the New Age ever could, by sowing seeds of discord and division. Their fear-based dogma keeps them blinded to the Light that is in others.Their own book says GOD IS LOVE.Therefore, where Love is, God is.Where God is, Love is.That's what the New Age is really all about. It's that simple.But many Christians miss the boat. They are stuck in FEAR.Perfect love casts out fear, right?Didn't Jesus say to LOVE God and LOVE your neighbor?Why, then, do so many Christians stay stuck in FEAR?Why do they feel they must attack the spirituality of others? Why not just offer their own spirituality in LOVE to those who choose it, and respect the rights of others to follow the spiritual path of their choice?
Save your money, i'm not sure whats more disturbing the fact that a doctor wrote this garbage or that people will probably believe him.
dear sir,i tried to contact you many times ,regarding this itemwhen i opened the box the faucet handle was broke and i can send you pictures if neededregardshaj hasanmohamad.hajhasan@gmail.com
It is the worst book I have ever seen.I passed both CFA and AICPA and familarize with those materials. I still find it difficult to follow. Not clear explaination, contradiction among arguments and wrong answers for the sample questions.I am very disappointed.
I bought this book to write the FRM exam. It is the worst possible written book that I have ever seen. Even the topics that I have a very good knowledge of (e.g. Duration, Convexity etc.) are written in such a disjointed fashion that I could not recognise them. The author uses symbols without describing them, the passages have no relevance to the examples which in turn cannot be connected to the solutions. It was a great disappointment. I wonder if anybody at GARP ever reviewed it before recommending it as a text for the FRM exam.
Is there anything less than 1 star? For the errors, this book is not a good value for your moneyI agree with other readers. Book is full of errors and irony is most of these errors are not corrected in the downloadable supplement - available on GARP web-site. Agreed the book covers everything within the Body of Knowledge for FRM exam, but many important issues / theories are mentioned / covered in the Handbook because they are part of syllabus but sufficient justice is not done to them. One definately gets this strong feeling that continuity is missing in certain parts of the book and they seem to be just product of simple copy / paste action.I strongly recommend GARP, Wiley Finance to correct the errors and replace current book with an error free version. Why should the readers pay for the errors? And please let the readers know what actions you are taking and when?
As comparing with some other exam-oriented books for CFA and AICPA exam., it would be the most poor book I have read up to now. The book is poorly prepared and organized. While it is organized in according with the exam. structure, it is still difficult for the reader to follow. Most concepts have insufficient explanation. While some notations have not been clearly explained, some topics are explained (or jumped) very fast without proper elaboration. Some examples are even not supported by adequate reading before the examples and the explanation can only be found in the answers. Thus, it has made a chapter in pieces and then becomes difficult for the reader to memorize. I doubt why GARP recommend it to the candidates since 2000 and whether it is suitable and sufficient for exam. preparation purposes. I suggest some serious candidates may be required to refer to other textbooks and even myself has such planning.
This book cost me the FRM last year. I made it the center of my study program. The book's writing is atrocious; there are gaps in what is covered; and there are many errors and misstatements. I wasted six weeks struggling with this book. When I finally realized my mistake, it was too late to rescue my study program, and I failed the exam. I am very disillusioned with Jorion and GARP. This shoddy, overpriced paperback makes me think they are in it just for the money. This year, I have signed up for the CFA exam instead. So far, I have been very impressed with their study materials.
This book is misleading. Contains impressive amount of errors, that leads readers to learn wrong concepts. I am starting to doubt that this book was written by a Phd. Or if it was, then lets revoke his title. Hope they release some decent review on this.
This book is not on the FRM reading list. The author already has one book for the GARP exam, and this one covers all the same material in much the same manner. There is little that is new here. It is just regurgitating the same stuff. The message seems to be that, if you can't make sense of his first book, you should shell out $100 to give him a second chance. Save your money. It is not worth it.
Sorry... I gave this album a few spins but I still can't think of a one good thing to say about it. Except maybe that it will probably be the weirdest thing you'll ever hear... can't say it's not original, but in this case that's not necessairly a good thing. If you're not familiar with this band, this probably wouldn't be the best album to start with.
Beware. This game does not work with Windows XP. The vendor said that it would work on any XP Version except Media-Center, but I have XP Pro and it crashes there despite changing compatibility settings to older versions and changing the video resolution. I suspect that it's like another game we purchased that worked fine when XP first came out, but Windows Auto Update changed something that destroyed compatibility with old Win 98 games like this.We have it up and running on an 11 year old laptop with Win 98 , but it's too CPU intensive to run properly on that old thing.The game seems OK for the right PC and operating system though...
The story contained in this book is excellent, but the book itself is junk. It appears that is was visually scanned from and older and more narrowly formatted print and then pasted into this print with little to no error checking. The worst result of this is that every word that was hyphenated across two lines in the original text appears broken and hyphenated even though it is now in the middle of a line (e.g. hyphen- ated). You will also see occasional misreads such as a number 1 in place of a lowercase "L".Find another printing.
The soft back edi- tion of this book is full of misedit- ed copy (full of sep- arated text (annoying isn't it?). It also does not have the publication date or a full title page. I wrote a report using the date of 2006 because that was the only date I could find. Lastly, whole portions of text are missing from this edition. My advice, spend the extra money and get a different edition.
This wireless camera only works 5 ft away from the receiver. It is supposed to be 100m. What is the point of wireless if you have to be that close?
I recently ordered this camera hoping I could fly my helicopter controlling it at close range. Well I sure was wrong! this camera gets fuzzy and you can hardly tell whats going on when it is 10ft away behind my helicopter box. I am very disappointed and hope to warn potential buyers that the range is terrible and can barely broadcast through a window let alone in the room right beside it. Unless you have one big room where the camera and receiver will both be placed, its not worth it. I just am saying It does not have a range near 200 ft like some are saying.. maybe you could tell whats going on at 50 ft no obstructions sitting still, but otherwis I do not recommend this to anyone and I am planning on returning the camera.
I purchased this wireless camera for use in a medium size model helicopter. Unfortunately the range and quality of the video is quite weak. Even the smallest movement of the camera causes the video to destabilize and lose all detail. Might be good in a fixed location.
It's not what you'd expect. Almost all signals around interfere with the video and audio of this camera. I takes too much adjusting every little move the camera makes so it is impossible to view off of a moving toy like a helicopter or RC vehicle as the product states plus RC products emit own signals than can cause video interruption. Not a good product at all. Will be more careful what cameras I buy next.
great concept, however, tuning is imposable, you get some horizontal instability 98% of the time. but when you get it, it looks decent!
I like platformers, which is why I got this game. I've played it off and on for a week now, only because I hate not finishing something I start. If it weren't for that fact, I'd never touch this game again. The graphics are good, but the camera controls are [bad]. I've died more than once because the game decided to adjust the camera angle while I was in the middle of crossing some tiny bridge or climbing a narrow ledge.
Well yea sure its supposed to be this wonderfull, amazing, groundbreaking platform game. Well its not, all thats changed are the graphics, besides the general opening there is almost no development storywise, and tecnically speaking all that revolutionary platform actoin can be had in games the like of the Rayman titles, or Ratchet and Clank. All in all it probably would be pretty fun and thus you should add one or two stars if your new to this kind of thing, or add a few stars if you really really really like large environments or just platforming in general.
Basically, you can say that this game is about 30% fun and 70% Frustrating. The gameplay is uneccesarily difficult at times and ceases to be 'fun' after about 4 levels in. The camera is terrible. Some have said here dismiss it as 'oh well, all platform games have camera problems'. However, this game definately has the lamest camera of them all.Another dissapointment is the fact that there are no milestones. If you [expire], you get to start over. Period. No matter how many lives you have left, how many items you have collected no matter how far into the level you have gotten, they all get erased to zero and you get the distinct pleasure of having wasted your time. Isn't that Fun?Acclaim has definately failed in their foray into platform gaming. Get Ratchet and Clank or Rayman, you will actually enjoy those games. This one looked like it had potential but is just too frustrating. Don't waste your money on this game. It just ain't worth it.
Unable to use on my television. Advertisement didn't advise me that it needed a special television to play this game.
I purchased the e-version of this book to be read on my Kindle. There were numerous spelling errors where two words had been combined into one. The further intothe book theworse it got. Two to three errorsper page. I believe a spell checkwould have pickedthese allup.
While cultural pundits try to convince you that some literature is better than other literature, the truth is that all art is relative to individial tastes. Thus, it doesn't make any sense to think that a novel like this one is really any better than say, Michael Crichton or Stephen King. Aesthetic standards can't be grounded.Thus, don't listen to anyone who tries to distinguish between "serious" works of literature like this one and allegedly "lesser" novels. The distinction is entirely illusory, because no novels are "better" than any others, and the concept of a "great novel" is an intellectual hoax. This book isn't as good as Harry Potter in MY opinion, and no one can refute me. Tastes are relative!
1984 over all is a very boring book. Their are parts in the book that catch your attention but just for a while and then it just gets boring again. I don't really like futuristic based books and the book 1984 is a perfect example why. I wouldn't recommend this book to any one, unless your into this type of genre. I give this book 1*.
I had never read 1984 and was very excited to do so only to regret purchasing this edition. In the forward (by thomas pynchon) the entire ending is revealed in great detail. I knew what to expect through the entire book and I really wish that I could get my money back. Dont buy the centennial edition, or at least dont read the forward if you want a nice surprising read.
This is the second time I've been forced to read this book for aclass, and I have to ask, "What's the point?" Maybe if you live in a country that's a monarchy, this book's worth reading, but this is *America*, ok? The whole reason we live in a democracy is so that we the people don't have to worry about things like this. "Brave New World" played up the science fiction aspect of it's "futuristic" setting ,and I thought that book worked much better. Orwell's lecturing on politics was ok one time around ("Animal Farm"), but this book gets so bogged down in a million issues that just don't matter ("double-speak?" Who cares how people choose to talk-- we should be able to talk to each other however we want) and gets lost. If you want to read Orwell when he actual has something to say, try "The Road to Wigan Pier," which acutally is enlightening, not this preachy homily of something that never happened. It's 2000. 1984 was a bad movie with Michael J. Fox.
While embarking on this "classic," don't expect to find yourself absorbed in a magnificant tale. 1984 is a redundant novel with unnecessary tangents and pages of contradicting philosophy. ...and must we really keep reading in full detail the horror and disgust of Winston's vericose veins?!
Cannot say that I enjoyed reading this book, because I did not approve of a lot of the things the author included. However, I did find some of the main points interesting to create a story. But definitely not the type of good book to read, nor would I recommend it.
I found 1984 to be an intriguing book. The plot of the book was interesting. How the author went about telling the story was too slow for me. I found it hard to pay attention while reading it. Throughout the entire book there were bits of intereseting parts followed by several paragraphs of, what i found to be, random information. I though it was a great plot but the storyline wasn't to my liking.
I was doing a research paper on the year 1984, and according to my teacher, NONE of this actually happened.I got a flippin' F.Last time I ever read a history book by this Orwell scrub.He doesn't know a thing about the 80s.Not ONCE did he mention Def Leppard or Karma Chameleon.I gave my copy to a donkey.He said it was about communism.Ass.
Amazon offered 1984 for its Kindle E-book reader, but then the electronic version's publisher decided it didn't want to make the book available that way. So Amazon deleted the book from the Kindles of customers who had already purchased it and credited their accounts. A small problem: what about annotations people had made on the book for their term papers? A big problem: what if I buy a book by a liberal and Amazon decides they only like books by conservatives, so they delete the book from my player? This is a despicable action, and I will be boycotting Amazon until they publicly change their policy. There are plenty of places to buy books online.
Having grown up in the former Soviet Union, as soon as I started reading the book, I could tell immediately where Orwell drew his inspiration, as well as most details of peoples' existence. Reading the book was like re-visiting my childhood, as well as refreshing my mother's and grandmother's stories of the soviet life in the 1950's, all the brainwashings, terrible living conditions, propaganda, people disappearing in the middle of the night, etc. Basically, Orwell took soviet reality of that era, and then took it a few notches up, and then twisted it some. Art imitates life, so to speak. I'm not sure why everyone credits Orwell's imagination, then. Either way, the book is extremely boring, the plot is almost non-existent, nothing is really going on, the [unlikely] love affair took half-the book to unfold, and it wasn't even worth it.
It was a very good description of life during anti-social time
1984 is the worst book I have ever read. I would advise anyone who is thinking about reading this book to reconcider! George Orwell is not a bad writer, however, this book he does not do evry well on, as some of his others. Prehaps he was getting old and lost his touch. Animal Farm was okay, but 1984 was horrible. It took him forever, it seemed like, to get into the accual book. If someone were to take out all of the useless part of 1984, it would be half as long. Why would he wirte so much about nothing? I havent ever meet someone who could wirte such a boring book about the goverment. I have meet many people who have loved this book, but i dispised it. I am not at all intrested in the goverment. This may be part of the reason that I didnt like it. I would advise you not to read this book.
The Kindle Edition of 1984 is incredibly sloppy. There are some blatant typos I'm surprised weren't noticed by editors, but the real slap in the face is when there are page numbers (from the print edition) in the middle of sentences that someone didn't bother removing when they copy/pasted the book from whatever was on file.
I was depressed for a week after I finished completing this novel. The torture that the protagonist endures is just too much to digest. I can only be thankful that this terrifying vision hasn't come to fruition...yet.Oddly enough, as I was trying to finish the final 100 pages of this book, I began reading "The Partner", which also has the main character endure series of torture to get him to crack.
I read george orwells book 1984. I didnt really like this book due to the fact it was a total negative outlook throughout the whole book. His prediction of the future was a little to far fetched for me. That book wasnt really my style. I can see this book being liked by many people so I would recommend it due to the fact everyone has different opinions. This book being such a negative outlook of the future just wasnt what i wanted to read about.
I think that this book is a bad book. Not only is it unrealistic, but also a boring book. Orwell has an imaginative mind, I must say, but thuis book talks about 1949, when he published it when there were such things as totalitarism. How could he know it would still be the exact same thing in 1984? This book also has strange events. The author skipped around too many times. At one sentence, he would be in the appartment in Winston's home, and without telling a reason for it, he would be some where else. The book is also boring. There is not enough action and suspense to make the reader willing to read it.
I think 1984 is not very interesting. The words are difficult. I had no clue what was really going on. It would be less boring if it was shorter and broken down so it would be easier to understand. You might like this book if you are interested in predicting the future and you can read lots of difficult words and know what they mean. Keep your dictionary close!
This book is old, gross looking. cover page is torn..the condition is definitely NOT GOOD..Got this book for $4...It's not worth more than 25 cents for sure.
This book is essentially the same as "The Brave New World" but expressed in a totally different way. Somehow, I like the "The Brave New World" better. It gave me a totally different view.
1984 is a very creative and well written book, Winston Smith the main character who is an insignifacant member or the ruling party in London in the nation of Oceania. Everywhere he goes he is video taped by cameras of the so called "Big Brother" party. This books talks about Winston on how he thinks what the "Big Brother" does is unfair. I enjoyed reading this book, it was very creative and well written. It makes me appreciate what I have in life. I also woundn't like the situation that Wiston is put by being watch all the time. I reccommend this book to people who are willing to sit threw some boring parts and who love science fiction. Overall it was a good book, but I don't think Iam ever going to want to read this book again.
Attempting to read this book is worse than watching the grass grow. At least the grass will become something you enjoy. The title and plotline of the story intrigued me to read it. Don't get me wrong, if well-written, this storyline could be very interesting. But even after just ten pages, the only thought going through my mind was "When will this guy shut up and tell the story???" The plot comes in a distant second to the narrator's monotone, seemingly unending monologue. If I could withstand this, I believe I would have enjoyed it. But forgive me for not having that kind of patience for hundreds of pages.
I READ THE BOOK "1984" BY GEORGE ORWELL. tHE BOOK WAS ABOUT A GUY NAMED WINSTON WHO FOUND A DIARY AND WROTE HIS FEELING IN IT WHICH WAS STRICTLY FORBIDDEN. I THOUGHT THE BOOK WAS RATHER BORING AND CONFUSING TO READ. I DIDNT UNDERSTAND MOST OF THE THINGS HE WAS TALKING ABOUT. WHEN READING THE BOOK I SUGGEST THAT YOU PAY CLOSE ATTENTION SO THAT YOU UNDERSTAND IT COMPLETELY AND WONT BE CONFUSED.
I have never read a bigger piece of garbage in my entire life. For the people who read and enjoyed this book...GET A LIFE!
George Orwell's book 1984 is a wonderful book set in England's future if WW II never stopped. The main character in the book, Winston, is an ordinary worker at a regular office in England. The catch is he can remember the past some what. In England's future it is ruled by an all knowing man named Big Brother of BB in new speak (the language of oceania earlier called England).Once Winston realizes this chick named Julia likes him he and she start secretively dating which is against the rules of the party. Winston finally realizes what is going on with society and BB. Winston and his girlfriend finally get the nerve and take a chance and join the resistance against the party. In the end it doesn't turn out how he expects it to be but was inevitable.The book was a great read and a good use of time. I personally think big brother is the man. Even though it was a school assignment to read it was great.
Why do they make high school kids, whose lives are already fraught with uncertainty and uneasiness, read such depressing books? I suppose back in the 1950"s this was a fresh new picture of totalitarianism, but today pick up any newspaper and you see this story all over our modern world. It's not that I think Orwell isn't relevant, it's just that I think high school English teachers could do a little research, find books that are well-written, expand horizons, but that lift people up, not depress them. Maybe books that would help kids, at their vulnerable age, to laugh, become wiser, and look at others with more compassion. "Cold Sassy Tree" comes to mind. Something with warmth, humor and wisdom, rather than bleakness.
1984,by Georgee Orwell,is not fun to eat although cheese is. The book itself is uninterestring and the text is plain like water. Some parts of the book are ok but the rest is lame. The things it talks about can be related to the events that are going on today and events that have happened. It shows how totalitarianism works and how it feels to always be watched. So in some sense it is educational but I would certainly not choose this book to read if i wasn't forced like in this situation. All of my friends that read this book said the same thing, "Boring!" Students that are into more action and adventure will not enjoy this book.
At first I did like the book. Then it just started to suck right around the time when Winston was getting sexually involved with his girl friend. I hated the book so much that I forgot her name. The first hundred or so pages i liked, then it just got really boring. So II highly reccomend that you DO NOT READ THIS BOOK. And please for the love of God don't read that "Brave New World" book by Hoxley. It is twice as worse as 1984. To put it bluntly, DON'T READ ANY GEORGE ORWELL. Your just waisting your time.
Unlike Mr Orwell apparently, I can actually remember 1984 and believe you me some of his recollections of the era are well off the mark. There were no such things as Memory Holes, was no such country as Eurasia and Big Brother did not hit our screens until 1999. I also find it staggering that there was no mention of Rubiks Cubes or the film Spies Like Us. On the other hand I did approve of some of the stricter measures bought in to promote sensible behaviour in the office which were advocated in this book.
This book had a good warning about futur totalitarian government but it was way too wordy. I had too much description and was really boring at the beginging that it took me a while to get through it. The love affair was discusting and the torture and Winston's viens were discusting and horrifying..Thats it
Okay all this book was about was random sex, the destruction of human nature, and the ending of all morales. However I must admit that Orwell had a prphetic sense when it camr to the idea of being watched constantly by the government. This book lacked a decent plot as well. THS BOOK SHOULD NOT BE READ UNLESS YOU LOVE THE DESTRCTION OF THE WONDERFUL HUMAN NATURE GOD CREATED.
This is a very well written book, I just had trouble understanding it. The begining wasn't too bad, but the more I read the less I enjoyed it.
this morning at 235am dudes in ninja suits came into my house and stole my copy of this book. I was excited to read it before amazon.com stole it.
I honestly dont like this book its just not the type of stuff i like to read. So any of you that are thinking about reading this if your favorite book is the twilight series, eragon or the vampire diaries you probably wont like it either. I only read it because i had to.
i ordered orwells 1984 on may 27. my card was charged. i did not recieve book. where do i go for a refund? steve
I thought George Orwell's 1984 was an "ok" book. I thought the book was just a little too far fetched for me. His prediction of 1984 was just so negative I found it really hard to get into it. It was difficult to read simply from lack of interest. I Think that this book may do wonders for other people though, it's just not really my style. For the most part I've always heard good things about this novel from other people. So just because I didn't think the book was that fantastic, don't let that stop you. I would advise you to read this book to see if Orwell's depiction of this strange negative utopia is for you.
OK, maybe Mr. Orwell intended it to be this way, but it still doesn't hide the fact that this book moves incredibly slow compared to the author's other works. I read this book because I remember thoroughly enjoying and understanding Animal Farm years ago, and this work was recommended by several of my friends. If you want an unrealistic view of a future that is totally morbid and depressing, check this out. Yes, this is science fiction, and just because some people call it a classic doesn't mean I like it. If you want some of the best in this genre, I recommend 'Dune', by Frank Herbert, '2001: A Space Odyssey', by Arthur C. Clarke, or 'Enders Game', by Orson Scott Card.
really slow service..... took me almost 3 weeks. And the cover is different the one displayed so are the page numbers.
I thought it was a very dull and cheesy book. Every time I picked it up, I fell asleep. I had to read it for school, and it took forever to get here when I ordered it. Barely finished it in time.
As is the custom of Barth, this book is informative but incredibly boring. The story of the Basseri is detailed and interesting but Barth has a style all his own and to say the least it is not engaging.
I am disappointed with this product.It is very cakey and do not cover blemishes more then my regular make up.It leaves streaks which looks really unattractive.I also find it hard to apply.
doent cover goo at all to me very light coverage wont buy it again sorry to say good day.. bye
I have yet to find a concealer that I am happy with. I have really dark under eye circles and this does camouflage them somewhat, but not how I had hoped. Instead of covering them, it seems to change their shade. Kind of like as if I were painting and rubbed white paint on a black spot, turning it grey. Get what I mean? It also looks really CAKEY! It could be because I have really dry skin, but not even with moisturizer + primer does it stop looking cakey.I'm returning this for my money back. That's primarily why I bought it here. I'm going to try Eve Pearl's salmon concealer in my shade, as well as Shiseido's concealer. Hopefully I'll find one I like.
The rating is not for the show but for the delay. Why is it taking so long to get these seasons of one of the best TV shows of all time to DVD? What do we have to do? We want to all go about this in a legal way but it seems that we are being pushed to illegal means in order to obtain these shows. I'm sure I could get them from numerous vendors throughout Thailand. It would not surprise me if these two seasons are already available for download off the internet. But some of us want to spend our money legally. And thanks to Fox it seems like we may never be able to.
As someone that bought the first season of The Bob Newhart Show, I must say I was disappointed in the poor quality. I mean that while other series have character pictures and are one sided DVDs this set was two sided. There are still some channels broadcasting the series and even though they are the cut-up syndicated version, it was better than what I bought. Wait for someone responsible like Shout Factory to do it right.Try Hulu, it may be there.
First I have to say I am disappointed that I ended up buying a Drama Audio CD instead of a OST. While I love the Karin Anime, spending the money on something I do not fully understand is a bit aggravating.All that aside, I'm sure the CD will be a treat to listen to. It unfortunately means my imagination will be in overdrive most of the time trying to create some semblance of what is happening.If you are a devoted Karin fan who likes collecting Japanese Audio Drama CDs, this is for you.If you're looking for the actual Background Music to the Karin series, you'll have to look elsewhere. You could start with www.play-asia.com. However, with Amazon.com always updating and changing, you may be able to find what you're looking for.Enjoy! ^_^
Pros: Uses 6 AA batteries which gives it a long life (about 9 hours with NiMH rechargables) in a fairly compact size. I did not see the problems that others have reported with the light not turning off or shoddy construction.Cons: The breeze it produces is fairly weak and diffuse. It is also fairly noisy (from a rattle, not from the wind). I bought a 5" O2 brand fan which is smaller, quieter and more effective. The O2 has the disadvantage (to me) of taking two D-size batteries but I was able to get a few hours out of it using AA batteries with up-sizing adapters. I thought the built-in light on the Wenzel would be nice but it seems that I usually don't want the fan and light pointing in the same direction. It would make more sense to have a separate light.
I ordered this fan for a recent camping trip, and never got to use the fan. I had it set up at the foot of my inflatable mattress, and one of my kids tipped it over accidentally. The fan detached from it's base, and I wasn't going to perform surgery on it during my vacation. The light on it is pretty bright, and we did use it throughout the trip. I'm sure there are much better, more durable fans out there.
This fan is a colossal waste of money - it's not worth the shipping cost, much less the purchase price. When the tent got hot, the poor performance of this fan was a real disappointment.
I can't recommend this fan simply because the output is so weak it doesn't actually get any thing done. Well if i had to say some thing nice about it that would be it has a nice LED light in there. So in conclusion don't waste your money on this product get a better reviewed one instead.
This fan is junk! The high speed didn't work to start, the lights don't shut off completly, which drains the battery, now it doesn't work at all! This is all only after 1 day of use!
Being a fan of Isabelle Huppert's work, I expected something more from this film. The only good thing about this film, as a matter of fact, was Huppert's performance of a woman coming undone. She lives her relatively closed (and closely monitored by her live-in mother) life as a piano teacher, and everything seems stern, put together (except for this bizarre relationship with her mother, who controls everything). And then Huppert's much-younger student begins to pursue her. By the time Huppert succumbs, she is unraveling. At the same time, the movie unravels with her.
I was sold when I saw how many ratings this proclaimed 5 star movie it had received but to my disappointment, it was just a waste of time and money. If you really want to see a good movie about a piano or pianist with a good story to it then I recommend "The Piano".This movie was somewhat sickening and pointless. There was no real good story behind the movie. Just 2 puzzling demented sicko's who's only purpose was to make you vomit and throw that movie away. I'd like to give a synopsis about the movie but the truth is, is that there's really no good plot to talk about a synopsis.Do yourself a favor and skip this movie. You'll save time and money. Not all 5 star movies have earned their stars.
This movie was crap. It boasts of a journey of submission and tale of D/s. It is boring and merely a poorly filmed interpretation of the lustful quest for dominantion.
I am a big fan of foreign movies. When I read read the reviews listed here, I decided to see this movie before buying the DVD. Thank goodness. The storyline was terrible.
That movie was soooo boring. An old teacher living together with her mum, whom she hates, very blunt loud dialogues between them, why does an independent self supporting lady stay there at all, ridiculous..I was very, very disappointed of actress Huppert's role, it was not her fault, that she had so little to do or say, eg in that scene on the public toilet.E. Jelinek's story was either not transported or is it really so far away from real life, or sex, or even perverse perversion?I did not even try to find out, too much time spent on that already. Sorry.
This is the number one worst movie I have ever seen. I usually love French films and enjoy the unprudish and free attitude in most of them, but this one went too far. I wanted to leave the theatre, but I was too transfixed in horror to move. I gagged, I winced, I covered my eyes, but still I couldn't move. After the torture was finally over I felt shellshocked and needed to go home and watch The Lion King to recover. It was a glimpse into the world of a sad, demented, and twisted character that I did not need to see. There was no point to this movie and I felt that it existed purely for shock value with no lesson, point or true plot. If you value your time do not watch this movie.
The acting was good for what it was. The opinion I have after watching it was the movie was someone's spoof of what BDSM was. The ending just left me with my mouth hanging open and shaking my head in wonderment.
I have to disagree with other reviewers who have heaped praise and many stars on this movie which I found to be art house at it's least pleasing. You will have seen words like, dark, brooding, disturbing thrown around like confetti, when in truth the movie simply does not deliver. What leaves an sour taste in the mouth is not the disturbed main character, nor the semi graphic sexual scenes, but mainly a very very compelling film that ends abruptly, if not predictably leaving the viewer feeling cheated. Is it well made? yes - well acted? sure - but like so many of these "critically acclaimed" dramas it's missing one vital thing. Most stories have a beginning, middle and an end - and this just leaves you hanging after nearly two hours, saying "What?"
Deadly accurate too, especially the mother stuff. Incredible performances, but I'd rather curl up with the cat and watch 'Roman Holiday'. Life's too short to roll around in the John.
Ok. So Isabelle Huppert was brave in doing some of the things she does in this. So what?The movie is a pretentious bore which never grabs the viewer. It's just a series of nasty and kinky scenes which ultimately go nowhere. The Isabelle Huppert character is a psychopath, but incredibly she is an uninteresting one.A truly disappointing movie.
I adored this movie in that it dispelled the simulacra of gracious living with classical music. I hated this movie in the shallow way it demonized bdsm culture, much as Irreversible demonized gay men.I was suprised that a young carefree boy in love would suddenly turn judgemental when the object of his affections, his teacher no less, provided instructions for him to please her. I had difficulty making that leap. I was not surprised that a pianist, being a tactile creature, would chose manual engagement for arousal.I thought the scene where Huppert pulled that little box of personal delights from beneath her bed had the greatest amount of compassion and empathy in the film. It was heartbreaking to see how small her world truly was.
Giving Sarah a lift from Loch Ness to London, the TARDIS picks up a distress signal and the Doctor lands the ship on Zeta Minor, a planet on the very edge of the universe. On this planet, an expedition seeking a new energy source has lost all but one of its members.However, when the Morestran Empire rescue expedition arrives, the Doctor and Sarah are prime suspects as the mysterious killers. But the planet has a very large secret, one which threatens the whole universe...'The Planet of Evil' is one of those Doctor Who serials that so many people seem to love, but which leaves me cold (perhaps not a surprise, as it was written by Louis Marks, who also wrote 'Inferno', which falls into the same category. Novelisation hasn't greatly improved the story in my eyes, and deprives us of the wonderful Zeta Minor jungle set.If you like 'Inferno', you'll probably like this one far more than me.
This is the second time I have ordered a movie manufactured "on demand" in a DVD-R format from Amazon.com. My Sony DVD recorder/player is less than two years old. When I attempted to play each movie on the Sony, this message was displayed: "Error. This disk cannot be played". I have never had problems with movies that are manufactured directly by the studio so I assume that the middleman responsible for making these DVD-R copies is unreliable. Anyway, I am very disappointed.
If this was a professional DVD, it would not be made on a DVD-R disk. Instead it should be made on a dual layer DVD disk because it is over two hours. This DVD-R disk must therefore be less quality than standard play playback. Not good for High Definition flat screens, especially the larger size screens. By the way, this movie was broadcasted by Turner Classic Movies in letterboxed form. The TCM broadcast movie differed from the movie I had on prerecorded VHS tape. The TCM movie plot was better than what was on the VHS version. Also the TCM version was in widescreen and more sharp than the VHS version. The source of where this DVD version came from which you are selling is NOT provided and that is one more reason why I won't buy it. Sincerely, Rick Gershon.A Majority of One
This is a delightful set of four short stories about the magic of Christmas.Each short is animated in either vivid color or black and white. 30 min. total playing time. Each has its own personality and charm. The stories can be used for discussion about Christmas between parents or teachers and young children. There is freshness in each. Few opportunities exist to share a Christmas story classic that is very short and talk about it with young folks. Makes them excitingly aware of the famed comic figure Howdy Doody and animation in fun terms.I watched it from the viewpoint of both a young child and parent. Four **** for delight and colorful fun that often brings out the smiles in young silent children otherwise prone to remain quiet. At a low price too. Not worth the new VHS price.Four Stars.
I kept getting the following error on Windows 2000"monsters1.exe has encountered a problem and needs to close" when launching Disney/Pixar's Mike's Monstrous Adventure (Windows 2000)All my drivers are the latest. Do see what the problem was and the Disney website is of no help. I may have to return the product if I dont get this working
I kept getting an error message when trying to install it. I ended up having to return it unfortunately. sorry
This was a pretty damn boring movie. Thank god I did not buy it, for I would be rather angry at myself. Boring plot, boring actors, you can probably see where I'm going with this. They couldn't even throw any gore into the movie for at least something to watch. I guess that would have put them over budget. I will say that I thought the cover art looked pretty cool, which is why I rented it in the first place. So overall, I would not recommend this to anyone.
This book could be useful if the examples actually worked. I have barely reached the 50th page and all ready I have found more errors than should be allowed in an entire book. The examples are mis-quoted and several don't work. The book might be more helpful if the proof reader knew enough on the subject to correct the more obvious errors. If you buy this book be ready to experiment with the syntax which may be close but not always correct.
This book may be fine for someone that already understand web production but it is very frustrating for someone just starting out. There are numerous mistakes throughout. Examples are explained and then demonstrations of don't match the explanation. Some of the examples don't work because the syntax is incorrect. If you don't all ready know how to use the commands explained in this book you will spend most of your time experimenting to correct the mistakes presented in this book.
Ever been in a car on a long distance trip with a cold bottle and a hungry baby? Let me tell you how obnoxious it is to have a bottle warmer that, even after 20 minutes, still has not heated that cold bottle. Don't buy this product.
where to begin, this product takes atleast 10 to 15 minutes to warm up a 4ounce bottle, and anyone with a small infant that is hungry knows this is entirely to long, would not recomment this to new parents at all, I now take a reusable bottle and fill with hot water and use that to warm up bottles
this bottle warmer is just a joke. It takes forever to warm a cold bottle up. I say " forever", it is forever. When I checked the power, it is only 13W. If you do the math, you know the energy the warmer produces may take forever to reach the heat to warm a bottle up.
hi i bought this warmer for a vacation trip, i was really dissapointed, it wasnt even 3 minutes that i had it on for the first time and it started to get ON FIRE!!!! melted plastic all over the place smoke like crazy all around the car it is VERY UNSAFE DO NOT BUY THIS PRODUCT DO NOT SPEND YOUR MONEY DONT PUT YOUR BABY IN DANGER IF YOU HAVE THIS PLUGGED IN YOUR CAR, CUS THE WARMER MIGHT GET ON FIRE, MINE DID!!!! i hope this review helps you, i wont EVER buy this product EVER again.
The Munchkin bottle warmer is quite easy to use, and does a terrific job warming bottles. In fact, it really can get too hot. If used strictly according to directions, this bottle warmer does the trick, albeit a bit slowly. I learned the hard way that it can also melt bottles. If you start from a cold bottle, it takes some time to warm it up to an appropriate temperature, more time than my hungry son will tolerate. Instead, I used it as a way of keeping an already warm bottle heated in the car until my son is ready for it. Unfortunately, this resulted in a carful of acrid smoke, a lump of melted plastic, and a black hole in his bottle as I was driving one day. If used appropriately, ie by checking the bottle frequently and turning the warmer off when warm enough, the warmer works well. However, resist the temptation to use it as I did, as a longer-term warmer.
This bottle warmer seemed like a great idea--it was great to take the chill of a cold bottle. But the fact that it can start smoking and melt the bottle, like it did for me today, makes it not worth the convenience and dangerous. I'd seriously pass on this one!
I was very disappointed to get this product and find out that it cannot be used with Playtex Nurser bottles.
Purchased this item and it caught on fire during its first use. I had it plugged in for about 3 minutes when my sons bottle and product caught on fire. I do not recommend this item. When I called the company they requested that I spend my own money to return the item and if they found that it was a mechanical failure they would replace the item only after I paid shipping. When I asked about my bottle they said their was nothing they could do about my loss. (Fire had caused the bottle lid to fuse to the bottom)This product is not worth a penny.
I purchased this in hopes of (like everyone else) having something that would warm a cold bottle in the car fairly quickly. This is NOT the product for the job! It takes forever, and actually makes the bottle too hot to handle without warming the milk much at all. The outside of the warmer gets way hot, too. Definitely a danger to you and children to touch. Luckily I have not had the problem some others have had with it melting my bottle, but I am not going to use it again to risk that!! In fact, I think the company needs to be notified so they will recall this product before someone gets hurt!!
I bought this for our first long trip with the baby. It was a waste of money and time. My baby was on pumped milk, so we couldn't just grab some hot water from a drive thru. It would have taken hours for her milk to get warm enough, and she is not that patient (neither are most babies, for that matter).
I bought this for my daugher on her birthday she liked the doll, but she did not love it. She said, "it was fun she enjoyed doing her hair,but it was not hat fun."
Dont get it twisted. I used to love Dogg Pound when they dropped their best work DOGG FOOD. But ever since then Kurupt changed his style around and Daz has been slacking on the production. The only standout tracks are CALI IZ ACTIVE and KEEP IT GANGSTA(featuring Lady Of Rage) where Lady of Rage delivers a verse that makes these female rappers we have out now sound like pigeons cooing. Its all hood(featuring Ice Cube) might have been a standout track if it wasnt for the weak beat and the even weaker rhymes coming from the Dogg Pound. Filler: Its craccin all night(who the f*** in their right mind makes a song with PeeDoody?)Heavyweights(more like lightweights), Slow your roll, Make that p***y pop, She likes that and the rest of this album. Bottom Line: One of the lowlights of 2006 without question. Bland production and sophomoric lyrics and pathetic guest appearances describe this album in a nutshell. Pick up the classic Dogg Food and stay away from this tragedy of an album.
Tha Dogg Pound was banging 10 years back,but they lost there Groove long ago. the flows are tired&there are too many hands on the Production end. seems to be going through the motions&hoping to catch somebody feeling the vibe,but you just can't recapture where things were at back in the day. Snoop is just hall passing these days so him being on cruise control here comes as no suprise.
I wouldn't bother with this one. Although I am a big fan of LPs guide books, this phrase-book was not particularly helpful. 9 times out of 10 they didn't have what I was looking for and when they did it was a real hassle to find. The pronunciation guide was not that helpful but the food section was good. If you already have the guidebook you could probably get by w/out this, but if you feel you need something, get a used copy over there(or maybe an Amazon auction.) If you do get fed up with it (as I did), it makes a very nice gift for a Thai friend. Next time I'll bring a pocket dictionary. Hope this helped.
After traveling using a Berlitz phrasebook in Italy, I went to Thailand, and bought the only one available -- Lonely Planet. It is terrible.The tone markers don't make much sense. They are not intuitive.The Food section has something advertised as a "menu decoder" when it is really just the same section all over again. Compared to Berlitz's food section for Italy, the LP guide is rather lacking.The Dictionary section is very lacking. It doesn't even have all the words listed elsewhere. The index is the same way. It makes finding information in the phrasebook next to impossible.Unfortunately, this phrasebook has just been whipped out as a companion to LP's monopoly on guide books. Try to find something else.
Although I am an avid Anne Rice fan, I initially bought this book because the back cover proclaimed it to be "the modern Story of O". Since Story of O is one of my favorite books in the genre of erotica, I just had to buy it, but then it seems that such sweeping claims hardly ever turn out to be true.... The book starts out strong, with intensely erotic scenes focusing on Lisa and Eliot and the beginnings of an interesting love story, but as the book progresses the characters seemed to become less and less realistic: by the time I finished it, I felt extremely unsatisfied. If you're an Anne Rice fan, this is a good book to read, if just to see how she fares in a genre other than horror, but overall there's much better erotica out there, and this book definitely does not live up to its claim of being as good as the Story of O.
This wasn't at all what I expected. Once I was done I understand what Anne was trying to do but while reading the book I was wondering what she was doing.It's not a bad book, just not what I expected.She spends lots of time spouting about why people become masochists. To be honest I wanted more of what went on in the club - not why they were there.
I kept thinking that Elliot and Lisa would really get down and dirty at the "Club". Was I disappointed when they actually only had sex once, and in New Orleans to boot!!! I will say that the one time they did have sex was worth the price of the book. But the rest of it was very poorly written.
The book just did not hold my interest very well. It was long and tedious, and I couldn't wait for it to be over. The characters were not believable nor were they erotic. They came across quite clown-ish. Anne Rice is an excellent writer, but from this novel you would never believe it.
I have to say that this is one of the worst novels that she has ever written. I just didn't think that it was that entertaining. After finishing the book, I went out and rented the movie, and It is far better than this novel. I am sorry Anne rice, but I can see why you used a pseudo name when you wrote this book. It stinks!
This book wasn't what I expected; never read an Anne Rice, but after reading what others had written, thought I'd buy a book of hers.Should have saved my money; this story was too far-fetched. Didn't finish it.
I bought this book because I thought it would be similar to her "Sleeping Beauty" series. It isn't even close. This is more romance novel than BDSM, and even then the romance is a little cheesy.If you want a romance novel, go ahead and get this book. If you are looking for good BDSM, look elsewhere.
It's not as erotic or engrossing as I thought it would be. There are parts where it begins to get really sensual, but then it ends rather abruptly or doesn't continue long enough for things to develop. Try the Sleeping Beauty novels.
This is some of the worst trash I have ever had the misfortune to listen to. The language is overwrought, the plot far-fetched and shallow, and even the readers sounded embarrassed to be involved in the project. However, it did make me laugh out loud quite often. Maybe the book was better. For a good S&M story, try Alasdair Gray's "Something Leather"
Perhaps in it's time this book was cutting edge, but for those of us within the lifestyle, it's tame and contrived to a very unsatisfying degree. It's ironic that the film adaptation was watered down even more, and turned into one of the worst movies you're likely to see. Ann Rice didn't deserve such treatment.There are books that capture the true essence of the BDSM fanatsy that are much more engrossing, and interestingly enough, Ms Rice has written them as well. (writing as A. N. Roquelaure, see her trilogy in the Sleeping Beauty series)
I've tried all 3 Zoe Bars. (Are there more..?) My personal favorite is the chocolate-peanut butter one. I've purchased 4 boxes in the last few months of that flavor and love them as a between meal snack. They are the only thing I've found that can replace sweets for me and with no guilt after eating.BUT...The chocolate ones are not good tasting nor is it a good texture. Too dense, too strange, odd chocolate similarity but not really chocolate and bad aftertaste. Even worse, however, are the peanut butter ones. I gave those away. At least I'll most likely eat these eventually.
The first thing I noticed about these is they are very dense, with a very waxy but dry and gritty texture. And there really is only a slight chocolate flavor, with a strange aftertaste. They are filling though, but then again so is eating compressed cardboard!
Let me start by saying that I never put down a book, even if I don't like it. This is one that I couldn't even get past the first few pages. Maybe I didn't give it a chance, but the foul language and vile event depicted in the first few pages turned me off completely to this book. I'm glad it was a free download on Kindle. I gave it two stars only because I didn't give it a chance to get better. If I hadn't deleted it, maybe I would give it another chance, but I certainly won't pay for it.
I almost gave up reading this book after a couple of chapters for the same reasons as the 1-star reviewers. I can't say I care for the writing style. It reminds me of the "Guy Noir" skit on "A Prairie Home Companion," which is, of course, supposed to be a funny take-off on these kinds of books. The protagonist seemed to be more of a stereotypical formula rather than a real person. I struggled up through Chapter 9. Then I began to get more invested in the story. I think the writing began to improve a bit and the characters gained some dimension. Still, it ends up being 2 stars for me. Perhaps his later books are better?
I read the first two chapters of this book, and I have to say that the writing was horrible. I can't believe that I wasted my time reading that much of the book.
Sorry, I couldn't get into this one at all. If you want to read some GOOD thrillers located in Bangkok, try John Burdett's books beginning with Bangkok 8.
'Herland' is hardly a cracking read, but it's interesting as a feminist-historical text. It's worth reading, but for the love of Mike get a different edition. This cover is utterly hideous and completely at odds with the ethos of the story. Why would a female-only society, where dress is utilitarian and reproduction asexual, tart themselves up in pink eyeshadow and mascara that would make even an overly-flamboyant drag queen quail?
Herland, by Charlotte Perkins Gilman, tries to take the view of a world without man. The notion that the world would be one peaceful little place without man is absurd. Women as well as men, have competed against each other for centuries. It is ridiculous to assert that women would not fight amongst themselves. If it was at all possible to give this book zero stars, I would.
I know that "Herland" receives quite a bit of praise and is highly regarded. In my opinion, the work doesn't bear up under these accolades. The story is down right boring, which is disappointing considering how engaging Gilman's short stories and other works are. The plot is odd and the message that Gilman is trying to convey is lost. I saw another reviewer call this work a satire, but I would strongly disagree. Gilman did not intend "Herland" to be a satire. She was attempting to show that women were more adept at "social housekeeping" than men were.Unless you have to read it, there are many other and better Gilman pieces to absorb your attention with.
This book is hard for me to understand because most sentences doesn't make sense. Some does make sense but most of them no. Ray Bradbury should do more better then that. I've being forced to read this book because my 9th grade english teacher made us. When I start reading this book it is okey. When I'm on page 30 the sentence doesn't make sense. It just mostly say "I burn bookee". I would rather read Great Expectations instead. If you are a very good reader you may try it.
If you wish to read an Orwellian, dystopian novel set in the future, read the novels by George Orwell himself, 1984 and Animal Farm. Undoubtedly, Fahrenheit 451 is a classic and I guess required reading, if only for completenes, but it certainly failed to hold my interest. I found the writing to be a little more fluffy than what I find enjoyable and the plot is remarkably thin, unlike the richly constructed 1984 and the taut Animal Farm. I'm afraid I can't call myself a Bradbury fan just yet.
fahrenheit 451 starts off well, but definately doesnt end that way. besides the fact the some characters seem unreal and are impossible to relate to, at one point in the book montag and his friend have an incredibly insightful talk and end it in an idiotic plan, but i won't go into that too much. the end is boring and close to impossible to get through. read it, but be prepared.
Basically, Fahrenheit 451 is a let down. The drop off ending cuts off the futuristic plot's potential. There is much colorful vocabulary, but some metaphors are so elaborate and sudden that one hardly knows whether something is actually happening or if it's just a figment of the character's imagination. It is more confusing that challenging to read. The main character, Montag, has a fairly interesting conflict. The only problem is that it is not resolved enough by the end of the book to leave the reader satisfied! Plus, the only moral or meaning from the book is given away early on, leaving nothing to motivate the reader. I recommend this book to nobody, because they will be disappointed.
This book could have easily been summed up in 30 pages! Not that I don't love attention to detail in stories, because I do, but F. 451 just dragged. It was a great concept and good plot but there was certain scenes where Bradbury overevaluated and overexplained everything! I'm never touching this book again.
the book has a good theme but it just dragged on. i did not like this book. montag is stupid to revolt in the first place he knows its the law and he knows what will happen to him if he does. Why did clarisse die there was no point to that just one day mildred said she was dead and montag was like oh ok it was lame and boring. i recomend this book to no one.
I thought this was the worst book I ever read. There was no point and way to confusing. he would ramble on about stuff not even importnat to the plot! i hated reading this! stay away from this book!
Fahrenheit 451 lists in my top 5 of worst books ever. my english class had to read it. i didnt even read the lastsection. by the time the first test rolled around, i hadnt even read 10 pages. i evenually forced myself to read it but stopped when i got to last section cause i thought if i read anymore, i might die. i felt no connection to the characters, no emotion towards them. Everything is drawed out way to much. when he could easly say something in a couple pages, he takes like 50 to tell one little minor thing. For me, its really boring and stupid. For u, many ur will like it. Maybe not. Cant no until u attempt to read it(NOTE: i said attempt)
I had to read this when I was in high school. So did my children. Now my GRANDCHILDREN have to read it! None of us has been able to discover WHY! Of all of the superb books I have read in my life, not ONE has ever been selected for required summer reading!
This book makes absolutely no sense at all. I read the first page and I didn't like it. I have to read it for school and I have fallen asleep 4 times reading it. All of my friends hate it to. We have a test on the 2nd day of 8th grade. Even using the Cliffs Notes didn't help at all. I don't recommend this book to anyone.
If it is, then I will imediatly torch the books to bits and pieces. The book proves one point to me: burning books and their society is much better than ours where Farenheit 451 can be published
This book was a hard read because I didn't find it interesting. It was really strange to me. I was required to read it for my English class. I wouldn't recommend it to anyone because I personally did not enjoy it. I was confused as to what went on the entire way through.
Fahrenheit 451 was a disappointing book for a reader who is not an avid science fiction lover. This book is very difficult to read. The correctors a sometimes very confusing to understand. The setting is also very hard to have a visual picture. Although the plot is very good the way that it is described is hard to understand. I think if you are a science fiction lover that you would like this book. But if you sometimes like to read science fiction you will not like this because you have to be a huge science fiction lover to like this. I also think you need to be above the 6th grade or a very advanced reader.
Fahrenheit 451 is the worst book I have ever read in my whole life. I was forced to read it in school, and I disguised the book starting at the first page. There is absolutely nothing good in the book. It makes no sense, and I personally don't think the world will become to be, as predicted in this book. I also find this book very offensive to my religious beliefs. How can a book that takes the name of the Lord in vain, in almost every page, be used as a class novel. Everyone knows that taking the Lord's name in vain is breaking one of God's commandments, and is a sin. I have never read a book that was as bad as Fahrenheit 451 in language. I don't understand how the school boards can justify such a book, and use it for classes. Anyone who hasn't read this book, don't waste your time!
Confusing, disturbing, and stupid are some of the few words to use when describing this book. Firemen who start fires?? Come on. Burning every book that exists, this isn't a look into the future. It's a look into Bradbury's twisted little mind. Bottom Line.... Don't waste your time.
Haing missed this book in school, somehow, I've always meant to read it since I keep hearing great things about it. I don't know if my expectations were too high or I'm just missing something that everyone else sees, but I didn't like it.The idea that political correctness grows into something so ridiculous that not only are books burned, but the houses that they occupy are burned also was just impossible for me to swallow. Add to that only a single character that was likeable at all (and she was killed off pretty early), then a pretty boring story to go along with it, and the only reason I was able to finish it was because it was so short.I don't see any reason why anyone would want to read this book, but I'm clearly in the minority on this one, so maybe you'll like it better than I did.
I marked one star only because I cannot give it anything lower. I placed this order on Jan. 10. Time to get the order came and went. Here it is Feb. 7, and I still do not have the CD of Fahrenheit 451. Is this company located on the moon? Why is it taking SO long for my order to get here? I am MOST displeased. I will never order anything from this company CheapBks4U again. This service is atrocious.
This book has been raved about as a classic SF story for many years now, so I decided it had to be worth reading. How wrong I was! As with many so called "brilliant classics" the author gets a novel idea and then tries to run with it. Unfortunately, the story fizzles out completely towards the end and the full impact of the original message dies with it. I was very disappointed with this book and wonder how people rate books like this so highly. Don't bother reading it!
After reading it for a school project I would avise anyone reading these reviews to stay clear of it unless your eighty and you want waste your last few months of your life. Pointless, which school teachers of little old scotland make you read. If we have to burn books I put this one up to get burned straight away.
Last year we had to read this as a class. There were two books our teacher made us read that I hate with a passion this is one of them. I could not stand the way Bradbury writes most authors would say the pit pat of rain he would say the pit pat pit pat pit pat and so on for half a page it was royally annoying and as far as what the guy said about it being about individuality and conformity if you want to read about that read Ayn Rand's Anthem. It is much better, and deserves its status as a classic unlike this one.
I order the book a week before it shipped and then took so long to get here I had to download the book to my daughters Kindle the night before she needed it for school. That cost me $9.99, and then got the book on the 4th or 5th of February. Won't use this one again.
Personally, I found the background idea of this book very smart and "appetizing":a world where books were forbidden and the fire-eaters were actually fire-blowers fighting in the name of mind-globalization against the dangers of reading and building your own way to think and to face life. Unfortunately I reckon that the style is weak, words are just thrown without explanesions in the pages, sentences are chopped in a way that often made me feel totally extraneous to the plot. A heavy atmosphere floats in this book and I had to fight hard to keep on reading. In simple words, I'd mark it 4 out of 5 for the subjects but only 2 out of 5 for the style.
I have Always preferred to hear an author read their own works because only they really know what was intended--until now. Mr. Bradbury has one tone and one tone only and that is carried out with a mush-mouth. It's just horrendous and painful to listen to. Go find another copy--trust me (I would quit but I'm trying to finish it for a book club). Mercifully @ 5 CDs it's pretty short.Amendment: So after finishing, I must say that the last CD is just an interview with the author and it's really very interesting. If you'd like to hear him talk about his life, the books genesis, etc., skip to the last CD. I did enjoy that and it's almost like a different person speaking. He's so much more gregarious when just talking.
I finally got around to this classic young adult novel. I figured since I'm in the young adult literature class for my MLIS, I might as well catch up. I never read the book because I was dryly bored by all of Ray Bradbury's work. I just can't seem to feel any passion for science fiction.Not that Fahrenheit 451 is scifi. There is a strong presence of metaphor in this book; too heavy a presence for my reading delight, though the idea is cute. Firemen ignites fires to destroy knowledge aka power. 1984 with an arson's twist. But the conclusion was so obvious from the start that I thought, why read what's in between?Written during an era of Cold War fear, I can see the appeal of his plot. But I wish Bradbury had either revved up the scifi and gave me an all out apocalypse or gave up on the robotic dogs and let the political hounds do more communist hunting.
I have always liked this book to read so I thought I would get it on CD. Ray Bradbury reads it, and it is very bad. It was so painful to listen to his voice I had to turn it off. He reads in such a monotone voice it put me to sleep. Someone needs to re-make the CD's.
This is definitely one of the WORST books I have ever come across. In the modern version, there is a forword and an introduction. Both of them have nothing to do with the story, and Ray Bradbury babbles on and on about his past and how he came up with the ideas for other books that NO ONE CARES ABOUT! I almost fell asleep during the forword, I dont know how I survived the book. The book drags on and one at a painfully slow pace. As for Ray Bradbury himself, he states in the introduction that in his eyes, Hitler burning and brutally killing people is on the same level as the burning of a book. I think that this statement is pretty much self explanatory for his views on humanity. Great guy, eh?
This book is quite possibly the worst piece of science fiction I have read... It is dramatically boring and far too contrived to be interesting... The world Bradbury creates is thoroughly dry and I simply hated his look at the future... Nothing was at all interesting or thought-provoking, except for the books examination into the issues of censorship as a whole. I like fantastically created worlds and futures, but when they're dry and brittle like this, you simply long for the pages of the book itself to burn bitterly....
To put it simply: this book sucked. Although this is a very juvenile way of putting it, it fits perfectly. This book was so boring, that all the description Bradbury puts in couldn't possibly describe how slowly it moves. If Bradbury wanted us to realize the importance of books, the LEAST he could do was make this book SEMI-interesting! Essentially: Don't waste your time.
I had to read this book for school. I, personally, don't care for any type of science fiction, so that could play a part in my rating, but it was very confusing and not worth my time. The book is about Guy Montag who is a fireman from three or four hundred years in the future where firemen cause fires instead of putting them out. The book mentions people Montag meets and is friends with and about his failing relationship with his wife. There are many 'futuristic' objects in this book which keeps you thinking and confused. The book ends in a chase which was by far the best part. If you don't enjoy science fiction, I do not recommend this book for you. I only read it because it was required of me.
I found this book to be very dry and boring. I tried to compare this to The Giver, and I just conuldn't. I know that there are some good points to it, but not enought to sit and read it over and over again.PS-If you don't agree with me, please don't click the "No" button below.
I really did not like this book! Now, don't get me wrong the idea was good, but the writing was horrible. I normally like Ray Bradbury's work, too. The writing style was very repetitive and boring. I think that this is one of those books that could have been great if written differently.
who ever wrote this dumb confusing book is in a mental state of mind! Fahrenheit 451 is a overworded description of a fireman who lives on rebellion! It is a bad influence on the young people of the world. THIS BOOK SHOULD BE BURNED!
I picked up this book with such high expectations-Ray Bradbury is relavtively famous, the book is fantastically reknowned, and it is about censorship, an issue that I really care about.Well. My expectations were smothered, stabbed repeatedly, and left on the floor to die. This is not a good book. Bradbury's writing is incredibly confusing, and some pivotal parts of the story are so removed from the main plot that you can't understand them.Bradbury has a penchant for killing off characters. For example, one character, that changes the life of the main character, is dead 20 pages into the book. If she was burned 'cause she had books, fine, but she got run over by a car. How stupid is that?Pass this one up, and for a real futuristic utopia, try 1984. Just not this.
While I can appreciate Bradbury's views on television's effects on people, I believe he gave far too much credence to the communistic approach to controlling people by doing away with books. Considering the beautiful complexity of a book like Dandelion Wine, this was disappointingly simplistic and unrealistic. And as to the war and the 'bomb' at the end, he stepped totally out of reality, since by the time this was written, the world would have known that the effects of radiation went far beyond the initial destruction. And he gave no explanation as to why there should have been a war at all. Bradbury ignored these issues to the detriment of his entire concept.
At first I thought that Fahrenheit 451 sounded very interesting, and I was glad to see that my 10th grade teachers had assigned the reading of it. By page 3 of the novel, however, I knew this was not a book I would enjoy. While it's a frightening, though thought-provoking look at the way society could become, it was extremely badly written. Bradbury goes on and on for pages of nonsense, and his words leave you with no more enlightenment than you had 50 pages ago. He uses redundant adjectives, and pointless sentences. I was especially annoyed when he would go "inside" Mr. Montag's thoughts and repeat the same meaningless phrases over and over again. I wouldn't recommend this book to a single person, and my condolances to any other student forced to waste their time on this. Fahrenheit 451 is one of the few books I would gladly toss in the fire.
How ironic that a book about limiting access to books is NOT text-to-speech enabled. By preventing access to TTS, the publisher has denied my blind husband the opportunity to read this book on his Kindle through text-to-speech as he wants to do. He will not buy audio books so the publisher makes no sale at all. He bought his Kindle for the express purpose of being able to read books through the text-to-speech function. Unfortunately, too many books have this feature disabled - often through Simon & Schuster. It is especially ironic that the publisher would limit the blind community's access through Kindle TTS when this book centers around removing access to books. Everyone loses.
I don't like this book very much. This is the most boring book I have ever read. I will not recommend this book to my friends because it's boring. "Fahrenheit 451" is about Guy Montag, a fireman, who starts fire but does not putout fires. In this society, the fireman has to set up fires and burn the books. Usually when we hear "fireman", we always think about that their job is to put out fires. It is totally different than we thought, right? This book is about censorship, that is, people does not have the right to read. In that society, the firemen have the rights to burn. Not only books, but also the houses and people. In this book, an innocent woman who has being burn in her house with her books. How can the fireman has the right to burn a human life, a human life! Especially a book lover, How?
Length:: 3:49 MinsFahrenheit 451Fahrenheit 451: A Novel
Well, basically what happens without all the boring details is there is this guy named Montag and he is a fire fighter. The only thing is, the job of the fire fighter is to start the fires rather than putting them out. Well one day when he has to burn this old womens house it really hits him hard because she refuses to get out of her house before they light it on fire. So the firemen end up burning her house, the books that were in it, and the old lady. That made him think that there must have been something in those books worth dying for. Then he met this girl name Clarisse who made him start thinking even more. So he sort of came to the conclusion that he really did not enjoy doing what he did for a living.
Okay,first off I would like to say that I enjoy almost any book I read. This book has made it to the top of my "burn this book" list. Dont get me wrong, the idea was well thought up, but the book wasn't well written. First off, the book starts off with someone trying to commit suicide,and this character is saved even though she's totally wack. Second, the main character is named "GUY MONTAG". How origanal. Third, the people in this book are IDIOTS! I mean, first they outlaw all "offensive" material, then they condense great novels into two page stories,and then they sit around on thier butt all day watching the "family" argue and OFFEND each other. The best character in the book simply dissappears in the middle of the book, and then she is found dead. Not only that but no one has friends. Not even your spouse is your friend. What kind of wack society doesn't have friends. This book needs to be re-written, and seriously re-done
As much as I love Ray Bradbury and all of his books, he should have the good sense to have an actor read Farenheit 451 -- Ray stumbles and mumbles his way through the book, to the point that his beautiful writing loses all it's power and grace. Can't recommend this version, although the last disc is a nice interview with Ray about his writing process.
at 180 pages i realized that i was one-quarter through the story and not even slightly interested in continuing. so i visited amazon ans clicked on the one-star reviews to see if their frustration was my frustration. if i finish it, it will be because i force myself. just before this book, i finished "on writing" by stephen king who points out [i almost wrote emphatically]: don't use adverbs ever. and if sparingly. Fahrenheit 451 is crammed full of "he said softly" and "she said slowly." my review: timewaster.
I am admitting this review does not relate to the actual book but to Amazon so with apologies to Ray Bradbury...Ten bucks? Really? Come on Amazon, you know this book is on a lot of school reading lists. My kid loves her Kindle but when I can buy her school reading book lists for $2 at the used book store, you lost. In fact, it is a weird circle of irony - we used to buy books, they got too expensive, bought the kindle, it was great, then you made the books expensive again and... now we buy the books. You lost an opportunity here, Amazon. For the record, she hasnt picked up her Kindle in a month.Too bad for you.
The book although very confusing , as the author uses too much detail , was intruiging . One of the things that didn't make sense was the reason for the character of clarisse mclellan's dissapearance. The ending of the book is too sudden , as if he rushed to complete the book .
I read Fahrenheit 451 this year, in the seventh grade, as a required reading. As I read this book, I got more and more confused. The plot twisted and turned and left me hanging wondering "wait... what happened?". Mr. Bradbury used large words that I learned as vocab. I would recommend this book to no one under the age of about 13, maybe 12. I chose this age because of the hard concepts of burning books and the fast-moving plot of the hound.
this book was really boring and i had to read it for a book report so instead of me reading the whole book i just rented the movie from blockbuster and watched the movie it was much easier
I heard so much about this book before I finally picked it up. And when I did get around to reading it...I wasn't impressed. Yes, the author's ideas are scary: That in the future, firemen set fires to burn books. One firefighter, Guy Montag, begins to look at his life more closely and discovers how empty it is. He begins to take books home from many of the places he has destroyed. Clarisse, Guy's next door neighbor, and seemingly the one that set his book-stealing into motion, is one of the most interesting characters. Unfortunately, she disappears without much explanation. I did see some good messages in this vision of the future, but I felt a little bit cheated too, because I wanted to get a better glimpse at this society that spawned this fire fighter-book burners. I'm not debating if it should be a classic or not, I'm just saying it was not personally a very good book to me.
Sure, this book gives some harsh warnings about the desensitization of our culture and the withering away of intellectual importance, but its radical premise detracts from the story's legitimacy and worth. Bradbury anticipates a complete elimination of all books and literature, and I do agree that we are moving in a more automated, fast-paced society with less emphasis on love and personal relationships. But we will never reach such an extreme level, its simply a rediculous concept. I contest that we cannot worry about whether others are getting their daily dose of Shakespeare, Joyce or the Bible, and if we choose to read on our own, we will always have the chance to do so. I imagine that if you are reading this review, you don't run a high risk of losing interest in books in your lifetime. Yes, Bradbury does offer a striking prophesy of the direction of societal development, but to use this book as the basis for an outrcy against our culture's future is ludicrous.
I am a huge science fiction fan and heard from many people that this is one of the ultimate Sci-fi classics. So, I decided to read it. I was very dissapointed. Though some concepts were fairly interesting they were not developed, so book had no point. I cannot understand why this novel is as famous as it is. Do not waste your time reading Fahrenheit 451.
Fahrenheit 451 is an unusual book about an alternate future. In this book, firemen have to start fires instead of putting them out. But they don't just randomly burn down peoples houses. They burn down the ones in which people have books; you may by thinking why would they care about books. Well, in this alternate future, books are illegal. I bet that this seems very ironic to you, but yes, it is a book about there being no books. I didn't like this book. I felt that that his writing style was very unusual. The author, Ray Bradbury, didn't have difficult sentences, but he did seem to jump around. He would never be very clear. Within each and every page he would jump around, or lose the readers attention by rambling on in an unorthodox style. If there were a prime age group for this book it would have to be junior high schoolers to high schoolers. That is probably because it is about that difficulty and this alternate future may be the most appealing to this age.
This book was hard to read from the start. Eventually one can infer what is going on, but very little is explained plainly. The copy I read was from the library, and there were mispelled sticky notes throughout with what looked like two middle schoolers trying to figure out what was going on. (For instance, "Why is Beatty ask about the dog? Dose he know where the books are?")The ending is alright, and I really liked the quote about how the inability to build creates a need to destroy.
I had to read Fahrenheit 451 for class in eighth grade, and from the beginning, I knew this book would turn out be quite eloquent and philsosphical, but also extremely tedious. I almost fell asleep in some occasions. Bradbury does a good job describing sections in the story, but sometimes gets carried away and forgets about some mood. For example, when the city is bombed, there should be some line of chaos and the people inhabiting the city running for their lives. In conclusion, I struggled through the book and only read it out of coercion. I would never read this again.
This book is boring. Unless you are interested in science fiction or Ray Bradbury's work you probably wont like it. This book takes place in the future in a world where all books are banned. People spend a lot of time watching television. Montag, the main character is a firefighter who burns books. The story of the book is ok but it gets boring and there is no excitement. The book is easy to read and there isn't any very hard vocabulary. Don't read this book if you are in fourth grade or younger because it might be to hard to read, just stick to the movie if you are interested in this topic.
I AM A FRESHMEN AND I WAS REQUIRED TO READ THIS BOOK.I AM ON PAGE 29. I DON'T GET A WORD I HAVE READ. I FEEL LIKE I'M READING IN A DIFFERENT LANGUAGE. MABY IT'S BECAUSE I'M YOUNG.OR BECAUSE I'M ONLY ON PAGE 29.ALL I KNOW IS THAT I'M LOST.I WOULD LIKE TO THANK ALL THE OTHER PEOPLE WHO REVIEWED THIS BOOK. YOU HAVE HELPED ALOT.
Ray Bradbury was a fantastic WRITER. I wish he would have stuck to his strengths. Choosing to read this book himself for the audio recording was a tremendous mistake. His speech is, at times, nearly unintelligable (He was over 80 years old at its recording). What should have been a wonderful audio book ended up being a complete chore to listen to. Writers of films know enough to cast proffesionals to act-out their visions. Writers should be no different. Do yourself a favor, read the book yourself.
This book was horribly written!! It confused more than it enlightened!!! I did not enjoy it at all and I never plan to read it again.
I ordered a book for my grandson's school summer reading program. The book was supposed to be Fahrenheit 451 and I received a totally different book. I returned the book and by the time another book could be sent would be too late.I probably will not order from this site again.
when i read Farenheit 451, my first impression was that this book is so screwed up. i mean like who would want to not read a book. thats just so wrong. the one thing i did like about the book was Guy's wife, Mildred. i liked her alot because she said that the t.v was her family. she was a little crazy though. i also liked the part where she called the firemen and told them that Guy had books. then she walked out on him. i also liked the mechanical dog. that was something very original. i gave the book 2 stars because i really thought that it was a waste of time to read it. but you know, that is only my impression of the book.Writen By:Jessica C.
I didn't really care for this book. Fahrenheit 451 is not far-fetched though. I think some of the material mentioned in this book really could happen in the future if we let it. This is a fairly good book overall, but I'm rating it a 2 out of 5 stars because I was just confused. I am a freshmen in high school and my whole Literature Pre-AP class had to read Fahrenheit 451 for an assignment. Now I know what you're probably thinking, well of course it's going to be confusing for a freshmen. But, I beg to differ. This book is written good I suppose, but the story jumps around too much and certain parts come up and it is just plain confusing (i.e. Dentham's Dentifrice). Well that is about all I have to say about this novel. I'm sure if I read it over again I would enjoy it more. But I don't think this book would be much more than 2 or 3 stars.
I first read this book in my L.A. class at school. This book has many meanings tied into it. Fahrenheit 451 is different then what I usally read. This book has so many hidden detals in it. In this book I can acutally see our world now ending up like the world in this book. The author of this book was brillant to make up a world like this. The main character Montag was great I could realt to him and put myself in his shoes that's what I like so much about this book. If I didn't read this book in class I probably would never read it.Hi Ms. O!!!!
Fahrenheit 451 is a book is filled with action and suspense. If you like a book that has many twists and turns, then you'll enjoy this book by Ray Bradberry. He tried to write about what he thought would be the worst future, with no books. They would set books onfire, because to read and poses a book is unlawful. The people believed that books made people upset, think up different ideas, and unequal. The firefighters we know now would set things on fire, not put out the fire like they do now. This book is fairly easy to understand, middle schoollers should be able to understand the vocabulary.
The book, Fahrenheit 451 by Ray Bradbury, is a perfect example of a science fiction book. This book is about the life of a fire fighter named Guy Montag who lives in a futuristic city where books are banned. The job of fire fighters in his view of the future are to set books and the houses they are hiding in on fire. The reasoning for this is that books are said to be evil and contain many different thoughts and emotions that are considered "dangerous" if people are exposed to them. This book pretty difficult to read based on its challenging vocabulary and its confusing situations. I would recommend this book to people no younger than 7th grade based on the content of the book, and I would recommend it to people with a strong interest in science fiction and futuristic books.
Not being a passionate Science Fiction reader, I did not enjoy Bradbury's writing ideas and form. I found this book to be a very slow read, not moving very fast. Some of Bradbury's ideas did not seem to fit into the story. I found this story to be too far into the future to relate to. I found the action of burning books to be very unreal in any society. I have read some other stories from Bradbury and part of one of his other books, Dandelion Wine, and Fahrenheit 451 did not match up to some of Bradbury's other works.
it was very boring and i did not lik it at all. it lacked a basic plot and character development. i was very disappointed with the novel and with Bradbury.
I had to read this book for school, and at first I hated it. The beginning chapter is hard to understand because of all the symbolism, however, it eventually gets better. (slowly) It is easy to miss some concepts if you don't read slowly enough. I felt that the ending was far-fetched and boring. I did enjoy reading about a dystopian society, but altogether, the book is tedious and slow-moving.
Another dark, gloomy, mildly confusing, Blade Runner-ishview of the future lacking in any redeeming qualities."In the future, Firemen burn books" -- Bradbury createsan inventive premise but his own gloom overtakes the story.Fraught with loose ends, this is the last book you readbefore you set yourself on fire.
Bradbury is a good writer (I'll give him that), but I HATE his writing style. He starts making huge long mini-stories within the main story that has no point and is useless. He could have written this book in 50 less pages, and it might've gotten 2 stars. I think this is a terrible book, no offense to anyone who likes it.
If you are a high-school student, this would be a stunner, but to anyone with a little more life experience and a shred of political awareness, the book comes across as dated, patronizing and condescending.
Fahrenheit 451 is a great book to read but deadly to listen to on the CD. Ray Bradbury reads in expressionless monotony. I tried to listen to the first CD five times and finally gave up. Stick with the book where you can supply your own voices.
I am frustrated by the sloppiness of this book. From what I understand, Bradbury sat in a library and wrote it in a few weeks, and it shows. Montag is introduced as a man happy in his job. The meeting with Clarisse blows his mind! But then Bradbury throws in numerous details indicating that his dissatisfaction has been mounting for some time. Although Montag is purportedly of a divided mind, the development of his character is very abrupt and unconvincing. But why develop what is essentially a mouthpiece for your own ranting? Blech. Bradbury's ideas have come to fruition in our time, but, ironically, his own work is not literature at all. I do not understand why this work is lauded as a classic.
This book is pretty good, except it is definitely very advanced. It was very confusing, especially the "TV family" which I did not understand at all. It is more of an adult book.
Fahrenheit 451 by Ray BradburyI didnt really like this book, it was all just people rambling on and on about how there life sucks, the whole worlds sucks, and burn books. I dont know how you could enjoy this book. People just talk to talk in this book. Its about a guy named montage that is a firefighter. He burns things instaed of putting fires out. He meets a wierdo girl who talks nonsense, this guy starts to think what hes doing starts reading books and gets caught. He then has to burn his books. He doesnt want to go to jail so he Runs away.
I struggled through this book. If I hadn't had to read it for school, I would have dropped it immediately. The story is dark and unhappy, and the writing style is so flat and boring. It seems as though the author is trying to use big flowery words and stuff, but it doesn't work at all. This is a horrible book.
Hey A reader from MISSOURI, I hear you. This book makes no sense what so ever and i had to read it for school. I have no idesa just how in the world a book this horrible could have stayed around for 40 years!!! I have talked to everyone I know and they all read the first 5 pages and immeadiatly hated it. THey rented the movie and watched some of it so they won't have to read it, and it was verbatum, and guess what...it was even worse than the book! I do reccomend this book to all of you...well only if you want to find out how terrible books can get or you want to find out what type of flammable liquid burns better on books!
this is very dissapointing, cause after all i heard about the book i thought it suppose to be a masterpiece, but after reading it i discoverd that the writing is very poor, the story is bery weak, and the plot is dull.i think the book lost most of it's taste - a similat book like 1984 is more prefferd to read.
Bradbury has set forth some interesting ideas and prophecies in this book but as far as entertaining and suspensful goes I would give it about an "F" grade. It squeeks two stars.
This book is one of the worst I have read!! Classic or not it still was bad!!! I had to read this for school and I hated it! It was soo simple. Only one thing happens in the entire book and that one thing isn't even exciting!
I read this book and i hated it. Don't waste your money on it. It will ruin any respect you have for books. Three words: DON'T BUY IT!!!!!!
first of all i was assigned to read this book for a class. it started out lame. and all it did was get worse. who cares about a firefighter who burns book. now come on, i could write a book, about books,ten times better then that. maybe if the books had names and talked then maybe it would of caught my attention.
This book really sucks. It makes no sense whatsoever and is a waste of my time. Ray should have had better things to do
I'm no advocate of book burning, but burn this book! It was terribly disappointing--lots of hype over a cheesy science-fiction novel. There are two major problems with it. One is poor language usage--lousy descriptive word choices, lousy metaphors and similes that make inappropriate comparisons--and two, not enough attention paid to societal problems that give rise to things like book burning in the first place: the threat of the individual to the group; government control over the sheep-like masses; the modern epidemic of people's lack of interest in anything intellectual; the timeless epidemic of a fear of anything that goes against group mentality or upsets the status quo, and so on. Bradbury touches on some of these issues, but leaves them largely undeveloped.
i purchased this thinking it was a music video dvd which it is not its more of a documentry with no videos
If you want a sick, disgusting, perverse movie, look no further. You've found it.One word: Feh!In NIGHT TRAIN TO TERROR, glum Jehovah and amused Beelzebub sit opposite each other in a train's dining booth. Three repulsive stories are presented in-between performances from an early-Madonna influenced pop band, complete with breakdancing vocalist. Ancient spectral black conductor and porter inexplicaby shuffle between cars. Visuals in the first segment alone include lobotomy, amputation, heads preserved in jars of formaldehyde and hanging body parts. Lots of booby shots for ogling snuff perves. (grabs some filth-removing eyewash)Parenthetical number preceding title is a 1 to 10 IMDb viewer poll rating.(2.7) Night Train to Terror (1985) - Richard Moll/Cameron Mitchell/John Phillip Law/Marc Lawrence/Ferdy Mayne/Tony Giorgio/Earl Washington/Gabriel Whitehouse
A dead girl is found in a field and that leads us to several stories that kind of involve her. Each one is dark and dreary and slow. Toni Collette and Piper Laurie reinact Carrie in the first segment which adds nothing to the film. Actually only the "Wife" and the "Dead Girl" seem really worth watching and both of those are very dark and again slow and dreary. Lots of good people in this, but no real mystery or suspense. Really just kind of depressing and that's does not make for entertainment. The real world is depressing enough.
That's N-i-e-t-z-s-c-h-e, and what he wrote bears no relation to this movie.In this stinker, all the men seem like predators, or are unappealing at best, all the women are victims. If this is reality--the reality of L.A. or anywhere, I want no part of it. In my experience, people from most classes have some kind of spark or charm. This is a film that mistakes vileness and vapid, blank suffering for profundity or realism.Watch them suffer! On second thought, don't! The most unappealing group of people I've ever fast-forwarded through in recent memory--even worse than The Hawk is Dying.I like dark films--but this is just rub yer nose in it vile and stupid.Avoid at all costs! Yech!
Two (2) of the the selections on this disc have static & skip, in fact, the 2nd one just stops after a while. The product is virtually un-usable.
the charger did work that is the only positive after one day the top broke off charger and the wires are exposed. I guess you get what you pay for..... low grade merchandise
I bought 2 of these and a RAZR battery from EFORCE CITY throught AMAZON assuming that Amazon would enforce some truth in advertising. Clearly all 3 products are china knockoffs according to the counterfit guide that one finds on other motorola product pages, but conveniently left off this one. I wrote eforce to compalin (dont bother calling!) and they insisted that all of their products came straight from Motorola!The chargers work fine, so for the price, I got what I paid for. The battery however (also clearly a knockoff) held less of a charge than the one it was replacing. I asked for a replacement(OEM as advertised this time Please!) and another knockoff was sent. Im disappointed in AMAZON for this. I was told to return anything I was unhappy with. Ill lose out on shipping both ways.one star because it worked, and they lied.Motorola Counterfeit Identification Guidebook: Motorola, Inc.
According to the Motorola guide, the charger I received is a counterfit: It has a illuminated blue dot rather than a fully illuminated "M". It works OK, but should not be represented as made by Motorola.
I bought this charger for only a couple of bucks and it works like a charm. I don't expect it last forever so i purchased a couple of back-ups just in case. Each one of these Adapters failed after a couple months use, even light use. I would skip this one and seek another way to charge such as an using an inverter and home plug in charger. This year I switched to an iPhone.
This product did not last two months. I brought it for emergencies and when I needed it, it wasn't working.
It works. That's the best I can say about it. The outer insulating cover has started to wear off in many places, exposing wire after only a month. My phone is telling me that I am using an unauthorized charger. So no, this was not a good purchase, and I do not trust the source.
I have been looking for this adapter for some time now and found it at Amazon.com. The price is great, arrived before schedule, in new condition but did not work in my car. Everything fit properly but it would not charge my phone - I did not notice an illuminated LED which would indicate power input. In all fairness, my cigarette lighter may be on the brink and therefore not transferring current/voltage; I doubt it though. I had already thrown away the packaging so I couldn't return it so now I'm stuck with it.Maybe once I insert it into another vehicle, it may work. For now, this is it.
As a longtime deer-lover, years ago I found a copy of this DVD at my local supermarket and bought it, thinking that I would probably love it. However, I was wrong. This is just another one of those boring movies featuring adorable animals that serve as the highlight of the entire film, but eventually over time their endearing qualities gradually start to recede in your opinion, leaving you to mindlessly sit through the remainder of the film. Not only that, but the fawn barely appears in the second episode on this DVD (only two cartoons are featured), and the cartoons are so old that you can hardly understand a word that anybody is saying.
I'm a huge fan of both the film and the author (check out his music!) but was pretty disappointed by this book. While Jaworzyn's choice of quotes (it's told 'oral histroy' style a la Please Kill Me, etc) certainly gives insight into things such as the process of making the film and the now legennadry financial fallout that followed, very little is told about the characters or the script. The detailed descriptions of what exactly went into filming border on the academic and may bore the bejeezus out of anyone who doesn't already have a background in filmmaking. There is very little information on the writing process - maybe it's just me, but I would have preferred to hear who inspired the Hitchhiker character, for instance, than read pages about foreign licensing and shady deals.
This book may be of value to someone who really knows Virgil and Virgilian scholarship, but Horsfall's style is so idiosyncratic, and his approach so random, that students and other intermediate readers are best warned off. Ideas are presented, or hinted at, in sentences or sentence fragments overflowing with parentheses, exclamation points, question marks, footnotes, and cross-references. The text is poorly edited and in places doesn't make any sense at all. Overall, one gets the impression that Horsfall (who wrote most of the book, and translated two chapters from Italian into his own idiom) is a brilliant scholar who welcomes us into his brain but really can't be bothered tidying up before we come in.
BloodRune is written in a unique first-person present-tense that I've never seen in another book. This gives a very interesting perspective on the story itself when told as it's happening by the characters that are there. This book follows characters more than the plot, and that's reflected by a bit of a lack of direction to begin with but is tied together once the plot is worked up to. In much the same light, there's a fair amount of content to begin with that seems pointless at the time, mere plot filler, but much of that is explained once the plot starts to come into play. BloodRune ends with a dramatic twist, leading up to the series that was intended to follow. Unique characters, carefully placed humor, realistic plot development, and a very interesting perspective make this book worth taking a closer look. A free preview of two pages can be found at the publisher's site.
Thanks to the people at Vivendi Universal for making quite possibly one of the most horribly boring/glitchy/... games of my life. How could you take such a good story, and turn it into the most rotten expierence of my life. Was this game test played EVER before its release? Obviously not.... Let me list the pros and cons:pros:*now cons:-combat is few and far between and when it comes about it usually takes 45 minutes for the enemy to run at you, attack, then run back to its spot (awesome)-not only can your character go of the screen and get stuck, other NPC can do the same! (real sick)-equipping and sharing items only takes about 400 years of your life, forget about all your goals and dreams. This is way better.-the dialouge (like the game itself) seems to be written by children-the games ends in the mines because of a horrible bug in this awfuly designed game.I hope this review sways you from even playing this game...
ATTENTION!DO NOT BUY THIS GAME!I REAPEAT!DO NOT BUY THIS GAME.IT IS BUGGY AND NO FUN WHAT-SO-EVER.THANK YOU FOR LISTENING
I had high hopes for this game since I'm a big Tolkien fan and really like good GBA RPGs. Boy, was I disappointed! First off the game is horribly slow. Combat takes forever, and is boring since your character miss all the time. You'll spend hours walking around looking for mundane items like flowers or Pippen.Add to that fact that the game is horribly buggy. Gimli turns invisible in one quest, sometimes the elves don't give you items you need, and I've yet to meet anyone online who found a way out of Moria without the game crashing.Don't buy this waste of a game. Save your money and either wait for one of the other Lord of the Rings games coming out this Christmas (The Two Towers) or buy Golden Sun or Castlevania instead. This is a prime example of a great license going to waste.
This game is more based on the book then any other lotr game. But the battles are terribly slow, some items don't work, things that the game promised are taken out, the graphics are awful, and there are some terrible glitches in the game, especially the Moria Glitch which made me go out buy another one (I thought the first one was a defect) and go through the same glitch again. Even if you are a huge lotr fan you should probably stay away from this game.
I am a huge fan of Tolkein books and lord of the rings especially. This was actually a pretty fun game for a while, I can't complain, I bought it in a bargain bin for $5 bucks, and I was thinking "What am I going to lose?" I lost 5 bucks and I want it back. I liked how it had aspects of the books instead of the movies in them, like Tom Bombadil and such. I would have more stars for it (1, mayyybe 2) if I didn't get stuck in Rivendell. I think I got Gimili's axe a step ahead of when I was supposed to and when I talk to him he says he needs it. Game over. There is nothing I can do to progress. And what really sucks is that I saved it before I knew that I was stuck. So its either spend another 3-5 hours replaying it and getting back to that part to progress, or quitting. I think I'll just quit and maybe sell it for a buck on Amazon.
I could have made it through this game several x by now, but the glitches stuck me in trees in caves over drop-offs, etc., numerous times. I'm done... didn't even bother to finish and I was well past Morea. Someone said the ending sucks, so what am I missing anyhoo? I'll try the other two, heard they were better. I'm glad I logged on here to see the reviews (that perfectly match mine) or I might have gone out to buy another copy... thought this cartridge had been flushed and just stamped on the grahics glitches were so bad! But no they say, this game just stinks. Don't waste your money, borrow this one from a friend at the most and see what everyone means. Does not deserve the one point I had to give it.
This is the worst LOTR game ever!!! It takes hours to figure out the damn forest, and a lot of other crap!! My brother bought itoff ebay, and only played it once. The graphics suk, the battle is turn based and slow, and it cost us 30 friken $$!!! Don't listen to the other reviews. This game sux. Buy Return of the King and forget about dis.
This game has so many bugs I'm suprised it works at all. I can't even finish because of a glitch in the Mines of Moria. I wish I could get my money back.
ATENTION ALL PERSONS!DO NOT BUY THIS GAME.I REPEAT DO NOT BUY THIS GAME.IT IS NOT FUN.You'd think that they'd have music and the game does,until you make a move pretty much.Poorly designed,Buggy,You could go on and on about it's flaws. final grade F ...NOT BUY THIS GAME
This game is boring. You can't follow the story line, and if I hadn't read the books I would not understand it at all. The fight scenes take too long and they are also boring. In the mines of Moria there is this one place where you have to go but you get stuck because the game has a bug. The controls are extremely weird and take a long time to get used to. I have bought this game and I do not like it. I would suggest not buying it.
This is the worst Gameboy Advance ever I can not belive I wasted my money on this. Buy a good game like Golden Sun, Wario Land 4, Spyro season of ice, Crash Bandacoot, and Sonic Advance. If you buy it get it for a different gameing platform. Never buy a game after a book or movie for Gameboy Advance I bought Harry Potter for Computer and my friend bought it for Gameboy Advance and I was amazed at how much better the game was for computer. So I highly suggest that you do not buy this game for Gameboy Advance.
As a Lord of the Rings fan i was excited about the upcoming Game be Vivendi Universal. You can play as any part of the company of the ring, from the first book, " Fellowship of the Ring". The game follows the book very well, but the gameplay is a different story. In many areas you get stuck and find that the only way to get out of being stuck is by restarting the game. If you are willing to play, and play to finish the game, then you might find this a good game. The graphic are alright compared to others and you may find that it seems to have a dark tint. If you are a fan of the book you will enjoy this game, if not, i sugjest finding a different game to play
Is this the same GBA "Lord of the Rings: Fellowship of the Rings" that was produced by Vivendi? Now it is said to be by "Jack of All Games". If this is the same cartrige, and it looks identical, this is the buggiest game I've ever seen. I have never even been able to get out of Rivendell, because Bilbo won't drop Sting, the Elves won't drop Gimli's Axe, and Gimli doesn't show up at the exit to get his axe. Unless these things happen you cannot leave Rivendel. I have played through to Rivendell twice, and it just gets stuck there. There are numerous other bugs as well, the game freezes in the house where you fight spiders, and when you enter the mines of Moria, although I have never even gotten that far. This would be a good game, if it worked. But it does not.
I was shocked to find so many glitches in this game! Give me a break; shouldn't products like this be tested and retested? I am not even talking about the silly and useless actions I was forced to take to make certain events happen, I am talking about outright glitches! I totally gave up when I got stuck in Rivendell. I can't leave the place; the elves won't give me an item I need and there is nothing I can do except start over from the beginning. Forget that! I started Two Towers; it's much less boring and inane, and so far, no glitches.
This "book" (40 pages, including the back cover as a page!) is very close to completely useless. Poorly organized, it does give some useful information, but it rarely puts it in a useful context. The very few drawings are of poor quality and tiny to boot! If you're looking for a start-to-finish process of how to side a house, as I was, this is NOT it.
I was hoping to find detailed instructions for selecting vinyl siding and installing accessories like soffits, trim, adding insulation, etc. I already know the basics of hanging vinyl siding. I found a lot of the instructions and many of the diagrams confusing. I found the FREE planning guides and installation instructions from the siding manufacturers more helpful. At $14.95 it is not worth the money.
Basically, if you ever played mario on the N64, you know what this game is going to be like. It's the same type of scenario where you do various things in each level to achieve stars (or hearts in the case of this game). The graphics are cool, but I just became bored due to the dejavue factor. I was dissapointed.
With.. Mario Sunshine, Metroid Prime, Star Fox, Zelda, & Wario World who's going to have time for this? Please ~Acclaim~ no sequels. Truthfully the first level was so boring I didn't care to go further. I know it reeks that you may have payed ~x~ amount of $'s for this game , but don't beat yourself up. Just brush it off and buy one of the other games I mentioned above. I can only give a few nods for good graphics, sound and idea. Hence the 2 stars.
At first this headset worked well, then it began producing occasional feedback and echo sounds. Now, 14 months later, right after the warrantee expired, I've called support to be informed that the unit is bad and that a repair will cost about $150.Personally, I expect a lot more from a headset that cost over $300.
What's the deal, slipping the fullscreen version of Stuart Little in with the widescreen version of Stuart Little 2 and mislabeling the package?! A 4:3 aspect ratio film should NOT be called a "Deluxe Version" when there is a 16:9 version available. I feel very deceived/taken by this, and am docking these otherwise cute movies 2 full stars for Studio Stupidity.
Adoptive parents should be aware of the problematic aspects of this movie for kids who were adopted. When Stuart's biological parents arrive on the scene and announce that they want Stuart back, his adoptive parents hand him over, no questions asked. There is no sense that adoption is permanent. If your adopted child sees this movie, be prepared to discuss it afterwards and assure your child this would never happen in real life.
This tool does not fit into my American made nail bags.The plastic seems really strong but i will never know cause i cant carry it.
The song selections and Art's playing are truly awesome, but,the sound quality of the first ten tracks is downright pitiful!Track #11, 'Wee Baby Blues' with band & Joe Turner singing, ismore a novelty tune. The 'clean' tracks, #13 thru #19 are allfrom the double-CD release: Art Tatum 20th century piano genius- which is probably a better option. The remaining good track,#12: 'I Got Rhythm' (w/ Tiny Grimes and Slam Stewart) is fromthe CD: I Got Rhythm: Art Tatum Volume 3 (1935-1944)- listen to this disc before buying it!
The pops and hiss are a horrible distraction. Sounds like a cheap tape recording of a really scratched up record. Buy any other Tatum CD and you'll be much happier.
I won't go into the plot as other reviewers have already given you a rather complete synopsis. After the beginning of the book the character development was weak and disappointing. Annie starts out as a strong, quirky individual by mid-book she's so hung up on Jake that she looses her charm and strength of character. Jake was just too angst ridden for me to enjoy. The secondary characters problems just brought the book down further. That, and that their major maritial problem is resolved by sex in the sauna well, once again a female character "melts".....pun intended. I guess I had anticipated stronger female and male characters, the ones I get from ... I think Ms Wells shows promise but the next book I'll get from the library.
Too much time spent on secondary characters or too much time spent apart by the main characters made this very slow reading for me. I really liked Jake to begin with but I eventually came to not really care. The initial conflict was very strong, but then the author seemed to drift off and care more on Jake's in-law's relationship. The final conflict was resolved too easily for me to really buy into it.But it's not all bad. Ms. Wells writing voice is smooth and easy. I'd be interested to see what she comes up with in the future.
Why dont the people who chose songs for Mangione's compilations, instead of just keep putting the same old songs on compilation after compilation, pick some new ones. Perhaps the only reason to buy this album is for "Floating," as it is the only song not yet used for a Chuck Mangione compilation.
I found the product inadequate. This CD is a collection of children's songs, with some narrative, spoken by a child in Japanese, preceding each song. The weird thing is the narrative is completely unrelated to the song. Even my 9 year old figured out that the song following the child's narrative, was in her words "completely random".I don't know why the narrative wouldn't have a strong(er) relationship to the song. That aside, the songs chosen are perfect for very young children, under age 10. But there is no way you are going to "learn" Japanese by listening to this CD. The best result would be that you and a child would improve listening comprehension, which isn't a bad goal, but isn't how I interpreted the CD as advertised.
Just throw them away after 12 hours? I assume these are plastic. So, folks after 12 hours they are obsolete, and throw them out to create more useless landfill trash that will last 10 millenia! Yay, hooray!
I bought 5 of theese for 20.00 dollars. I turned all of them on at 10:10p.m. At exactly 10:11 p.m. they shut off and wouldn't turn back on. They had lost all of their battery and I was forced to throw them away because what is the use of a BROKEN litecube. They JUST HAVE TO make a charger for these. They were cool until they went out.
The section on humor is very good, but if you want to improve your presentation skills, it's no point reading a big book, you have to practice to improve.This book could have been more useful if it were more concise.
My rating is for Amazon, not the product. I placed this order and just received a mail that it is not available. Why is the availability not updated? I still see it being available now. Very disappointing
Being a collector of period pieces, I have never watched a collection with such aweful picture quality. Do not buy this collection if you want mediocre or good quality viewing.
We've watched three of the eight and find them hard going. I thought they would be historical but have found the plots to be mundane and predictable. Maybe the others will be better.
These movies were overall not that good for me. i had 2 of them already and didn't enjoy the others
Been in the computer industry for many years. Trusted ATI in the past, but this card is the worst thing I have ever had to try and install. I spent over 12 hours trying to install this card and make it work. Currently I have been able to get my system back to where it was prior to attempting this installation. If I could only get it to keep from locking up I would be there. To the writers of the latest code for this card, you shoud be hung from the highest tree. I had had high hopes for the functionality of this card, but with this recent adventure, I will never buy anything from ATI again. In summary, I think a perfect acronym for this card is POS, use your imagination!
OK, amazon.com is completely wrong. It says this card is worth [$$$] give or take five cents. The new one, supposedly comming out in August or September, is much better, and is going to be at a retail price of [$$$]. Itis MUCH better, and definately worth the wait. HOWEVER, if you must buy a new graphics card now, you should get the NVIDIA ti 4600 by VISION TREK. Not, by PNY, their customer service is very bad, even though they give a very good warranty. (Even read other reviews about PNY consumers). The NVidia 4600 is much better than the ATI 8500, however again, when the ATI 9700 comes out, that will take the crown. Until than, the NVidia 4600 is proudly wearing it.
I agree with others opinion that if you get lucky and the card installs properly this product is great. I have quite extensive experience with PCs (I have put together over 100 of them) and it took me 6 hours to make this card work. I would give it more stars but..... First of all, when I bought it, it said on a box that FREE VideoStudio 6.0 by Ulead is included. Well it wasn't, instead there was VideoStuio 5.0 which I wasn't able make it work. Secondly, when I tried to contact ATI by email I was getting stupid autoreply totally unrelated to my question why ATI company is cheating their customers. I would call them but they charge you over [X] a minute for support. So the bottom line don't count on any support from ATI.
Used the card for about 4 weeks and had problems with audio which traced to the bad (...) connector on back..efforts to get service have failed ...This card and its associated software should have been more extensively tested by ATI.
I purchased this product to upgrade my old all-in-wonder card. I love ATI for their wonderfully multi-functional cards but they really need to do a better job of writing software for them. I tried to install this card on Windows 2000 with all the latest drivers and with the exact instructions (after reading another review here) for each driver. The end result was video with vertical lines on both the DVD player and the TV software. Spent 4 more days trying to fix the problem but just gave up in the end and went back to my old ATI card. I might try the Radeon 7500 in the near future (since I suspect that the "DV" output of the card had something to do with my problems).
I'm sure the 'Did you find this review helpful?' patrol will vote me off the island, but this is absolutely the WORST collection of erotica I've ever read... and I've read (er um) lots.Look elsewhere... this one's a snooze.
I'm no sure of the original release date, but it sure sounds like 1980's style avantgarde stuff. Most of the sounds and "melodies" are virtualy cliche by today's standards. If you like Eno's "music for airports" this album will probably bore you and you'd be better off with other Hassel albums or Harold Bud.
Great looking bag. The compartments are the best I have had in a back pack. The support structure is poorly designed which leads to pressure spots on the shoulders and early failure of the seams. Baby it a little (avoid using just one strap with more than a lite load) and it should do ok for the price.
This device should configure a lot easier than it does. I'm a programmer with many years of experience configuring hardware. I found this one annoying to set up.You may have to download new drivers for this device from the simpletech website. Once you get the correct version of the drivers, and install it following the instructions EXACTLY (the device cannot be plugged in while loading the software) it eventually works ok.Note that there are two DIFFERENT part numbers for this device. 90000-40388-001 and 90000-40388-002. The 001 version does not support some platforms that the 002 version does. I recieved the 001 and have had no end of difficulty with it.If I had it to do over again, I would spend a bit more, and get a device from another company that supported more than two media types.
From what I understand of these types of hardware, they are created in batch by varying hardware component manufacturers and the resold to vendors (e.g. Simpletech) who combine them into the nice products we buy for distribution.Unfortunately SimpleTech doesn't quite get things right. The driver installation for this product went smoothly on Windows XP. It was a matter of clicking the mouse a few times, a reboot, and plugging in the device into a USB slot.However, what followed afterwards and for succeeding attempts at getting the thing to be recognized by your PC would be what I call my own form of digital gambling. Some days the device works when I plug it in, and some days it doesn't. The odds are usually not in my favor.I would have much preferred a more expensive item that worked all the time.
This card reader isn't any faster or more convenient than downloading directly with my digital camera, and was a lot less reliable. We bought a pcmcia reader and are much more satisfied with it.
I bought this game and it really sucks! The reason that I bought this game was because I like Rocket Power a lot, and I thought it would be cool to have this game. Once I played it I got bored and wanted to sell it. It doesnt save at all. You have to write passwords down!If you are planning to have this game, you shouldnt! Dont waste money for the worst game I've ever played.
I was new to Guanajuato and enjoyed the parts of the book the discuss the city. But the story line was trite, even contrived. THe "culinary" part of the mystery included recipes that, while tasty, are hardly gourmet -- they mostly consisted of things made with Campbell's soup. Not one that I recall was indigenous to Mexico. At least it was a quick read.
Yep thats right 12 games for 9 Bucks. No kidding. Yeah. But the only reason why i gave it 4 stars is the fact that yeah you get all of those games but you get 2 repeats (galaga, gal Im not saying i dont like the game (considering that i bought it solely for the galaga & ms pac man) but it should be more of a selection than just having all the galaga's Some might disagree with me but oh well. The fact that it has all these old original arcade titles loves it. It would be better with a regular tv rather than a wide screen, as all the games are narrow. Funplay its like being in the arcade all over again, difficulity- that digout game is the only one that i am having trouble with! and graphics (who cares) Your playing your favorite titles which is why you bought it so dont cry for mommy if its not in HD!For the money you cant go wrong
I wish I had bought the Roget's International version. There are so few synonyms in this thesaurus--and if I want definitions, I'll use the dictionary. Synonyms: worthless, useless, stink-o
Buy "The Synonym Finder" if you want a REALLY good thesaurus. I am only familiar with the first edition of "Roget's II," but I consider that edition to be among the worst volumes in print.
Joyce was quite understandably frustrated when his magnum opus, "Ulysses," did not immediately receive the critical attention he felt it warranted upon its publication in 1922.Thus it was that the artist, while composing his next work, "Finnegan's Wake," got into the habit of periodically banging his head against the typewriter keys, a poignant expression, obviously, of the searing torment boiling within him.Happily for us, the result of these repeated cranial collisions can be viewed in the contents of this volume.
There may be rewards here for people who are intelligent enough and have the time to spend, but that's not me. I've always felt "smart." (800, 800 and 730 on the GRE's-degrees in mathematics) but this book made me feel like a mental midget. Either Joyce had an I.Q. of about 775 or there is nothing here to understand. I don't have time to find out. At least we got the word, "quark," from this book.
One wonders how many of the positive (4 or 5 stars) reviewers here are either (1) intellectual poseurs who say they've read the book cover to cover but actually haven't read more than a little; or (2) if they have read it in its entirety, whether they have too much spare time on their hands.One thing it is not (contrary to what some pretentious reviewers here would have you believe) is a "fun read" or "page turner".Despite some glittering word play and demonstrations of great scholarship, Finnegan's wake is a hulking mess.
"Out door, keel cooling vorsnevou." You could add this sentence to this mass of drivel and no one would know it wasn't written by Joyce. If the point of this book is the utter incomprehensibility of mankind, Joyce greatly contributes to it with this rambling waste of paper. A monkey and a typewriter could have written this "experimental" trash. I cannot see any way in which this "work" is a classic. It is stream of conscience gibberish. Anyone could have done it.
I am a fan of Joyce's writing especially Dubliners and Portrait of the Artist, but this is pure garbage. Thank goodness for the look inside features at amazon, so that people will be able to know what to expect when ordering Finnegans Wake. The novel has no plot and lacks the vivid descriptions of seemingly meaningless things that made Joyce's other novels so great. Here, he picks random foreign words and places them wherever he please just to make his book seem original and artistic. The result is an incomprehensible piece of garbage that is not only plotless but devoid of any writing ability and talent.Use the look inside features to see what I'm talking about.
The cow who dried up was an udder disaster....like this gibberish novel. Even JJ's best friends and critics called it drivel (his brother included). I guess after writing Ulysses, JJ felt somehow had to create something more mystic. Well, he certainly succeeded. I have a standing $1,000 bet with anyone and the challenge is that I will open 3 random pages of FW and have the reader explain, in detail, who the parties are, what the sentences are about and mean. I am quite confident than there is no one out there who can do that. Period. So much for a memorable reading experience.
Will someone please, please tell me what the heck this man is talking about? This is the book for people who didn't find The Jaberwocky to have quite the necessary amount of pretentious pseudo-english garbage. Don't even bother trying to read this.
NO! BOOK BAD BOOK BAD BIG BIG WORDS I DONT UNDERSTAND! MY BRAIN HURTSSSS! THIS MAKE NO SENCE. YAHOO CHAT MUCH EAZYIER TO UNDeRSTAND! I GO THERE NOW.
let the high preists of deconstructionist post modernism interpret it for you. bow down before the wisdom of frustrated ineffectual professors of English, the preistly class who will interpret this message from the gods for you, (and actually get pay and respect for it). lets get real. this is a book by a sciziphrenic for the pompous and pedantic. a few puns aside dont waste your life trying to interpret this nonsense, just because you have an ego. (even Nobel laureates fell for it--hence the quark, but FASHIONABLE NONSENSE is the delayed reaction)the real dope: read: WHAT ART IS. MADNESS AND MODERNITY. and THE FOUNTAINHEAD. for some insight into why nonsense like this continues to propagate.
This book is bad, and I think it was intended to be so. Probably upset with the over analysis of Ulysses, Joyce must have set out to play a trick on the literary world. This book has no value except to make you laugh at how far some people would go to pretend that it could be interpreted. There are better wastes of ones time, for example staring at a blank wall.
Which should be the only reason one would have this book in a collection.Daferring on red hair moots the ramdelgerag! Cays hast ner eyed the entire lash from the libre, does get sidlelassinlunahack? And for ery' scholar of jits and wallyfins, dare may cieved a consciousable readament of peering quenth Labrynth. Hark! Vain! Rack! Finnegans Wake dost injoyafun for the kathweolasopkookoo. One glance may planner read and ner open this Rhodical magnumus.If you understood what I just wrote then you may just enjoy this book.
Real words, unlike what you'd find in this book, cannot describe what you find in here. This book is the bane of my existence. James Joyce must have self-inflicted mercury poisoning in order to write this. The only other plausible explanation is that he became severely mentally retarded from a lack of flow of oxygen to the brain. If you want to actually understand anything, you have to read explanations EVERY "sentence". This turns it into a f'n time vampire. It is terrible in every aspect - there are no plot, characters, situations, comedy, horror, storyline, or anything else that books usually consist of. If the author came back to life, became unretarded, and then read his own book again, he would instantly want to drown himself in Lake Michigan. I award him no stars and may God have mercy on his soul.
Evelyn Waugh once described this book as 'gibberish' and added that you could see James Joyce going madder by the page. That said, it's quite amusing to read bits from.
Admirers of this glimpse into madness must have a great need to feel smug and superior. Such "intellectuals" are painfully desperate and afraid of reality; for it is only in the realm of the naked emperors that they can pretend to be hip.
In Tom Robbins "Fierce Invalids Home From Warm CLimates" the main character Switters is attempting to read this book and never gets though the first 5 pages. I now understand why.
The point being, presumedly, that humanity is incomprehensible to humanity? How is my understanding of, or sympathy toward, humanity improved by attempting to read and decode the word "Bababadalgharaghtakamminnarronkonnbronntonneronntuon- thunntrovarrhounawnskawntoohoordenenthurnuk"? There are many far greater works that not only tell the same story, but are readable and even enjoyable. My apologies to those who like Finnegan's Wake, but humanity is not best served by having its story told in gibberish.
While Joyce's Ulysses demonstrates his monstrous success with literary experimentation styles, FW does not. I find it poor by his standards. In academics (and among pseudo-intellectuals) the book is quite fashionable, and understably so - the style is unique. Its almost comical to listen to my fellow Joyce fans rave about it. But whenever I corner them, and beg them to dissect the work for me, the responses are as incoherent as the book itself. Perhaps it inspires creative thinking/translation from its readers, but nothing of the sort on my part, despite my repeated efforts to sincerely read it.I've read far worse, that's for sure, but someone thinking of dabbling with Joyce for the first time should seriously consider selecting one of his more substantial earlier works, or the frustration with FW may alienate them forever from an otherwise brilliant and often very powerful author.
I gave this book two stars because I admire anyone who can summon the sheer willpower needed to complete a novel of nonsense--particularly one with as much deadwood between the covers as this one. One must also admire the salemanship that must have been displayed when FW was presented to a publisher. If not for these factors it would have gotten one star. Please don't be sucked into the crowd that thinks a book is really good if they can't understand it. Instead, rate highly the book whos author presented you with a clear story, made you want to read the next page, and perhaps, in the end, changed your view of the world.
Fascinating as a look into the symbol-laden mind of the highly learned James Joyce. The entire history of the world up until the first quarter of the twentieth century is here. Unfortunately, you have to spend years playing archaeologist to discover its hidden treasures. I've spent two years studying this thing, and will waste no more of my life on it: everything that Joyce has said in this has been said more eloquently and (obviously) more clearly elsewhere.NOTE: If you're undecided about this, read the first page. If you hate it, you'll hate the rest. If you love it, you'll love the rest. The quality of the writing stays fairly consistent.
Well, what can I say? This kind of writing would never make it past Mrs. Johnson, my 7th grade English and Grammar school teacher. I made many attempts at reading this gibberish. To those who like this book, kudos's to you few. I highly recommend this book as an anchor on night stands of insomniacs everywhere. I join the ranks of those who do not like this book. I'm sure there is something enriching in there, somewhere. Who was the editor? I know it was not Mrs. Johnson!Jimmy Lair
I give this book two stars because it's the first, and last, book to tell us what we already should know...that we think gibberish in that ethereal state between waking and sleep. Finningan's Wake reminds me of the canvas I've seen at countless art shows with a jumble of random splatterings of paint. Any one of us could create the same thing. Why don't we? Joyce is challenging us to get off our duffs and splatter some paint on the canvass. If you think it's worthwhile (personally, I don't) do it. You could be the next James Joyce.
I think it's rather dumb to write a book for the purpose of making it difficult to read. If you want to be allusive, that's fine, but express yourself coherantly and in an unambiguous fashion. Ulysses and A Portrait managed to be both timelessly powerful and legible; it's a pity Joyce didn't make better use of his seventeen years.
I had read 5 or more rave reviews about this book and was excited to receive it. After reading it, I am sorry to say that it was not life changing, inspiring or even a good read. The book seems so childish to me. Maybe because I am 50 and the author is 29. Maybe the lessons she is trying to pass on I have learned a long time ago. Things like it's not O.K. to tease or take advantage of another person. . . Just disappointing. Maybe it is a good read for someone who hasn't done a great deal of living yet.
If you are interested in learning about Saudi Arabia, this is not the book for you. It is a collection of the writer's true or imagined sexual experiences. Having lived in many countries I believe there is so much to see, learn, teach, get involved in, etc.,that focusing on sex is a waste of the experience. Writing style and vocabulary is also very simple, almost childlike. I'm almost finished with the book, and so far there is only one chapter that I found interesting.
Single in Saudi is a complete work of FICTION! It says so in the copyright. I have made that mistake before so now I always check to see if it is fictional or is a true event or sadly ...true EVENTS! If you like autobiographical books or biographical as I do, always look for the copyright. Also, get the sample first. If you do not like fiction then you need not pay for it!!
I bought this card to because it is a reasonably priced dual moniter card. I have two CRT's (21" and 19") and wanted to increase my desktop real estate. It does not work well for this purpose. Installation was easy in my Dell 8100 system, but there is only one vga plug on the card, the other is DVI. Great if you have a LCD, but otherwise you must use an expensive adapter... Anyway, the output from the DVI port is of very poor quality. This may be because of the adapter, but regardless. it does not have a useful second output. Too bad, now I'm trying to use two separate card, which will be much harder to configure.
I bought this card, and within minutes of purchasing the card on Amazon.com I tried to cancell it, I purchased the wrong card. I tried all the right way of trying to cancell it, but it looks like Amazon can get a card ready for shipping within minutes of a purchase, but the delivery date is August 15. I have written you an email, now how long will it take to get a response with Amazon.
Unlike other reviews here, for me the lapinator and mousepad didn't work so well. Used it with a Toshiba Satellite laptop and optical mouse. After about 2 hours, the lapinator was almost HOT to the touch, laptop fan did not run less, laptop itself did not feel cool to the touch. Had better luck with other coolant systems. Maybe Toshibas run hotter than other laptops, so it could be a matter of that particular laptop not being well-suited for the lapinator. I run my new HP Pavillion right on my desk's surface, with no resulting overwarming of the laptop or the desk surface. Possibly, this particular cooling pad works optimally with only certain laptops.
I was really disappointed to find this pad is two seperate pieces; I assumed the mouse pad slid out, but it doesn't. It is wedged in the bottom; very inconvenient. I would not recommend it. The pad itself is fine, it does have a small loop of velcro on the rear to hold your AC cord, it catches on your clothes and I will probably cut it off.
I like alot of music but this I dont.I dont even think this should be called music.Every song sound the same.This cd is plain horribal.Dont buy it unless your on the highschool football team so you can fit in with the other jocks.
Hatebreed's just another pesky "hardcore" band destroying the scene. A bunch of...guys yelling about beliefs that aren't even their own? Sounds kind of like Slipknot. That's not the hardcore mentality, ...Hatebreed is the assumed forerunner of Victory Records, keeping good bands like Grade, Shelter, and Snapcase from playing main stage. Instead, they have to open up for a cross between nu-metal and rock and roll.
This is a very poor translation. Martial is a lively, urbane poet with a razor-sharp wit; his language is precise and powerful. James Michie's translation is insipid as poetry, and often unrecognizable when set next to the Latin. A single example: Mr. Michie has a penchant for translating simple Latin words like "terra" into configurations like "turf and dew," rather than the obvious and elegantly simple "earth." In Michie's translation, Martial's more beautiful elegiac lyrics are made gaudy and his urban bullets of observation become flaccid. Get the Loeb Martial and a good dictionary and work through the epigrams yourself. You will be better served by Loeb's literal translation than something that sounds as if it were written by a mediocre pre-Raphaelite poet.
I did not realise that this was just a book containing the 3 other professor books that I already own and have read.I would not have bought this had I been aware.
This would be the worst van dam movie I ever seen not a good plot. I am used to so much more from van dam that this movie was disappointing
2.5 Stars because the action scenes are great, but the plot is simplistic and the semblance at drama pathetic, with irritating stabs of shallow sentimentalism and worn cliche. Worth renting but not worth buying unless you want good action shots and are a Van Damme fanatic. I will sell my DVD if I can. A previous review compares this to Glory, but I consider the comparison far-fetched, unless action is the sole criteria.
LegionnAire is really good but there is to much acting in it, it has really good action. Van Damme should stick with doing Katate movies not acting movies
VAn Damme's movies were going nowhere, each one worser than the last one ... Then a good idea came up: why don't try to make a kind of "epic" movie, taking a lengendary theme (the French unit called "Foreigner Legion" )and changing from the custumary scenario of karate kicks and sterotyphed villains who want to rule the world ? Great idea. I bought it. So, what disapointment after watching this.. it became clear that, no matter how many movies he has already made, Van Damme will never improve as an actor... EVery frame of the movie is wasted, making us think that he is being bad orientated by his agents or film-producers. IT's a totally unconving history, without pace and rhythm...
I purchased this book after I read the good reviews. I really did not like it. The story was dull, the heroine uninteresting and the hero not a hero at all (but just some idiot).
i tried everything but he hated it. it was a no go. even though i set it to a snug fit, he kept pawing at it until he was finally able to get it into his mouth and chew on it.
They sent an imitation; Holt from china instead of the advertised Halti, and it cut my dog's face! I tried contacting them, but no response.
At first, I was happy with the product because my dog wasn't pulling nearly as hard as before. But then I noticed that the side strap pushes up into her eye, making it water and become irritated, when we walk. I tried fixing the problem but nothing worked, it kept going into her eye. The product was definitely a waste of money.
The collar actually works fine but it's not a Halti. It's a 'Holt" Looks and works the same but it's not a Halti which is what I was ordering.
I was excited because the collar seemed to work. My dog obviously didn't like it and tried to paw it off but as long as I kept moving he only occasionally pawed it and didn't pull. He usually pulls nearly constantly despite my efforts. However half way through my second walk my 23 pound dog stopped to sniff something. I kept going and the strap that goes around his nose broke. Don't waste your money.
The strap only lasted one day. Tied my labradoodle up outside a shop and when I came back he had chewed threw the bottom strap. The funny thing was he was just sitting waiting for me like nothing had happend, even though his lead was detached to where I tied him. I think the strap around the snout is too big and needs to be adjustable. I will get the next size down and see how we go with that.
The Halti must be correctly sized - and unfortunately the sizing info to determine the correct size is poor. The Holt sizing chart is based on breeds - and didn't work for my mutt. Way too big. Why don't they provide the sizing info based on the circumference of the muzzle and neck?
This is probably a good product for dogs with square jaw lines but for owners of small dogs such as a lhasa apso or shitzu beware! Because of their flatter facial structures, the collar slips off and won't hold as it should. And speaking from experience, the size is not the issue i.e. even a small size won't work.
Although this card fit well into my Rio500 MP3 player, I had to call Simpletech's 800 # and punch through a long phone tree to reach a helpful technician. He explanined that Rio 500's can't take more than 64MB, so I'll have to send it back and pay for shipping.Find a way to verify compatibility before ordering.
I have three brands of SmartMedia cards: SimpleTech, Viking, and the Olympus card that came with my camera. I timed how long it took to copy the same 5MB file to each card. The result: the other cards took 32 seconds and the SimpleTech took 38 seconds. So, my results show that the SimpleTech is about 18% slower than the others. That's important to me because when I take action shots I'm often waiting for the previous image to write to disk before I can take the next shot.
This is the latest in the stargate movies, the plot is that the stargate has captured their most dangerous enemy and they are preparing the trial for the crimes committed, however he tells things will change, somehow he manages to change the time when the stargate was not found and the team was not formed as we all know.While the idea is very good, I'm sorry to say the movie was profoundly very tedious, not as exciting as I hoped. So if you want alternate universes please check Star Trek Deep Space Nine or the books in which the idea is used.As this movie Sorry Stargate fans it is not worth it.
I've seen better episodes on TV. Forgettable, don't even remember what it was about and it wasn't long ago that I saw it.
The movie was ok, as much as a let down as 200 was, but at least it was ok.Blu-ray on a decent TV makes this thing look like utter and complete crap.I returned it to the store to get the DVD because at least that doesn't look as bad.The lack of quality on the picture makes me ashamed to be a fan.
I was shipped two when I order only one! The return menu did not have a selection that covered the return and I was charged shipping to return the extra item!
Not bad but could have been a lot better. Overall it was dissapointing. They could have at least noted what happened to the Ori after leaving fans hanging with the series ending. Not worth buying.
the story is without a bunchline and not as good as the others stargates that I have bought
I am a die hard stargate fan...this movie was really bad....wish that stargate would stop taking advantage of its loyal fan base by making this straight to DVD movies....end the series or put in back on the air...(i would have much prefered to pay $10 to go see on big screen vs buying the expensive dvd.)
A very predictable thrown-together movie to make a few more bucks from an otherwise outstanding series. Better than "Ark of Truth",but not much.
The producers of this franchise know they have a great fan base, but now after several years of making an intelligent and entertaining sci-fi series I think they've given in to intellectual laziness. If "Continuum" is the new standard of what we (the fans) can expect to see in the future from this franchise, then they should just stop making these films now. The plot to "Continuum" is silly, the narrative (the story and how it is told) is completely bland and devoid of life. It was as though all these characters we have come to know, suddenly had their souls written out of the script.
I've seen every Stargate SG1 and Atlantis Episodes and movie.The reason I didn't like it was the one thing I loved about the shows that for the most part, they were clean. This one had a couple almost goryscenes. Not to mention the swearing was like star trek 4 and 5, were all of the sudden your Heroes of many years start having potty mouths, it's so unnecessary. I was looking forward to an all new sg1 were they tackle something new, not a rehash of the same old thing. It seems like The industry is turning to the Dark side again with the success of an over the top Dark Knight being so succesful, the feel good adventure will need a comeback. Please bring the SG1 team back for a good adventure!
I purchased Stargate continium and when I received it they sent me Steel magnolias instead I have contacted the company 3 times anf=d after 3 weeks I have heard nothing I will not purchasing anything through Amazon again or its partners
I should have gone with the DVD. The image quality on this is the worst of any Blu-Ray in my collection. It looks like a DVD, actually. That said, it bogs down my HTPC more than any other Blu-Ray in my collection. It stops, lurches, and the sound gets really out of sync. It also flips out completely for a few frames here and there and displays a randomly colored pixelated image.The movie itself is a good rompin' episode of the sci fi classic. But save your money and get the DVD.UPDATE: I upgraded the firmware on my LG drive and it solved most of the issues with this disc. The lurching/stuttering/syncing problems are gone. It still goes bonkers with the pixelated image from time to time. For the most part, the disc is now watchable. But it's still a very disappointing Blu-Ray.
this was pleasent and satifying fluff. It's always worth while to watch Baal's machinations, but it would have played better as an episode.Sorry I can't say more.
Not for my taste. "Stargate: Continuum" has a very old plot that has been reused over and over again in both "Stargate SG-1" as well as in sci-fi stories in general. The first half is lacking in action, and you don't see much of O'Neill in this one. He shows up in the first few minutes of the film and the last few, but that's it. And the story is lacking in structure. The second half of the movie wasn't that bad, but still not worth wasting your money on.Not recommended!
The quality of the image compression was the same as the up-converted DVD of Ark of Truth I just watched a few days before. There was no comparison in watching the Arctic scenes (so-so) vs Planet Earth Blu-Ray (great). Not sure why they'd even release this as blu-ray unless they're pulling a fast one.The story had holes in it bigger than the gate itself. When time changed, people were disappearing like Back to the Future style. poof? The paradoxes are ridiculous.. like why is Baal able to travel back and stop the stargate from arriving in the US. if he did that, he wouldn't know about Earth in the first place. where did Baal get Anubis's ship? how did Daniel's leg reappear? why make mitchell the hero? you'd think for a $7mil budget, they'd pull a better script together.I think the only thing I enjoyed was Vala as a villain.
This movie includes all of the traditional "Stargate" favorites, from Jack O'Neill to General Landry, but without the humor that made the series so enjoyable. It plays as though the writers and the director had a checklist instead of a script. Quip for Oneill-check, Brilliant insight by Carter-check, Moral stance for Daniel Jackson-check. None of the elements are truely integrated. Watching this convoluted tale was a large disappointment.
my rice cooker of 10 years just crapped out and i read bunch of reviews and that really didn't help me. since this got so many reviews and most of them good i ordered it and the price is right. well, it makes rice but if you eat rice every day but don't want to make it every day then this rice cooker isn't for you. the steamer plug thing kicks back tons of water back into the pot so you get this really really wet spot. then there is this hot spot so it starts to burn and the bottom starts to get really crispy a couple of hours into the warm position. then after about 12 hours it starts to get this wet rag smell. gross!!
Too Expensive. 5- 1/2 cups are not true, you can barely make 3.5 cups. Every time you cook, you need to clean outlet also, that sucks. I don't recommend this product. You can do better with 1/3 rd of money what you spend on this product.
After a cheap rice cooker I had for years died, I thought I would upgrade and get this one. I wish I had heeded some of the reviews I saw on here. First of all, it is difficult to read the water level lines on the inside of the pot. I am young and thought it couldn't be that bad. It is. I have to hold the pot directly under a light to see the markings at all. Also, I often find that my rice is not cooked through when the cooker indicates it is finished. The final straw for me is that it is pretty cumbersome to clean. If it made perfect rice, the cleanup wouldn't be an issue, but I'm not sure that the rice in this cooker has ever turned out as good as the cheap one I used to have that I picked up at Target. I am now going back to a cheaper model - don't want to spend a bunch of money to end up with a dud again.
Cooked rice fine for the first month then suddenly burned out for no apparent reason. I didn't even have a chance to try out the porridge/soup cooker and steamer functions. Now I will have to ship it back to Sanyo for a replacement unit.
I was so excited to finally be getting a rice cooker stateside! But I hate this one. Here are the reasons:1) No handles for the pot. I can't take the pot for the rice out without using a potholder or towel. There are no handles for easy lifting in and out.2) Pot is not secure. When I want to get my rice out, I have to use a towel or potholder to hold onto the pot because it won't stay still when I'm scooping out my rice.3) No beep for finished rice. Why isn't there a beep or a noise to indicate when the rice is done cooking?4) Over-warms rice. I left the cooker on with rice in it overnight, and instead of being yummy the next morning, it was mostly dried out and hard. What a waste of rice!In retrospect, I should have shipped my original rice cooker back with me from Japan. It had all these features, and I got it third-hand. Pay the extra money to get a real Japanese one, not an import.
The quality of rice is inadequate to satisfy anyone who likes sushi. I am really surprised that Sanyo makes such bad quality product. I returned the product.
I am very happy that I purchased this rice cooker.It is easy to use ,brainless- just add water,rice and forget about. It is extremely convenient and makes excellent rice. Guests have asked how we cooked the rice because it was perfect.
This rice cooker is good for one time cooking. The rice does not last more than 12 hours. I usually leave my rice for 4 days so that I do not have to keep cooking it (lazy). I returned it and bought Cukoo rice cooker (made in Korea). The rice lasts for 4 days without changing color or get old. Cukoo is more expensive but it will last for years.
I bought this because it was recommended by Cook's Illustrated and I've had excellent results from most of their recommendations. Not so with this one. I have major issues with the unit's cleanability. The lid is hinged and is not removable for easy cleaning. The inside of the lid had a scale on it after cooking and I was hesitant to clean it thoroughly because it seemed to be something of a mystery substance and I was afraid that I would scratch it. There is a trough that catches condensation and is also difficult to clean. Likewise with the extremely flimsy gasket. The unit took longer to clean properly than it did to make the rice, and I prefer the old Aroma rice cooker that I bought this to replace.
I don't like this rice cooker because the inner pot's non-stick coating peel off after 6 month, and there's no way to replace it. My last Panasonic rice cooker's non-stick coating lasted 5 years.
It was ok, unless I left it on warm and the rice caked onto the bottom terribly. However, it stopped working after 4 months of use. Not sure what happened....
This worked well for about 4 months and then broke. Its mechanism turns to "warm" now way before the rice is done. When I called the company to ask about service or an exchange, I got someone one time. I had to call back with more information from the receipt and I have never been able to get a hold of someone since then. I have called about 8 other times. It is not worth my time to keep trying to get a hold of someone, pay to send it to a service person, etc. Since this item is well reviewed in Cook's Illustrated, I am debating buying another and crossing my fingers...
1) The intro, "soulstar."2) "youloveme," which should have been the first single, not "forthenight."3) Somewhere between "momentinlife" and "thereason."Otherwise, a less than stellar album.
I am a fan of Musiq - don't get me wrong. I really liked his first two albums, so I was thoroughly outraged when I bought/heard "Soulstar". Nowhere on the same level! It lacks so much of the "soul" that ironically labels it. Honestly, pick up "Dwele - Subject" or "Kem - Kemistry" instead. This album is not hot, don't believe the hype! And whoever said that Musiq in on the same level as Maxwell, must be deaf! At any rate, the best song on the entire album is "forthenight" (for the night), which they play so frequently on the radio. If you're curious, let one of your friends lend it to you (if they have it), or ask them to burn it for you... I wouldn't recommend blowing your hard-earned moolah on this soul-less atrocity. ;o(
I got the feeling when I was listening to this album that he wasn't there musically or lyrically. The majority of this album is just passé and I could take it or leave it. Forthenight is the only song on here that gets major play in my cd player, and he couldn't even give you five minutes to really get into it. The other songs sound as if he was going off into left field. Now only if he could JustgivemeawholealbumIcouldlistentoo!
and that is a reach.this Album has Easily His Best Music to date on it but the Cat can't Sing to Me&nothing every seems to change.now He is One Lucky Cat with all the Tribute Shows&Projects He gets to be down with.but as far as Being an Elite Artist?Don't Believe the Hype.thsi Album He is trying to tap into R.Kelly,D'angelo&Maxwell's World&Come up way short.
What's good with this album. His first album was a classic and the second was good. This is just whack. His voice is not up to par like Glenn Lewis, Bilal, Maxwell and D'Angleo. Come on,are some of you people deaf? He can't carry a note.
COME ON!!! I am a Musiq fan to the core. But we need more than just unclever words and same story scenarios. The only song worth listening to was the first one after the intro. I forced myself to listen to the rest. Womanopoly? Baby Mama Drama? What about love longs and decent ones at that. The second CD was a keeper. Musiq should practice his craft or lose a fan. Also...stop remaking original songs if you DO NOT have the voice for it.
I was pretty disappointed with this CD, and don't think I'll be buying another Musiq CD because he seems to be going downhill. He's basically regurgitating the first two projects with not very much success. I really like Musiq's whole vibe, hopefully it's not too late for the brother to pick it back up again.
These versions do not play like the original games. I'm amazed that they don't just write an emulator so that they can get their games right!
I too bought this disc because Ray McVeigh is the guitarist. His playing on the Professionals "I Didn't See It Coming" record is incredible. The guitar tandem of Ray and Steve Jones (sex pistOls) on that record was, as far as I'm concerned, the punk equivalent of Keith Richards and Ron Wood. Tasteful, catchy, weaving guitar lines that are stuck in my head forever.There is none of that here. Like many industrial records, everything is so sludged in effects, you can't make out any style at all. There are also appearances by a few other artists I dig, but the same problem exists there.If you need another industrial record, this is better than Filter, or any of that nonsense, but it's nothing that's going to change your life.
Although "Run, Lola, Run" is off-beat, has some nice camera work and a few impressive images, I could not develop any interest in any of the characters. Lola's extreme red hair and goofy outfit (blue tank top, white bra straps, turquoise pants, and black Doc Martin boots of all things) were distracting. The "driving music beat" (or however it was described), was fairly boring and repetitive.The commentary was only slightly more interesting than the movie. The two participants of writer/director Tom and lead actress Franka were a couple at the time, which accounts for the mutual admiration society feel of the commentary.There may have been a good idea for a movie here, but I could not find it. Close to being the least watchable movie ("Lost and Delirious", "The Smokers", "Black and White" and "Armageddon"). I nearly dozed off both times.I give the movie two stars for effort and concept, but I advise you to..."Run Away, Run"
My 16 year old daughter told me this film changed her life. I'm getting her into therapy soon. I suppose that as a study in film making techniques and creativity this film breaks some novel ground. Aside from that the characters held no interest for me, a 47 year old. The overdone running scenes comprise about 50% of what is a rather short-running film to begin with. Decent Dolby 5.1 effects. Look for something else!
I dont see what the BFD was about this movie. I mean, yeah she looks cool and they do drugs, yay. I thought the experimental "and then" parts were kinda cool. But I just didnt like the movie. I dont think they connected the groundhog day feeling of it all together that well. Or obviously. This was better than the otherGroundhog Dayin how it was maybe an hour shorter. Not for me. And I usually like off beat movies. Just dont be off beat for the sake of being offbeat. I think I might check out the soundtrack though.
If you like thumping, loud, monotonous music, you may like this film better than I did. With all the hungry, talented musicians in the world, I would think this film maker could have found one that could provide decent music.Although I liked Potente in other films, it was difficult for me to find the characters interesting. Maybe I could forgive Lola for being in love, but her boyfriend seemed worthless.Yes, this film showed various futures that could have arisen from a single starting point. That is a good idea for a film, but I just think, in spite of the attempts at originality, the result did not bear fruit. For a more intelligent film about the possibilities arising from a situation, I think Rashomon would be a better way to spend your time.
I cannot believe that people would give this film 5 stars. I forced myself to watch the entire film just because I could not believe that someone would actually recommend this film. Yea it has an interesting twist, but it gets real painful after a while. If you love it, god bless...
It was kind of an interesting film, but I found the music boring and monotonous. Some of you have good points about the technical merits and originality, but I just could not get past the music, so for me it was not enjoyable. If the director and producer both had tin ears, there are millions of cheap, underpaid musicians in the world. Or just leave some of the more obnoxious music out.Germany/Austria has given so much great music to the world: Mahler, Brahms, Schumann, Beethoven, Haydn, Mozart, Handel, Bach, to name a few. It's a shame that this movie from Germany could not do better.The characters were difficult to identify with. Maybe that was intentional. It was difficult for me to understand why Lola cared about her worthless boyfriend.I have never rated a movie this low before, but there are some worse films than this. It would have been a decent movie if they had taken the care not to ruin it.
Also ich finde es ja toll, dass ein deutscher Film in den USA so gut ankommt, aber ich habe ihn bei uns in Deutschland im Kino gesehen und dachte mir "wie lange rennt die denn noch" und "warum rennt die schon wieder". Mein Freundin fand den Film aber echt klasse. Von den vier Leuten die wir waren gibt einer 5 Sterne, 2 geben drei Sterne und ich gebe dem Film 2 Sterne. Würde ihn mir aber niemals auf DVD oder Video kaufen.
I know all opinions are subjective but I do not undertsand what you could find interesting in this movie. The love story is stereotyped. The boyfriend is an idiot (which makes the girl an even more idiot), the soundtrack is exhausting and the plot is non existing. In this type of movie there is MUCH better which has been done. Please.....
"What a waste of money! " These words demonstrate my exact reaction after watching this movie which I have regrettably purchased on DVD. Excited to have a new DVD player, I bought this DVD after reading the many great reviews about the movie. Now I'm extremely puzzled. Why so much praise for this flick? It is anything but interesting: the story is childish and shallow and the much talked about cinematography and the music are nothing more than cheap attempts to decorate the silly plot. For those of you who want to buy the movie, rent it first! If you are not a fad-driven kid who actually thinks MTV is a music television and Jewel a poet, then you'll surely dislike it. There are no philosophical ideas here. The mere fact that this movie is considered to be "thought provoking" may be a testament to the reality that perhaps we are not thinking much.
I did not get it. She is just running and running and again running. No philosophical idea. No point. The movie is telling us the same story in three different versions. Why? Boring...
ok, so u want to know what a bad film is like. yea well dnt watch this one cause u will just fall asleep and still not know the film is about her running and runninga and running and running and u get the picture
This is one movie where the title makes as much sense as the content. I gave it one star, although Franka deserves five stars for fitness.
This pic reminds me a bit of Amelie, but much better. Amelie was cutsie and this is an action pic. Unfortunately, the running does get a bit tiresome, though it is interesting for much of its running time.
There are so many good things in this movie that I really wish that I could've liked it more. But, as it is, it felt like the cinematic equivalent of a video game. If you really do want to spend 80 minutes watching some chick running then I'd suggest waiting for the next Olympics. For a German movie with some depth, rent anything by Fassbinder, Herzog or Wenders.
I bought the dvd of this movie after I read all those positive feedback from other viewers. However, this is not the type of movie that I'll be willing to wait for more than a month for viewing. As an overseas buyer,the movie, shipment waiting time, and the cost of buying it all doesn't meet my high expectation/anticipation level of the movie. I was expecting something more like "Le femme Nikita" not a story of 2 youngsters having three different ending of their problems. The only good thing from this movie, for me, is the music! Two thumbs up for the music selection...
I see a lot of glowing reviews for this movie and I just don't get it. It's not "deep", ingenious, brilliant, or anything else that I've heard it called. Anyone who thinks this movie is thought provoking probably thinks Barney the dinosaur is a great philospher (seriously, get an education). This is a gimmicky, kitchy film that is a combination of concepts that have all been used before. The funny part is that they weren't great concepts the first time I saw them in other films. But hey, nothing suceeds like excess...so lets bring it all together and make a really really bad movie!
This movie doesn't even deserve one star. The script was horribly written, and they kept on playing the SAME thing over and over and over again. Little parts changed while they replayed it, but I knew I couldn't stand to watch ANOTHER rerun again. I had to watch this movie for German and I'm certainly not watching it again.
I give this film 5 stars. This and The Princess and the Warrior are in my top 10 all time favorites.This is less a review than advice to those that may be influenced by the 1 star reviews. The reviewers all tried really hard to sound intelligent while at the same time admitting that they "don't get it" and claim that there was nothing thought provoking.They say that it was just the same thing three times showing three possible results. These reviewers said it themselves- they didn't get it.During the movie the song What a Difference a Day Makes is played both to create atmosphere and to send a message. One of the main points of the movie is to show what a difference precious seconds can make..Cheers.P.S.Hopefully this sheds some light for the 1 star reviewers as well, but I doubt it.
Well whats to like about it other than the title track?The 7" version keeps a bit of the intro and still cuts out the outro. Deeper Underground (Chillington Mix) tries to have a more darker sort of industrial sound which sounds pretty mushy and terrible, as the vocals do not fit in one bit with the music.Overall though if you want all the songs, be sure to get the jewel case version as the cardboard slipcase with trays get annoying and damaged easy and its easier to have 1 cd with all the songs on it rather than 2.
You probably read towards the bottom of the description that it works with XP, and you'll even read it on the BACK OF THE PACKAGE, but it's not true. compaq still has no drivers for XP to recognize the PA-2, so if you have XP you'd better get a different mp3 player.
It works in my Sony DSC-S85 camera, but not in my Sony camcorder. It gives a format error. I'm not sure why the difference because it works fine in the camera. If I would have known that it would work only in the camera, I would have purchased the Sony Stick.
There are some many memory cards in the market, that I think the list of the camera brands and models should be available with the product description so it will be easier to find the more convenient for the one we are looking for, or when asking for products all of the choices for a specific brand of cameras will be presented in the results.R Limon
I was looking for a book that was a little more enlightened and a little less materialistic. This author clearly likes to shop (I am not a shopper), so it was hard to relate. Most of the ideas I have read before. I think the title is a little misleading. When I think about meaning, I think of higher ideals -- not just having more time to read a book in a quiet corner of my house. I don't know...I think if you have a strong sense of what brings meaning, you might find this book a bit superficial. Writing is good and there are good quotes too.
Everytime I think of this book I feel to yawn. I was excited to get it but I have to admit I was very bored reading it. The secret of Mr. Hogan's swing was no secret at all. It may have been back then but not now. My apologies to the author. It is just my opinion.
I bought this because 2 other 12 volt ocilating fans I've had did not ocilate. This one seems to reliably ocilate but even though it spins the blade it does not seem to move the air. jUNK DON'T BUY
This calendar begins with August 2005 and ends with July 2006! My son bought this for me for Christmas and was very dissapointed when I opened it and found out it was 'halfway used up' already. He felt very cheated and I felt very sorry for him. I think it is absolutely terrible that the item is not described truthfully. Shame, shame, shame on you! I wish I could give this item a negative number of stars!!!
This book is a complete waste of money. It contains no information that a reasonably intelligent man (or woman) couldn't easily figure out on his or her own, or discover on internet dating sites for free. The authors are believers in astrology, and devote a substantial chunk of the book to providing astrological information. As you can probably tell, I do not believe in astrology, but despite that, the astrological information in the book would also be very quickly available at no cost to any minimally proficient Google user.
This brief 100 pages book wastes 25 pages on horoscopes, zodiac signs, what your sign says about you, what signs mean in women, what signs you should date. What do ancient superstitions have to do with the Internet and why does it consume 1/4 of the book? The remainder of the book dispenses fairly obvious advice like woman types: "some women are after money" and "if you marry a women with children, you will be a step father" duh! Also a chapter on how to date when you are already Married, nice. This book mentions NOTHING AT ALL about the Internet. They just slapped Internet on the title to peddle an existing book on dating, except that it is useless as a general dating book as well! I got this at the library so I didn't pay for it, but I still feel like I was CHEATED, out of the hour of my life I wasted reading this garbage. The worst, avoid at all costs, even for free at the library. Horoscopes! Gawd.
I bought this to review it for content and usability, I can't believer what I read. This book has nothing useful in it! It don't tell you anything about what to say or even how to figure out what type of woman you want let alone how to get her to respond to you. It's just full of useless information like horoscopes I culdn't believe it, it even had the chinese horoscope taken off of some menu in a restaurant! This book doesn't do anything buy take your money and waste a tree.
I am sorry but after reading this book, I have to admit that the feminists are right. Men are pigs and the only reason this book was written was for the authors to make money.The book tries to justify its existance by saying it is designed to help you find the love of your life on the internet. It actually only helps you find the love of your night. If I had actually used any of the tips in the book, I would have had alot of sex but I doubt finding my soulmate would have been possible. In fact I doubt anyone using this tips would find their ultimate mate, it would be inspite of the tips not because of them.An entire chapter is devoted to sterotyping women, though the authors do try to explain most women do not meet these types, then the list over 10 to watch out for.I am glad I did not actually pay for this, I would have demanded my money back.
This was a very disappointing purchase. The 'Premium Hand Decorated Exotic Wooden Tea Chest' appears to be pine decorated with printed paper. Although the print is very nice, the description of it is a bit overblown.The tea inside was okay. Some of the combinations of flavors just didn't go well together, and often drowned the flavor of the tea.
The teas are good, don't get me wrong, but the whole reason I purchased this for my wife was because of the box. And the quality of the box is mediocre at best. The corners were worn and the gold trim paint was splattered all over the top of the thing. Yikes!
"Hand decorated"...? Only if that phrase means cheap glued-on paper. I, too, purchased this item primarily for the chest. The chest arrived with the paper already peeling from all corners; on the lid are several raggedy-edged holes in full view. Really disappointing. Does anyone from Bentley actually read the advertising copy?
The tea assortment in the chest is excellent, vey tasty. However, the chest is very poorly put together. The applique material does not line up and there are numerous rough edges. Not wht I would want to display on the countertop.
I purchased the Dorman plug boot adapter and find them average in quality. I was looking to buy a "SET" of 4 for my 4 cyl Alero and was worried the picture shows only 2 boots but the price made me think it was for 4. the description never says it's for 2 but it's my fault for assuming there would be a complete set. Not real sure why anyone would buy only 2 when it makes for since to buy all 4 when servicing your auto. My bad I guess. Look around, for the price of these 2 boots (around 13 bucks when I bought them) you should be able to buy a complete set.
What happened to the gossip girl that I came to know & love? Guess thats gone for good now. Season 3 of this show took a major dive. It's not the same as it used to be & prob will never be again. Unless if they come up with something drastic next season to put this show back in the game. It's really ashame this was a great show with amazing potential. Now it's just a bunch of college kids that whine because they don't want to grow up & are stuck in their hs days. Gossip girl needs a major makeover if it's gonna last because this show is going downhill fast!
Ordered this on Amazon and sent me 2 (CD #3) and no (cd #4)My daughter's Christmans present turned out to be terrible. Make sure you check your cd's if you order these. They don't send you the whole season but want whole season $$$$. Bought it from Sold by: Amazon.com LLC. Of course I can't return it either.....
Disk 4 was scratched and so I couldn't watch 2 episodes, I tried cleaning the disk but that didn't work. All episodes were on the disks but there was also a disk 6 that had episodes from a different season, so I believe that these are fake.
I dont get it,this is yet another show of wasted film.What is going on, rich kids, blah.INSTANT STAR on CTV Programming is not.Check INSTANT STAR out on the youtube.If you dont know about INSTANT STAR or Tommy & Jude maybe you should.
Gossip Girl - The Complete First Seasonis the perfect example of a great show to watch. It was guy friendly too. After January 2009, when the show was heading in to the second half of theGossip Girl: The Complete Second Season, the storylines were rushed and repetitive and this pattern has continued in to the third season. Aside from the last disc, the entire season is a waste of money but the cover art does look tempting to buy. Let's face it, even Blake Liveley would like to leave the show. Seriously, how many times can Chuck and Blair get back together or a better question would be why s Michelle Tratchenberg returning at the end of every season?
I am serving the military overseas ai expect delays over stateside deliveries. In this case the product did not arrive and I have contacted the seller through e-mail twice to let them know that the product never arrived. I have never heard back from the seller. Very frustrated.
I've already complained twice because I've bought this product on august 9th, 2010 and I've never received it. As I've never got a answer, I'm writting this comment. WhAT shoud I do? I'm waiting for so many months and no answer and no product
I did not find this book particularly useful. The college descriptions are more like advertorials written by the colleges themselves rathen than objective and independent analysis with pros and cons. Furthermore the book provides little help with putting together an application for each of these schools - something the author could have done given his claim to know these institutions so well.
I graduated from one of the schools described in this book, and I was horrified to see it listed on the cover. Throughout my time there, I was surrounded by people who couldn't care less about the name on their diploma, and couldn't care more about the quality of their education. Anyone who would be interested in a book titled "Hidden Ivies" does not have the sort of personality suited to my school - the name is nothing, the labels are nothing. The professors and fellow students are everything. These are excellent schools, but they should be considered in spite of what the Greenes title them, not because of it.
You just want to use your computer as a digital VCR right? It's unlikely you'll be doing so anytime soon with this video card. The TV feature wouldn't work until I uninstalled my NIC and USB. TV and DVD work fine now, but the capture (record) feature doesn't record any audio. Yes, yours may be ok, but here's one more thing: the software that comes with this card is version 7.5, but the current version is 8.5. Owners of the 7500 have to PAY $$$ for this upgrade, whereas owners of higher-end ATI cards get it for free. You want to do business with a company like this, be my guest.
I purchased aiw 7500 aprox. 1yr. ago. I thought it was a decent card when I bought it at that point would have given it a 4star rating. Within three months the card started freezing my machine while using DVR. Then more reciently the video with the tuner started flashing bright than dark. It happens all the time making the tuner unusable. I have found no resolution to my problems from ati. I'm not angry just unsatisfied.
I bought this card for a new custom built system and problems from the start. This card caused my computer to crash so often that I had to save games every 5 minutes to make any progress. I wrote an email to ATI and received an automated reply advising me to update the driver. After downloading 5 files and spending over an hour with DSL I updated the drivers. Still the system crashed all the time. Finally the card totally failed with a boot to black screen and I sent it back to ATI for repairs. I purchased a PNY Geoforce Ti 420 to keep my computer going and suddenly NO CRASHING, NONE! It was so wonderful. I dug up the games that were too frustrating because of the crashes and they were perfect. ATI sent the card back and said that they couldn't find anything wrong with it. Well I can't find anything right with it.
I ended up w/ this burner as a warranty replacement for my first VeloCD, which went toes up after about a month. Less than a year later, I have a completely useless burner that stalls at 6% and then freezes my entire system. After NUMEROUS emails and phone calls to TDK, I finally got "authorization" to send it in for replacement. I am so fed up, I am going to buy a Lite-On and wash my hands of it.Look elsewhere....this burner is not work the carboard box it is packaged in.
If you want a game for the whole family to enjoy, get Shrek.Just because the cartoons may be good, doesn't mean the game is.My 6 year-old doesn't like it.
This game is a piece of .... The system requirements on the box are misleading. It is tough to explain to a six year old that his brand new game can't be played until you upgrade your video card, even though no reference was made to it on the box.And when the game finally works it looks like a hybrid of 2000 technology meets 1977 graphics.
This game is only for kids and if you play the game for a while you will get bored unless you are usually the age of 8 or under. The game is cute. I'm not looking for cute games. I mean shooting water, getting slimed, and doing a food fight is for kids. When you buy it, you will only like the games for probably like the game for 3 days unless you are a big Nickelodeon freak.
I was excited when I first saw this game. We are always looking for a game for our young children to play. There it just not enough games for young children on x-box. This game was a big disappointment! There did not seem to be much of a goal to shoot for while playing. There are so many players on the screen at once that it is difficult to fine your player. It just was NOT FUN!
We got this game for our 7 year old when xbox still had so few little kids games. This is the worst game we have ever purchased. It is hard to figure out...hard to play...and hard to see what you are doing. It just feels like pushing all kinds of buttons until the game ends.Also...many levels that my daughter would want to play are 'locked' and the game is so hard to win that she will never get to play them.The game has been collecting dust since the 1st week we bought it.
Not what I expected. Too much acting. Disappointing to say the least. I will not buy the like again. Oh well.
E of Egypt is at one end and gypt at the other. Karachi is spelled Karacho. Portion of the Antartica is completely missing. Chittagong shows up in India instead of Bangladesh. Portions of Africa is missing.Buy a good globe even if it's for a small child who may not be ready for Geography lessons. It would be sad if the child turns out to be attentive and learns all the wrong lessons.
Altman has moments. Early in his career, these moments came often: "M*A*S*H" and "The Long Goodbye," "Nashville" and "McCabe & Mrs. Miller." But he also had disasters and disappointments. This lackluster, tedious picture belongs in the latter folder. There is an utter lack of narrative momentum, Carradine and Duvall are a real bore, and the use of radio bits fails to add much. No one needs to see this movie.
Its full of pitures and not what I thought it would of been. There are better books then this one I would pass it up if I had known.
The bra is too "molded" for my taste. The cups are very thick and feel to the breast the way a helmet feels to a head. It does have a good basic design but I will be returning it because of the uncomfortable density of the cups.
I have the Le Mystere Safari T-Shirt Bra and love it, but this bra is just not as good. The quality is not great; the fabric is harsh and the cups of the bra are very stiff. When I tried it on, the bra separated my boobs very far apart. It made me look like a 1950's housewife with cone boobs. No cleavage, total separation, very pointy. Just not attractive.As for the sizing, I didn't feel that the cups were too small. I am a 32 G in other Le Mystere bras and the fit was proportional. The cups just made my chest look unattractive.
The elastic used for the band very easily loses it's elasticity and thus loses shape quickly (after one wear I noticed the difference). For a molded style, this bra loses it's use after a week. It's pretty but poorly engineered.
I wasn't thrilled with the fit of this bra. It was stiff and the edges were so pronounced that even my thickest sweater couldn't hide them.
Maybe I didn't give the game a chance, but I couldn't because I would get motion sick too quickly. Maybe it's the very bright colors or the high-pitched music or the constantly going around in circles, but I was hanging over the side of my TV, turning green within 15 minutes every time I tried to play this. I was on the Baby Easy level, too, and I didn't find it all that easy, but I'm not a kid. No doubt it's probably a lot of fun later on when you get vehicles and stuff, but I couldn't even put together the snowman in the beginning levels. To its credit, the Baby Easy level does let you win even when your skills are horrible because I was a huge failure as far as navigating a river, and the game still applauded me and advanced me to the next level. (And still I couldn't put together the snowman. I am such a loser.)
The accuracy of the rule and ruggedness of construction seem satisfactory. Unfortunately the lock mechanism doesn't work well, the rule moves when pushed even when the rule is locked tightly. I cannot tighten the lock enough to keep the rule from moving when it is forcefully pressured.
If you like crappy motivational films that make your employees feel like they are being brainwashed when they watch the videos you present them than Ride The High Places is just what you need. You should be ashamed of yourself if this crap inspired you to do anything in life. Useless video garbage, 18,000,000 thumbs down.
I bought a Radeon 8500 to replace my Radeon 7000. When I first installed it the performance and frame rate just blew me away. But then I found out that my card has problems running games and 3d apps. I got a headache from trying to fix it and I'm going to have to send it back to ATI for a replacement.
When I bought this book I was hoping on getting a book covering only small jets! But what I got was a book including a lot of piston aircraft and a few airliners along with the biz JETS. Piston engine isn't a jet engine! Some informations that I would like to know on these "jets" are not there e.g. cruising alt. But the book has it's good sides to! The recognition part is very neat and I the thing that gives this book those two stars!
I'll make this short. Terrible script with very forgettable acting. How'd they con Liam Nieson into this one? Extremely cheesy, not to mention lame, visual effects. It seemed they skimped on the screen writer to waste more money on worthless effects. Very boring sound effects, there's only so many times I can here a creaky door in 5.1 before I put the mute on. At least it was only a rental, however, it was late so it cost me 6 bucks, what a waste. I'm glad I didn't blindly pay 20 for this dog.
This movie doesn't scare, it barely entertains and is frustrating to watch capable actors (Zita Jones and Nelson) in limited roles.The script is just plan bad, instead of showing realistic traditional ghost the producer decided to go with high dollar unrealistic special effects that are way overdone.I didn't hate the movie, but I was really disapointed.
The Haunting is incredibly mediocre, even to the point of making you laugh when you should be screaming. The plot is weak, the script is empty, and the acting is subdued. Well, what do you expect from a movie that has Zeta Jones in it? Actually, the scariest part of the movie is that they didn't allow a good actor who played a bit part ( Bruce Dern )to be the main character in the film. Trust me, you've seen this movie a hundred times before. Even The House On Haunted Hill was better than this turkey.
Not scary, bad acting, boring story... One star added for some nifty special effects. I really wanted to like this movie, but alas, it was another "Armageddon."
Do computer generated things scare you? They don't scare me.Do sets scare you? They don't scare me either.I understand that studios can't make money re-releasing old classics in theatres because of home video but why spend all that money trying to remake or even surpass something that is obviously the sum of its human parts, all of whom you won't or can't reuse?Isn't that like trying to be the first man on the moon - - - -again?Some scriptwriters and directors could make a biscuit and a glass of milk frightening.They used a super computer called talent.Please reboot.
When I first saw the preveiw for this movie it looked intriguingly scary. But that all changed when I actually saw it. I found it to be very boring. I was actully waiting to get scared. The preveiw for this movie was scarier.Also, the storyline was exceptionally weak and nearly drowned out by way too many special effects.this movie was just another "tech show".
Wanna be scared? Watch this movie, it is horrible. More words would just be a waste here.
I watched this flick at 1 a.m. Afterwards, I had no trouble falling asleep. When is Hollywood going to realize that showing too much emphasis on visuals makes bad theater? Overdone, bombastic,predictable,CGI effects. The house looked too much like a gaudy museum with ridiculous fixtures. On the positive side,though, the sound effects were great. The bass notes were very well done, subtle shades of ghostly children whispering and eerie creaky sounds throughout the house were the real jewel in this film.
In The Haunting a group of people are told they would be paid if they stay in Haunting Hill for one night so a skeptic can prove his point that there is nothing to fear. It isn't long before there are attacks. Such as when the stairs one person is on collapses when he is over a story up, and when a mysterious oversized hand reaches and tries to grab one of the occupants. This movie starts out well because it's scary like it's supposed to be and is very unique, but you quickly notice it's also very repetative.
Unlike the smart and creepy 1963 original (of the same title) or the spine-tingling Shirley Jackson novel (titled "The Haunting of Hill House"), Jan De Bont's brainless thriller "The Haunting" beats you mercilessly over the head with great special effects, but leaves you wondering where all the story and logic went. The film's razzle-dazzle visuals make it somewhat fun, but it's unescapably a downer.
THE ORIGINIAL OF THIS MOVIE WAS MUCH BETTER. THE SPECIAL EFFECTS IN THIS REMAKE ARE BETTER-BUT THE PLOT IS NOTHING LIKE THE ORIGINAL.
Four people are placed in a gigantic mansion as part of a study in fear, but they don't realize the house is actually haunted. Effects-heavy thriller features a decent beginning and a so-so cast (Liam Neeson and Catherine Zeta-Jones are fine, Owen Wilson and Lili Taylor are spectacularly awful), but eventually falls apart in the last half-hour, with a barrage of cheesy special effects taking over. Add to that the predictability and the sappy conclusion and you have a movie that went from promising to big dud. It might, however, hold appeal to non-horror fans looking for a quick, undisturbing thrills (and it seems that that was the crowd this movie was aimed at). For everyone else, either stick with the original or see House on Haunted Hill for a real coaster ride of a haunted house thriller (Which also actually features better CGI effects, a surprise considering it only had 1/4 the budget of The Haunting).
Only in this, the age of mediocrity, could a piece of rubbish like this get made. Owen Wilson turns in one of the worst performances in recent memory. This was made strictly for the idiots who find MTV worthwhile part of our culture.
Question: How do you take an excellent cast, millions of dollars, top of the line FX, base it on a good movie only toturn it into a piece of unwatchable garbage? Answer: Let Jan de Bont direct it.
A truly horrible horror film. Over use of not so special "special effects" attempted to divert our attention from the fact that the movie never gained any momentum, and that the characters were never developed or interesting. The only thing that's scary about this film is that someone actually tried to improve upon a classic horror movie so frightening the memory of which still scares me after 30 years. The other thing that scares me about this movie is the reoccurring memory that I actually paid to see it.
It's really difficult to make a good movie with bad material. But making a bad movie with good material must be easy---Jan DeBont proves it with this turkey. Shirley Jackson's story was a spooky classic. Robert Wise's B & W version was excellent and one of the scariest movies I've ever seen. And HE did it without special effects; just sound, shadows, and camera angles. This movie could have been so much better by relying on the original premise and forgetting all the comic book special effects. Mr. DeBont is proving that he's better as a technician than a director. Liam Neeson must have lost a bet to go along with this.
I was really stoked to watch this movie. And I honestly enjoyed the first half of the it - the setup. I love the actors here. The look and feel of the picture was great, dug the vibe. A bunch of strangers come together for an insomnia experiment in a haunted house in New England. The Dr, Liam Neeson hasn't told them that he wants to study their reaction to fear. They stay in the house a couple of days and it begins to have an effect on them. Lili Taylor's charactor in particular.That's about as far as I can go w/o spoilage. I'll just say it becomes predictable haunted house story after that. I didn't get the thrills I was expecting. Such interesting characters. Such potential. I've rarely seen a movie that was such a let down.
Hollywood reheats a classic, but this cheap serving is hardly very appetizing. This remake throws some heavy morsels of CGI down your throat and will give you indigestion.Same basic story, some people volunteer to stay in an extravagant mansion. This time they aren't told about the house's dark past. They believe they are part of a study on insomnia. The truth is they are part of a controlled experiment on group fear.Now I thought this was a nice alteration to the story. But unfortunately it starts to get extremely ridiculous. Nothing subtle here, there are plenty of cheap scares--like ghostly images or moving statues. As it turns out this house is basically a holding cell for dead children's souls. The evil landlord's spirit keeps watch over them in this purgatory. Great, a perverted pedaphile ghost.This turns into more of a goofy adventure flick. No spooky atmosphere or mystery. No suspense. No reason to bother.
This is a travesty, not only of Shirley Jackson's creepy, intelligent, incomparable "The Haunting of Hill House", but of the original "The Haunting". It's a ghost story for video-game-addicted morons. I've lost all respect I may have had for Neeson, Zeta-Jones and Taylor. This will be a permanent blotch on their resumes. If they were smart (ha ha) they might want to consider just whiting this one out! I won't apologize for sounding spiteful, either; when one of this century's best 'ghost' stories was turned into an excuse for lots of gimmicky, asinine computer graphics, instead of being crafted into the eerie filmed masterpiece it deserved to be, I was angered and even more disgusted with Hollywood, its crummy formulas and lowest-common-denominator scriptwriting than I ever was before.
This re-make fails to evoke true terror, trading for easier shocks thanks to easily distinguished CGI effects. Might have worked as an original idea, but being a re-make of a classic movie, itself based on a classic novel, necessitates living up to the original, which this movie did not.
I'll admit it was years ago when I had seen part of this movie remake that was SO bad, SO corny, SO awfully un-scary that I couldn't even continue to punish myself and barely made it half way through (and I, a lover of all things spooky!). I do recall however three things about this movie: the directing was awful, the script was terrible and Cathy Jones (I didn't know who she was - she hadn't married the old man yet which really launched her career) gave a performance that was particularly bile producing and one of the worst things about this movie. No! I speak in haste - there were a number of 'worst' things about this movie.If you want to be creeped-out, read the book (The Haunting of Hill House by Shirley Jackson). If you must see the story in movie form, watch the old black and white original from 1963 starring Julie Harris. It's dark and moody and may just give you a shiver or two along with a tinge of vertigo.Happy Hauntingness,Wind in Hare
1. This is one of those rare movies where it's so lame, that I didn't / couldn't finish it.2. This movie is so lame, that spending more time writing a detailed review is a waste of time.
Okay, this movie may not be nominated for an Oscar for best Movie, or best acting, or not even for FX. However, it is a good movie where you can spend 108 minutes. The critics listed above were too harsh, and I almost did not buy the movie. I am glad I did, and will watch it a few more times. Zeta-Jones is a pretty girl, she has nice outfits in the movie. The haunted hause is nicely decorated, so why not watch it a few more times. Please keep in mind, sometimes movies are for a good pass-time, and this one is one of those.
along with the new Starwars. It is one of those movies that you want your 8 bucks and 2 hours of your life back afterwards. The plot is lame. The psycho-thriller classic turns a flop & dumb special effects-fest. I recommend "the Matrix" "Taxi Driver (remastered)" etc. for your holiday viewing.
Some day Lili Taylor will land that role in a film which will show the world what a high-calibre actress she really is. THE HAUNTING is not that film. What a thankless part for Ms. Lili. What a thankless film. The scariest thing about this movie must have been the bill for the c.g.i. effects that the studio received. I mean, the movie had a moment or two of tension, but on the whole, I was bored.There was nothing new here: the fury of an evil, dead capitalist and the pain inflicted on his mostly children workers--and his family--just can't seem to get out of the house. So! The evil men do does live on! How original! I'm reaching for sarcasm which is never pretty, so I will end here. This movie was the pits.
Crass, vulgar, ridiculous farce of a film that regrettably retains none of the keen psychological portraits in Jackson's novel. Believe me, I am no stickler for slavish literary adaptations. When changes need to be made for cinematic purposes, I utterly support a director's choice to do so. Here, however, Jackson's work is not even on display in spirit; instead, this juvenile, special effects laden mess is marred by a juvenile screenplay and lousy performances from good actors. Even Liam Neeson publicly declared his utter disgust with this production. If only the filmmakers had taken the Robert Wise film version as inspiration; it is by no means faultless but is a masterpiece compared to this dreck. Only those folks who adore CGI will appreciate this film, and to them I say "enjoy." To those looking for characters or true chills, try "The Innocents," "The Changeling," "The Legend of Hell House," or the original "The Haunting" instead.
ALL I CAN SAY IS SEE THE ORIGINAL WITH JULIE HARRIS. SO MUCH BETTER THAN THE NEW. THE NEW DEPENDS ON COMPUTER EFFECTS. WHICH WERE PRETTY COOL. BUT DID NOT SAVE THE MOVIE FROM ITS DOWNFALL. ITS LACK OF STORY WAS LAME.NOT SCARY WHAT SO EVER. SEE THE ORIGINAL. YOU WONT BE DISSAPOINTED.
I honestly can't understand why Zeta-Jones' badly-scripted part is stealing the show with these reviewers; her cliched "liberated woman with just a hint of vulnerability" part is no more of a highlight than the rest of this awful movie. Bitter, am I? When the '60s version of a movie has more scares than the '90s version, be very afraid.
It was funny, bad acting, stupid scripts and over the top special effects! There was nothing else to do but to laugh at how stupid it was. This movie good be 1 hour shorter if it wasn't for all the repeated scences of just looking at the house from the outside. And no, Catherine Zeta Jones didn't save the movie.
This is not a horror movie- it is an interesting science fiction movie. However, it is a science fiction movie with bad special effects and a bad dialogue. The acting is good, but that just doesn't make up for it. I didn't buy this movie- I went to see it once in the theatre, and that was enough for me. If you want a real horror movie, check out The Sixth Sense.
I thought this movie would be something more, but the teaser trailer was far better than the movie! I understood that it wasn't a jump out horror movie, but more of a psychological thriller thing, and still, no good. Maybe the only thing good in it was Catherine Zeta-Jones that neat merry-go-round / mirror room, and the special effects.. I also found the other characters in the movie quiet boring, and the plot confused me until the third time I watched it. But if you like slow-paced movies that eventually end, then this is for you.
No, no, no! What went wrong? Big-budget film with great actors, and what do we get? A visually appealing film with a completely flat Liam Neeson and a paper-thin storyline. Catherine Zeta Jones tries to charm her way through, but even though she does an okay job, the movie is still bad. Lili Taylor and Owen Wilson also try to add flavour to it all, but cannot manage to save the day. All we get is a movie with a few novelties but way too little content. It all seems to be over before it really begins, and nothing really makes much sense. And the eerie mood is almost totally absent. Not a good omen for a "horror" movie, is it?I just can't believe what went wrong for Neeson. Usually he drags a movie up, not down! Watch House on Haunted Hill instead, if you're into "stuff-some-people-into-a-haunted-house-and-see-if-the-survive" movies. Then you'll se how a proper haunting should be :)
This is probably the worst "horror" movie I have ever seen! Don't see this unless you want to be bored to death!
If this movie had been played for more than just cheep thrills, it could have been good. It had an array of good, if not overly impressive, actors, good special effects, and a good basis novel. Unfortunately, the acting skips around from histrionics to casual acceptance where there should be histrionics to just plain silliness. This is a neat movie to watch for some brainless eye-candy, but it really lost a lot of energy in the translation from big-screen to video.And completely unrelated, but the ending scene sounds like an anti-Russian lobbyist. "I won't let you kill any more children, Ukraine! Go to hell!"
The special effects are the only thing that saved this movie. The characters are shallow, the plot is either non-existant or predictable, and the ending is unbelievable. If you're interested in this movie, I would recommend the 1963 version instead. It doesn't rely so heavily on special effects and in turn has great characterization and plot (not to mention a more believable setting). The DVD takes longer than usual to cue up or didn't work at all in both my players. (I tried two different discs, same problem.)
Sad Sad SadThe waste of talent in this movie is such a sad state of affairs. Catherine Zeta-Jones is a much higher caliber actress, along with Liam Neeson's lame attempts to make this movie palatable is such a crime.... almost as if the movies' set was haunted!The beginning of the movie has so much promise - you feel the backround of the centralized story has promise, you get suckered into the premise this house has to offer - then, and without warning, the silliness begins.It is as if you've been thrown into an Addams Family reunion - the story line starts to wander, the characters continue to wander, and ideas and solutions pop-up without a warning or explanation...To say a "horror" movie isn't believable almost sounds absurd, but this movie gets you suckered in, then throws you on the floor flat...This is a definite - do not buy, borrow or rent! Just wait for cable!
The newly updated film version of Shirley Jackson's "The Haunting of Hill House" is somewhat acceptable. If your looking for some good effects and a strong character lead, "The Haunting" is your cup of tea. For the rest of us who want something scary, "The Haunting" was definitely not it. For the first hour of the movie, it's creepy and fun as we explore the house along with the actors. But as the second half begins to roll, "The Haunting" loses steam. If your a person who enjoys the sights and sounds of a high budget film, buy "The Haunting". But for those who want class in their horror flicks, definitely leave this one out of the collection.
THE MOVIE TAKES SO LONG TO GET INTERESTING YOUR ASLEEP BEFOREYOU KNOW IT.THANK GOD I RENTED THIS!
This was another one of those movies that mostly had it's special effects support it. Don't get me wrong Catherin Zeta-Jones was hot as usual but she needed a bigger role. This movie was good in many ways but not for horror like maybe adventure would have suited it fine but not horror. As a matter of fact I would like to take this opportunity to say that this movie is the least scariest that I have ever seen but still a good storyline goes behind it. So yes this movie would be worth renting.
No, it's not as good as the original. But let's rate it on it's own merit - hmmm, it has none! This movie sucks whether you compare it to the original or let it try and stand alone! One of the worst movies of recent years, it has ridiculous acting (except for Liam Neeson, but it's not like he's good, I don't know why he did this) and one of the stupidest plots I have ever seen in my life. This is such a waste, don't buy it, don't rent it. This is a terrible movie. Period.
Movies don't get much worse than this one, folks. The plot was poor and the acting was terrible. The scene near the beginning with the two ladies prancing around the house was incredibly lame. The filmmakers tried to overcome the shoddy storyline by tossing in some mediocre special effects. If they were intended to be a distraction, they didn't work.I have to admit, my review is based only on the first 30 or so minutes of the movie. That was all I could take before I got up off the couch, rewound the film, and promptly returned to the video store.
If you want a movie with a poor script, poor acting, and poor scares this movie is for you. We were hoping for a scary movie, but instead we came across this comedy. Lili Taylor is horrible as Eleanor, a woman driven to save everyone else who deserved to die for deciding to be in this attempt at a production. Liam Neeson, what were you thinking?
Not scary, not original, bad computer fx, bad acting and no suspense! What a waste of money...
I guess the part I liked best was where Eleanor discovered that she was related to the ghost haunting the house. It was really believable. Tears came to my eyes it was so touching. Then, when the cherubs on the wall came to life, I was even more moved as there little souls finally were freed to go to heaven. That was really touching. I am just amazed at the screenwriter's brilliance. And all those special effects! He was so clever to add those. It must of taken a great deal of intelligence to have everything--even the ceilings come alive. I feel richer as a human for investing my time in this masterpiece.
this movie is so stupid. waste of anybody's money or time. Not even Catherine Zeta Jones can make it seem worth watching. no parts in the movie were scary at all. In fact, was this a comedy by mistake?
It just didn't work. Astounding sets alone can't create on-screen chemistry. The story line and performances were weak, and, even worse, I didn't think it was scary...and wasn't that the whole idea? I left the theatre feeling cheated. This movie was just plain DUMB!
The actors in the movie are a great bunch, but when the plot is very weak, you dont get very much. I mean Liam Neeson! Hes a great actor, but was very weak in this movie. it wasnt scary at all, the the end of the movie was bad. There was maybe one scary part, which was when a fake lookin skeleton popped up and made me jump. That was all. I dont recommend this movie to people who like scary movies, b/c it was a polar opposite.
A fan of both Jackson's novel and the 1963 Robert Wise adadptation, I went to this movie expecting it to be underwhelming. It was worse. In fact, it was so bad, I laughed my way through it (along with the two friends who accompanied me). There are so many digital effects that the house seems alive, indeed, but computer geeks set free with a big budget don't creep me out. They're just annoying. So is the movie. The house shape-shifts, sighs, moans--hell, even the door-knocker gets a reaction shot. Zeta-Jones's leather hipboots manage to out-act her, and Lili Taylor is hilariously bad as Eleanor. ("I've got the save the children!" Wha?) Liam Neeson is even less interesting than he was in THE PHANTOM MENACE, if that's possible. Let's just put it this way: I just sacrificed 10 minutes of my time to write this review so that you won't waste 1 hour and 40 minutes of yours on this film.
This is one of the most horrible movies i've ever seen. It starts off promising with a creepy house and an old story of how the house is haunted. From there it gets worse and worse and worse until the ending, which might be the dumbest ending i've ever had to sit through. This movie only deserves one star but Catherin Zeta Jones looked very very attractive in the movie (like always) and i had to give it an extra star just for her.P.S.what's up with her and Micheal Douglas, that's just a shame.
How any sane, intelligent person(perhaps that explains it!) could recommend this overblown crap-fest is beyond me. Quite posibbly the worst horror movie ever made. Get the original 1963 version or read the classic novel--BUT, DO NOT WASTE YOUR TIME OR MONEY ON THIS TRAIN WRECK OF A MOVIE!
I'm sorry, but I just couldn't stay awake to see this complete video. Whenever a cliche' scare comes up, I fall asleep....and this was often. I saw the original 60's version and, sorry, but that one was a snoozer too. I think this story could be phenomenally scary, but the right party has yet to make it.The only really scary thing about this movie is looking like Lily Taylor and having to share the screen with Catherine Zeta-Jones. She's a Goddess!!
Third grade mentality, third-rate dialog. Not for adults. Egads, I actually bought the DVD. Shame on me.
Good cast, high budget movie. The movie was supposed to concentrate on a group of 4 people (all insomniacs) who were going to stay in an isolated house, to test their reactions to pressure situations.Was it the lack of direction, the lack of story line, or the lack of interest from the actors that led this movie to become a flop ?Watching this movie was a chore. It was about as exciting as "The Avengers".There's not a lot that can be said, apart from save your money and get a better movie (The Sixth Sense was made on a cheaper budget & was far more exciting).
"The Haunting" is certainly one of the worst films I've seen. While it starts off promisingly, the sets and special effects become so mind numbingly overdone that the thread of the original story is lost completely. It is replaced by a story that is not only derivitive and banal, but laugably contrived as well. This movie proves that even with a classic novel and a classic movie, a remake can totally botch its rendering beyond all recognition. Recommended for the film audience that prefers style far above substance.
"The Haunting" with Julie Harris was so good--even better for its black and white medium, which enhances the sense of the macabre and general off-kilterness of the set. Why don't they remake "The Wizard Of Oz?" Now, there's a picture that could be made MUCH pertier with modern cinematography. The cheap set and old theatre-style acting throw a damper on what's still is a great universal story.
The only thing in this "horror" film that made it was the house and Lili Taylor, Catherine Zeta-Jones, looking good!, but the story was so forced, it never caught any horror, the special effects were cartoon like, not one bit frighting, the original movie and the short story will scare the pants off you, and why?, because your mind can conger up all the horror you want, your minds eye will take you to all those dark corners you fear, oh, and another thing that ruined the movie for me is, Owen Wilson, can't stand him!, how he ever got in movies is beyond me!, ignore this cluttered up movie and go to the original black and white one and get set to be terrified!
To say I was disappointed in this movie would be an understatement. To classify this as a horror film would be just plain wrong. While it achieves its goal to tell a good story, the chills and thrills just aren't there. I cannot recommend this movie to anyone with a serious yen to be scared out of their wits. If you want a real frightening tale, I recomend Rose Red. That's how a haunted house story should be told.
It's just bad. I've already written one review but I feel its my duty to make everyone avoid this hideous and vile mess at all costs. Rent the original!
What made the book horrorific/good was not the special effects but the thoughts/feelings of the main characters.The ending was completely destroyed. The writers/director/producer should have stuck closer to the original story and this would have been a much better movie: a classic.C'est la vie.
This has to be the stupidist movie I have ever seen. The acting is horrible besides Catherine Zeta Jones( she is excellent). But I mean the other girl in there was so dull, 1 word comes to mind when I think about this movie LIFELESS. Cant these producers waste 10 million on a movie that will be eerie or scary, because in my opinion this was just horrible.
This movie, supposedly a journey into terror, lulls one off to sleep most of the time. The pace is so slow that I thought the exposition would never end. There wasn't one fear producing moment in the entire movie. I believe "Bambi" was scarier.This movie is dreadful, especially when one remembers the 1963 version with Julie Harris. I wonder how much money was spent making this dud!
To sum up this movie takes one word and one word only...Terrible. If this is your first foray into The Haunting stop now and go back 36 years to the original.
This is one of the worst movies I have ever seen! It was absolutly stupid, boring, and a time-waster. The movie seemed to take forever and I couldn't wait for it to end. Plus, the ending was absolutely terrible and stupid. The main character in the story was such a bizzare character you really couldn't relate to her at all. The other characters were pretty weird too, but they were just funny. The special effects were OK, but it really annoyed me that those stupid statues kept coming to life to make the movie go on and on. There were so many many comedy aspects of this movie that it was hard to tell sometimes whether it was a comedy or a horror movie(such as the fact that all the characters had problems that were very obvious). I don't know about the old version of this movie, but the new one really sucks.
I saw a commercial for this movie. The special effects looked great. I was expecting to see a great action-packed movie. A friend and I anxiously stepped into the theater. The movie started with a little action, but then it was gone. Nothing. That was it. I actually fell asleep during it, something I never did before! This was one of the STUPIDEST movies I have ever seen in my life. It doesn't even deserve one star, but I've got to give it something. If you think that this looks like a good deal, think again. Your money is worth something much better for the same price.
My review is very simple: not bad, you can watch this movie but you might find it boring a bit.I dont recommend this to people who enjoy movies that have a good story and directing.
This overdone remake of the brilliant 1963 classic is sorely disappointing. If it had been released as an original movie with an original title, it would have worked. The special effects (though good) were too much for this movie to bare.
This was a horride movie. It had some creepy sceans, but the story was flater than paper. This proves that a movie doesn't need special effects to be scary. I saw "The Sixth Sense" and that was much better (And more scary) than this movie. Don't waste your money.
This was a bad remake of a really original SCARY movie. This remake focuses on the children trapped in the house. The original movie focused on the house and how scary and evil it was. That was what made it scary. The Haunting remake has ok special effects but some were not needed. Whoever reads this review I don't really recommend this movie but if you want to waste a couple of bucks go ahead.
This 1999 horror film based on the original "The Haunting", is creepy in some ways, but altogether, it's not really a great film at all. It has good acting, and the scares and pop-outs are clever (things that boost my rating from a 1 to a 2), with an ending that isn't perfect, but really can hold the movie from completely falling apart. The film moves slow in the beginning, and it starts to pick the pace soon after, and later has it's intense ending. The film is OK in some ways, but ultimately becomes more of a fail than a win, but it still isn't horrible. I liked the house and the setting, though. That was cool. The complete storyline was pretty good, also. If you want some innovative horror from 1999, I suggest you get "The Blair Witch Project".
Liam Neeson is pathetic. Catherine Zeta-Jones is sham. The young boy is boring, though i gave him a pity because he's killed for no reason. The only thing i was moved by is the girl and her story, her family story; in fact, the story itself is pretty interesting, so there's huge disappointment's waiting for you. Except computer effect there's almost nothing.
A Philadelphia Catholic in King James's Court was a Catholic vs. Fundamentalist Christians story. Michael, the main character who went from Philadelphia to Kentucky, defended Catholic views and procedures. He tried to explain new ideas to the Fundamentalist, but they where not open to these ideas. I personally felt it became better towards the end of the novel. At first it was slow-moving and hard to keep track of all the characters. The description became hackneyed, along with the plot. Also, reading about the farm life was hard to relate to. After the heated bible discussions began, the story was easier to read. Overall, this book was better than I had expected.
This novel shows the struggle of a young boy troubled by his own faith, with problems within his own family from his father's death, to his uncle's fighting against his faith. It shows his struggle to find out what Catholicism is, the flaws of it, and which religion he should follow. It shows the heresies against Catholicism, along with its strengths. It has a sheer lacking in the amount of entertainment in the book, yet it can either strengthen or weaken your faith. It is tends to be utterly dull at times. Not a good book.
While Morison does admit to the genocide of the Indians lead by Columbus and his henchmen, it idolizes him for the duration of the book. A brief admittance of guilt, for Morison, is a surefire way of allowing a much more bias, idealistic portrayal of a man with "questionable" character traits. Bartolome De Las Casas, a European minister who lived in the same time as Colombus, gives a much more realistcally bleek look at the Spanish invasion of the Americas. Because Morison's focus shifts so rapidly from the bad to the good, it loses major points for realism. The book reads more like a 3rd grade textbook; Morison would have us believe Santa Claus and the toothfairy exists along side a saintly Christopher Columbus.
As far as I know, this is the first book on SQLite and for that Chris Newman deserves a compliment.Beyond that, this book is not very useful though:1) It explains some basic SQL syntax but I didn't buy this book to learn SQL.2) Very little information about the specifics and pitfalls of SQLite syntax, I rarely find what I'm looking for.3) Being a PHP developer I don't need the chapters on C++, Perl, TCL and Python (about 25% of the book).
Covert writes a bunch of non-sensical, sophomoric songs that my kids simply hate. This guy is a Barney-wannabe and this album does nothing to save his dignity.
Although the doll is great (like all Barbie - Kellie dolls) the jumpin castle was pretty much a waste of money. We really didn't get it to work right and, in the long run, my daughter just played with the doll. Unless you are buying it for the doll, I wouldn't recommend this one, just a waste of plastic here.
I ordered this bag without any knowledge of how big it was. I wanted to use it for a wkend trip I was taking and was shocked at how small the bag was. I have a 3 month old baby girl and it was way too small for me to carry all of her things in it. I was only able to fit a few diapers and wipes and the other small items. I wasn't even able to fit a change of clothes. I tried putting a change of her clothes in the back pocket but it made it way too bulky. All in all the bag was adorable but way too small for a newborn. I wouldn't recommend this bag to any mother with a newborn baby.
I just bought this book 5 days ago. I test in 17 days. SO that gives me at the most if I started studying when I bought this book about 22 days total. I will give you an update on how I did. So far I've read everything in the book, but aside from the practice tests, I don't really care too much because it doesn't actually go through and help you with more difficult problems. I've taken the asvab before, but for the job I want I need to score a little higher to be a linguist in the general section. I'm just studying my VE & Arithmetic since those are the only two that matter. I'll give you a future update.
this book is very mediocre, it has very little correct information. the practice test especially the math parts have a lot of questions that are irrelevant when taking the actual test none of the questions you have practiced for math is on the actual test. the info about the time and amount of questions in the test are correct but be warned. Im sure there are better ways to improve your math skills. don't waste your money.
Contents references pages up to 375. Book stop at page 342. Three chapters are missing. Good book up until the missing chapters.
I bought this book for my son as he wanted to study for ASVAB test and when I was helping him study by reading him the test there were many many answers incorrect in the back of the book. When checking to see if an answer was incorrect or correct there were lots of mistakes. I was aware of some of the answers and knew they were wrong, but if a person was in the dark about what the answer would be they would go on the incorrect answer. So, this is not a book I would recommend for studying.
I am sorely disappointed by this book.I don't know what the other reviewer was doing when he actually read through this book but I found countless, and I mean a SUBSTANTIAL number, of incorrect answers in this books prep tests. The amount of factual errors, typos and flat out incorrect information contained in this book makes me wonder if it really was written by a "Dummie". On top of this everything contained inside the book is stuff you would have learned in the first year of high school if you paid any attention what so ever to your classes.To top this off and prove how serious I am about informing you guys/gals not to even contemplate putting your money forth to purchase this book -- I made an account on Amazon.com solely so I could express my distress at this poorly written piece of literature.
If you read a "Dummies" book before then you know the format. The first part of the book is divided into lessons, then there are three sample tests in the back.I thought the lessons were good, but not great compared to some of the other ASVAB books out there. The book did a great job of telling you upcoming changes to the ASVAB as advertised.What really turned me off from this book was when I was doing the sample tests and there were a couple answers that were clearly wrong. For instance, the question for General Science was what Chromosomes does a female have. The answers in the back said "XY" while it should have been "XX". This was just one of a few I found.While the style remains the same as most dummies books, I cant recommend this to anyone based on the errors in the sample tests. If you dont plan on doing sample tests then this book might be for you.
I mean seriously, I paid good money for this book and the practice test answers are wrong. I don't recommend buying this and am going to try and get my money back.
This book is great for people whom already have well developed, basic math skills and are just looking for a refresher to familiarize them with what they might run across on the ASVAB. You need to already have good math skills because the math, science, electronics, and physics portions of this book are FILLED with basic, arithmetic errors (elementary school level addition and subtraction and middle school level factoring). Don't expect to learn anything from this book. If you need to brush up on math for the ASVAB, I would suggest a different publisher.
Although there are good poems in here, and good authors, Astley is intent on dumbing down poetry - this book aims for the lowest common denominator possible, and then digs deeper. Astley's commentary and rants are opinionated and condescending. Poetry is far more alive and interesting than than this anthology suggests.
I have never bother to write one of these review but I agree that the video is too advance for beginners and I find it difficult to get over the fact of what a poser she is. She seems to be cashing in on surfing and going after a niche market in yoga DVDs. I have watched and done all three DVDs and I have seen much better yoga DVDs. I sold these DVDs because they aren't the best out there. Check out the Living Art series of DVDs. I found these much better then the whole series of yoga for surfer. Go mindfully and slowly. Peace
You get audio signal onlt with no picture when you try to capture home movie from comcaorder tape. In very few case, I captured the video footage, but i just get the audio when you paly it back.When you sent the problem to ADS customer service, you get automatical e-mail response said they will respond to your questions ASAP. but, you never get e-mail unless you call them. the phone line is so busy, you wouldn't be so patient.
First of all, I have major issues with children's snacks that are so full of sodium.I have to admit, my son loves these. What is not so great is the two or three days of garlic breath I have to endure afterwards. Was it so necessary to add garlic salt to a toddler snack? The onion and other vegetables are more than enough to provide flavour.
A little too flowery for my taste and not very scientific. Then again what did I expect !!! Easy pros however if you want to learn about anatomy, get an anatomy atlas !!
I cannot believe there are no negative reviews for this. No matter any point of view (feminists are gonna be mad) or theory this book is positing, the basis of the book is not understanding female anatomy. I have no idea if the psychological ideas have been debunked. This book was given to me as a joke a few birthdays ago. You can say "the reason your sex is bad is because you've lost your feminine role" and hell, that could be 100% correct, but a big chunk of this book ignores where the nerve endings are located. In the 40 years since this was published, I think someone went ahead and talked to some women, maybe even did some science-y stuff and decided 80+% of women weren't just orgasming wrong. But its good that this is still out there, to make people feel ashamed of the way their body works. In other news, no one poops but you: cause you're gross.
I ordered these to replace my worn pins on my truck. I'm CDO about my truck and I noticed a bit of play in the factory stock hinge on the driver door. As it turns out these are made with pretty generous clearances and my door now has more play than it did before installing these. My next step is to try McMaster-Car in hope they will have a tighter fitting bushing in the correct size for my door hinge.I gave them two stars because they do an adequate job of holding the door onto the truck.FYI: CDO is similar to OCD except the letters are in the correct order.Erik
This is a very cheap toy. Poor finish, sloppy tolerances. Had a slight imbalance and would vibrate and lose speed quickly. The vibration makes most of the usual gyroscope tricks impossible.Then it spun off the table and promptly broke. Perhaps that's why they offer the two-pack?
I know because I bought it. The gyroscope spins out of control and the string snaps on the first pull. The gyroscope is UGLY and DULL. I am Verry Disappointed and so will you if you get this. Do Not Buy it. It is made of lead and stains your finger when you toutch it. This Toy is Very Low Quality and it stinks. As I said Before Do not Buy.
the felt top is so thin, my dog tore into it instantly! Next came out the foam bed, which she shredded into a million pieces, then she got to the inner cedar beds. Well you can imagine the mess it made.this bed lasted her a whole week. I cannot find anything for her. If you have an older, mellow dog, this would be a great bed. It is quite comfortable. But if you have a pooch that likes to destroy, this won't hole up at all.
Disappointed by this item. I bought a couple of "crystal" decanters at the same time, which cost only a few dollars more. The difference was striking. This set is very dull, ordinary glass, and the rubber stopper in the decanter looks cheap.
We bought this thinking our kids would love it. They did love painting. But the problem came when we tried to wash it off. We cleaned it about 30 minutes after the kids started and we had to get out the pressure washer. It took about an hour to clean up. It was by far the worst clean up. It does not come off that easily. the regular hose did nothing to get it off.
The paint is very thin which makes it hard to paint on the sidewalk, you have to keep going over and over the same area to get it to stay and then I had a hard time getting it off when I left it overnight.
Inserting this card in my new Minolta Dimage 7i (digital camera), I get an "Unable to use card" error. The card is evidently incompatible with the 7i. Others have had the same experience. See the digital camera forums.Check the compatibility chart at minoltausa.com before you buy!
This card worked great in my Canon G3 digital camera for few months, and the 'CF Card Error' started happending (as some of the other reviewers have also experienced). I reformatted the disk few times and I'm still getting that error when I turn on my camera. Since it has a life time warranty on it, I'm RMA it back to SimpleTech.
The card isn't very good and stores pictures too slowly, especialy as you start to fill up the memory. Also SimpleTech's customer support isn't too good. Not one person could tell me what the 'Error Application' message meant when using the Simple Tech CompactFlash Card Reader to get pictures from the card.Stay away from this company.
I bought a SimpleTech CompactFalsh card of 256Mb to use with my digital camera (Minolta DiMAGE 7i) but it does not work ! The card works fine on my PC, but there is a compatibility problem with the digital cam. I guess SimpleTech must be aware of the problem since their tech support e-mailed me that they would post a patch on their website as soon as they would find one, but of course I had no clue of the compatibility issue before buying the card, so I hope this might help some potential buyers...
I wonder if the guy from Chicago was on to something when he mentioned the possible lack of good QC with these guys?! My card didn't lock anything up, but it wasn't as responsive as two other brands that I currently use (I won't name them so as to not start a brand loyalty debate). I do believe that I won't try them again until I hit upon their "good" cards though.
I bought a Simpletech 256 Compactflash card two months ago. I opened the package and put it in my Nikon Coolpix 2500. I tried it by taking a couple of pictures. Suddenly, the card stopped working and my camera said CF card Error. :( That was only 10 minutes of using it. Then I tried it with a Canon G2...still did not work...had to return it...
It's very simple, everything I have ever owned by SimpleTech has died on me including this drive, 4 USB sticks, 3 SD cards, and 1 CF card. Not one of their products lasted me more than 2 years and caused me a lot of headache.
I saw the negative reviews and thought it must be user error or bad luck to blame, but I'm afraid it's all true. My brand new Simpletech card has gone mysteriously crazy, within 10 minutes of popping it in my Canon S230. I don't care what the explanation is, frankly-- card error is a scary thing to see. Magically, replacing my trusty (if allegedly slower) SanDisk cards rectifies all problems. I swear, I did nothing wrong-- it's idiot proof. This card is just wacky.
It seems nice enough and it's cheap, but it is apparently incompatible with the Canon Powershot Digital Elphs. For use with those cameras, buy Sandisck instead. Seriously.
After a few uses, I got CF Card Error during a function at home with my Canon G3. Going to try if I can get a replacement. Even with that, I don't think I will be using this for any important events.When I buy a card next time, I have to read each and every review and see how many people with G3 got into trouble.
I just could not read it; it was too violent and ugly. Perhaps it was just me but I couldn't get past the first chapter.
In this book many characters are parallel, mimicking thefutility of war and the cycle of meaningless brought onby wars. The characterization lacked depth but the writ-ing ha a beautiful quality of magical realism like inother books by Marquez. Again, Marquez's focus on pedo-philia was disconcerting.How can I like a writer so much yet dislike his book?The answer is that beautiful writing is not enough tocreate a good book. Their needs to be excellence inform and content. Marquez is excellent in form but heis very low in content. I found this book more confus-ing than any other book that I completed. If it hadnot been written by Marquez, I would not have finishedit.
This book has been extoled over and over to me throughout the years. I tried it about 5 yrs ago and quit after 30 or so pages, but this time when my book group chose it, I was determined to try it again. After all I'm 5 years older. I read it slowly, tried not to analyze it too deeply and become immersed in the flow of the culture. About l00 pages into it, I thought this is really creative and interesting. Fifty pages later, I was bored with its redundancy of characters, names and magical events. It picked up again in the last 50 pages, but it NEVER did for me what so many of the previous readers exclaimed about. I was disappointed. This is one book that didn't live up to its hype.
This is just a warning to those of you who think you may have found a new, great author to read: forget it. I completely disagree that this is one of the best books of all time; the book was boring, and its characters were difficult to keep straight due to the author's annoying decision to name them all similarly.
I was cajoled into reading this "required reading for all of humanity" masterpiece. I had to fight to finish this novel - I thought that at the very least, it would be as magical as Allende's House of Spirits, but I was severely disappointed. Unlike everyone else (or so it seems everyone else), this book did not change my sensibilities. The best part of the book was the last 40 or so pages, which ALMOST, almost, made the other 400 pages worthwhile. I do not doubt Garcia Marquez' talent -- what I do believe is a lot was lost in the translation!
This book was highly recommended by a number of people who knew I was going to visit Colombia. They said it would explain the culture and tell the story of Colombia. After visiting Colombia and immersing myself in the culture and history of this incredible country, I do not see the fit. Colombia is a country with energy, action and forward momentum rather than a sleepy melancholy society chasing its tail.
My experience with 100 Years of Solitude has been that people either love it or they absolutely hate it, but I'm apathetic about it. I had to read it for a world cultures class in college and not even the teacher could tell us how it was relevant to what the class was about. The repetition of the men's names makes for a very confusing story line, and the son that was born with a tail? Weird, to say the least. But apparently this book inspires a lot of people judging by the previous reviews. I would suggest that you read it if for no other reason than to form your own opinion about it.
I enjoyed the first hundred pages or so. The symbolism was very intriguing, but after a while it was just confusing with too many characters and a meandering plot. I could not stay awake long enough to finish it.
In what appears to be a stab at Western values this Prize winning author has created a confusing mess.Many people take this book and wade through it seeking some sort of enlightenment from such a prestigious work (Nobel Prize 1982). When, in reality, this book is a sophomoric slap at US and Western European anti-communist policies of the Cold War.I am not saying the Western policies were sound, but I will say that communism and the system it supported have been proven to be morally bankrupt and fiscally unsound. Perhaps the politics of the time pushed the Nobel Committee into giving an award that could have been given elsewhere.
What is the point of this book? It doesn't have one, in my opinion. The author himself said that the reason for writing it was that he wanted to write a book about incest! I really do not enjoy graphic descriptions of this incest, either. I would not reccommend it to anyone, in fact, I tell others NOT to read it. I wouldn't have read past the tenth page if I hadn't been required to for my English class.
Not sure why this book has been so raved about. When I bought it, the book store clerk told me it was his "favorite book ever". That's quite an endorsement.I found it to be really uninteresting. It's almost all exposition, with little dialogue. The characters may be "memorable", but only because they're "boring". None of them have any personality (although one is well-endowed, which is nice) and is the author just *trying* to be difficult when he gives them all such similar names?This book felt like the authors parents told him lots of stories and fables when he was growing up, and he tried to cram them all into one long stream on consciousness tale. I abandoned it half-way through.
Characters aren't interesting. The story is not compelling. The plot is not engaging. No mystery of any kind. Just dull. Much ado ... why?
This book was a total waste of time. I kept thinking that it was going to lead somewhere or reveal something, but it never did- it just kept repeating names until I had no idea and no longer cared who was who and rambled on to an unfulfilling end.
I read this book after it was recommended by Oprah as being considered "perhaps the best book ever written"! What a disappointment... I slogged my way through it, thinking "it must get better if it's the best book ever written"... but alas, no, it didn't.I am a voracious reader, and read fro 2-5 books a week. I noticed Amazon recommended "if you like this, you'll like Catch 22". I loved Catch 22! I HATED this book! What am I missing here?
I read (well, not really...I got to page 100 and felt like I'd read it three times already) this book over ten years ago and I still rank it as the worse piece of tripe that I ever had the misfortune to come across. But I'm biased. Like most Latins, I think the whole "magical and mysterious" cloak with which Latin literature is viewed abroad is unfortunate, but ultimately it's that kind of rubbish that sells.
I will not critize this book too heavily, as apparently it is a classic and many people find it delightful. However, I found the book extremely hard to follow, and without any identifyable plot line. Yes, it is interesting to see how a city can develop over 100 years of time, but all the characters kept dying off, and I found myself not being bothered by it, as nothing made me connect with them through the book. I really just did not find the book enjoyable enough to continue past 2/3rds the way in to it .
I pride myself on finishing every book I begin reading, but this novel severely tested my perseverance. I kept waiting for the story to generate even a spark of interest but it just never happened for me. Admittedly Marquez is a gifted writer and for this reason I was tempted to award the book 2 stars, but if I had to sum up the book in one word it would be PAINFUL, thus the single star. I've read a number of 'classics' which were difficult reads, but there were usually rewards for the effort. I can't say the same for this book.
10,000 ideas thrown up in the air and landed randomly on pages.Characters not even likeable except for Ursula. Too muchridiculous stuff making story unbelievable. The author reallyhas put one over on the public; I could have written a betterbook!
So if nobody understands what the heck the author is trying to say means that the book rates five stars? I think not.
I am sorry to say that I gave up on the book. I tried and even read some very intellectually capable folks reviews to see if I was missing something. I came to the conclusion that an individual who rarely reads fiction and who is an engineer by training could probably never "get" something like this book. It almost seems that the technique of the writer fascinates many of the readers perhaps more than the substance. The magical realism style is too much for me. I regret I could not finish Nobel prize winning author or not- maybe at some future date I will go back and try again. Sorry ----
I only made it to 195 pages. The book is just boring. A lot of sound and fury signifying very little. There are marriages; there are deaths; there are love affairs; there are suicides; there are battles... so a lot does happen. BUT-- I don't care about the characters. If you don't care about the characters, then all their quirky faults seem abstract and dull. Like dusty butterflies in a catalog, their various lives are chronicled. It's a dry description of their adventures and I'm left with a "so what?" Maybe his dryness passes for sophistication, but this book left me cold.
Marquez' book takes the reader through the lives and times of what I hope is an atypical Columbian (?) family, covering from roughly the 1830s to the 1930s. It was fun in parts, but oddly repetitive, with a style that seemed half magic realism, half Freud. And, of course, the standard enervating anti-American diatribes were thrown in. I guess a Latin American author even in magic realism mode can't overcome his predilictions.
As I opened this book, I thought to myself "Wow! This seems like a great story!" I found myself growing more depressed and disgusted with every page. Although the style and Marquez' technique are unquestionably wonderful, the overlaying themes of lust, lack of self-control, and immorality outweighed the good. The goal of nearly very character's life is the same; to please him or herself. Very few characters are in the least bit caring of self-sacrificing. The only way I could reconcile myself to reading this disapointing work was the fact that it is a lesson in man's depravity. I realized that every person, without God's intervention, is just as bad or worse than Marquez' perverse characters. The book is not without its high points- I loved the ending, the mystery of the Segundo twins, and Ursula's strength. There are some passages where the language is incredible. Marquez is a mastery of imagery! I only wish that there had been more positive images to remember....
One hundred years of characters and you won't care about one. This novel is overloaded with characters, but I didn't feel much of anything for any of them. It lacks focus, and failed to make me care about anything that happened in the story.
The first paragraph of this book is one of the greatest in literary history. It's enough to compel the reader to read the next one hundred pages. Unfortunately, the book becomes one of the most overrated in history.Many of the praises given say the book is difficult, confusing, and yet they come to the conclusion it is a great book. Why? Why not just say that difficult and confusing books are not very good. This is a parable with many characters, magic realism (a genre that deserves to be ignored, though that's another discussion. To give Marquez credit, his magical realism is a response to the limits placed upon him by the government he lived under, but it is, nevertheless, a poor literary form and when imitated purely awful), and the intertwining of lives, but they just don't move. The story only makes the reader wonder what the big fuss is all about?Marquez' book about Miguel Litton, and News of a Kidnapping are much better, but this book just bores and bores.
I'll come clean first. I stopped reading after 100 pages. A lot happens in this book, with deaths and spirits and insomnia and marriages, and it's all fairly easy enough to figure out what's going on. Yet, nothing happens. So much plot takes place that the characterization suffers. I simply didn't care what happened to the characters, or anyone in the town. If a bomb had levelled Macondo, I would have simply flipped to the next page to see what happened next, not to read on about the characters. If you're interested in a classic worthy of its praise, where characterization is king, do yourself a favor and pick up Sound and the Fury by William Faulkner. You'll work to read, but your mind and soul will be enriched. Faulkner's novels are like movies you watch in slow motion to get every nuance. Marquez, on the other hand, is like a movie you watch in fast forward. You get the plot and action, but when all is said and done, nothing sticks in your mind that is worthy of the space it occupies.
I can see this is an unpopular but not unique opinion, but this is one of the very few books I've stopped reading halfway through. And I have no intention of ever finishing it. Despite the fact that I horde books, I gave this one away.While the prose was beautiful, the story tended toward the dull and was difficult to follow. The fact that there were only a handful of names reused by dozens of characters did not help much. Most of the characters were unlikable and hard to relate to. After awhile I decided I just didn't care anymore.Is this book a masterpiece? Perhaps it is, but that doesn't mean it's a good read.
This highly overrated book indicates the havoc that overweight talk show hosts can wreak upon the literary world. Garcia's most juvenile and frustrating book is now being yammered about by book clubs the world over who suddenly think they know about South American authors.The book is overly long and repetitive; themes are repeated ad nauseum. Characters (some of whom have the same name) are one dimensional and unbelievable. By the time you reach the halfway point in the book you are praying for something different to happen. Then Garcia introduces a new character, has him act just like all the others, and die within 3 pages. It's amazing how quickly he mows down his creations, as if he is as tired of them as I was.In the end there are no surprises, and you feel exhausted from the repetition. Underwhelming, and nowhere near as good as "Love in the Time of Cholera".Give it a miss and try "Blindness" instead.
I bought this book four years ago and finally forced myself to read it from cover to cover. I can't believe all the "5 star" reviews people are giving it. This book was one big disappointment and has been exiled to the bottom shelf in my collection. The characters are meaningless, the text is scattered and awkward. Perhaps something was lost in translation, who knows. I've never been one to give up on a book but I considered it many times with this one.
I can count on one hand the number of books in my life that I have been unable to finish. I am oftimes mocked for my reading, the rate at which I devour books being astronomical, but I could not drag my weary brain kicking and screaming through more than a few dozen pages of this book.I love a good fantasy novel, or anything that gives you a sense of the magical, but I could not find anything interesting in the random and inexplicable bizarre occurrences in this book. Mix that with the dry, long winded prose and I find myself doing something I have NEVER done; sitting with a book in my hands, looking around the room for something else to do.
found this a very weird book,just couldn't get going with it..maybe it was the translation..I might try again soon
I expected much more from this book. It started out interesting enough but, seemed to drag on and on. In the end it was depressing and a little confusing. I like a fiction book to be entertaining and thought provoking; with a point, I did not at all enjoy this book.
CUZ THIS BOOK IS A "SNOOZE FEST!"ONE HUNDRED YEARS OF SOLITUDE IS RIGHT CUZ THAT'S HOW MUCH TIME YOU'LL NEED IF YOU EVER WANNA FINISH THIS!I HIGHLY DOUBT OPRAH MADE IT PAST CHAPTER ONE.ZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZ
Just recently, I decided to give this book a second chance. Like other reviewers here, I hardly ever give up on a book. But about 30 pages into the SECOND attempt, I am feeling exhausted. All of the bright and shiny books on my bookshelves have never looked so good at this point. So I came here, read the reviews and feel better. I think I can put this book away and be at peace with not appreciating it. I will say, some of the words Marquez uses- his descriptions, seem to have been created especially for the world that exists within this book. But is the trip worth it? I have decided that it is not. Thank you all for helping me be at peace with NOT completing this novel.
This was my first encounter with the magical realism style and I love it! The Buendia family is quite possibly the most intriguing I have encountered in any book. A must read.
So if the Nobel Prize is for the author's body of work then again it does not say much about his work because his most famous work (100 years of solitude) is CRAP (that's in capital letters). If this is his best work and most famous work and it is a labor to read then his other works must be capital punishment!!!Much like the best book of the century by James Joyce - Ulysses.Again another book to be placed in Solitary Confinement!!!
Starts off good, but after about 200 pages, it gets pretty stupid. Lots of repetition, and very trite. Totally unbelievable too; some of the stuff that happened in this book would NEVER happen in real life, such as a girl floating up into the sky, or people living into their 120s. Ant the book didn't even have any pictures!!! OMG!!! Check out the General and his Labrynth if you want to read something good by Garcia Marquez (or "Call of the Wild" by Jack London, perhaps the best book ever).
This is one of the hardest to read most pointless books I have ever had the misfortune of trying to read.
I even finished Brothers Karamazov and Bleak House, but this one I quit. I felt like I was wasting my time trying to remember the characters and their relations and what in the world is occuring in this make believe town of Macondo. Marquez may be a skilled writer and storyteller, but this book confused, bored and frustrated me without offering entertainment or insight.So what if Oprah picked it and if it has been labled a classic...it is not enjoyable or remarkable to me. I think I made it to about page 150 or so.With so many books to read, why waste time trying to decipher this one?
I think that Mr. Marquez is a far superior story teller than he is a writer. It is too bad you can't sit around a fire listening to his stories instead. This book basically has no overall plot, but many smaller plots for each little story within it. I thought the sheer number of characters who names were similar (if not the same) was very annoying. I had a hard time connecting with any of the characters due to the weaving in and out of other characters. I know that there was a family tree in the beginning, but I just got tired of flipping back to the point that I just did not care.To the average reader, without a discussion group or a literary expert, many of the "hidden gems" will be missed if there are any. On the whole, I just couldn't shake the vibe that I was reading an extended version of the Old Man and the Sea.It was interesting from the point of reading a Mexican writer.
Disturbing! This is the only single word that I can use to describe this book.Although definatley unique it the composition style, the book is dark and depressing. The theme of incest and child porn appeared to be the primary focus in the book instead of creationalism as eluded to in other reviews.It had an interesting ending but not worthy of the time spent leading up to it.
I'm one of those obsessives who forces himself to finish any book he starts so I plugged away hoping I'd experience the enlightenment all these other reviewers seem to have found...but I just didn't get it. Maybe it lost something in the translation, but I prefer a little dialog in my fiction...even in my heavy, pretentious intellectual and politically correct fiction. I don't mind the magic realism, but I do get bored with sentences that run on for two-plus pages without a period. Oh, well, chalk up the dissent to a libertarian crumudgeon redneck who's educated beyond his intelligence. But I was underwhelmed.
I recognize that lots of people think this book is wonderful. However, as an extremely well-read English major, I think Marquez must be laughing. Without repeating the comments of the other one-star reviewers, I'll just say that I was more than underwhelmed. It's nonsenical, and (am I the only one who noticed?) misogynistic.
I agree with the other reviewers that say this book is tedious and much overrated. I read quite a bit, and I usually enjoy everything I read. However, I just cannot get in to this book. Yes, it is rambling, confusing, and all those other adjectives someone else used. But I don't want rambling and confusing. I don't want to be spoon fed, but it would be nice if there were an identifiable path for the book. I wonder how much is lost in the English translation, and if it would be a much better read in its native language.I am a few hundred pages into the book. I'll keep reading -- and keep hoping that it improves.
I checked this book out of the library after reading rave review after rave review.I wanted to like it, I really did, but I honestly cannot understand all the high marks. To me the book reads as if it were written by a 6th-grader. Characterization and storyline aside, the language itself is what turned me off. It seemed stilted, contrived, lacking in fluidity, and devoid of any real color; an amateurish effort at best.Perhaps this reads better in its native tongue, but the translation I read was atrocious. I promptly returned it to the library, shooting it soundly down the return bin with a force that it so richly deserved.
I came back to read the Amazon reviews because, after reading half of this book, I've begun to wonder when/if it's going to get good. I hate to put down a book I've started- even if it bores me- so I wanted to be reminded of how great this one is supposed to be. Now I know I'm not alone in my confusion. This book came very highly recommended, but I've just been waiting and waiting to enjoy it. I think I've gone far enough and I can return it to the library. I'm really glad I didn't buy it.
very bad paper quality. some of them torn on side. papers had different size!!! so some were popping out of book!!! not happy with my purchase.
I am an avid reader, and I don't mind a challenging read. I started reading this book at the suggestion of some colleagues, and a woman in my book club. I know it is considered a "modern classic", won the Nobel Prize, etc. - but I couldn't even pretend to like this book. To the author's credit, his imagery and descriptions are beautiful. I admired the magical world that was evoked by the style of storytelling. But the plot was next to nonexistent, and after about 100 pages, I really felt like I was on a road to nowhere. The story went off on tangent after tangent with no real, identifiable purpose. Reading this book gave me the feeling of being locked in a room with a very creative, yet nonsensical crazy person that won't shut up. After a while, it gets old.
I enjoyed it mostly although it was hard going. I'm not sure what it was about except I think it was partly about how we can live very close to other people and still not understand each other at all. This was a group of people leading lives of solitude although they were supposed to be family and community. I grew to like the weirdness like the ghosts, and the bizarre happenings. I think the author was writing as if what goes on in your own head was actually real. The cover said it was enthralling - I did not think so. It also said it was supernatural, magical which it was.
As I opened this book, I thought to myself "Wow! This seems like a great story!" I found myself growing more depressed and disgusted with every page. Although the style and Marquez' technique are unquestionably wonderful, the overlaying themes of lust, lack of self-control, and immorality outweighed the good. The goal of nearly very character's life is the same; to please him or herself. Very few characters are in the least bit caring of self-sacrificing. The only way I could reconcile myself to reading this disapointing work was the fact that it is a lesson in man's depravity. I realized that every person, without God's intervention, is just as bad or worse than Marquez' perverse characters. The book is not without its high points- I loved the ending, the mystery of the Segundo twins, and Ursula's strength. There are some passages where the language is incredible. Marquez is a mastery of imagery! I only wish that there had been more positive images to remember....
This book won the NOBEL Prize? I just can't help it, I need to write another review.This book should be placed in Solitary Confinement for 100 years. This is to save both time and trees used in printing of this book.Do not even dare buy this book even from a 2nd hand bookstore. Believe me, do not waste your money.
My High school english teacher swore that this was God's gift to literature. I tend to disagree. I understand what Garcia Marquez is trying to get at with his symbolism, but the reptitious names and slow plot make a good book lag.
It was a required reading in college in 1990. It was boring then as it is now. No wonder it was selected as an Oprah Book Selection. Most Oprah's book are boring but with HYPE.The story does not follow any logic even within the story itself. You will get confuse with the repeated combination of names that are used througout the story. I believe there are only 5 (Jose, Aurelio,Miguel, etc) Fiction does not follow logic I know but usually a story (even a work of fiction) sets boundaries within the story itself and are bounded by this limit. This story is a waste of paper on which it was written. Marquez is one of those overhyped writers with nothing to show for. I guess this is the result of some literary critic needing to sell some books to get a comission from the publishing house.Sorry if I was mean but I was forced to read it college and felt that it was a waste of time and money.
What a horrible book; hard to read; too many characters; I never did figure out what the whole thing was about. I can't believe this won a Nobel Prize. Definitely a waste of time reading.
Yawn. 400 some pages of nothing but incest and death. Characters with the same name throughout the book. Non-linear time, too, it's very hard to follow. How could this "book" change your life? I have come to fear love, it's like your emotions are being dragged through the mud and everything you hold dear and ethical are just pushed away like its nothing. It was about incest, personally, maybe something was lost in the translation. It was so depressing and disturbing. I could not sleep without lights on after I finished reading it. I would never suggest this book to anybody who has a weak constitution or is easily emotionally disturbed. NOT good reading for a highschool student. Even Faulkner's The Bear was not about incest (it was bad too).
I expected that this book would be wonderful. Many friends urged me to read it and so I did - up to page 168. I think I just don't get it. I began to get sea sick from being at times engaged in the story to next wondering what the point of reading it was. War after war, sex after sex, baby after baby.... it got old and so I gave up. Hooray for all who get the beauty of the story and enjoy it. I wish I had been able. Next.....
This book is confusing, it jumps around to much, to many generations in the book. I could not understand this book at all.
This novel is written in very interesting and compelling prose, but its characters are hardly worth the effort. The charaters are obsessive bores that can only be compared to day time soap opera characters. After reading through half of this novel, I was so numb from the constant tragedy and melodrama, that I simply did not care what happened to the characters anymore. To make matters worse, the plot is extremely complicated and very difficult to follow, with new characters added every chapter.The most amazing thing about this book is its popularity and that it helped its author win the nobel prize.
I was expecting a consistent story or at least an engaging narrative that takes fantastical twists. Instead, so many characters are introduced (many have the same name) making it very difficult to care about any of them. Also, the struggles between the rebels and whoever it is they are fighting (and why, come to think of it) are vague and uninteresting. I can't imagine what about this book is so transfixing to so many people. Count me out, I guess.
I read this for a college course. If this is the best the world had to offer at the time (Pulitzer Prize winner), then I fear for this nation. It was confusing at the beginning (conflicting ideas presented - it speaks as if it were the beginning of the world, but the characters find ancient items). And the story line is jumbled.Personally, I found no enjoyment in the reading of it. The symbolizism that we were supposed to find was buried so deeply that I had to research it on the internet. I finally found a few things written on the symbolism, had to re-read most of the book to find it, and consummed quite a bit of headache medicine to get through it.It was far too long for what it had to say...which wasn't much. Never have I burned a book in my life. I took special joy in planning an overnight camping trip for the sole purpose of watching it burn.
Pretty easy to read, but a load of tosh, drivel,whatever you call it. I see the comparisons with Rushdie here. If you're into this sort of writing then fine. Read Rabelais instead, at least you get a bit of a chuckle.
100 Years of Solitude is a dense, confusing novel that is seemingly endless. Most of the characters have the same name - either Jose Arcadio or Aureliano for the boys and Amaranta or Remedios for the girls. The chapters are long and have large amounts of action. Most of the chapters are very similar: incest occurs, a child is born, named Jose Arcadio, he studies Melquiades, fights with some people, has a mistress, several children, and then dies. I do not recommend this book for anyone that wants a quick/easy/interesting read. It is well written and conveys many themes and such, but is purely painful to read.
Though this story was written in a unique voice, it is not the great classic that everyone claims it is. It often wandered and was full of characters who's personality and dialogue (not to mention names) were all so similar that you could hardly tell them apart.Let's be honest, it's only trendy to read this right now because it was featured on Oprah's Book Club. Don't believe the hype.
I don't understand why Gabriel Garcia Marquez will get such great reviews on 100 years of solitude, I thought it was one of the worst piece of Magical Realism that I have ever read.Don't waste your time or money on this terrible piece of literature, Sincerely, it is a pointless, mediocre and most definitely not Nobel Prize material.
This is what I think my problem is... I didn't like the translation of the book. If the novel was written in Spanish and then translated into English, I would sit there and say to myself that I loved the descriptive, but not the flow of the sentence. I am compelled to give this novel another try based on these reviews. It has been a few years and I feel it is well deserving.
After a couple of chapters into the book I went online to check why so many people felt that this was one great work of literature. The words I found repeatedly were magical and enchanting....When a grown man has the desire to take a nine year old girl to be his "wife" and gets her pregnant, than I don't feel enchanted but repulsed. Fiction or not. Actually to make that up, speaks for it self as far as I am concerned. And Oprah of all people to recommend that in her book club. I clearly missed the point about a lot of things and that male characters shared names did not make it any easier. My husband read it as well and we felt the same about most passages. I was glad when I finally finished it, as I really wanted to know the whole story before making up my mind.
well I have, and this book has got to be one of the stupidest things I have ever tried to write about. It is basically about nothing, and I had to write about that for a school paper! you would hate it too if you had to write about it for a flippin' school paper! Really, need I say more? I bet the people who loved it never had to write an essay about Amaranta's repeated refusal of love, and in about a week! Just ask everyone who's a junior at my school! It is a torture manual! Far too beastly a book to be dealt with, even for most english majors and teachers!I give it two stars because it has more substance than the stuff Allende and Amado put out.
I wish I could have given this book "no stars:" it's a book that deserves every star that man, god or science has created, and nothing we can put here on the internet (or in any review in any medium) would do it the eternal justice it deserves. A dream of a book: I would pick it up the day after having read forty pages, start the next chapter, and wonder where it was I had left off the night before. A book that gives off narcotic fumes, that gives off disembowling violence, love, and indifference. A book that deserves more awards than humankind can bestow.
I have not yet read this book but am looking forward to doing so as I have heard from friends that it is wonderful story. However I am super dissappointed at the poor quality of this item. The paper is obviously re cycled and has been cut extemely unevenly. I understand the need to recycle but was not advised prior to purchase that this is the policy of Amazon.. Consequently as this is the 2nd book I have bought in this condition I will not be purchasing any further from you at any time. I have sourced another good priced on-line book seller. Thank you.
so mr marquez is supposed to have invented this whole new genre of writing with this book and other annoying ones like In Evil Hour. But no one seems to stop and say that the events of the story are ridiculous and embarrasing. who wants to read about an old lady who makes candy for her family for generations? no one. and the romance portrayed is nothing short of farcical. it's a wonder he's a star in the literary universe.
The book jumps all over the place, and the point is? Magical? I suppose so. Depressing? Oh yeah. Why does Oprah pick one depressing book after another?
this book was trash to my mind, why fill your mind with junk? What good knowledge are you getting from this book, knowledge that is valuable to the mind and soul? NONE! It does not leave you with a good feeling!
This was my second try after 30 years to read this book. First time I abandoned after some 20-25 pages, this time I got as far as page 150.And I got this far because I thought that maybe I'm missing something, it can't be that so many people praise this book and I am the only one who doesn't like it. But after 150 pages and three generations of Aureliano and Accadio, in which almost anything happens, in which you hear love stories and war stories and fantastic stories and so on,suddenly I didn't feel curious what's next.First time I abandoned this book because the magic realism wasn't my cup of tea at that time. This time I quit because the book wasn't catching me , didn't make me feel any emotions about the characters, didn't make me curious about their fate.Someone said about this book that you either love it or hate it, well, to be honest, it left me indifferent.In another 30 years I'll give it another try and I will let you know if my perspective changed...
I can't understand the buzz about this book. I've tried to finish it twice and failed each time due to boredom.Perhaps it is better in Spanish. Is that why people love it? Personally, I can't understand why this is considered a classic.
Purchased the Omni Mount UCL-L for my 40" LCD. I'll have to admit that the unit appears extremely sturdy and well built but it does come with one minor flaw- if a part is missing there is no way to get a replacement part. My specific issue was the bracket at the end of the arm that connects to the plate securing the display. The part was not in the box so I called Omni Mount to get a replacement part. They assured me the piece was part of the assembly when it left the factory and there was no way to get me a replacement part. I now have a $250 mount that is useless. Gotta think that if they are correct, I wound up with a used or salvaged unit.
This is a very sturdy mount. It is extremely heavy and as other reviewers have noted, it is complicated to setup. The one big drawback is how far out the TV sticks when you have the mount completely pushed in. We wound up buying another mount that sat more flush to the wall. I would recommend a different mount unless you need something this sturdy that can rotate the TV verticle.
This is a good card - if you can not afford the higher priced ones. 64MB DDR, Great - but there are multiple problems with the Gamma. Most of my games need to be touched up a bit by going into the settings and putting the brightness up.I tried to play WarCraft III, Everquest, Age of Mythology and NeverWinter Nights - had problems with all of these games.If you are looking for a good card - to get by on - this is for you.If you are a heavy gamer - DON'T THINK ABOUT IT.Your best bet is to stick with any of the GeForce cards - I just purchased the Xtasy 64MB DDR GeForce 4 card - what a difference....Hope this helps...
I was very disappointed to find the footnotes missing from this edition. If there's a way to get to them, I couldn't find it & Pratchett's footnotes are a significant part of the humor. So buy the print version of the Discworld books - and do buy them. Prachett is always entertaining!
Harper Collins is about to join Penguin books in the Kindle boycott.I'm was set to put my enter Pratches library on Kindle but won't when I can buy a new mass market paper back at 20% less, right here on Amazon, from an "alternate" seller.
...but for the money, they need to do a better job with the footnotes in a Terry Pratchett book. At some point there is a bookmark that gets embedded in the text, so all following footnotes are off by one and you have to do prev page to see the right one. Also part of another footnote or 2 get embedded the same way...kind of ruins the effect.
Why is the publisher setting the price for the Kindle version the same as the paperback? Apparently they live in some fantasy world where either paper is free, or duplicating bytes is expensive.
This is a warning to other Pratchett-lovers out there looking for audiobooks. This is an abridgment of the original book, and a bad one. A lot of the best word jokes and philosophical humor is missing, many scenes are in pieces, and the whole thing simply does not convey the sense of fun and insight of the original novel. As well, in my opinion, Tony Robinson is a horribly bad voice actor, but that may simply be a personal preference. [...]
There aren't enough words in the English language to express my utter loathing and contempt for this book. I had heard that Pratchett was "satirical", "devious", "irreverent", "magical", "entertaining" and "above all funny".Sadly "Men at Arms" is none of the above. Pratchett is trying to be Douglas Adams and fails at it miserably. This story in particular was trite, condisending, and supremly unfunny. His use of footnotes to make a joke that had no bearing upon the story was...lame, for lack of a better term.The jokes, reeked of "ho ho ho see how clever I am!" rather than actually being funny. The characters struck me as pale shadows of characters who only grow and change in set and sadly predictiable ways so that they can advance the plot and story rather than being changed by the plot and story.I can't even say the story was silly lame. It wasn't. It was just lame.
I purchased this item for my son, and it did not work right out of the box. I followed all the terrible instructions, and it still did not work. I went to the Coby website for answers, and there was nothing there either. I then attempted over 20 tiems to contact Coby via telephone, and was never able to get through. I finally returned the product for a different bran. I STRONGLY suggest buying something else with a longer battery life. and MUCH better support and documentation.
Funny, funny funny...Unrestrained junior academic high jinks that will have your 14 year old, (and not to mention, YOURSELF) sprinting violently out of the room and into the streets screaming loud uproarious praise for this once-in-a-lifetime masterpiece. This little jem of a purchase is a must for anyonetired of the usual hollywood fair. The character of Mark is by far the biggest scene-stealer in this shining cast of adolescent thespians! I have seen the glorious future and it has a name : Hail Maximus Keeble!
KIDS WILL LOVE IT. ADULTS WILL THINK IT'S KID'S STUFF. I CAN'T SAY I HATED IT. BUT IT'S DEFINITELY FOR THE NICKELODEON CROWD.
I decided to pick this up after hearing Lifeforms, and hearing several great things about "Papua New Guinea". Believe the hype about "Papua New Guinea!" It's a mid-tempo ambient house masterpiece that has aged marvelously. The rest of the album however, is just kind of blah. FSOL try their hand at up-tempo acid house, and the results are mediocre at best. Some tunes are decent if unmemorable ("Calcium" and "Expander"), but most are just cheesy and un-catchy.And while the album as a whole is lackluster, you still need to hear "Papua New Guinea", which can be done either by purchasing this album, or one of the two single releases for the song (of which Translations appears to be the better of). That song alone is worth the price.
This is not an album to dance to, nor is it one to work-out to. There is no steady beat/musical-rhyme to this album (except for Papua New Guinea, which is the saving grace of this album in my opinion). I can't seem to fit this music to any mood, so unfortunately I have to rate it down.
Myself being a second (father's side)and third generation (mother's side)Swedish-American, I find the suggested pronunciations to be inaccurate. Some of the sounds described in this book are not as my parents tried to teach me.Disappointed in Dallas.
This collection of the entire Canterbury Tales ("translated" -- how can English be "translated" into English? "transposed" or "recast" into Modern English is a more accurate way of putting it)is clearly and gracefully read by a variety of readers. BUT there is no accompanying Table of Contents, nor are the tales in the conventional order, so one has to search through 17 CD's in order to find a specific tale. I'd send it back if I hadn't torn the wrapper open -- which I had to do in order to discover this serious deficiency.
I was looking for a well-structured side-by side version of the Canterbury Tales. Bantam Classics normally does a great jobs on books, but whoever transcribed it to kindle did not know kindle at all, left it unstructured and the translation all over the place, intermingled with the lines, translating the wrong verses and generally just all over the place.Practically, I am reading four lines middle-english, five lines modern, three lines middle-english, 2 lines modern, 6 lines middle-english, and so forth. There is no connection between the middle-English and its translation.That was a wasted 5.99 USD for kindle version and a HUGE disappointment :( ...
The annotation style if this edition ruins it. Putting the definitions of words in line with the text, rather than as footnotes or end notes, disrupts the flow of reading. It quickly gets confusing as to what is original text and what is editorial comment. I'm off to find another edition only partway into the first poem.
I find it very unfortunate that I wasted my money on this book when I could have read the entire story on the Internet. Of course, the story is out of copyright, and you'll find it all over the Internet, in complete.Don't waste your money like I did. Even worse, I never even read the book.My rating is only on the size of the book, because like I said, I never read it, and I am forced to issue a rating (I only wanted to enter a comment).
This version of the Canterbury Tales in modern English is brilliant. Nonetheless I was deeply disappointed in finding that the Parson's Tale was omitted completely, the reason being that "it does not interest the general public". I disagree with such a sweeping statement.
This is not easy to read in Kindle format. In paperback, it has two translations: one in Middle English, the other in Modern English. These are displayed side by side, with the earlier English on the left, Modern on the right. When it comes to the Kindle edition, there are no breaks between these translations. It switches back and forth without any notice, making it really difficult to follow. It would be alright if we could view it page by page (in it's original format), but without that option it's harder to understand. (Yes, it's obvious which part is which, but finding where it stops and starts takes away from the reading experience. It's too choppy.)In short, buy the paperback or perhaps a different Kindle edition. The format makes this a challenge to read.
Here is the lesson to be learned: write a few dirty stories, wait a few hundred years and everyone will say you are a genius and that what you wrote is classic. Really, there is nothing in Chaucer that I don't hear in any locker room of any local gym. Why is this stuff taught in classrooms? Because tenured professors think if it is written in middle english it must be some revelation into life. The same could be said of any anecdote told by any average joe, if only they would take it just as seriously.
If you like the television series "The Simpsons," you will probably like Chaucer's Canterbury Tales. They reflect the same vulgar approach to entertainment which, instead of making us rise above the gutter of everyday life, brings us to the lowest level of crudity. There are some redeeming tales however, such as the Knight's Tale, but as a whole, this book should be avoided by anyone with a sense of honour and decency.
The Lonely Planet phrasebooks are usually a great help travelling around the world. This one however turned out to be creating more problems than solving them. The transliteration is so weird that you actually have to learn two new languages before pronouncing anything closely right. I tried the book with several english speaking lao persons and lao speaking native english speakers while travelling around the country and all had problems with the transliteration. Nothing is like you would naturally pronounce it. For example who would say Khoj if you see Khawy?Helpful is the lao bit so you can point, in the end its how I got around. A pity, there are much better transliterations around.
This phrasebook looks reasonable in most respects, but it has no Lao to English dictionary. That means, if you are trying to communicate with someone who does not speak english, they cannot respond to you with words, even if they are motivated and patient enough to try to carry on a conversation.The description of this book said it had a "comprehensive dictionary". Unfortunately, it only has half of a comprehensive dictionary. If you want a book that will make it possible to actually converse with a Lao speaker, this is not it.
Since purchasing a DVD player a year and a half ago, I have often come across reviews that bemoan the "transfer quality" of a particular title. Now...I know what they are talking about.While this is one of my all-time favorite movies, I was extremely disappointed in the picture and sound quality. Film grain is evident throughout and at times the highlight values of the picture seem overexposed.I give the movie 5 stars. I give the "transfer" 1 star. Since this is not likely to be re-released as a "Special Edition" I would reluctantly recommend buying this title, only because it will have a longer shelf life than the VHS edition.
Jacket is good to just protect your portfolio, but a handle and/or strap would be helpful to carry your portfolio.
I study Titanic and try to get every book possible on Titanic,( I've been studying Titanc, way before the movie was made). But when I bought this book and read it, I regreted it. It's a good book, for... how shall I say it, Beginner readers for Titanic. I give this book, in my opinion, 1 STAR because of it's lack of thought. The book seemed like it was made for new Titanic fans. Since I've been interested in Titanic for a long while, this book wasn't at all great.
The fact that this book is about Titanic (well sort of anyway). This book is not a true work of history. The research is faulty, the words and thoughts of the various characters is bogus fiction. After being a student of Titanic history for almost 40 years, this is a book that I have dismissed lightly, very lightly. If you want to know Titanic and the disaster that befell her, this is not the book.
I'm always up for another look at the Titanic, especially if new light is shed on the story. Unfortunately, Pelligrino spends a huge percentage of the book referring to himself admiringly in the third person, or subtly inflating his own worth in the parallel story line of Ballard's expeditions. On top of that, it's not interesting. The retelling of the events on the ship are fine, but they can't carry the deadweight of Pelligrino's attempt to make himself a central figure or as important as the story. It's the literary equivalent to watching an actor talk about how moved they are by their own acting. PASS.
I have studied Titanic for many years, starting way before James Cameron's film. Many of the "facts" presented in this work go against those given by tons of other authors and explorers of Titanic. The author seems very full of himself, trying to give himself credit where he doesn't deserve it. It almost seems as if he is trying to convince everyone that he was a co-discoverer of Titanic and Robert Ballard's best friend. I would recommend another author, one who actually has a love for Titanic and isn't trying to make himself look better.
After reading glowing reviews of this book on Amazon.com, I purchased it and eagerly awaited its arrival. I first read "A Night to Remember," and couldn't put it down. This book, on the other hand, has been difficult to stick with. The author just doesn't seem to know quite what he wants to write about. He goes back and forth between the actual sinking (very interesting, but most of this stuff can be found in Lord's book), the discovery of the ship (which includes a great deal of very technical dialogue), and the Challenger explosion (perhaps this connection is a bit of a stretch). As someone who has become very interested in the subject of the Titanic (as a result of the movie), I found this book disappointing. The author seemed more interested in letting us know how involved he was, personally, in the entire expedition, but that just didn't interest me. Nice try, but no cigar.
Birthright uses the battle system rules that are o.k. but they are not as fun as doing a mass battle by group.
For the price of the book I was looking for more recipes not a history of cast iron cooking. Not worth the price
this book spends too much time on history and stories. beginners need to know how to determine the temperature of the oven. advanced cooks may know how many coals to put on and under but charcoal is better to learn with.twelve chapters of history and differances of cast iron and aluminum is too drawn out. the final blow is when there are only 19 recipes and most do not appeal to me.
The Searchers are still touring and I saw them last year in Bay Shore, new York state. This album here is fine, BUT the group's work is much more worth getting INTO. We need the biggest most complete set possible. It is hard to get new listeners to hear some of their best songs: The World is Waiting for Tomorrow, Lovers Will, All a Dream, Till I Met You, and so many more. Buy this if it's the best in your price range and then join the groups on the web where you can expand your Searchers appreciation! And don't forget to read Frank Allen's memoir of the group's history. It's fun!
Everything about this scooter is incredibly cheap and shoddily put together. The seat broke under my weight (I weigh 165, well below the stated limit for this product) and half of the bolts holding the scooter together rattled themselves off within a few blocks of riding it. Do not, under any circumstances, waste your money on this inferior product.
I am 22 years old men and i bought this scooter for the speed by ivoog scooters for 400 dollars with free shipping, and i like it,i have this scooter two months with problems, and the only big problem is that the wheels are very small to enjoy the ride safety,controller will stop working and then the company will leave you will not help ,and will tell you what could we do.and it not comfortable because it do not have any shocks so i do not recommend it all for adults that need to ride long trip,so adults for you good do not buy any xtreme scooters they are for kids you be not happy if you buy it.i bought the ezip 1000 scooter this is the best of the best scooter, with the x500 scooter i am 140 lb i ride 17+MPH and with ezip 1000 i ride with the top speed of 16+MPH and it fille really like 20MPH, and its very very comfortable so this for you adult you will love it and you be very very happy with it you see....
A small town girl who comes to the city to become a star is a premise as old as the cinema. Coyote Ugly is just repeating this, with a particularly annoying character who suffers from one of the most demented looking cases of stage fright I've ever seen.Jerry Bruckheimer usually does good films, but this is a case in which I would love to ask him what he was thinking. The only attraction to this film is a bunch of girls dancing on top of the bar, and the singing of LeAnn Rimes. He could easily have just made a few music videos and dispensed with the vehicle for presenting them. It would have done us all a favour.
Okay, I'm a sucker for John Goodman, and he's by far the sexiest in the cast. I'll admit that I enjoyed the movie mainly because (a) I did not actually pay for the rental, and (b) I was consuming large amounts of alcohol at the time. To the film's credit, even in my drunken stupor I could tell that the scenes in which Piper pretends to sing were incredibly corny. I think I remember falling off the sofa and landing on my head from the extreme cheese-ness. You know? The kind that makes your skin crawl?In true Bruckheimer form, Leanne Rimes organizes a high-speed train robbery which results in a spectacular car wreck involving two commercial airliners and the Seattle Space Needle... but I don't want to spoil it for anybody. See it for yourself (read: do not see this for yourself). Two stars.
This is the kind of film I get stuck watching on long plane rides and would NEVER seek myself. It is such silly schlock that I marvel at how the Hollywood mill can churn these things out and make money - it's really an industrial production process, geared to superficial viewers.This is one of the basic plots. THe others include crippled boy, whose love of a dog or pony allows him to walk, love, or talk. Why do we keep watching this junk? A video game at least offers some chance of a variation in outcome.OK, here goes: beautiful girl with a dream, seeking big break, gets gig in a bar, handles it, meets boy who doesn't fit into plans, shakes it, shakes it more, shakes it a lot more, flirts with corruption, stays course, makes real friends, gets to know real self, grows. Oh, and then succeeds on her own terms.Not recommended. Admittedly, the acting in not abysmal, but what a waste of time about lives that could never exist.
Loved the movie, bought the dvd and its in widescreen, its terrible. My favorite scenes, dance on the bar, all you can see is their middle, not faces and feet at the same time. It's not the same would rather have a TV cut format.
This movie is Flashdance with no flash, a Saturday Night fever on a Wednesday afternoon happy hour. The main character is cute, but annoying. The bar atmosphere with all the dancing is stupid, and the plot is written for some afternoon school special. Save your money and treat yourself to a Big Mac meal. It will go down easier than the characters in this movie.
My friend likes this movie so I checked it out. I didn't like it. Kind of boring. Couldn't get through the whole thing. Fastforward solved the problem :)
The usual Girl Goes To The Big City cliches, not as bad as what you'd expect from Mr. Bruckheimer, thanks to the lovely and charismatic Ms. Perabo and a nice performance from Mr. Goodman as "Dad"...still, a gal who aspires to write songs and has ABSOLUTELY NOTHING TO SAY. That whole Whitney/Mariah thing, yecch.The bar scenes have a certain energy to 'em, but the other coyotes apparently have no hopes and dreams (or personalities).Here's hoping the adorable Piper will get a great or even better movie in the near future. I will definitely be following her career.
I bought this movie because I love Jerry Bruckheimer movies. I should have just rented it. The only entertaining part of this movie was the bar scenes, all of which were shown in the trailer. That about sums up the good scenes. When I watched the featurette about how hard they were looking for a lead actress and how excited they were to find Piper Perabo, I couldn't believe it! Perabo's acting was so annoying, she ruined the whole movie for me. Her fear of singing in public just became more and more irritating as the movie proceeded. I just wanted to smack her and say just do it and stop your whining and sniveling! I'm one of those people who like all kinds of movies, even some really bad ones, but this is one that I don't think I will be watching again.
This movie is so dumb... "HOW DUMB IS IT?" This movie is so dumb that even though it has a bunch of hot chicks dancing around in sexy clothes provocatively it is anything but sexy and provocative. Dumb, Dumb, DUMB.Did I mention that it stunk too.
Yeah, let one of 'em spend a day with Ted Bundy... let's see how damn tough they act after such an experience. Stupid women.
This is one of those movies that really disgusts me in the way it depicts women stutting their stuff and men drooling over them... I absolutely hate these type of flicks. Hey, with a little imagination you can pretend that you are at a strip bar and that they are taking 'em off just for you. I found myself looking for women in the bar. NONE. this is just Pig S#*T. You are a jerk if you think this is cool. Needless to say I did not care for it, and I very much appreciate hot women, don't get me wrong. This just sucked.
A plot and story that has been done before, better. Miserably bad acting: Tara Banks, Leanne Rymes. Only highlight: John Goodman. Better yet, rent something else.
This was the biggest waste of time I have ever seen. The only person that would be interested in this movie is a thirteen-year old boy. Tyra Banks should stick to her day job. She is much better as a model for Victoria's Secret because she never has to open her mouth & speak. I want the wasted hour & a half of my life back. This movie was very predictable & lame. Don't waste your time.
Now, this is my mind on this movie. Too much focusing on women dancing on bars and not on story and characters, hence this is a boring movie, but the women are good, but this movie is boring. Now see you wouldnt get me on a table and dance and take it off, nope, not my thing. John Goodman as Piper Perabo's father is a treat though. This is Tyra Bank's first big movie breakout and see does it nice. As far as i'm concerned the thought of Coyote Ugly 2 would be more of the same, except that Piper Perabo, not Maria Bello trains the new recruit and it would be more of the same but new moves, but more of the same. Also starring Adam Garcia.
really boring dull cjhick flick that is awful. i lov u tira but this isn;'t a ggod movie. i didnt wantt o watch thers people at all. but i do want to go into this club.
Viewed: 2/06Rate: 32/06: Coyote Ugly displayed a fair story that made my skin to crawl. A dopey looking girl who happens to dance sexily like never before and got everything going in a big city New York? That'll never happen. This film explains the reason why I have nightmares from taking, eventually dropped out of, Women's Studies in college. I don't need to be manhandled like that by a film like Coyote Ugly, telling me that women like those depicted in the film are the bomb and everything. I rather watch true films, touching realistic issues that surround females such as Hoop Dreams, My Left Foot, and The Miracle Worker, not crappy movies like Coyote Ugly. What's up with the title? Really, what's up with the concept? No, really...what's up with the actual realization of this movie being made? Maybe I should open a bar, have women wooing the male patrons, and face the music of being deported to prison for numerous of pimping violations.
I am so glad I waited to see this movie on cable. 30 minutes into it, I almost changed the channels. But, just like an accident or police car chase, you have to watch. Overall, the movie was just too sappy. And every "twist" is not surprising. Also, I don't understand why the movie switched between color and black-and-white -- I'm guessing the decision was made in a very late editing session because it didn't seem to have any context. In conclusion, I thought the bar scenes were the best...I can't believe I'm agreeing with the guys. I encourage you to check your cable listings if you're curious about this movie and spend your money on something better.
I rented this poor excuse for a movie and couldn't help falling asleep the whole time. It's pretty predictable and not very entertaining. It's not really worth buying.
Coyote Ugly has the worst cgi and special effects I have never seen before in all my years of movie bashing. Actually, I just started watching movies last week. Due to Coyote Ugly, I'll never watch another bad movie again.
This movie is a pretty boring tale of the surburban girl going to New York and getting her dreams crushed before finally making it to the big time. Being a 26 year old male, the only thing about this movie that was enjoyable were the nice looking girls. The guy in this movie does one of the worst acting jobs Ive ever seen, and nothing ever really happens. If you have a good taste for movies, then you shouldnt like this movie. Again, if I were a 14 year old girl, I would probably like this movie because it was geared towards 12-17 year old girls. To give the movie some credit, it was kind of a "cute" story, but thats about it. (Also, no bar like that is going to have only 1 bouncer, gimme a break!)
Piper Perabo is a great new face in Hollywood and I look forward to seeing what she does next. That said, I believe the director and editor (more on that later) should be taken to a public place and caned with a bamboo pole.What starts as a cute girl-coming-of-age-in-the-big-city movie begins to fall apart the moment the girl who's too shy to sing in front of anyone starts working in a bar that requires her to dance on the bar while getting buckets of water dumped on her. "Oh I'm too shy to sing one of my songs in front of my new date, but I'll strip for him!" What???There is a spasmatic sequence with a phone call, a trip to a club, a family reunion and a performance that had to have been spliced together by an MTV editor that drank way too much Mountain Dew while eating pixie sticks. One character even repays a debt that was cut out so she couldn't have even known that she owed it!Hopefully Piper will have better luck with "Slap Her, She's French" this year.
You know you're watching a bad movie when your partner leans over to you and, without ever having seen the movie before, outlines the plot in detail, including accurate descriptions of most of the scenes to follow minutes after the opening credits have run.What on earth was Bruckheimer thinkning when he made this? I can only assume he had a contract with the studio to produce a certain number of movies and this was one of his 'fillers'.An unlikely plot to say the least, the acting was substandard and John Goodman, usually a decent actor, looked embarassed to be associated with this, seemingly hanging about in scenes waiting for his check to clear before he could leave.I've no doubt this movie earns at least 4 stars from many people who use this site; the teenage girl and mid 20's male I'm sure think this is an 'awesome' movie. Utter dross; Hollywood really needs a fresh injection of writing talent.
This was one of the most embarassingly bad films I've seen in recent memory.I watched this because there is a 14 year old in the house who is understandably amused by girls in their early twenties dancing on top of a bar....and is willing to watch a non-plot for a half-hour between those scenes. Short of a pubescent male, I have to think that anyone who enjoyed this movie is either miguided (hopefully) or an idiot.If this is really what a person looks for in a film, let me recommend saving your money and watching nearly any television sit-com....they're just as bad and it won't cost you four bucks a pop. Take that extra four bucks and donate it to the library. That way, people who are dragging the human race intellectually down to such a depth can at least offset the damage they do by hopefully lifting someone else up.
I'm usually not disappointed with a Bruckheimer film, so this was definately a first. The plot was cheesy and slow: All-American, apple-pie, girl next door goes to "The Big City" to make it big in the music business...Meets good-looking orphan who helps her overcome stage fright in the most romantic of ways. The movie would have been better if it was, indeed, about the women of Coyote Ugly. The bar owner's story would have resulted in a better movie and a less misleading title. This movie will most likely be a hit with teeny bopper Backstreet Boys fans and junior high school age boys.
nothing really happening with this Film.the Girls were Looking Good but as far as the Film Goes not much Happening.it's one of those films you watch when you are in Pure T&A type of Mood.it's fairly a Air-Head Film.
Save your money and just buy any Curve album. Garbage won't sound too original anymore.
Garbage is an alright band. I'd heard them live BEFORE they became huge. Still, this album fails to match their true potential... this is really weak.
I expected a lot more from Garbage. I bought this cd in hopes that it would be really great but only found satisfaction with four songs out of the rest of the 12 tracks. Three of these four songs are out on the radio anyway. My rating? I'll give version 2.0 a C+ for a good attempt
I did not realize that I needed a PCI Port card and the web site did not indicate this requirement nor that this card was AGI. My son pointed it out to me after I ordered the card. When I contacted Tiger Direct, they did not know that it needed an AGI slot. They told me to call the Distributor - Diamond, who after a 35 minute wait on hold, said it was not his product (it was). When the card arrived and I confirmed that it was not PCI, I was able to return it and get a full refund. It was a hassle taking the box to be returned. I would have preferred to know about this before I ordered it.
First of all, Peyton was my favorite character. Second of all, Haley, Mouth and Millie are unlikable characters, in my opinions. Does anyone care about Skills and his girlfriend Lauren, or Mouth and his job? And YET again, Nathan and Haley's marriage is on shaky ground. Everything seems recycled. Fortunately, Clay is the beacon of the light. A likable guy who seemed unable to commit, he found his love in Quinn. Yet again Schwahn decides to kill someone off, this being Haley and Quinn's mother. Yet again, Schwahn uses the plot line of a crazy stalker. Unfortunately, the character of Dan is not in much of the season. Attempts to be funny were made, such as the girls getting high of pot brownies. Attempts failed. Terrible season. The only reason I will watch season 8 is because of Clay, and because I've been watching since the beginning. The show should have ended after season 6.
I purchased this set in early december paid over 40.00 -- the next week target had it on sale for 23.00 returned it ... also bought another dvd set(house) and also found that for over 20.00 cheaper at bjs ... the week before christmas amazon put this on sale .... check your prices look around... I overpaid by a total of 40.00 then was charged 3.00 each by amazon for returning it and it took over a week for my credit to come though....
This was a good product overall. it was just bad quality. it seemed like it was burned off of an original. Every disk says disk 1 the title scene is blurry and parts of the episodes are pretty choppy.
First, I want to say I watched the entire season and have seen the entire series. This season was pitiful There were points that you laugh out loud from it being so stupid and corny. Nobody acts like they do and Jamie's character which was good in the 5th and 6th seasons has become stupid. The show isn't the same without Lucas and Peyton, it's just dumb. The writing is just terrible, worst show of the year. I've never seen anything so corny. The new characters are ok, but this show shouldn't be surviving without Lucas and Peyton because it is so pointless and stupid without them. Even without them, it's too bad the writers and producers couldn't make it interesting and dramatic. Instead it's full of games, messes, snowball fights, and stupidity. Don't waste your time or money. Try some of the shows like 90210, Gossip Girl, The Vampire Diaries, and others which would be way more worth your time and money.
This game can NOT be played on the Xbox system that is sold in the stores today!! Maybe I should have known that, but I didn't. I feel as thought sellers should have pointed this out in their ad.My son has an older Xbox, and I am currently waiting for him to get that out of storage to see if the game will play there. Until then, my rating of the transaction is that it was the worst for me ever on Amazon.com, but that may change to an OK.
I have got it with a crack in the disk when I got it and also I do not now how it play I cannot play it with the crack in the disk and yes I let them now about it nothing was done about it
I had great hopes for this film, it was after all an Oscar winner, but I now understand why the film was not widely available. I found it disjointed. There seemed to be a lot of time spent shouting down the telephone and smoking cigaretes which would be fine if the conclusion satisfied me, it didn't.The main Character, played by Jane Fonda, seemed naive and hopeless, the title character, played by Vanessa Redgrave was such an enigma that she was unbelievable in substance and played far to minor a role in the film. The only reason that I would like to know what happened next is simply to find out if any strength of resolve would be found! I think probably not.
Another case of when I side with the minority. I didn't get through it. Decided I had much better ways to spend my time. The only thing I really enjoyed was Meryl Streep's bit. I don't whether she resurfaced later in the film but I guess I'll never know now.
only the first case is fun and the rest are stupid. dont waste your money on this game like i did
I bought this game thinking it was going to be cool as hell, But I was sadly mistaken when I got halfway through it and I kept hitting glich after glich. I thought it was my Xbox, but I took it to a friend's and glich after glich. I guess I got the worst game in history, but that's what happens when you get a massed produced game like this one
As both a surfer and yoga enthusiast i was excited to see this program created, however, upon watching the video it became clear that it's not all that great. It's hard to follow the poses when you can't see the instructors feet b/c they're buried in the sand and unless you have a decent knowledge of yoga there are a lot of important details about many of the poses that are left out. I'd recommend a non-surfing specified yoga dvd over this. You'll get more out of it.
don't waste your money .lots of wasted time talking about how great yoga is.content is good but alot of fast fowarding.not useful as a work out video.
This video is not good. Peggy seems like a regular soccer mom who decided that she could make a yoga video. Her instructions arent good and her form is not good enough to be teaching others. The editing is pretty bad. And worst of all theres awesome surfing clips on when your head is bent over in your lap. How are you supposed to watch the sweet barrels?Maybe the other two Yoga for Surfers are better but I'm over it.
I purchased this as a video, and was not that impressed. It has nice surf footage, but the yoga instruction is really bad. The time would have been better spent slowing going through each yoga pose, versus racing through a large number of poses. Skip this DVD, take a lesson at your local yoga place.
As far as yoga instructional DVDs go, this is not one I would recommend. Particularly if you are not familar with yoga already. The poses are not explained as well as in most not-for-surfers DVDs. Often times, you can not see the feet of the instructor, so you do not know how to place your feet unless you already know the pose. I think Peggy is probably a good instuctor, but this DVD isn't a good example. The best part of this DVD is the advert for Rochelle's surf camp, which includes a cameo appearance of Minnie Driver. I found this portion of the DVD to be inspiring. If you are looking for some instruction on yoga poses, this is not a good choice.
This is perhaps the worst of all videos out today of its type. If you have a basic knowledge of yoga, you don't need this at all - you can create and tailor your own workout. If you don't know yoga, it's useless. The instruction is poor, peppered with a split screen of people surfing and practicing yoga (no wonder the surf mags think it's great!) with little, very poorly demonstrated techniques of basic yoga. In some scenes you can't even see their feet (a crucial failure) - even if the "instructor" says what to do. Save your money, take yoga long enough to learn it properly, then apply it to your own surfing. Yoga is great for surfing, but this is a poor video.
If you know anything about yoga, do not buy this cd. The only positive parts is the location and view of the waves. This is more a novelty than useful. Honestly who does yoga in a wetsuit at pipeline..Try Ali McGraw's Video for a great intermediate yoga tape.
This book does NOT contain a book key. I returned one and the next one didnt have it either. The OLC passcode card is nothing either. The card says that "code is no longer necessary". Basically this is a like new book with no extra features. Buy used!
I purchased this book under the impression it had a book key for QUIA, required by my profesora.It didn't have any book key... so now i have to return it. And just buy the one from the bookstore, like I should have done from the beginning.Also UPS was a day late, and didn't leave the book as I requested by signing the "LEAVE PACKAGE" form left by the delivery man. I had to go pick it up myself because I'm never at home.
There brighter,whiter when I first used these I wasn't to impressed. After driving with them I could notice an improvement over regular lamps.
This thing is ok. But realize, you must hold it onto your blow out port to make it work. Therefore you need 2 people to blow out your pipes. When you are blowing out an rv, constant air pressure is the key. So, saying that, i ripped off the needle and attached an air chuck fitting to it. Now I just screw this on, attach my air hose and pop on the compressor and I no longer need to hold it in place.
The previous reviews must have come from students of theauthor's, or students of students of the author's. Perhaps friends ofthe author? I can't imagine anyone thinking this book is good. A good comedy, maybe.The techniques in this Ju-Jitsu book are almost offensive in terms of practicality. And though he does outline some tactics and concepts for applying the techniques of this art, this is most likely a book for his students to read so they can brush up for their tests, but not for serious self-defense.In fact, this is not a book for any one interested in learning self-defense. Buy the book if you want to get killed on the street. Otherwise avoid it, unless you're a student of the author, of course. I'd hate to see what the "Basic" book is like, and as funny as this particular book is, it's not worth the money to buy it, even for a good laugh.
I am very disappointed with this CD set. I hardly recognize the sound on many songs. My favorite is Georgia on My Mind. I never heard a rendition like the one in this set. It is terrible. I am sorry I made this purchase.
I am really disappointed with the quality of this 2 CD set. Plus, I wasn't able to find a track list anywhere, and I was missing a LOT of songs I was looking forward to having.
This book arrived 2 months after I ordered it. I had already went to my trip to Greece. I was so pissed off!
Once you start reading Xanth novels, they become addicting. This one is not as addicting as some of the series
My son was very excited as we put the CD in the player! But when the music started, he was very unhappy!! The songs don't sound anything like the ones on the show. The melody and pace are different- and the performers aren't interesting. DON'T BUY if you are familiar with the 'REAL' songs.
The CD cover shows the 'performer as Noddy'. However, the songs are sung by various artists. They liked the songs, but my grandchildren were disappointed. They thought they would hear the voices heard on the DVD's.
This 52 minute video is nothing more than 8-10 minutes of bad content on a loop. It is a video of one woman doing sing-along style songs. Any claims that this is a "Sign Language" video are dubious at best. There are very few real American Sign Language signs, so few as to be pointless. An episode of Blues Clues has more signs. I feel ripped off, and I didn't even pay any money of out my own pocket (I was using $15 in free Amazon Unbox credit from a promotion). Stay away from this video at all costs. I highly recommend Signing Time, which isn't yet available from Amazon Unbox. I hope it will be soon; I'm going to send the makers of Signing Time an email asking them to get their content online.
Thw writer has done a marvellous job, writing the history of USAAF in one volume only, in a modern and acesible language. But there are two serious flaws: 1)there are no apendix, which could include the number of planes built, destroyed in combat, the number of enemy plane shot down, number of enlisted men at end of war, etc, etc.. 2)The photo session is so small, so ridiculous, that it should have been better to have no photos at all.
I picked up this book because I was researching my grandfather, who was a B-17 pilot shot down over Switzerland. I looked this up in the book, and immediately found inaccurate information. The author claims that only 10 crews made it to Switzerland in March of 1944, yet when my grandfather was shot down on 18 March 15 other crews were interned by the Swiss on the same day, the highest number in the entire war. The author also claims that many of the bombers landed with little or no damage, insinuating that they were intentionally getting out of the war. This is also false- the AAF conducted an extensive investigation during the war, and found that almost every bomber that landed in Switzerland had extensive damage. I'm not sure where the information in the book came from, but it is incorrect. Any crewman interned in Swizerland could have set the record straight in that regard, and there are plenty of them around who belong to the Swiss Internees Association.
This guy does not check his facts with primary sources and has many axes to grind. He has admited in interviews that he is not really an historian, but is rather a writer with research assistants and relies mostly on secondary sources. Useful only to those who know not where else to go. Really has it in for the B-29 and Hap Arnold.
a long time lou reed fan was so looking forward to recieving this dvd. if you are entrenched into the talent and feeling and soul of the lou reed album rocknroll animal, you will be so disapointed with this dvd. sweet jane and rocknroll i swear could be played better by a holiday inn cover band. save your money.
The author's message, in essence, is that working mothers are not "real" mothers. I can only assume that in the sequel to this sexist, essentialist rant, she will reveal how working fathers are not "real" fathers, and how they should build *their* careers around parenthood, and how they are sadly mistaken to think they could possibly be successful both in the labor force and at home.
Don't waste your money on this book unless you want to be insulted. Just because women work does not mean they can't be great moms. Finding quality daycare is key! My children loved their daycare providers and they loved playing with other kids. I like working and being a mom! I think I'm pretty good at it too!
If your drive thru mud and rain expect water to get in this bag. It is not very water resistant.
Just another book with huge text and lots of wasted space (that makes you think you are getting a lot of reading material).Unfortunately, not much info in this book. If you are looking for a simple, down-to-earth useful book, this really isn't it.Perhaps the other book I ordered, "Healing Secrets of the Native Americans: Herbs, Remedies, and Practices That Restore the Body, Refresh the Mind, and Rebuild the Spirit" [Hardcover] will have more useful info. If it ever gets here that is :(My verdict? "Secrets of Native American Herbal Remedies: comph GT Native amern Tradition Using Herbs Mind/Body/Spirit Connection for ipvg (Healing Arts)" [Paperback] is a complete waste of money.
This book is okay, but Brown Jenkin is not what I saw when I read HPL's "Dreams in the Witch House."It's not a good Masterton book, either. The last 30 pages seem as if he had to get it done fast, or be sued by the publisher.Skip it. "Spirit" is a lot better.
